A good Christmas carol dhenry winkler one during the depression. Henry winkler does a good job.a classic film I recommend for all ages.
How a bitter old man comes to know the true meaning of Christmas. Realizing to late his lost love and life.
Even though i don't care for Henry Winklers  acting i liked this movie it fit him real good ThanksDale
This is a wonderful movie. It stay faithful to A Christmas Carol, but it very American. A fun movie for one and all.
Henry Winkler played a great part as Scrooge.  It gave yet another twist to all the Christmas Carols of the past.
A great acting job by Henry Winkler. I saw this many years ago and it'll always be a Christmas favorite.
Henry Winkler does an amazing job as scrooge in this tale, he is an awesome actor, I really like sitting down to watch this movie on a cold night.
Henry Winkler makes this delightfull Dickens variant a treasure of its own.  (In Blu Ray now - yes!)  This great actor has always been a welcome see.
He did a great job as a Scrooge type character. I truly enjoyed this film. I liked him from the Happy Days show.
Henry Winkler does a great acting job as he protrays &#34;Mr. Scrooge.&#34; Here again one the whole family can enjoy!
This is one of my favorites... I was very happy to see it on this site. Henry Winkler  played this part well.
Henry Winkler plays a great part in this movie, brings it to life! Good modern version of Scrooge! Don't miss this classic
This is one of my favorite versions of the Scrooge story but they never show it now I can watch when I want to
Great American Versions of the Dickens's Classic.Enjoyed it very much This video is worth buying.It has a modern view of a &#34;Christmas Carol&#34;.
This is my favorite Christmas Carol movie. I have waited for it to come out, and when I finally looked it up again, I bought it!
We watch this every year, as well as the original story with George C. Scott....good contrast in stories and wonderful treats.
A must have for anyone who loves the Charles Dickens original. A great holiday movie for the family.
Henry Winkler was great and so was the cast.  I saw this years ago and very happy I could own it.  A great American take on an English classic.
gave it as a gift to my sister she love it.  a good telling of the life of Joseph, son of jacob.
Ah, my favorite Bible story. After watching this and seeing how well produced it was, I can only say that I watch it ast lease twice a month.
This movie is very inspirational to me, it helped me through my trails and tribulations during the time I needed it most, this movie relates to me.
I have watched this movie several times.  I really enjoy it.  It is an accurate account from the Bible.Thanks candpfoote
I read the Bible quite often and teach Bible classes from time to time. This is a very accurate account of the &#34;Joseph&#34; story.
this movie brought tears of jOY AND HAPPINESS to my eyes I can watch this movie over and over awesome movies
Great movie. Excellent acting and definitely not boring. Thank God like most Bible based movies these days this movie is exceeding with talent
joseph is one of my favorite movies. I can watch it over and over andnot get tired of watching it.
Acting was very good, the story line was well done and included all the important parts of the tale  without adding too much conjecture in.
This version I liked. Went behind the scenes. Not totally accurate but great version of this story.
Joseph is my favorite movie out of the Bible Collection. I am going to get one movie at a time as I can afford it until I have the whole collection.
This is the best and most accurate rendition of Joseph's life.  This is great for the family.
This is one of my most favorite stories in the Bible, recommend this one to anyone who loves a good Bible story.
Very well done.  Great acting for most of it.  towards the end the main character loses me a little bit, but for the most part I like it a lot.
Very good movie.  Another great Bible character truly comes to life and is a good message for the family.
This was a great DVD. It tells the story of Joseph and his family. Good for the whole family and great for reinforcing your knowledge of the Bible.
One of the few movies kids can watch without mom worrying about inappropriate scenes or information.  Perfect for the holidays.
Have always loved the old movies and this is the original frosty the snowman like I remember from my child hood. Grandkids loved watching it
Such a great classic Christmas movie, it is nice to pass it on to another generation. I watch it over and over!
Great family cartoon that will remind of your younger days when simple things made you laugh and smile.
Loved it as a kid - love it even more that my children can enjoy the digital version.  It never gets old!
I don't know how anybody could give this movie anything but five stars. I have loved this movie since I was a kid.
I have always loved Frosty now I can watch it whenever I want and will not have to wait until Christmas.
It is a great video for the kids, parents and grandparents to enjoy at Christmas time:) Hope your family enjoys it as much as our family does.
After all these years it's still a classic!  My five year old loved it as much as I did when I was a kid.
Christmas classic.  Every household should have a copy.  Brings back wonderful childhood memories that are part of many holidays' past!
I replaced a worn out VCR tape with this. Beautiful. My adult kids wanted it here (memories of childhood) The quality is excellent.
Very classic movie that brings back a load of memories from my childhood.I got this one to give to my little grandson. He enjoys it.
Great Christmas classic, always enjoy watching, must have for home to watch over and over.
great Christmas cartoon for the whole family to watch. And a great way to introduce the bible to the younger children, and grandchildren.
Drummer Boy will always be a favorite of mine. It teaches a good lesson to all kids to give from their hearts.
It may be low tech but it's still an endearing story. I enjoy watching this each year.I highly recommend this story to adults and children.
One of my favorite shows from childhood, I had to buy it for nostalgia reasons. My little neighbor loved watching it this Christmas season
Just like I remember it. Great holiday movie. Son enjoyed the "old fashion" animation as he calls it.
The Little Drummer Boy always brought tears to my eyes and this DVD is no exception!! This was a great story!!
This is a very good movie, especially for the kids.  Collect all of this type for the grandchildren and is great for our Christmas collection.
This is one of the best Christmas movies lf the season. I wish they had put it on tv. Political correctness sucks.
Loved this movie as a child and my kids loved this movie.  Hope the grandchildren feel the same.  Not Christmas until we watch this short movie.
I love this classic-it reminds me of the excitement and joy I use to feel at Christmas time-loved sharing this with my daughter and now my grandson!
Got it in time and all is well. Nothing Bad I can say about this cartoon! I Love the Little Drummer Boy!
One of the few movies kids can watch without mom worrying about inappropriate scenes or information. Perfect for the holidays.
It is always nice to enjoy a movie where I do not have to explain embarrasing actions or words. Fun for the whole family
Just like I remembered it when I was a kid. My son (11) also enjoyed it alot! The figures are still a great way to do animation.
Fast shipping, and Tape was in excellent condition.  Somehow these old shows are better in VHS.
This is everything I expected it to be.  It came considerably quick as well with ordering it right before the holiday.
This is a special, touching Christmas video.  Wonderful for the kids and to add to your Christmas collection
When I was a kid  I always enjoyed these movies at time of christmas.....feels like time is back ....without black and white of course...
I bought this cause I'm just feeling very nostalgic this year. It was really wonderful to see this again. The DVD is great.
We enjoyed watching even though we ordered late.  Will enjoy for years to come.  Great xmas story.  You/your kids will love it.
wow, only if they had these videos back when i was young. My kids want to watch this from thanksgiving to about March every year.
I have such fond memories of this movie growing up.  It is the story of Kris Kringle...and is a classic!  A must have for Holiday DVDS!
I love all the rankin bass video's I own all the christmas one's, the monster party is kind of dull and the easter bunny one is good.
Excellent film for those that love classic Christmas stories. Buy it now. That's an order.
Kids love this movie!
Perfect Memories to have , and for those to gain.
the same movie every one grew up with and or there kids.  great audio and video.  the destiny's child has a music video.
This is an older movie, but it has become a holiday favorite in my family. It's great for all ages and the songs are very catchy, too.
Once again the transfer is great!  Even though I have it on dvd,  it was worth it to buy on blu-ray.
THERE IS ONLY ONE RUDOLPH AND RANKIN & BASS HAVE DONE A SUPERB JOB CAPTURING THIS GREAT STORY.  A MUST SEE YEAR AFTER YEAR
I don't know what some people were sent. But, I got the original. It is just as we've all seen growing up. I love it!
A Classic movie!  Just incredible!
So many reviews, just wanted to add my rating to the overall score for my favorite christmas movie.
Truly a holiday classic. I watch it every year. Without being preachy, it teaches us to accept each other as we are.
seen it many many times and I just absolutely love it...one to be added to any collection and cherished for years to come
I call myself  The Queen of Movies, and I really enjoyed this movie , and plan to watch it again soon!
This reminds me of my childhood, minus all of the commercials.  If you like the TV specials but would rather watch it on your own terms, get this!
I had to get a copy for my sons to view--it's hardly on TV anymore.  This DVD version appears in good quality, and is great fun for the holidays.
i remember this movie growing up when i was a kid andone of the best kid movies ever there is and a favoriteto everyone
This is one of the BEST old-time classics!  I have loved  this all my life, and I am 52, and I still love to watch it.
Good blu-ray and nice quality. I got to watch it on Christmas this year, and it brought back a lot of childhood christmas memories!
My husband, myself, and my two adult children think this is one of the greatest Christmas movies of all time.  A classic that everyone must own!!
Our kids loved this and I wanted it on DVD for grandchildren. Color, sound, everything is lovely. A family favorite.
This movie is a tradition in our house, so having the DVD which is remastered is great to have.  Finally able to toss the old VHS tape!
This is probably the best of the Christmas cartoons.  It never grows old and should be a Christmas tradition for everyone.
My all time favorite Christmas movie. Got it for my granddaughter. She loves it as much as I do. One of the all time best Christmas movies.
This has always been one of my favorite Christmas movies to watch. I grew up watching this and can't wait to introduce my children someday.
Gave as a gift and he loved it and didn't know it was anything like this. It was easy to find and it came when you said.
Great picture quality, fine supplemental material, edited into a seamless presentation (minus the minor 'filler' characters).
THE 'FEEL GOOD' MOVIE OF THE YEAR....SEE IT WIT YO KEEEEEEYUDS!  Oye, I hate CONTRIVED HYSTERIA!
Wonderful movie and a must see! I Watch it every easter as a reminder of what the holiday and my faith is about.
the truth as I know it, I cry everytime I watch this movie, great doing business with saler, was fast.
The story is eternal, Blu-Ray makes the movie that much more enjoyable. I highly recommend you upgrade to the Blu-Ray edition
I highly recommend this movie. TO see what our King did for us sinners was just tear jerking for me the whole way through. Thank you JESUS!
I am a movie afficianado - i like all kinds of movies, especially those that are educational and entertaining - this is one.
Aramaic with English SUBTITLES.  They should of did it in a English version too I think.  Amazing Quality in 1080p.
I received the movie within the said time, also received the movie in excellant conditions and will use them again, thank you.Dianne
THIS MOVIE WAS VERY WELL MADE. MEL GIBSON DID AN OUTSTANDING JOB WITH THIS MOVIE. THIS IS A VERY POWERFUL MOVIE THAT EVERYONE SHOULD OWN.
Good perspective on what happened to Jesus.  Love that the Biblical language is used and the Bible is quoted throughout the movie.
A must have for dvd collectors. Best DVD of All Time. A must see. It will change your Life.
A Respectfully done Version of the Life and Ministry of the ONLY Son of GOD, our LORD and Savior JESUS CHRIST. A must-see for all.
This is a movie I have avoided watching until a few days ago. I am glad I watched this, the suffering of Christ is very accurately portrayed.
Very powerful message and it gives hope. Strong stuff, very insightful and very detailed powerful film of all times.
religion department at my school is pleased to be able to show this re-cut version of the film!
EXTRAS all around. If you watch movies but adore the extras then this Blu-ray edition is the one to own even if you own this movie in another format.
This was the second time my wife and I had seen this movie and it was as powerful and moving as the first.
A great movie to see.  Excellent acting and the story is great.  A movie all should watch be you religious or not.  Tells a great story.
my mother likes these types of movies and the price was a good value I would recommend this movie if this is the type of movie you watch
This is a wonderful movie. Biblically accurate and vivid portrayal of the Passion. It really makes you grateful for Jesus' sacrifice.
An incredible motion picture that captures the Passion in a way no one else has. Highly recommended.
this is such a wonderful story to be shared and told over and over. great movie, well done, great purchase
Very good movie. So realistic like being there at that time. I also enjoyed hearing the original language. This movie reaches out to you.
I felt like I was there, feeling all the hate, seeing all the suffering that Jesus Christ endured for our love and salvation.
What can I say that has not already been said by the positive reviews? Well worth watching again. Love or hate Gibson, it doesn't matter.
great powerful movie tells how Jesus went thru the suffering for us to show us Hos love to save the world.
excellent movie with superb direction from mel gibson. this should of won an oscar for independent release. very realistic depiction of jesus.
This Film Change My Life In A Better Way , Try To Wach Very Carefully And Try To Understand Why Mel Made This Movie
i cried the whole entire moving, it surely gives u a idea of what our lord and savior really sacrifice just for us
They did such and amazing job on this show.  It is in the language of the time but you know it all by heart as you watch it and don't really notice.
A very good story, the violence is very graphic.It is a different view of the last moments of Jesus' life.
Great film as an ever present reminder. Always like to have a look again every so oftern .Glad i made the purchase to have in my library of DVDs
Very Intense believe able movie about Jesus Christ. Even though it is subtitled, it's easy to understand what's going on . Another MUST SEE !!
Bought this to go with the kids version and adult version of the book.  My students loved it and read the books as well. Great lessons in life.
WOW  this was great story about a poor kid overcoming his child hood!CARSON FOR PRESIDENT!  :-)
great movie and inspiring.  giving as gifts to some doctors and friends.  they appreciate the move and gift everyday from us
Wonderful movie about a wonderful person.  It shows how anyone can overcome diversity if encouraged and they really want to make their lives better.
Ben Carson is an inspiration to hear and see about.  His Faith is solid and a very big part of his life.  This dvd is great to watch.
A wonderful picture that is a true story about a great man. It is definitely a  message of hope. Everyone should watch it.
What a wonderful inspiring story. I so want my nephew to watch this movie. So good I must Pass it forward!
When I first saw this movie I was moved and needed to add it to my movie collection.  It is very inspiring!
Best film ever for inspiration and motivation, it is a must see for everone.  He is a role model for all of us.  THANKS
Received promptly, great condition ~ Inspirational DVD.(We saw this before ~ enjoyed it so much that we decided to addit to our DVD Library.)
A VERY SENSATIVE STORY THAT WASN'T AFRAID TO ADMIT THERE IS A SUPREME BEING THAT CREATED US ALL. I was impressed.
Thank you so much... I love this movie so much! It is a real treat to watch this when ever I want to now!
This DVD shows determination and fortitude and will set a good example for young people of today.  Purchase yours today.
I saw this before and I decided to buy another one as a gift!  It is outstanding and I know it based on true story.  It also has closed caption.
Gooding plays his role to the max. Another true story that was good. Again my fav is true story's. Loved it!
I liked this move because it is based on a true story and that is the kind of movies I really like
ANOTHER TRUE STORY THAT IS UPLIFTING.  ONE GETS EMOTIONALLY INVOLVED IN THE DRAMA AND ITS SUCCESSFUL ENDING.  BLESS DR. CARSON.
This is well acted and based on a true story.  You will not be bored.  I recommend it for a family.
COMMON SENSE.....SO REFRESHING.....TOUCHES MY HEART. YOU MAY SEE SOME OF YOURSELF AND HOPEFULLY WANT TO BE MORE THEN YOU ARE NOW.
We received this dvd and I've watched it with delight and even shared with my friend.  Truly pleased with the speedy delivery and the dvd
Well done true story about Ben Carson, world-renowned brain surgeon, and a real inspiration to all of us.  A good video to add to your collection.
This movie is so clear even though it is in black and white. It's story lime keeps your interest. A must buy
I just love old classics. These are the movies of all movies.  Just love old classics. I love the actors and actresses back then.
Very Clever! Well Acted! A downright good time. Good god I sound like a jerk. But it was good.
An ultra-funny parody of the college life of George Lucas and how he was inspired to write the &quot;Star Wars&quot; trilogy.
THIS JUST IN: THE NOODLE HAS WON THE RACE!
if you like to learn about the civil battles this is a great one on Gettysburg.I would buy again .
A wounderful new take on Battle of Gettysburg using drones to view ba ttle as the soliders saw it. Well worth seeing as history and a virtrial tour.
This is a good video. It goes to each versus as in the bible.  Very good not boring. Eould recommend to everyone
The actor who plays Jesus could have ben better but he's good enough. The movie is Biblically accurate and it's something for the entire family!
I loved it. Same as Part i. I have watched this video along with Part 1 2 times and am going to watch it again tonight
Acting and scenery was truly amazing! They reenacted the life of my Lord very well and the narration was great!
It tells you alot about Jesus as told by Matthew. He talks about Jesus's lessons and how he healed people.
See my review on Part 1.  I am not a bible reader, so watching both parts were both educational and entertaining.  I recommend it.
The DVD is one of the best decriptions of how I feel Jesus was.  I loved it.  It was in great shape.
I believe the inspired author's intent was faithfully portrayed.  This is an excellent supplement for a small group Bible study.
Comes on two DVD's, and it about four and a half hours long.  It's a great movie for family viewing, especially for younger viewers.
I have not watched this but I am going to..this is great..it's worth buying. Yes I would recommend thisto anyone out there..
JOE AND STEVE PLAY ALMOST THE SAME. Eric has so much talent. I only wish I could hear more Eric Johnson!
This is some of the best guitar work you will ever see on one stage in one concert, you will not regret this disc.
Music to calm the heart of beasts!!! Hard to choose what offering is the best!!
Having seen Stomp a few years ago, this was a truly enjoyable DVD.  My toddler also found it interesting and entertaining.
I bought this for my daycare, I love it and never tire of seeing it. The kids get up and dance to it.
The kids love it.
My 3 year old & 1 year old love this movie! They laugh & think it is great!
Great movie all kids.  It is entertaining, nicely done and keeps the kids entertained. My 6 year old and 2 year old granddaughter love it.
My little one is ga ga for Elmo and this gives it up in spades.  She really likes this one and it's perfect for someone her age-around 15months.
Awesome movie and condition of dvd. I will buy another copy as the condition was good and my grand daughter loves it.
I bought this for our 2 year old who is learning to count.  He loves it!  It really adds to our Sesame Street collection.
my kids LOVE this video. From 1-5 years old. The 5 year old, not as much. But still it's a great video.
daughter loved it when she was 2-3 yrs old, Its a childs DVD not sure what else to say its cute?  Helps them learn?
I have yet to give this to a kid who didn't go crazy for this video! It is a timeless classic!
Now this one os good, not like those horrible Elmo ones.
It is all your favorite seasme street characters teaching the kids the ABC's. It is cute and I would buy it again.
Kathy Smith has always amazed me with her hard workouts that she makes fun and energizing.
I ordered this for my 3 year old Elmo fan. He loved it and watches it often. He loves the part when Elmo is dusting!!!
My then 2 year old and 7 year old both like this movie. They have both watched it several times and continue to watch it every now and then.
Such a great spin on Cinderella for the boys in this Elmo adventure!!! Love it! Have watched it about 10 times in 5 days so far!
CinderElmo is so funny!  I laugh at the comedy and my 20 month old daughter dances to the music.  We both love it!
It was a really cool movie. I liked it and it is great. I picked it and it is prefect for a 8 year old.
This animated movie may not be as good as the 1939 Wizard of Oz masterpiece, but it is still a great movie to get.
Paul gilbert showing some of his favorite chops, a true innovator of the 80'sguitar era with racer x/mr.big and his solo work!!!!
Such a great vocal warmup, exercise and overall technique. Has helped me immensely in becoming a better and more powerful screamer and singer.
This was everything I expected & I'm happy with this.I love Andy Kaufman he was the greatest man ever.
Ordered this for my library collection.God Bless America!God Bless America!God Bless America!God Bless America!God Bless America!
I love this movie so much I love how it shows a little of the trail of tears and how people help the native americans
Homeless For The Holidays it a great movie would gift it to everyone you do not find movies like this much any more
I love Christmas movies.  I love them all year long.  This one was very special and heartwarming. A great one to watch with loved ones.
very very good movie,  every one should see this movie.  you can see why people should always be nice to everybody
What a great 80's revenge movie with tons of violence and gore/ This was an incredible cult movie with some interesting kills..
this is one of the best kaiju movies ever the first time godzilla became a hero and i love both versions of this movie japanese and american
Bought for my brother for Christmas he loves these old movies anything to do with Godzilla the guy in the rubber suit as I call him...
My kids love it just as I did 40 years ago.
The original Godzilla Vs. Ghidorah, before it became an apology tour in the 1990's, to Imperial Forces of Japan. Great
Great movie and all of the stars are in it and they seem to have a good sense of hummer.....what a conversational piece!!
This is one of the more sinister monsters. I really enjoyed watching this movie and the sequels with this monster against other creatures.
Quality of this movie was real bad. My VCR was betterI rated it because I have all of the Godzilla movies in VCR
This is one of those movies I first saw on the (Dialing for Dollars Show) that my grandma use to watch. Glade to have watched it again.
Just as I remembered watching on WOR TV years ago on the day after Thanksgiving movie marathon. Great to have this on DVD now.
I love Godzilla since I was a kid. My children will love him as well. One of my favorites movies.
Another winner from CLASSIC MEDIA!  If you are a GODZILLA fan, add this to your DVD collection.  Good, quality DVD.
This is a great movie but I would like the option to see the original version offered with English subtitles.
had the vhs growing up this movie is just great for godzilla movie collecters you love it. well worth getting
This is such a good miniseries.  Great acting with great British actors.....great storyline.  Highly recommended.
PBS always delivers. This is one of their better romantic two-part series.  The stars of great to looks at, and the plot-line was captivating.
Love this movie! Saw it years ago and had to own it!  Love  Michel Kitchen.  I also loved Motherlove which I wish was on DVD.
DC in the early days.It's not difficult to see why he was chosen as the new Jams Bond.. Enjoyed this DVD.
First major role for Daniel Craig and a great start to his career.  Good mysterious who-done-it with lots of great characters and interesting plot.
A two part movie. Very entertaining. British mysteries are the best. An early Daniel Craig movie. Does a good job.
Daniel Craig is much younger not as good looking as he presently is as James Bond but he does a great job with this mystery.  Very enjoyable.
this is really an engaging mystery and the first time I saw Daniel Craig. He is an interesting actor. Great service.
Very funny for Woody's first full length feature.  He's an incompetant bank robber and his wife is a laundress.  Enjoy!
Classic slapstick humor movie by Woody Allen. Silly. Funny.
Very well conditionedGood image and soundI recommend it for all lovers of Woody Allen movies and all movie lovers
Woody Allen's Take the Money and Run is one of my favorites amount his great movies.  It is hilarious!  I love it!
Wuthering Heights can be a little confusing. I found this version easier to follow and the characters easier to understand. Very good effort.
I love the view (and the story) of the island.  It's played by 2 top actors.
Lee Marvin and Toshiro Mifune (you may remember him from Seven Samurai) with only one chance for survival, very entertaining.
Very enjoyable film which in Hollywood's poetic license of ways was not a bad representation of pre medieval life of pre German life.
An interesting breakaway from the traditional British mystery with an exotic setting, well-drawn characters, and you almost feel you are there!
Excellant series. Wonderfully written. Trevor Eve is an enjoyable character and is fleshed out. I recommend this series. You will enjoy it.
Great stories and Kenya as a back ground.  Daring do and high drama.  Plus Kenya as it was in that time in History.
This movie is corny and just fun. With improved technology of today, I would love to see a remake. A comic book comes to life.
i love this movie, my second fav old video.fast car chases, cool car gadgets, and a good senseof humor. tops james bond any day....
This one is great!, if you haven't seen it, it is totally worth purchasing, My kids were cracking up when they were watching it!
I'm buying classic moves.  I remember this from long ago and since I liked it then, I bought it so others could watch it.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE I SAW IT FOR THE FIRST TIME DURING MY CHILDHOOD ON VHS IN THE 80'SGREAT FAMILY FUN AS USUAL IN DISNEY MOVIES I RECOMEND IT.
A movie from my childhood. I saw this all the time. Its alittle cheesy but still holds up as a great movie.
One of my favorite movies of my youth. It was one that the whole family enjoyed. A good movie to take me back.
Hunted high & low for this movie.. I remember seeing this on HBO & I based my sons birthday party on this movie.Micheael J is great in this!
So cute...just love this movie, always have.  Bunch of old familiar Disney faces.  Lots of laughs and slapstick-ish kind of stuff.Great fun!
I have looked everywhere for this movie and was thrilled to find it.  It was mailed with care and is a nice addition to my DVD Disney collection.
The movie starts a little slow but if you hang in there you'll laugh untill your sides hurt.  Very clean family movie.
This dvd is a nice clean comedy and very entertaining for all us older people.
who can pass on this great cast of actors and actresses in a story of intrigue and pandemonium inside a group of church ladies.
My favorite Argento flick has been re-mastered and uncut by the folks at Anchor Bay. You won't be disappointed.
Ya gotta love the Bobby Rhodes character, he made this movie work.  Great film.  No need to rent it first, just buy it.
This movie is a classic and I am excited that I own it. The movie has a mixture of comedy and horror; this is an excellent find.
This is one of my favorite horror movies. Interesting script and concept and directed very well, with one of my favorite soundtracks.
A REAL crowd pleaser, Italy puts out some of the best horror & in my opinion this is MAYBE the best !
Great family movie with romance, comedy and wholesomeness. Enjoyable for children and adults. One of my families favorite comedy movies.
This is one of the oldest movie that i've seen before and this movie keeps getting better and better all the time.
Suspenseful !  I love watching this movie from the very first time I saw it.  That is why I purchase it so that I can watch whenever I please.  Ha!
This is a REAL thriller! I love how the car looks and the movie is done in good taste-no blood or gore.
This is an excellent movie.  I saw it first when I was a kid and I still enjoy it.  The product arrived timely and well packaged.
Such a great movie of its time, like the evil car, loved James Brolin.Great Entertainment! Sort of like Stephen King's Maximum Overdrive.
I LIKED THIS MOVIE AND GOT A FEW JUMPS JUST THINK AN EVIL CAR RUNNING AROUND.
the car is an excellent movie with james brolin is the lead actor the car its a horrow movie its very good with lots of sacpence in it.
I loved this movie for Duvall's performance alone. His character is so believable, I found myself crying at some moments.
a good movie.  I've been wanting to add this to my collection. Disney is always a pleaser. glad I bought this because I hardly ever see it on tv.
I bought this for my daughter - one of her favorite Christmas movies.  It was in good condition and shipped on time.
Now I can watch it online this great warm tale of a Chrismas story made me cry love it rent it it's so affordable
this is a great movie i could watch this movie every day i really love it thank you so much
A very good movie. I would recommend it to anyone. It is a great christmas story. looking forward to watching it again.
This is one of our favorite Christmas movies. Had it in VHS and purchased this whe. We converted to DVD. We watch it every holiday season.
This was a favorite when I was a kid and I purchased to relive those memories , I like the movie .
One of my favorite Christmas movies I was happy to add to my collection.  It is a great holiday movie.
One Magic Christmas is the best Christmas movie that many people have never even heard of. I make sure to watch it every year.
this is a family favorite.  We watch it every year  it is a god family movie for the christmas season.
The DVD arrived quickly and in excellent condition.  I really wanted this movie in my collection. It's a Christmas must-have.
I was looking forward to this movie, and got it super fast !!! Love the expedient service, and look forward to ordering again
A take off of Scrooge, but with a twist.  Sad but wonderful.  Ranks with White Christmas and Wonderful Life according to my wife!
"One Magic Christmas" is an excellent Christmas classic.  No home should be without it.
One of the best stories for christmas, one for the whole family. Good actors, great story, one you will watch over and over again.
Some movies are touching and this is one of them.  Good for the whole family to watch. I think kids would even love it.
This is a very good movie. Long time ago I transferred the vhs to dvd, but just did not have the quality. This DVD I have now is AWESOME. Ray
This is a unique story for Christmas but you'll enjoy it. I love the story line and it's excellent for the season.
I asm very pleased with the DVDI like Christmas movies and hope others will be available that are not available now!
JUST A  CHRISTMAS MOVIE TO ADD TO OUR PRESENT CHRISTMAS MOVIES ALREADY IN OUR COLLECTION OF MOVIES AND FOR OUR AMUSEMENT.....
Great atmospherics! Watch this late on a stormy night and you will be entralled. I like this film better than Gaslight.
Outstanding movie!!! If you love a good thriller this is your movie.
Great movie for the OLD MOVIE LOVER!!  Suspenseful and fun! Amazing performance by Dorothy McGuire.
The mother loved and appreciated it and said thank you. I was just glad I could help the mother out.
One of 2011's best TV releases, this is a must-see even if you've not seen the original program. Buy this now!
It's a great series with interesting characters and fabulous costumes! A window into an era of war and changing alliances. Fascinating!
But then again I love BBC television - especially the older stuff where there is great language; no violence, no swearing - nice change.
Great story and love the characters.  If you are a fan of Downton Abby you will be a fain of this show.
This is a very interesting series. I have not had a chance to watch the whole season, but I like what I watched.
This is a great set of shows.The language is great and women are clothed.I wish there were more shows to watch.
Every bit as good as Doughton Abbey, try to find the older series before viewing  this one it will be worth the effort.
Get more shows like this? It's authentic to the times, it has intrigue and romance; war and peace. An engrossing insight into the time period.
Great story line and a great look into History. Outstanding performance by the actors. This is a very educational and enjoyable series.
This is the best thing done in a very long time. Period stuff is great education, inspiration and plain old fun!
I love the English shows. This was one series I could not see  and I would forget to set the recorder.Thanks
Really a nice follow-up to the original series. Picks up in the 1930's leading up to WWII. Looking forward to season 2 and more.
Love show depicting the life of the upper crust and those who serve them in the early 1900s. Very enjoyable and touching.
Picks up close to where the original show ended.  If you enjoyed the original program, you will most certainly enjoy this continuing saga.
The actors, sets and costumes are real great.  The story lines are less &#34;soapy&#34; than DA.  The class issues are much clearer and well drawn.
So interesting to find out how people lived back then! Kept you guessing as to what was going to happen next.
I totally loved this revamp of the the series! Superb acting!I could watch ten more seasons!!!A must see for Downton Abbey lovers too!
I didn't watch this show in the '70's and decided it was now time. I love it, and would probably watch it again.
Beautiful scenery and costumes.  Mostly great actors and characters.  The plot is a little like a soap opera, but really draws one in.
I especially enjoy these because they go into depth more than an hour long showing. I find the Brits seem to be really good at this.
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. I love all the actors and actresses as well. It was very entertaining. Couldn't wait to watch Season 2.
Great TV viewing. I thoroughly enjoyed the show. I hope there will be a second series. More shows like this please.
I loved Downton Abby....started watching this since I had seen all of the episodes and anxiously awaiting more...this is good...but no comparison...
I thoroughly enjoyed this series. The characters are believable and engaging. I am excited about season 2 starting...it is a fun series!
I enjoyed the era that this movie was based on , the characters made the movie believable and surreal. waiting for series 2
I really enjoy watching this and other BBC shows. Watching it in HD isgreat, thank you very much for offering it.
I rewatched the old series recently.  It was great to see the house carry on and Miss Rose become a part ofit's new story.
the acting is superb as is the writing! I would recommend the series to anyone wishing to step back in the history of that peroid.
The story had the past blended into the new story very nicely. I'm looking forward to watching the rest of the series.
You must watch the Upstairs Downstairs series from the 1970...the whole thing ties in so well and very interesting bit of history
I really love this show. The characters are really engaging. And the story is addictive. If you like Downton Abby you'll like this.
This continuation of the series was most welcomed.  I only watched parts here and there of the original series.  Great!
Watched it with devotion in the 70s.  Now is seems more like watching a filmed play. I recommend it highly for the whole family.
This is one of my favorite series on BBC. Have really enjoyed it along with Call the Midwife and Downton Abbey.
I watched this of course many years ago when it first came on PBS.  When I found it on Amazon I watched it again and it was still excellent.
Watched the original Upstairs Downstairs, and had to buy the carry on series, If you like the original, you should look at these
Great remake, but not as good as the first, but I still would tell anyone that loves British movies to buy it.
I am a lover of English drama and this fills the bill.  Maybe it the historical part of it all but I definitely recommend Upstairs Downstairs.
Very good show, hoping Season Two is even better.  A bit like Downton Abby, quite similar for sure.  Like it.
It's been a nice change watching this series. It's fun to see what other countries were like in the early 1900's.
I am really enjoying watching this series on my Kindel Fire HD.It is so nice to revisit a great series from the past.
This is a great series, and so is the following season.... I keep going back and watching this over and over and over
i just love it  i wish it would go on forever.  i don't watch tv much anymore i watch this in my kindle
Great show with a great story, like downton abbey but made much earler and covers the victorian era. costumes are great
Love this series.  I had not seen it before and am really enjoying watching it with my Roku.  Looking forward to the rest of the seasons.
I love this show, all the characters. I so wish there were more shows shown on tv!!  Thank you PBS/Masterpiece theater!!
We are still watching these TV shows and like them very much.  Thanks to Amazon Prime for giving us these shows.
I'm hooked.  Very entertaining; not just humorous but offers a great insight into the emotions of the characters; great acting also.
We watched the original, and, while this programme started off a bit slow, it did pick up, and is very good.  We need more of this type programming.
I thoroughly enjoyed watching this series. Each episode was better than the last. The acting was so superb that I felt as if I was part of the cast.
I got hooked on British television years ago with Upstairs Downstairs and remain a great fan today.  Brilliant! Brilliant! Brilliant!
Really enjoyed and would love to see more of it. The storyline and timeline tied to other entertainment to add to the story.
I couldn't stop watching until I watched the whole season and then onto Season 2,3,and 4.  Outstanding characters, actors, and customs of the day.
I love all BBC tv show, soaps, movies and anything else they make.  I stll have quiet a bit too watch before i catch up too now.
i loved this series its so good  ....i love series so this one is a winner ..awesome series i loved it
Enjoyed having access to this series.  Quality TV is scarce and to know that it is being archived is a good thing. Thanks
Great stories, authentic sets, well acted, engaging....got hooked on series 1, watched series 2 and  3.  Working through the rest.
After the years since the series was first produced it still pulls you in.  I got hooked on the people and their lives.  Great entertainment.
If you like Netflix and have seen the original series Upstairs Downstairs then you MUST see this too.  Beautiful how they have redone the house.
Great version of Upstairs Downstairs.  Better that the older version.
I personally am a great fan of both the era and of the type of show. I was not disappointed.
I love the style the women wore back then. I wish hats were back in style! You can judge a woman by her hat and pullng it off!
Loved the original show and this follow up is just as good. Can't watch the second season until it goes to prime.
Great story writing & acting makes you feel like you're right there with the family. Don't watch this if you don't want to get addicted.
We really enjoy following the lives of these people--the servants and the served; witnessing how their lives intersect and depend on one another.
He is one of the best Mr Rochester's everI am glad that I added it to my collection ofJane Eyre movies
I like this version very much, I recommend it
This is a true girls move and makes my wife and her girlfriends quiet for at least two hours, happy Wife happy Life
I must have read the book hundreds of times in my youth. This is my favorite Jane Eyre movie. The movie was wonderful.
Samantha Morton and Ciaran Hinds are in one of the most romantic love stories I have ever seen on film.
I bought this movie to add to my Jane Eyre movies.  It is well acted and most enjoyable.  This is how I introduce my granddaughter to classics.
This is a good movie too. i really love being able to order and get the movies I really want . I like the fast shipping too.
Read so many classics when I was young.  It's really a delight to see the characters come to life on DVD.
I absolutely loved this movie. It is well acted and excellent script. I would highly recommend this movie to anyone who loves the time period.
THIS MOVIE IS SO ROMANTIC, I COULD WATCH IT OVER AND OVER. IT IS SO BEAUTIFULLY FILMED. THE COSTUMES AND THE  BEAUTIFUL SCENERY ARE FANTASTIC.
the story is full of twist and disappointments. I enjoyed it a great deal and continue to watch it again
I saw this on television a dozen years or so ago and loved it at the time.  Spotting it on Amazon (and so reasonably priced) was too good to pass up.
This series is excellent! I was hoping that it was the complete series but I am glad that I received what I purchased.
Other than not exactly following the books, these are really good sea stories. For all lovers of the wooden ships and iron men era.
This is an amazing series with never a dull moment.  If you like high seas adventure and historical drama, this is for you.
We saw the entire series on PBS TV years ago. It is just as good as Sharps Rifles. Great acting and script.
If your not an Aglophile--don''t watch this movie. Peck--excellent-Mayo beautiful, addan interesting plot and good cast and you have it all.
Thank's for the outstanding job in keeping and sending this video in perfect shape . I will enjoy it for manny years to come. ART
again I cant say enough about it is very action packed and it was a great way for back in the times
I can't get enough of Steed and Mrs. Peel. This was a great purchase and I'm thrilled to add it to my growing collection of The Avengers.
This show should never have gone out of reruns. The DVD arrived on time and in good condition.
I used to watch this as a child and thought it was soo scary. Not so scary any more, just fun.
If you like beautiful women and handsome capable escorts--you'll like this. Good plot-excellent acting..What more could you want? Two more words.
very nice i enjoy the british tv cult i think  she is very hot looking and they are a clever team together
Handy collection of this favorite show, which arrived in good time and in good shape.
So happy with this dvd--being an Avengers fan and having the source for such items makes my tv watching a pleasant experience.
You'll love these black-and-white Avengers episodes but buy the set for a much better deal:Avengers '66 - Set 2, Vols. 3 & 4
One of the great novels of the 19th century, and British television does the very best at being faithful to the original when they dramatize.
I saw this on PBS after I had read the book.  It is very faithful to the book, so I decided to buy a copy for my home video library.
I enjoyed this version of the Emma saga ! It was acted so well, and I prefer this one over several others I have viewed.
nosey young female that thought she knew everything about love but found out she knew nothing- she learned valuable lessons of life.
We love this version of Emma.  We've watched it several times, and enjoy it each time.  Definitely would recommend this one!
Perfect! Excellent! Thank you! I really love this movie.I absolutely recommended this!I will buy some more movies, great experience
A charming adaptation of the Jane Austen classic, with believable characters and a good pace throughout.  I highly recommend this version.
Wonderful performances from a great cast. Great choice of scenes and dialog from the book. It truly captured the essence of one of our great novels.
I thoroughly enjoyed this DVD of EMMA.  I love Jane Autin's books.
I like the movie and watch it several times a week .I wish we had  real men like Mr. Knightly..
I truly like this series. The pictures and illustration are fascinating. I haven't seen in the series but look forward to it.
It is very well done and interesting from beginning to end, recommend it to people who are interested in Space.
This was a very good video, explaining the most scientific data to date on how the planets were formed and what they consist of.
Watched this for my son to get a better grasp on his science lesson but kept watching because it was so interesting. Great actual footage.
Excellent movie!Acting was very good.I loved getting to know the historical characters .Movie was well done. One I can watch over and over again
Jeff daniels did a superb job as he always does. I'm intrigued by what our forefathers fought through for us to gain the freedoms we now own.
I love this movie. great acting and very well done. I would definitely replace this movie if it becomes damaged
My husband had seen this on TV and really liked it so I got it for him as a Birthday suprise. He was thrilled Thank You,
This movie is one of the best on General Washington and the crossing of the Potomac!! A must for the history lover!
Will not will any awards but if you like American history you will find it entertaining. A different look at history.
Regret to InformA moving film extremely enjoyable as a Vietnam veteran depicts the effects on those at home perfectlyTony Green
cathy gale plays a very nice part in the 1964 series and patrick macnee is also very clever also in this series
As very interested in WWII, I found these discs particularly accurate and well done.  Cannot recommend them too highly ( 2 come in the package)
Simon. E. Grant is superb as  Percy Blakeney! His turn as Blakeney is much better than Leslie Howard's turn.  I cannot wait for a new series!DGW
Good intrigue, based on a rough period in France's History.If you like historical series , you should enjoy viewing  this movie.
THIS IS A MARVELOUS VERSION OF THE OLD CLASSIC. IT HAS HUMOR, TREACHERY, SWORDFIGHTS, REVENGE, LOVE AND FRIENDSHIP ALONG WITH SOME EXCELLENT ACTING.
Perfect when you want to watch something that takes you to a different time and place...romantic, exciting, idealistic, arch and classic.
You like the civil war?  You like watching a civil war documentary and being able NOT to fall asleep?  Do yourself a favor and buy this.
What a way to celebrate the 150th years of the Civil War . The DVD's add to the knowledge of the great conflict.
A colorful view of WWII. Mostly have only seen black and white WWII - this gives it a new depth.  I would recommend.
I'm getting the entire series - bit by bit.  That's how much I like Suchet and Poirot.
I always enjoy David Suchet as Poirot.  The stories follow the book fairly well and I always enjoy the movies no matter how many times I watch them.
Love Christie's work. Agatha makes all of us work our brains and for the most part, we do not come up with the answer.
I love this show and now I have complied the entire set.  I hate that TV always gets rid of the &#34;good&#34; showes
This was a Christmas present for my mother and she loved it. She needed this to complete her Dr. Quinn collection.
All in all, despite extremely few lame episodes, both my wife and I enjoyed the series very much and wish it had run a couple more years!
I truly do love these old tv shows. I do not watch a lot of the new shows of today but I will always watch these type of TV show.
This is a very enjoyable TV Series, One you can pick up and watch again.  I have watched it more than once.
It was good. I would recomend it along with rhe rest of rhe Dr Quinn series. I like watching western type movies and series.
great family showthat entertains you each and every episode.when we are done my wife says we will watch them again.
this series has it all,adventure, romance,travel and true family settings.The dynamics of the family are tested and strengthened on a daily basis
Completed my set. It was in excellent shape and got it very fast. Love this series. Can't wait to watch the whole series......^i^
WONDERFUL TELEVISION SERIES. WE NEED MORE LIKE THESE. JANE SEYMORE IS A WONDERFUL ACTRESS. I HAVE REALLY LIKED EVERY SEASON. THANKS AND SHALOM
I love this series nothing better then  good English acting  , a little dry some times but on a whole  I love it j.m.arnold
A real CLASSIC!  Gave this as a gift to my mother, and she is totally entertained by it.  Another wonderful british show!
Wonderful series. We were so sorry when it ended !! The next series is not nearly as good :(  Sorry to say!
A very enjoyable series. A must have in any British collection for devotees of Masterpiece Theatre. Extremely entertaining.
Really very awesome series,  I am glad to own it as I did not get to see all when it aired, so have really enjoyed being able to catch up on it
Mel Brooks is a master as satire and comedy. This is the perfect way to have all his best films in one place.
I always liked Mel Brooks  as an actor and director and this  set of his movies are the main reason why....
one of the best commedie movies made by him i love them all blazing saddles was the best bring more.
No comedy collection is complete with out the Mel Brooks Collection. Comedy genius on all levels. A truly great man.
Mel Brooks is the best.  All of his movies are laugh out loud favorites of ours.  Can't wait to get started on watching them all again.
Great set of comedy classics.  And they look good in Blu-ray.  The best films are Blazing saddles, History of the World, and Young Frankenstein.
I got this for $27ish when it was Amazon's Deal of the Day. What a steal. The movies are great and it had all my favorites.
This has been one of my most enjoyed purchases lately. It provides continuous laughs time and time again. Highly recommended.
His humor is wonderful, you can't watch his movies without laughing, so glad we now haave these classics in the home.
If you love Mel Brooks then this collection is a must have.  I love have Blu-Ray box sets.  A bunch of movies in a smaller container.
This is the 8 best of Mel Brooks classic movies.Best first time Mel movie purchases for less that purchasing individual movies.
This many awesome movies in one set, how could you go wrong?  I bet you can't watch them all in one day!
I really have enjoyed the movies and am glad to have obtained it for my collection. You must own it also
Good movies from back in the day for a cheap price. Definitely worth it if you like mel brooks movies
I'm not a fan of "Men In Tights", but even it looks great in this set. Beautiful set at a good price, and I loved the "book" that comes with it.
What can you say about this, other than it's his best movies collected in one box with lots of extra material
I would definitely purchase this item again and recommend it to others.I would definitely purchase this item again and recommend it to others.
What a master of comedy! That pretty much says it all for those who get it! This set has it all.
Do you think that Mel Brooks has directed some good movies?  Then this is an amazing set of movies, I just need the time to watch them all.
I enjoy purchasing box sets and this was definitely a steal. I got it on a deal for $25. That's 8 great films/classics from Mel Brooks.
i recommend mel brooks funnies movies ever minus spaceballs the movie it was a great film and i loved it
One of the most fun movie collection i got. It has some of the best that Mel Brooks that he ever made in Hi-Dif.
A gift for my husband - got all of us watching and enjoying Mel's creations.  Got to say it was a hit.
Mel Brooks has a unique sense of humor and way of telling stories. This is a great collection to own. A Must Have for any fan!
Great collection!  I don't know how anyone can complain about anything in this collection.  Buy it, you won't be disappointed.
Great collection. One or two not so interested in, but in the whole it's worth the purchase. When you need a laugh.
Fantastic group of movies by a sheer mad genius. Remastered in bluray just ensure that his comedic relief will make it a few more generations.
This isa Christmas gift, and I am sure that it will be enjoyed by the receiver of the gift immensely.
Always loved Mel Brooks from the very first time I saw Blazing Saddles in the early 70's. This collection is a must for every fan.
You get the best collection of Mel Brooks films, in blue ray format.  What w great way to enjoy the classics that he has created.
Where is &#34;Spaceballs?&#34; Anything else we're not familiar with? I do think that &#34;Silent Movie&#34; was too silent. Still, it was wonderful.
My husband loves Mel Brooks.  This collection is great.  We really enjoyed watching all the movies.  They are so funny.
I love all Mel Brooks movies and this had some of my favorites!  They dont make these types of movies anymore, which makes this collection unique.
If you love to laugh and Mel Brooks is your style of humor this just has to be part of your collection! Awesome!
Still havent watched all the movies in the set but a wonderful collection. I love watching movies from the 80's
I finally found a collection of most or Mel's movies...except Spaceballs....I wonder why this was not included...copyright legal issues maybe?
I love this Mel Brooks is funny as Hell quality is spectacular I would recommend for any Mel Brooks fan a must have.
It was a Christmas present and I received it on time and the person loved it! He definitely enjoyed it!
This wonderful collection of films by director Mel Brooks belongs in every DVD cabinet. You will laugh till your sides hurt.
7 of these movies are our favorites. The only one missing is &#34;The Producers&#34;  This package was a super special deal, so I had tobuy it.
this is a classic movie and i am so glad to have added it to the christmas collection.  me and my family love it
thanks amazon for a fantastic deal for 2 of the greatest family movies ever made.  on blu-ray to boot. you rock.
Both great movies!  Watch them all the time.  Never get tired of them.  They are timeless. They are fun to watch over the summer too.  Awesome!
Great price and the two originals are still the most fun! Get down on your knees and tell me you love me!
I grew up watching these every Thanksgiving with my cousins and brother. Doesnt seem the same without watching these. Great movies. Classics.
A great classic that needs to be adored and loved by every child growing up. To this day I watch it about once a month.
These are great holiday movies that EVERYONE loves.  Kids, parents and grandparents.  I'm sure nearly EVERYONE has seen these movies!
I have always loved these movies, and though they are a bit corny, they are still funnier than heck. Booyah!
enhanced viewing, brought out alot more color.  Blu ray the way to go at this time.3D needs a whole lot of work for a small screen
I Love Home Alone! I was happy that I found it in Blu-ray. Good quality DVD. Great price on this too!
I was excited to see that this was 1 & 2 only, as I didn't want the 3rd one anyways.  I love the case and these are truly fun movies!
Good movies, good deal at the time (not sure if the deal has expired), and a cool addition to my collection.
One if the best ever!funny,funny,funny,I think this has to go down as one if the Classics of its time!Great Comedy!
They just don't make movies like this anymore. Both are hilarious. I feel bad for the kids who didn't grow up watching this movie.
I got this because I love both movies Glad I own both now! Its a holiday Classic! Happy I got it on Blu Ray!
this dvd was to replace the vhs copy we have, It is 100% better than the vhs copy and we got the other movies too.
Just in time for Christmas. Quality is wonderful compared to the regular DVD I had. This was a great Purchase :)
Bought this to add to our holiday collection of Christmas movies and watched it several times. Forgot how funny it was
these 2 movies should have been the only 2 home alone movies made. both of these are in the top 20 holiday movies. they even lookbetter on bluray.
This was well packed and easy to open. Both movies were hilarious. This is a welcome addition to my movie library!
SEEN IT MANY MANY MANY TIMES AND I JUST ABSOLUTLEY LOVE IT......ONE TO BE ADDED TO YOUR COLLECTION, AND TO BE CHERISHED FOR YEARS TO COME......
Great Classic movie for Christmas. Was a gift on Christmas that everyone loved. Would reccomend to another person shopping for a good movie.
Great movies; classics at this point as hard as that is to believe. Gives you a merry feeling. I would surely recommend these movies to anyone.
I have these in DVD, but for this price, couldn't pass up the upgrade to Blu ray.  Love these movies.
I guess it's old enough to be a classic.  This one has always made me laugh.  If you like laughs, buy it.
Home alone one and two were the best of the lot. They are funning good movies. I would recommend them to any family for a nice family night.
I feel that any older movie that is transfered from an VHS or even a DVD to a Bluray has superior picture and sound quality and so will YOU!!
My all time favorite christmas movies! Grew up watching them as a kid and I still can't get enough! I love it!
So vibrant, so glad I bought the blu-ray version, it brings the movie to life.  I will always have it in my collection of christmas movies.
Awesome blue ray movies! These are my daughter favorite movie. She loves to watch them over and over and again
I have never had Home Alone on blu Ray before. They had both great  picture and sound. Good holiday movies to own.
who doesn't like this classic movie, this is a great movie to watch when company is over for the holidays.
Actually this is more or less a good whole some family movie for my library collect from my past history
One of my family's favorite Christmas movies. I had to get this and on Bluray great price and one we will watch every year
I love both of these movies especially during the holidays so it's a must own for any Christmas movie lover.
Excellent Blu Ray quality and a great price for both movies together. Great to add to any Holiday Movies Collection.
These movies are great and at $10 for the blu-ray set, I couldn't pass this deal up!  I'm glad that its only the first two.
this movie is always a hit... part 1 and part 2 , both viewed very well and packaged nice and came on its due date... great condition.
Since both me and my wife first watched Home alone long ago we became instant fans. These movies are Christmas classics. A must have.
the movie is great I love to dance the hustleI would recommend everyone to see this movie.was well delivered and wrapped.
It almost takes you back to that time. When people were looking for fun and love . Not like today where everyone needs to be a thug.
Great timing fun and I began dancing again the movie was a memory long ago nice that u had it Thank u all for making a person happy
Yeah,Yeah,Yeah! FINALLY the best movie starring Terri Nunn from music group "BERLIN", that i've ever seen.....Yeah
Loved this movie a long time ago. It is a bit dated now, but still worth watching. Glad i got it.
Love Sally Potter films, this is my favorite!  The dancing is absolutely incredible, the story sad at times, but wonderful
Thank you so much, added another great Godzilla to my collection. The butterfly, to this day still surprises me. That's one big bug !!
This really is the best Godzilla movie, but doesnt it bother anyone that Columbia pictures hasnt released the original MOTHRA on DVD yet?
when monsters clash it is magic mothra loses her egg and godzilla on the lose could japan survie a mad mom protecting her baby one of the best
Bought for my son for Christmas and he loves the old Godzilla Movies so I know for a fact he will love it !!
My order was put in July 2,2012. it came before due date like express, couldn't wait. I am very pleased with.
Classic Godzilla, one of the best Godzilla films ever. Much, much better than the 1998 Tri Star film, by miles...
I grew up in the NYC area and watched these movies the day after Thanksgiving on the Ch 9 marathon of Godzilla. Great movie, classic...good quality
Bought this for my grandson.  One of the classic battles between Godzilla and Mothra.  Well worth the price.  Great quality.
What can I say? This is one of the classics of the Godzilla franchise.  Godzilla and Mothra battle it out and its awesome.
I've been converting my VHS collection to DVD & of course this one was on the keep list.  DVD arrived quickly & in great shape.
I always liked this film.  Nice of Spielberg to give a nod to Truffaut.  Great price for blue ray and yes, it is essential to any library.
This movie is a classic - and really was a trail blazer with regard to alien theme movies. It is a movie that continues to be thoroughly enjoyable.
Now that I have it on Blu-ray, Close Encounters remains one of my all time favorites.  This disc presents the three different versions of the film.
We hadn't seen this movie in many years. It's a definite keeper, and is a good choice for anyone's collection of must haves.
Great movie and a classic. Steven Speilberg really knows how to keep you on the edge of your seat.
How does one rate a movie, it is spectacular, like every other time I've watched it.
Bought this for myself. Just wanted to see again and again this old classic movie. Would recommend it to everyone.
I highly recommend this Blu-Ray edition of Close Encounters of the Third Kind.  The quality of sound and the quality of picture are magnificent ! ! !
I bought this Blu-ray to replace my old VCR version of the movie.  The Blu-ray is a good quality and a great buy for the price.
Yes, I replaced my VHS copy with this DVD.  Its a great movie that I watch from time to time.
This is a cult classic movie about an unexpected event - close encounters of the third kind. When it's on DVD, this is a must for your collection.
Favorite all-time movie.  we Can watch for hours and hours.  Love the music, scenery and acting.  Richard Dryfuss is great.
I've been watching Close Encounters for a long time in theaters and at home on video tape, but this full HD Blueray presents a spectacular picture!
Great sci-fi movie if only it were true. Then again maybe it is.  Nonetheless this is a good movie with a very good cast and scenery
The hi def remaster is simply outstanding. The previous DVD was real good but this is the one to get if you have a blue ray player.
This is a great blast from the past. They don't make movies like this anymore. Share with  your kids and grandkids!
This includes 3 versions of the film.The amazing blu-ray picture and audio quality make this movie seem new again.Can't recommend this title enough.
Who doesn't love this movie. I originally saw it in the theatre and was very excited to finally own it.
This is the BEST one yet!  Everything included is terrific!  We've waited a long time (30 years) but it was worth the wait!  GREAT!
Classic. Corny at times. But  you can't go wrong with Spielberg. Fun and colorful. Government still does the same things.
If they come any better than this, I sure haven't ever seen them. This is easily one of my top ten favorite movies ever.
This is one of Spielberg's best movies.  It has a great cast and is beautifully filmed at Devil's Tower in Wyoming.
Great acting and visual effects.  Love the music also.  This was one of the first sci fi movies I ever saw and is still one of my favorites.
Great movie & a bargain priced DVD. Seller has quality DVD's. responds & ships very quickly. I couldn't be happier.
one of the old school sifi flicks out there that deals with the age were pretty much in now, great story line great flick
This was a pretty good movie...  I enjoyed watching it!  The part of the movie where a dolphin helps him out was done quite well....
This was a great movie and I will watch again soon. A lot of work went into this movie and its worth watching.
With a moral clarity reflecting the disaster that was the NAZI regime.  This one is one of the must see films for WWII history buffs.
I have this 2 disc set uncut Version ,'tis a Sensational movie,I love it much :)
I love this movie, i watch at least once a month.  Somehow I can't get enough of it.  Great movie!
Just watched the whole 5 hours and I loved it. This is the uncut TV series shown in Germany back in 84 or 85.
Shared this with my sons..... the 19 year old has taken it to add to his military collection!  Excellent quality too!
What war is really like from the perspective of young German soldiers on a German submarine in World War II.
I find this to be more genuine for the life on early submarines. Not the Hollywood versions that make the boats look like luxury hotels
A great movie.  One of the best World War II movies ever made.  I love it!!!
got this for my hubby and he is very happy with it and the price we paid
This is a classic.  The movie itself is a must for any submarine enthusiast.  Good sharp video and crisp sound.
Video transfer is excellent.  Audio is excellent. If you like the VHS version you will love this DVD.  I could not find a flaw.
Story of a German u-boat in World War ll. The boat is ultimately sunk in harbor in Italy. Very realistic.u-boat in wartime
It's certainly a classic, one of the best war films of all time.  Probably the most realistic submarine film ever!
A very authentic representation of life on a World War 2 U-boat.  A very long movie, but I enjoyed it very much.
If you love vintage subs this is as good as it gets ! Very well written and directed and the acting is superb !
Excellent movie about the dangers and trials of the WWII submariners from the other sides perspective, well worth the viewing don't miss it!
Shows the tedium, filth, living conditions, crew attitude. Better than the original. I like the subtitles, as you can hear real voices.
It was very well done for a foreign film. Made you feel like you were right there with them. Showed a different perspective to WWII.
I was especially impressed by the enhanced soundtrack as well as the very good video quality esp for a vintage movie.
A must for any WW2 person. Touchs all the emotions and feelings of regular soliders in the greatest war of all times. Please buy!
Far better that the way I remember watching it as a child, and while I didn't realize it at the time, it did shape my world view a bit.
This is an excellent movie and we very much like to watch it. We like the German version and would recommend it!
Excellent movie! Tells the story of what it was like for those men who were on the U-Boats. Well worth watching!
Undeniably the best submarine movie ever made. One of the few 3 hour movies I will watch.Excellent DVD quality.
anaconda is the best reptile movie ever a must seeeeeeeee dont listen to the bad revies thereeeeeeeee crazy.
anaconda is great very suspensful a true thriller. a snake attacks a documentry crew.great special effects. a must see action thriller.
This tape terrible It had me running out of the room instead of sitting there watching One of the best I ever watched.
After all these years, still a great movie to watch.  Reno's and Portman's acting are excellent.  A good old revenge story.
ONE OF MY ALL TIME FAVORITES!!!
loved this movie this time and when it originally came out. hated he had to die in the end. oh well you live by the sword...........
This DVD is the Euro Version which has missing footage from the USA version.It is amazingly clear as well this extra bit thing is impressive.
This one very good movie with a bizzare twist and a very bright starlet in Natalie Portman at the time, and she just stole this movie.
A professional hitman with a heart of gold. A bloodthirsty drug addicted cop. A young Natalie Portman. Very well done, and hugely entertaining.
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. The ending was a real tear-jerker. I would highly recommend this movie to anyone.
THIS IS ONE MOVIE U CAN NOT MISS.IT'S THE BEST HITMAN MOVIE.MY WHOLE FAMILY LOVES IT.I AM TELLING U GET IT U WILL BE HAPPY THAT U GOT THIS MOVIE
This is on of my favorite movies and can watch at least once a week both actors were great exspecially Natalie Portman in her younger days.
This introduced me to Luc Besson's films. I recommend this movie to pretty much all of my friends. (The ones that'll listen anyway.)
Purchased for my dad who wanted this for Christmas he loved it. Would recommend and has definitely held up. Thanks
This film has drama, great plot and intense action.  If you want a film that will keep in suspense than this film is for you.
Jean Reno, Gary Oldman and Natalie Portman all at the top of their game. A great supporting cast. Enough said. See it.
I completely fell for Jean Reno in this movie, and have been a true fan of his ever since. This movie is great.
Absolutely the best movie ever produced. It'll keep you riveted.
True classic movie. A must own for movie collectors. Amazing movie.
LOOKS GOOD JUST GOT HERE TODAY. ITS A B-DAY GIFT HOPE MY GOING TO BE 23 YR OLD LIKES IT.HE JUST LOVES TARANTINO MOVIES
This movie is great. It is so well done and so well acted. A break out role for everyone in it.
This is a fun movie, and well done.  This is one of the best movies we've ever seen, we both agree.
A classic movie perfect for quite a evening with some Tapa's. Best part Mark Anthony does NOT sing. Gucci is great!
Being Italian I enjoyed that aspect of the story.  A little sad story of betrayal which was a little unnerving to me.
Awesome flick! Loved the story!  The 50's setting was wonderful!  Had an awesome cast and was very well directed.  Recommend it!
Great film, in the clearest picture yet. Buy it you won't be let down. Oh yeah the audio quality is pretty good too!
Excellent movie.  Excellent cast, especially Johnny Depp and Al Pacino.  Keeps you on the "edge of your seat" the whole time.
Well...as long as you like Al Pacino and Johnny Depp and I do - so I highly recommend this movie.  An oldie but a goodie.
Another Depp Classic. He plays a man who is in the FBI who has to go undercover in the mob. Its like 21 Jumpstreet but all grown up!
the came on time and in great shape. donnie brasco is a great movie, if you like a good mob movie check it out.
This movie is a all time killer movie! Its based on a true story! Can't get enough of Al Pacino baby! Everyone should have this in your collection!
Johnny Depp is one of the best actors of his generation. This is a must own blu-ray.
Johnny Depp is my favorite actor hands down. He has been for about 14 years now! Great movie - if you are a Johnny fan I definitely recommend it. :)
Everyone who sees this will love it.  This is a great mafia/FBI movie.  Great acting and great story.  I'm sure Joe Pistone himself is proud.
A great storyline with great actors. It never gets old, do not miss this movie.
What a combo. When this movie was made, Depp was emerging as a truly great actor, alongside the great Al Pacino. Fantastic!
LOVED THIS FILM.IT IS TRULY A MASTERPEICE. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE.
A great movie. My husbands favorite.Was glad I found this movie to add to my movie collection.Trying to build up my movie collection.
This is a well-told and well-acted true story about an FBI agent's infiltration of an organized crime group in the U.S.
If you like mob movies this one is for you! Johnny Depp's best.
I HAD SEEN IT BEFORE, SO I BOUGHT IT FOR DAD AND I. HE AS I, ENJOYED IT THROUGHLY. THANK YOU
I love all of Harrison Fords movies.  Not the jungle ones but the realistic ones. I have most of them
One of the few Harrison Ford movies I have enjoyed and Brad Pitt was pretty good too nicely photographed not for the kids though
one of my favorites of all time.  this movie brings back memories and well as continuing to tickle me as I watch it again and again
I love Shakespeare and esp this version of the play. I was pleased to find this and pleased to buy it. Nopw I can watch it when ever I want.
The English excell in this art form.  It is always entertaining !  Shakespeare was a mater of this art form.
I've watched this movie so many times and it always puts me in a good mood! The mix of modern actors with Middle English is so fun!
keano finally knows a part that he can act in an emotionless villain haha but i do love keneth branaugh and densel in this it is funny and witty
Funny wonderful and full of delight and feel good moments. I would recomend this to anyway who enjoys a good prank or match making scheme!
Acting was A+.  Scenery was just joyful and full of life.  All film you were waiting for the true lovers to be reconciled.
purchased and watched it long ago. well worth the money spent. a Beautiful movie with a fine plot. and a wooden bad guy :)
I loved it in the movie theater and it has lost none of its charm on my smaller home screen
Kenneth and Emma are great.  A romantic comedy.  A must see.
This is my favorite play by Shakespeare, and partially it is because this movie makes it easier to understand. Great actors, great movie!
Excellent acting and accents and modern depiction. Definitely would watch before seeing the play. Have to write 6 more words.
Great Movie! The quality of the feed was excellent. Very convenient. Since I was using earned credits I liked the price as well.
We watch it a couple of times a year and we both do enjoy it.  Light hearted, always makes us smile.
When studying this in school it was dry as toast! But this movie lets you enjoy what's happening without the stilted language getting in the way!
Whenever I feel &#34;down in the dumps&#34; I watch this movie.  It never gets out of date and every performance is spot-on.  Brilliant!!
This is one of my all-time favorite films.  How do I rate it?  I love Bridget Fonda.  Need I say anymore??
I really enjoy this movie. I can't wait to watch Single White Female 2. I hope it is some what the same as this movie or even better.
great for all ages this movie has everything- aliens, comedy, action and a great cast.  One of my favorites along with the others in the series
I hate the first line (G-D bugs), but then I start loving it every time.  I would tell you more, but I already looked into the light.
very funny movie, I thought it would be better to watch it before I watched the 3rd movie so that;s why I decided to buy it.
I love it! Clear pictures, great sound, everything I can expect in a bluray. Even the DVD is great! Worth it!
My husband wanted this movie and I had a hard time trying to find it in town.  Got it very fast and in great shape
this has to be one of will smith's and Tommy lee Jones's best movie. mib is awesome i recomend this movie for everyone
great movie and It works fine the wrapping on case was torn I thought someone had already opened the blue ray but it looks ok.
It's Will &#34;The Fresh Prince of Bel Air&#34; Smith. Eleven more words required in order to submit a No Brainer!
Kind of quirky which I like.  Tommy Lee Jones in a tongue in cheek comedy role.  And Will Smith is great too.
I have really enjoyed the movie and I am glad to own such a great work in my collection. Get it
Hard to top the other two but they did a great job with this one.  But I think this should be it.
This is about an organization that doesn't exist and the way that they deal with the aliens that come to this planet.  It is very enjoyable.
We have been waiting for this movie in blu ray for quite some time.  What an improvement.  This is a must have.
Recommend this to anyone who loves Will Smith! Had to have it for my collection. Great buy! Very funny movie
Love both actors - they do these rolls very well and show how versatile they can be. Will Smith has come a long way from &#34;Prince of Bel-Air&#34;.
A good and funny movie, with Will Smith and Tommy Lee Jones at their best. Good, clean entertainment, worth watching
These are very good movies and our daughter hadn't seen them so i sent them to her.She loves them now.
A good start to a good series of MIB movies.  Good cast and fun banter with an unusual story development.
men in black 1 &amp; 2 both rock. the men in black are a top secret agency that deals with aliens. buy this movie.
Since this movie came out, I have always enjoyed this movie!  I have it on all 3 versions of media available & the Blu Ray is the best yet.
Great movie (one of my all time favorites), Blu-Ray is a bit soft but still OK considering the movie is a bit dated.
great job and great movie i love it when the place you order from is on the ball and you get your order when it is promised thanks all
I had 2 and 3 and just wanted to complete my collection.  I don't have to tell anyone how great this is.
A true movie classic to add to any movie collection.  It has Tommy Lee Jones what else does a person need to say.
We love the MIB movies and this is going to be fun to watch with our children.  excited about MIB III
This humor is just too great and the effects so kool!Delivery was excellent and paking excellent.GREAT MOVIEFor all ages!
my family and friends really enjoy this movie.i would recamend this movies to others. the  other two movies are good to.
The original Men in Black fits right into the well-developed genre of &#34;good guys rule&#34; 90's action movies.  If you love 'em, you love 'em.
Men in black movies is a great family movie. Will Smith and Tommy lee Jones are great in this movie.
This movie was as funny as I remember. I love Will Smith & Tommy Lee Jones. The DVD arrived quickly and was in great condition. Thank you!
i love this movie, it's a real classic, funny and engaging.  it's the type of film that most people would enjoy.
As many times as I watch this film, it still makes me laugh.  I would highly recommend it.  Off the wall.
This is a very funny movie.  Not sure I would recommend it for anyone under 15 as there is quite a bit of language and sexual references.
The menin black movies are all very enjoyable. WE all love them and would recommend them to anyone who likes sci-fi movies.!
This movie is just great, I can watch it over and over again and not get bored and I alway notice something new.  The special effects are great.
This just a good movie, it's funny and the whol family will like this movie.
This is another movie I purchased on VCR form years ago. I loved it and wanted to keep it so I upgraded it to DVD and got it at a great price too.
I chose 5 star because it is nice to come to amazon to search for thisthen having to go all around town to find thisI recommed this for anyone.
You know what your going to get when You put these two togeather. It is so funny and none stop.
I loved this movie when I saw in the the movie theater with my mother.  My mother wasn't a big fan of sci-fi but even she enjoyed it.
Purchased men in black I and IIFor kids and dad for movie nightThey have fun watching it.  Well worth the money
I rented this to share with my children.  It is a great movie with weird humor but caution in needed with young children because of violence.
Love MIB.  Have watched it over and over.  Good Movie, and good story line and who doesn't love Will Smith?
No matter how many times I watch this movie, I still find new things that I never noticed before.  Awesome!
MIB has always been a favorite movie of mine and it needs 11 more words to prove it to me.
They become cult classics, and that's what this movie is!This is a *must* see movie.  Trust me as it is a great movie!
came right on time, in good condition, & very well enjoyed100% happy with service
Great Movie Thanks! Love these types of movies! They are so funny. Will Smith is great!  So entertaining ! I definitely recommend watching this one !
I love this movie! Will Smith and Tommy Lee Jones really work well together. It really is a fun movie.
Just buy it, add it to your collection, and enjoy the extra content on your own schedule.
Old favorite and the best in the trilogy . MIB 2 isn't too bad either. Didn't care much for MIB 3.
I wanted this movie for my collection of men in black I love it my kids love it we sit and watch it together a family movie night
Funny in some parts. Tommy Lee Jones is a great actor, Will Smith is a good sidekick. Glad it was given a digital copy.
Love this movie.  Love Will Smith!!!  Glad to have it in my library.  This is a movie you can watch over and over.
I like this series.  entertaining and humerus - not intended to be a scary monster movie - probably good for 8 and older
The flim is good and the action in it is all so good. I like this movie ( funny stuff)
I really love this movie. It is one of my favorites..... I am at a loss of words here.
What's not to like? Edgar suited bugs, Will Smith and Tommie Lee kicking alien tail. Big guns, Flashy thinging everyone. Fun flick
The best MIB out of the 3 and I said it's better than Independence Day. Love Will Smith and all the crazy alien stuff.
This movie was great, The quality of the disc was excellent, no skips, hardly any wear on disc, overall happy with this!
Good move I like it and Awesome I wish it lasted longe If it is a good series Good storyline
i love this movie. its not serious its actually pretty darn funny. its a masterpiece of epic proportions. see it or better buy it on vhs or dvd.
Chessy movie, but it was worth the money at the time. The first movie they made has been the best out of all of them.
My son enjoys these sci-fy combat movies.  Bought him this movie for his birthday , I'm sure he'll enjoy it!
This movie is just fun, almost funny at times.  Not to be taken seriously.
This is an entertaining movie for SCI-FI buffs,but still has a silly and comical kick to it as well.
If you're a sci-fi fan then this movie  is a must have in your collection, it's one of those movies that you many times cause it's that good.
Great Movie. Action Packed but Smart as well. A Good Satire that works on multiple levels. You'll Enjoy this one!
This is an awesome film full of dazzling (and grotesque) visual effects and great and funny characters! A don't-miss extravaganza! Gung-ho! Grade: A+
Sex, violence, nudity, big guns, war, and Denise Richards. What else does a man's movie need?
This movie is great. I have watched it several times. The acting is great and there is alot of fun to be had.
Men and women can share a true long lasting friendship and be there for each other until the very end.  I love these moments they share.
julia roberts is not good at all,but diaz is perfect even if her musical skills are not revealed. the story is funny, so buy this movie
This video is of great quality and is economically priced. I enjoyed every minute of it. I've watched it more than once. I recommend it.
I enjoyed this deliteful romantic comedy.I am not much of a Julia Roberts fan But I enjoyed her in this movie.
Great movie, love Julia Roberts!
I love this movie, really fun and the DVD have so many extras.  I like when this happens.  Must have DVD.
I love watching a good movie.  Most of Julia Roberts films are enjoyable and funny. She seems to enjoy life.
Excellent movie!  This is funny and we enjoyed watching it.  Cameron Diaz is wonderful in this movie. This movie, I will watch again!
cameron diaz and juliet roberts back in the day, What a great year, the 90's. The music and movies were just great.
Anything with Matthew Perry is a winner for me! I loved him in Friends and now in Studio 60! He is a great actor!
This is a truly beautiful love story, viewers need to be a little older as it deals with some issues that are not suitable for preteens.
This is one of my favorite movies bc not only are they adorable, but it makes you realize how important family is versus work.
This is a true gem of a movie. The most I can say is .....Matthew(OH MY GOD) Perry!!!!!!  He is a very good, and funny young man
if you like upbeat romantic comedies you will love this one. if you like matthew perry you will like this movie!
Fools Rush In is one of my favorite movies. The chemistry between Matthew Perry and Salma Hayek is great. You really get into the movie.
Fools rush in is such a god movie with Matthew Perry as he is such a wonderful actor. I feel he can adjust to any role he would play
Selma Hyak is beautiful (hate her too) and Matthew Perry is a nut so how else could this be but fun - love it!
A Wonderful Movie featuring brilliant acting and an honest story of love with cute innocent comedy mixed in.A Must Have.
This is a light hearted, romantic comedy. The cinamatography is very nice, too. One of my favorite movies. It's just fun!
The wife loved even more than I did. I didn't care for the ending thought. I am just a guy.
This was a great character study.  We love Anthony Hopkins and most of his movies.  This is one of his best
This is one of those films that is worth watching over again.  The casting was superb, the setting was truly brilliant.
Watch this movie and you'll see why Anthony Hopkins is considered by many as the greatest actor of these days. Definetely a oscar-worthly.
This gem of a movie should be seen once a month - everything about it makes it a masterpiece. Own it now.
Great acting and great storyline. Two of my favorite actors. The movie is brooding and romantic and has yhe feel of an older movie.
How many times have I seen this?  I never get enough of Anthony Hopkins in this genre. More of this.  Less of Lectern.
Sir Hopkins and Ms Thompson are wonderful in this story.
If you love Downton Abbey, you will like this movie.  I really enjoyed this movie.  I  would recommend this movie without hesitation.
Very wonderful story with great acting by Anthony Hopkins and Emma Thompson.  I thoroughly enjoyed this movie.
Great movie came fast in great shape.  This is a classic that can be watched over and over again. Highly recommend it!
It was very interesting 2 me, this I can watch over.  Anthony Hopkins is once again outstanding. I love it.
Boy this is a classic! ordered this for christmas. Great acting, story line. Got this at a great price. love it!
Average picture quality for a blu ray disc.  This region 2 purchase does play in my Sony player, so I believe it to be region free.
The richnesss and care taken in this period piece is not to be missed.  The acting is great and nothing is left to chance in writing.
Very good story and very good interpretation by Anthony Hopkins and Emma Thompson. I also liked the photography and edition!
This is a favorite film that I first saw many years ago.  It still has a great emotional impact after many viewings.
i love this movie big fan of Alicia Silverstone and fell in love with Benicio Del Toror in this movie!
One of my all-time favorites. I love all of Harrison Ford's movies. The price was great, fast shipping, love it, thank you.
This is probably one of the best Action Movies ! Harrison Ford is the President from the USA, and his plane was hijacked!! Excellent movie !
Great Movie love to watch it over and over.  Can't go wrong with Harrison Ford in the lead role .
My daughter loves Harrison Ford so we added this for her collection.  Great price during the Christmas season. Shipped promptly.
We really love this movie and have watched it many times.  We love Harrison Ford.  He is really good in this movie
As a 21 year fan &amp; collector of Harrison's, this is him at his best.  Great film.  Which he would do more films like this.  Great disc as well.
But then you can be dumb and do dumb things in a movie and have it all work out. Other than that, not a bad movie.
I love Harrison Ford and have almost all his movies.  This movie was in excellent condition.  Thanks so very much.
I thoroughly enjoyed this action packed movie.  Harrison Ford is amazing in this movie.  Thank you.
A great action pack movie.Alot of good acting from everyone in the movie. Well written story and produce.A real thiller.
I had this one on DVD and loved it, but The blue-ray is the BOMB. One of my all time favorites.
So this before, one of my favorites
one of Ford's best lines ever...&#34;get off of my plane&#34;....kind of sums it up.  Oldham really makes u hate him.
I love this movie and I was very excited to find it a such a great price. It arrived on time and in perfect condition.
Edge-Of-Your-Seat excitement! Top-notch special effects! A-level acting! Riveting storytelling! Watch and enjoy! Grade: A+
An older one, but had to watch it again because it was a good movie then and a good movie now.
NOW I COULD EASYLY SAY THIS WILL GO DOWN AS ONE OF THE GRATEST MOVE EVER MADE IN THE WORLD THAT IS SO FOR SHORE & THAT IS PUTTING IT LIGHTLY
Such a great and funny movie, great for the whole family.  I have recommended this movie to family and friends.
talking babys, and fun times. kind of educational. haha great service and fast and friendly prices.
All I can say is this movie will always be one of my favorites it's a great family film.
As with so many excellent actors, Paul Newman is masterful in this movie.  If you like and enjoy Newman, this will be one of your favorites.
Mystery, romance, wit, and style--all in one excellent movie.  I can watch Paul Newman all day and every day.  Outstanding!
It is an odl movie that I saw many years ago when it first came out. It plays well and is the one I wanted. Thank you
Excellent film and in excellent condition. one of the best film I have purchase so far. one for my collection.
Paul Newman is great to watch. A good film as are most Paul Newman films. One can't go wrong.Deepak Singh
Paul Newman displayed why is such a great actor. This movie kept you on the edge of your seat in suspense.
Two great stars make this an excellent movie. I really enjoyed how Paul Newman turns the situation around at the end.
Great modern classic about how it feels to have to live as you force others to, or as the worm turns. I do want to give it away, a great movie!
This show was excellent and the original cast nailed it. I just wish it was available on DVD or BluRay.
Riverdance is always greaty fun to watch. The energy of the performance comes through eeven on DVD!
A lot of performers are involved in the making of this musical and everything fits.  I love this type of dancing even if I can't do it myself.
This DVD of the Riverdance Production from Radio City Music Hall is a pure delight. I have watched it many times and always enjoy it immensely.
But plays well.  The back has a near puncture hole in it.  I'm glad I wasn't giving it as a gift... would have looked like I really skimped.
The price was awesome and the movie was perfect, I did not have any problems and I would buy again.
One of my Favorite Sci Fi (with a lot of Humor) movies.Buy it you won't be disappointed in Bruce's performanceas Flying Taxi cab driver.
A must have movie, came when promised as promised would get from them anytime they have something I really want
Best funny & entertainingSci Fi with a twist!Stellar!
Movie looks and sounds great. Get this version over the regular 2 disk collectors edition.... its super bit!!!!
This is one of my favorite films.  It is defiantly a world that is intriguing and mind blowing.  A great add to my collection.
I got my item. the fifth element steelbook. It was in very good shape. The Packaging was good. I look forward to do more business.
Corbin Dallas? yeah that's meI love this movie with Chris Tucker and Bruce Willis I used  to watch this movie in Broad River in Port Mouton.
Familiar with the movie. I found the price, quality and content to be exactly what I was looking for. Worth the price.
Now this Sci.Fi film will keep you on the edge of your seat and laughing if you have not seen it yet. I've truly enjoyed it.
Love it or hate it, but it is a good movie to just drift away from whatever it is that distracts you.
The Fifth Element is one of our favorite movies - a great combination of action and humor.The Blu Ray (remastered version) is nicely done also.
I've yet to meet someone who didn't like this movie. Great version of the movie and still a fun watch to this day. Strongly recommend
This is a gift for my daughter.  I most likely will never see it but she will most certainly enjoy it.
I got this for my bosses birthday. I have seen this movie several times on TV & I love it. I need to get me this movie just for me :)
I was entertained from start to end. The fifth Element was full of action and Awesome sounds and picture. This is a must have blu-ray.
Suspenseful and engaging, this movie was well directed. It questions issues in society, including genetic screening and predetermination.
at first i thought it will be all talking well it is but the plot is so amazing that u dont even notice,i realy liked this movie.
I remember watching this movie when it first came out. It wasn't popular, but I must say that this is one of the best movies of our time.
The title says it allI was satisfied.Twelve more words requiredEight more words requiredFour more words required
This is what I would call a classic must see movie. It is a unique story line and the directing and acting was great!
I have a feeling that this will be a very interesting movie. I thank you for your fast and courteous service. I hope you have a wonderful week!Norma
I already owned this movie and bought this because of the (Special Edition)  It's an excellent movie.  One of my favs.
Really nice wording. It makes me feel like I read the entire library. I don't need Isaac Aasimov books anymore.
this one hit it out of the park. smooth and cool and sophisticated in many ways. i was immediately taken by the stark landscape of the future.
the movie came on time and in good shape, It is full of great actors and what a good movie!!!!
I truly wish there were an easier way to discover good movies like this.  I can't think of anything bad to say about this movie.
Great book with excellent understanding of culture, history & a story many might have never known! Thank you for cataloging this movie.
Excellent Movie..Watch it and follow the relationship of a man with himself....friends and love ones. Very Beautiful to watch also...
My husband and I both enjoyed this film.  The story was great, acting was well done and the cinematography excellent.
This is a great movie and i am extremely happy with this show.  Thanks
Was not all that impressed with Brad Pitt as a performer till I watched this film. Now I am. Great film.
I enjoyed this movie. The movie has a good story, good actors, romance, action drama and great cinematography.
best movie I've seen in some time. the fact that it's a true story really is riveting. brad pitt and all the actors were amazing.
This movie was captivating our attention the whole time we watched.  Makes you wonder if things have changed much after all this time has passed...
I saw this film years ago and bought it to keep in my collection. Great movie!
I highly recommend this movie. For historical facts concerning Chinese and Tibet. This was a true story and beautiful scenery.
I can't believe what this family had to give up for their country.  This was a story that I am glad was made public  It was certainly worthwatching.
Excellent movie, brought back great memories of growing up watching movies like this and the family sitting enjoying a movie together, well worth it,
Enjoyed this movie immensely, great job by all actors. So glad I purchaed it, to be able to see it often.
This is one of those touching almost comedies I will want to watch over the years. It was received promptly.
Nicholas Cage at his BEST!  You MUST own this one if you are his fan.
What a fun movie! Nicholas Cage is great with a delightfully fun character portrayed by Shirley Mclain. Good fun for everyone
I had no idea that this movie was going to be comedic yet dramatic in a way, wonderful  performance from 2 amazing actors at a great price. :-)
This is a great film.  It is funny, touching and has adventure.  You will love the mind games and verbal battles.
Excellent movie. Best yet.  Have always loved movies and music. This is the best!Thanks You always for giving me this.
Great movie.  The actors were perfect for this movie .  I watch it everytime It is on the television set.
JUST LOVE IT IT WAS A GIFT FOR A CO-WORKER THAT LOVES  AND AS FOR HER BIRTHDAY I ORDER AND SHE TOTALY LOVED IT.
Why?  I have always enjoyed the movie.  I love Nick Cage. Tsk!  Isn't brief enough? What else can I say?
I once worked for a similar personality as played by Shirley Maclaine.  I can definitely relate to Nicholas Cage's character!
Great movie in my opinion. Shirley MacLaine  and Nicholas Cage play off each other beautifully. Has just the right touch of humor.
The entire movie is interestly woven to ensure the tapestry of justice is prominent in the final scenes. There is such a thing as validation.
Very pleased with this movie. A kind of like take on The Devil Wears Prada before it was popular.A good laugh as well as entertaining.
I LOVE THE WAY TESS FALLS FOR HER TEAM OF FBI PROTECTORS AND THE WAY THEY TAKE CARE OF HER AFTER SHE HAS BEEN KIDNAPPED.
Replacing old VHS tapes with DVDs.  This was a great fun movie and I love both stars.  I will always enjoy this DVD.
haven't seen it yet, it's a birthday gift....so glad you had it... thank you , thank you,  thank you. I'm happy
Michael Keaton had done a lot of good movies, This one is the best multi-performances of his.
Michael Keaton had a real workout as an actor in this movie - and did a fantastic job!  Well worth it.
I always love Micheal Keaton Movies, but now this was the best!To me he is very Funny. He did a Amazing Job!
One of the best comedy movies I've ever watched. This is a good family movie you can watch with your kids
I bought this movie.  The right stars and location. Michael was so funny it made me laugh.  Whole funny love this movie.
One of my favorite movies as a kid. Funny and family oriented. Great for people of all ages to watch.
This is a great movie.  Both main actors do a great job and have a wonderful connection on screen.  Love Michael Keaton!
This is a family favorite. We have watched it for years.  The acting is excellent and it is a very unique story.
ITS A FUNNY MOVIE YOU CAN NEVER GET TIRED OF WATCHIN MICHAEL WHAT HE DOES TO HIS WIFE IN THIS MOVIE
Michael Keaton is a talented actor. He does an awesome job in this movies playing several parts at the same time!
Oldies but goodies and this is a really cute movie!!  Lots of laughs!!
It is no wonder that this movie takes place in Pittsburgh,Pa.where corrupt cops abound.Bruce Willis is excellent in this one.
Great mystery/murder movie with good character development.You never know until the end what is going to happen and whodone it!!
I love Bruce Willis movies and this one was very good.  I really enjoyed seeing Dennis Farina playing a good role.
I have enjoyed most of Bruce's movies.  This one was very enjoyable with good action and I would recommend it to others.
If you are a bruce willis fan. This movie is a must buy.Great suspense from begining to end. Sure Classic
We seen it in the theater when it first cam out and now we get to enjoy it when we want to have a movie.Lori
I saw this movie a long time ago and I love it! Love Bruce Willis! Had to have in my collection.
An outstanding film in every respect. Too bad they don't make'em like this anymore, but there's always hope one might come along to emulate it
such a great movie..
If it so good, why is it back of DVD? I like it so much.
Fun movie - Robert Downey Jr is so young.  i would recommend it for a fun Sunday movie.  Light and fun.
a really funny quirky comedy, it is a good watch if you can tolerate 90's fashion lol, all the actors are good in it
For my endless collection of movies. I just love old movies with love, comedy and a real story with a little catch.
I have purchased this movie in multiple formats and now I have added it to my DVD collection.  This is a timeless classic.  My wife loves this one.
I loved it. Arrived right on time. A must have. A great buy at a great price. 2 Thumbs up.
Any movie Dan Akroyd chooses to do is always enjoyable. This one is hilarious.  I will watch it often. Thanks.
Very funny movie which makes you belly laugh.  For the most part very clean and acceptable for preteen & teens.
I saw this movie when I was still in high school. Still as great now as I remember it then. Silly, funny, just a feel good movie!!!!
Great B grade movie with likeable leads and a zany story line and good effects.A must for any Kim fan.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE ITS BEEN SOO LONG SENSE IVE WATCHED IT ITS NICE TO WATCH THESE OLD MOVIES WHEN THERES NOTHIN ON TV TO WATCH
This was a great find. The price was the best I&#8217;ve found.It does exactly what I was looking for it to do.
Great Quinn movie bought as a gift hard to find..happy to find it at a good price....I know you will enjoy it!!!
ONCE AGAIN NO F WORDS...AND THEY STILL GOT THE MESSAGE ACROSS..AND TO SEE A YOUNG MICKY ROONEY AND A YOUNG QUINN AND BEST OF ALL GLEASON
Thanks for having this other hard to find dvd. The suprise was even greater when this arrived. It was shipped fast and in time for the holidays.
some of the songs are stop, too much and do it.  i say the sound is good.  hope you like these legendary singers.
Spice World, the Spice Girls, need I say more. GIRL POWER! A fun movie for anyone missing the 90's or just looking to reminice.
Spice world is the best movie ever. Hands down. So Do yourself a favor and buy this. Just do it.
I used to love this movie when I was a kid and when I found it on DVD i was so excited!! Love this movie!! Spice Girls 'Viva Forever'! :)
This is just a great romp for anyone who enjoys the Spice Girls. It's silly and funny and the music is pure Spice gold.
I had ordered this for Not only my friend, but my Boss at work. She loves it. Thank you and have a great day
I grew up watching this movie everyday on VHS, a complete classic! All music and movie fans should purchase this DVD!
I love this movie it is one of my all time favorite movies. The first time I watched I loved it
It came right before Christmas. It was a great gift, it was cheap and it came fast. good news all the way!
We love watching this movie at home. It never gets old and I can't wait to watch it over and over again.
I love this movie. Always have right now I do not have a DVD, player but I will still buy my fave's.... Great movie!
The movie is a baseball classic. Autos bit of drama combined with a lot of comedy. True and timeless. I love this movie.
This has always been one of my favorite movies. I love the time period portrayed and the music is great!
Great movie on the female league of baseball that was formed during the war and the male pros were gone to war.
From beginning to end this was a real treat of a film....the cast was great and the storyline compelling and fun..Fun for the whole family!
I really loved this movie and I would recommend it to anyone. It came before the date required and in the quality stated.
I adore this movie and everyone in it. I think it captures the era so well and the casting is superb.A MUST SEE!
Though I've seen this movie numerous times it still is quite a tearjerker & Madonna is hot a hot woman!  Nice wholsome movie.
This movie is funny and sporty. I love watching this movie with their old baseball uniforms. Came in perfect condition without flaws.
Very Good! I really hate the way Amazon has a demand on how many I should use to review a product - What a bunch of horse pucky!!!
This is such a great movie that I had to add to my personal collection.  I still enjoy watching it from time to time.
I saw this movie before and it is good enough to see again.  It is funny and poignant and just plain fun to watch.
Geena Davis, Rosie O'Donnel, and so many great extra players.  Tom Hanks?  Oh, yeah, he was good too.  Great movie based on true stories.
You can't go wrong with Hanks, Davis, O'Donnel & Madonna, plus. Penny Marshall directing. One of my favorite movies of all time.
The package was great and it came on time. Plus i love this movie. And i watched it the very next day after i got it.
I absolutely love this movie.  I do wish the girls had been able to continue in the glory that they had pre-war ending, but that is indeed life!
This is a great movie, and the acting is wonderful. It's loosely based on real events, but it's still fun to watch.
tom hanks so mean in this 1 but i ever so enjoyed how ended up helping the girls out,,,,yeah,,,, ....
There's no crying in baseball just like there's no crying when you buy this classic.  That's all I've got to say about that.
As someone who likes all kinds of movies, I thought that this selection would be a worthwhile watch. It was great.
This is an incredible movie. Tom Hanks plays a great roll. Geena Davis is awesome. Makes you feel like you are back in time.
&#34;There's no crying in baseball,&#34; has got to be the best line in movies.  Loved it and a great movie.
Excellent Blu Ray Quality in an older movie.  Great Price on AMAZON.  A movie that you will actually want to watch more than once.
I really liked this movie.  It was filmed in my home town at that time.  Evansville, Indiana.  A must watch.
A lovely movie about a little known part of baseball history that is beautifully cast and acted.  I recommend it even for non baseball fans!
Great story, fantastic cast and well directed - with just enough accuracy to perk up one's interest in the AAPGBL
The historical value was inspiring.  I enjoyed Tom Hanks in many movies and he was no less great in this one.
Enjoyed the flick with the family.  Great actors and storyline.  Loved the historical information provided at the end of the show too.
One of our favorite movies.  Another Tom Hanks hit!  All of the actors are perfectedfilled in their roles.  A fun movie to hold your attention.
Enjoy the movies and it gives you time to think how people treat other. No one is no better than another.
Got A League of Their Own with a few baseball-related movies for my wife's birthday. Really a good, crazy movie!
Good movie. Fun and with good acting. Great for baseball fans. A movie for the whole family. Good video and great sound.
A true 80's movie.  I loved the story, maybe because i never had an adventure like that.  Regardless, this is a classic and must see.
I grew up watching all these actors - a trip down memory lane. It is still a great story and very enjoyable to watch.
Great movie. A true classic that shows a view of what life used to be like for the young growing up in the now lost America...
This is one of my all-time favorite movies. It never gets old. Highly recommended for kids and anyone who enjoys watching a good movie.
This is a good movie about four friends who make a journey together to try and find a died boy.
This is one of my favorites to watch, all them young actors and they did such a great job in their roles. Very much an enjoyable watch.
i really enjoy this movie i have seen it like more than 100 times and still i am not tired of it.
A really good movie, encourage all to watch it. Certainly a throw back. Conversations between the kids is something that we can relate.
Wonderful film with wonderful child actors. Such a heart-warming movie and so well done.
i really only watch it 2 times but i only seen only half of it that is why i got the dvd and i watch it all and it was a great movie sad but good
...better than The Sandlot.  Better than Star Trek the Next Generation. Its the best. Around. Nothings gonna get this movie down.
One of the greatest movies of all time, I still watch it occasionally.
This is truly a great movie and I would recommend this to anyone who collects movies to add it to their collection.
Love the movie, buyt it! Its a must have specially if you have kids, since in my experience is a childhood memory! A happy one!
Always loved this film and so glad to own it digitally in great quality now. It's so timeless and affecting.
Some of the best story telling about growing up as a young child, while trying to fit in. The best of friendship(s)
A nice coming-of-age story much like &#34;Catcher In The Rye&#34;  It is sad to lament that River Phoenix is passed on now.
Best movie about childhood hands down. Loved watching this with my older brother growing up. LARD A$$ LARD A$$ doesn't get much better than that.
A perfect movie for boys who love to explore. One of my all time favorite movies growing up because I could relate to exploring the railways.
'coming of age' movie..great for teens and up!  great story, told thru the eyes of a young teen.  touches your heart and soul.
I have seen it several times and just wanted my own copy. This is so worth buying for your collection
Very good movie about childhood friendship.  I had it on VHS, but I wanted to add it to my DVD collection as a keepsake.
Great movie adaptation of Stephen King's short story of four boy's coming of age.  Love it!  Surely it's a classic by now; if not, it will be.
this movie is great to watch like this and fun to watch to and is enjoyalde and learn about what happed back to then
I suggest this fun classic for anyone's collection. It bring back memories of anyones innocent childhood. Great viewing with a bowl of popcorn!
One of the best.  Simple and with heart.  A classic.  Received in good used condition in good time.  Thanks.
I loved this film the first time I've watched it and still do. It's a great tale of boys and friendship and coping with loss and growing up.
Story about 4 buddys who take a trip to findA body. Rest your have to find out lol well packedGot here on time.
This is such a great coming of age movie mixed with some eerie stuff too. Stephen king always does it right
Very good movie,knew about this movie years ago but never seen it,  bought for teen age boys and we all liked it.
One of the best coming of age movies out there and it stands the test of time highly recommend this movie to anyone who is not sure about the movie!!
This movie is needed in every movie buffs collection.  First time I noticed River Phoenix's talent.  Sure miss him.  Watch it!
Great classic movie. Enjoyed it just as much as the first time I watched it. Great price and arrived quickly
I can't pass this movie by if it's on cable or regular TV, and I'm glad I was able to watch it streaming on Amazon.
I love this movie!  I've seen it 100 times and plan on watching it 100 times more!  One of the best movies ever made!
We love watching this movie at home.  It never gets old and I can't wait to watch it over and over again.
A goodie/oldie movie. A sad but lovely story, One of my top faves!!!!!! Amazing movie. Great cast, too. I have always loved this one.
LOVE Shirley McClain and Olympia Dukakis is a RIOT!  If you loved Terms of Endearment, this is one for you.
bought for my mom. she has Alzheimer's and is really enjoying watching the old classic movies! hj kjh jklj lkjl
Great movie , it's one of my favorites- I love the acting and the storyline,  It was very entertaining.  I would watch it again
Great movie. I watch over and over again and still love it. Heartwarming movie about how important family really is.
great movie shirley maclaine dose a great job as dose the all star cast it makes you cry and laugh
This is a great movie in that it is jammed with great actors and any movie that you are laughing one minute and crying the next is a winner to me!
Tear Jerker! Sally Field never fails to deliver a phenomenal performance! The cast of actors worked well together. The movie left you wanting more.
I love this movie and has such a great story.This has such great actors.I watch this movie every few months.
I have always loved this movie!  Being a southern girl myself, some of the phrases and genuflections really hit home.
I had forgotten how sad this movie is.  Still funny and memorable with great performances from all involved.  Must see ... again.
This is a great movie dominated by great actresses. I love this movie, a true chic flick. If you need a good laugh or cry this is the movie to see.
Very good product in VHS. However buyers beware of this title in DVD. I purchased 2 from different sellers and the sound was missing on both.
I loved this movie, happy and sad all in one, the bickering between the women was the best part of this movie for me
This is a all star cast, these lady's bring a smile or laugh to every ones face, this is a must see family movie
This movie is a classic and will go on for years to come.
This story is ageless - and the characters unforgettable.  As a Southern girl, it will always remain a personal favorite.
The acting done by all cast members is wonderful and this is one of my all time favorite films & always will be.
Funny and touching.  Sally Field is a great actress and is supported by a fantastic cast.  An older movie worth the watch.
I really like this movie its sweet I like Dolly and Julia Roberts its sad at times but a really good movie.
this is a film I never miss on t.v. so I got my own and love it more with each viewing... Never mind &#34;chick flick&#34; this is for everyone...
I so enjoy this movie.  I have seen it many times.  It is a movie worthy of anyones collection. Excellent
Steel Magnolia is one of my favorite movies.  Every time I watch it I end up crying at the end!
Replacing my VHS with dvd's and this is a  family favorite.  Funny yet still can watch with little ones about.  Great family movie and great actors.
this movie was amazing i love it, it has made me cry and laugh so hard and it also has a life lesion in it i would highly sugest this movie.
excellent cast - great acting - great story lineone of my top ten movies of all timehave some tissues handy
One of the best movies ever made! The characters evolve through several years but the love and friendship never fails.
I love this movie, It's such a classic. I can watch this movie over and over again. I even know the lines to the movie.
Love this movie and love this vendor. Got it for a good price and I will continue to use this vendor for future purchases.
I loved this movie the first time I watched and every other time since!  It's a sweet movie.  The actors are awesome!
I was so very happy to find as a special gift. My grand-daughter said  it was her favorite present of all.
A great movie with a lot of great actresses. So many different personalities in the movie characters that just blend so well.
Even after so many years have past since this movie came out it still an amazing movie to make you laugh, cry and appreciate life.
this is a great family movie that tells how life really is ,and how family still are willing to help each other when it is necessary
Yup - I love this movie and getting the special edition at a good price was like frosting on the cake.
I just love the way these women ban together thru thick and thin, I have a friend like that and when I miss her I w
Still timeless after all these years.  Shirley Maclaine and Dolly Parton at their finest.  Ad it to your collection please.
A true American original about Southern folk and how they react to both the good times and the bad.  An excellent cast!
Classic movie - great lines and many famous actors and actresses- Oliva dukacus is very good and so is McClaine
Finally found this on DVD!  I looked everywhere for this movie and finally found it on here.  A classic that is a must have!
I love this movie.  So many great actresses all in one place.  Sally field looks so young!  Everyone should see this film!
This is a wonderul cast. Story line is good. Lots of laughter and tears at times. Highly recommended for any movie lovers collection!!
This is truly a wonderful movie. I loved the everything about this movie. We should all have friends like these women. Weezer is my favorite.
For some reason, wives love this movie, and it puts them in a good mood.  Very nostalgic for the oldies but goodies.
love it .. and watch this movie all the time.. very heart warming and reminds me of family that i miss
Movie is packed with talent.  The characters and plot never have a dull moment.  Will be hard to replicate their dynamics
Great Story, Great Acting and the character's nailed their roles. I can watch this show over and over again with no problem.
This is one of the best movies of all time, It looks unbelievable in blu ray and was worth the money.
You have to love this movie.  If you love baseball, you love this movie.  It is a great purchase, a good buy and well worth purchasing.
A good family movie for an afternoon when you want to relax.  Makes you think about the choices we make and the effect it has on our later lives.
I liked this one, story, actors, characters and so on. I recommand it. I think it some two hours well passed.
i love major league baseball and this is a good baseball movie 4 the whole family
The master showing every one else how it's done.
I am just a sucker for sports movies where the underdog makes the most of a second chance.  Doesn't everyone want to succeed at their second chance?
I have watched this many times and enjoy each time! It is a good verses evil story in a baseball setting.
great movie robert redford is a natural  NEVER SEEN HIM IN A BAD MOVIE  highly recommmend great story line and casting ,regards PAUL
I bought this for my son who is a big baseball fan, but it's an awesome film whether you like baseball or not.
I haven't had time to watch The Natural yet but I know I will enjoy it when I have the time.
This is a fine movie.  It just makes you feel good after viewing; not  a bit of explicit sex in it either.  I recommend it to anyone.  Rich
Baseball fantasy and Robert Redford at their best.
Very good movie ... if you like the proverb &#34;Pride goeth before a fall&#34;, and then redemption of a prodigal ... sammy
This was a christmas Gift.  Santa Studded it in the stockingof a very lucky family. What a get together they had.
One of my favorite sports movies.  Robert Redford is terrific in this as an aging ball player who gets a second shot.
An all time favorite movie.  The DVD was in excellent condition.Robert Redford was a perfect Roy Hobbs.  Great DVD.
Tom Hanks I LOVE HIM. This is such a sad movie real movie and He is AWESOME  Denzel is brilliant too put them together and I'll buy them all!!!!
love this movie. it was awesome, it moved me. great acting, just awesome. it def. shows how awful AIDS is.must see movie
This movie is very good. And it is a very sad movie as well, get your tissues ready.
I will add more later, but suffice to say that this movie ranks among the best - right out there with "To Kill A Mockingbird".  Not to be missed.
This was an excellent movie. It had truths that we have to deal with for real. It was educational and informative. I love this movie.
As someone who likes all kinds of movies, I thought that this selection would be a worthwhile watch. It was good.
I have seen this great Hanks/Denzel movie so many times on cable I decided to just buy it. And I still watch it .
I love Tom Hanks in anything of course, but this was a very good movie about how America was back in the 80's when the Hiv virus first appeared.
This is such a terrific movie.  Acting is superb by both main actors. I would highly recommend this movie to anyone.
This movie was recommeded to me by a friend. It was a terrific movie and I would recommend this to anyone that enjoys a great movie!
The story, the cast of actors, the setting, all is perfect.  Quality movie that is educational, compelling, compassionate and a real tear jerker.
this movie is a great trip into fantsay land. and it gives you a chance to be a kid again
What a classic movie! I remember watching it when I was little and after seeing it now, I understand what the heck was going on...
This movie is full of excitement and action. I recommend this for anyone who likes the unusual.
A great feature of the Python company, just after it was disbanded.
I loved this quirky film growing up and I'm so happy to have it on DVD verses my VHS copy.
I do luv films like this! It's got that 'Python' feel to it. I can't say enough about it...all I can say isWATCH IT!
This is a very fun movie full of totally incredulous events. It was fun several years ago, and fun again.
Loved this movie! Might not be for everyone though . Amazing acting and great story.
This is one of Christina Ricci's sexier movies.  She is a little hottie I think.  Good acting and Christina Ricci.
I saw it when it first hit theatres and wanted it on hand to relive the fun of that moment.
I'm not a fan of animation, but I really liked this movie that spans several generations of one family in the music world.
My mom was watching this on TV, I wasn't really paying attention at first but all the great music caught my attention.  It's really good.
Great cast, a great story about making a tough decision while at sea and trying to beat the system to make it stick.
As a Bogart fan, this classic is a must have for anyone's movie library. Bogie at his best with a an exceptional supporting cast..
Great Movie, excellant color transfer, Bogart at his best. Superb cast and acting.. The story line holds up even today.
Classic movie.  Story has a twist at the end.  Bogart and the rest of the actors delivered a fine performance.
Story of a mutiny on an American minesweeper, leading to court marshall of the captain.Very good fiction.
A classic.  Great performances from numerous &#34;Hollywood&#34; stars of the day.
Having served in the US Navy aboard a target towing vessel I was impressed to see the footage of that exercise.... looked like the real thing.....
The condition of the DVD was perfect. The movie is one of the great movies of American cinema.. Actors in their prime.
I've wanted to have a copy of this film for a long time.  It's a classic.  Even better, the DVD was properly packaged and arrived on time.
This is a very engaging and classic movie! It is produced in such a way that you truly feel the captains spiral into insanity. Very riveting!
Combat Classic, one of the very best Bogart perormances.  Amazing the Navy didn't object to this. One if the very best.
I appreciate the opportunity to purchase a quality copy of a true classic old movie  great actors and storytogether with prompt service and delivery
This is $9.99 along with Sahara at Barnes and Noble. Why Amazon is so much more I have no clue. Barnes and Noble have many titles at 50% off.
Timely delivery and in great condition. Excellent story line and character portraital by the actors
Picture in blue ray seemed great, as was the improved sound.  I would buy it again, and the price seems reasonable.
Excellent movie, have been waiting to buy it on blu-ray.  It was worth the wait.  Bogart is excellent as the over-wrought captain.
This movie didn't get enough credit in my opinion. Lots of action and a good story.
Great action film. Would recommend this for anyone who likes a lot of action. Great stuff. Really enjoyed it. Glad I bought it.
I enjoyed this movie. Richard Gere & Kim Basinger were at their best and delivered outstanding performances. Older movie but worth watching.
still loved it when i was younger at movies still love it as an adult.... must be the chicago side in me...
I got my movie early and in great shape. I would order from this vendor agian. Thank You and Good Night!
No man is worthy of kissing a young hot Kim Bassinger! Lucky Richard! Very suspense filled, edge of the seat drama!
This movie is excellent. I seen it years ago and could never find it or find anyone else who has seen it. So luckily, i found it on amazon! Yay!
This movie is action from start to finish a lot of crazy things in this movie rod Steiger is a crime boss got roped off and then ?????? But it's good
This is a great movie.  I love movies that have strong character actor parts.  Everyone is alittle over the top and very entertaining.
It relaces a VHS copy that I had.  It is a wonderful movie.  If I didn't think is was great I would not have replaced it.
This DvD I right up there with our favorites. If you want something, funny and strange! To combine both puts it in Pune of our greats in comedy!
Love love love this movie.  Please buy it and enjoy.  You will not regret it.  Most entertaining for the who;e family
Great DVD and fast service. This is one of my favorite movies. I was so happy to add it to my collection.
Marlon Brando stole the show here, but well acted by all.Watch for Maximilian Schell's peculiar accent. He was not noted for comic roles.
One of my favorite movies!Based (mostly) on a true story!Love it, and have watched it many times. :)
I have watched this movie several times. It teaches that sometimes good deeds never go unpunished, but God has the last word. Benny
We love the storyline on this.  It was a well written movie.  It can deplict what is envolved with winning a lottery.
This is one of my favorite movies.  A real chick flick but it is nice just to have a decent show to watch.
I enjoy movies that have some romantic comedy. I also enjoy movies with happy endings. Hopefully I can invest in more movies like this one
This is a wonderful movie that reminds us that honesty still exists. Good acting and believable characters contribute to the movie's excellence.
This movie I found out was actually a true story and I just wished it was me. A true love story with hopes and dreams.
Was what I expected good movie had a very nice theme and at keeps moving good actinever knew of Bridget Fonda
Wish this could happen to me-LOL!. Love this movie, don't really like many lovey dovey movies. This one is a keeper.
These are the feel good movies you want to fill your cabinet with. Great price for an upgrade to blu-ray!
Romantic story at it's best.  Love Brigit Fonda and Nic Cage, but Rosie Perez steals the movie.  Must see.
this movie might be a little old but it still captivates.  My grandkids sat in silence while watching this movie.  Love It!!!
Any movie fan should own this movie in their collection. Get it for yourself or for a gift. Blu ray looks as good as it can for the age. Get it!!!
good movie  if you like older movies id get this one  action  is good  acting is bad  but all in all good for the price
This movie is a classic, and i was glad to have found it, a great buy.
I appreciate the origin version of this film and the remakes of this film really,with the CGI crap,makes the remakes look less enjoyable to me
Very  good  fantasy  movie.  Excellent  special  effects.VERNON  KESTLER
This wonderful film from my childhood was better than I remembered!  The Ray Harryhausen special effects are terrific for their time!
Do yourself a favor and order this from Amazon right away and watch it with your kids. You can turn off the trash on TV. rm
love these type moves.Good old fashion Pagan religion illustrated.  I watched it several years ago and still like today.
Another Harryhausen classic special effects film fromages ago.  Good story and excellent special effects.Another classic worth the price.
Great movie.  Perfect casting, good plot and story execution.  A nice window into another time with today's issues.  Time well spent.
I bought this for my young nice and nephew. This old school movie has the charm and storyline too keep your attention. These are the movies for kids.
My husband  really is enjoying this movie, the sound and color is excellent,Thank you so much for this action enterainment.
I really enjoyed this movie as a kid, started my love of movies. I will continue watching this movie over and over again.
What a great movie, I loved it since I was 8 and now I'm 27 and I still love it, You must buy it!!!
what can you say classic movie bit dated but who cares .
Classic film from my childhood, pretty good transfer and enjoyable even after all of these years, so glad I bought it for Christmas for my parents
great movie and i am glad to finally find it on dvd. It has been a long time since I have seen it
If you like adventure movies like Clash of The Titans, you'll love this. It's a great adventure from beginning to end. A must have.
Classic movie and fun to watch
Lose yourself in this magical movie and see how things were before CGI. Timeless entertainment for all ages, a must have!
me gusto mucho esta pelicula, muy buena y no me arrepiento de haberlas compradas. las he visto ya varias veces
I forgot how impressive these special effects were. I saw this at a Drive-In when I was a kid and it's just as cool now.
This is a classic, if you like adventure this movie is for you.
Love this movie very suspensful and awesome very well worth purchasing who highly recommend this to who anyone who loves suspensful movies
I sent this to my sister who recently moved to the north woods and can't get many tv channels. It's a good dvd if you like suspense.
Love the movie.  It was interesting my heart almost dropped when they acted like they were going to run over her son.
I really liked this one when it came out it was a differnt type movie than the regular ones. worth watching for sure.
Very good movie about life in South Central La during the 1980's and early 1990's.  Good movie about gangbangers and the live they live.
This movie is classic and I have always loved it very happy to find it here and less expensive than I thought
This is a great movie that speak to the people who been or live in the hood. not much has change
I LOVE IT. I LIKE HOW LAURENCE FISHBOURNE WAS A STRONG, BLACK, GREAT MALE FIGURE.
MY FAVORITE MOVIE, IN THE WORLD, NEXT TO PURPLE RAIN!
Another classic ghetto movie.  I found it pretty funny that after doing some research, I found out that the shotgun guy was killed in real life.
I love the classic tales told for today's audience.  This movie does just that.  Must have for your De Niro Collection.
THIS IS AN EXCELLENT REMAKE OF A TERRIBLE OLD B&amp;W FILM
This is one of the best performances ever for both De Niro and Branagh.  The movie is said to be true to the book and is a real joy to watch.
a perfect adaptation that lives up to the spirit of the novel.I really think Mary Shelley would be proud.
This is the best version of all the Frankenstein movies, bar none. The actors are all perfect for their parts.
I appreciate this version of the Frankenstein story far more than the movies I watched as a kid. What else can I say?
Overall, just great script, performances, characters. Perfect movie, really, no flaws. I love this movie.
Want a great movie? Just get it - you will watch it over and over - just for that single line that Jack pulls off in the restaurant.
This is one of the best movies I have ever seen. If anyone wants to have a good laugh, I would recommend this movie.
Purchased it for my daughter.  I haven't watched it myself.  Jack nicholson is a good actor and I am sure it is a good movie
This is truly Jack Nicholson at his best. Both he and the dog take the movie (spoiler - they both have OCD!
One of the best.  We've watched this one several times & we love it.  It does not get old. Good dialogue great acting.
funny movie and great to have on a DVD Sale ran very smooth, no issues in the process of purchase or playing.
What a match... Jack and Helen.. Well put together... I have watched this oneSEVERAL times.  Put this one on your list also.
A great cast delivers moments of random charmed exchanges of humanity. There are some really romantic scenes that I'd never expect from Jack.
Great Modern Classic. I really hate the way Amazon has a demand on how many I should use to review a product - What a bunch of horse pucky!!!
I loved it. It's funny and great. Enough said
This is one of my all time fav movies  funny  touching  and  shows what love can do....even to a hard person
Although Jack Nichols is the main character, Helen Hunt is the force behind the movie, I enjoyed the movie very much.
EVERYBODY WAS PERFECTLY CASTED IN THIS MOVIE ... HAD MANY A NEIGHBOR ALMOST LIKE JACK IN THIS ONE. A MUST SEE.
This movie is a very funny. Jack Nicholson plays his part to a T. Along with Cuba Gooding jr, Greg Kinear and Helen Hunt.
Nicholson at his comedic best! Love the show and the cast, well written and executed. Great addition to any collection!
A great movie that combines lots of humor with a pull on the heart strings, and the acting is superb!
I can't count the number of times I've watched this movie.  Jack is always 'so bad' that he's GREAT! The rest of the cast is great too.
Very good movie enjoyed watching it ,had company over and they loved it we all laughed and couldn't get enough
how can you miss with Jack?  Most of his stuff is memorable and this is one of those that shows him well
Best Jack Nicholson ever and Helen Hunt is wonderfu as. always.  Greg Kineer (sp) is terrific.  Heartwarming, funny and always entertaining.
Love this movie. Jack Nicholson at his best. Would recommend watching this movie if you can't find anything else to watch.
It has closed captions, a great story that will keep you guessing right up until the end, Rebecca Pigeon really stood out.
This movie is really good. The actors and the plot of the story are good. The movie is really long. The idea behind this movie is smart.
i'm in the process of looking for all those old vhs on dvds.  glad i was able to find this one.  it's a great story full of wit and a little revenge.
this is just an excuse 4 jrm to lose his shirt and everybody to have affairs with everyone else! thats why i like it!
Romantic and yet sad.... Great acting by Vincent Perez and Rachel Weisz. A tear-jerker...
This is the most beautiful and gentle love story. The overcoming of prejudice and bigotry is amazing. I had to have it for my collection.
I love this movie.  Great performances, loved the way it's told and if you need a good cry, trust me, it will happen.
brings back many memories and i watched a lng time ago and love the actor, worth wtching thanks a lot
Grat film and very well fimed with extremely good perfomances from the all of the cast.
One of my favs a must for any broadway fan Michael Maguire Michael Ball and all the cast does a great job
Get yourself surround sound, a wide screen TV and enjoy a beautiful and powerful musical.
it was a really good show, and i recieved it fast it was packaged very well, a movie the whole family could watch
One of my favorites.  Kathleen Turner does a great job.  Love Nicholas Cage!  Classic movie, lots of fun.  Star-studded cast.
The product arrived early and was in better condition than stated by the seller. Would absolutely recommend this seller to others.
I have always loved this movie,  It has a timeless story and great understanding of what if?
This movie takes me back to when I was a young girl.A simpler time to be alive and rock and roll was just getting started.
Watching this movie made me wish I could go back in time and fix my life. This movie is funny and my daughter enjoys it.
This DVD came to me in perfect condition. Had to wait until I watched it a couple of times before I could rate this. It's perfect.
Great service.  Purchased this for my niece who LOVED this movie when it first came out.  She was very surprised and happy to receive it.
Haunting movie with tugs on the heartstrings that will pull and warm you all over. Great acting, Nick Cage is very believable.
This movie was great.  Kept my attention the whole time.  I watched it for class, bought it, and now I watch it for entertainment.
Me And My Wife First Time She Saw Star Man Movie She Was Laughing So Hard  It Was A Good Movie.
Loved this old classic.  trying to replace all the old movies that I had on vhs with dvd and this is just another of the oldies but goodies/
Some thought this was rather goofy, but its actually well acted.. all things considered. Good Movie.. Good story line. A+
Great movie that teaches us that humanity is too eager to judge and fear.  This was a great &#34;feel good&#34; movie with lots of lessons!
this movie is epic,its so romantic and mysterious. I wish they made a part two because this movie has a twist.
Bought twenty different movies all three dollar and five bucks....Nice to not have to dig through the bargain bin at walmart.
I really wonder if we could be as open-minded if we had proof of intelligent life &#34;out there&#34;-we're so arrogant, probably not!
This is one of my all time favorite movies.....Jeff Bridges does a great job and is one of my favorite actors
A great movie, full of fun and good humour, a really great movie for the family, lots of laughs.. go for it !
a good price  a good classic addition to my dvd collectionI have added a lot of dvd titles from amazon
A really great movie. Jeff bridges is definitely a wonderful actor. A must see. You will like this alien love story.
This movie is old and the CGI really marginal but the acting is fabulous and the story actually unique and engaging.
Quality contentinterersting plot line......keeps your attention based on the outter space appealmore like this are needed....
I have loved this movie since it came out and am glad I finally got around to getting my own copy.
I bought this because I remembered it as such an enjoyable movie.  It can be viewed by the whole family.  I still love it!
Great story line. Great romance. Great actors. Love the older movies. Hate that I can't find these in the stores any more.
still super movie...  Bridges is outstanding!!!!  :)
This is a great movie and certainly an asset to my vast collection. Arrived faster than a speeding bullit too!
I bought this for my Mom when it was on sale and she loves it.  Hardly see it on tv anymore so now she can watch it at will.
Safe and entertaining enough for kids and adults. Good story to keep anyones interest. A clever sci-fi slant on aliens
No matter how many times I see this movie, it's great! I'm sure Ill view it again in the future.
I love this movie. They finally put it on Blu Ray. The PQ is fantastic and J-Lo is as lovely as ever.
Excellent film! It's worth it just for John Trudells dialogue! It offers so much more ....
I love this movie because it has Val Kilmer and Graham Green in it and I like stories of this kind.
I really love this movie, it touches me .  The DVD was recently purchased to replace the VHS copy of it that I had...
A great film.  This movie should be watched by all of us.  People need to know how the Indians suffered for what was theirs in the first place.
Films like this are important and forgotten the story is upfront and Val Kilmer is fresh in his acting. Enjoy
This has an all star cast.  Good action pack story.  It will keep you guessing who the real bad guys are!
This has Val Kilmer in one of his best performances. Awesome story and great actors
Great and well played movie. Based on a true story. All the actors do a great job. Interesting story line.
A great NAtive American story bringing some truth out from a 1/2 breed that went to the REZ and was used to help his people
This movie is excellent and would look great on Blu-Ray. Does anyone know if this is planned for Blu-Ray?
Excellent movie taking place on Native American Rez.  Serious and very touching, but also holds a laugh or two. I highly recommend.
I really enjoy watching Val Kilmer.  I think that he is an outstanding actor and wanted to upgrade my movie collection from VHS to DVD.  Koo movie!
The movie, of course, is excellent.  The hd was decent.  Until a blu ray comes along, this is definitely worth the purchase.
Any movie that provides the stories and/or histories of the people who face prejudice daily is worth watching by all.
I LOVED THIS MOVIE, MAYBE BECAUSE VAL  KILMER WAS A TRIBAL INVESTIGATOR AND GRAHAM GREENE IS A TRIBAL COP THAT RISES ON A MOTORCYCLE
IT'S BASE ON A TRUE STORY.  IT'S SO SAD TO THINK THAT THE INDIANS WERE TREATED SO BADLY.  YOU WILL ENJOY IT..
Greene and Kilmer are great in this movie.  I haven't seen it in a while, but it still holds up.  Delivery was fast and item arrived as promised.
Saw the movie years ago and loved it. Great cast and a good combination of the old west and today. One man trying to do right.
I've always loved this movie. It just makes you believe that true love still exists. A great buy at a great price. 2 Thumbs up.
I loved this movie, the music, choreography, Vanessa Williams, and the whole story line was pretty good to watch .
this is a very good movie. i liked it a lot but my grandkids really enjoyed it a lot, i would recommend it to anyone
I am a real sucker for a good dance flick and love story, and if only I could shake it like they do, another good film :)
I loved this movie, if you like dancing and a good love story this is it, good story line not great but good.
Good cast of characters with a nice ending and really nice dance moves enjoyable movie starting in Cuba then moving to the U.S.
This movie was great. I love dancing movies and this one was no different! Amazing to say the least, worth watching!
It gets the heart pumping and the feet moving. I love Latin music. It's feel good music that you can't help but move your body to.
I absolutely love this movie! I think it's Vanessa's best film. So full of energy, spark and great dancing! Chayanne's not too shabby either!
THIS MOVIE WAS ABOUT SOME ONE HAD TO PROVE THEMSELVES ......ONE THOUGHT THAY WERE BETTER THAN THE OTHER ....HE HAD TO PROVE HIMSELF
I love this movie and I watch it all the time. It deserves a five star rating for the acting, dancing and the music.
Total fun and great looking people.  For those who like dance movies, put this one on your list to watch!!
First time I had seen Chayann in  a movie, but I was hooked.  He and Vanessa Williams were a perfect pair and the movie was a great love story.
Classic - great music, sets and costuming. Very faithful to Dickens' story as well. This musical is a true masterpiece.
One of the classics.  Glad I got the DVD and sound track.  A plus for my musical library.
the classic story about an orphan living in an orphanage escapes then stealing to survive with this group of kids then lives with these people.
This musical is timeless. It's good for all ages. It's one of my very favorite movies of all time.
I took my grandson to see this play live ~ he loved it, sang many of the songs, so was delighted to find it to gift to  him.
my wife loves this movie that is why I bought it. I also enjoyed it. love the music. would buy from them again.
Classic movie! Everyone one loves this movie.  It's a classic and has great tunes and characters.  It's timeless and ageless!
watched this last night not a sratch on it been looking for this for a while and I got it used for a great price
I loved the music and also the characters. The story is a classic and this version is very well done.
Oldie but goodie; one of my Broadway fanatic daughter's favorites!
this is the musical version is just as enjoyable as the movie though different, and I need six more words
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1968. Had to add it to my collection.
A great musical with a view into the lives of orphans in England.........  great acting and the story line is poignant.
This movie is incredibly sad, yet you feel a sense of hope in the boy, Oliver. The songs are catchy and the timing is perfect!
Good old musical from my childhood and my grandson loves it. Of course, his name is Oliver. Recommend this movie.
This is a musical that I can sit down and watch over and over again.  My 18 year old daughter was amazed that I knew all the words to all the songs.
i saw this movie as a kid and liked it then, watching it now brings back some good memories of some great times....thank you...
Super pleased with this transaction in every way- well shipped, fast, good value. Would definately buy from again!
When my grands leave our house I tell them, &#34;You Can Go, But Be Back Soon&#34;.They love musicals and this was a fun musical!
Had the VHS version, glad to have the DVD .... Good Show ... Great cast,  I can now enjoy it over and over
The quality of this restoration and digital remastering is excellent--it has saved an absolute classic film.  I am thrilled with it!
ONLY  MICHEAL KEATON COULD PLAY THE ROLE AS THE MANIACAL VILLIAN IN THIS FILM. SEE HOW HEMANIPULATE AND MAKE IT BELIEVABLE
IF YOUR A BIG FAN OF MICHAL KEATON AND DON'T MIND HIM BEING THE BAD GUY, WHICH HE PLAYS VERY WELL! YOUR GOING TO REALLY LOVE THIS MOVIE!
The beautifully filmed scenes of the rolling Arabian sand dunes will absolutely take your breath away! Yes, it's that good!
An older movie that has been revised in the Blue-Ray format.  Great history film, great actors and a super story.
This version of LOA kicks ass! You definately get what you pay for. Nuff said. Throw away the legacy versions, you won't see them again.
One of the best films ever. I rank it right with his &#34;The Bridge on the River Kwai.&#34; Both films are magnificent on Blu-ray.
I know this movie by heart and so I appreciate this edition of it.  I particularly enjoyed the interviews with the stars as well as the making of it.
I only buy movies and classics I intent to keep and watch again ..  not much more to say about that ..
Ive seen this in a few formats this is a great job wish it had extras on how they tranfered to Bluray
Just love these old movies. This one is a classic and one of Peter O'Tooles best. you can't go wrong with him.
This Superbit DVD version of Lawrence of Arabia is of outstanding quality and is enhanced for widescreen TVs.
This was an excellent restoration.  Colors and picture were outstanding.  If you had an older version, this one is much better and worth the price.
Petere O'Toole deserves an Oscar victory. This movie is beautiful. David Lean is at the top of his game. Watch it on a huge screen.
I like The Swan Princess III and the Mystery of the Enchanted Treasure. It's a cool movie. I like the fact that Rothbart appeared in this movie.
They like the way the princess gets transform as a swan they enjoy it and have fun watching it is great
I love this series of movies. I had them as a child on vhs and was happy to find them in dvd form!
Excellent remake of the Broadway musical.  I will watch it every Independence day!  Great history lesson for anyone as well!
Powerful personalities and rousing music just as inspiring on the Kindle as it was in the theater years ago.  Kindle Prime movie access is great
This restored version of the movie is excellent and especially enjoyable around the 4th of July.
Excellent movie, believable history, pretty music, lots of humor, and actors you didn't know could sing doing just that.  What's more to love?
This movie is not only entertaining but educational and my son watchesit and he has learn alot about how congress worked back then
I love this movie!.  Wonderfully acted. Wonderfully directed. Beautifully restored and really great fun to watch over and over again.
A wonderful musical about the signing of the American Declaration of Independence! Great for young history students and their parents!
Does a great job in showing the thoughtfulness and angst that went into writing the constitution. My students loved the film as did I.
I purchased this as a gift for my daughter.  She loves musicals and I am hoping she will enjoy viewing this and having in her personal library.
A capsule of the Founding Fathers dilemma in securing the freedom of this nation without the high drama and I like the music.
Seen the play, seen the move, all are great, but you beat the original cast in this one.  Which is was in DVD or Bluray so I can keep if forever.
very classic western movie and a lot of good actors though not the best movie far from the worst one.
Silverado is the quintessential western.  It's a work of art.  If you own only one western movie this should be it.
Fun to follow all the threads of people's lives.Love all the characters in this movie. A very good western.
This is just one of those movies that belong in any good collection. First-rate cast, good story, great scenery, great all around.
THis movie should have made the return of classic westerns to the bigh screen, I wish it had and made a sequal.
This is truly one of the great modern western's ever.  In blu-ray it is just fantastic.  Great cast, director and really fun to watch.
Very entertaining. It has a lot of different things. I love horse. Horse play a good role in it, I mean there are many horse action in it.
This is a must have if you like westerns.  I was thrilled at the clarity and how great it looks in HD.
great film one of the  classic westerns would reccommend for any one's library of western films or horses and cowboys
SilveradoMy hubby ask for this and was surprised to have it at Christmas.  It is one of his favorite movies.
Well, it is a western, after all.  It has a lot to offer and good casting makes it  pleasant to watch.
Like westerns and love the part Kevin K plays along with the other actors.  Fast moving at the end and cool acting
Another family favorite - right up there with Maverick.  Watched it more than once and our kids loved it as much as we did.
Super Stars!  Super Story!  Cowboy heaven for those into westerns and the bad guys getting what they deserve!!  YEE HAW!!
I re-ordered this in DVD format to play on my DVD player.  It is one of my all time favorites!!  It has been enjoyed by my entire family for years!
I saw part of this on tv one saturday, and wanted to watch all of it and add to my collection, great movie, loved this western.
This movie has an all star cast imho and I enjoyed the plot, characters, action, and theme of the movie.
I have always liked this movie. I had it previously on a VCR,  but wanted a DVD. I enjoyed alot
An ongoing favorite
ON TIME & AT A GOOD PRICE!!  I LOVE BOTH THESE MOVIES & IN THE SAME SET!!!!!AWESOME!!  CAN'T FIND ANYPLACE ELSE, I LOVE WESTERNS
Excellent movie of course. Based on a true event. If you like K2 you will like this as well. Thanks
Great performance and direction. Very fair treatment of Oscar Wilde during a period of social upheavel unrecognizable in informed cultures.
Perfect performances. A must for any cinephile library. Stephen Fry IS Oscar Wilde. Jude Law wonderful in this early role.
Another film I was over and over.  Love Stephen Fry's portrayal of Wilde.  One of our greatest writers paid a very high price for his natural being.
the movie was terrific....the actors were cast perfectly.  I think this is the best rendition of Wilde's story so far.
This was an interesting movie based on a wonderful writer. The way he lived his life explained a lot about the way he wrote. I highly recommend it.
a popular story of the history of the French Revolution and its amazing conclusion in spite of the French governments best efforts
I love this adaptation of the book.  I have seen this film at least five time and don't seem to get tired of it.
I'm a huge Liam Neeson fan and this movie has intrigue, drama , and suspense and it lasts the entire movie.  It's one of my favorites.
I ordered this movie while I was in Korea like 4 years ago and lost it.... but this is such a great movie.
Item shipped timely.  Item as described.  Great movie, one of the classics I would recommend to anyone. Watched several times already
ive been looking for this movie for a long time and i found it at amizon no problem and at a great price and there always arrive on time or before
One of the better versions of &#34; Les Miserales.&#34;  I always like most any movie that Liam Neeson is in.  Mr. Neeson always plays his part well.
This is another very good movie. I could watch this over and over again. The movie arrived on time with no issues.
A non-singing version of Les Mis.  It's well worth watching.  I like it as much as the musical.  Highly recommend.
It is a great story.  The movie is most enjoyable for the scenes in Paris and in general for the photography.  The cast is good.
This version has to the best version.  A great movie.  Visually beautiful with very strong perfomances by artist and characters you'll love.
Liam Neelson was great! I would recommend this movie to all of Neelson's fans. I enjoyed all the other actor as well.
Even though the latest version is also fabulous, this version is still a favorite of mine. The cast is fantastic.
to awesome for words
It was not what I expected from Liam Neesan, but it was well done.  I am glad that I can watch it again.
Excellent story and excellent acting.
I'm very familiar with the Broadway version but the movie was well done.  The cast was fantastic and the story line is superb.  Great movie.
I don't believe there is a part that Liam Neeson can't play. A very good version of Les Miserables. Fast shipping, just as described.
This movie is awesome. I don't understand why it bombed so bad in the theaters...
Good movie! Enjoyed this movie very much! Never lost interest, well worth the time! Would and have recommend this movie to others!
I loved this version of the classic.  It was twice as good as the newer version.  The actors and production are simply better.
I love this movie - it suits my tastes very nicely. If you love crime and plot twists you will probably enjoy this at least a little.
Love the east coast accent with alot of Italian family drama. good suspense, good action, great ending with an unexpected twist.
DEMI MOORE, AND HARVEY KEITEL ARE MY FAVORITE CHARACTERS IN THE MOVIE. I'VE SEEN IT ON PAY PER VIEW AND ON HBO.
I liked having English SDH subtitles on this Blu-ray disc as the DVD version of this movie did not have them.
You love Arnold, you love Action, you love cheesy one-liners, then you already know you love this movie as well
If you don't like Arnold Schwarzenegger movies then you don't deserve to like his movies at all and that's the truth.
This movie is 150 pounds of awesome in a 100 pound sack.
Arnold's performance embodied everything he's about - looking tough, lots of action, and best of all: He is the hero & nobody can stop him!
THIS IS A FANTASTIC MOVIE ABOUT THE MOTHER WANTING TO STAY IN CONTROL OVER HER SON BUT THE WIFE PUTS IT DOWN YOU JUST HAVE TO WATCH THIS ONE
This movie is one of my favorites. It keeps me on the edge of my seat watching this story unfold.
movie was absolutely perfect. brand new and played excellently. good movie so glad i purchased it so reasonalbly priced.thank you
i have been looking for this movie for about two years now and i am glad that i found it here, thank you all so very much......
this is one of my favorite christmas specials of all time and I was sooo excited to be able to find it on dvd since the only way i had it was on vas
Rare item, great buy.  Good quality DVD makes the Muppets live forever.  Unlike Jim Henson.
This movie is one of the perfect movies for the whole family at Christmas.  Not preachy or overly dogmatic, this is a timeless holiday classic.
Now i must say that now i know why this movie is so well known this movie really breaks some serious barriers in terms of thrillers.
Great mystery sotry, set in Floridda.. Includes sailing, loaded w/ surprises. Strong sex scenes. Might rate &#34;R,&#34; has moderate violence.
I really only got this movie for the good looking women.  But wow!!!  This was really a good movie.  Tons of plot twists.  Try it out.
watching Denise making out with Campbell in prestine crisp high definition blu ray is the BEST!!! 5 stars!
This movie has a great cast of actors...who deliver the goods.  It has a good plot...and it holds your attention througout.  I loved this movie!
I THOUGHT IT WAS A VERY GOOD MOVIE AND I HAVE NEVER SEEN IT BEFORE BUYING IT AND I AM HAPPY I DID.
I thought this was one of the best videos I have seen in a while, lots of fun twists.
I love everything that neve cambell does she is an amazing actress and will always be one of my favorite
A comedy, a love story, & a lesson about life from the eyes of the suburban teen. A must have at a great price.
really cool movie showed jen when she was young liked the movie a lot thank you all good for the buck
I love this movie. Has a great soundtrack, great characters, and great story line. It's also in great condition. :)
Good movie for the price. Had it on vhs and wanted it on dvd. Definitely worth a look good movie night flick
I didn't expect this movie to be good to begin with, but...the ensemble cast, the acting and the script really was surprisingly good. Very well done.
This was an excellent buy, the price was right and it seems to me to be in beautiful  , Ya whatever, I tanks for licenses
I love this and it works very well.  I will keep buying more due to the cost and quailty of the product
The movie uses many different elements from many different Madeline books.  It is cute and represents Madeline accurately.
my 3yr old absolutely loves this film and its not so bad that i have to sit through it sometimes too.delightful :)
I love Hatty Jones in this one. She is good and her best friend. I wish  there was madeline two. I have a lot of madeline dvds and videos.
Saw this movie in Germany and loved it and have been searching for it. It is an excellent movie and I would recommend it.
This is an awesome movie! Dennis Quaid does such a good part! This is a serious movie but it does have a few light hearted scenes.
Dennis Quaid does some of his best work in this film.  It is unforgettable with an interesting storyline that you long remember.
This movie is about redemption and the cost of war.  It will leave you with pictures that won't get out of  your head
A fun movie with great special effects.  Try and see it on DVD wideacreenBesides, there are those of us who like to see NYC trashed.
For all Godzilla fans this is a must for the collection.  We enjoyed the extra features and look forward to more Godzilla.
I love this movie.  There is a lot of fast action and great effects. We will watch it over and over.
My 2 boys absolutely love this movie and cannot wait for the remake to come out this year.  DVD came on time, new as advertised.
Now that I own the DVD I am able to watch it whenever I want to, and each viewing seems to make it just a little bit better!
the dvd I got was in good shape the disk was in good shape Godzilla is very good  very dramatic
Very well liked movie for the grandkids....it had some action and exciting parts that kept their interest for a long time...
We have watched this movie at least 30 times since we received it.  It is a MUST SEE movie.  Matthew Broderick is super fantastic.
Although it was used, I received great picture quality and have passed this on to neighbors for them to enjoy.
i like godzillagodzilla is king of monsters past and future
GREAT MOVIE! KIND OF SAD BUT VERY INTERESTING . THERE'S LOTS OF ACTION! DRAMA! GODZILLA LOOKS GOOD THE F/X DID GOOD!
I mean what additional good comments can I give about the Godzilla remake.  Love this movie, my youngest child enjoys watching it with me.
Love this movie! Love the updated feel and computer imaging that was put into this movie! A real classic for years to come!
Bought this to build up my DVD collection from VHS, seller was fast, orderly and DVD was still in plastic wrapping, no dings, no scratches, no skips.
great great great great great movie of all times besides King Kong ! i collect all the classics its worth it
I really love this movie. I have watched this show for more than 10 times. Fast pace and great effects. For me, it is a must have dvd.
This is not one of the best Godzilla movies ever made but it's still pretty good. i liked it alot and i hope you will to. I Recommend it for everyone
Yeah, this was an awesome movie. Good special effects, and I do love Matthew Broderick.
watch this movie all the time. its a great classic. acting was great and the special effects are amazing.  best movie that matthew brodrick made.
If you like big lizards and Godzilla. Then this film is for you because it has action, thrills, adventure, and excitement.
Short review:I really liked this movie! IMO, this Godzilla looks better than the japanese Godzilla!(...)
I thought this was a good movie.I also thought Godzilla was really cool.You should buy this movie.
awesome movie great graphics and sounddidn't come scratched or badly recorded.
older godzilla movie is a fun family movie and its beter on blue ray you cant go roge on this movie.
very good movie. made back when Hollywood was still putting out entertainment and not the CGI junk they have today.
Awesome movie!  One of my all time favorite movies, and I am a BIG movie person.  Good condition and good buy.
Why was Brad Davis not nominated for an Oscar for this?? He's terrific in the role. As are John Hurt and Randy Quaid.
Although the DVD appears to be homemade the quality is Good.  The movie is entertaining and quite well done.  The acting is excellent.
Excellent movie, very realistic, a must have if you like classic good movies for your collection or a good one for a start.
A good movie to watch. For an 80's movie It Is still a good movie to watch. Plenty of drama.
Still a great movie after all these years, and the commentary is priceless.  Highly recommend.
blue thunder is my total favourite as a kid so a must buy for me. The action is still kick butt with a great story line. Some great actors.
roy schenider (jaws) pilots a super high tech helicopter across LA and reaks havoc when corruption assures. worth the watch
wow it really looks good for this old classic flix.good sound and pix,I love this movie from years ago , the chase seen is great.
Great bluray great picture great sound and all the special features from the dvd are ported over to this bluray.
With an excellent commentary track and behind the scenes documentaries, this blu-ray provides what this great movie deserves - the quality treatment.
Fascinating that when this movie was made is was a work of fiction....now it is a reality.  Still fun to watch.
for 1990, this movie to this date is hot, pretty brutal but over all good acting, good plot and production, its a good add to the collection.
Candy man 5 times in the mirror and he appears&#8230;Boo! Tony Todd and his creepy voice Run! lol good movie.
Excellent service on packaging and delivery.  I would recommend this product to anyone who loves good horror films.  Clive Baker is a genius.
Just have to say that the movie is a really great classic! Cool actors, great plot, no b.s. It's just a movie that must be seen!
i love this movie not scary but good seen it in the past i wish the 2nd one would be cheaper so i can buy it
I saw this movie years ago and Chirs Sarandon made a delicious vampire.  Although it wasn't as scary as I would have liked, it was a fun movie.
I look at this movie maybe once a year. I still enjoy it.
was the greatest movie i seen in a long time and chris sarandon is a fox i just loved it all
One of the first horror films I watched as a child.  Still great today.  Glad to own a piece of horror history.
One of the great classics from my era--the 80s! This movie scared the crap out of me as a kid. Shame to see Corey Haim so young & full of promise...
This movie we watch over and over again.... it has everything.... scarey, funny, sexy - you name it.  Chris Sarandon is sooooooo sexy in this movie!
One of the best scary movies from the 80's, a decade which had a lot of really good scary movies. I watch it nearly every Halloween.
I just wish they paired it with Part 2.  I really would like to get my hands on that.  Didn't get that for Christmas this year.
I  LIKED  THIS  MOVIE  ALOT.  IM  NOT  ONE  FOR  SPOFF  MOVIES BUT  THIS  WAS  GOOD.  TEENS  WOULD  LOVE  THIS  MOVIE.  GREAT  GIFT  IDEA.
was a great movie nothing wrong with it no skips no jumps no pauses no blurines ok ok ok ko
we enjoy westerns and this has some good history lessons in it and it is interesting to watch but listen well
A very good historial movie. It has the Indians side of the story, which is refreshing to see. A great action movie that will hold your attention.
This is one of my favorite British DVDs.  Anthony Hopkins and Emma Thompson are such wonderful actors and the story is compelling.
When this was released as a movie, I missed it for some reason.  It deserves all of the honors it has received.  Excellent entertainment!
I have been wanting to see this movie for quite a while and was happy to see Amazon was carrying it on instant video.  Greatly enjoyed this movie.
Great story, gorgeously photographed, with a perfect cast, all adding up to first rate entertainment.  Highly recommended!
This is one of my favorite movies of all time.  The actors are great and so is the story line.  I would rate it superb.
If you like Emma Thompson, Helena Bonham Carter and Anthony Hopkins you will enjoy this movie. And don't forget Vanessa Redgrave.
You have to love van damme movies, lots of action packed drama,. always entertaining. I've seen almost all his movies. Keep them coming.
I like movies he is in and this is just another one he stars in. Pretty action packed. Overall I would say rent it before buying it.
DVDS In Excellent Shape.  Very Fast Delivery. Awesome Seller.  Will Buy From Again.
The DVD is in excellent conditions and worked fine from the begining of the movie top the end. Satisfied with the purchase.
its pretty good van damme dose what he dose best..!! which is fighting nd acting
I wish time cop would be released on bluray by itself like this movie, rather than a double set . Better PQ than the DVD.
was very a very good story, with great action. one of your better westerns. receive on time and in excellant shape.
Bought as a gift for my Husband, he already had just the DVD.He loves having it and BluRay is fantastic!!!
Who doesn't like a woman that can shoot just like the guys and also look good doing it. My wife really likes it.
Loved it. A lot of action and I love westerns. Gene Hackman plays an awesome villain and there were plenty of stars in this film.
great cast played thir parts with great gutso.gene hackman brillent as usual mean as ever.great to see the movie in blu ray.
Loved It! Love Russell Crowe in almost anything. Adore westerns and this was a good cast all around with a gripping story. Two thumbs up!
This movie brought home some of the crudness of the old west and just how violent it really was. A Good movie.
A great movie taken place in the old west. A great storyline and wonderful character development. A must see for western fans.
REST IN PIECE SIR TONY SCOTT, DIRECTOR OF REVENGE. HOLLYWOOD HAS LOST A TRULY GIFTED FILMMAKER. SO PROUD TO BE A FAN AND TO OWN ALL HIS FILMS.
this movie was a very good movie. i really liked it, but i like kevin costner . he is a great actor. price was great also
What can you say. Everything I've seen that Kevin Costner did was good. Enjoyed the movie. The quality was excellent.
Kevin Costner at his best....check out  NO WAY OUT...  THE WAR......HATFIELDS AND MC COYS...MESSAGE IN A BOTTLE...great movies...  4 stars
I  loved this movie if your a kevin Costner fan you will really love this, Marilyn stowe, Anthony Quinn great movie
This movie was very touching and also sad. One thing you never know is who you are going to fall in luv with. Powerful movie !
I love Kevin Costner. He does a good job playing the good guy or is he really the good guy. Watch the movie and judge for yourself.
Good watch.. two great stars and Stowe is always entertaining, even as a fallen woman or a victim ,she plays the role well.
always thought this one outstanding movie... one of the best -in blu ray it is even better
Great Movie I have watched in many times A + A + A + A + A + A +  Costner GREAT JOB
Omg I saw this when i was younger..It is well worth the watch...Kevin Costner is excellent.....OMG the move is one of the great ones.
i just love this tape so must it is great i just love to watch it thank you so must
One of Demi Moore's best films acting wise.  Had a good storyline and even though I am not a fan of end of the world movies, this one was great.
This tape will bring tears to your eyes. I know I cried and the copy that I got is clear and you can hear what is going on.
I thought this was very good. This was one of Demi Moore's that did she did not get a lot of credit for.  All actors were very good.
I am very pleased with my purchase. It was sent very quickly and in great condition.  I will buy from this company again. Love the series.
Such a good movie - oldie but a goodie.  I used to watch it all the time as a kid so watching it as an adult is a bit of a head trip.
If you like military movies this is a good choice if you don't mind cussing. Takes the viewers through the entire mission.
My husband loves this movie and asked me to get it but he doubted I would find the DVD. He loves this movie. Good price and arrived fast.
These three movie were great i in joyed tham. they wer ver intertaaing.The playses they shot the seans in each movie wrer beautiful.
I mean, it's a classic film that every person needs to see in their life. Bill Murray at his best.
Always funny. Classic lines that never get old. Watched it with my 11 year old. Probably should have waited a couple more years.
My favorite and even more so now that I don't have to stick a disk or tape into an antiquated machine to watch it! ;)
This looks awesome on a Kindle HD.  Great picture and sound.  I look forward to watching the whole movie at some point.
What can I say. Bill Murray rocks this movie. I would reccomend this movie to everyone. Great comedy great movie
This is a classic slapstick style comedy.  Love Bill Murray in this one.  Quality of Amazon streaming was great. Highly recommend.
I love this movie it is fun and just plain dumb.A great Friday night flick.Bill Murray - John Candy - Egon what can I say... fun ...fun ...funny
Up tight people get theirs with humor, but not much differently from the theatrical release
Bill Murray and Harold Ramis are so good together.  this is one of my all time favorites!  I love it.
I just love the pictures and updated sound quality from Bluray movies that were transfered from either VHS or older DVD's and so will YOU!!!!
So funny, you will recite quotes from the movie right on queue. Love Sgt Hulka. Hilarious look at the Army from an 80's perspective.
I love Bill Murray....he is SO funny....and in Stripes ~ well, down right rolling on the floor hilarious! Highly recommended!
This is classic Bill Murray. What else needs to be said? I've seen this movie a hundred times and I still laugh out loud!
Excellent and light hearted movie. This movie takes me back to the 80's.  Funny and very nostalgic. I would recommend this to anyone.
I have not seen this movie for years I forgot how much it made me laugh out loud thank you
All Time Great movie!!!!!!!!! Awesome and funny as all Bill Murray movies are. A real all time Gem of a comedy
Good goofy movie.  It is right up there with Caddyshack.  I liked John Candy's character, Moose, in this funny movie.
THIS WAS ANOTHER ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES WITH A LOT OF HUMOR WITH A MILITARY SETTING!  I RECOMMEND IT TO ANYONE WHO ENJOYS A COMICAL GENRE!
HAVE WATCHED THIS MOVIE FOR THE LONGEST TIME SINCE IT HAS BEEN AVAILABLE IN THE WORLD....NOW I GOT A COPY TO MY OWN....
This film I saw with my Father when it came out. It's great a lot of Fun! Merry Christmas and Happy New Year 2012!
This is a very good movie, Bruce Willis and James Garner make a very funny pair.Great Movie.If you like Bruce Willis you will love this movie.
I had been looking for this movie for a long time. It became a favorite of mine and I was thrilled to find it and get a copy of it, Great, fun film.
I WAS SO HAPPY TO FIND THIS MOVIE ON DVD!!  IT IS  A FANTASTIC FILM, WHICH I HAVE ENJOYED ON VHS.  VERY FUNNY AND ENTERTAINING!!!  :)
This is my husband's favorite movie.  He wore out the VHS version by watching it every weekend.  Fun, clean family fare.
ANOTHER great movie by Gus Van Sant. The storyline is easy to follow. It has a really good cast. NOT boring at all.
This movie is so funny and pretty accurate to th Pam Smith case, considering they are playing it for comedy. Kidman and Phoenix are both excellemt .
I have never not liked a movie with Nicole Kidman in it.  This one was a great myster with a surprise ending.
I love this movie.  To me it's one of Demi Moore and Rob Lowe's best 80's movies.  It's a classic.
I remember this movie from seeing it years ago and decided to pick it up. Jim Belushi is hilarious in this!
Great movie. I wanted to rewatch this movie again & relive the 80's experience. It's been remastered too, I think. It still looks good.
When I seen this one at Wal-Mart for $5.50, I had to have it. This movie is AWESOME! If you haven't seen it, you are really missing out.
Loved this movie back in the 1980s and still love it now. Can't beat the price. Good comedy with some heart to it.
One of my favorite Mark Walberg movies. His acting is great and I loved the plot. If you have never seen this then you've been living under a rock.
This is a darn good movie.  Much better than I expected.  Give it a shot
I loved it. It was better than Cats. I want to see it again and again... :)
Making a Christmas basket for a big Mark Wahlberg fan!  Was able to get lots of his movies for great prices!
Love this movie, its awesome. Great price, excellent condition, came on time. Thank you so much for selling it, I just had to purchase it :-)
this is a very good movie its a classic and its very funny. starring mark walhberg when he was in his prime
A great Brian De Palma movie. If you like Sisters and  Dressed to Kill then this movie is for you.
the last very good de palma movie!!!! amazing stuff, frankie-melanie-sexy etc....!! great story!! suspens, what do you whant more?
It is a true classic about the birth of Las Vagas.  The  greatest part was a view into the design of the autos of that era.
I loved this film! It is crime drama at it's best and Warren Beatty's best performance since &quot;Reds&quot;.
The movie is great and it tells the history of Vegas and how it got started. Warren play a great roll as Bugsy.
was like seeing a old friend again watching this movie is a treat warren is perfect in this role what a awesome actor
Love the movies with Jacqueline Bissett and Nick Nolte.  Good mystery story and played well.  Scenery was great!  Loved it.
great movie with action,robert shaw is the best.anyone who likes movies about water, this flick is for you.just bye it
one of my favorite movies.  Allof the actors are on top of their game.  Great story line, wonderful photography and locations, good action flick
Always liked this movie, finally got around to buying it.  Good quality, plays good, no complaints. Enjoyed seeing it again.
I'm a fan of Robert shaw. This is a suspenseful movie with a lot going on. It has different angles looking for the treasure.
Just loved this movie with it turns of events and secret in this time piece. Love Don Cheadle character. Off course loved Denzel
i purchased this movie by mistake, but the movie was great.  and, the acting was great.  it is very enjoyable.
Loved the interaction of the actors in developing the story line. Cyndra Williams should be in more movies. Love her down home  approach.
He had very long nose, his buddies don't know what to do,or put out a fire if they found one. Her head is in the stars. Funny movie
The writing is the best and the characters are so delicious! Even the town is beautiful. Daryl Hannah never looked more beautiful.
Steve Martin was funny on Saturday Night Live and this Movie shows that he still is, you might also like My Blue Heaven and The 3 Amigos.
Steve Martin is great in this movie and show a flawless ability for amazing comedic timing. Have always loved this one!
The acting is outstanding , the story may be similar, but not with Steve Martin on board. I espically like the fire department
I love this movie and I am so glad to have it on blu ray. Steve Martin is so funny in this movie
Good fun movie.  The transfer quality translated well to DVD and looks good on an HD TV.  The packaging is clean and crisp.  I recommend it.
Motorcycle movies start with this one.  While a bit cheesy, it summed up the attitude of many generations.  In addition to several cool bikes.
gotta love Marlon...very old movie but a real classic...husband was very happy to get it ...the good ole days relived
One of Marlon's best films.  Great action, some romance, a lot of drama, and all without cursing or graphic violence.  How did they do that?
Was a very good movie, light hearted and very entertaining. I would highly recommend it to anyone who likes the two main characters. Very good!
a very good movie. Have not seen it in a while. But, I remember it being very good.Suggest it for all!
Barbra makes so many good movies. She is wonderful in this role. I wish she would make another movie soon.
I really enjoyed this movie. It is definitely worth a second watch. It is a great romantic comedy. One of my favorites.
I HAVE ENJOYED JEFF BRIDGES MOVIES FOR YEARS AND NOW I HAVE ANOTHER MOVIE TO ADD TO MY COLLECTION, I AM VERY HAPPY
I like Barbra Streisand movies and this was a good one . It was  romantic and funny. I loved the end!!!
It got here quickly and in great shape.  Thanks a bunch, Suzette!  This is exactly what I was looking for and for a fraction of the cost!
Romantic and love the story line.  Barbara adds her own flair and the other actors did well.  It was great to see Lauren Bacall!
This is one of the best surfing films i have ever seen, The Actors played a really down-to-earth lifelike role!! CHEERS
I have always loved slasher movies. I love the corny moments and not so great acting. Grew up with slashers and they have a special place with me.
these movies are pretty good. i can't wait for ul3 if they're going to make a third one. they obviously need to.
I love having this movie on the Kindle so I can watch it anywhere.  I have watched it many many times.
This is a good movie with a star packed cast. With many twists and turns you never know what is going to happen next. Love It
Great flick - cool chicks. I've heard the stories before but that's what made the movie work so well.Great
This is a great teen movie. I loved watching it when I was younger and still enjoy it today. Would recommend if you like scream.
This was purchased as a gift for my daughter.  She will be happy to have this in her personal library.
awesome sci fi type of movie that keeps you guessing until the end.  Great starring cast, awesomely written with special effects
An Excellent Movie With A Strange Twist.I Love Armin Mueller-Stahl's Work In Movies.This Is A Movie To Buy, And Add To Your Collection.I Did !!
Great story, great twists and surpises. Really good performances by the actors. I really like this movie. Great job by the film makers.
I like the Matrix feel about the movie. However, I am clueless about what the movie means. It's good for the flashy lights.
I love this movie. It made me cry, and was very much like Beaches (in some way) If you loved Beaches the movie, you'll love this.
This movie has funny parts, but it also has sad parts.  It is a good drama, and I recommended it to those who enjoy emotional movies.
An exceptional move.  Great actors and good story line make for a movie to be watched over and over again.
This story shows how family can learn to work through any problem. The acceptance of a stepmom can be difficult and Julia really comes through.
This movie has great actors and a very good story. I Love It! I recommend it to all Julia and Susan fans.
I loved the story line, and each actor did a great job portraying the emotions of the situation.  The children were really good too.
This is an amazing movie - heart-wrenching, gut-wrenching - addressing real-life issues from a unique angle.  Get ready for a tear jerker.
guilty pleasure fave...own because I can never get enough of it and consider it one of my classic go to cry movies/family drama
Julia roberts does an awesome job .. helps where she can and tries very hard to make it a great time
it came in good package shape works very well it came on time quick like and is fun i will enjoy  it a long time
One of the best, funniest movies. I watched it so many times before I bought it. He is just fabulous!
I freaky dark movie but I have to admit that I enjoyed it.  It is hard to get past the main plot of it but I thought they did a good job of it.
I had seen this movie years ago but just recently bought it for myself. Rewatching it I still indeed like the movie.
Very well done. For those who have experience with family members that suffer from Borderline Personality Disorder this movie offers hope.
even though this was made a few years ago, it is still a great movie.great story and well made.would reccomend
A great movie with moments of tragic situations. It's all about life and its up and downs. Great performances by Winona Ryder and Angelina Jolie. .
This movie is chock full of big name actresses. it is a good account of a person's journey through mental illness, Highly recommend it.
Lots of emotional sidelines in the movie. I highly recommend. I even cut my hair short for the first time after seeing this movie.
Angelina Jolie stole the movie.  She won an Oscar for best supporting actress but she was the star of the movie.
Great movie great true story.  Follows the book real close. I liked alot I gave it 5stars. I really enjoyed it
I liked, this good actresses who, played in this, I never read the book I will when I get time but I liked this worth watching......
NOW I COULD EASYLY SAY THIS WILL GO DOWN AS ONE OF THE GRATEST MOVE EVER MADE IN THE WORLD THAT IS SO FOR SHORE
I am glad that their lips match what is being said! Some dvd 's are Lip SYNC-ING, and this one is not.Thanks
Great movie, great story line, good acting. I have watched this movie so many times. It is one of my favorites.
I forgot a lot of the subtleties of this film, I am glad I watched it again. The acting is solid and there are a lot of emotional moments.
Great family movie about small town life.  It's just a sweet movie that even guys would like.  Just love this movie!
i haven't seen this since movie since i was a teenager, and you guys made it possible for me to own this awesome movie now that i'm a little older.
Another really fun Jackie Chan movie.Definitely worth buying and adding to your martial arts movie collection.You won't be sorry.
We enjoyed this movie.  Do yourself a favor and give it a look-see.  You won't be disappointed. Great movie at a great price.
I love this movie simply because it doesn't seem they are acting at all but normal people carrying on conversations and reacting like people would
A clever story and great acting by Woody and Diane Keaton. Some interesting plot twists and some Hitchcock-like scenes. A fun movie!
Great Movie to watch.  I am not a movie watcher but this movie was good.  Curl up in your favorite chair with some snacks and unwind.
I had seen the movie a long time ago.  It was just as good as I remembered.  Would recommend it.
enjoy Woody Allen's movies and this one is GREAT!  Would reccomend this movie to anyone who enjoys mysteries!!  Thank You...Marion Edwards
A funny thriller inspired in Double Indemnity by Billy Wilder, this has Diane Keaton back to pair with Woody Allen..
For a first time movie for it was great. A bit slow, but I love the relationship between the characters as well as the cinematography was great!!
I could go on for days but won't.  Suffice to say:  Absolutely love it, as always.  Wes Anderson is my God.
&#34;Passion Fish&#34; is a beautiful story and I recommend it wholeheartedly. Mary McDonnell plays her part beautifully. I loved it!
a bit rough in language but a good story i would highly recommend this movie. Rate it at A -
Excellent movie.  The Passion Fish has great values to share with many.  The DVD is an outstanding movie.  Thank you for the opportunity to purchase.
I ordered for my friend, who is a Mary McDonnell fan.  She enjoyed viewing it and is always looking for more DVD's with her in it.
I really enjoyed it.  Good acting.  Mary was really good.  Things like this really happen.  How much you can grow  She did great.
I collect diecast cars from muscle to nostalgia and I've found that Jada brand is consistantly outstanding in quality and workmanship..
Who's Harry Crumb?:  the video was great and enjoyed watching this movie, everything was in great conditon and recieved the video on time
candy is funny manthe movie good castingjohn plays very good types with costumesin funny gum shoe
Annie Potts is scantly clad and hot in this movie. and John Candy is funny in this as well as a good movie.
thank you, in my opinion this is one of the greatest movies ever made!! it makes me cry it's a wonderful movie!!
This is a classic. as i got older, I appreciated what this movies was saying in the 60s. i still love this movie.
It's a classic movie. You can't go wrong. All the actors involved are top-knotched. This movie has always been a favorite. We loved it.
helped to turn the racial tide in the 60s...a great film. Spencer Tracy's last.  Poitier a little too intense with his father.
Artists are the prophets of our lives and times, pay heed all you sinners. Do I hear an Amen? Great biography.
This is adult only stuff. Love his work, but the dude is weird. The whole family is screwed up, no wonder the art is so off beat.
This is a great documentary.He is one of the best artists of our time.The story of his  life and his family is very interesting.
hysterical movie, I love it.  Great seller too
This movie is so good that I had it on VHS, and now I have it on DVD. It's a movie I can watch over and over again
Amazon. Some cheap, some costley, But so far I have not had a complant. &#34;Hudson Hawk&#34; is one of his best; By all means.
Couldn't help but love him and guess I'm going to have to order another one for the family as my sister-in-law loved this one.Thanks
This comedy i watched more than 20 times. Interestingly look at Bruce Willis (the star of action-movies) in this role. Very funny.
A very silly and fun and romantic movie that has nothing at all to do with real witches.  I do love this movie.
Can't tell you how many time I have enjoyed this movie and the lovely Kim Novak.
Great classic movie. How can you go wrong? It stars Jimmy Stewart and Kim Novak.SHe is a witch and he falls in love
How can you ask for a better movie. Just love everything about this movie. The acting is fantastic. The old movies are really the best movies.
i love this movie.  Its full of quirky characters, jack Lemon is crazy hilarious, and a smoldering Kim Novak.  Great halloween romance movie
It's a fun ride from beginning to end. You'll Laugh and wish you could be in on all the fun. Kim Novak and Jimmy Steward are on top of their game
Very cute, amusing film; love Jimmy Stewart, Kim Novak and Jack Lemmon.  I saw it years ago and knew I would want to own it some day.
What a great movie!! I just loved it...It's one that you can watch many times and enjoy...definitely a keeper for good!
What could be better than this?  Great stars and I love the story.  I have watched this movie at least 10 times in the past 20 years.
Great movie, and the seller was very courteous, prompt, and the disk arrived in great condition.  Thank you!
This film is a classic, with a great cast:  James Stewart, Kim Novak, Jack Lemmon, and Ernie Kovacs. How can you go wrong?
Magical fun . I love this movie . Wonderful cast and it's good movie .
This delightful movie seems to me to be the honest precursor to the hit television series Bewitched!An awesome movie which I highly recommend!
I've loved this movie since I saw it the first time. With the extraordinary cast that was assembled for this film you can't go wrong.
can't go wrong with this movie, Jimmy Stewart, Kim Novak and of course Pyewacket.  It's a great addition to any collection.
This is a very cool twisted little tale, IT wasn't predictable, had action, I enjoyed it a lot ! IT a great Stephen King story, creepy, fun!!
The original book is far more detailed. I would recommend that you read the original book or listen to the audio book before watching this film.
Uncomfortable story, but Ian Mckellan  is always superb.
I purchased this as a gift for my daughter.  I know she will love.  Actually I think she's had it B-4.
One of Stephen Kings absolute best movies. Truly enjoy every time I watch it. Dark and surreal like a good flick should be.
Bizarre premise.  First time I saw Tommy Lee Jones.  Faye Dunaway is great.  Suspenseful.  Not for kids (nudity and violence).
Love The Actor line up. This is back when they were young & good looking! A decent mystery story for the time! A +
This 2000 edition of the DVD is awesome! Contains widescreen & full screen version. Digital image of the film is great!
Remember the early days of rock & roll well this movie has this and then some you will enjoy it
Great movie , a real life story of Ritchie Valens , LOVE the music - such a great loss for all rock and roll fans.
Good movie love it and would recommend it to any ages and a family movie loved it will watch it over and over.
Wow... One of the hottest moves with Sherilyn.Fenn! a must see movie...will look for more movies by her!! a must have in your collection.
My wife loves the 80's romance movies.  She cannot get enough of them.  Every year she ask for them and this is one of her favorites.
I enjoyed this movie more than 9 1/2 weeks. Played liked a fantasy. Liked it very much. I recommended this to several people.
Loved this movie because I loved the book that it was based on.  Michelle did a wonderful job as the mother in this movie.
i love it its one of my favorite i had in a vha and i couldnt play it any more
It has a really nice plot and positive ending. A movie with both learning and teaching moments. Highly recommended for all ages.
I have always loved this movie.... I grew up on it!!!! Its in really good condition.... What a great purchase
I always wanted this film and at the price of this Blu Ray it's not to be missed. Good special features too.
This was a great adventure story. It is fictional but very enjoyable. The quality of the product was excellent, too.
This is a classic must-see movie. It has a wonderful cast, and tells a great story. Plus, Gregory Peck AND David Niven!? Yes, please!
One of my favorite 1960's war movies, David Niven was never better! All you need is some cold ones, chips and the time to watch.
This is a great world war two movie, it is well acted by super stars.. I think its intense and the type of movie you can watch many times over...
Musical score is in my library for all these years, NOW, I get to own the whole great, movie .. and in such sharp focus!
Movie Made to author's novel, Director didn't mess with perfection. All Major Actors are Pros. able to carry the story and the action.
An excellent WWII movie.  I've seen this over and over and never tire of it.  Excellent acting and suspense.  Music is excellent too.
Each of the actors deserve an award - all actions may have been shot in a studio, but the story is very well 'told'. A must for any WW-II Buff.
The Cast of movie make it one the best of all times Anthony Quinn, Gregory Peck, and David Nivens  and the rest of the crew were great.
One of the all time enjoyable films. Great acting and cool story. I enjoy watching it again and again. Delivery was fast and complete.
I never tire of watching this film, which has everything  -  with a brilliant cast, outstanding action and moments of high tension.
This is one of the very best war movies ever made. The story is good, the action intense and exciting. It hasn't become dated it's an excellent work.
One of my favotite movies for action and suspense.The cast is one of the best when you consider gregory peck.
Bought this for my husband for Christmas but I also love this movie. It's well written, well acted and exciting. A slam bang combination !
Thanks for not allowing these classics to disappear- great movies and David Niven a wonderful actor. Keep distributing these classics please
This was a movie that my Dad remembered from years ago and thought he would like to see again.  He really enjoyed watching it again!
Love Gregory Peck! What a great performance in &#34;The Guns of Navarone&#34;! I've watched this movie several times.
a wonderful movie starring 3 legends Rita Hayworth Frank Sinatra and Kim Novak where Frank uses Rita to get him his own nightclub but falls for Kim
Definitely a DVD for your library collection.  All three actors weregreat.  Very entertaining and talented stars.  A must buy!
Great entertainment from an age where quality abounded. Fabulous music performed with excellence. A prize movie for my collection. Essential viewing.
This movie is a classic! I enjoyed hearing all those wonderful songs . The performances were stellar! I would watch this over & over again.
Of course the movie is fine, that why I ordered it.Service from Amazon was great as usuall
This product was delivered in a very timely manner.  It is funny.  Good product.
EASTWOOD PLAYS A DIFFERENT KIND OF GUY HERE. VERY WELL DONE AND WELL WORTH A VIEW. HE USUALLY DOES A FINE JOB.
This movie is great.. Clint Eastwood at his best!!! Great Director and Good Acting... All I can say is I loved it!!!!!
One of Clint Eastwood's best.  He is a favorite of mine.  Wonderful talents.  Too bad Eastwood is growing old with the rest of us.
True to Clint Eastwood's acting, one will not be disappointed with the exciting drama of this wonderful and courageous movie.
What a great script! And Clint does it justice. Russo is also a treat. This film is a lesson in how to do a great action-thriller on the screen.
I loved this, have seen it at least 5 times, above expectation.  this is all I can say about this
This is an excellent film. Clint Eastwood provides an outstanding performance in his role. I would highly recommend watching this movie.
This movie was wonderful!!!  Clint Eastwood and Meryl Streep were outstanding in their roles...truly a classic love story!!!  Loved it!!
MY WIFE AND I ENJOY GOOD MOVIES AND THIS MOVIE WAS WELL PUT TOGETHER AND THE ACTORS WERE GREAT
Great action pack movie by Clint Eastwood.Well written story and as well produce.The acting was very good by all the players.
a great dvd .everything was first rate very smooth
This is a very good DVD.  Clink Eastwood is his usual self and that is always a very ood job.
LOVE Tupac so this was a must for my collection. Its a classic John Singleton film. Highly recommend this movie.
This is a very good movie. Its a old one but good one. I will recommend it anybody its excellent.
This movie is awesome and should be seen by all people who feel like giving up on love.  No matter what is will change your idea....
Tupac and Janet Now that's movie can not get enough of this got it on VHS only, now DVD hey Blu ray is next ... LOL
A thoroughly wonderful movie that had me laughing in no time. Melanie Griffith is outstanding in this zany story. Highly recommend
Despite the subject matter (race killing, decaptation, wife abuse).Its a funny movie, Melanie Griffith is great in her part.
This film is about civil rights. Ads don't do it justice. Very good film!  I enjoyed it years ago and am glad to have foundit nonlinear.
I love this movie. I fell in love with it the first time i seen it. It's not only a good movie but it's about freedom in 2 different kinds of way.
I love it for a modern day sword fighting movie it is entertaining and a must have.
One of Antonio Bandaras's best role.You really can't see any one else in this role he redefined the role to fit him.
Great movie. My husband had his doubts when he saw the movie cover, but we both really enjoyed the great acting and action scenes.
Diego del la Vaga is Zorro, a man took Diegos daughter and killed his wife. The man raised Ellea as his own. Great movie.
a great film set in early california days. it has great acting, a great story, and some fine action. i recommend this to everyone.
I have a sister who is into action and romance.  This made a great gift for her.  She loved it.
I love this movie. It has action,romance,drama and the heroe presence and for me this makes for a good movie
It was a good movie, with plenty of action, romance and comedy! Of course, Catherine Zeta-Jones was beautiful and curvy!
I love this movie. What a superb job they did on this film. Antonio and Catherine was great. The chesmtry they they had together was electrifying.
Great movie. I think I will order the 2nd Zorro movie even though it is not rated as high as the first. I enjoy the fact that it is multilingual.
This film was a pleasure to watch with our kids.  They were as entertained by it as we were so many years earlier.
The old version with Tyron Power is a classic, I like Anthony Hopkins in all his movies he was very good in this movie.
old school but well done.
I love this movie-I got it with "THE LEGEND OF ZORRO" follow up movie to "THE MASK OF ZORRO" GOOD -GOOD
The blue -ray version is sharp and spectacular. Arrived early and in great shape. A new Zorro is born. Great action.
Been enjoying this movie since it came out! Action, murder, revenge, abduction, love, and taking down corruption- doesn't get better than that!
both zorros lived their dreams. i liked all the swashbuckling sword fighting action. catherine zeta-jones was incredible as elena! zorros rock!
I loved the movie and I love the actors.  It was the second part and it was just as good as the first one.
This movie is fantastic. I love the dynamics between the characters, the embedded humor, and the stellar story. Oh, and the music is incredibly fun!
Wonderful, magnificent , superior , glamour abounds , great music, I loved every minute of it h m Dodd
I love this tape and am soooo glad i bought it!!!  Gives me a glimpse into many musicals I've never seen and may never get to see.
I didn't even know I could find this movie on the net at such a good price and in such great condition and quality
If you're a guy you'll love it!  Lots of violence!If you're a chick you'll hate it!
Glenn Close & Judy Davis both were superior in this movie.  I especially liked the ending where they kiss - very touching & beautiful!
LOVE THE STORY LINE.  BABY GODZILA STEALS THE SHOW.  REALLY ENJOYED SEEING RODAN AGAIN AND GODZILLA WAS IN TOP FORM.
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. I like the classic monsters with combination of Mechagodzilla.I like the feel of the picture.
Don't believe people who say this is the best, you'll only end up disappointed.  But it's still a great movie!
This movie was excellent because it is a commentary on artificial mechanized creatures in their relation to nature and humanity in general.
Better than the first Godzilla vs. Mechagodzilla.My son really like Rodan and Fire Rodan.
It's Kaiju Eiga - guys in rubber monster suits! How could it not be great! Super fun all the way!
This movie was a great addition to my collection of which made my day, the movie itself was both questionable and strange but entertaining.
If you like Godzilla you'll like this. Throw in Rodan to fight Mechagodzilla and you have a nice fight on your menu.
SUPERBLY ACTED BY ALL CAST,  BEAUTIFULY WRITTEN.MAGNIFICENT MUSIC !!!I RECOMMEND IT TO ALL  MUSIC LOVERS OF ALL AGES!!!!
This is the quintessential Beethoven movie of our time. A story of a musical genius. Get it and enjoy the story and the music.
This is a wonderful movie, at least as good as Amadaes.  Even someone who was not familiar with Von B will enjoy the story.
Excellent film - glorious music - well acted.  I recommend it to anyone and everyone.  Can be seen again and again.
Extraordinary music, good acting and attractive visuals. Takes you into the troubled personal life of many great composers. Highly recommended.
I love this movie. Gary Oldman shines as Ludwig Von Beethoven. This story has romance, drama, mystery, and a great score!
Insight into the life and music of a great composer.  Can't imagine being deaf and still creating such beautiful music.
this is a great turn on how Beethoven's world was from his side once he went deaf. It is also a sad what if story about love lost.
THIS WAS ONE OF THE TRULY GREAT MOVIES OF OUR TIME. IT WAS VERY WELL DIRECTED AND THE CAST WAS FANTASTIC... IN BLU RAY IT IS AMAZING
Somewhat in the vein of &#34;Amadeus,&#34; this is a wonderfully told tale, incredibly filmed, with beautiful music.  What's not to like?
I'd love to see this wonderful comedy again, but I threw away my VHS player years ago. How can a five star movie not be on DVD?
Bronson was the Clint Eastwood of street fighters-Doesn't talk,just gets it done, in style!  Goes to work,,wins,and  moves ondown the tracks.
If you like action movies with good old fasioned streetfighting this is your movie. Movie arrived in just over a week, in great condition.
A very well done underated fairly accurate period piece.This movie gives gives the viewer a gilimpse of life during the depression.
Great cast, good story, what more do you want from a movie. Good action, some damn good fights. Enjoy it
One of Charles Bronsons' best films ever! If you're a Bronson fan, you must add this one to your collection!
I've been wanting this movie for a long time, Pure and simple &#34;Charles Bronson&#34;Get it before it's too late, you won't regret it.
The actors give top notch performances in a well choreographed fight movie that satisfies on all levels other than a follow up was never made!
Seriously, who hasn't seen this movie. Buy it now and stop reading this. Stop that right now! There'll be none of that while I'm here.
This is as good as it gets.  If you are a Python fan, watch out, you may wind up wetting the couch.
I remember watching this movie at the drive inn. It's a good Monty Python movie. It's British humor at it's best.
True comedy at its best. Good pacing, excellent acting. Classic lines. This is real comedy! Not like the carp that passes for humor in movies today.
Hilariously funny and unpredictable!  You have to see it!
If you haven't watched this movie, you've been living under a rock for most of your life. British comedy at it's best. Family favorite.
it makes me wonder what these guys took to create this and I say hail to the knights who say kneeh and not forgot the rabbit
Who doesn't love Monty Python's Holy Grail?  It's a classic.  I don't normally buy movies, but this one I had to have.
An awesomefilm with so many great line and great scenes.  The bridge scene is by far the best.
Like all the other Pythons, this one is very funny and enjoyable. Always a good laugh when watching it. Enjoy
Great and classic comedy film. A must see for any who love comedy. One of the best of all time.
had scene it years ago, still just as funny and stupid, still laughed at bunches of stuff, still good dry british humor
I'm really not into the Monty Python scene but I really have come to be a big fan of The Holy Grail movie.  It's hilarious.
This DVD is great worth the money it is. Bring out your dead. Bring out your dead.
This movie is either love or hate.  Good thing I love it.  The dry sense of humor and slapstick comedy right up my alley
Monty Python and the Holy Grail is probably scene for scene, the funnest movie I have ever seen!
Love Monty Python, love amazon.com - good deal on a classic comedy!
British humor at its best or worse depending on your likes and dislikes of British humor if it can be called humor
I've not seen this in awhile, but it is pure Monty Python if you don't know English(Brit) rumor, this is 101 to PHD
has to be they're best film EVER  laughs galore  great one liners (I use on occaision) excelent price for a true classic
This movie has a lot of dry humor. Very low budget props but full of ridiculous antics that will keep you laughing.
The is a very funny video seen the live play and had to get the movie it's funny get it
It's the brilliance of Monty Python and it's hilarious.What more can I say?
On Blu-ray? their best movie-for less than a trip to McDonalds? Come on. Buy it already. You can't lose. You can sell it to anyone for this price.
Even the credits are funny. You can't go wrong.
One of my all time favorite movies and it was great in blu ray format. A must have for any fan.
Purchased this for my son for Christmas - now we have a new Python fan in our midst. Excellent film - wonderful to find it on DVD!
Great movie. Monty Pythos's best, I think. I love British humor. The best part is the French guy telling them off.
What is your name?What is your quest?What is the capitol of Constantinople?This film is so much fun.
This is such a classic I can't even tell you anything I dislike about it. Monty Python makes everything better.
great for your 2 year old lego world is great for dexterity and all unisex yes maybe this that more
I think this is one of the funniest movies of all time. I got it at a good price and in a timely fashion
What a hilarious movie!  A great addition to your dvd collection!
A classic movie that you can watch over and over again. Although the movie is old, the jokes and the humour are still fresh and clever. A must
I'm glad they cut the scene in which the lady of anthrax hopes they don't cut the scene.  Much improved.
It's hard to find a comedy troupe that was as classically funny as Monty Python.  The Holy Grail was the team at their finest.  Pure hilarity.
Got to introduce it to my wife for the first time.. Always been a classic she said she loved everything but the ending.. I enjoy it all..
You need to be convinced? If you're here, you have some modicum of interest. Buy this now. Or be poked with the Soft Cushions.
I have purchased this movie in multiple formats and now I have added it to my DVD collection.  This is a timeless classic.
What can I say about this movie other than it is the best of British comedy and everyone should see it!!!! I mean everyone!!! You will love it!!!
Great video. As are all the Monty Python videos, Have enjoyed these guys humor since they first hit air ways many years ago.
Many lessons in this film; Compassion, strength, Love, trust and faith. I was extremely touched from watching this film...a must see.
I am glad to finally have my Zorro movies! I have been a fan since I was little, and glad to finally watch it whenever.
Very entertaining movie with a great performance. It has very colorful scenes and Catherine Zeta Jones looks beautiful in her dance dress.
One of my favorite movies of all time.  It was funny and memorable and just a great movie over all.
Who you gonna call?  The Keymaster and the Gatekeeper!  And you gotta love Gozer the Gozarian... A classic of '80's cinema!
Great story and fun each time I watch it.  It sure also speaks the basic truth of politics through the ages.
This is when Akroyd and Murray were in their heyday. This is such a great movie. A must have for any SNL SCTV fan~~
It's ghostbusters.. in HD.. Do I need to say more? Great movie that now looks great on my hd tv.
This is a fun movie for all ages. I love this movie, and it has an awesome cast. So happy to own this!!!
If you like the Ghostbusters movies then you'll want this for you and the entire family that enjoys a comedy.
I'm actually surprised how well this movie stands up to time, some of the special effects in this movie look better than some of the CG they use now.
This movie is pretty good!I really liked it a lot. Rated PG for language and scary ghost violence.
Good quality movie, fun for all, perfect night in to catch up on all oldie.One to recommend to friends
Arrived in perfect condition.  Wonderful film to finaly view in blu ray quality.  I will definitely be back for more.
Ghostbuster is a fun movie, but the 4K didn't look any better than a regular blu ray. A regular DVD would be fine.
Ghostbusters is a great movie plus Bill Murray is great in this movie. You have a all star cast. all good actors.
A movie that can be watched again and again, and it never stops being funny. Great cast and a great job with its production of.
This warm and funny comedy that pulls together comedic acting with dramatic tension and the supernatural. All around best film of my childhood years!
Grew up watching Ghostbusters, loved it then, love it now.  One of those movies that I can watch again and again.
Not since the Blue Brothers has one viewer had so much fun watching a film. It was almost like watch a live action cartoon.
Great entertainment, really worth the cash !!A good enough andidote to &quot;Stephen King movies&quot; ???
That hasn't been said already? Like having a copy of Dark Side of the Moon in your record collection, this is a must have!
Funny, funny movie. Good cast....About what you would expect as to ghosts and goblins. Funny eradication of them. Good movie to watch.
This is still a very funny and original movie.  You can watch it over and over and still laugh.  This is a classic.
The dvd is fine, the film is a favorite, but i hoped the dvd would include the music video... Pity.
I enjoy all Godzilla moviesThis one was even better because it was two movies in one I watch them both
This is a good DVD.I just love how it has two movies on it!You should buy it!
this is a good movie godzilla vs mothra 2 battle for earth and godzilla vs king ghidorah and godzilla always wins great dvd to watch i recommend it
He has watched this movie but never all the way through.Now he really enjoyed it and it is one of his favorites.
Love this movie, the premise, the movie stars, the acting, and what a beautiful home where filming took place.  Highly recommend.
This is a classic. Well acted, well scripted, and the lessons learned in this movie should be paid attention to.
I really love this movie, it makes me laugh and cry.  The DVD was recently purchased to replace the VHS copy I had...
What a great example of the "best" of performances by actors........what a wonderful addition to a movie collection, including the "golden oldies"...
I really enjoyed seeing this movie again.  This was a back in the day movie.  A throwback.  I grew up in this time era.
I consider this one the best movies ever made. Spencer Tracey and Katheran Hepburn, were amazing together as always. A
You would think all of these questions would be answered and we could smile and say how quaint. But the stings new every time I watch this picture.
Love this movie.  I remember I saw this movie when I was a teenager and remembered how nice everyone was in those days.
This was an interesting movie given both the time period and subject matter. We really enjoyed the movie and would recommend it.
The story line is well done and Sydney is a joy...Kate and Spencer are always the best.Great reflection on that time in history.
This is a very good story of facing up to and overcoming racial prejudice. Spencer Tracy's last performance is magnificent.
A wonderful story about love---that knows no bounds--color blind! It dealt with bias quickly and with wit. A wonderful cast!
This movie is a top-notch comedy/drama.  It is one of my favorite love stories!  The acting in it is flawless!
Great Xmas gift for parents. They really enjoy the old movies that they grew up with and it was on sale!
Great story line and script. Classic movie, actors, etc.  I was surprised at how sharp and clear the movie was!
This was an exceptional movie. I watch it many times, when ever I need a lift.
One our favorite movies of all time Tracy and Hepburn in one of their last  pictures together.  A modern classic.
This movie has DEFINATELY become a cult classic...  When a white daughterbrings home a black man, sparks start to fly....
Sidney Potier was some actor back in the day. This is a really great movie. All of the acting is superb!
This movie is a class act.  Great plot and good cast. Sidney Poitier in his heyday. Fun and poinient topic of a couple in love in changing times.
I've always loved this movie.  Great cast and acting.  The extras included with this one are very interesting, also.  Highly recommend.
My kids absolutely LOVE the Snowman.  Great animation with relaxing music.  Kinda like Celtic Women put to a nice holiday cartoon.  Great!
this is a must see movie even if its 2011 its still good to watch now this is a great movie lots of screaming and action.
Blu-Ray is brand new.  Plays great.  Movie was shipped from back east and it took awhile to get here.  Still, I will buy from this seller again.
Great slasher movie. Almost as good as the first but still a bit farfetched. Loved it. My kids seemed to enjoy it too.
This movie rocked. I watch it all of the time and it's not boring. The haters think this movie is stupid, well it's not. IT ROCKS BIG TIME
Good movie!  She doesn't needed to work at home."ALONE"  Too lonely
I liked the film very much as I am one who adores Sandra Bullock in all her movies, I nearly have them all especially her act in The Proposal.
I loved this movie so much I downloaded it off Limewire and emailed it to twenty-thousand of my best friends!
I like Sandra Bullock and this was a really good movie and current in spite of it's age.  Plus I like a happy ending.
Great movie, suspensful and riveting.  Like Sandra Bullock in just about anything and she was very good in this one.
one of my favorite movies,sandra's best on my list,would like to see more of her in movies like this never get tired of watching it
Besides being a pretty great tech movie, it's also a great picture of how far we have gone with tech since this movie was made.
This could actually happen to someone, which makes it scary.  It's a good story, lots of mystery and excitement, good characters.
i injoyed the movie very munch it show how in reel life that identy thef could happen to any one.Sandra bulic did a great job of acting.
I love this movie, It just goes to show with technology what you can do! what if you weren't you anymore.
love this movie had to added to my files the price was great and it arrive right on time great deal
This is one of the funniest movies I've ever seen!  Gene Wilder and Richard Pryor are great together!
gene and richard this is so funny,it could only happen to them,to guys try to make a living are mistaken for bank robbers...and the hits keep coming
After all these we still love you Conrad Birdie. I love this film. What a cast and an endeariung film that I can look back on and relive my youth.
Highess thank's. It is like new. What can I say more. Manny thank's and looking forware to calling you again . ART
Have always loved this movie.  Kind of follows the path that Elvis had coming into his own.  Great stars and music.
Anne Margaret's greatest moments, in my opinion. the &#34;pinning&#34; song near the beginning is pure entertainment. hips don't lie in this one.
Love this movie, show cases Ann Margaret in the first stage of her fabulous career.  upbeat and fun summer movie
This is one great fun musical. Up Beat all the way and I agree that Paul Lynde was a stand out in this funny musical.
What can I say?  I like this movie.  Always have.  My wife hates it.  Nice take on the Elvis myth.  And what is the matter with kids today?
One of the great musicals that I enjoyed when I was growing up.  Can see it over and over again.  Great songs and Dick Van Dyke is great!
wonderful music and dancing. a true funny time...and singing and dancing make this film most enjoyable to bring smiles and fn to ones life!!
Ann Margaret, so beautiful and sexy....what else can anyone say?  This movie created a crush I had for this star for many years...and I was only 8!
Went to the show when I was a kid and loves it, great to watch it since so many years !! Great acting and comedy!! Good times...wow!
A great musical with a story to tell. Liked seeing all the actors and the many things that they did in the movie.
The quality is just fine, the movie is as I remember it from 1967 when I first viewed it. Thanks A.J. Caiati
Strong cast- good script, the ending will surprise you.  A movie to add to you classic western collection. Buy it.
I loved the acting of the old stars.  Better character presentation.  How real people handled certain problems.  To bad they are gone.
I think this movie was one of the best western's made for the time period. Lot's of action and the best actors in it.
This is one of those movies that you can watch over and over and over you never get tired of it. All great actors that do a very good job
This is a great movie.  Our little one likes to watch it a lot.  Arrived just as seller said it would.  Thanks
This is really a great action movie and has great actors in it came in really quickly and in good shape
This is one of my favorite movies of all time. I love Jason. He is a very taliented actor. Louis Gossett is also very special.
I watched this movie on tv the first time. I wanted to watch it on DVD and its so much better than on tv.
GREAT FOR MY COLLECTION I LOVE IT...100%
I may not completely understand it, but I know great art when I experience it.P.S. The special features are an enlightened treat onto itself.
I thoroughly enjoyed this film. A wonderful philosophical journey through a life filled with discovery.
i saw this movie along time ago and i decided to buy it. love the character and cast. love the story and love the ending
THE ACTION FOR THIS MOVIE IS SLOW PACED BUT GOOD THE STORY THAT WAS WRITTEN FOR THIS MOVIES WAS WELL THOUGHT ABOUT
This movie is as good as the novel by Stephen King. Some things were changed, but I still love this film. The effects and actng were great.
This movie is just awsome.  I loved it as a kid and still do.  I f you like horror movies and classic cars, this ones for you!
I have always loved this movie because of the effect for the time involved doing just shoot a plymouth fury which he was the main attraction...
Even if you seen it before, see it again.Lot of great actors & unforgettable scenesthat deliver excitement at every turn & motor roar.
It's a very good movie I wish they would have wrote a sequel to it , it's not too late for one.
we really liked christine, it is an unusual movie. you would never expect what happens. really exciting. different than anything we have ever seen.
What can you say about scary movies.. an adaptation from Stephen King's Christine horror novel.This one is great .. Great Movie..!
As a fan of horror/suspense flicks, Christine fits right in with my collection!  Enjoy watching this movie atleast once a week.
Great movie. Evil car turns malcontent youth into an evil boy. Good friend and girl friend try to save him.
I recieved the DVD Christine and viewed it immedaitely.  It was good condition and recieved in timely manner.  Enjoyed it very much.
My purchase came quickly and I was very happy with the product! It was brand new and in great shape....all for a great price and great service!
i liked it , i liked it this movie is that good, i can watch it over and over all the time
I've had this movie on VHS tape for years so I decided to get it on DVD. I enjoy watching it every year or so.. it's that good.
Don't cross this Fury, or it'll be the last thing you do. Good story (of course, it's King), and riveting drama.
The first, and I hope not the last, Monty Python movies. I recieved it fast and in great shape.
Though I like some new stuff but all it was, was just the same joke they repeated from their show but I still like it!
Britisher comic film, Monty Python's And Now For Something Completely Different really funny movie, well done Monty Python's team :)
The Monty Python Crew Rides again, and the fans love it, and the critics don't know what to make of it ..... and that's the way it is meant to be.
For any Monty Python fan this DVD is a must.  I bought it as a gift and the recipient loves it.
This is a great movie and though you would think it is a comedy (it is VERY darkly funny) it is all drama.
Hard to believe that intelligent people could be so self serving to the detriment of their own children.  Makes one think about today's rulers.
So glad I know have a DVD of this classic movie.  I only had a tape of it before.  I can watch it over and over.
I remember seeing this movie as a teenager.  I loved it then, and loved it now. This is a movie definitely worth watching.
This film has it all... murder, madness, and Rasputin!  A lush, extravagant production of an era gone by.  A great film.
I like historical movies because they are very informative. The acting was very godos and you learn a lot of the Russian Revolution
This movie is one of the best I've ever seen! Sensuous and erotic at the same time, without being cheesy like today's  movies. It's a must-buy!
It is in great shape. I will enjoy it for manny years.Looking to seeing other item you have for sale. ART F.
Brought back many pleasant memories to my wife and I from our high school days.  This has always been a favorite movie of ours.
This film really took me back to the 50's... the picnic scenes were wonderful!  Great acting from the biggest stars of the day.  A must-see classic.
It was an xmas gift for my mom and one of her favorite movies. Although I think she watches it when its on tv more than on dvd.
Sally &#34;You like me!&#34; Fields and James Garner are perfect sparring partners...fun movie.
Have been looking for this  awhile. Was in practically brand new condition. Turned out to be a great mothers day gift
I have always loved this movie. Sally Field and James Garner make a great team. The movie holds your interest.
This is one of my favorite movies.  Gave a copy to my Mom as well.  She likes it too.  Fun to watch
This is another of my favorite movies that I must have for my library to pull out and watch when I want a really sweet, funny story.
Sally Field & James Garner were perfect for these parts.  I love a good romance story & this one hit the spot!This DVD is suited for all audiences.
MY WIFE ENJOYS THEASE FIMS AND WATCHES IT FAITHFULLY.SO I WENT OUT OF MY WAY AND SURPRISED HER ON HER BIRTHDAY.
This is such a great movie. You will laugh so hard. This was one of my mom's favorites when I was growing up, now it is one of mine.
Another great feel good movie. These actors are amoung the best there is and the movie is up there with them. A great one to watch.
Very heart warming, have watched it many times over the years and I always go back to watch it again.
Great movie and great company to buy it from. My mom loves this movie and I am planning on giving it to her for xmas
It started out interesting and kept building on that.  Sally brings something to the screen that the more sex pot, dreamy stars will never find.
James Garner and Sally Field made a classic with this one. What a great romance! This is highly recommended for a quiet night in!
Although this is  a DVD that has been around, I loved watching it again.  Great acting, cute story! Highly recommended and a wonderful price!
I love James Garner and anything he is in. Sally Field is very good in this as well. New beginnings and new friends - great movie.
another great movie. watch it over and over again. great story line. I am sure others love it also. fun to watch.
One of my favorite James Garner movies.  Sally field is cute as can be in her role as a single mom.  Good family fun.  Good chick flick.
great oldie but goodies. Sally Field was always one of my favorites. She and James Garner are a good match.
If you haven't seen this, please consider getting it.  It is a clean movie, with great stars and lots of humor.
I think this must be a real work of art by a very talented writer who knows how the real world works and is.
I remember when it was released. How could a black and white get a award, Just watch the movie and you will see why!!!!
first seen it around high school age(back when) now its on dvd. I play it when im down then it makes me happy:)
I have always loved the music from this, but had never seen the film.  Sublime!  Happy, happy :) Highly recommend.
Just goes to show you that when something is done well, it will pass the test of time.  Did they ever try to do a remake?
Loved it when I first saw it in the 70&#34;s and it's still great, now my grand kids are able to enjoy it.
WHILE Godspell is dated and shows NY prior to 9/11 still has great music and a timeless message for everyone.
Loved seeing this again!  Treat Williams was great, and I had forgotten that Victor Garber played Jesus.  Did he really sing his own part?
I especially love musicals. This one is the best of all the Grease movies. I would highly recommend it to other musical lovers.
I also purchased this for my husnand for christmas, it arrived when promised and in excellant condition
This product was shipped quickly. No damage and was well packed. This movie is one of my all time favorites and I love having it on DVD.
I love this movie and had had trouble finding it in the stores.  I was pleased to find it here.
This is a good movie with great music - mostly from the Book of Mark in the Bible.  Not as good as the play, but oh well!
We have the VHS version but wanted to upgrade to DVD.  It was a good price and the message is still very valid.  We like the new purchase.
I chose this rate because is a wonderfull edition of this wonderfull movie , and have portuguese subtitles. Recomend this product
One of the best films ever made. DeNiro has never shined this much before. M.S.'s finest film.This DVD is a must with great extras for all the fans.
There's no question in my mind that the most significant influence in the direction is Roman Polanski.
This freakin movie is one of the best movies out there period! I can't get enough of this kick ass movie! Everybody should go out and buy it!
This one of the best movies I have ever saw, of course I am a big Robert Deniro fan. I would highly recommend this movie to anyone!!!
this is one of the best films of all time.great cast, great directing, the story is very real like,and its very chilling
This is one of my favorite De Niro films. Very good acting on his part and very classic movie with twist.
Great movie with excelent material.The quality and sound of this release is awesome. This item must be in your collection.
Excellent, Excellent, Excellent.  Great movie, even better DVD. Great features.  The best documentry I have ever seen.
Among the top 20 greatest infact. and a heck of a really good dvd!..
A "must have" classic! Keeps you watching on the edge of your chair and wanting for more. I highly recommend.
this is a great movie one that is similar is &#34;Falling Down&#34;. I wont be selling it, classic De Niro
Brand new DVD, good price and arrived fast.  This is a classic movie that should be in every movie buffs collection.
was fun to see the man get his hand blown clean off, not a movie for young children but for us adults its a very fun timeless classic
another great movie by martin scorsese. another great role for robert deniro. and this is one of my favorite movies ever made.
This is a great movie.Awesome DVD.If you have not seen this movie, you should buy this DVD version.I highly recommend it.
ONE OF THE BEST COMEDY FILMSI RECOMEND THAT FILM TO EVERYBODYIT IS A MASTERPIECEIT IS A MASTERPIECE
Amazing child acting, beautiful actors, a must-see Soviet drama. Waiting for the DVD price to come down.
About a Russia woman, her son and a con man pretending to be a Russian soldier. I really liked this movie, very believable.
this is great movie with an outstanding cast that can really make you think about what you do in your life.
great movie for its time.love the concept.interesting spin on death and what could happen.im happy with the purchase.
Very Cool. Why hasn't anyone tried this? Who says you can't undo past mistakes. Very thought provoking. Rate this 2 bags of popcorn!
A big big fan of Keifer Sutherland love the movie thanks amazon have a nice day :) will watch it over and over again
This is a movie that is really entertaining and enjoyable. The casting is good and the plot is interesting. It will certainly move you.
One of my favorite scary movie. And it is really scary.I am a fan of good horror movies and this is top drawer, in my opinion.
... This movie came out, great movie then and great movie now,  love getting some of the recent classics on blu ray
This is one of my favorite movies. it is suspenseful and has a good meaning at the end .I love Julia Roberts in this movie.
I have always loved this movie. The cast and the story are both great. I have this in regular format but wanted the Blu-ray version also.
This is a good movie to watch now and then. Just as good as I recalled when I saw it 20 years ago, well worth the money spent.
Just as good as I remembered. The cast is amazing, and the storyline interesting and intriguing...really enjoyed this awesome movie!
This movie is so great and the two main characters are wonderful...  it is funny and sad and it makes you think about your values...
What a TERRIFIC MOVIE WITH ROBERT DE NIRO AND Robin Williams.. Such an Eye opener with medicines! Very glad I own it
Well produced. Wonderful true story. Made to be watched again and again. For ALL AGES. Family movie. See it. Feel the love
I love to watch movies with Robert DeNiro playing in them.  I think he is an excellent actor in any movie he plays in.
A great, cheap deal for a great film. Well worth the money and wait. I recommend this film to every one.
Wonderful Movie! Funny Sad and True. This Movie Broke My Heart. Didn't Get the Credit it Deserved. It Was a Heart Breaker!
A fav of ours.  Both Robin and Bob did a great job on this movie.  Good storyline and even better acting.
A great movie to watch over and over again, it will make you laugh, make you cry, and make you happy all at the same time
Wonderful, wonderful, wonderful.  I watch this again and again and it warms my heart.  Robert De Niro and Robin Williams are so great in their roles.
love the main actresses and especially Marilyn manson, even tho he has a very small part in it. thanks for a great film at a great price!
I remember watching this movie when it first came out. And with Rose McGowan being my favorite actress, this movie was a must have!
Fun movie. Makes you think twice about eating or sucking on a jawbreaker. Love the cast in the movie and the transformation to blu ray looks great
Watch this constantly.  If you like She's All That, Heathers, or Cruel Intentions you'll love this.  Another great teen high school movie.
This will be come a classic movie of the start of high school &#34;mean girls&#34; who will learn that bullying never pays.
I like weird and twisted movies and this one fits that to a tee. I love this movie and it was shipped very quickly. Very satisfied.
A bittersweet love story that I just added to my ROMANTIC COLLECTION. I also love the war-torn Europe era in movies.
Harvey Keitel is so loveable in this movie.there are parts that will make you laugh and parts that make you cry. great cast
Harvey Keitel does such a great acting job you will swear he is Elvis.  I love this movie don't miss it
As always these movies are just awesome always will like these. got a lot of action adventure and zombies in it.
Love this series of movies I think the plot in each one is fabulous and MIla does a great job.
To get the movies in steelbook is definitely worth doing, especially if you are a fan of steelbook case collecting!
Great movie, looks great in our blu-ray player with our 37" lcd tv. couldn't be happier with the great price for this movie!
I need to get this on blue ray, because this is still the best in this movie series!!! This one is as close as it will get to the games!!!
I would have to say this is the best resident evil movies plenty of action and milla is at the top of her game beautiful as always
We love these movies. I know its 2013 and we are just watching all the Resident Evil movies..lolIts a time of Zombies!
Each Resident Evil Movie get better each time. I love this movie. I would recommend to anyone who is fan of Resident Evil
I like it a little bit more than the original. Awesome supense. Milla Jovovich, Sienna Guillory, and Sandrine Holt are hot.
This film has hot chicks, and it has zombies. That's really all you need in order to make a good movie. Buy this.
NOW THAT'S A REAL RESIDENT EVIL MOVIE AND THIS TIME IT'S JUST LIKE THE GAME EVEN BETTER
Mila can be both victim as well as oppressor. Her skills seem to be ever evolving and the story line is well conceived.
rOCK'N GOOD TIME.jUST PLAIN KICKS !i LOVED EVERY MINUTE OF IT.mILA ROCKS IN THIS ROLE!I must say it was a great time!
This was so very good I watched it twice.  Dudley Moore narrates it and he is fabulous! I highly recommend it.
It's such a cute story of a friendship between a dog and cat. Must watch for children who love animals.
Great filming. Can't imagine the amount of time it took to create this video.  Children will love it. Definately for animal lovers.
A classic in our home. Two generations of fans the originals and now our Grandchildren. This movie is timeless a true classic of entertainment.
One of the finest movies I have ever seen! It must have beenso hard to make! Dudley Moore MAKES it!!
This is a wonderful movie and my four year old loves it.  It's engaging for adults, too. A very sweet, tender movie for all ages!
This is fun family entertainment.  It has great photography, nice voice over,  and a good story.  I wish there were more movies like this.
I loved how the cat and dog were together and helped each other throughout the whole movie.  An excellent children's movie.
Bought foir my daughter who is 30 years old and she still enjoys this movie. I would recommend as a family movie
Love this DVD. Great for any animal lover.Children will love it as well as adults.
I loved this movie when I was little and still love it to this day! It is a very cute movie with a good plot and good characters.
My grandson (3 3/4old) watched this together and we both thoroughly enjoyed it.  Just a lovely movie with a dog and cat friendship and exploration.
This is a good movie. I use to watch it when I was little and now my children love to watch it.
Very great for children and adults.  Anytime I feel down I put Otis and Milo. Just to make me smile and laugh.
This film is a long-standing family favorite in my household, and I think it will be yours, as well; just give a peek and see for yourself!
A fantastic movie for children and the whole family.  Excellent shots of other animals also. A great family picture to watch.
Never gets old watching this movie with the grandkids!  The animal adventures are very fun to watch and even dramatic at times.
My granddaughter watches this movie all the time. Cute story for kids..Funny to watch. Wonder how they got the animals to do all that stuff.
a great nature movie and it shows how life would be if you were a cat or a dog. It is amazing  how they got these animals to do what they did.
Barbara and Nick did a great job on this! The story told what can happen when secrets are kept. Great
I love this movie and if you are a Barbra Streisand fan it is worth buying...It is a movie I enjoy watching over and over again.
The item arrived very quickly. I got it for my grandmother- it is one of her favorite movies. The disk played without skipping.
This is quite the love story.  Filled with hope and tradgedy.  Simply stunning in its entirety.  My favorite movie to date.
I bought this movie for my mom because she loves this movie and also loves the book.  She has really enjoyed watching it over and over again.
GREAT MOVIE! GREAT TAKE ON THE BOOK! BUY IT! YOU WON'T BE DISAPPOINTED!!! YOU WISH IT WOULD'NT END THATS HOW GREAT A MOVIE IT IS!!!
Item arrived before expected delivery date and in condition promised.  Would definitely recommend this seller!
This is great.;  I enjoyed watching it recently and its great to have a nice DVD of this wonderful movie.
Great movie that will have you in tears.  You'll be glad you watched it, I was.  Nick Nolte and Barbara Streisand at their best.
I purchased this movie to replace my VHS version! One of my all time favorite movies! Really enjoyed this purchase!
My second fave movie (Dazed &amp; Confused is first) stays funny (darkly) and the pace is usually fast.
It 's amazing package color. It's a great movie with a lot of special features, the sound e imagem was amazing too.
gift for my son and he was happy to receive it.  nice to be able to purchase it here with you
Doug Liman is the man just GO and buy this movie watch it and enjoy the ride.. Great music and all 3 stories are  great
I always Cry when Heroine Bob dies! I love this movie! Has a great and attractive cast! I wish they would make A second movie
this is such a great movie!  entert aining, fun, funny, and just simply a classic.  you wont be let down!
Very cool, unique movie. Matthew Lillard does a great job portraying the life of a dirty punk with the mind of a philosopher.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE. ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES. IT MAKES ME LAUGH SO MUCH. WATCH IT ALL THE TIME.
this is a movie you never see coming. It is awesome and everyone should watch it!
Timeless! A great movie for anyone 13 and older. The plot is timeless, and the acting is superb. Watch it!
I don't buy any movie unless it was worth it and great flick and a good price and it works well all in all great buy
This is a movie filled with great performances and lots of actions and suspense.  The plot is a good one...actors all deliver their lines like pros.
the product was nicely packed -- thanks, and it came on time... what else can I say? good job, keep up the good work.
Great movie with a great plot. I saw it as a teenager, but I enjoy it more right now. The music is amazing!
One of the the 1st adult cartoons I watch as kid on Mtv.  Love the music on this soundtrack & the actors that provide the voices.
A action packed Adult Cartoon. Packed with Great Music and Action. If you were a midnight movie goer this is one of the best.
This is one outstanding movie that contains and is just filled with futureistic violence, drugs, sex and rock and roll.
i loved this movie. everyone will like this movie. it's awesome.
Owned it on VHS years ago but it's even better on Blu-Ray, I recommend it the sound and picture are 100% better.
Heard about this movie for years before I got to see it, still love it today, it's a guy thing.
I ordered this for my grandson and he loves it.  Easy to understand and navigate through the levels.  Completely satisfied.
I have seen this movie so many times that has become another of my favorite movies and I have also seen the sequel which I thought was great also.
Loved this since it first came out. One of the best Adult cartoons and Sound Tracks you can get your hands on!
This was actually a gift for my father. He absolutely LOVED this as a Christmas present! It was something he grew up on.
My copy was the old VHS tape and it had seen better days, so glad to get this in DVD format. good shipping.
i totally enjoy the old shows.  ordered and received this item in excellant time.  completely pleased with the purchasing process...
Hook is a more modern classic. We love this movie! Robin Williams is brilliant as Peter Pan, this is a fun movie all in the family will enjoy.
The is my love this love a lot. If u have never seen this movie u need to buy it or rent it. It will bring the kid out of u.
Awesome family movie, that we watch time and time again. Robin Williams never fails to entertain us all.
My best friend love love this movies and she told me to buy it because I would like it and she was right I loved it
Hands down the best version of Peter Pan - Pan The Man. ever done. Robin Williams is at his best here. Great for all ages!!
Hook DVD is great, we love Robin Williams, Dustin Hoffman & movies in general. This is a must see movie.
The grandson loved this version. Its amazing how grups change from when we were kids. Find your child again and humble yourselves
I have really enjoyed the movie and I am glad to own such a great work in my collection. Get it.
This is perfect exactly what I needed and I would recommend this product to all.  It came faster than expected and perfect condition. A MUST BUY!!
This was good for the group we all enjoyed the evening thank u for sending the movie so fast u guys are working it
its a cute movie my granddaughters love it thank you
Kids movie with adult overtones, enjoyable to sit and watch a couple of times.  Dustin Hoffman plays a good part as the evil Capt'n Hook.
Crystal clear, great sound for the price.I like this movie and no missing parts. A must for your collection.
Such an imaginative continuation to the Peter Pan stories!  I have always loved this movie, and you will too!  Glad i finally purchased!
loved watching the movie. Great for the whole family!! when in doubt rent this movie you wont be sorry that you did.
The movie showed up in perfect condition and was truly a wonderful addition to our movie collection!! So happy to have ordered it!!
Another Christmas gift for my oldest son who requested this movie on Blu-ray for his collection...he loves it very much!!!!
Robin Williams, fantasy, comedy, Captain Hook and sword fights. What else do you need? Great flick for the family or just the big kid in you.
Hook was so much funny! my favorite part was when hook said he was going to kill him self and pore smeath had to stop him!
WOW, Dustin Hoffman, Robin Williams,  peter grows old and returns to fight again,  loved it when it came ou,t still love it,  ever better on superbit
Love this movie. Dustan Hoffman does a brilliant job in the title role. It's a classic story done very well.
Robin WIlliams is wonderful as Pan, and the references to the original Peter Pan often are subtle but, oh, so clever.
My grandson couldn't take his eyes off the screen.  This was the second time I'd seen the movie and I still enjoy it.
A++++++  I am happy to do business with them again.  This is a great movie fun to see.  CoolNice
A favorite of the family for many years.  Robin Williams and Peter Pan, what could be better?
Thought I had this in my collection.  My grandson is in love with this movie and had to have it.  Great quality.
A classic movie that I watched when I was a kid so I figured my son would like it...think we watched it 15 times the first week!
I love all of the different Peter Pan stories but this is a favorite with the family! Robin Williams is great!
Good for entire family.  The actors and actresses do a marvelouse job with their parts. Well worth the money spent!
It was the first time we watch an Amazon film online, it was great, the kids and me enjoyed it.The stream was fast, the picture is net.
This is a fun movie for all ages. I purchased this movie and consider it a must own. Dustin Hoffman is perfect in the roll of Captain Hook.
The Blu-ray is stunning.  Very clear picture and looks great.  The movie is great as well.  I always liked it.
I watched this movie as a child and I brought it for my 9 year old daughter, she loves it just as I suspected.
I watched this a lot when I was a kid, I just watched it with my kids and they loved it, thanks for having it available to stream.
This has become an all time favorite movie of mine! My kids are grown but I'll still watch it by myself! Not just a kid movie but for adults too!
The quality of the blu ray is very good.The picture is sharp and the sound is clear.Worth the money.
Great movie!One of Brad Pitt's many, many great movies!A great story with great characters!If by some chance, you haven't seen it, watch it!!
This movie is visually and inspirationally worth anyone's time.  I had been looking to replace my vhs copy and glad I found this deal.
This movie is a classic or should be . If you like fishing it's great .Brad Pitt at one of his best preformances .
Loved this movie very good and inspirational would highly recommend it loved it well worth the purchased be your own judge and give it a shot
One of the most beautiful films I've seen in my life. The natural scenery of Montana is sublime!
This Movie Is In Some Parts A Heart Breaker, Won't Give Away The Plot ButBrad Pitt Play An Excellent Part As Do The others.
A vivid story that captures you from beginning to end of the life of two young boys living in Montana.
Movie showed up in Great condition!! Disc plays perfectly and the movie is one of my favorites!! A Wonderful Classic!
Very good movie.  Of course anything directed by Clint Eastwood is good but I rate this one as excellent.  Sure you will enjoy it too.
Who doesn't love Brad Pitt? Another wonderful family movie. I highly reccomend this movie. Beautiful scenery and you can learn about fly fishing.
A very touching tale of two brothers in a time long past. One of Brad Pitt's best roles set in a much simplier time.
This is one of the best movies about growing up in a challenging natural world.
It has all the softness of a warm Spring rain and the sadness of the death of youth.  One of my all time favs.
Have loved this movie for years so decided to get it in Blu-ray.  Has so much more depth.  Very good story.
This movie is a great story of growing up in the early 20th century west. Good character development throughout the film.
Love this movie & Brad Pitt as well.  I've seen this film about a half dozen times and it never gets old.
Marvelous, just marvelous. Worth every penny of it. I am buying all of the old Robert Redford films. I am enjoying them all.
a River Runs through it.  tells the tale of love between brothers. and takes us through the triumps and downfalls of a slice out of time.
If you like any movies about this era in time with an great outdoors back drop, then chances are you will like this movie. It's a great story.
One of my favorite movies of all time. Great acting, and directing. Could sit and watch this movie all afternoon.
this movie makes me laugh lots of very funny comedians are in it including the guy who voices sponge bob but this not a kids movie
this movie is sweet so i had to have it and was shocked amazon had it
Adding to what others have already said would be superfluous.  Get it and laugh your azz off!!!
Wonderful show! Great price! My kids watched this episode when they were young and potty training, it was one of our favorite episodes :)
This is educational and fun. Now i don't have to wipe down the floor after evey time nature calls. Period.PS: The whiney mouse is a riot.
I see a lot of negative reviews due to inaccuracy. Sometimes that's not that important. We watch movies for entertainment.
I loved this movie. The actress did a fantastic job depicting Joan of Arc.I will definitely see it again and again.
I finally got this movie on DVD after many years of neglecting to buy i9t on DVD. This movie is awesome. Great acting with some humor.
This movie has a lot of great characters.  Mark seems to be a very driven guy and he deserves success.  I wish everyone in this move the best.
i love this doc. happy to have it in my collection now. after watching this i may have to stop drinking and doing drugs. maybe...
I thought this was a "mock"umentary; couldn't believe it was real!! Funniest movie I have seen in a LONG time.
man,,,, this movie is 2 funny
Stranger than fiction,these guys are inspiringand downright funny.
A great dramedy, not as dark as other works of his.It is even better if you've watched &#34;All About Eve&#34; recently.
My daughter loves Elmo and absolutely loves this movie. We have most definitely gotten our moneys worth out of this dvd.
my 3 year old watches this over and over. this is one of her favorite movies and has a good plot. she is learning and having fun at the same time.
What child wouldn't like Sesame Street characters?  Eight month old loves watching it.  It has lots of bright colors.  She loves it.
I purchased this for my three year old niece. It's one of her favorite shows. The song with Vanessa Williams rocks.
It's a Kid's movie and my son like it. It made my son stop a monkey role and stay to watch.
This movie was a good movie for youngsters as our grandson loved every minute of it. He's only 18 months old. I think the bright colors attract kids.
IT'S A NICE FAMILY MOVIE. TIME FOR A NEW ELMO MOVIE. A MUST SEE. IS ELMO UP FOR ANOTHER CUDDLY BUDDY MOVIE?
Great DVD. Takes us back to the live performance. Good photography, sound & color good. Get to relive the show
This movie have to be seen for the final fight between Jackie Chan and Brad Allan! WoW!!! What a Great fight!!!!! See it!
Best Jackie Chan film ever and by far my favorate, great for a romantic comedy and worth watching every second.
I had been wanting this movie for so long. When I saw it at a great price, I couldn't pass it up!
A great movie about China, but more so about unconditional love.  If you want a good movie with great visuals, try this one!
The end of this sweet movie will make you cry like a biaatch. Get your tissues.
Again, one my favorite Sinbad movies.  I love all the &#34;special effects&#34;  Fun to watch and good quality in the DVD
Love seeing it once a year.  Beautiful color, great costumes, great sets, great cast and one of Ray Harryhousen best!
My Wife ordered these and liked them very much. I never got into them but she liked them so I watched a bit too.
Watched this as a teenager still love it. introduced it to my grandkids and they loved it. I love the classics.
My son has loved this movie ever since he was 5 years old. He enjoys the story line and the stop-action animation, particularly the dancing statue.
This is a classic. Great and entertaining film to watch. The quality is very good. It is definitely worth getting.
I took my two kids years ago to see this movie and I still like it!  The animation is quite good for this movie.
Loved this movie and Tom Baker being in it, made it a REAL BIG PLUS!!!! This movie is for anyone who is in to mystical and magical images!
You think 7th Voyage of Sin Bad was great, this movie shows a lot of special effects as well and that it is with action packed
It has great sound nice viewing for all ages nice animation juust which I had more to watch loved this move
Too many shows accurately make the claim &#34;Very Funny&#34;. The Larry Sanders Show Season 1, unlike the others, is very, very funny!
This is a highly recommended set.  Larry Sanders Show was brilliant in every way.
This quite simple is one of the best shows ever on TV.  Shandling may be crazy, but he sure knows how to be funny.
fAR BETTER THAN 90% OF COMEDY SHOWS OF TODAY!  REALLY FUNNY, ADULT, ACCURATE AND FAR MORE INTELLIGENT THAN TODAY'S SHOWS.
BA bay  BE be  BI BICKY BY  BO bo  Bicky By Bo  BU boo  Bicky By Bo Boo!FANTASTIC PIECE OF WORK!
If you have a DVD player and are a stooges fan, you must buy this.  It has 7 classic episodes and all are in great quality.
What a great movie. As funny is it is, it's actually very smart and heartfelt... Jay and silent bob are apostles and alanis morset is god. 5 stars!
Kevin Smith is an intelligent man and this is probably one of the best View Askewniverse movies. Really thought-provoking and funny at the same time
Funny movie! Classic and Must own. Thses are the main things you should know about this flick! Buy a copy! You WILL be glad you did!
If you're a Catholic with a sense of humor, you'll enjoy watching (not for kids). One of my favorite movies!
Christmas gift for our son who had this one his wish list.  He was happy to add this to his collection.
A must watch movie.  I'd love to be in a Kevin Smith movie (one of my  dreams)
This movie is an absolute classic due to the cast, actors like Chris Rock and George Carlin and the deep and straight up debates about religion.
If you like Kevin Smith, or even if you don't, YOU HAVE TO WATCH THIS.  I love Kevin Smith and I love this kind of humor.  Must see for anyone!
This movie has a quirky storyline and a bunch of fine actors to make it believable and enjoyable. Really a fun couple of hours.
here's another Kevin Smith movie that everyone has to see. it is so funny and so true. get this one right now!
this is my absolute favorite movie, you have to see it.
I bought this for my sister Hannah because she really likes this movie.  Well received.
i've been searching for this movie a long time. i was very happy when i received it .thanks it was great
Dogma was really entertaining. It's completly smart and down right funny. Kevin Smith is the master of all comedies!
Best movie ever! I wasnt sure about it but I really enjoyed this movie shipping was REALLY fast And Dogma was just a blast to watch thank you!
I would argue this to be Kevin Smith's best flick. Absolutely hilarious, while also being very thought provoking and intuitive.
Is hilarious! You won't stop laughing!An incredibly imaginitive take on religion...'Buddy Christ' *lol*You won't be sorry you rented this!
Kevin Smith is a better director than most. A fresh take on the Bible and the cast is classic View Askew.
Thank youI just got home from work and was hoping it was here and it is!can't wait to watch again,It's been years!Glad to find it on BluRay!
We love watching this funny movie. We had it on VHS. Thanks now I have it on DVD. IT was packaged and played great.
Lots of side plots to keep you entertained. The picture quality was just OK. I expect a DVD to produce a better picture.
My husband loves this movie, can watch it over and over again, now he has it in his collection! Oldie bu Goodie!
Classic Movie.  Good comedy, reasonable story, but overall good film.  This movie launched a bunch of actors into the stratosphere.
This is a really good movie about life in the 60's, fast cars, crazy young lovers, and fun to watch. I highly recommend it.
Yep truly one of the best car/coming of age movies..
This movie was always one of my` favorites . It takes me back to my` teen-age days . It is also gut-bustin` funny !
WATCHED IT AT A FRIENDS HOUSE AND REMEMBERED HOW MUCH I ENJOYED THIS MOVIE. THE SONGS BOUGHT BACK SO MANY MEMORIES AS DID THE MOVIE.
Great movie with hot rods! Funny jokes! And big stars before they became famous! Buy it and you will not regret it!
My husband loves this movie! He wanted it in blu-ray. Great movie! A blast from the past!!! A real Classic!
Love this show. Especially the cars. Very funny. Big time actors/actress in this one. Tony Danza is pretty good in this one.
This is the best hot rod movie ever made  It has Project X 57 Chevy and 67 427 Cobra and the Rail Job
the hollywood knights is a very funny movie it has an all star cast befor they were big stars you will enjoy this movie very much.
I only wish all sellers were as speedy and honest as this one is.  I would not hesitate to buy from this seller again.
All Time the funniest and best movie with great stars and great fun. A grat watch for all families who want a great comedy.
my husband loves this movie ... he used to have it on vhs ... but it has disappeared ... so glad i could find it in dvd ~!!!thank you !!!
I love this movie. Subtitles are not my favorite but there are some parts where they speak English. Funny and exciting.
I love all the actresses portrayals of the characters and feel they really brought them to life. Casting was dead on and made it even more enjoyable.
Winona Ryder made the best &#34;Jo&#34; of any of the past Little Women movies.Watching this movie made me want to read the book again.
Another of my favorite movies and just had to add this one to my collection! I know that you will love it, too!
I watched previous versions of this movie when I was a kid, it is truly my favorite version, I can't even remember how many times I have watched it.
Very well done.  Jo has much more depth than the silly older version with Katherine Hepburn. Enjoyed it.
I absolutely loved this movie. It was very sad but very heart warming. Great family movie and I highly recommend it to others.
I enjoyed this show. The version is great. The actors and actress we great. I am so happy it ended the way it did, Will watch gain.
Greak remake of a clasic film. My sister loved it 60 years ago. Still good. Am passing it on to the young girls I know.
This movie captivates from start to end.  I find it flawless, extremely well-acted.  I will continue to watch it from time to time.
This is how movies should be done. Talented cast, and a well written script. It has heart and soul, it warms your heart.
have loved this story for so long and love this particular version the most be ready to laugh and cry with this one
The ensemble cast in this movie is especially brilliant.  It's a classic movie with a wonderful story suitable for young children and teens.
This was a gift and as far as I know she loves it. Great for those who enjoy classic movies.
I love this version of Little Women. It is family friendly--no language or junk--a gem that our whole family could watch!
A timeless classic.  I have several versions.  This version being equal to the classics and my daughter's favorite version.
I like to watch this whenever in a sentimental mood...plus the acting is superb. Don't miss it.
Was great I loved it on a great story and a lot of hard I would definitely recommend this movie to anyone who loves the classic!
Modern version of Little Women. Susan Serandon is always enjoyable on the screen. Wynona Ryder was enjoyable as Jo. All the actresses were likable.
A very beautiful story full of laughs, tragedy , romance and struggles and the occasional triumph over the odds in that day and age.
My granddaughter had just read the book.  She watched the movie and loved it.  Great picture for children that are past the cartoon stage.
I LOVE this version of the movie, watch it at least 3 times every Christmas....a keeper for sure.
I have loved this movie since it came out. It is now out of production so I was pleased to find any copy.
An early Dominique Swain film-one of her finest. All her acting skills are on display here and she looks great. A must view!
It was packaged really well and shipped promptly. I had it before it said that I would have it. Of course I love this movie. Oldie but goodie.
Such an excellent movie.  I am going to watch it over and over again. It's a great watch with the hubby.
Purchased for my granddaughter who saw the play.  She loves this movie!  Glad I purchased it.  I enjoyed watching it with her, she is 7 years old.
I GOT THIS AFTER SEEING IT ON TV. BUT BE SURE TO GET THIS ONE, THE REMAKE ISN'T AS GOOD.THIS IS INDEED A CLASSIC WORTH ADDING TO YOUR COLLECTION
This is another movie to be watched over and over.  It is a fun, uplifting story with a great cast.
Always a great movie. It should be on everyone's list to watch at sometime in there life. Carol Bernet's performance was outstanding.
Little Orphan Annie was my all time favorite funny strip. And now I can watch the musical anytime I want on my Kindle Fire.
Watching this on a 60&#34; Sharp LED TV the picture is better than I thought it would be.  I can see the individual strands of Annie's fuzzy hair!
Love this version of Annie! I had the soundtrack growing up and listened to it all the time! Definitely a classic!
My kids weren't thrilled at first to watch this but since then, they've asked to watch it again and again.  Classic!
Have seen the newer version as well as a play. This by far is THE best! We all loved it!
A real classic.  I was replacing my VCR tape, which I gave to my grandson.  I still like VHS better than DVD, except for it takes less space
This movie is required for anyone who likes musicals, or even doesn't dislike them.  Carol Burnett and Albert Finney were outstanding.
I really have enjoyed the movie and am glad to have obtained it for my collection. You must own it also
Bought this for my kids as once again I go to this original version being much better then the &#34;New and Improved&#34; version!
We showed this old classic to young kids and it held their attention. There is nothing offensive in the content  and many adults will like the story.
Always a treat! This ginger is a die-hard orphan with talent & the will to survive.  I loved this movie as a child & my children love it too!
Excited to watch...haven't seen this movie in years!!  Ready to show my kids the movies we watched back in the day!  LOL
I saw this as a child and loved it. Now as an adult I still feel the same way. Such a great movie I had to add it to my DVD collection.
This is such a wonderful movie. Since I never could see the musical on stage, I can see this movie anytime I want and I love it.
you have to have Annie! Fun movie and is age appropriate all across the board. must share with your kids!
I gave it to her.  She rehurses to it.  She visited us for spring break and sang the entire show.  It was fabulous!
A movie you can watch with your family no matter what age your children are. Fun and laughing is great!
this is a great movie to watch and have fun with the actors and watch when ever you want to watch
I love this musical!  So happy to have it on DVD!  Rich in color and clarity.
My girls loved the story and never trier of watching it. they were 4 & 5 when I purchased it. Now they are 6 & 7 and still love it.
I bought this three years ago and we've watched it a dozen times since.  The grandkids love the music and we watch it often.
great for kids my opinion, carol burnett in it and many others, great for teaching kids, has games on it, a must have a huge 10 thanks
I LOVE THIS MOVIE!!! IT HAS AN AMAZING CAST. THE SONGS WILL PLAY IN YOUR HEAD ALL DAY. YOU MUST SEEE THIS MOVIE
Great &#34;Feel Good&#34; video. It came very quickly. Thanks you for your service. Good to watch with your whole family.
I always loved the film Annie.And I am so happy to have it on Blu-Ray.A real joy to watch.
Adorable movie!  It is much much shorter than the original Annie version with Carol Burnett, but it is still sweet and the acting is fantastic! :o)
This was my daughters favorite when she was a little girl. We still love to watch it to this day.  It's a movie the whole family can watch together,
The movie of course is great.  The Blu-ray is stunning.  The picture and audio are fantastic.  This is a great version.
bought this for my granddaughter after watching the high school musical.  she loved the movie played it over and over
still love this as much as I did when I was a kid.  My young daughter was not as impressed as I would hope, but maybe that will come with time!
My favorite movie of all times!!! Love the Blu-ray format. The extras are cool, the colors amazing and so worth the money!
I've always loved this movie and not realizing I didn't have it on dvd, prompted me to finally buy it.
My daughter wanted this classic for Christmas and we watch it over and over and the story never gets old.
I wasn't sure if it would be well adapted to film but it was. This is a timeless musical for everyone.
Annie is a classic. A great family movie. I loved sharing this movie with my family and friends. Oldie but a goodie
my friend saw this movie when he was around 5 years old I am so glad its now available dvd
I've actually never seen this one, but my fiancee really enjoys it.  The cover looks pretty great though, and who doesn't love red-headed moppets?
I was very happy with the product and the transaction, would do business again!Thank you
Digital beautiful copy of a great broadway musical. Heartwarming story. The extra material by the star, now grown up, shows how it affected her life.
i love this very much and i will share this with everbody i know it was funny to me and great.
I really enjoy this movie. Finally got it on bluray and it's still great. Make sure you get Bad Boys 2 also!
I love this movie.  It is funny and action-packed.  I just wish two could have copied the same formula.  It had too much action.  It made me dizzy.
There quite a few funny scenes and dialogues. It contains non-stop actions. Will Smith's and Martin Lawrence's acting are engating. I own it.
I loved this movie, but I got a little teary eyed when they wrecked the cobra, what a shame.  This is a great movie
i loved this movie. it's wills best movie. you should watch it if you havent.
Bad Boys is a great movie and i got it early and was very happy this MandR Media Is a great place and they rock thanks all
This movie was excellent and I would recommend it for adults who like drama mixed with comedy. It will be one of my favorites.
This is the BEST one of the two Bad Boys movies.The Blu Ray picture quality and sound is AMAZING! Get this movie you will not regret it!
it was like brand new wen i got it plays good and cheaper then the stores and hastings and got it withen the few days
This I got for my son. He is trying to change all his dvds into blu-rays. He loves Martins movies and wants to get more for his collection.
Martin Lawrence and Will Smith are great together they are one of the best teams in movies I think. Action and comedy all in one. Its a good movie.
These two main actors make a great team. Good action-packed movie that keep your interest through the whole thing. #2 is even better.
what A pair, if you want to watch A movie that's funny, watch this one, on my thumb scale, this makes A two thumbs up rating
I still like the movie because of John Travolta, he is great in this movie!
I bought it because kids love all 3 of these movies & they watch it most of the 3. It took a little longer to get here, though.
I love this movie, great for any new time parents, movie captures everything a new parent is going through with their kids.
when i looked at the first i had to get the others that go along with it. funny show. great service and fast shipping.
It arrives fast for a great price, I love this movie it's funny and definitely on a boring day it entertain you.
This is a film I have sought for a long time. My husband and I saw it late one night on cable and loved it.
This is an incredible movie with Jackie Chan. It showcases more of his acting abilities, but still delivers some amazing fights and choreography.
Excellent DVD very interesting the way this DVD was made. The DVD was great picture and great quality sound!  It was very well done!
This is a sad but good movie remembering the sinking of the Titanic.  I like the interviews with survivors and makers of thismove.
The movie had very nice quality in sound and vision. I enjoyed this movie a lot.Thank you very much.Christopher
This film is certainly the most authentic version of the &#34;Titanic&#34; disaster.  It's a must see for those interested in this subject.
The very best movie ever made about the Titanic with the wonderful Kenneth More at his very best. A movie to be watched over and over ...
This is the best version of the story about the Titanic. If you haven't seen it you should another must see!
I was curious and wanted to see this classic to see how it compares to the Movie we are all familiar.I am glad to report that I was not disappointed.
This is an easy one. Get this movie. I've seen it about ten times and I'll watch it many more. It's just very well done. Trust me. Would I lie ?
The best Titanic movie I've seen and I've seen many. This one stays true to what I've read about the Titanic. Doesn't waste time on a love story.
A family member ordered this for her library & I understand that she really likes it. She was excited to finally get a copy.  slk 6-5-2013
So realistic. This film is a must see for everyone. It is amazing to see what it must have been like for all those people.
excellent movie five star at the most the movie is great in blueray the picture is bright an clear a wonder movie for the whole family to watch .
I gave this film to a Shakespeare loving friend as a birthday gift.  She loved it.
Best video yet on the life of the world's greatest male dancer.  A must for ballet devotees!
Put the DVD in your medicine cabinet and watch it when you are not feeling well.  It is guaranteed to lift your spirits.
I have loved this miniseries since it was first aired.The DVD transfer is pretty good, and looks much better than my video casette copy.
A friend recommended this video and I am glad she did.  It was really good.  I'm just glad I didn't live at that time.
Really good.  Everyone makes their roles very believable.  The stories are good.}The production is quite good too. I do recommend it.
All I can say is if you like Up Stairs Down Stairs, Downton Abbey you are in for a nice weekend. I am watching this one again as soon as I post.
Great buy!!! Enjoyable series.  My spouse was a nanny and she really likes the story lines which are timeless.  BBC at its best.
One of the most entertaining films I have ever seen....I am hooked on English Movies.....and this one will be watched many times over.
Berkely Square is another film I've watched more then once. I love all the costumes and scenery plus the acting was great.
I love all BBC tv show, soaps, movies and anything else they make. It was a good show, they should have made another series.
I waited awhile before purchasing but I am glad I finally did,this was one really one well made series,you'd enjoy it also
GOT HOOKED ON INSP. MORSE WHEN THEY WERE ON OUT LOCAL PBS. HAVE ENJOYED ALL OF THEM. THIS ONE IS A GOOD MYSTERY.
Very highly recommended.  Sean Bean is a great sexy actor and his character in this series is what most men at least secretly aspire to be!
Plays good and is as expected. I have the entire series and watch them on a frequent basis.  It would help if they were numbered.
I bought this set of movie for my dad, e's a huge fan of these movies. I got it for his birthday. I wish you could have seen his eyes light up.
A great story of a time when life was hard and wars were bloody. The story grabs you and you must finish the collection to the last movie.
Fascinating episode.  I think if you like Inspector Morse at all, you will like this one.
I was really excited to see this available and surprised a friend with a copy as well so we could 'watch it together' and giggle.
I use to watch this every year with the Kids.  Enjoyed this movie, Loved Diana Riggs and Tim Curry, Charlotte Rae and Fairuza Balk.
I have always been a big fan of Tim Curry. If you like him too, you will enjoy this movie.
I love this movie. It was my favorite movie when I was growing up and it is still my favorite Halloween movie. I watch it every year.
loved this movie as a kid and still do as an adult! they just don't make 'em like this anymore...
didn't realize he had this when I purchased it but it is quite worn and will hold as a replacement for him.  it is one of his favorites.
I watched this movie as a little girl. I had to add this dvd to my collection for my kids. I loved Tim Curry in this film as well.
I wonder why Criterion skimped on their usual great extras for this release, but the print quality is remarkable and so is the movie.
Terrific film.  Lorre at his best.  Very moody and atmospheric.  Extras were quite interesting.  Worth the time and price.--DJS
Old but very clever movie.A young Peter Lorre was masterful as the child killer.They should re-make this movie.I truly enjoyed this movie.
For those of you who think M looks good on the latest DVD release, you should see it in Blu Ray.  It looks wonderful.  No more needs to be said.
What can I say, they don't make movies like this anymore! Suspense without CGI. Peter Lorre is incredible in the courtroom scene.
All the reviews I've read here are so good that all I can add is the image of the balloon floating in the air.
One of the classics of Japanese cinema.  Well acted, good production, and a plot that is both rewarding and entertaining
Awesome movie!!! If you like Japanese cinema then this is a must have in your collection! Very creepy film and beautifully done.
I read about this in some essays by Eli Wiesel. He said it was very well done and he was right.  It is stark and clear in it's message
Very bold and insightful look into the horrors that occurred during WWII. Disturbing but I feel required perspective of truth
a very good movie.  it reminded me so much of my extended family and their way of life back in the 30's and 40's.
honestly,you really do wonder how people survived in those days, A truely remarkable story of love and determination. Eye opening
"Dark Journey" is an exciting spy story, full of humor. The pace is swift. There is a moving romance and the actors are superb.
Don't need to say much if you know this movie.  It is what it is, has it all, great story, great characters, great messages.
This movie is outstanding in all its glory. This is a classic that I remember from the tv samurai saturdays. im enjoying it all over agin . thanks.
i don't have much to say about it except that it was masterfully created and filmed by Kurosawa.
I have seen this movie about three times. If you want a good look at Feudal Japan and what it was like to live then this is a great movie.
This film is a work of genius and the condition of the dvd was without blemish.  I commend you.
No one can dispute the greatness of this film.  Of course Toshiro Mifune headlines here but to the man - all seven of them - the samurai are perfect.
This release is great, but Criterion just announced a 3 disc version of this with a BETTER video transfer!
An old favorite movie put on one disk, and made better quality. Love the format and think I'll be getting more Kurosawa films...
I bought this DVD for my husband. He put it on his Christmas list one year. We've seen a number of Mr. Kurasawa's work. We do recommend this DVD.
Title says it all.  I haven't watched the extras yet.  This is a nice package and a great transfer of the film to DVD.
Some say Citizen Kane is the most important movie ever made, but Seven Samurai has had more influence on cinema than any other movie.
What can I say that has not already been said?  The Criterion version has a great commentary, so check it out.
Ever wonder where the idea for THE MAGNIFICENT SEVEN came from?  Me either, but this is it.  =)
Its absolutely true, this is the best Samurai movie ever! Its a true classic!  A perfect and necessary addition to anyone's Kurosawa collection.
A cinematic giant, now on DVD.Probably the best movie to ever come from the east, and the basis for some of the great American westerns.
All fans of the film should see it once. A classic. If you are ever to see it, DO watch the full, three-hour version.
Having studied Japanese history I enjoy martial arts films.  This is a well crafted and detailed account of Japanese life.
Great movie, great acting, great direction.  Finally got to see the complete movie, not cut down version shown in theaters and on TV.
Amazing Blu Ray quality for a movie that is about 70 years old. The transfer is only a minor part of this amazing movie.
No Italian film collection is complete without this one.  The quality is great, subtitles easy to read.  A good watch
It's a sincere documentary of the era it depicts. Excellent in every respect thanks also to Criterion treatment.
Wonderful movie, amazing print quality, and one of the best commentary tracks (Peter Cowie) that I have heard.
Sterling DVD release of a movie that only a heart of stone would dislike; certainly a must-have for Cocteau admirers.
THIS WAS THE FIRST FRENCH FILM OF COCTEAU I EVER SAW. THE PHOTOGRAPY IS SUBPURB, AND THE ACTING ALSO.  THIS IS A CLASSIC.
I bought this as a gift for my Sister in Law, she loves it! Once again Criterion hits the mark with its quality product enhancement.
Thank you for your helping hands!Everything went perfectly well.
This is the earliest Hitch movie I have seen and , as usual, it was great. Really enjoyed it. Wish he was still alive and making more movies.
This should definitely be in one's Hitch collection. The picture looks good and the audio commentary is well worth the price.
Sooooo much in this film.  No wonder people loved Hitchcock.  this movie ROCKS!  Too Much Fun.
It's great to finally enjoy a beautifully restored edition of one of Hitchcock's early masterpieces.  Highly recommended!
It's Kurosawa. What else can we say? It's Criterion - guaranteed quality. Good deal, good film, good company. Buy it.
CRITERION have announced a fresh new restored 16x9 remaster of this for May 18, 2010 on DVD;  confirmed
another great movie on African spirituality from Australia.  great great great I would recommend for all. white persons will not like it.
I got this for my mother who saw it a long time ago & wanted to see it again, & the whole family thought it was quite good.
A great production. Nice to see old Japan and the customs of respect and loyalty.  It was exciting all the way through.
This is a really dark movie to watch, it holds your interest from start to finish.  James Best stole the show, he was scary good.
The little girl is a treat to watch and I liked the song she plays on her audio device. Most enjoyable movie
Bought this because it was the Academy Award winning film for Best Picture of 1948!
I love Sir Laurence Olivier.  The greatest actor of all time.  Felix Aylmer and Robert Helpmann opening the film are just as good.
The very best as past of the series of Shakespeare plays by the best Shakespearian act y for in the past year.
I will reserve my review for the current Blu-ray edition. Otherwise, Criterion Collection pulls-out all the stops.A truly great film.
I love the costumes and scenery taken fron the Tres Riches Heures. This is a beautiful classic. None of the dirt and muck of Branagh's version.
This was almost too easy! Product exactly as advertised and delivered on time without a hitch. Would buy again.
&#128513; Gripping fear never felt so good. The Criterion Collection is a sure-fire way of building a black and white library.
A masterpiece of suspense filled with unforgettable characters. These character actors were real - seldom the case these days.Typical French ending!
The Blu-ray is INCREDIBLE!  This is one of the best suspense films ever made.
Simone Signoret was one hell of an actress. This film is one of her best and it's scary too. You'll be surprised so don't tell anyone!
Love Robert Donat. Love the suspense. This is good Hitchcock before he felt the need to be so gruesome and gory.
Clever and funny spy thriller. Robert Donat was one of my favorite actors. While he is gone to use in life, he lives on The Silver Screen.
I will never tier of this movie classic. Alfred never disappoints!! If you are one who likes the twists and turns of his movies you must start here.
This has been one of my favorite films since childhood and after viewing it again recently, I think it always will be.
An excellent example of Alfred Hitchcock's exprtise as a director. This is one of his earlier films and it is great watching.
This is a very unique off the wall sense of humor series.  But if you are in to original humor, this is for you.
I love the opening song written by John Lurie himself. Hooked me from the start. A  must see for fish lover and haters alike.
this is a unusual movie, I like it better than the remake and has a few wild events going on....
This is a great movie.  I haven't watched this DVD yet.  I wouldn't waste my time or money on the remake.
PERFECT Movie and the main character is one such that we WANT HIM TO LIVE.  And he does.  A beautiful movie.
There is little left to say about this flick that hasn't been said.  Every time I watch it, I'm amazed, outraged and completely creeped out.
If you like sci-fi, you can't do without this move - an absolute classic in every way.  As time goes on it only seems to get more and more relevant!
I saw this long ago and I am happy to get it on bluray.  If you have not seen it, I suggest you take the time to watch it.
I have probably seen this movie some forty-seven times or so. It is quite possibly the best movie I have ever seen. Don't miss it!
A Terry Gilliam masterpiece that only improves over time.  Hate work? Feel marginalized? Feel bullied by heartless bureaucracy? This film is for you.
Dune, Brazil, 2010, Bound, and Office Space.  These are five DVD's I would buy if they were in anamorphic (a.k.a. enhanced for widescreen).
...is some kind of mad genius.  On a par with Blade Runner for its' inventive visuals, Brazil is awesome.
What an interesting mood to put in front of your eyes all day. It has some kinds of colors. It is like sitting in a night club all day with De Niro.
quite the journey, a fun frolic in a future worlda great addition to your collectionbuy the book too
One of Fellini's later masterworks.I cannot speak high enough for this delicate balance of farce and heartfelt sincerity.
I LOVE ALMOST EVERYTHING AUDREY HEPBURN STARRED IN.  THIS IS NO EXCEPTION.  AND CARY GRANT AND AUDREY TOGETHER ARE GREAT.
Nothing like these older movies to entertain, as well as keep you in suspense until the end, done with flair by the wonderful artists of our past.
A GREAT MOVIE WITH AUDRY HEPBURN AND CARY GRANT AND SEVERAL SUPPORTING STARS EVERYONE WILL RECOGNIZE. A DVD ALL SHOULD HAVE IN THEIR COLLECTION
This to me is a great classic movie. And who doesn't want to see Walter Matthau as a bad guy.
Audrey Hepburn and Cary Grant are matchless in this clever story of danger, intrigue and romance.  Great story and music.
This is a very good movie. Great actors and very good ending.
This is one my all time favorites. Cary Grant and Audrey Hepburn. Great movie, up with North by Northwest. Wonderful!!!
One of the best films for both main actors. intrige, suspence, and a love story all rolled into one terrific movie!
Watch this every other year or so, great classic. Great cast of characters and switches in the plot. good movie.
This movie has you wondering what will happen next,a great plot with lots of twists and turns.June M.Canada
it is a great movie. this is an early Audrey Hepburn movie. She was good at being this role. great
This is one of my favorite movies with two of my favorite actors.  Good mystery, fun and just plain enjoyable.
One of my favorite movies with all the twists, great actors, and fun dialogue. Always been one of those movies I can watch over and over again.
well done, a must have for a classic movie buff.  You can't go wrong with Audrey Hepburn & Carry Grant in the same film!
I love the 'old time' simplicity of this film.  No frills, just a solid mystery with lots of twists and turns.  Wish there was a sequel.
Great movie to have in my collection. A great who done it.This is a must to have in your collection.
A terrific film with some outstanding actors, keeps the mystery running.  Some very sharp dialog as you would expect from this pair.
My sister was thrilled with the movie and I was thrilled with the quick service so that I could give it to her for CHRISTmas.
Of the video downloads, this one got through.  I have the film on tape but this download was a pristine copy of a great film.
Audrey Hepburn and Cary Grant make a great couple in this film.  It's adventurous romantic and wonderful to watch.  I highly recommend it.
Super movie with Cary Grant and Audrey Hepburn. It has a good supporting cast including Walter Matthau but it is typical Cary at his best.
I love old movies and Audrey Hepburn is no different. I really like watching her movies. She is a great actress
One of the best romantic mysteries and a must see for Audrey Hepburn and Cary Grant fans.
Cary and Audrey. You cannot go wrong.Very good direction. I loved it so much.You will not guess the end.
One of Cary Grant's best.  All-star cast and good plot.  Excellent video transfer on this one too.  Well worth the purchase.
If you are a fan of Audrey Hepburn and Cary Grant you will love this movie.  They do not make them like this anymore.  Great story line.
Trains, murders, lots of money no-one can seem to find- all set in Europe (mostly Paris)... This is a recipe for a great romantic thriller.
This is something good to watch if you want to better idea of moon landing sites and astronauts blabbing on.
if you are at all interested in the Moon program, you need to see this, great historical info, etc.  a must get.
One of the best films I've ever seen concerning NASA and the moon landings. The detail and never before seen images were stunning.
There is nothing I can add the wonderful comments made here, criterion have done a great job.
What a brilliant film that I came across quite by accident.  Amazing portrayals and close ups.  A very emotional viewing experience.
Great acting from these wonderful actors who showed us the sexuality, vulnerablilties of what it is like to be human.
Classic Kurosawa and inspiration for &#34;A Fistful of Dollars.  This is about as b-movie as Kurosawa gets and it's a joy!
Terrific fild - I just really like this actor and this production and this story. Great fun!!
This is one of the great mysteries of the human spirit and morality of choices with Rampling and Bogarde terrific
I saw this movie in 1968 before Jane Fonda went to Hanoi. I love all of the options that blue ray offers.
A three-some with Bridget Bardot and Jane Fonda in French. What more could a 60's guy desire?
I bought it to show my grandchildren.  It's a great film of a great opera.  It's by Ingemar Bergman, fer chrissake!  Of course it's good.
I have been teaching for over 30 years, and this is the best for the performance both in music and acting.
I read all three reviews for this movie before I bought it for my father in law who has been in love Brigitte Bardot FOREVER!!!He was happy with it.
I like to own many & famous films from the past , I think it's much better than now , noboby like: Doris Day , Lana Turner , Bette Davis & others
This was a good story line for an older black and white movie. Its nice to see romance without all the smut.
One of the best film romances I've ever seen. I cannot praise this movie enough! The music, the acting, the plotline... all brilliant.
This DVD is a joy for any fan of the movie and/or the great pianist Eileen Joyce. Margaret Blair
The  plot  has a  flaw.  I&#8217;d  better  read  the  book  to  tell  me  WHY  on EARTH  the fiance  knew  that  walk-up  address!
I don't know why people think movies are all sugar & spice because life isnt...affairs do happen..i loved it!! but this affair had a tragic ending
Emotionally powerful performances in this sensuous and erotic story of the destruction caused by unbridled passion and obsession.
DAMAGE, Perhaps the most provocative movie in my collection, a story of passion and desire, love and demise with a very tragic ending...SIX Stars!!!
Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles is an amazing movie. On blu-ray the picture quality is perfect i suggest any TMNT fans to get this blu-ray.
Old version sometimes slow for my 8 year old but other wise it was entertaining and funny to watch He liked it!
I rated the product, and I HATE BEING reminded to review AND EXPLAIN why~ I HAVE BETTER THINGS TO DO WITH MY TIME!
my son watchs this religiously. he loves this  show, love that we can get this on digital playback. would recommend to all tmnt fans
Still one my favorite movies of all time! This movie still gets roaring laughter out of me!
I cannot say that I enjoyed this movie as much as I did when I was younger but it was still a good film.
love the mix of drama and comdey. Would love to see a new version of these movies as well even though they are classics.
Good classic movie that takes me back to my childhood. I think all young kids should watch this these days :)
awesome movie so great with the special effects and stuff the turtle actually look real. unlike their third movie which wasnt done by henson
This the movie was in very good condition, both the disk and container. I really enjoyed the service. It was quick, fast, and efficient.
this was another great show and I think a lot of kids might like this movie I even like this movie
We love the Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles...Never gets tiring to watch it. I still love them at the age of 66!
Great movie. Can't go wrong with this movie. It works on so many levels and the characters come to life.
me ANd my son watch it alot and its a great price wen i got it and a fast timeon shiping
This is certainly a classic, one of the best Ninja Turtle movies I've ever seen, It's a great family comedy, I recommend :)
The classic movie.  Great characters, great costumes.  It's a classic that even my 2 year old loves.  This is a must for any TMNT fan.
Well, it was a fun movie to laugh at, I'll tell you what. Ha ha ha, those funny rubber masks.
THE MOVIE THAT MADE THE TURTLES A HIT, THIS WAS A GREAT ACTION, COMEDY MOVIE. IF YOUR COLLECTING 80'S MOVIES, THEN INCLUDE THE 3 TURTLE MOVIES.
This reminded me of my childhood.  Very funny and cool movie from a comic book.  This was a great buy.
My teenage son loved this movie, and makes references to it often (laughs to himself) and I have no idea what he is talking about.
There were a few bonus scenes in the director's cut that weren't in the theater or TV versions. Still funny as ever! Recommend.
This is a KOOL funny movie, specially in blu ray, must own it to wach it. I will be purchasing all the friday movies in blu ray
i love friday! who doesnt !? was suprised that the movie has extra scenes play which werent bad at all!
Awesome movie! One of the best low budget films eve for a comedy!! You never get tired of watching this one! Sit back and enjoy the laughter!
BUY THIS MOVIE NOW YOU'LL BE LAUGHING YOUR AZZ OFF.CHRIS TUCKER IS THE FUNNIEST PERSON I KNOW.
This is my second most favorite movie behind Coming to America. Enough said.
Looking forward to watching this movie.Rated R for pervasive strong language and drug use,and for a brutal fight.
I've loved this movie since it first came out! Great story & perfect humor, but the acting makes it believable.
This is a funny movie. Smokey owes  BIG WARM money. So him and his friend Craig are trying to get some money. Because their life is on the line.
The whole cast is hilarious. I can watch this over and over. It's the kind of film I grew up watching with my brother and sisters. We all love it..
Still funny after all these years. I still know people who quote this movie. I would watch again!! Especially if you have nothing to do on a Friday!
I don't care how many sequals he comes out for this series the first will always be the best!!!!!!Chris Tucker was mad funny in this film!!!
Buy it, watch it, love it and watch it again and again. This movie is always good for a few laughs.
A great classic!
THIS IS MY GREAT MACK YOU KNOW THAT I AM CRAZY ABOUT IT
EXCELLENT MOVIE THAT I HAD ON VHS. SINCE VHS IS NO LONGER THEN I HAD LOST A GOOD MOVIE UNTIL I LOCATED IT ON AMAZON.
I am extremely pleased with my purchase. It arrived in a timely fashion and there were no problems playing my DVD.
The acting was bad, the lighting was bad, but I love this movie!  Willie Hutch did an outstanding job on the soundtrack too!
really good movie and classic. came to me on time. everything came as indicated no scratches or prints on them.
LOVE THE CLASSICS OF THE 70'S. NOW IF I CAN JUST GET PEOPLE TO STOP BORROWING, AND PURCHASE THEIR OWN ....
The Mack Movie is very good movie take back how Thing was back in the days of Pimping  about Gold'e the Man.
i recieved The Mack Monday. Great Movie I must say. The Packaging Was Good and delivry was prompt. Five Stars. Thank you!
If you are a fan of the 70(s) Blackexploitation Movies, you will love this one. It paved the way for Dreamgirls and Tyler Perry.
I bought this for someone, and he was very pleased with the movie. He was extremely happy about the movie.
Yes, another film from the 70s series that has great theme for its time. Great for the avid collector of this genre.
I received this DVD before the date it was supposed to arrive and it is in fine shape.  I look forward to doing business again.
It's nice just to watch and enjoy a movie like this one.  The action is great , dialogue cool, Claudia's butt outstanding!
yeah, .... no special effects, ...but, ... a well-written sci-fi flick, ...do yourself a favor, ... buy this one for a lazy afternoon, ..
Non stop action. A thrill of a movie.  Well thought out plot.  Recommended for any law enforcement and Blue Line enthusiast.
I Love Martin Lawrence and this MOVIE!! Really GOOOOOOOOD!=) I Would Really Be Excited If They Made A Part Two=)
I received the DVD in great condition and quickly.  I was very satisfied with the service.
I've liked this movie since the day it was release. I finally purchased it. I have no compaints. Martin is funny yet loveable.
This has and will always be one of my favorite movies... Shows how women act crazy for a man. You get what  you put out...... Must see
This is a good movie. Hope all players will watch this movie and learn that there are girls out there who wont let you mess with them.... LOL
only legends live on and these ladies pulled this one off, that it will never die till the end. bloody classic
I can watch this movie over and over!  The acting was great, the plot was great and the women were awesome!
VERY RAW FILM THAT I LOVE BECAUSE OF QUEEN LATIFAH WHO MAKES YOU FEEL FOR HER CHARACTER AND WHERE SHE'S COMING FROM.
well i think the movie was well done they picked the perfect people to play the right parts i can watch that movie over and over again.
I love this movie a lot of action and suspense till the very end  Jada Smith is a great actress and how they stick together no matter what
this is one of my  all time fave films.fantastic storyline,fantastic actors,Queen Latifa is 'da bomb' !!!
I love this movie and the actresses, Vivian, Jada, Queen & Kimberly did a great job. I always cry at the end!
All of these women in this move was great and the story line very powerful to me. A keeper for the collection of my African American films.
This was one of the best movies for all women in this movie love them all exspecially Queen Latifah and Jada
I LOVE SET IT OFF!!! this movie is in my opinion a CLASSIC. The Blu Ray is excellent!!! this is a must have movie.
This is one of my favorite movies. I was so happy when it arrived not to mention it was of great price.
good movie i enjoyed watching it. The story is kinda sad in the end but cool at the same time.
great movie.  great acting especially by queen latifah.  good story, plot, and camera action.  great movie all-around.  you should buy it.
How can you go wrong with Cary Grant. I love everything he has done. This is a classic and worth watching many times over.
Works as described in the product description. Nothing much to add except I am a film noir fan/fanatic personally! Great buy!
Can't get enough of Cary Grant!  This movie is a classic!  Cary Grant and Myrna Loy are fantastic!
Timeless story line; very amusing story about the challenges of building a house and the interpersonal action between the principal characters.
An oldie, but goodie. Superb acting and good story plot. Lots of laughs, a movie you never tire of watching over and over again.
Love this movie. Back when they New how-to make good clean movies ! One of the best actors . Cary Grant is just great !!!
A great classic to add to you collection, one you will watch repeatedly.  You'll love Cary Grant and his expressions in this role!
Great movie with Cary Grant & Mira Loy. A classic you must see especially for those of us who have built a house while being married.
This is a good comedy. It is a bit slow but if you like old fashioned movies you'll like this one.
The Money Pit of the 50's in which Cary Grant and Myrna Loy are superb! It is a classic movie for all ages, and a must see.
I have always loved this movie. You can watch it again and again. It was delivered promptly.It will always be a source of entertainment in out house.
Anyone who is preparing to build should watch this movie first! It is hilarious and absolutey shows just what most folks go through when they build.
It is a great old movie.  I always loved watching it when ever it came on the television.  Now I have it so I can watch it more often
Great show oldie but a goodie the actors are very funny and i love them.  The storyline is great enjoy it
How much fun is it to watch Myrna Loy and Cary Grant have at it?  So many quotable lines. I've seen it about a dozen times.
Wow a classic hat made in michigan born to be  classic the hat was a gift and now all the family fights to wear this michigan classic
This is a must see.  It's funny and has a great storyline.  Great for the entire family.  I highly recommend this film.It's really wonderful!
Cary Grant and Myrna Loy are truly great together. A fun film that I enjoy watching again and again!!
A favorite of mine Myrna Loy and Cary are great together . had to have this in my dvd collection. just plain fun movie
IMO it's like the old version of the Money Pit movie w Tom Hanks but I got a kick out of it was done well..
A real winner! Cary Grant lovers will adore this one. His comedic ability shines! For a rainy day of lighthearted movies, this is a must have.
One of my favorite Ginger Rogers. It is fun and charming.
this is a cute/fun movie about a women who is mistakenly thought to be the mother ofan orphan - fast pace,  good characters and great ending
Great old movie with three great stars.  Very pleased with this selection.  Very lighthearted theme with a predictable ending--my kind of movie.....
you can't get better then Ginger Rogers and David Niven has such a wonderful laugh you just giggle along.
Love ginger and this is one of her best!
I love scary movies,and it kept me on the edge of my seat.with the covers and pillow up to my eyeballs.
I purchased it for a little old 80 year old friend in a nursing home. She loved it. (:  .
Love this dvd came in good shape it was like brand new :) awesome dvd insert that was in there as w ell :)
Check out the uncut version included here instead of complaining about how it was hacked up years ago. Watch THIS version. It's bloody good!!
Great acting!  An amazing true story of overcoming mental adversity.  Uplifting and inspirational.
this is a must see for all people who love piano music-also a very good story.
One of Rush's best!!! He is an amazing actor and the story is superb and mostly uplifting though sad early on.
One of my favorite movies.  I love it because it's based on a true story.  Watching this movie prompted my to purchase the soundtrack.
Emotional story of a imperious father' devastting effect on a sensitive musical genius.
Geoffrey Rush gives the perfomance of a lifetime in this inspirational film.If this movie doesn't tug at your heart strings you are not human.
What a great film and based on a true story!  We watched it the same day it arrived. It's very heartwarming.
I'm glad to have my own cd of Michael. It's been one of my favorite movie and now I own it.
I love this movie. I seen this movie once, but with commercials loaded in the movie. So, I decided to purchase the movie to see it in full length
John Travolta's great in this movie. I like fun movies and for the most part that is what this movie is. It ends well, even if Micheal does leave.
Fun movie with cute story and great performance by top actors. Its a classic comedy that you can rewatch over and over.
Will watch over & over again - a story that doesn't get old - it's refreshing! John Travolta plays this part to perfection.
This movie starts out funny and ends on a serious note.  A different take on what an angel might be like.
Would recommend this movie if you are a John Travolta fan. It is a tear jerker and he dances in this one too.
Had this on VHS, needed to replace it so I can still enjoy it. Also want my dad to get a chance to enjoy this as well.
John Travolta was terrific in this movie.  He was funny and it had a great moral to it too.  There ARE angels among us!
Would recommend this movie for entire family. At times it makes you laugh, other times  extremely touching. Get it, you want be disappointed.
This is one of my all time favorite movies. John Travolta really nails this part. Do your self a favor and watch this movie.
I just happen to love this story.  Guess it is a fairy tale but we all need one from time to time.
John was just the right choice for this movie and every time I watch it, while I exercise, I laugh at the same scenes.
Can't stop watching this movie!  It's funny, sweet and a lift in your spirits when you are feeling down!  Worth repeating!
This movie is worth owning and watching again and again!!!! A happy ,sweet,thoughtful and thought provoking movie as well as fun!!!
Love this movie.  John Travolta makes a great Arch Angel.  Funny and light hearted.  I have re-watched this movie several times.
John never fails to deliver.  This movie was funny and entertaining.  I'm a Travolta fan and have been watching his movies for many years.
I love this movie William Hurt is one of my favorite actors. I think everyone in the movie is terrific. It is such a cute story.
John Travolta always finds a section to dance in, and in Michael he does the same. I enjoyed this movie because it was something different he did.
Travolta at his best. I think of this movie every time I smell cookies or have to choose a flavor of pie.
STARTS OUT SLOW BUT GET BETTER AS YOU GET INTO THE MOVIE. MAKES ME CRY AT THE END. LOVELY STORY.
I'm a sucker for angels and/or time travel type movies, Don't particularly like Travlota - sorry - but adored this film - and still do.
My wife loves this movie, it is the second time we have purchased it, first one was stolen. Great Christmas gift
I bought this because I love this movie and had it on vcr and wanted on dvd.  I love John Travolta, so it was a win, win for me
I have to say that even years later, this is one of my favorite movies.  I love John Travolta and this is one of his finest movies.  Heart warming.
It's been around quite awhile, but has always been one of my favorites. Some people think it's corny, but I think it's a feel good movie.
A great movie. Just as advertised. It was in great shape, no scratches, case in good shape. This is a wonderful movie for anyone's collection.
Now this is an action packed movie. It keeps you on the edge of your seat. Gena & Samuel do a fantastic job. Great ending!!
Incredibly excellent spy type film.  Intelligent, action-packed, fun, and witty.  Very well directed and actors were perfectly cast.  I loved it.
purchased for my son - he loves it!  glad to be able to build him his own collection of movies at such an afforable cost
I love this movie. It was great price. came in great package. made it here in great timing. It plays great too.
GREAT CULT CLASSIC!  I love this movie and was excited to get on DVD!  Great Movie for adults only, not good for children!
I like comedy.  I get plenty of laughs with this movies. Yes, women can be very good agents too, LOL!
I always refer to this film to be inspired to write. I just love over and over again for ever
Samuel Jackswon!  What can I say.  Always giving a great performance.  Great movie, you have to see it!
We love the, sitting on the edge of your chair, action in this film. We were scare for the young girl, but way to go mom!
A really fun movie.  Lot's of excitment.  I've watched it over and over  for years  Holds up well over time
THIS IS ONE OF THE BEST ACTION MOVIES OF ALL TIME. GINA DAVIS WAS PERFECT IN THIS ROLL. DON'T THINK ANYONE ELSE COULD HAVE PULLED IT OFF.
This movie will hold your attention.It's the best acting that Geena Davis has done.Excellent script, excellent acting.
both actors played and strong part in this movie but i must tell you the profany is in this movie; but overall i love it
Jim Carrey and Jeff Daniels are Superb together. This Film is just FUNNY all the WAy. MUST SEE
This is definitely the funniest movie I've ever seen! Every single bit of it is hilarious, and I've seen it about 30-40 times (honestly)!
I choose this rating because this item was as said and it plays very well for the price I paid for it.
c'mon its dumb & dumber....you know what your getting with this movie. It's awesome, and an all time classic comedy.
we had to add this one to the classic collection.  Can't wait to see the remake when it comes out!
The Funniest movie of all time I believe. I have seen it between 50 to 100 times what a joy of a movie.
I hope you're not using the toilet.......it doesn't work.  Comedy genius but we all love toilet jokes don't we? Best movie in decades.
this is still the funniest slapstick movie of all time. fall off the couch funny...and the hotsauce scene...hilarious! a classic
This is one of the funniest films ever made. Its so dumb, don't even try to make sense out of it, JUST LAUGH!
this movie is so freakin funny. this has to be one of the best Jim Carrey movies i recomend this movie for everyone
This is a great funny movie and I would reccomend this to all
Jim Carey at his best are you kidding me!This is an all time Classic if Comedy ,A must have in your collection!
ALL I CAN SAY IS IF U HAVENT SEEN THIS MOVIE THEN U SHOULD GO AND SEE IT US ITS MAD FUNNY.
This movie rocks my world. I want a bowlcut just like Lloyd and a dogcar pet transport thingy too. Plus I like Cheetos.
The movie's great came in just in time no scratches of any kind nothing more or less.
If you see this movie you will laugh your butt off!Rated PG-13 for off-color humor,nudity,some mild violence,and language.
These guys have amazing talent.  Not many can approach being over the top without actually careening over the other side.
The kids loved this slapstick movie. This original is far better than the prequel.  I highly recommend this to those who likes Jim Carey.
Love this movie it's so funny it's a must have came fast and like new great price well worth it love amazon
My son loved it. If you are looking for juvenile humor, this is the movie for you. I'm just scared my son will start quoting from it.
Very funny movie about two guys who have no job and set on a journey across the country to aspen colorado to deliver a suitcase full of money.
This movie is for the type of people who appreciate comedic genius & slapstick comedy. This movie is pure gold!
One of the funniest movies of  all time ,Jim Carrey at His best ,can not wait for the sequel coming out soon.
I enjoy his stuff for years. this one is a great one to get if you like his funny movies that he did.
My daughter and her friends loved this movie. As I explained to them, all boys are stupid and this is just an example (maybe a a little bit extreme?)
I OWN IT ON A  VHS. FUN TO  WATCH. FUNNY.
You would be Smart and Smarter to buy this hilarous and affordable DVD. Big gulps, huh? Alright! Well, see you later.
Very happy with the transfer on this disc, the ski hills looked like you were there
This movie is about two guys trying to make a living. Helping out someone in this movie probably isn't for your best interest. Lot's of laughs.
This is a must see for those that enjoy slap stick comedy. Jeff Daniels does a fantastic job along with Jim Carrey. The wife hated the show though.
I could watch this over and over again and still laugh at my favorite scenes. We need another Jim Carry...
Great movie!  I love the Amazon Prime Instant Videos.  I now have access to so many movies that I own on VHS tape but no VCR.
This show never gets old.  I got this for my kids and I can still enjoy the endless humor in it.  I love this movie.
Still a hilarious movie. The clothes and some of the camera work betray its time period a little but I think this is comedy gold.
This movie has thee all star cast of any movie ever produced with a great plot and story line. Would recommend for the movie enthusiast.
This movie is a very good movie.  I believe you will enjoy the mystery of it.  Check it out. I enjoyed it.
I am infatuated with the journey of Lewis & Clark.  This does not romanticize what they endured.  I love it.
Very informative and provides a good explanation of our nation's history.  A worthwhile purchase.
It is one of the &#34;best&#34; biographies I've seen!  Very well done, a wonderful piece of our great history!!A beautiful story with many heros.
This movie has lots of good actors and is great from start to finish. It's perverted, twisted, and mind blowing. One of my favorites!
THIS IS A SICK AND TWISTED MOVIE! IT IS VERY WEIRD!THE PERFORMANCES ARE GREAT! THIS IS VINTAGE MATERIAL FROM DIRECTOR DAVID CRONENBERG!!
This is a great movie to see in both versions. Although I can watch the R Rated version first, then the NC-17 version next.
Jackie is a hero of true stunts and this is his debut showcase.  Excellent stunts and Jackie is loveable as always.
Rumble in the bronx is a fun movie very enjoyable, well all of chan's movies are. this is a great movie. i recommend it for everyone
i had ordered the rumble in the bronx vhs tape for myself for christmas. i am sure thati would like it.
he like it and i didnt see it no time been bsuy so he love jackie chan he start collects
One of my favorite Jackie movies.  Definitely a keeper.I recommend it to anyone who likes Jackie Chan.Check it out.
One of the best most enjoyable jackie Chan movies made!  I loved this movie its action,stunts and fight scenes are awesome...great martial movie
very dark creepy film about a burned killer who attacks in people's dreams. you don't want to miss this, Robert England is great as freddy
This is the best horror film so buy it today!
It was just a good escape movie for me and I had never seen it before and I like watching Johnnie Depp
I bought this for my son and Husband they both like the Nightmare on Elm Street Series this is their favorite movie.
This is a very good movie.  Do to the fact that this is the first of the Nightmare movies this is considered to be one of the best in the series.
This movie out done it self! it was wonderfull..WOW Im speechless! This is a MUST SEE!
It's a Awsome Scary!! Movie.You have to get it on Blu-Ray.Better then the others. So go onAmazon.com and buy it.
scary as hell funny as hell and one hell of a movie better than the rest
I love this movie. It's so realistic and well acted. I love those 'just-can't-you-go' type of love stories. "Love Jones" is a classic.
This was a really good movie...it's different, sexy and the soundtrack is THE BOMB!!! We need more movies like this...
Loved the movie!!  Sometimes you just want to see a good love story and this was it.  Larenz Tate and Nia Long have great chemistry.
Really cute love story. Really cute couple. It was touching and just a nice love story. The main characters are really great actors.
This was a great movie. It had some "Very Good" actors & actresses that starred in it. I was very pleased. The poetry and story line was *GREAT*!!!
This is one of the sexiest black love stories ever told NIA LONG & LARENZ TATE are MAGIC ON FILM
I love this movie.From the gritty footage of Chicago (shot on actual film GASP) to the poetry and passion I can't get enough of this classic.
The movie was in great condition and the delivery time was awesome. I now own the entire set and am very grateful.
If you are fan of cult comedies, you would find this movie amusing. Movie has some good laugh in it.
any movie i can watch more than 3 times is a great movie and i have seen this around 15 times. never get tired of it.
i swear this movie was made for mike meyers. only he can do this film, austin powers is a really funny and a really good movie.
Austin Powers collection is so funny!  This is no exception!  If you love Austin Powers You should love this!  :)
This entire series is a classic.I still often quote from it ten y e ars after first watching it. A great comedy.
This is a no brainer and is an instant classic. the whole series is wonderful and frickin hilarious. Always good to watch.
had the 1st one and i wanted to have all 3 so makes me laugh so have to rate the other one as well.
This is a movie that I feel is one of Mike Myers best movies since Wayne's World, which is still one of my favorite comedies.
I absolutely honestly love This move it's hot and funny! Point, blank, and the period!!! That's all you need to know.
This movie was ordered for my son. He loves this movie and the other  Austin Powers. So this is to add to his collection of movies.
This is one of the best movies of the 90's.  Elizabeth Hurley is one of the hottest women alive!
It is a very entertaining movie for kids and adults I recommend it to everyone who loves these kinds of movies
TMNT 1 and 2 were awesome and the turtles always crack me up!  thanks! amazon for the quick delivery
Just as good as when I was a kid! It's still got it! Awesome movie for any teenage mutant ninja turtles fan!
If you liked the first movie, you'll like this one. More detail on how they became TMNT. Funny,action,all around fun to watch
I always have to order pizza to watch this. Great old movie from my childhood. Great action and a good message for the kids.
This is the excellent ninja power classic family movie, from Leonardo, Donatello, Raphael, and Michelangelo, this is an instant turtle classic!
I loved this movie so much when I was a kidd that I recomend that every kidd should own this classicit kills the first and third movie
a great movie. an awesome sequel. the fitting way to end shredder. now on to other things to fight in the next movie.
everyone loves these pizza eating ninja practicing Turtles. My son loves to laugh through this one and wants to watch it every night
ths was another action movie the kids will like I like it its funny and it has a lot of action
The grandchildren love the Turtles. Any shape, any media. Yea, or Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles. They have survived over many years. Thanks.
its a funny movie me and my soon watch it alot its a good price wen i got it and fast service
Watch this fun movie so happy 90s had the best movies, best movies, good movies. TMNT is awesome. Review is now over!
This is another great masterpiece of a movie, I love it, I can watch it over and over :) I recommend :)
I streamed this for my grandkids and it is now one of their favorite movies.  We love to stream from Amazon because it always works like a charm.
i love this movie, everyone should own it. definitely really fun and nostalgic. one of the best cartoons of my childhood.
Animals that sing and talk with a non boring story line. Love it. Very funny too. This came early so the fun began earlier then planned.
Movie came quickly and in tact through the mail.Adorable under appreciated movie with fun songs to listen to. I absolutely love it.
This was a great show, loved all the singing and dancing that went along with the movie. Defiantly a good feeling movie.
I love the movie, my grandson and I had such a good time watching it, it's clean and very entertaining, music/songs very good!
My title says it all. I have loved this movie since it came out! I was little then, but I appreciate it so much more now!
A wonderful and fun family film that is enjoyable by kids of all ages. This is a good addition to any movie collection
love this movie been long time since i owned it now i do again thank you very much blessed me MERRY CHRISTMAS
Excellent movie. Great actors,male and female. I would recommend this movie to anyone. Buy it today!Island of Doctor Moreau
I don't understand why this movie got such bad reviews when it came out.  I personally liked the movie a lot so the critics are useless as usual.
gr8 movie.  very entertaining and the directors cut....how can u lose with that? arrived in speedy fashion and was in excellent condition
I went to the movies to see Spawn back in 1997 and I loved it. This is one of my favorite movies and I would recommend this movie to anyone.
great movie!i would suggest that anyone that has not seen this, see it at least once.may not be for everyone, but i love it.
Ihave no complaints, the video, even used was great.No scratches, skips,ect, played like it was new.....
These items were bought for myself, my son the geek and my mom the best cook. We all loved them.
I have been looking for this movie for a long time.  It was super fast delivery and exactly in the condition specified.
Ok this was a very well put together movie.. I am so glad I have it in my collection... as I could not imagine this movie out of it!
I had seen this on TV and liked it. So, I wanted a copy for my collection. It is enjoyable and meaningful.
Love, Love, Love this movie. It's so witty and real. The characters are so believable. Never a dull moment. I found myself laughing and crying.
THE MOVIE ITSELF WAS FANTASTIC!!!!  THIS MOVIE HAS ALLWAYS MOVED AND TOUCHED ME AND MAKES ME JEALOUS THAT I DO NOT HAVE GREAT FRIENDS LIKE THAT
This movie is very good but pretty sad in the end tho. I couldnt say for words about this movie so I figured I would give this 5 stars!!
THis movie is a must own for chan fans. Bottom line. thats it ...buy it.
This was advertised as a used dvd that was like new, and it showed up in a few days and was brand new.
A great cast and the humour that weaves through what could be a very sad story line makes it a film I can enjoy again and again.
Very prompt!  Got it just before I needed it.  I teach World Geography in Junior High and it holds their attention while they learn!
Great movie very funny. Got it for a gift for Christmas and they like it very much. Lots a fun to watch.
Another fun movie when you really need a laugh.  It shows the verisity of both actors and entertains you.  I enjoyed it.
One of the funniest, craziest movies ever.  Chris Tucker and Charlie Sheen together...priceless!  I wish they would do more together.
I found this at my pawn shop for a dollar & i love this movie & chris tuck is funny so i had to add this in my dvds collection
I love this movie , ITunes does not have it so amazon hooks me up . I put this on my ipad mini, thanks.
This is a good film and it got two good actors in it.  It gots its funny parts in it too.  this is not a kid movie an
The combination of Charlie Sheen and Chris Tucker is fabulous!!!  It had me in stitches laughing and glad I rented it
Chris Tucker is genius and we need to see more of him these days.  Charlie Sheen is also very good in this movie.
I had to have this because it is my favorite movie. Chris and Charlie really &#34;do their thang&#34; in this hilarious comedy! :-)
this movie is very funny chris tucker  and Charlie sheen made this movie a classic laugh until it hurts I did
Loved it. Very funny. Love anything Chris does. I would recommend this movie to all of my family and friends.
One of the funniest movies ever!  Chris Rock and Charlie Sheen are a great team.... Kept me laughing the entire time!
This never movie never gets old because the story line keeps it interesting. Yuck it up from beginning to end.
Chris Tucker is THE MAN! Every movie he has appeared in is great! If you liked all his other movies, you will definitly like this one!
Movie is filled with laughter, watch the movie years ago and till now it still cracks me up. Both guys are great actors.
Now here's a movie guaranteed to make you laugh even if you're in a sour mood, can't sleep and your cash is low.
This movie is freakin hilarious! I love Chris tucker and Charlie sheen, so this was a win win for me!
This is a fun romantic comedy.  I introduced my wife to this and she loved it.  Paul Rudd and Reese Witherspoon work well together.
I love this storyHilarious and great story to go with it.Great characters. Love seeing these two before they got really famous
A great little sleeper of a movie that was made before Reese Witherspoon or Paul Rudd became stars. It's a fun romantic comedy and road trip.
There is bacon taped to the wall. As Werner Herzog said 'this is the entertainment of the future.'
loved this movie growing up and i still love it, one of my favs and it still is, wonderful movie
This is not an easy to find product, so when I found it I was excited. So was my son when he received it as a gift.
a good movie to watch on a late Saturday night , good story line with above average actors. you want the good guy to win
Every husband should be forced to watch Don Juan DeMarco and Chocolat once a day until he "gets it!"  If hubby won't watch it, watch it alone.  ;o)
This is a very touching, funny, and at times sexy film.Depp is superb and Brando is too.Awesome DATE MOVIE.Art
Well-done - - memorable!  Starts off kind of HOKIE, but, as you geet into the story, it becomes better and better.  A great FEEL-GOOD movie!!
Fun movie to watch.  Johnny Depp didn't look as good as he can look but he played the role well and I really liked seeing Marlon Brando again.
Wonderful movie Johnny Depp and Marlon Brando two great actors. Great story I have this one on DVD but wanted it on Blu Ray also.
This was a fun movie with a message for anyone.  Johnny Depp was his usual wonderful self and kept me entertained.
The movie was shipped prompty and arrived in great condition. On the downside, the movie itself was really a bad attempt at strained humor.
There is little that I can add about this world class western classic. One of John Wayne's best.
This is a great movie for the whole family! I love it, but then tere is not a John Wayne movie that I don't like! Its just wonderful!
I am helping my pops switch from VHS to DVD and this is a great movie! It is John Wayne a classic!
He is a lover of John Wayne and this one is just and addition to his collection.  Highly recommend this one.
This is a movie I bought to replace a VHS copy. John Wayne is my hero, and this is a very enjoyable movie for all the family.
I loved the regular ink joy pens so it was only a matter of time for me to get these beautiful vibrant smooth flowing pens.  I absolutely love them!
She Wore a Yellow Ribbon is one of my favorite John Wayne movies.  I enjoy the story, music and acting for a movie made many years ago.
This movie is a war/western movie. I thought that I had never seen it but I was wrong. Now, I am glad I own the movie.
This is a classic western.  Enjoyable to watch- great plot and lots of drama. It's one of my husbands favorites!!
HOW CAN YOU NOT LOVE JOHN WAYNE, ARE YOU A COMMIE OR SOMETHING??  WATCH IT FOR THE BEAUTIFUL BACKGROUNDS IF YOU HAVE NO HEART.
Great great western. John Wayne and John Ford at their best. My favouite of the cavalry trilogy. A must see.
What can I say about John Wayne that Hasn't already Been Said Its truly One of His Classics All time Films
You just can't go wrong with John Wayne. This is the middle story of a three-part with Fort Apache and Rio Grande.
Just enjoy his movies
If you love the classic's you will really enjoy this movie.  It is good clean fun the whole family can enjoy together.
A well acted movie by all. A look into life in the Army back in the Indian war days. Beautiful scenery.
i am a john wayne fan and enjoy all his movies. Ihad no problem with the dvd when it got her.  play well no issues with picture or sound.
This is one of John Wayne's older action packed western movies.  It is a great movie and one the entire family can sit and enjoy together.
This is a great movie. john wayne was at his one of his finest actors films as a action movies
A decent story, with a very good cast,and with beautiful photography and good music.
If you are a John Wayne fan as we are, you will enjoy another one of his great movies. I would recommend it to everyone who enjoys his movies.
Great plot and EXCELLENT sound track. Several touching moments. The HIV sub-plot is well done.  Recommend this movie for sure.
One of the best fighting movies out there. If you are a big fan of fantasy and martial arts combined, then this is the movie for you.
A great sequal the kung fu and other martial arts where great the special effects excellent it's A shame they could not come up with another movie.
We are very satisfied due to getting it in a reasonable fast time!!!! Disk and disk cover in good shape!!!!
loved this movie and the first one still. i grow up watching this movie and i still love to watch it every weekend and play the video game
Awesome movie. Tons of great actors and actresses. Plenty of drugs, sex, and violence plus you get to see Heather Graham naked!
great movie! a fun look thru the window of time at the 70's and 80's. great acting on everyone's part in the movie.
It's perfect to keep enlarging my collection of movies in hd Quality, if I keep this up, I will not have more room in my house.-
This and Dazed and Confused are two of the best movies about the 1970s. Also has a really fantastic soundtrack too.
This is a classic! Had me rooting for these characters no matter if they were unsavory. I recommend this movie!
I love this movie.  The characters progress.  If you have not seen this movie, please take time to watch it.  You will not be disappointed.
one word INTERESTING and for the ending VERY INTERESTING...I was a bit iffy about this movie before i watch it but it was actually a good movie...
I love ,love ,love this movie.You must see it, own it, love it, be it.It is incredible .
Always good, great action and fight scenes, great concepts, and stunts galore, looks like the stuff really did hurtlol
Before Rumble in the Bronx and the other American releases this was one of his great movies from the 80s
aTitle said it all. All so best line in the film. One of John Waynes best Westerns. A B oater that was on the leavel of a classic.
Quality recording and great story line for this young John Wayne western.  Would recommend to a friend.  Would recommend to a friend.
Had to have this one we borrowed it from my son's collection and just had to have for ourselves. Excellent Movie.
love John Wayne and Gabby Hayes in this fun hero saves heroine western, with the mix up of who was the real villians and who were the good guys.
Gotta love stephen king!!kathy bates rules this movie! shes one tough cookie that dont take no crap!!
I really loved this movie...SOO rich,Great casting and scrip...worth every penny i paid to have this movie.A+
This is one of the best movies i have to say i have ever seen,And nothing could top it.Thanks from all of us
awesome movie great for stephen king fans. not a true horror story per se but a great film cool. wow.
I LOVE THE MOTHER CHARACTER IN EVERY MOVIE I HAVE WATCHED. IT WAS VERY EMOTIONAL.
I just love scary movie that have a really god plot and a lot of blood and guts they are the best
I love Kathy Bayes and this movie is one of her best. It is raw and compelling to watch. I love it.
One of my very favorite movies.  It's between nobodys fool and this one.  I'll bet i've watched it 50 times
Great movie one of her best. Kathy Bates adds such great acting to this film. Very dark but ion the same side a mothers love is shown.
This is not my genre of movies but my wife raved about the good acting in it and the suspense
This is an intense movie and I strongly recommend it.  Suspenseful and never a dull moment.  Scenery is nice also.
these actors and actresses make it look seamless and easy in this dark and difficult tale, i am ever reminded that it is a real art form and craft.
I enjoy watching this movie over and over again.  I wanted it for my Kindle, to take and watch on vacation.
Denzel Washington is at his best in this movie.  I hadn't seen it in a long time and watching it again was just as enjoyable as the 1st time.
Very intense with a great storyline. Worthwhile at a higher price. Washington is always good and is in many good films
Another great movie by Denzel. I throughly enjoy watching his movies and character. He is the best I have seen
Old very entertaining movie. However any movie with Denzel Washington has to be great. A surprise ending makes it worth while watching.
Denzel Washington as usual delivers in this suspense thriller that keeps you on the edge of your seat to the very end!
Yup, gotta say, good movie, I enjoyed it.
Denzel Washington is always great in his roles.  The overall presentation kept me wondering what would happen next.  Surprise ending, too.
always love a good detective thriller, but u add the biblical element and im hooked! i love john goodman, not crazy about denzel
I always liked this film a lot.And when it came out on BD.I decided to buy it.Any fan should be satisfied
one of the best ever.  As simple as that.
This is a great movie filmed in the tradition of film noir, great cast, and acting. Would recommend for those who enjoy sci-fi and noir.
You have to watch this movie twice to understand it clearly. It's up there with the matrix and very eye opening
GOOD MOVIE--- SUSPENSEFULMAKES YOU THINKSIMILAR TO RECENT KEANU STORYKIEFER IS THE BEST.
This movie is one of my favorite science fiction movies of all time. If you haven't watched it yet, you're missing out. Buy it now!!!
Great storyline.  Pretty good special effects.  An escape from reality with a surprise twist at the end.  Must see movie for sci-fi fans.
This movie is very fascinating to me, it has great special effects and the story is very captivating.
Of you like modern film noir this movie is for you. Great story line, dark and unpredictable...everything I like in a new school noir movie.
This is dark, strange and oddly attention holding and entertaining.  A friend recommended it, and I don't regret getting it.
I liked this movie.It kept me wanting to find out what was going on.Anyone who likes sci-fi movies should see this one.
lots of action and drama. I would recommend this movie to anyone who likes the unusual and unique and with lot in-between action.
The Matrix ripped this movie off, but this movie has much more style and heart. If you like NOIR style, then this is for you.
great cinematography and acting - a wonderful surprise if you do not know this film
I love this movie
Its great just like the original. Just better picture and sound. I really enjoy this movie. And I always will. yea Just had to add more words sorry.
Great story, great effects, I wish it had a sequel or something, the spin off could go on for a very long time.
My favorite Sci-Fi flick. Most don't know of this film, or just avoid it on purpose. But if you're into Sci-fi mysteries, then this is worth a look.
We all truly enjoyed this movie!  The picture quality was beautiful and I know I will watch it again!  Awesome!
Try to spot the changes.. I needed to listen to the commentary for that one. Also, great movie only greater on the Blu!
Knew about this movie for a long time but never watched it.Now i have and i think its great and makes you wonder abit.
If you liked this movie, you will like the movie Primary Colors.
This movie shows how easy it is to sway public opinion. It is too close to the truth. It hold up better than the first time I saw it.
This movie never goes out of date, I was so glad to get it.
I love this film. Great concept and fun to watch. Awesome actors! I love a good conspiracy film and this one will make you laugh!
Bought this for husband for Christmas. He had never seen it and I love this movie. He really enjoyed it and said he had a wonderful wife
This movie is a great example of how we the public are lied to and just some of the insights to government working for us.
I don't really like romance movies but this one i did like. There were some funny parts but all in all I thought the movie was good.
Gotta love Adam Sandler, always funny, always cute!! Really great movie, Very funny. Great ending!!!
If you grew up in the 80's, this movie will give you all the musical nostalgia you need!  Its a good one
I was surprised at how good this movie was because AS part was way different then his past roles, but he did great!
Have Watched over and over again, huge fan of 80's films, or films made now a days to be in that period.
Classic. Forever favorite. Always fun to watch when there's nothing on Tv or I'm in a bad mood. Everyone should watch this.
was the bestloved itadam is my favorite personjust a amazing guycan,t wait til i have waterboy and big daddy on dvd or blu ray
I really love this movie. It is a true Adam Sandler classic, from his younger prime days. A must have.
I was a teenager in the 80's and this was a humorous take on what happens when life goes on.
Product arrived earlier than expected and we were able to enjoy watching it sooner now I don't have to watch this movie on VHS anymore
This has to be one of Adam Sandler's best movies and the soundtrack is fantastic. A very funny but heartwarming movie!
Not a big Adam Sandler fan but this is a good family movie. You can watch it over and over and never get board.Another must have DVD.
Great purchase, had some deleted scenes. I love this movie, so i am simply happy to own it now. Yay
This has been a favorite if my family.I thought a copy for each of my guys, since we all live separate now.
I got the item I wanted in a timely fashion, that's all I ask for.So often thing are miss listed or labeled, but these were right.
I HAVE ALLWAYS LOVED THIS MOVIE COME ON ITS ADAM SANDLER NEED I SAY MORE!!!!!!!!!!!!THIS IS A 5 STAR MOVIE
I enjoy this movie and watch it every time im in a lovey dovey mood. I love quoting lines for this movie.
Really enjoyed watching this movie with my family!!! Thank You for giving me the chance to buy this movie to watch!!!
Adam and Drew are great in this, we're looking for a wedding singer for our daughter's upcoming wedding. We wanted to watch it on our new blu-ray.
All I can say is ANYONE who grew up in the 80's needs to see this, Lol! You will love it!!!!!!
this is a great movie every time I watch it.  love adam sandler and drew barrymore together
My daughter knows the dialogue of this film by heart.  It's a classic.  Very funny Adam Sandler and spoof of the 1980s.
Loved going back to the 80's even if it was only for a while.............my Japanese husband loved the 80's music as well.
Adam Sandler is great along with Drew Barrymore quirky character. Brings back the 80's music and what the 80's were like to some who grew up then.
you can't go wrong with jackie chan. this movie rocks. chan is the best. i love this movie and so will you. i recommend it for everyone
Ienjoyed this one a lot. Surprised they never came out with more it was a really great movie,maybe one day they will add more.
Lost in Space is such a fun movie.  I used to watch the TV show and this movie is good.  I have already watched it several times.
Great movie, good quality, crappy snap-case.Basically I bought this so I could get to see Heather Graham whenever I wanted.
this movie was a first movie shared with a life partnerand since we were soul mates it felt like we were lost in space too
It's fun for kids and adults!  I wasn't even a Lost In Space fan until I saw this.  Forget Star Trek.  Screw Star Wars.  Give me Lost In Space!
I NEVER SAW THE ONE BAC IN THE 60S . BUT I REALLY LIKE THIS ONE ! TE F/X IS GREAT! GOT 2 SEE!
This is a great spin off for those of you who are old enough to remember the series Lost in Space in the 1960's - good special effects
well orchestrated as a movie, good visual effects, if you liked the &#34;lost in space&#34; series, you'll enjoy this movie
as stqted above, I love lost in space. very good actors and actresses. a great story and  lots of action.
very good
Was very happy to go on this fun trip in the movie. Will be adding this to all of my other movies.
DVD was entertaining.DVD arrived in a very timely fashion.DVD arrived in excellent condition.
I remembered watching this one when I was little and thought it would be fun to watch with my little one
I really loved Lost in Space when I was younger, and the movie was just as good.  Its a good copy and I really enjoy it.
Awesome Sci Fi flick! Classic! I loved it! It reminds me of the Fifth Element & Star Trek! Give it a chance! It's pretty good entertainment! 5 stars!
i watched this movie along time ago and always liked it.And on Amazon you can get just about anything you want so I bought it.
Yeah nothing but good things to say about this movie love it watch it over and over, was a great find on here for a great price
Nicely done.  A updated Movie verision of the old TV series.  Good action and special effects.  I enjoyed this movie very much.
i liked the flashback to the old t.v. series. although bill mumy didn't appear, they were all very worthwhile. can't wait for redux!
I recall seeing this when it originally aired.  It was fascinating and well done.  Please release on DVD, or even Netflix.
A great movie that remains timeless, made better with HD sound and picture.  A must have for your Blu-ray collection.
A Classic!  This movie is so good.  I highly recommend it for everybody's classic collection.  It is a great story and the acting is top notch.
This is the greatest movie ever. The standard DVD doesn't come with commentary, so this version is worth the extra money.
Love the movie always watched it on TV. Needed to have it. I love who plays in it. A must have.
This movie is great, one of those you need to watch a few times to get the little &#34;clues&#34; and has one of those unexpected endings.
This is just an all around great movie. Am so glad that i had the chance to buy it and own it.
One the best shows I've ever seen. Very much worth watching. Excellent acting and script. Time well spent watching TV . . . . if you watch TV.
Morgan Freeman Narrator great acting by Tim Robbins and Morgan Freemanit's worth looking at don't hesitate buy this movie it's a good one
If you want a prison film, this is one of the best. Subtly beautiful without a doubt, great story, great acting. A pleasure to watch.
I love this movie. One of my favorites. Gets you thinking. Wonderful actors, and captures emotion. Some parts of the movie are so heart-wrenching.
This wonderful picture goes on my all-time favorite movie list.  I have seen it countless times, and it still packs an emotional punch.
theres nuthing left to say......... Brilliance at its best
this is one of the most beautifully done movies. it has been a favorite for years. if the price is right, add it to your collection.
I have now watched this film about 6 times and each time I find another great plot point or nuance.
We love this movie and it is a great addition to our movie library which we have hundreds. I guess if I have an addiction it is movies. Thank you.
This movie is just as great as it was when I was younger. I was glad that there weren't any cut scenes like in the televised versions. Love it!
I bought this DVD to give as a present because I thought the movie was so great. This is something that I have never done before.
The Shawshank Redemption is quite the Masterpiece. Tim Robbins, Morgan Freeman and the rest of the cast were at their best!
Great movie, one of my all-time favorites. Deep and moving portrayals by the actors. Plus it has a great ending. I hate movies with lousy endings.
Out of the thousands of movies I have seen this is still in the top 5 all time best movies. If you dont own this, then you dont like movies.
This move is really good , its long but not drawn out nor boring , it was one of those shows that make you go hummm
This is a great movie. To think this movie comes from a short story by Stephen King is kind of amazing. This is easily Tim Robbins best role.
Hd to get it in DVD I had vcr put there out dated. This is one move we can watch over and over thank you
I would bet money that this movie is too good. It probably will make some people upset because of this.
Just by watching the trailer you will be hooked by the movie, and yes you will take the time to watch it. The movie is very touching, and classic.
The Shawshank Redemption is one if the greatest films ever made. If you haven't seen it you are doing yourself a disservice.
I finally saw this movie after years and years of never watching it.  It's a good movie because now I understand the Family Guy reference.
The entire story was awesome... From beginning to end, non stop excitement. I hope anyone who is looking for a good movie watches this movie.
This is one of the best movies I've ever seen.  A true story that's a must see movie.
I loved this movie and watched it several times.  Stephan King did it again with another great story, one of my favorites
This is definitely one of the greatest films ever made. If you have never watched this, you should definitely watch.
If we could recruit Shakespeare to write Hollywood Blockbusters this would be his first one!
Many people watch this movie over and over again. Its message of hope and redemption, not  to mention sweet revenge, is timeless.
This really was a great movie.Great and believable plot. Excellent acting.One of the best of the past 10 years.I loved this movie!
This was another movie that I had to add to my collection. It is a great story with a great ending.
This was one of Steven King's best books. Then making it into a movie for me was great, even with the customary differences, I loved the movie.
Very good movie. would highly recommend. If you Morgan Freeman you will diefinely want to see this movie. Go see it.
Robbins and Freeman are terrific in this film!A great story and twist at the end!
I am always in the mood to watch this film.  The Bluray transfer is truly spectacular.  Can't praise this movie highly enough!
How do describe it?Smart story, a lot of suspense, an incredibly good Tim Robbins...I could see this movie over and over again!
This is one of the best movies of all time. I don't want to tell you any more just see it for yourself.
This is one of the best films I've ever scene, even if you're a renter and not a buyer you should own this one.
What can I say. It is by far the best movie. We watch it when we can. Good to add to the shelf
It is a very good movie...  The type of movie you can watch many times, and always enjoy it.  Jeanne
I Love Morgan Freeman, I Felt So Bad For An Innocent ManTo Go To Prison For A Crime He Did Not Do. But He WinsIn The End.
I love this movie. The BLU-RAY version is exceptionally clean compared to the regular DVD. I never grow tired of watching Any Dufraine. A cool guy!
love the movie about a prison break gone right for the right reason with a twist of the books and fiat
One of my all-time favorite movies.  I have been known to stop whatever I am doing when I come across this movie playing and watch it until the end.
Freeman and RobbinsDo twenty years togetherAnd become fast friends
It was my favorite movie growing up. I loved the bond formed between Tim and Morgan's characters and the story the movie told.
This movie is worth every penny. So many different emotions throughout the film but by the end will make an impression on the viewer.
the story line, the acting, its just beautiful, I seen it 5 times already, every time I watch it, I can always find something new
Great movie. We enjoyed it so much. It's one that you can watch over again. It's definitely one of a kind.
Great movie - one of the best ever.  I think this will go on to be a classic.
I love this movie and could watch it all day. It is one of Stephen Kings best movies in my opinion.
All movies are better on Blu-Ray.  Definitely worth the price, especially since you get the book full of info.
It is still as great as when it was first released.  I had to have it for my collection on DVD.
Excellent film. I had it on VHS and wanted to replace it .  The movie  is an example of a wonderful friendship and exciting story.
This movie does what others don't, and that's focus on character rather than sex or violence. It's a bit on the long side, but it is well worth it.
My 16 year old son had this film on his Christmas list. I saw it a couple of years ago and I did enjoy it as it has a great storyline.
One of my best DVDs
I have seen this movie dozens of times already.  It's a favorite.  I was glad to see it was available to stream on Amazon Prime.
This is one of my favorite prison movies!  How you can be wrongly accused but patiently wait for your time and your VICTORY!!!!
One of the best Steven King Adaptaptations.  Only one better is perhaps the Green Mile.  If you have never seen it I highly recommend it,
Well crafted story. The suspense and characters keep one involved and intrigued.  A little too much violence for me though.
Tim Robbins and Morgan Freeman present a fabulous story. Based on a Stephen King short prison story. Acting and directing both excellent.
Simply one of the greatest movies ever made. Maybe Morgan F. should narrate every movie, look at the success of March of the Penguins.
Compelling and intelligent, this film deserves to be a permanent member of your dvd/video library.Very highly recommended.
Who'd think a dark prison movie would be so wonderful?  Clearly, one of the best films ever made.  Superbly acted. Fine script.
We really have enjoyed this tape.it is a great show and a true story.
This movie is unlike any prison movie you have ever seen.  Tim Robbins does an excellent job as the prisoner who plans his escapefrom prison.
I could watch this movie 100 times over and not get tired of it. I loved it.
I love Shawshank Redemption. I ordered this for my SO who had never seen it before. He's a critic and loved it as much as I did.
Yes there is honor inside of the walls of prison. Great actors and a superb story of prison, friendship and honor amongst inmates.
morgan freeman and tim robbins were great and the co-actors helped make the movie alot more interesting and worth the time to watch and buy the movie
Love this movie. It shows on A&E all the time but wanted my own copy regardless. A must have for people who appreciate good dialogue.
I rank this movie one of the best I have ever seen without a doubt.There is no way to  make it better!
I didn't do it, a lawyer #@&*%^ me. Has to be one of the all time best prison movies ever.
If you are a fan of this movie, then check out the Blu-ray release. It looks stunning.  Well worth owning again.
A strong and compelling movie, I found it entertaining and not at all boring. I have seen before and will watch many more tiimes.
The Shawshank Redemption is I believe still one of the most popular movies on the top 10 list. Well worth seeing.
Fantastic movie. I watch it every time it comes on tv. Love the story, love the actors. Another fine Steven King brought to the big screen.
Love this movie from beginning to end.  One of my favorite roles for Morgan Freeman.  Nice to see just a good ending to a hard road.
My favorite movie.  What's not to love? Made Morgan Freeman my son's favorite actor.  Love the ending - everything finally fell into place.
One of two king stories turned into movies that actually does a good job on the story line! One of my favorite movies.
A great movie to sit on a roof in the spring time with a cold beer.  Definately a movie worth biting into and prying your jaws open with a crow bar.
this movie is a cult classic, a must have in bluray...i could qoute this movie forever but i wont stephen king and bluray is enuff to buy it.
Tim Robbins and Morgan Freeman make a great pair.  The story line has many different facets and keeps yourinterest as to what happens next
Outstanding performances by Tim Robbins and Morgan Freeman!!!!! It is a classic movie, but not for the faint of heart.
An old movie that i can always watch in the comfort of my own home. A Great movie, will enjoy this for many years.
This has been one of my favorite movies for a long time. It was cheaper to buy than to rent.
This is my grandsons favorite movie & he wanted us to share it. We both love this movie. I decided he should own it.
The best movie one worth watching over and over again. It leaves you with a good feeling, many people I think would like this one.
This is one of my all time favorites. I manage to watch it at least once or twice a year. Great price too.
There's a reason it's widely considered one of the best ever. I would recommend EVERYBODY see it at least once!
Excellent movie shines even brighter on blu ray. A worthy addition to any cinephile's library while remaining satisfying to the average movie fan.
I purchase this movie to watch again and again. I loved this movie and would recommend to everyone to watch
movie lots of twists...happy with this purchase I would  buy this again.I shop on Amazon for everything and think they are great!
This is mainly a romance movie, but also a comedy.  It's a movie about friendship, compassion, and love.  Very unique & Excellent.
I love John Cusack in this movie. It's the space between the handshake... That was really good. they were fabulous. I loved it.
This movie is excellent.  It holds up well and the acting is of course great.  Can't say more - done
hilarious comedy about Dracula.  Love Leslie Nielson and the physical comedy in it.  Really a funny movie for the Halloween time or whenever
Mel Brooks is a comedic genius.  Combine his talents with the comedy of Leslie Neilson, and you have the formula for hilarity in a movie.
dracula...you have to love that guy and his chicken
Love Mel Brooks movies, this one was funny too. played great. was new, got here at a good time too
this is a hilarious movie.  Mel Brooks does it again.  I love his movies & this is at the top of the list
i love this movie stupid funny i'v laned this movie out many times as a vsh tape decided I better up grade before the tape snaps
Funny movie, a great spoof on all vampire movies. Will watch again and again. Leslie Nielsen at his best performance.
You've got to see this movie, it is so funny i had tears coming out of my eyes. very awesome
I think this is one of the best spoofs on Dracula.  I could not stop laughing.  Leslie Nielson is over the top.  I especially loved the mirror scene.
I really enjoy this movie, I have loved it since I was younger and hadn't seen it for a while.  Super funny
Great spoof actor in a movie made by the comic genius Mel Brooks. Leslie Nielsen and Mel Brooks play off against each other very well.
Mel is the MAN! I'm a HUGE Mel Brooks fan and I highly recommend anyone who appreciates good old fashioned comedy buy this movie!
I love the movie Dracula: Dead and Loving It. It's a hilarious movie and I love Leslie Nielson. He is so funny.
A very funny DVD with Leslie Nielsen If you like screw ball comedy's, this is a must for your collection. Nuff said.
Always a hoot, campy, and clever, and will leave you with more good lines than Justin could do in a day.
This is one of Mel's best. Hillarious, but, ironically, also one of the most faithful-to-the-book of all the film interpretations.
Had this in VCR format and my daughter wanted the DVR for Christmas.  We love this movie.  Fun and lighthearted.
I love the &#34;Daywalker&#34; take on the vampire theme.  Something about them being afraid of something is kind of cool.
This movie was well done and mastered in HD with 5.1 surround. I would recommend this to any fans of Blade and who are vampire fans too.
This movie is just outstanding. There is no better vampire movie that i know of. The special features on here aren't that good though.
Blade is a very good film, with lots of gore and good plot. A sequel is inevitable.
Wesley Snipes plays Blade in this trilogy of films and boy does he do a great job. Lots of martial arts and sword play here
A popular vampire movie with lots of Karate like action. Wesley Snipes adds star power for an action flick few can match. Try it!
Wesley snipes is like a super hero in this film,different kind of hero with a whole of action,and martial arts fighting!!
This movie is badass epic! Martial arts and a sexy African-American babe kicking a**along side with Blade, disposing the enemy vampire underworld.
One of my favorite Marvel comics adaptations, and a pretty good vampire movie on it's own.  Great action and special effects.
I really like the original Blade.When I first saw it in the theater,I felt the visual effects where new and I still like watching it.
This movie will keep you on the edege of your seat, the acting is great the special effects can't get any better. Very entertaining movie.
Snipes Rocks! Killer moves - no nonsense, just get in there and hack, slash and eviscerate!Great for tension relief, and a whole lot of fun!
I love Blade!  I brought is through Amazon because the cose was very cheap.  Plus, I don't mind watching it over and over again.
Laugh Laugh Laugh when I watch this film. I never get tired of it. This item arrived in super fast time and was in like-new condition.
First off, I just want to say that this is a great movie. It has something for everyone, including action and comedy.
This is a fun movie that the whole family can watch, minus some minor swear words.  Shanghai Noon is still my favorite.
Excellent and enjoyable movie.  Jackie Chan and Chris Tucker are sensational. They have made Rush Hour 2 and 3.  Cannot wait for Rush Hour 4.
great movie but a bit grainy.  Cant really complain on the kuro since everything looks great on that set
how can you not like RUSH HOUR they have the prefect chemistryand chris tucker's funny bones shines through, jackie what can i say but good job......
CAN'T GO WRONG WITH THESE GUYS...THEY ARE SO GOOD TOGETHER AND WE' RE HOPING FOR ANOTHER MOVIEWITH THESE TWO...
This movie is funny and has action!, there are plenty of special features and the case i got was very good and I there are no skips
This is a great movie...so funny and with action and adventure, too. These two actors have a great chemistry. Pop some corn and enjoy.
Its fun and has lots of action with its fair share of comedy. Chris Tucker is hilarious! I could watch over and over.
This movie is one of the great of the nintees. We enjoyed watching. I will recommend it. We need all the other movies to be available.
you will be on the edge of your seat watching this movie.reward your self and get it now. great action
this is a good movie!  it may not be for everyone, but everyone should see it at least once.  i recommend it!
This movie is just as good now as it was when it came out. Hilarious lines from both the leads.
Watching this movie is very fanny and interesting. I can say it is one of the best movie I can watch 1000000s of time.
It is very entertaining and action packed.  Our family really enjoys all these videos.  We watch them whenever we get the chance.
It's a classic, what's not to love! I am a movie lover. I don't care about Genre, if it's good, it's good.
When you put Jackie Chan(Comedian Martial Arts Actor) With Chris Tucker (Comedian) you just get a funny Action film. Amazing movie and I loved it.
This movie is so funny that it will have you in tears.  This is a great movie to have if you love comedies and are a Jada Pinkett Smith fan.
This movie is silly silly silly and funny.  Jada and the other characters played some good parts and I laughed through the entire movie.
i love this movie and i am really enjoying it now that i own it. I would recommend to a friend.
I absolutely love this movie i was cracking up but you have to like that type of humor like the movie booty call funny
GREAT MOVIE TO WATCH JUST SHOW HOW SE GOES THROUGH A BAD MAN TO GET TO A GOOD ONE IN THE END
Good movie about how men should treat ladies and women have to be considerate about men just they have to be about women.
Patrick Stewart is awesome in this version of A Christmas Carol. I watch it many times during the season. Excellent!
This is a great version of the movie to use when reading the book in a class room.  I would Recommend
Another version of my favorite Christmas story, better than most.  Patrick Stewart does a good job of being Ebeneezer Scrooge.
I love this show.  I watch them all.  But, this is my favorite one of all.  I do recommend this to anyone who loves A Christmas Carol.
I believe this is the best version of A Christmas Carol that is out their on the market.  You will love it.
Patrick Stewart renders Scrooge as a character recognizable even in our day, so the Dickens message shines through very well.
I fell in love with this version of Christmas Carol the first time I saw it on TV. Patrick Stewart does and excellent portrayal of Scrooge.
Patrick Stewart is great in this part. This movie is a Christmas tradition in my house
a role Patrick stewart was born to play faithfull retelling of classic scrooge tale one you will watch year after year.
Second only to George C. Scott, I adore this version of a CC since I first saw it on television.!!! Excellent price too!
This is my favorite movie version of A Christmas Carol. Patrick Stewart is terrific and it is pretty faithful to the text.
this scrooge movie was wonderful. Patrick Stewart at his best! I really enjoyed it. it was packaged well and arrived fast! thankyou
A must have Christmas movie - nice to see Captain Jean-Luc Picard as Scrooge
A good version of &#34;A Christmas Carol.&#34;  Mr. Stewart does a splendid job as Scrooge, and holds one's interest throughout.
It seems Patric Stewart is an extremely talented actor and does well in everything he does.  This is worth buying.
Stewart shines in the work. If he had never done anything else he this work proves he is and always will be a great actor.
Excellent. He really depicted Scrooge well. He seemed a mean Scrooge, then one who repented. I would reccommend this DVD highly.
This classic story was very well acted and carried out the book fully. It's one of those we watch annually and this is the bests apart from the book.
This is something I have been looking for for over a year.  Husband extremely happy to get this long wished for movie.
Patrick Stewart does an awsome job as Scrooge.  This is a well done version of 'A Christmas Carol.'
I love almost all versions of this story but Patrick Stewart gives you an insight into Ebenzer Scrooge the others miss.
Patrick Stewart portrays Scrooge in a believable manner. You really get the feel for the message of Charles Dickens's story.
I own the orignal with Alistar Sim. I also own this one. I liked Patrick Stewart's version of Scrooge.
Please release it on DVD. It's far too good to leave it on VHS.
I bought this movie years ago and it is intense. There are some scenes that I could not watch. Powerful. NOT for kids.
ship very fast and a very good movie as will. dvd was packed very will and came with no damage at all
always loved this movie growing up so owning it on blu ray is pretty epic! need this in your collection!
it's a bit old, but it is timeless. the first time I saw it, I liked the hate, but this last time I saw it I saw the meaning and cried.
This is a great series and makes the perfect gift.  The product is of great quality and presentation. Glad I ordered.
a hard core reality check for both sides of the coin be a good guy be a bad guy and this still is a life lesson
Edward Norton and Edward Furlong were amazing in this movie, every student who is in high school should watch this with parental consent!
This is one of my all time favorite movies. It's a very powerful story and Edward Norton's acting is outstanding. Everyone needs to watch this movie.
My husband wanted to watch it, I wasnt sure if I'd like it but I actually thought it was great.
Simply Brilliant. A must see. Words cannot describe how moving or educational this film is. It will stay with you forever.
one of the all time great movies. some parts are sick but overall its awesome great writing by directors or whoever.
This movie shows that anyone can change their ways, but your actions and what you do, does not affect just you but your friends and family as well.
The plot was kind of hokey, but it had its dramatic moments.  My favorite scene was the one where he said, "Put your mouth on the curb."
My wife and i both love this movie, it definately teaches you that people can change no matter what background they came from
Not for the extra density person this is a grey movie Edward norton awesome this product is exactly as advertised no complaints
Brilliant video! very good example of modern youth; very good story; fabulous views of Alaska.
just a nice movie to watch for my husband and i to watch on a yucky night, thanks you again
alaska is so good they made it in to a movie. wow! i did not know alaska was so good. i hope the gobi is a movie some day.
WAS A  GREAT FAMILY MOVIE THAT I COULD WATCH OVER AND OVER AGAIN. IT HAD ADVENTURE AND SHOWED KIDS HOW TO STAND UP FOR SOMETHING THEY BELIEVE IN.
Is the best movie ever I bought it for my mom and she gets alot of joy from watching it.
The movie Mickey Blue Eyes, enjoyed the DVD and it was great conditon.  And I received the video on time
The acting is incredible, the movie is slow but I find it to be a very refreshing movie. Must buy.
I enjoyed the storyline and characters. It left me with an uplifted feeling. I will watch it again for the feel good.
Great movie!  The cast was very funny and the story seemed possible to anyone who has been through a divorce.
Holly Hunter is such a great actress and I love listening to Queen Latifah sing.  It was sad and funny.
I Have Seen This Video. He has won every match. I Like It When He Pined Hulk Hogan For The WCW World Heavyweight Title.
I just love this movie!  Just love the Prince of Puke!  Great one liners and just all around dark humour!
this movie is so good. i highly recommend watching the commentary at the end after you watch the movie. i love how john waters' brain works.
Great movie Loved it and will watch it again several times. They don't make them like this anymore. Good stuff.
The True king of the Monster movies.  Its just a great flick that technology can't improve.  This was the first blockbuster.
The blu-ray, both technical quality of the disc and package, doesn't disappoint the expectations. It is also region free .
watch it  and see what great moviemaking isa truly enjoyable experience again and againI know I will...watch it again that is
This is a classic. Which the re makes don't come close to even with their millions in budgets and superstars.
Read about this film as a kid and dreamed of seeing it. To see it in Blu-Ray glory makes it even more special. Love the Peter Jackson version too.
There is no other version of King Kong that rocks like this one! There will be no other either! Yes!
Awesome Movie, one of my favorite old movies.  It's crazy good and awesome.  Everyone should watch it it's col and stuff
This is a piece of film history that will live on as a classic example of the thirties Hollywood film industry.  One of my favorites.
Im a huge King Kong fan from way back.  I love this collection. It has some really neat bonus items including some really cool lobby cards.
Will the mail in poster offer be redeemable by people living outside the United States and/or Canada?
......consider this true sci fi/horror classic a true film-fantasy come true, has got the mind of an ape!!!!!  Check it out!!!!!!!!!
A movie I can't wait for to be released on DVD.  It's almost a crime that it isn't available yet.
Still very exciting to watch after all these years!  Proud to own it and add to my classic films!
I love this movie and it's available here in australia on dvd!Fay Wray has the best scream and the hairy ape can still tug on the old heartstrings!
This is the original and the picture was good quality! I love the old monster movies and this is the top of my list!! Great for a raining afternoon.
One of the all time great films and it is a terrific package with all the extras and at a great price. Love it......
Great to view a classic on bluray. The bluray format does wonders to this movie.This edition proves that an old B&W movie can still look spectacular.
Nothing to say much about this, but, BUY IT&lt; IT IS AWESOME&lt;BUY IT NOW..........ALLLLL TIMEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE CLASSIC!!!!!!!!!
If you like older classics you will LOVE King Kong - the first - much better then the newer version.  Fantastic movie!
It is what it is. Looks great. The Harryhausen commentary is required listening. The recreated 'spider' sequence is extremely creepy.
if you like the newer version of king kong you will love this movie! the extra features are just as great as the movie.
One of the best movies ever made, 80 years later! A must see even for kids, you can't beat the original King Kong.
This is where Ray Harryhausen got his inspiration as a child. You can see why. LOVE this movie!!
The plot was okay.  The special effects were obviously fake, but of course this was 1933.  Overall, I really liked it.
This is painstakingly restored and is just a fantastic treasure.  Amazingly, it holds up yet today.  A classic to be sure.
this movie was the first movie I ever saw at a theater back in 1954 and t was a good movie then for me and its still a great movie
This wonderful movie is a celebration of American song and dance, though there isn't much mystery over why the guy got a divorce.
I have always been an admirer of this dancing duo.  After all these years, they remain the leaders in this performing art.
With all that great dancing, you just can't help but love it.  I was even impressed with Mr. Scott. Enjoy
A good film I recommend a classic with two great dancers.  All there films are great classic dance in them.
We all know better.  This number is probably the high point on the Astaire-Rogers collaboration and the film is probably the best the two did..
This is a classic that should not be missed! the costumes are gorgeous and Astaire is in top shape, of course! Lovely music and songs!
My favorite Fred and Ginger movie from childhood. Always makes me smile,Great acting, singing and dancing, Fab supporting actors.
One of the best classic Hollywood musicals. Fred Astaire and Ginger Rogers dancing is superbly wrapped withing a comedy. Enjoy.
If you're a diehard CHiPs fan, you need this movie. It has many of the old characters as well as some new ones.
I got this for my dad. It is a great add on to the set. I wish they would get the other seasons out.
I enjoyed watching the movie chips 99 it had drama, action and suspense if you like chips buy this dvd
what a differance to all the others but great to watch these two on their motor bike but the speed really gets to you
Lots of fun for CHiPs fans gets most of the old gang back together. Brings back old memories of times gone by
This is a good family movie. the price was right as well. glad i bought it. not a blu ray but I dont mind.
I enjoyed this film.  It is one of my few favorites and I try to watch it often.  I am pleased to have it in my personal collection.
I had to sit and watch this anytime I saw it on tv. I finally decided to buy my own copy so I could watch it when I wanted , commecial free.
My kids belly laughed often. A little cursing, but contrasts that a little clean decency is still in vogue, never goes out of style
This movie will be a modern classic!  The music, dancing, and acting is great.  Nice, clean fun.  What's not to like?
This is a great flick!  Very original storyline and everyone in it plays their part very well.  Christopher Walken is top notch.
Blast From the Past is just that: a fun movie filled with dated d&eacute;cor, clothing, clich&eacute;s, music and expressions. Wonderful.
this show is hilarious.  love the actors and the story is a crack up.  i've watched it about 6 times now.
This is one of my favorite comedies.  Christopher Walken and Sissy Spacek are amazing.  Brendan Fraser is so stinking funny.
It is a bit illogical at times, but it is a fun comedy just the same.  Viewed it in the threatre first, but liked the DVD just as much.
Brendan Fraser is genius in this role -- he plays an innocent, inexperienced young man, with style.  Very funny flick!
Thank you getting this movie to me very fast. I have enjoyed this movie the very first time i saw it.
Great movie. The actors were a perfect fit. I love how it related to how people thought in the past.
VAVORITE TV MOVIE GOOD CLEAN FUN, DIFFERENT WAY OF SEEING A PERIOD OF TIME.  SISSY SPACEK  AWESOME. COULD EASEALLY  SEE IT HAPPENING
Great comedy with a cute story and wonderful actors.  Christopher Walken is awesome in this and not the usual character type you see him play!
Perfect vehicle for Brenden Fraser. Good script, cast, comedic timing. I have watched it 3 times. I like more each time
To the few of us old enough to remember being taught manners. The bar room scene and dance are worth the price.
No deep, dark plot, no misery, this is a great movie when you just want to laugh a little and have some fun.
This movie show once more why we love watching Christopher Walken.  Silly premise, but wonderful movie - Sissy Spacek is great as mom
This movie is a beautifully crafted and executed masterpiece of delicious humor at its best.  I believe you would be remiss not to own  it.
If you are looking for a little now and a little then, this is the movie for you! This movie is terrific and I highly recommend it to everyone.
great movie ... the dvd was in perfect shape ......
The cast selection is perfect having just the right chemistry in this comical past and future scenarios.Definitely a good movie.
Cute story, nice acting. Enjoyed it very much and will probably watch again in the near future. This type of movie is always great to relax by.
Always liked this movie and wanted my own copy of it, finally got around to buying it.  Good quality DVD, plays well.
I could watch this over and over, just thinking of the manners and values crack me up.  this movie was in perfect condition and arrived very fast
A very unique and beautiful story of a good family, you can see what was then and what is now. I really like the story, great video.
loved the movie. makes us laugh a lot. fun family night movie, or late night laugh movie. Great story line.
I watched this movie as a kid and really liked it and was surprised to see it on a here so I ordered it and it is just as good as I remember.
This is one of Brendan's best movies. I love the plot and the characters are just perfect. Great movie all around.
Not too serious not too silly... smart enough and funny enough- a real classic as far as I'm concerned. Word.
Naturally it deserves 5 stars -- otherwise I wouldn't be spending the $$ to replace the VHS!!Great, fun movie!
Love this movie, very funny, great story and great actors.  Brandon Fraser is so charming in this move.  Wish he would make more movies like this.
Really good movie, fun and entertaining, and of course the cast was perfect for the parts.  Would recommend even children could watch that movie.
Good movie. Brandon Fraser plays the or nicely, as did Jon Voight. Family enjoyed the movie.
A lot of action, fight sequence, comedy and more!! That's why we love Jackie Chan!! See this movie.
Jackie is the man this is a great one, also get police story new police story and super cop all great movies
A great Jackie Chan follow up movie to the original again Jackie Chan at his best as he usually is
Alfred Hitchcock deserves to be Called LEGEND,,I have this 9 disc set boxset and 'tis a well done collection :)
This Is such a cute story,  If you love Alfred Hitchcock movies you will find this one a scream............. of Laughter ;)
This was a gift to my son, he was thoroughly excited about it, he said he loved it.
This movie is so cute. I love Carole Lombard and Robert Montgomery. This is a keeper. I have seen this before and I still love it.
My wife is a great fan of Carole Lombard and her movies are hard to find since she has been gone for a very long time, but not at Amazon.com
This is a great collection. I love all of Alfred Hitchcock movies. I have almost all of them on DVD.
Once again, what can you say about the master of suspense.  Pure genius!  Everyone should have these four apart of their movie collection.
This is a classic because the story is believeable, great actors, no sex, violence or drugs.  I wil save this in my coillection of classics,
It is a movie that all Film Noir and Alfred Hitchcock lover's will thoroughly enjoy.  I highly recommend it.  Joan Fontaine was great!
This is one of the classic Cary Grant films, I loved every minute of it.  I don't of anyone who hasn't  seen it and didn't love it.
Cary Grant and Joan Fontaine deliver in this classic;  from the beginning you will be in suspense throughout the entire movie.
I'm just so thankful to find this wonderful movie on DVD and in such good condition and so affordable!
First time I saw this was on TCM. I loved how he called her monkeyface. To tell to much on here would give it away!
If you love classic movies, then you will like this DVD. Picture is excellant and movies are fun to watch.
All four films in this box set are excellent. The DVDs are all of very fine quality.
My wife and I love these old movies. They are warming to the heart. We're big fans of Turner Classic Movies.
Wonderful collection of great old classic Hitchcock films.  Along with the special features it was a great add to my collection.
Love the stories and enjoy watching again and again; love TCM !!  The quality of the picture is very good too.
Of course these movies are full of suspense and mystery. You really need this for your collection. I love it.
Don't hesitate to buy this Hitchcock collection. All of these movies are fantastic if you like the old classic movies.
I have not seen this movie but I love the cast and the story synopsis.  I can't wait to sit down and watch it in full.
Great acting, sweet and a very loving movie....kept you on the edge of the seat till the last 3 minutes of the movie.
I love Hitchcock films and I have been trying to get all of them. This just added to my collection.
Anything by Alfred Hitchcock I absolutely love.  I am working on getting everything he has ever done.  I'm almost done
Love this movie. Love Carey Grant. Love Joan Fontaine. So happy I found this old wonderful movie to enjoy today.
Perfection. You'll be glad you watched it! Even my 16 year old daughter loved it. I've loved this film for decades.
Nice little collection of the lesser known Hitchcock thrillers.  Not all his earlier movies were so great but this set is worth having around.
This series was a great buy for my sister.  Im more of a Jason Fan.  But she love it.  Nothing else to say
A Christmas gift for my son as he enjoys the Nightmare movies.  He was happy to add this to his collection
Talk about good old fashion Horror Flicks. After so many years have passed, I still get chills up my spine seeing this classics.
The Price was excellent, clean box set to make the nightmares even better and real, I had in all the possible formats, but this is the thing.
All the nightmare films, spooky packageing, awesome bonus disc, what more could you want??!
These items were purchased as  gifts and were a great purchase. Price was right. Great for anyone that doesn't like a real scary movie.
this is the best collection for any Nightmare on elm st fan!! If your really a part of the elm st children you have to get this!
i been wanting this boxset for awhile got at good price and i just love it! so freddy is watching you ;)
Awww! Finally own them all! Yes, used to live on elm street :) the only one I don't like is the newest one.
i just love horror movie and plots they are good to watch, most of the time they are pretty scary
Everything about this set is top notch. The only thing missing is Freddy VS Jason but it's all here and in one complete package. Love it.
That collect is the best thing and how come we don't have more of these horror and provide good it.
it is very nice to have these movies again. and we received them very quickly. we received the movie in just a matter of days!
This is such a great show and I'm so glad they had it in a collection I had to buy Freddy vs Jason separate from this though.
With one extra bonus dvd, the enciclopedia. Buy it!!
Witty,clever,original,moving,enlightening and funny.This is simply a must see film.
Refreshing look at what shaped our past.  It is always fun to say in my day, but as this movie points out, every generation had its share of stress.
Love the movie!!! It will recommended to others. We watched on amazon video demand, it has good quality and sound.
Saw this on T.V a while back and liked it. It's a pretty rad idea and they do a good job not making it too hoky.
My daughter is in film class and had to watch this movie.  She found it fun and enjoyable.  It teaches a good lesson.
This is a great. To see with someone who did not let live in the good old days of black and white things.
I loved this movie since I saw it several years ago. Watching it in Bluray made the experience only better. Recommended.
inventive masterpiece. wow. i was pleasently surprised.
Such a great movie!  Love the characters and how they really make the story.  Great actors and just a lot of fun!
If only we can go back and change some things in those old black and white movies - how much fun would that be?
I think I may have seen it a long time ago but it was very entertaining and has a good message for life.
Amazon is always fast and reliable.  Have used them in the past and will continue to use them in the future.
because those were the days when jim carey could do no wrong......it is a brilliant show, and holds up well for its age.
One of the rare kind movies I have seen which has so much deeper perspective on olden times lifestyle as well as race discrimination issues!
Amazing film for the price. I grew up loving this film. Once I found it in blu-ray it was a must buy.
Amazing movie! Watch it! Love it! The story is still very &#34;Now&#34; and will make you appreciate what we have accomplished so far.
I love this movie! bummed that they don't repeat it on tv but since im amazon prime it solved that problem and can rewatch whenever i feel!
So great to have this film on Bluray.  Ggreat transition from BW to color.  And ... a wonderful message to boot!Exceptional dealer as well.
This is a movie that expresses color more than any other from that era..  I did not find the movie funny  but sad
I have watched this movie before i bought it and wanted it for my collection and its perfect. It is a cool movie and worth watching
this was a hard to find Dvd and she was really happy I found it for her i'd do anything for my siblings
.....it's too close to call.  Outrageous and hysterical.  This movie is not for the self righteous.
Very funny, you must see this.  I laughed and lauged,  great movie! It is a good look at small town life.
This is a teriffic telling of the early days of Microsoft and Apple heroes, Steve Jobs and Bill Gates.  I aboslutely loved it!
came to the public. I leanr the sotry of origins of Personal Computers. I learn about these two guys, Steve and Bill. It is very good. I like it.
Very good version of the story, goes great with the new film by Jobs. I recommend buying the two films
This is a very interesting and educational watch that is under appreciated. Also, great acting and writing that makes you attached to the characters.
if you are interested in computer history and the fight between microsoft and apple still very hot today this is a must have dvd.
This movie hits me in my spot. Something tweaks inside me whenever I watch this movie. I feel rich when I watch it.
This movie is definitely seductive and sexy. Heck, the entire 'Poison Ivy&#34; series is seductive and sexy! But the original is the best.
Cute movie. Drew Barrymore did a great job. I recommend this movie to anyone who is a big Drew Barrymore fan.
I think its great this is a 3 pack. I loved the first one and its been years since I've seen the other two.
DVD was jaw dropping.DVD arrived in a very timely fashion.DVD arrived in excellent condition.
it works for the first two and the third one will most likely work since the first two did but i was too busy for to watch the third one
Wow What a Body Plays a great part Jaime Presley, a little different from the first one but who cares
A wonderful addition for any Alyssa Milano fan!
This is a very sexy vampire story that Alyssa Milano starred in! I recommend this for anyone who loves Alyssa Milano!
look we know why we are watching this movie.  Alyssa Milano is beautiful.  the movie is bad but does that matter?  Alyssa is the movie.
I got this video for a good  vampire movie  and it was that the DVD has some extras on it and there good to
DVD was arousing.DVD arrived in a very timely fashion.DVD arrived in excellent condition.
I would give 5 stars for any movie with enough exposure of Alyssa Milano , and I must say, this beats all the movies she ever made!
Excellent Vampire film. And Alyssa Milano is Hot Hot! Well scripted and filmed and the Blu-ray version is exceptionally clear and beautiful.
very good, cameron acts very well as always, the story is a little bit boring when diaz don't acts, but it good at all buy this vid&eacute;o.
Ms. Diaz always provides believable substance to the roles she accepts in her career.  A fine actress...and...major eye candy :)
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  This is just a terrific movie.  it also has some comedy in it which is pretty funny.
This movie makes you want to throw a house party. I love this movie, it's a enjoyable comedy and it still holds up today. You have to own this one!
One for the collection. I watch this one until it didn't work anymore. fun funny and funny. must see. . .
Good Movie I really enjoy kid and play when I was younger I could not watch it when they come out to young but I can now. good movie.
do not like any of the house party movies but a neice does so i give it 1 star and my neice gives it four stars, she like all of them
I enjoy this movie it really has a good massage in the move. if you like kid and play give this movie a shot.
i love this movie. it is funny and entertaining. i would recommend this to any one that loves comedy and music put together.
Love this movie! Video is great quality & great price. One of my fav movies & I'm glad I found it here!
Love this movie. Its hilarious from start to finish and the late great Bernie Mac shines as fun of its funniest characters.
It is my favorite House Party movie because you have a lot of legends in this film. From Bernie Mac to TLC.
I thought Dazed and Confused was the best funny movie for that time in life but DRC totally enihalates it in the laugh factor!!
I bought this for my son-in-law and he loves it!  Great buy and well worth the money to make someone happy!
This movie is so bad A$$. I love the fight scene at the ending! lol. Laugh every time I watch it. Finally broke down and bought it on DVD!
Great movie, great music! IT was a hilarious comedy that any adult or teens can enjoy, however I do think it is inappropriate for small children.
i grew up when kiss ruled the world, this movie is funny how often do you see a priest high on mushrooms? shannon tweed is gorgeous.
TWO THUMBS UP FOR THIS MOVIES. LOVE THEM ALL. I LIKE THE WAY THEY SET UP ON CD'S. 4 CD'S IN ONE CASE. IT WAS GREAT.
I love the movie. very funny.  Chris Odonnell did good job in this movie.. I like his movies he makes.
I never got around to buying this on dvd and finally the chance came around to pick it up. awesome movie and it's good to have it on dvd.
I saw it at the movies and even better in blu- one of john's best, great transfer
Was very pleased with my purchase. I had rented this movie and liked it so much that I wanted to own it.
I think this movie is a perfect work. That's all I have to say about it.
Wonderful BD transfer.  I had not seen this movie in many years.  Good story line, I like Sam in anything he does.
If you enjoy horror movies this is a "novel" movie.  Fun to watch...both myself and my friends got a kick out this
This has always been a favorite movie of my wife and I and now it is a welcome addition to our Blu-ray collection!
A classic movie for a great price. I love this movie and am extremely excited that i finally own it!
GREAT MOVIE ABOUT A BLACK MAN WHO WAS GIFTED WITH THE POWER TO BREATH LIFE INTO THE DYING
Excellent adaptation of Stephen King's book.  All the characters are believable and Tom Hanks shines..
I loved this movie.  It takes a little while for you to figure out what is really going on which makes it a great movie.
i do not buy tom hanks movies but this movie i just love it it is one good movis thank you
Hands down, IMO, the best Tom Hanks movie. Great cast. Wonderfully acted. Movies such as this (fantasy element aside) should really wake 'us' up.
Tom Hanks and Michael Clark Duncan were phenominal as well as the rest of the cast was good. I have watched this movie at least 6-7 times.
Tom Hanks what else is there to say , I enjoy him in every movie he makes , a very powerful actor !
he has proved to b a excellent actor and director over the past years. this one is right up there with forrest gump
This one's an absolute classic and for anyone who likes severe drama this is one you'll be glad you bought.
This is one of Tom Hank's best movies.I cried and cried and cried.You have to see this brillant movie.
I just wanna say that you must this movie cause I can not think that there is a person who did not like this film.Strictly Recommended.
Great film about the people who work on Death Row and one very special inmate they encounter. It has a surprise ending.
Tom Hanks is one of my favorite actors but I have to say that Michael Clark Duncan stole the show for me on my second viewing.
Great movie and of course Steve Hanks is at his best in this movie.  A must to add to anyone's collection.
wonderful movie! very emotional and moving, i loved this and am considering adding it to my permanent collection very soon
This movie is very touching and the cast is brilliant especially Michael Clarke Duncan. Not very many movies can be as touching as this one!
Great movie, classic Tom Hanks. You don't want to miss this one. Great story line and actors.
Tom Hanks Plays A Really Nice Prison Guard. I Had A Hard TimeWatching Some Of The Parts As Tom Is A Guard On Death Row
one excellent movie but it did not work it skipped in all the players i had so i got a refund
THIS HAS IT ALL DRAMA, ROMANCE, MYSTERY AND SUSPENCE. I HAVE WATCHED THIS MOVIE MANY TIMES AND ALWAYS ENJOY IT.
I saw this movie many years ago, and just to own a copy for myself! Thank you so much. And I do reall love this movie.
This is by far the best movie based on a Steven King novel I have ever  seen.  Powerfull, good acting, good storyline, and heart-wearming.
The story was full of life experieces that anyone can relate to! Great scenes and great acting! I have watched it twice now.
The Green Mile was a lot better than I ever imagined. I was very shocked the movie had humor as well! This is a must-see!!!
it is pretty close to the story with few changes this movie is great. i like how he kept it close to the book with out making it a overlong movie.
I'd say this is one of Tom Hanks best movies and MIchael Clark Duncan does an outstanding job as well.
Enjoyed this story very, very much. Tom Hanks does a wonderful job acting. Very touching story. Sets are beautifully replicated.
I love Tom Hanks.His films always make me think.Good acting, the black guy is great too. Good story.It's a classic film.
one of my favorite movies ever. the cast was the best and tom hanks was fantastic like he always is.
you will feel things and think about and learn more about these actors and what they bring to life with their skill
one of if not THE best ensemble cast ever seen on screen. everyone touches your heart! absolutely adore this movie
Liked the movie very much- love the mysterious part of it and wish there was a sequel to this one for sure.
As always Tom Hanks does his best in every single film he has ever done. Thanks Mr. Hanks! For another awesome amazing film! :-)
This is a movie that I have liked for many years.  Finally bought  me a copy and have really enjoyed it
This movie has become a classic and looks excellent in hi-definition, making it a great pickup at the price I paid
If you like a good story this movie is for you. One of the better movies that I've seen. Great
this is a wonderful movie to watch i love watching it and to add to my collection is wonderful thing i want be loaning it out
The best movie ever made it keeps you drawn to it from beginning to end Tom Hanks was great as always
This is an amazing movie full of exceptional talent!! I highly recommend this movie to everyone! This is Michael Clarke Duncan at his best!!
I would recommend this movie to anyone.  Tom Hanks is wonderful in anything he does and this is a great movie!
This is one of my favorite movies.... I own a bunch of DVD's and am now trying to upgrade to Blu-Rays.  The quality is GREAT!!!
The Green Mile is a great movie to sit by a fire place and drink hot chocolate to, GB Mr. Pete
Great book, great movie. Not exactly horror though some horrifying scenes--The Bad Death of Delacroix is just one--it's a great story and movie.
I love Tom Hanks movies. He is so good. This is a movie that is a little far fetched in only one way but the rest of the story line is wonderful.
i really love this movie i'm a guy but i cried during this movie i reccommed this movie plus ghost also to very moving and touching film.
I don't remember where or when I saw this show. I really enjoy the story. It is about doing the right thing.Do you know who wrote this story?
One the best book-movie adaptations I've seen in a long time!This and 'The Shawshank Redemption' are two of King's best.Thumbs up!
This is my most favorite movie, I could watch it over and over. I'm glad that I bought it to go with my movie collection.
This is a classic movie and I just had to get it on DVD, I already have it video and they wear out. A must own movie!!!
I am late in commenting but the DVD quality is still excellent after several years of viewing. A darn good movie and it last and last and last.
This movie is incredible. Stephen King had a unique vision in writing this story and the movie adaptation won't disappoint.
Good story. Very good cast and told well in movie form. Not quite a timeless classic,but should hold up well for a long time.
Picture quality very sharp.  It's hard for me to tell a good DVD from a Blu-Ray.  I use a Sony Blu-Ray player and a 65&#34; Panasonic plasma TV.
This is a great movie.  I have seen it many times and decided to just buy it for myself.
A must see.  Either on Blu-Ray if you don't already own it or on DVD if that is the source you already have.  Either way, it's powerful and moving.
This gay oriented movie is a good depiction of the west village in the 1980's Its fun and nostalgic. Buy this one!
This was worth the purchase.  I can't begin to express how good this movie was.  I can't wait to purchase more in the future.
This has set the standards years ago for gay films and has been unsurpassed since. It is funny, touching and gripping all at once. Fantastic
This is one of the best renditions of Hamlet I have seen.  Well acted and photographed.  Basically unabridged.  Worth the price.
one of my favorites of all time.  this movie brings back memories and well as continuing to interest me as I watch it again and again
i saw parts of this film in high school english and wanted to see all of it so i found it on here and got it, it was a good one!
A fantastic performance by Branagh, Winslet, and others. Billy Crystal is the gravedigger! The special features are alone worth the price.
So many great actors. Some you would not take seriously in this production. First class! Great camera work. Very long.
It's classic, and performed by classical actors.  Shakespear is hard to follow for the uneducated, but this move plays out the authors mind.
worth sitting through.  Branagh does a great job.  Some of the "bit parts" are not only unexpected but very, very well done.
For you comedy and romance Fans...this gets an A+ from me in both categories. it is like enjoying a nice relaxing read. Be sure to check it out.
I am a fan of Bill Pullman so I like all his movies  I also liked the TV show The Virginian
You can't go wrong with Fred Astaire!!  He is the best.  So nice to own this movie on DVD.  Very enjoyable.  Arrived in great shape.
Was taken back into time!  Totally enjoyable and thrilled to add this one to my classic library of DVD's!
You don't see movies like this any longer. Sure it's dated but the innocence but none-the-less sexiness is here for sure. A Great old time movie.
This is a MUST have series for the baseball fan!  Excellent quality and narration.  Ken Burns' reputation is still outstanding.
I bought this as a gift for a fellow baseball lover, but may eventually end up having to buy another copy for myself.
If not for Ken Burns films, Amazon instant video would have been a total waste of $80 bucks. Thank you Mr. Burns
Like every else directed by Ken Burns, this is an masterpiece of presentation and history. If you like baseball, even a little, this is a must see.
I highly recommend this DVD...Great documentary for anyone wanting to learn the history of baseball.  I enjoyed every episode equally!
A wonderful depiction of my favorite sport even though my team, the Indians have only won the World Series once in my lifetime
Anything by Ken Burns is great. Baseball is no exception. I definitely enjoyed watching as the history of the game unfolded.
Surely every baseball fan is aware of this series, a great lesson in history, sports and the country, to pass down to kids
My husband is a baseball fan; he wanted the series and is very happy with the purchase. He loves it!
Our entire family has watched this over and over and all agree it's one of the best films made in quite some time.
A wonderful compilation of old and new memories captured by Ken Burns. The narratives and music are outstanding, too! Highly recommended!
It brought me back to loving and following the game I loved for years. For that alone it is worth everything bright and beautiful.
Great documentary about the greatest game ever played. Brings a lot of memories of the players that played for the love of the game.
This was a wonderful gift for a very special friend who happens to LOVE baseball.  And we all love Ken Burns.  This documentar has it ALL.
If you like baseball, you will love this history of the game.  The 30's thru the 70's were the most interesting to me.
Loved how the history of baseball was told and the various players who made it great.  This is a film worth watching for anyone who likes the game.
I own this because its just  amazing. I still remenber how scared i got when i first seen it (laughs). Buy it !
pretty good sequelbut theres one proplem plus this is a very grusom gory second all the noes are very very very gory but this one definitly.
I definetely think this was the best of the series. There were so many classic lines, and the effects were a big jump from the first two.
I think this one is pretty good because i have seen it more tehn 20 times. Buy it !
a very good sequel a must see great special effects.
best part of this movie is the nurse  lets face it any male that who doesnt agree is not alive great movie pity about 5 and onwards
Not much to say except CLASSIC!I recommend taking a look at the box set.
VERY COOL AND TIGHT SEQUEL VERY SERIOUS FILLED WITH SPECIAL EFFECTS AND GORE AND A GREAT STORY
Loved every Freddy movie there is, except for the new one. Nightmare on Elm Street is a great thriller, with a twist of comedy and suspense!
&quot;It's a Boy!!&quot; This is a great movie
saw this tons of times on vhs and tvjust as sick, funny, shocking as the other Nightmare on Elm street moviessee thisi'm so glad I have it on dvd
The movie is very good and scary and funny. The product is in great shape and I recevied it very quickly.
she loved it was a great add to my granddaughters horror collection thank you very much.have a happy new year
this is a really great movie it might even be the best in the series even if the first one in like this classic.
i loved this movie. heck most horror movie fanatics will. it's better than dumb jason movies.
i love this movie it is one of my favorites. its a good movie i recommend it to any one
Tom Cruise's performance alone was worth watching the film.SEDUCE AND DESTROY! Watch that scene on youtube and you will be blown away.
Usually I can't stand Tom Cruise Movies.  This one was great and my dislike of Tom Cruise didn't stand in the way of my total enjoyment.
We bought this to add to the video library and it has been a pretty popular item since purchased. Great!
Great movie. Great cast. Great acting. Horrible ending. Cruise in his most powerful role. Phillip Seymore Hoffman shines.
Craig & Day-Day make it all work in Rancho Cuchamanga!This one  was much better than FridayUncle Elroy is the king!
Movie is absolutely hilarious!!!! It does contain bad language so I wouldn't recommend it for small children! Great to watch w/ adult friends!!!!!
I REALLY LOVE THIS MOVIE I COULD WATCH IT ALL DAY LONG AND WORK GREAT THANKS FOR MAIL MY MOVIE TO ME AND THERE NOTHING WRONG WITH IT
I love this movie. Who wouldn't love this movie? Soooo funny. Day Day and Craig are great in this movie.
this one of the funnies movie this is a great find for family and friends and I completed my collection
love love love this movie.  It was in excellent shape. This movie is so funny.  Although is was used it really plays very well
This movie is a a thrill ride. I love seeing all of Hollywood's biggest actors crush a movie like this so long ago. Highly recommended.
I can't ever get enough of this movie. I love all the people in it and the soundtrack. I definitely recommend it.
Almost all DJ Premeir beats over a cold New York setting add to the movie greatly.  Makes you wanna get off your @ss and go make some money.
And fun to see Clint Eastwood in fine fun form. Really nicely done. Have shared with family. On my list.
This is one of Eastwoods better movies and will make it to my collection for viewing again. thanks, Bobby j.
EASTWOOD SEEMS ABLE TO PULL OFF JUST ABOUT ANY KIND OF CHARACTER HIS FILMS DEMAND. HE HAS EARNED ALL OF HIS PRAISE.
I love anything Clint Eastwood plays in and this is  no exception.  Excellent movie.  I highly recommend this movie to everyone.
I thought the book was good, by David Baldacci. But the movie was great, good action and suspence. Read the book first and then watch the movie.
Very pleased with the wifi scanning , a good movie in no time. fan of Clint Eastwood. keep it coming amazon.
This is one of Clint's best.  I loved the story, the acting and the movie.  This one  you can watch over and over and still enjoy.
THIS IS A GREAT TRILLER, FULL OF SUSPENCE, A TOUCH OF ROMANCE, AND A LOT OF EASTWOOD PAYBACK.I WOLD RECOMMEND THIS FOR A BUY FOR SURE.
A must see!  Keeps your attention throughout the movie.  One of Clint's best performance....
Suggest it for all. No way to describe it. You have to see it foryourself. Watch!!!! You'll love it.
I had to write this review seeing that it only got 3 stars .  This was a good picture good direction and  a hell of a plot.  PICK IT UP
packaged well. worth the money, great tense movie. I would recommend this to anyone. definitely worth it. cool. done well.
Great movie. Clint Eastwood plays a good theif in this movie. I am use to watching his western and dirty harry movies.My husband loves this movie.
I'm more the &#34;murder-at-midnight&#34; lady.  I loved the book, but liked the changes made to the movie.  Interesting movie, interesting outcome.
We have really enjoyed sharing this show to our friends and family.
Clint Eastwood makes a great thief, but draws the line when it comes to murder.....superb performane by the master of dramas!
Clint is great in the movie and the plot is very good a lot of action and suspense.  A must see for everyone. .
This was, in my opinion, one of Clint Eastwoods best movie.  It ranks up there with Gran Torino.  The whole cast is outstanding.
This is one of my fav Eastwood movies & one I've watched numerous times. If you like Clint, you'll want to add this to your collection.
I love Clint eastwood's movies. This movie was very good from the beginning when gene hackman , the president caused the death of his lover.
I love this movie. It is one of the best teen horror flicks ever! A worthy tribute to Alfred Hitchcock. Get yours now.
This movie is amazing, it's funny, scary, jumpy and very gory.  Buy this movie NOW!
Thrilling and different. Good slasher flick minus the slasher (as critics agree). Recommended. Score: 98/100
I love the whole series of final destination, if you've never seen it i highly recommend watching it. :D :D
This movie is such a thriller! It is so good!!! I love it so much. I watch it all the time. Made me afraid to get on a plane lol.
great classic movie work the money have all the rest on the movies they are even better then this one
Final Destination is a great thriller.  The movie is full of suspense, I recommend this film to anyone Looking for a good thrill.
The movie that started the franchise off, can't go wrong with the first one. Crazy scenes and action packed, got to love it.
kid is hot, and a good aCTOR. story is realistic though a bit contrived toward end. stil..............a must buy. honest
The Mask is a very funny movie and one of my favorite Jim Carrey films. Too many laughs throughout the film!!!
It's one of JC's best films and it's just plain funny. Bonus that CD has never looked better, ever. True story.
One of rhe best movies with Jim Carrey! Very fun, romantic, colorful, great music.Good for adults and even kids!
Very funny Jim Carrey movie! Personally I think all of his movies are good, but this one is at the top of the list!
We have seen this movie multiple times and steel laugh! worth it if you like Jim Carry!  I love the Dog in it, he is the star to me!
Bought this for my grandson who has seen it at least 10 times. We both repeat lines from it all the time and is my favorite Jim Carrey movie
Jim Carrey is always funny to begin with.  This is just another example of how funny he can be.  Watch it once for sure!!Dale :O)
Jim Carrey is as funny in this movie as he has been in all the others.  Have always been a Carrey fan and enjoyed seeing again him in the Mask.
It's Party Time P.A.R.T. Y because the mask is definitly one of jim carreys best movies. he should of done the sequel. this movie is awesome
This is one of my favorite movies. I love the music and the wacky behavior of all the actors. Very entertaining and always makes me laugh!
Just a classic Jim Carrey movie that I haven't watched for a long long time it's just fantastic seeing it again.
We watched this as a family. We have two small boys. They loved the mask and waited for the mask to come back. Fun family show.
I really,really like this piece of film.Rated PG-13 for stylized action violence.Good for anyone
Not the first time I seen this one, but I like to see all or parts of it again and again.
One of Jim Carrey's better efforts.  The combination of live action and animations works very well here.Make-up effects are great in this movie.
This is a great family movie to watch with or without the kids. It is a classic and is hilarious.
I believe this is what made Jim Carrey a superstar. Oh yes he was always funny but this movie broke all of the bounds for him.
what a classic jim carrey movie-makes you laugh out loud! and cameron dias in her first film. love this movie and was waiting to put in on my kindle!
I love this movie. I used to watch it all of the time on VHS. It's funny and also has some action.
ONE OF THE BEST COMEDIES IN RECENT MEMORYNOT RECOMMENDED FOR SERIOUS PEOPLEONLY FOR THE ONES THAT ENJOY CARTOONS AND COMEDY
One hell uv a movie, play it over and over for great comedy here. Vivannnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnnt!! The best of movie making here.+
DVD was hilarious.DVD arrived in a very timely fashion.DVD arrived in excellent condition.
This was a good pick. One of Jim's best works of my decision..The entire movie is just SMOKIN. LOVE IT
Great quality and product arrives in good condition.Excellent movie to add to my collection.highly recommended for all!!
He really aired it out in this hilarious romp.  I use Cuban Pete as a ringtone, which always make me smile.
Just a goofy funny typical Carey farce to pass time and get a good laugh.  I recommend it to anyone who likes Carey.
I have always loved watching this movie.......Had not seen it in awhlie, but thanks to AMAZON PRIME I was able to see it again.
I liked it because it was really funny and had an excellent video quality.  I will watch it again and again!!!!
Jim Carrey is a good comedian the movie is very funny had me laughing from beginning to end.&#128522; thank you
Delivery was quick, and the movie is pretty good in bluray edition. I have been a fan of The Mask since I was in grammar school.
jim carrey is one of my fave actors. he is soooo funny in this movie. it's great for family u'll definitely enjoy it!
this movie will be a classic, fun for the whole family from beginning to end. one of jim carrey's best movies
Witty, fun, and gave me a good feel for the backstage of the production.
Even my small children enjoy this movie. My youngest specifically loves the cowboys. If you are a Prairie Home fan it is a must see.
Sending sparks up into the sky....What an amazing sendup--I'm just sad the movie had to end.  I haven't laughed so hard in months.
This is a unique film!  It's music and humor is absolutely charming!The cast is great as well.
Funny and happy. Old jokes and gags are great. Loved the blend of humor, wisdom, music, and sadness. Like an old time review.
we loved this movie - the PBS radio show is a great American past-time fun, quirky, and low key - the movie is just like the show
This is the second time I watched it (first time in a theatre).  So fun to see GK &#34;in person&#34;.  I highly recommend it.
I purchased it for a little old 80 year old friend in a nursing home. She loved it. (:  ..
Not only the dvd was in very very good condition the movie was awesome, probably the best in the series.
I had this movie before, and I still love it. will keep you on the edge of your seat and make you wonder if this could really happen
Oh, I liked this one! The blood the gore, everything!
I'm not sure why but this is my favorite of all the Texas Chainsaw Massacre movies. I recommend it for anybody who enjoys the other films!
What can I say? Excellent price and even better quality. As you can see the price is right. You won't find a better offer.
You really will enjoy this DVD, but get ready for a lot of details, good choice if you like this kind of show.
This film is AWESOME, great history, great acting, The best movie prequel ever. buy it.
This was a scary movie.You will not be disappointed at all.Well written and produce.The acting was good.Plently of blood if you like that.
Exciting.  Will keep you in suspense from beginning to the end, Great movie to watch when  you want te be scared.
Great dvd. good buy.. enjoyed it very much. I am happy with my purchase. I love horror movies and books.
Fortunately we'll never know!  It's a cute episode dealing with Linus's angst over the possibility of losing his beloved blanket.  A must have!
Happiness can be many things to different people, luckily for Linus it's a warm blanket.  Life should always be this simple.
FUN MOVIE ... NOSTALGIC AND HEART-WARMING ... SNOOPY IS ESPECIALLY FUNNY IN THIS ONE ... POOR LINUS! - HE CAN'T GET A BREAK ...
This is a typical Charlie Brown Story...lots of fun to watch for the entire family. All young kids can relate to it.
Happiness is a warm balnket and so is this cartoon! Let's all cuddle up with Linus and enjoy it together!
I really loved this dvd. I have been a fan of Charlie Brown for sometime. This is one of my favorites. I would recommend this to anyone.
it is great to have both the color and black & white versions of this movie....
One of the best holiday movies ever in my opinion.lets hope they never try to remake this one.
Classic feel good movie.
This is the perfect movie about the holidays, and everything that matters in life.  Was so glad to be able to add this to our collection.
Hubby loves this movie and always watches it on TV, now he can watch it any time and it any color.  :-)
We have the VCR and wanted the DVD for more background information - just lovely.
Anyone who collects, Classics, will BUY this movie.......I suggest it highly !  Finally decided to add to my DVD collection, so glad I did..
Love this movie, it is one of my favorites! I had lost my copy and definitely needed to replace it!
Absolutely fabulous!!!  I watch it at least 3 times during the Christmas season and whenever I need a &#34;pick me up&#34;!
The  CD was very enjoyable. The commentary was very good. Like James Stewart very well.  Like Having the collector's set.
You can watch this movie again and again and find something new each time.  It is a timeless classic!
one of my all time favorite movies - so i glad to have found it for such a reasonable price
This movie is a definate classic witch has been remastered into its original black & white release which is clearest sharpest that I have ever seen.
it is the good old favoriteof mine, watch it every thanksgiving to put me in the christmas mood. must have
Watch this, It Is a Wonderful Life. The cast created a memory to last for all time, perfect for any Jimmy Stewart or Donna Reed fan
What can one say about this classic movie Grandparent Parents Kids of all ages have seen this movie Jimmy Stewart in great and so was Donna Reed
love this classic..good quality DVD
Watching this movie is part of my annual Christmas tradition and always will be.  I enjoy the simple message it sends: everyone matters!
Viewing this video is a great way to start the holiday season.  Great family video and some good life lessons to be discussed.
this was a gift. the person who received it was very happy . It was an older person  quite satisfied with movie
It's one of my traditional Christmas movies.  Great feel-good movie that is timeless.  Jimmy Stewart, Donna Reed...lots of movie pros.
What more can I say.  This movie is part of my Christmas tradition and it still makes me cry joyfully every year.
It's a Wonderful Life joins my collection of essential holiday films. Nice to see the classic film without commercial interruption.
How can you go wrong with this movie.Watching it in color makes it even better. A holiday tradition to come in my family.
I loved this as a kid - thought it was fun. Got this for my kids. They loved it. I am totally reliving my childhood.
We watch this movie every year on Christmas Eve.  They did a great restoration so the clarity was magnificent in blu ray.
This is my very favorite Christmas movie of all time.  It's a great classic for all persons of all ages.
Having both formats and a lot of extra features is worth the price.Vendor exceeded expectations with very prompt shipment.
I had this movie before and I would watch it every year after Thanksgiving. I lost it so I looked for it and found it here. The movie is a great buy.
best movie of that era!  James Stewart is amazing, and Donna reed is no slouch!  If you like Christmas movies, then you will love this movie
I really like it, a great Christmas DVD!!! I especially enjoyed all of the special features!!! We will be watching it for many years to come!!!
I Love this movie. Now I can watch it year around. Great for the family, IT IS A WONDERFFUL LIFE!
Everyone likes this movie.  I am guessing my wife likes the idea that we will watch it on DVD since she ordered it.
I love this movie it's a classic and I'm glad it in color so that my grand kids can seat and enjoy it with me
Watch it every Christmas. Such a classic. Never gets old. Never goes out of style. Will pass onto my younger generations.
I Have always loved this movie it has moved since the first time I saw it now I enjoy it each year with my kids on christmas
every house should own this encrediable classic it is worth ever penny and the dvd is awesome.
This was purchased for a women's dorm on a college campus. They loved this classic flick and it's frequently checked out of the movie library.
This classic is the BEST Christmas Movie of the entire bunch!  Our family and a number of friends watch it every year before Christmas.
If you like Christmas movies and haven't seen this one, you are missing out.  Wonderful, wonderful, wonderful!
Can you really Celebrate Christmas without watching this movie. This is a holiday classic. Watching this movie is a tradition in my family.
This is such a great story for people who collect older movies, everyone should have this in there collection,I do..
It wouldn't be Christmas without this movie!  An annual must-see at our our house.  What a Great Cast and Great Story Line.
Love all the old Christmas Classics.  Aahh!  The good old days.  What happened?Highly Recommened to Christmas Classic Movie lovers.
First, it is an absolutely great film.  Second, the color in this rendition is superb.  Great holiday classic.  Every family should own it.
This is a holiday favourite for the whole family. While it does not hold the attention of the young children, I think anyone over 12 will enjoy it.
I can't imagine a Christmas without seeing this movie. It reminds someone of what Christmas is suppose to be. Great
this is another one of my favorite christmas movie.  i watch it every year and love it.  it just wouldn't be christmas without it.
This story is a wonderful rendition of a timeless tale.  The acting is marvelous and the story a delight to revisit every Christmas season.
This is the number one favorit Christmas movie. I watch it every year. Best picture of all time. Can't get enough of it.
This is a wonderful classic.The quality and sound of this print is great.
This is the best story to enjoy at Christmas time and will I continue to enjoy this great movie every time I view this great classic!
I've loved this movie forever. Jimmy Stewart is terrific. Watch every year. Love having the colored version as well as the black and white.
my favorite movie. my kids groan when I get it out every December. I love jimmy stewart and co stars.
What more is there to say really? Buy it and enjoy it with your kids and their kids and their kids...
This is a Christmas Classic that makes the spirit of Christmas come to life. We watch it every Christmas Eve.
Only wish there were more of these type of family value Christmas movies made today. This trully is a classic loved by anyone that waches it.
ordered to add to my xmas movie collection and enjoyed every minute of it as the others I ordered for my collection for the holidays
I love this movie, it is one of my favorite Christmas movies that isn't a cartoon or animated. LOVE IT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
DVD arrived in excellent condition. This is a classic & I wanted it in my collection. A good buy for any movie lover.
What can I say about this movie that hasn't already been said a gazillion times over?!  It's a Wonderful Movie!!
This has been a movie that has stood the test of time.  One of the great movies that never goes out of style, so to speak.
It just wouldn't be Christmas without watching this classic old movie!  I certainly wouldn't hesitate recommending it to all :).
This movie is a movie you can watch every year, or every day.  It has good values in it that our family need.
What would the world be like if you had not been born? This movie addresses this question quite nicely and thought provokingly.
THIS IS A GRET MOVI FOR CHRISTMAS OR ANY TIME YOU WANT TO WATCH  IT THIS IS ONE OF MY FAVES
Great price and service.  Wonderful Christmas movie we watch it every year.  the whole family enjoys it and especially the grand children.
One of the best holiday movies ever made.  Jimmy Stewart and Donna Reed shine.  Great for Thanksgiving and Christmas viewing.
I cannot add anything to what has been said before, just wanted to put my five star rating on this film as well as this release.
Great Classic !  Clean, wholesome entertainment. Most everyone takes time to watch this movie during the Christmas season.  I have always loved it.
If you have never seen this movie you are missing out on one of the best movies ever made.  It is awesome.
This is a movie that you must own, You will never see a movie like this again so buy it now.
This movie is absolutely one of the finest movies ever made. Classic James Stewart. This is no finer movie made for Christmas. Thought provoking.
The It's A Wonderful Life Two-Disc Collector's Set is a great addition for your Christmas DVD Collection! I'm so glad I purchased it.
Gave this as a gift this past Christmas and it was a BIG hit, one of the greatest movie classics ever!!
I had been looking for this movie on DVD in color for some time.I like this movie better in color.
This movie is in the top 5 of all time. Everyone should see this movie. From 8 to 108 "It's a Wonderful Life" has meaning to all that see it.
This is on of the best X Mas Movies around and I love watching it each year  Does not get any better then James Stewart.
another great classic movie
Love this movie!  This is a classic that never gets old.  This is one of the first movies I always watch as Christmas approaches!
I purchased this dvd movie to replace a vhs copy. This is a great Christmas Classic that my family enjoys every December.
I needed to replace my copy and was so thankful to get this Christmas Classic. I have always loved it. Real family movie.
This is the best Christmas movie.  A story and message that needs to be learned over and over again.
Are you tired of missing this movie's air time on TV because of work or school? I was! That's why I bought it, now I can watch it whenever I want :)
This is a classic, not just for Christmas. Everyone should reflect on their lives as Jimmy Stewart's character does.
good deal i love the pirce and it works good to im verry happy whit it ok ill tell all my friends to ok
One of my favorite movies in one package. My family loves to watch this movies every Christmas. Love the easy access packaging.
Jimmy Stewart makes this a great seasonal event for me and my family. It tugs at my heart strings every year!
My son told me that that DVD was one of his best Christmas presents.  He just loves the story and the actors and actresses who perform it.
&quot;It's A Wonderful Life&quot; is simply the best movie that has ever been made. Nothing else needs to be said.
This is one Christmas classic I'm pleased to own. This was another one of my had to own films. This is a true Christmas classic.
This is a delightful family movie that our family has watched many times.  I would love to replace our old VHS tape with a DVD. Can you help!!
Veary cute movie. Its family friendly and a joy to watch. Great for any age. Its one of the best movies.
I bought this DVD for my wife who loves horses.  It was a good movie.
this movie shows the shows the love of man and animal between them. great move for the kids and horses lovers. heartwarming
Great movie.I wold highly recommend for anyone to view this DVD. It is very entertaining.Enjoy this DVD with friends.
ANYTHING WITH THIS GENIUS IS WORTH MORE THAN THE PRICE LET ALONE IN BLU RAY . I WISH THEY PUT OUT ALL HIS POPULAR MOVIES IN BLU RAY
Four of my best actors in a wonderful movie. A beautiful story, a nice romance, a big decision, life goes on.
but that seemed to be popular at the time! Acting was good, if a bit 'prepared' and the story line wasn't new!
This has always been one of my favorite comedies. It is clever and intelligent. The synergy among the five major cast members keeps the humor fresh.
I remember whiting this movie when I was young. I thought it was fantastic. It made me want to travel. Great Friday night movie!
I love old, romantic comedies, especially with Cary Grant. This movies is very good. You'll enjoy it. Watch it. Good.
You can't go wrong with a Cary Grant movie. This one is one of his greatest. It is a keeper for anyone collecting classic Cary Grant movies.
Cary Grant at his best. This just shows that the truly great ones stay at the top of their game at any stage of their career.
I grew up loving this movie! I just had to buy it. I love Cary Grant, and now I get to watch this as much as I want.
Goody Two Shoes and the Filthy Beast?  A great War Movie.  It looked like a snake.  A very fun movie
Excellent film. Excellent service. When I checked on this film before I could not find such a reasonably priced DVD.
This is another family classic movie for everyone in your family. It is very funny and quit enjoyable for all.
And he is messy, he is not neat and tidy and clean like Madine and six girls. But they are all stuck on the island togrther.
This is one of Cary Grant's best movies, in my opinion. He and Leslie Carron mesh very well together.  Definitely recommend it.  Great family film.
Yes, the image is "matted" / letterbox, but my DVD player fits it to my 16:9 TV screen, and the image is quite viewable. I'm quite happy with it.
love this movie its good clean comedy , would also recommend house boat . if you haven't seen this you should you want be disappointed
Probably one of the best ww2 comedys out there next to operation petticoat which also stared cary grant. Great story and a great cast.
Grant and Caron are magical in this date-friendly family-friendly movie. Some of the scenes are quite funny; altogether a charming movie.
I like this movie a lot. Again, it always entertains me to see a guy like Carey Grant with unruly children. Great movie!!!
I always enjoy Cary Grant and Leslie Caron.  To see them together is a real bonus.  Very enjoyable, funny and suspenseful.
Carey grant is at his finest. His interactions with the kids and Leslie Caron are classic. A great movie for all!!!
this is a funny war time movie.CARY GRANT is a plane spotter on a remote island when some castaways wash ashore.
great movie for adults and kids--- THE CAST WAS REALLY GREAT THERE WAS ALWAYS SOMETHING HAPPENING  THROUGHOUT THE FILM IT WASN'T DULL
A little different World War II story.  It's also a good comedy.  A different part (from her musicals) for Leslie Caron.  All in all I recommend it.
It doesn't get any better than this classic. Cary Grant at his finest and funniest. The entire cast is just perfect.
Another Cary Grant great which will have you laughing your heart out and wondering why movies are not like this today.
One great funny movie. Cary Grant was one great actor. This was one of his best movies that he has ever made.
I had this in VHS and ordered it to add to my dvd collection. A wonderfully funny family movie. end
This unique movie has so much going for it that I had to get a version in widescreen as soon as it was available
I am a big Cary Grant fan, that is to say his comedies. This movie is one his best and the DVD quality is very good.
I love the old movies! Cary Grant is hilarious as a grouchy, kid hating, drunk who must rescue a boatload of girls and their teacher during WWII.
just my kind of guy with his yacht, and attitude about ties. this is a classic must see movie. OK OK OK OK OK
I'm not sure of anyone I've ever known, or of any personality type who was not or would not be entertained by this movie.
One of my all time favorites. No sex or violence. Funny. Cary Grant is hilarious. It makes me feel good.
this is a very good family movie for all ages. don't want to miss it.cary grant is very comical in this movie
Loads of laughs with this movie.  You'll enjoy this movie for years to come. I just had to buy it and make it part of my classics collection.
This is one of my favorite Cary grant movies of all time.  It came in good quality and my wife who had never seen it before absolutely loves it.
Best all time movie CG ever made...always a favorite of mine, for rainy or snowy sats....with friends of course!!Love it
Funny, clean movie.  I was pleasantly surprised by Leslie Caron's acting--she's come a long way since An American in Paris.
Timeless classic...a must for anyone's movie collection. A near perfect role for Grant at that time in his career and it's a brilliant performance.
This is a wonderful old movie.  If you like Cary Grant you will love this movie.
Another great  movie from the world war era. Very funny and entertaining. Love this movie. We need more movies like this one.
A pink classic with Cary Grant and Tony Curtis, one that the whole family can watch.Still one of the good movies out there.
One of the better old comedies that Cary Grant is true blue even if his sub isn't.
Hubby wanted this dvd for his collection.  Hard to find in stores, easy to find on amazon.comOperation Petticoat
Carey Grant and Tony Curtis do an excellent job with this movie. I have loved it for years.Love the comedy.
This is a good, old time movie.  I love Cary Grant and Jack Lemon.  I have always liked this movie and it is so nice to be able to get it on a DVD.
DVD CAME AS PROMISED WITH NO SCRATCHES, AWESOME FILM, EVERYONE SHOULD HAVE COPY OF THIS COOL SHOW. GREAT FOR ALL AGES
This is a great movie to have a good laugh and just enjoy how the move plays out. Feeling down watch this movie.
This is one of my favorite movies, and this version of the movie is priced right. Highly recommended--Grant and Curtis create magic together.
I love anything WWII - add in the iconic Cary Grant, Tony Curtis and several beautiful Army Nurses all stuck on a submarine - it's a classic!
I love the film and wanted a copy on DVD. It is avery funny film that all the family can enjoy.
A great World War II comedy with excellent acting and a love story toss in too. I highly recommend it.
Wonderful Movie...I watch it all the time, it's funny well madeand just timeless...Tony Curtis plays his part so well...
Why these two didn't make more pictures together I'll never know.  One of the all time best war comedies.
One of my favorite movies of all time. Cary Grant and Tony Curtis were in their prime. A great family movie from the classics.
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  This was actually purchased for my daughter as I already owned it.
Very funny movie but not for little kids. A little above their heads and some what risqu&eacute;. God bless you
classic - must have watched it a 100 times on TV - now I can watch whenever I need a laugh - how could a &#34;pink&#34; submarine not be funny.
Such a heartfelt story of love and family.  It breaks your heart with tragedy, brings tears to your eyes, but in the end, there is a happy ending.
Touching family movie-real tear jerker about a couple that have kids. Really good acting!! Cary is excellent as the adoptive father.
such a good old movie- i love it- good all the time- good actors and just plain good........  buy it
My mom loves this one, I do too!  It's such a sweet film!  It's on cable every once in a while, but having my own copy is the best!
Cary was nominated for an Oscar for this role, he should have run.  In one scene, he brings you to tears.  Very good classic movie!
This is a film well worth watching and a real classic.  They don't make them like this anymore.
excellent tear jerker great movie
This was a well-done older movie, with a heart rendering story. Most movies these days are gibberish. This has substance.
We did not have this in our Doris Day collection.  We have most all of the movies she made.  Great family viewing.
It was a great movie but then again I am a big Doris Day fan and enjoy all her movies.I do recommend it to people who like comedies as well.
Two of the nicest people to be on film.  Great combination, cute story -- truly a chick flick, but fun.
This is a wonderful movie with Cary Grant and Doris Day, I remember when I was a teenager watching this and loving this movie.
Gary Grant is one of my favorites and I am in love with Doris Day. Great movie. I loved it.
These two are a great match for the movies.  You will love their chemistry.  The old movies are the best.  There is actual dialogue!!
Cute.  Very much a date movie and a chick flick but the guys will like it too .Worth the time.
a classic....handsome man, beautiful girl...love and marriage do not come easily....but they do come !  you will enjoy every minute of it
If you grew up in the 60's and LOVED Doris Day or Cary Grant movies - BUY THIS ONE!!!A sweet and funny story with a great supporting cast!
Entertaining, pleasant, feel good movie.  I love anything Cary Grant and this was an excellent romance movie.  I highly recommend this movie.  A+
He's been gone a long time.  Closest thing we have now is George Clooney. Cute, funny movie.  Cary Grant and Doris Day were a great team.
It's so nice to watch an old movie. In many ways, corny. But they are not offensive and the clothes are beautiful.
It was great to watch this movie again. It's funny, light hearted and very entertaining. Love Grant and Day together.
Great way to get U.S. news as well as foreign news.  Keep up with celebrity news as well.  I recommend to all.
I brought this for my hubby. He loved it so much he asked me to buy him 3 copies of this movie.
I was very happy with the excellant condition the dvd was in and I would use the company again and recommand them to friends and family.
I am so excited to find this movie!! I have been looking for this movie for years and am happy to finally own it.
One of the great lawyer flicks out there it's too bad they don't have this on Blue Ray or DVD I would definitely own a copy.
Great! Loved it. I always enjoy court room dramas and good actors. Need more of those. Was worth to pay extra.
VERY GOOD ACTORS ANDY GARCIA AND RICHARD DRYFUSS, DIFERNET CONCEPTS, INTERSTING I LIKE ALLITS A VERY GOOD MOVIE. TRY IT
good classic monster movie i cant get enough of these old 80s movies this one was pretty good..it should be checked out by everyone..
Jay The Stingray is wrong!This film is classic creature feature goodness.  Do yourself a favor a purchase this right now!
the first time i saw this i was amazed. this is an awesome rockumentary!
The best psychodrama ever!  Definetly made it into my movie collection. You will remember this movie for the rest of your life.
This is on of the best movis ever made, it is very hard to eplaine how good, YOU MUST SEE IT  and better OWN IT.
Coop at his best. A movie that can be seen over and over again. Great price for a sealed DVD.
Coop's a little old and Kelly's a little young, but what the hell. A great film you won't forget, ever. And that's saying a lot about a movie.
Gary Cooper and Grace Kelly and a Tense Drama. What's more to like? This is a just plain excellent movie!!!
Great film, excellent acting. Gary Cooper was awesome! John wayne had made some comments about the film, but my family throughly enjoyed it.
This is a wonderful classic that, no matter how often you see it, leaves you satisfied with the cast, story and conclusion.
My husband just loved the DVD.  This is one movie he'll watch with his Blackberry turned off.
Great Western.  Great plot, acting and photography.  Even though it is black and white, this actually adds to the excellence of the movie.
This Movie was a very good movie I saw this movie when I was a kid and always liked it.
Good streaming.  Good movie.  Man, this guy had a hard time and the towns' people...  someone kick them in the head!
A brilliant cast, headed by Gary Cooper and Grace Kelly, and Tex Ritter's theme song make this one of the greatest westerns of all time.
Cooper was always outstanding!  In this one, he is brilliant!  Not to be missed!
Wow, what can you say about High Noon that hasn't been said...except you won't be dissapointed with the DVD version.  Well worth it.
Very cool movie.
I have enjoyed this classic many times over the years.  I was glad to finally get it on DVD and find the quality good
What can I say, Jennifer and Gina are awesome in this movie and they really create a world for the two of them in the most dangerous situations.
I like it off from the start- its dark movie, not sure why I just had to watch it to the end, that's how good it is!
A naughty mixture of dark comedy, drama and suspense. You'll be anxious to see what comes next.  One ot Tilly's finest performances.
gina gershongina gershongina gershongina gershongina gershonthey made me write that many words! GG rocks and a 'lesbian' movie with a plot? AWESOME!
Love this movie!  Replacing my VHS copy.  Well done & different & reminds me of the film noir - my favorite kind of film.
Not for the kids in the family. Great. Diamond in the ruff. Love it. Would highly recommend.Chris Meloni is in it.
May be a low budget movie. And of course stereotypical. But such a good movie. Not too shabby for two straight actors. oh yeah. :)
they really did a great job in making this flick, very suspenseful, keeps you on edge, all the actors did a great job with their parts simply awesome
I loved this movie.  I gave it as a gift so I'll have to buy it again.
One of my favorite movies, kind of like a lesbian Goodfellas! Very entertaining! Check out netflix for more reviews, I guess.
Except for a few thin spots in the storyline, and a lot of unnecessary sparks, Highlander will always be a classic movie.
For an 80's flick, it has held up well.  Thoroughly enjoyed the extras and movie again.  Good enough to watch over and over again.
I received the movie on time.  It was a great movie.  The Blu-ray version is the only way to watch this movie.
This was a great way for me to watch one of my favorite shows over and over again.
I received this product in a timely manner and in the condition it was advertised as.  I would purchase from Amazon again.
love it.  love this series..happy to have all of them.  fun to watch and fun to have...love them great movie
And this is it until  they release another 'best' version. Look, if you know the movie, then you know its great, if you dont, get it watch it yay.
I love this movie. It is a classic that I was just had to get on DVD. I love the director's cut of this movie and the commentaries are amusing.
I love the Movie , so for me is great to have in my Library . Got it at A Great price in exact Condition as Described.
We love watching this movie at home.  It never gets old and my hubby can't wait to watch it over and over again.
I got my movie in at the promise date. there were no skips or scracths on my movie i am very happy with my purchase. thank youcharlotte
Great movie. I think it's the best one of the Highlander of them. Sean Connery is always great as well as Lambert.
Christopher Lambert and Sean Connery totally rock in this movie. I recommend not only this movie but all of the movies in the Highlander series.
old movie that we still love.  glad to purchase it and have it in my collection.  happy to purchase it here
Delightful movie. I am well pleased with this one a very interesting comparison between the &#34;super rich&#34; and their employees.
Dated, but still fun. Light, amusing script in a time capsule. Good early acting from Bob Cummings. Also a bit of a time capsule of New York City.
If your are a fan of Jean Arthur, you will enjoy this movie.  Great cast, fun story line - I love Jean Arthur in anything.
One of our all time favorites! Great casting and a great story line! Please see it if you can! Fun movie!
This movie was sad but good I love the romantic story how she always loved him and he took her love for granted .
a deeply emotional story, one of the finest examples of Joan Fontaine's great acting ability and she was excellently paired with Louis Jourdan
I love this movie and was not disappointed in the condition. It was brand new and I've watched it several times since I got it!
The story is truly soap opera but the sets and photography are so great they draw you in .The performances are flawless.
A lovely romantic story. I was delighted to find this movie on DVD format available now here at Amazon.A romantic movie to watch again and again.
Wow this came with the book of NOD! Great collection well worth the price!! I can't believe the deal I got on this
THIS SERIES IS A CLASSIC PERIODDDDDD. IF YOU LIKE VAMPIRES AND WEREWOLVES THIS IS IT BUT IT IS AN UNDERWORLD STYLE TELEVISION SERIES.
This is an awesome movie series. I really enjoyed watching this. The prince is a very hot looking character. :)
The original in the 1950s sci fi era, great movie and great concept! You will enjoy this even dated sci fi adventure!!
Thank's for keeping this movie safe from what time can do . The tape is in great shape , and you got it to . Than's . I will keep it safe. ART
Purchased as a gift and recipient was very pleased. Came promptly.
One of the best Sci Fi movies of all time.
One of the best sci-fi movies ever !!!!!! Still sends chills down my spine.  I think this was one of the movies that really got me hook on sci-fi.
This is the all time, great, original classic.  The remake is .......okat best.  Add this to your classic movie collection.Highly recommended.
What a great movie and one of the all time classics. I am happy I had the opportunity to add it to my collection.
I have always loved this movie. The re-make is not even close to this great classic. The acting is great and the story is just creepy enough.
the best ,to bad they cant make movies like this any more.just copy cat crap with political views and stinking white hating stuff
I upgradced from the blu ray which wasn't anamorphic. This is the best I've ever seen it. Great 50's sci-fi. I like this better than the re make.
We highly recommend this movie to all.  World war 2 movies and John Wayne as well.  One that will keep you watching
Nothing better to get the patriotic blood running. Wonderful movie. Ooh Rah
This is my favorite John Wayne movie and my daughter has just become a fan so I bought it for her for Christmas.
This was a rare John Wayne movie and a good deal on VHS.  It was brand new and played perfectly.
Two great reasons to have a film like this. I am happy I decided to buy it. Thank you all.
The Duke John Wayne as Sargent Striker is on a whole verry well done. Another must see for WW.2 fans wont disapoint.
I give this great movie a 5 star rating, it is a classic and I just love it not to mention it is John Wayne the Duke is the best.
A great HD version of  a great great movie. One of John Ford's best. Great all around cast in this film.
John Wayne  horses Indians  what more could you want . The man just moves me he is the best .
I bought it because I didn't remember it, but as I started the movie I remembered it and was glad I got it.
I cant figure out if this is the best John Wayne movie or not but it is definitely one of them.
I love western movies and especially John Wayne movies!!! This is one of my favorites and I love that this one is in color...
Great old time western that is good wholesome entertainment for the entire family. Just a great movie for those whoLove westerns.
This is one oh John Ford's trilogy.  It is probably John Wayne's finest movie.  A great portrayal of Cavalry life.
What more can be said for the greatest western hero star with this outstanding cast.Could watch it again and again.
John Wayne is the tough general and the tough father. Is a husband wants his son to grow up and his wife to quit babying his son!!
This John Wayne Western movie is great.I intend to make it a part of my DVD libraryincluding other Western classics.
If you like John Wayne you will like this movie. As always "The Duke" is big, bold and there is lots of action.
good movie i like john in all his calvery movies i got all of them.Ithink i do anyways Iwill look for some more.
How I love John Wayne movies and have so many of them.  He died all too soon and I will always have these movies rather VHS or DVDs.
This is a classic. There are many stars of by gone days. It is a great video for those who are Western fans.
Just what I expected. Great movie. Quick delivery
A john Wayne Flick, wish it had been in color, but the actors were excellent. Movies like this and all the rest of John Ford movies are the best.
Grew up watching John Wayne with my Dad.  Still enjoy watching almost all westerns of any type, even the B movies!
This is one movie where he and the entire cast just SHINED!!! It did need Ward Bond though. Still a great movie!
THIS MOVIE IS A CLASSIC!!!  I HIGHLY RECOMMEND it for ALL Duke lovers!!!  EVERYONE BUY IT, WATCH IT, LOVE IT!!!
A classic John Wayne movie.  I suggest this movie to be viewed by young and old together.  A must see classic.
Love John Wayne and Rio Grande is one of the best. Blu-ray just makes it that much better. Can leave out Maureen O'Hara. She is a great actress.
What's not to love about John Wayne.  His movies are always great.  This movie is one that I have seen over and over.  That why I bought my own copy.
John Wayne is at his best in this Genre. It brings back memories of going to the movie on Saturday morning.
This is just one of may John Wayne Westerns and this is a series done with John Ford in which I recommend them all.
If you are a fan of John Wayne and these timeless simple westerns then you will enjoy this film.  The streaming quality is top shelf!
I am a big John wayne fan and I could watch this moviee over and over again  he was the best in the business
Dean Martin and Rick Nelson singing together, Angie Dickinson at a young age, how could one not love this movie.  Great cast and of course the DUKE!
Good old fashion fun movie. Never gets old, never fails to entertain!! A definite winner!
Great movie of that era ..... I will watch the duke over and over as the great actor that he is ..... Thanks !!!
I happen to like John Wayne and Maureen O'hara so I have seen it several times and may see it again.
I have The Jazz Singer ON LASERDISC.. "sensational"'tis A Must See for The Jazz's FANS :p
I received the product in a reasonable time.  The quality of the product was terrific.  Have really enjoyed watching it.
Loved the movie. It is simple, well told and well acted. The soundtrack is totally out of the world. Great item on my collection.
Neil Diamond is BRILLIANT in this performance, and moreso with the musical score.  Excellent, excellent show, you'll want to watch again and again
I saw this movie the last time IN the theatre, with my mom and step father, made me feel young again and still enjoyed the movie.
When I first saw this movie, I had no idea that Neil Diamond was that good. I became a fan of his because of this movie. It was done very well.
it is Neil Dimond, so of course it is good.  Quality of the DVD is good, and the extras are very intertaining
A great movie that I had seen before - I wanted to have my own copy mostly because of the great sound from Neil Diamond
This DVD arrived in perfect condition and the movie is in perfect condition.The story is unlike any Streep's I've seen but enjoyable.
I think this is one of Meryl's best films. It evr gts old for me.
Buy it, view it, you won't regret it.  You'll watch it more than once and  maybe a few times more after that.
A great movie with Robert Duvall at his very best. Did not realize he could sing.
A fine story, well acted and I enjoyed it years ago, wanted to share it with a gal!She loved it
Robert Duval really transforms this fantastic character study into a pleasure not to be missed. All the performances are outstanding.
This is a great great movie.  Duvall and Tess Harper and the little boy do a fantastic job.  It arrived in great shape.  Thank you.
this movie was o.k. i guess.Robert Duvuall always plays a good part in any movie.I liked it.A good romance movie.
Robert Duval is a master actor.  The film has a timeless sense of flow and a well developed plot. Enjoy.
A genuine sleeper! Robert Duvall's performance is impeccable as Mac. A great supporting cast. A small classic. Genuine "Must See"
Mum loved the movie, it was gentle and quite, the quality of sound and picture was great.Very happy, shipping was great, thanks a lot.
I like robert duval and he did an exelent job with acting. I don't know if he was the one that sang the songs but if he did he did an excellent job.
Tender Mercies is without a doubt one of the greatest movies about country and western performers you will ever see.  Check it out.
Tess Harper gives a great performance as the cautious, but generous single mom who gives a down-on-his luck country singer a second chance.
Tender Mercies is a movie I have loved for years and when Crazy Heart came out it brought it back to mind and i just had to have it.
We really enjoyed the move wouldnt be surprised if we watch it again sometime. Had a nice story and music.
I love Gary Grant and these are perfect for rainy day sat's....or any rainy day to watch a good old movie
This is an exceptional product. I am very pleased with it and will be looking for some other titles as it pertains to John Wayne
2 John Wayne movies for the price of one. John Wayne does not disappoint in either of them Good movies well written script
Great movie and better in the colorized mode!.  I really enjoyed watching this movie and it is very entertaining.  Highly recommended.
THANK YOU, JACKET, IS FINE, TAPE PLAYED WELL. HOPE TO DO IT AGAIN, WITH FOLKS LIKE YOU..AM STILL LOOKING FOR OTHER FILMS
Beautiful remastered. This is One of our favorite actors, John Wayne, and the first movie for a very young Riy Rodgers.
John Wayne at his best as a Marshal trying to capture Quantrill's Raiders during the Civil War.  Also stars Roy Rogers and Walter Pidgeon.
come on do I need to say more who doe not like a John Wayne move and this is a good movie
I have not watched it so do not know if it was a good deal or not such a good deal.
Another favorite from my childhood.  I like this film in spite of the cheesy plot and crude special effects.  It is now in my John Wayne collection.
Rating it a 5 Was Easy ...... We Need More Hero Type Actors Like The Duke ..... Few Actors Have Ever Matched HIs Acting Ability...
You have to be a John Wayne enthusiac to really enjoy the film. It is a classic John Wayne and should be enjoyed by all.
I bought it as a gift. They loved it very much and was happy to get it. It is a must have for any movie collection.
John Wayne is my favorite.  You need to purchase this movie.  Great item to put in your inventory of movies.
Not a lot to say, except it's the Duke at his best. One of his best early movies and real gem! Watch it Pilgim!
John Wayne is one of my favorites i've seen this movie several times and enjoyed it even more in BLU-ray
John Wayne is my favorite Actor, I get every movie of his I find that I don't already have.  I give copies as gifts, and they are appreciated.
Hope to Find More Like It .... John Wayne is Classic.... Keep them Coming .... No Actor Has Come up To John Wayne in My Time ...
I got this for a friend who loves godzilla this movie is a real orginal with its story and the monster Biollante never turn your back on a rose
Any Godzilla movie that I have is excellent, in my books. The services was great, keepit up. This is s swell movie to have in your collection.
Love Godzilla movies. Have them all and glad to have this one too now that is fiinally released on dvd.
Huge fan of godzilla movies i want to get them all on blue ray, so i was pretty happy this one came out on blue ray
I'm trying to collect all the Godzilla movies. I had seen bits and pieces of this one. Cool to finally see it all the way thought.
If you are looking for Godzilla this is a great one to get.  Biolante is a great monster to battle Godzilla
I have waited a long time to see this film released in its English dubbed format.  I would highly recommend this movie to any Godzilla fan!
Nice blue ray edition for my collection and if your a big Godzilla fan like myself you will enjoy this movie..
would recommend this to any fan or collector of the godzilla series, very awesome to have on dvd, i give it a 5 out of 5
What is there to say about? Its the Big Gman in one of his better movies. Top notch release with an amazing price. Get it while you can.
I'm a fan of old monster/scifi/horror movies, it arrive timely and in great condition, looking forward to buying more movies.
if your a godzilla fan you have to get this one. its a good movie. a must see movie for godzilla fans
This is one of my 5 year old's favorite. It's a great movie, especially if you collect Godzilla movies. A must have for the collection.
Looks like the Big Guy has had had some work done.But all in all he's still the same Godzilla that had me haiding under the table as a child.
I enjoy THAT TYPE OF films!  SO I REALY CANT Say what I liked, other than it was a good film1
Pass the popcorn around as you watch this movie. It is a sweet movie about finding love late in life and learning to live again.
Wonderful performances by all and a beautifully told story.  Smart, funny, sad, uplifting--I loved it!
Its been a while since I've seen this, but it is super! Well done, and not full of punk stuff that you see today!:))
this set is over 24 hours long it does such a great job at explaining the reason why that war happened and how the world would go to war.
I am hoping this replaces my VHS collection, I'm still going through BBC history of WWII. But if its the same thing, then its great.
Laurence Olivier is by far the best narrator for this kind of documentary. The cinematography update is pretty good for 1974.
Saw this series on TV many years ago and it kept all our attention throughout.  Probably one of the best documentaries on WW2.
One of the greatest if not greatest series on World War 2. Well worth the upgrade even if you already own it on DVD.
I am a WW II history buff. I just had to add this one to my collection. Plenty of good film footage.
This is where you start a lifetime collection, add to it - or top it off.
Just as advertised and totally satisfied and also the shipping was so much more rapid than I had expected and do appreciate that.
Truly the defining film series of World War II. I remember many years ago watching the segments on Sunday night. A classic
full of suspense and action about a killer boards a jet and goes wild on a killing spree.  i loved this movie.
This is a great very suspenseful movie, it will keep on the edge of your seat, I highly recommend it!
Wow! An adventure movie where Lauren Holly plays a pilot who land the plane after the flight crew are killed. An excellent holiday movie.
Yes, another review for a Ray Liotta movie! LoL !  It has action , Kind of like Con Air but not as much !
Great actors in this movie thats based on a true story. Well done filming on location and not boring to watch.
Please put this great movie classic on DVD so that humble people such as myself can afford it.Thanks!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
GREAT FAMILY MOVIE ABOUT A FRIENDSHIP OF A DOLPHN AND A DOG. IF YOU DON;T KNOW IF YOU'LL LIKE IT, WATCH THE DOG AND DOLPHIN FRIENDSHIP ON YOUTUBE
Watching children and they love animals so thought would add to my movie collection like some of the other movies I bought
A family friendly movie with a great story and keeps your attention.  Excellent job to actors and directors. The human actors did a great job also...
Sweet and beautiful,I love animals, and this is a movie every one should watch.Kids and adults at the same time will love it.
I really enjoyed watching this movie , and plan to watch it again soon! Anyone who likes movies , willlike it too.
Years later, this movie still terrifies me. If you want to watch a good horror film, This is definitely the one.
Suburb movie. But nof has goood has the book.Very supense filed. Foumd myself got up into if as though I was one of tje caractors.
What an interesting story about how the implant was developed and the unfortunate out comes for many who expected more.
The Pentagon Wars was very interesting. Well done. But I don't think some people would appreciate the humor...it makes some people look like idiots.
I really like this movie, I really like this movie, I really like this movie, I really like this movie ,I really like this movie
Saw it before on HBO and decided to own it.  Decently accurate on what happend to the Bradley fighting vehicle.
good movie to see, especially if you know anything about the DoD. somewhat realistic unfortunately but still very funny. buy it!
I just love this dvd!! I have watched it several times.I have also tried to find others like it. It is addictive!!
I have had this DVD for years and I go back to it every so often. Still love it and still enjoy the ingenuity involved in creating this piece.
Who thought you could make music out of garbage cans?? it was well worth buying.
the movie was shipped very fast and when I got it it was like new.  I will order movies from this person
I've been in awe of &#34;STOMP&#34; since I knew of their existence and my son LOVES watching this with us! Would that I could see them perform Live!
We saw the stage production years ago and appreciated the talent then. The DVD is as good and more. No one leaves the room when this is playing.
This is a very good movie that Iwanted to add to my collection. It arrived ina timely manner and as described.  No problems and nocomplaints.
This is a Classic!  Every movie lover's library should own this one.  I loved it.  Many lessons to be learned from watching this movie.  A must see!
THEY SO NEED TO MAKE AONTHER  MOVIE LIKE A PART 2 OF THIS THIS IS SUCH A GREAT MOVIEI NVR GET EOUNGH OF WATCHING THS MOVIE
Beautiful story about the loves of the lives of minority's and the struggles of the 60's with racism and poverty.
As I have said in many of my reviews Deniro is just the best. He is a classic actor who puts you in the movie with himBuy it you will love it
This was a gift for my mother so I cannot rate the quality of the DVD, however shipment was fast and very easy.
This movie is different with Robert De Niro being the good guy in the movie. This movie you see it through a child eyes.
Excellent movie showing how children can be influenced by their peers in a bad way, and how parents are right.
Kid growing up near the influence of the mob gets lured in. Sometimes its a good thing... sometimes not!
EXCELLENT MOVIE LIKE NEW QUALITY LIKE NEW CONDITION SUPERB ACTING AND STORY AND DIRECTING BY BOBBY HIMSELF! AN ALL TIME CLASSIC
He watches it all of the time and was thrilled that I got it for him.  Great addition to his movie collection.
This was a gift based on my love of the film. It's a great movie that would be enjoyed by all.
A great mob movie.De Niro is once again at his best. A very well written story and produce well also.The acting is good
Excellent movie and a good message about life itself, Highly recommended to all. who needs lessons in life  5 stars*****
But you should care about this classic.  This movie passes all the tests.  Except the Mario test.
A Bronx Tale is the best, Robert De Niro is the BEST, I have, and will watch this movie many times over.
Excellent video and sound quality ---outstanding story, great acting, transitions were on target,Clearly one of my TOP TEN DVDs.
Great story and great movie.  Two great actors acting in roles they were meant for.  Highly recommend it for mafia movie fans.
fast delivery, clean dvd, one of the best movies, a great family friendly movie that makes you want to move in with the indians.
Love love love this movie.  Please buy it an enjoy.  If you are interested in American Indians, then please buy this.
BOY would I have loved to have this happen to me- such a great story and so well done- I've gotten it for gifts and so jhappy it was on DVD now...
This is one of my husband's favorite movies.  It took me a long time to find it and he was ecstatic to receive it.  Was a great buy.
Works great and received quickly.  Great movie about keeping the ways of the old west and appreciating Native American history
What a beautiful love story of two people who grew to love an obscure native American people and each other.
had the vhs but wanted the dvd this worked perfectly and is exactly what i needed to update my collection.
A very good movie.  Saw it first on AMC.  Purchase was challenging as it was bought out of print.  The copy I received was in excellent condition.
Gia is one of profounding films our time.  Angelina Jolie brought her to life again with the beauty and pain of fashion industry.
Although a very sad story, this was a really intense, and interesting movie.  Angelina lives up to her best performances, as usual.
Angelia Jolie did such a good job in this movie.Wasn't sure it was going to be a good movie but I am so glad I ordered it. it really was done well
I loved this movie!  The format is wonderful, the acting is superb, and the story is both haunting and beautiful.
This is a great movie that put Angelina on the map. I think it's great. I received it quickly and in great shape.
The depth of talent in Angelina Jolie, is exhibited more in this movie, than any other I've seen her in...She is a great actress.
I was very pleased with my purchase.  The picture was so clear.  Also, it was sent in a timely manner as well.  I will recommend it to others.M
BUY THE BLU-RAY and you will have the best version of this movie forget the dvd versions just get the BLU-RAY!
Angelina did an outstanding job in this movie.  true life story very vivid not for kids under 15 but a really good Angelina flick
I watched this movie years ago on cable, I am glad to have founded it. Great move.
This is a earlier movie from Angela Jolie and one of my favorites. Its a great true story that is tragic.
Jolie looks spectacular and her acting terrific.  It's an excellent bio of Gia and everyone was good in it.  I recommend it.
Because it's a good movie and good action. Thank you very much. Have a nice week and weekend.  More word? I have enough giving you my answer. Vicki
Pretty Good Movie...  Great Price....
This series tells it all...totally captivating especially the minute attention to detail!  It is great to see the Gemini missions highlighted.
Transfer was Excellent. Sound excellent.  Content Excellent.  If you liked the Right Stuff, I recomend this DVD.
This is a wonderful set, makes a wonderful gift for any history buff or space fan.  It seems historically accurate.
Great video.  Interesting and education.  Our nine year-old daughter got a lot out of it as well.  And it's a terrific price on Amazon Prime.
SCARED THE HECK OUT OF MY ADULT KIDS SO IT WAS MONEY WELL SPENT THEY LOVE THE SPAWN STUFF SO HOW CAN U GO WRONG
This was a gift I purchased for my daughter and it was the best price around not to mention with my prime account free shipping!
This is a excellent movie for the family to watch. my wife has added it to her native american collection.
John Cusack plays a great part as a wronged cattleman who seeks justice but gets over the line.  You root for him all the way.
Have seen before but wanted a copy o this movie as it is very moving and shows a man staning for justice and his rights,  Great movie
John Cusack was great. My favorite western by far. That was incredible. I watch this all the time. Loved it. Burn 'em!
But in this film you can see the love for his animals in this film very sad at the end and unjust!!!!!!!!
if you like this type movie  you  will certainly be in for a great story.I truely enjoyed this movie. Will watch again. Thanks. Thelma
I have Heaven Help us on LASERDISC,'tis one of my Favorite 80s movies,I need it on dvd too :P
This movie is one of my husband's favorites...we are both Catholic school raised, so if you went to Catholic school, you will probably enjoy it.
I'm not Catholic but this is one of the funniest &#34;coming-of-age&#34; movies I've ever seen.  Kevin Dillon is an absolute hoot!
This is a story of love, and devotion within the church. It is chocked full of wounder, and suspence. I would recommend  to anybody
This comedy is so good,tha it came out in the eighties when I first saw it,and Ijust had to have it.
I have MY LEFT FOOT ON LASERDISC And I am gonna get the Special Edition DVD too..you too don't mess it,you'll love this one  :P
I wasn't sure at first, but found it to be a very good movie. It's always good to see how people with less than normal  situations do through life.
Daniel Day Lewis is a Master! He shows his skills as a Academy Award Winning Actor. A must see for sure
Daniel Day-Lewis at his very best. It is an amazing story, made all the better by outstanding acting that is hard to beat.
Finally got to see this outstanding movie. It definitely lived up to it's reputation. DD Lewis was immpeccable! What a movie!
Very inspiring. Loved that this was true and it wasn't sugar coated. A very realistic portrayal of the life of a handicapped artist. Moving
JCVD is at one of his best in this amazing performance.  It is truly a classic and a must have for martial art fans!!
This movie kicked ass, with karate fighting.He fights Tong Po and kicks his ass.This is the best Van Damne movie ever.
This has to be the best Van Damne movie with Bloodsport and Hard Target, get this movie its Van Damne's best, 4.8/5
As kids we used to watch this movie over and over trying to replicate Jean-Claude's moves.  Good to know that I still enjoy it.
van damme is a great action star.  great movie.  one of his original films that started his rise to stardom.
The movie has a good picture and van damme is ripped and at his best. Big fan. I have been a fan of him since I was about 7 or so.
Is one of Jean Claude Van Damme Great Movie's , and is A great Movie of the time period that it came out . Definitely got what I paid for.
i always have to leave long reviews so here it is liked thwe movie it was pretty cool thank you very much
Absolutely love Rutger Haier in this movie he's the bad guy but you feel like you sort of root for him. Excellent movie better than the new version.
I think this is a very good movie it really had me on the edge of my seat I enjoyed every moment of it I would recommend this movie to anybody
That's the warning we get from this very scary movie.  Rutger Hauer is the hitchhiker that just won't quit.  Don't see this one at night...or alone!
The story line and acting in this movie are awesome. I would highly  recommend this movie to anyone.
The DVD is awesome. I had been looking for it on DVD for quite sometime. The movie cast is awesome.
The work of the director is five stars, but the  way Hauer plays is simply for an anthology of the cold face movies. A very meticulosly done movie.
This is a very good movie. Sissy plays an awesome part of Lorretta Lynn. I just love this movie.
Love, Jessica Lange, and she does a great job, portraying &#34;Patsy Cline&#34;, thoroughly enjoyed this!!!. So, glad I decided to get this DVD.
Loved Patsy Cline's music when I was young. Now i got to see even more of what her life was really like. Just just what Mom said.
This is a great movie Jessica played Patsty better then anyone in the world could. Thiis is a movie that you would always enjoy
I am a huge fan of Patsy Cline.  This is a great movie which I wanted for my collection.
Great movie and heart warming shows that no matter how rich and famous we all have problems and we can leave this world at anytime
If you are a Patsey Cline fan you will love this film. Fantastic stars, Ed Harris and Jessica Lange. A must see!
It ia a very good movie and it is true story as it goes.I am very glad I got this one..A keeper.
I was looking for this DVD for a friend & she loved it... Very pleased with this purchase...Amazon is the first place I always check for movies...
one of the best shows every very sad and family friendly at some points lol thanks again will order again
great bio movie i know it is little older but interesting life story well told
A classic silly movie; kids love it and after a few viewings adults start listening and enjoying it, too. A gem.
Steve Martin pokes fun of Hollywood in more ways than one on this one... buy it, see it , love it and watch it again
This is just a classic, funny movie with 3 comedy greats. Great movie for a rainy day or if you just want to laugh your rear off.
Great comedians and a great hilarious film. This is still a funny film. A must buy for some great laughs.
This is absolutely one of my favorite movies ever made. I watched it again today and was laughing all the way through.
Just as funny as the first time I watched as a kid!  No damage or scratches, could not be happier!
A very well written story line and great acting.An enjoyable satire bringing humor and action into a new dimension.  Bravo.
Doesn't matter how many times I see this movie it cracks me up. 3 of the best comedians ever. .
I have no idea how this was considered a kid's movie. And I has some weird gay-baiting going on. But it's pretty damn entertaining.
Love this movie. Even my 4 year old watches this with me...it's that good. The movie just makes you feel good and has great acting.
I picked up the classic, hilarious movie to add to my DVD collection.It was a great price and arrived on time.
Great classic comedy you will laugh and laugh each joke is still good and I cant get bored no matter how many times I see it.
Bought for B-day gift for my husband I am sure he is going to love it
This movie came out when I was a kid, and it's still GREAT to this day! I had to have it on blue ray to enjoy and share with friends and family.
Excellent transfer. The picture looks great and com'on, it's Steve Martin, Chevy Chase and Martin Short in their heyday - so good.
Three Amigos is a Great movie! These threeActors make a Super great team.Its an oldie but a goodie!!!!!!!!
THREE AMIGOS is sooo good, you may never need to see another movie!
they say they are the three amigos and the do so good at the act.but they are not the tree amigos they are just acting for some money
This movie is soooooooo funny in so many ways.It's just as funny today as the first time I watched it about 20 years ago.
Another funny film from the days of original comedies were born. Well worth the price for this movie. Wish there was more special features though.
my husband got me to watch it and now I love it. martin short and steve martin are a wonderful treat
The best singers, actors, in a comedy. Good show for kids. My granddaughter watches it all the time because of the hillarious storyline.
Ali different stages of his career a Ali fan you deserve it like I did God  Bless Ali what a slick boxer a legendary boxer !!!
Muhammad Ali was the greatest. I liked it when he said, &#8220;Float like a butterfly, sting like a bee: AAAAAh.&#8221;
Cher and her backup dancers and singers really put on a great concert... Saw this on tv a long time ago and wanted to add it to my DVD collection..
I saw Cher live in concert in our home town and enjoyed it very much, and this DVD is very close to that concert.
Theirs only one Cher.  I love all her costumes.  She puts on one heck of a show.  but i dont think its her best.
I love CHER, so I love this concert show from Las Vegas. Favorite video on this DVD is her song "TAKE ME HOME"
Cute collection of stories for bedtime. Two of my personal favorites in there. Short and sweet.
Bought this to go with my son's good night story and he loves it.  I like that this is a classic too because it never gets old.
A favorite children's book.  I have decided to buy this for my grandchildren.  It is very sweet, the narrator has a beautiful voice.
Halle Barry is just wonderful as Dorothy Danbridge in this movie. She brought the movie to life as she played the role of the singing actress.
Halle Berry was so convincing as Dorothy. She really looks like her. Halle was the perfect person to play her.
This movie was so interesting it was interesting and sad to watch her struggles to get to the top in those days
is genial. and strong. demi moore is the best in this film.and the best history too.cher is good.
I enjoyed the movie as it portrayed the times of each mothers heartache choosing the path to take that was best for her child
It is interesting to look the story of this great president.It is also interesting to see actor Gary Sinise aging with the story.
Almost like being there. I have been to the Truman Library and this complements history.
was a gift. They loved it . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
one of the best haunted house movies of all time! a blue-print on how to do so much with so little. "THE CHANGELING" is a true classic!
Saw this movie on TV in the last millennium and it is just as good today.  It has retained its spookiness and the acting is great.
This movie is not necessarily scary but a psychological buildup of atmosphere that makes you wonder what is going bump in the night.
my neice loved it she gives it 5 stars she loves scary movies the scary they are the better they are.
Well First it has George C Scott. But much better than the remake (as usual the original usually is) And it is a must see movie.
This is a great horror film that you won't soon forget about.  The acting is great and the climax of the film is amazing.  A must see!
This is a must see.  I had forgotten how scary it was.  Great ghost story.
i really like watching scary movies. And i really liked watching this movie.I recommend people get it and watch it
I love this film.  It's moody and dark and it's got George C Scott!!!  It's a great ghost story that really is worth watching!  Enjoy!
Compared to today's ghost/horror films; this one is classic without crazy special effects. This is pure grab-my-hubby/blankie scary movie. Love it!
This is a very good spooky story!  The story kept our interest until the ending.  I was very satisfied with this purchase.
this was a gift to my sister who had no luck in search for it.  she was surprised and loves this dvd
Excellent film and in excellent condition. one of the best film I have purchase so far. one for my collection. one of the best film I have ever seen.
This is the most realistic &amp; best done serial killer movie evermade it's a shame it didn't get the recognition it deserved.Simply superb-get it !
I've enjoyed this movie from the first time I ever saw it. It arrived very quickly and was in perfect shape. Glad to add it to my collection
Had never heard of this movie before, but thought the acting and dramatization of this story was very well done.
What makes this movie more compelling is that it is based on a true story. Well worth the time and money.
I love this movie thank you.. I got it on time. will the ordering again. I love itlove it
You will love this movie so what are you waiting for. You need to get this movie it will change your life!!!!!
TV movie based on real events in Russia in the 1980's.  Surprisingly, a superb cast with no passengers.  Have watched this one many times.
Many important messages come through in this taught thriller. Great acting and sadly a true story.  Hats off to Mr. Rea and Mr. Whittaker.
This movie is quite good. It is really close to the truth. Done quite well.
Everychapter is awesome but the case with the dvd is very cheapest..anyway  I love this ..
Carrie and the girls are so awesome, they really give women something to be, and that is to not be ashamed!
Brilliant writing, brilliant acting, have watched all three tapes about thirty times and still find new laughs. Buy this set.
I've always loved the series so purchasing the movie was bound to be my next choice. I will be purchasing all the series soon, season by season.
you will enjoy the topics discussed in these serials ,in comic and sexy way. i recommend it for every one.
This is the best of the thre series. It has great footage and insightful perspective on the early game. A must have!
She's the perfect mother and he's the perfect son to embarrass.  The combination of action/adventure and comedy make this one of the greats.
We saw this years ago and loved it so thought it would make a good birthday gift for my husband.
This is a very funny comedy.  Stallone and Getty are a great team and really play well off each other.
Very funny.. People should rent this they will get a kick out of it. They really act well together. good movie
I love any movie with Sylvester Stallone and this one was no exception.  It was funny and entertaining and I loved it!  Highly recommend.
I've Private School For Girls on LASER DISC!! And I'd like to own The dvd too,I hope Soon :).
A classic along with Animal House, etc. Should be released on DVD. It was on satellite tv tonight.
This movie came in wonderful timing.  The packaging kept it safe, and like new.
finally one of the best comedies made it to dvd. the music is great. the girls are great. and the comedy is great. that's all i have to say GOOD-BYE.
i saw this on tv one day and decided to order it to own and it is definitely one of the funniest 80's comedies i have seen next to porky's
Great movie I think it was very funny and out standing for me n my friends other classic or more sex
I love love  stories. I just really enjoyed  the movie. good story line. will watch it again. just like watching movies. thsnk-you.
Tom Cruise and Nichole Kidman play star crossed never to be lovers. The story is very well written. The sets are great.
I had seen this movie some time ago and wanted to see again.  Very good movie.  Recommend to all for purchasing!
The male lead gets the female lead in the end using up his spare life before winning the land that they sought from far and away
Far and away is a great film.Only a trailer/but I still would rather have a disc.The A/V presentation is also excellent.!!!!!!!
Yet another Movie well worth the watch...I've only seen it 5 times at last count, I highly recommend this move.  Kidman and Cruise, what a pair.
Excellent acting and story , and photography. Kept you on the edge of your seat, and you relished in the happy ending.
One of my favorite popcorn movies!  Wonderful script, cinematography, and acting.  This movie continues to hold its magic.  Highly recommended!!
This was a replacement from VHS and one of our families favorites. I love the historic story line and love watching it.
MOVIE WAS AWESOME!  ACTING WAS SUPURB, AND A REAL CHALLENGE FOR PACINO!  TOTALY ENJOYED IT!I WOULD REALLY ENJOY MOVIES OF THIS CALIBER ANYTIME.
Really good movie, but very bias opinion. my mother had me watch it lol but classic heart warming type movie
Al Pacino is perfect in this role. A good, realistic movie with a solid message.
a feel good movie for viewers of all agesi purchased this as a gift for my aunt who just loves the young  chris o'donnell
This has to be one of the best movies out.  Great acting in an age where most so called actors suck, Al pacino keeps on delivering the real thing
Al Pacino, simply THANK YOU for the fine performance, if you have not seen this movie you are missing one of the greatest pictures you will ever see.
Quite possibly the best work of Al Pacino ever. A Must see / Must own movie. Truly fantastic, will keep you on your toes and maybe even cry a bit.
i loved this movie.  It is a movie that you can watch every couple of months and still be moved by it!
I have always loved and enjoyed this beautiful movie.  It's entertaining, delightful, some parts was frightening, educational, and romantic.  Hurrah!
Makes you think as well as cry!! You may lose your will to live for whatever reason that may be but there is always hope! Especially a hope in God!
ANYONE THAT LIKES AL PACINO, WILL LOVE THIS . IT IS  GREAT. WONDERFUL PERFORMANCE.
Excellent movie! By far my favorite all-time film. It teaches a lot about life! I highly recommend it for young adults.
Great movie. Great features and additional material. The tango dancing scene is the best!!! it is a must in a DVD collection
one of al pacino best movie ever cant do any better then this movie. ok thanks for listens ok bye
great movie. enjoyed pacino role as a blind person. love the tango scene and the last where he speaks up at the school assembly for the young man.
Put together a fun basket of things from 1992 for a birthday present!  This was one of the most popular movies that year.  Perfect!
Maybe Pacino's best ...He did a great job, especially the defence of Charlie...and the Tango ...All great work.  He's a firstrate performer.
I actually bought it for my son as one of his Christmas presents.  It is a fabulous movie and Robert Downey Jnr is unreal.
A great movie with great talent. Robert Downey Jr is amazing as always.  Funny, sad all in one great soundtrack.
Heart and Souls.If you like light hearted entertainment then I highly recommend this DVD, the acting was superb, very clever.
I just love Elizabeth Shue so this movie was an absolute must. But overall, this is a great movie to watch with the family.
I had seen this movie and enjoyed the plot and storyline so much that I had to have it for my collection.
Romantic movie!  Sometimes we need some help to find that special someone who has been right in front of our faces all along.
Missed this when it came out. Just watched it on hulu. I enjoyed it. Robert Downey Jr really is a good actor.
The guardian angels are really well played by great actors.  Well written simple story of destiny and romance.  Easy to watch feel good movie.
SUCH A LOVELY 'FEEL GOOD' MOVIE WITH A MORAL TO THE STORY PLUS COMEDY. LOVE IT.PEARL FROM AUSTRALIA
This movie made me shed a tear a few times but overall funny and charming.  Consider a good investment to have on hand.
If you have never seen this movie I *HIGHLY* recommend that you do as thismovie has obtained Cult Statis.  It is a GREAT movie!!
Love this movie.  Very heartwarming and enjoyed every minute of it.  Robert Downey is really a great and wonderful actor.  I love this guy.
I laughed and even had a tear or two BUT the tears were happy ones and will not say more to give the plot away
Just a good well rounded film - it has a little bit of everything and nice little sentimental twists - worth the watch.
If you are not aware of what it is like to be a cowboy/cowgirl you may not be that into this movie. But the normal people will love this movie.
worth watching it over and over. laughing with the characters. love woody and keifer. maybe they will do another together?
Very happy with the price and quality of this hard to find DVD . My wife loves the movie and probably will watch it several more times !
I love this movie.  Woody Harrelson is hilarious and Kiefer Sutherland played a good guy in this one.  It was both funny and a neat story.
i gave it a 10 its a good move and  wan i go it it was in good shape i am very happy
I ordered this movie for my dad.  He absolutely loves this movie.  it is well worth it to hear him laugh!
This movie is Very Funny! I have this on vhs and I'm glad that I have this movie on DVD because it shows up a lot clear then on video.
This movie is a classic in our house!!  I bought this for my daughter for her birthday.  We all enjoy watching this movie!  Too funny!
You cannot go wrong with this movie. It is clean, funny and a good ole' boy movie. I recommend it to everyone who likes cowboys and comedies.
this movie was funny and also entertaining.I love the seen were woody harrelson did the dance. I thought that is partner also did a ex lent job.
Came as expected, easily opened. My kids n I love this movie it's great to have it on dvd ..
I really enjoy this movie.  I got it at great price and very fast.  It's pretty funny with a wild story and lots of stars that became very big.
Very good movie.
Superbly done film about a painful period in Jewish history. Incredibly well done, excellent acting. A must see film. Highly recommend.
This is a long movie but I never seem to get bored watching it.  I can watch it over and over.  This is one of my favorite movies.
Again another outstanding movie...so glad I have this movie in my collection ....and glad I got it!  U SO ROCK!
It was nice to watch the movie after 20 years, it's almost like you are watching it for the first time, you forget so many things.
One of the best movies ever made in my opion.  Worth buying and so glad it FINALLY came to Blu Ray
When watching this movie it doesn't seem like it's almost a 3 hour long movie. What you get completely immersed in it.
I think this was Spielberg's best movie ever, but personal opinion.  Comes with VUDU and Digital Copy for those using Smart TV's. I really like it.
received the dvd in perfect condition, thank you. what a moving , movie, wow. every one should have this movie, they would learn a lot.
Flawless movie and remade in High Def - The Best and is priced right.  Five stars for quality and for integrity.  Thanks Stephen !!!
True account of Nazi Germany and one of the good commanders during World War 2.
What a great movie! Steven Spielberg definitely deserved an Oscar for this one. Casting was great and story that will preserve.
Great movie, looks amazing on blu ray!
This is the most grim film I have ever seen. It is so grim because it really happened; it shows what mankind is capable of. We must never forget.
I have always loved Liam Neesan in everything he is in and this is one of his best performances.  Great movie and I will treasure it.
I was so moved by this movie. I have seen it 6 times &amp; yet to tire of it. Perfection!!!
I saw the movie before and it is an excellent movie.  What I do not remember seeing was that it was in black & white.
This is an obvious classic and is the first film i have seen several of these actors in.  Should be required viewing in high schools in my opinion.
It is truly a great movie, how this man risked his life to save many Jews. There many today still living that owe their life to him.
Should be required viewing for every  holocaust doubter.  Hard to watch, but excellent.  Liam Neeson PERFECT as wasthe Nazi camp commandant.
It was as described,it arrived in good time,Exellent quality Blu-ray,the pricing was very good,and it is one of my favorite movies.
Truly one of the best films ever made. Historically significant, everyone should see this movie regardless of how old they are or their nationality.
I had this movie on VHS. So glad I got it on DVD.  Movie just shows the humanitarian in Liam Neeson how he really wanted to help these people.
This is the best movie about this terrible part of human history.  I recommend this movie to everyone.  It is for sure a movie one does not forget.
Absolutely amazing move that should be seen by everyone to see that there is hope in the midst of tragedy.
I am still overwhelmed by the depth of this movie.  One of the best films I have ever seen.  Awesome.
TO MARK THE 20TH ANNIVERSARY OF THIS WONDERFUL FILM. IT HAS SO MANY SPECIAL & WONDERFUL FEATURES THAT ANY FAN WILL LOVE.
A great epic movie of the holocust  Action and drama all throughout.  Makes you wonder how people ever existed in that time
Nothing more to say Oscar winner, well made and acted. Directing and script were perfect could watch a hundred times and transfer was flawless......
Wow.. What an epic film, made with such love. Liam Neeson portrays Oscar Schindler so believably. A must have for every collection.
People experienced similar treatment, in some places, it still happens. This movie is a great eye-opener to the motivation of genocide.
Absolutely unforgettable in every sense....Liam Neeson pulls on your heart strings.
Have wanted to see this movie for years. Had heard alot about it pros and cons. Gotta say it was a great movie.
I love this movie, the dvd case isn't cheap and the dvd was fine, not scratched and it was a great price.
the box and the disks were in perfect condition when i received it! such a wonderful movie that everyone should watch
THIS IS A WONDERFUL MOVIE. VERY, VERY SAD  BUT IT'S TOLD AS CLOSE TO WHAT ACTUALLY HAPPENED THAT I CRY EVERY TIME I WATCH IT. AAA+++FILM
Arguably one of the most important films ever made on the holocaust. Not to be missed. Visually bold and stunning, this is a beautiful film.
Great movie with great quality. I would buy a similar product again. If you are a fan of this movie do not look any further.
OMG... the movie that is a sin to love..
This movie was well directed and well cast. Liam Neeson and Ralph Fiennes are superb. Although the content was tragic the outcome brought hope.
This is another excellent film.The A/V presentation is equally as good as the film.Thanks to Mr Steven Speilbergh
A great part for Liam Neeson and a sober and reflective look at the horrors of War and the benevolence of one individual.
This movie tells a great positive story in a very bad time in history when Hitler was in power.Loved it !
This picture is all it is rated to be! It shows a very realistic view of what did actually happen at that time in history.
my wife and i watch this once a year to appreciate the great democracy we live in and are thankful for
I can only say you have to watch Liam pull off this performance as a slightly off key business man you think is bad but is really a great man.
this is a phenomenal film.everyone should own it.
It was so well done I couldn't watch all of it.  Very graphic and to the point.  Again.... just too good.
This movie seems more like a documentary than a movie, because it tells the story of Mr. Schindler, a German with a heart, and a war profiteer.
This movie shows you that there are heroes in and out of uniform. It took great courage to do what was done in this movie.
Had not seen this movie in a long time, but still a very emotional watch and would recommend a second viewing.
Great movie about a horrible period in human history! Blu-ray makes it a collector's edition. Highly recommend the Limited Edition!
This movie really touches your soul. One of the finest films I have ever seen. Pulls the heart strings a &#34;10&#34;
this movie best exemplifies the struggles and open torture of the times. I am moved each time I watch it.
If you like WWII history, you need to see this! In fact, EVERYONE needs to see this movie. This is one of the best movies, in my opinion, ever made.
It was advertised.  Big name actors (lots of well knowns). Great mystery,  which is hard to find in a comady. It is better than CLUE which also like
Have always liked this movie. Now have it on DVD. Fast moving. Always something going on. Never slows down. Excellent.
A great under-rated movie! A great look at the old days of radio when it was the main form of information and entertainement.
Excellent in every way...great story, acting, atmosphere, LA locations...and a razor sharp transfer...what more can you ask for!  Get it and enjoy!
Movie was well recieved every thing was ok and I added this to my collection of Richard Pryor, in the future I will keep ordering. Thank you
great this shold be enuf for me to say not feeling like i need to use more words huh1duh duh
I have a Richard Pryor collection and had to add this one to it as well.  Stand up fans must have.
Richard is just plain down right funny in this movie.just funny. Five stars all day in the new day for the older day.
this Richard pryor collection will bust your gut this man is just outstanding again the funnest man to ever walk this earth
Richard Pryor is one of the greatest comedians of the decade. Watching these movies at any time is a plus to have.
This is my favorite movie. It is hilarious. This is a real gut buster. I reccomend this movie to everybody to watch.
One of the funniest movies I ever seen. Pryor is at the top of his game. Still funny even after 26 years.
absolutely love this movie.  the quality and sound was excellent.  i recommend this movie .  it was really funny . richard pryor was hilarious.
The name speak for itself, need I say more ( young and old alike know when they hear Richard Pryor, it has to be good).
WELL WORTH WATCHING - LOVE RICHARD PRYOR - WITH HIS MULTI CHARACTER PLAYING THE FIRST EVER TO DO THIS HILLARIOUS SIMPLY HILLARIOUS
One of the best tempter/reasonable demon performaces I've seen, wrapped up in a B Movie
5 stars, do i need to say more? Billy Zane was excellent in the role as the Collector. Good special effects, lots of humor and gore... Buy it...
This is one of my favorite horror movies ever. If you like good horror movies, this is a sure thing.
My son-in-law is a film editor and has specific tastes when it comes to entertainment. He was VERY happy to receive this for Christmas.
Arrived in excellent packaging and in a timely manner.  This has always been one of my favorite horror films.  I truly liked the plot.
I love this movie, had it on VHS, but no longer have a VHS player. I was happy that I was able to obtain a copy on DVD.
Seen this when I was younger, always wanted it when I got older. Found it on here. Excellent condition, great price, thank you
This is must have for any horror fan a key to the existence of man must be hide from the right full owners of the world the Demons?!?
Adam sandler is at his best in BM this is a great movie, buy it!
Classic movie in its own right.. with out Billy Madison, Tommy boy and Black Sheep,  my life would be incomplete.
One of the best Adam Sandler movies is Billy Madison. I laughed during the whole movie because of how funny it is.
I've seen this movie and it is great and hilarous!Whatever you do see this movie!Rated PG-13 for language,sexual content,and crude humor.
One of the best Adam Sandler movies you can buy. I recommend it for anyone looking for a good comedy.
always like Adam Sandler movies there all pretty funny and have a great story line, well worth the watch keep you laughing
funny classic comedy about a drunken guy who makes a bet with his dad that he can pass grades 1 - 12 in 1 year. hahaha o doyle rules.
One of the funniest, dumbest films I own...seen it many times, but love it.......a silly concept, but loads of fun for the family.
My favorite line: &#34;I hate this class and I hate all of you! I'm never coming back to school, never!!!&#34;.
i rate this 100% the movie was awesome. my husband and i really love this movie. i recommend this to any body. thank you
Henry Fonda back when there really were actors and casts who could together tell a story and make you believe it. Wonderful color.
Please put this great early technicolor film classic in DVD so that humble people such as myself can afford it. Thanks!!!
This was a gift for my 75 yr old sister. I only know it came in perfect condition for a 60 yr old movie!! Kudos for having it available on DVD!!!
The more I grow older, the more I realize that age in love is less important, and when love is there go for it.
THIS IS ANOTHER FAVORITE. MIRACLE IN THE RAIN IS ALSO VERY VERY GOOD. I HAVE THIS ON VHS AS WELL. THESE DON'T GET LOANED OUT.
ROCK HUDSON AND JANE WYMAN ARE JUST GREAT TOGETHER IN THIS.I LOVE IT .
This DVD was worth the price I had to pay, because they never show it on TV. Excellent movie.
This is one of the best movies I've ever seen Rock Hudson and Jane Wyman in.  Beautiful scenery and beautiful serene story.
this is a great mini series, watched it as a kid and loved it, I keep wanting to buy, it. Got a great deal on Amazon, thanks so much!!
The best mini-series ever made.  Great actors in great parts.  It has aged, but is still my all-time favorite.
I loved this series when it came out and wanted to have in in my library to watch again and share with my family..
Saw it on TV. Got it on VHS and had to have on DVD. Love the story entwined with history.
Have not seen it yet - but I did see it years ago on tv when it was first released - and it was great. Can't wait to see it again !David
I am enjoying it due to that is was fillmed in the area of Colorado  in wiuch I am from.
This is the best movie about the settling of the West ever!  Similar to How the West was won, but much more detailed.
I watched this over a long weekend and stayed engaged with the storyline.  It was enjoyable and I do not regret the time invested.
This one held our interest from start to finish. Very nice story line, with lots of human interest and action.
a movie I saw as a young adult I loved it .my daughter and I woull come home at night and watched it together now my grand kids are goin to watch it
I believe Centennial to be an excellent series which is true to history. Also, it is very well-acted and directed.
Reasonably accurate, well acted by a quality cast.  Based on a masterful novel.
great price and lot&#34;s of movie time. bought it from a good will and was a great movie.  4 stars
I really enjoyed watching this series.  I have re-sold it on amazon to someone who will enjoy it as much as I did
It can be slow at times but the story in very interesting and so enjoyable. It was filmed near our home so there is another interest for us.
Centennial, LOVED this story.  Wanted to have The Complete Series--with the cast of characters.  This is a wonderful story line.
I first saw this when it first came on T.V  Enjoyed the story, would recommend this as a must to watch.
How I love history and this series is another example of what I like best; the telling of it from a family standpoint.
....now let's rally for James Michener's "SPACE" the CBS 1985 mini-series. It too is another great classic work with a huge cast and history abounds!
Love this series.  Watched it when if first came out.  This is one of the best series made for televison.
Excellent viewing.  Rivetting performances,  Good story line.  Not to be missed, and should be seen in it's entireity  Top marks!
Very engrosing. all the actors fit their pats which makes this story believable. I would high recommend this movie for alll ages.
This is an excellent epic series and provides hours of great entertainment.  Packaging is fine.  I highly recommend it.
This mini series tells the story of the founding of a city in Colorado. The personal stories are wonderfully interwoven into the history.
I loved the book and the series follows it very closely.  Would recomend it to anyone who read the book and history.
we both saw this on tv & loved it & wanted to get it & watch it again / to many retrcticions on what to do or say etc on site
We watch this series over and over again.  Add this to my ALL TIME FAVORITE collections.  The whole family loves it.
I have wanted this for a long time still good amazing what was on TV Mimi series were .enjoyed it
This great miniseries is a collectors item. The viewer can get totally absorbed into each of the characters and their role in making this movie.
VERY HAPPY WITH PURCHASE.EVERYTHING WAS JUST AS ADVERTISED.
Excellent quality. Very pleased.  Would do business with this company again.  Also, came fast.
Didn't see the original series, but it sure is a good story.  Haven't watched all of it yet, but so far we love it.
My Mom wanted this. I couldn't find it anywhere; even here it took almost 6 months before it showed up. She wass tickled to death to get it!
One of the best John Wayne movies and loaded with stars of Hollywood's golden days.  If you enjoy older movies, I highly recommend this one.
Another good movie by John Wayne
Shepherd of the Hills was a great movie and John Wayne is always the best in anything he does!
Alan Ladd was a great actor and he thrills in this movie.  It highly recommend it to Film Noir buffs.
Alan Ladd ,Veronica Lake together in a great gritty LA film noir One of the best !!!!!!Its one of my all time favorites
Like this version better than the last one out.  Blue Dahlia to Shane, provides some great performances by Mr. Ladd
Brand new great price, was looking for a box set unfortunately they don't have one but this is a good start!!
This is scary, but good.  Very good.
Jaws will be a classic forever we keep wearing out this movie its a favoriteit still startles me buy it always
The used disc was in perfect shape and the movie was as awesomely scary as it was the first time I saw it! Go Team Jaws!
It's an older but a good movie to watch again and again. My granddaughter it also being 13 I didn't know how she was going to like but she enjoyed it
This was a gift for my daughter and she loved it. The first one was the best out of all the Jaws movies.
One of the best funnest movies. If you haven't seen it, please do. Now I have to write 7 more words: here they are.
Jaws is one of those movies that gets better the more you watch it.But all of the sequels to Jaws were irreverent, since the scripts were forced.
bought for a dvd library and it was perfect. no scratches or problems with anything. great movie from the 80's
The best reproduction of Jaws on Blu-ray, its an all time classic and never looked so good , you just have to buy this if you are a collector.
I ONLY LIKED THE FIRST TWO WITH ROY SCHEIDER AFTER ALL NOTHING IS BETTER THAN ORIGINALTHIS APPLY TO ALMOST EVERYTHING
One of the best movies ever made.  I don't care about special features so I couldn't tell you about those.  Just needed a new copy.
great classic
Great great summer movie.  I needed an upgrade from the VCR tape that I had. I never get tired of looking at it!
It's jaws, crystal clear and with all the outfits they was wearing at that time. It came on time and as expected.
This one really let's your imagination go. You can watch it a dozen times and still get startled by it. An oldie but still a goodie.
i saw this movie as a kid and now that i have my own kids they loved it as well.  Well made and i'd take them to see the remake.
One of the first movies I remember watching in the late 70s. Scared me silly then, and still does. Looked good on dvd, great on blu-ray.
love that shark. gets better all the time. &#34;BITE, BITE, BITE&#34;!!! WATCH OUT WATER PEOPLE BEWARE. SHARK IN THE WATER
JAWS is probably the best film ever made in a century besides Citizen Kane.  Otherwise,  Jaws still frightens millions of people.
I have this MOVIE on DVD. The BluRay version is so much better that seeing it was better than the first time!
I've done plenty of business with this vendor, & always fast service, no hitches, & a quality product, & a great price, what more do I want.
One of those movies that you like to see again.  The script has even had an impact on our language today.
this is a movie you can learn from and have some fun watching and be able to watch over and over
A classic movie.  It never fails to scare the bejesus out of me.  I first saw this in the theater...people were screaming.
nothing needs to be said about this classic thriller, it never gets old when watching it for the &#34;hundredth?&#34; time!
Superb restoration. Great picture..great sound...great white shark...what else could you ask for?A must buy collectors item. Get it quick.
Is exactly what I wanted a lot of extras just for fans, this kind of classic! thank you very much
Bought this as a gift. Came in great condition. Uncle was very pleased. Would buy from again and would recommend to others
DVD played perfectly fine. Viewed well, no jumps or skips. Money well spent. Glad I purchased, had been wanting this DVD for a long time.
I bought this for my grandson.  He wanted the Collection so I bought it.It is a great gift set to give to anyone.
I love Jaws, ever sence I was a child.  This is what made me want to be a marine bioglist.
a huge improvement alot better in blu ray so much clearer i would buy it again for sure, cant go wrong
Oh, yea. The only thing missing here is a scratch n  sniff of the ocean. Love it, love it! A must for Blu-ray collectors!
Um...what's there to say. JAWS is one of the greatest films in all of cinematic history. Buy it! Duh! It's not as though you'll be sorry.
Given as part of a birthday gift for a true Jaws fan. He was thrilled to receive it and now hosts Jaws film nights.
The best in the series and one of the best 100 movies of all time...
This movie is fantastic!!!!  It is an adventure classic.  We all know the ending, but it is an all time favorite!!
Movie was brand new and in perfect shape.  it was a most enjoyable transaction from beginning to end.  I loved it!
......even better on Blu-Ray than I expected.  My kid would watch this movie once a week if he could.  Classic.
Great movie, great writing, great scenes all around 5 star.  I was still scared to put my feet under my blankets
This movie has been my favorite since a child! love the comedy and the acting of Swayze, snipes, and leguazamo.  Great cast and even better story!
I love watching this movie at home.  It never gets old and I can't wait to watch it over and over again.
Loved this movie. It is funny & entertaining with good acting. It is one that we have watched more than just once.
Oh my goodness how can one not love this movie!! I love it ad have 2 copies of this movie
Hadn't seen this movie in years and found a used copy here for a decent price!! Thanks so much for making this available!!
I absolutely love this movie.  Patrick Swayzy in heels!!  Wesley Snipes in a dress!!  John Leguizano in a mini skirt!!
I love this movie. It is a very cute move.  The guys play their parts perfectly.  And it is so funny.
this is a hilarious movie ever i know is a old movie but great actors and the history is great learning experience
This is one of my favorite comedies of all time!  It has a great soundtrack also!
Wonderful movie! Always love a good drag movie! Lol Just wish this was an instant video to watch or at least re-done in bluray.
Another fun movie that gives great "grins and giggles".  It also has some very poignant parts as well.  I have love this one for MANY years.
I love Patrick Swayze and heard this was a great movie I am sure I am going to love it
A great film with all you could wan ting a film.
So much fun with this movie and the stars in it! Jam packed full!  Makes a great story and you will cheer for the drag queens!
A classic I seen this year's ago and always wanted it on dvd and finally got it all 3 actors played their role perfectly
I liked the story line, and every one of the actors that starred in this fun movie, but wouldn't missed seeing Wesley Snipes in drag for anything!
This is so funny. Swayze, Leguizamo and Wesley are at their best as drag queens
This was a surprisingly good movie.  Sweet, a good message and you just have to see Wesley Snipes, Patrick Swayze & John Leguizamo in drag.
This is my favorite movie. I have always enjoyed this movie long before Patrick Swayze past away.
Hilarious. One liners that sometimes make me wonder how much is the actual script. Fabulous cast that makes this movie one of my 5+ star list.
THOSE DRAG QUEENS HAD ME LAUGHING. WESLEY SNIPES WAS UGLY IN DRAG. THE PUERTO RICAN WAS PRETTY IN DRAG.
This is a very funny movie to see this men in drag. good story and makes you laugh and think about a whole new life style.
I like this movie wit Wesley Snipes and the gang. My Co workers like as well. They play it too much though.
The acting is superb.  This film proves that Patrick Swayze was such a fantastic actor.  The three of them together was magic.
I love this movie John and Wesley made this movie good from beginning to end.this is a must see movie
what a wonderful and funny movie the actors are great it is a wonderful movie and would recommend it to anyone
I collect movies that impact my psyche, one way or another.  This is so well done and acted with outstanding actors, it's a keeper!
What can I say about this movie.. it was great. Loved watching Swayze.. god rest him.... My daughter enjoyed the movie as well.
Just love this movie....and am giving this copy as a Christmas gift to a friend.  I think she'll enjoy it  A very funny movie!
I love this hilarious movie and the hilarious cast.  Amazing that they turned out to be a beautiful as they were.
Patrick Swayze outdid himself in this movie.  The characters were all well drawn and well executed.  I would recommend this highly.
I love this dvd, very entertainment and funny, I always liked the tv series and this dvd is great. I added this dvd to my collection.
First of all this movie should be on DVD. I loved this Movie and if you have not seen it , You should !!!!!
This is a GREAT movie!  Don't miss it!  I can't believe it has been finally released.
Tony Curtis and Janet Leigh are perfect in this romantic comedy with some slapstick that is appreciated throughout the years.
We enjoyed this movie with Ray Milland, etc. He is such a great actor. Good sound quality and a good picture.
Great classic  Billy Wilder. Not a great transfer. Also, lack of extras disappointing. Major studios should do better by classics.
The movie shows what Berlin looked like shortly after the war in a light hearted way of course.  But it was a charming love story.
Love this type of movies by these actors.  Enjoyable movie.  Love Tony and Janet, make a great couple. Love their movies.
this is a great drama to watch with family and friends if you are into shows like this type of drama
Finally they released this one and Taras Bulba is close behind, thank you.
This is one of those old fashion movies where the plot is fairly predictable but, it is a is a good family movie of the old style.
The quality was like no better than when I first saw it. One of my favoriteMovies when I was younger
Toney Randall played second in a number of funny films but he made a few as the lead and this is one of the funniest, thx.
awesome movie, just like I remembered it when I was a child. No scratches or voice or video problems. good work.
One of the funniest movies I have seen in a long time. Set in the 1960's before Eden was Jeannie.
good  / old but i like the plot barbra was so young in it  then she did i Dream of jen
Just a great old movie with lots of 60's nonsense.  Makes Mad Men seem more real.  Buy it, or better yet, wish for it.
Love This little fantasy, so glad they finally released it to dvd.fun and entertaining a little campy. AAA+++
This movie is awesome I really enjoyed it. I laughed really hard watching it I really recommend it for any Ginger Rogers Fan.
LOVELY MOVIE AND SO FUNNY TO WATCH IT AGAIN!  BROUGHT BACK TONS OF MEMORIES AND FOUND IT SO DELIGHTFUL AND ENTERTAINING!
Great classic movie. Ginger Rogers plays a great part. This movie is a must see and a must have in any classic collection.
This was the first Adam Sandler movie i saw and i couldnt stop laughing. This is diffinitly one of my favorite movies and you should buy it!
I always liked this movie, the hd dvd version looks great and lets me enjoy this movies in great hd.
love love love love this movie. this movie cracks me up. i could watch this movie like 4 times in one day
prolly my favorite sandler movie but BM is close 2nd . Hilariouis
IF YOUR A GOLF  OR ADAM SANDLER FAN,SEE THIS MOVIE.IT WAS EXTREMELY HILARIOUS.HAPPY GILMORE JUST GETS SO PISSED OFF!
Insane!!!, it was more than I was expecting, best comedy I ever seen there's nodoubt about it, My favorite!!!
This film may be as old as the hills but it is, in my opinion, a classic...I have now seen this film 6 or 7 times and it still amuses me!
I saw this a long time ago and just had to own in my collection of movies love the movie
Happy Gilmore is an Adam Sandler classic that you just have to have in your home collection.  His fight with Bob Barker is priceless!
One of Adam Sandler's classics that you must watch! Not a HUGE fan of his newer movies. But its probably not his fault.
He loved this movie back ago he still loves it Adam Sandler is awesome he still watches this on a weekly basis years later
A very good movie with the right cast , funny with a very good sign of intent, get one a good movie.
I really love this movie. It is a great movie. Would recommend this movie to anyone!! This movie is very good..
Happy Gilmore is one of Adam Sandler's best movies.He becomes a golfer so he can try to winfirst prize, which is a lot of money.
This is a great movie and the highlight is when Happy gets a beat down from Bob Barker! It will leave you in stitches!
Watching children and they love animals so thought would add to my movie collection like some of the other movies I bought .
A good film. The intrigue is built well.  We pass by quite the ranges of emotion: of the laughter in tears.
this is yet another great movie by Peter Jackson a must see if you enjoy nice movies with comedy and horror, nice to see Michael J. Fox
I happen to think this movie is great. A great story, great Special Effects, great acting by a great cast.Just a great movie!!
A oldie, but a goodie.If one likes Micheal . J. Fox and his acting they'll enjoy this film.A must see if the first time or after a long time.
as yall already know i love horror movies. this is on the top ofmy list. it's actually funny. i really liked it and would strongly reccomend it.
I loved this movie! It exceeded my expectations! I loved the extras and seeing deleted scenes and bloopers. This was a GREAT buy!
A great movie with real humor and a plot. It has a bit of the who done it coupled with some nice special effects and good acting.
Great ghoulish funny show. Michael J. Fox was great in this fun show. I only purchase shows that I know I will watch again and again.
wonderful characters and story line.  a movie you can watch multi times.  no boring sceen and a great stay at home dinner movie
I love anything that has the old GUNNIE in it. Also this is a very funny/scary movie!!!!!!
5 stars. Very good story, characters and special effects. this is one of the best Michael J fox movies. Shortly before his parkinson dicease.
I really enjoy this movie, had to get it. It was a great price, it arrived on time, & was in excellent condition. I'm so happy, very pleased.
Great movie,and Paranorman was just the companion!One of those hidden treasure MOVIES, like FIDO andGod Bless America! WHO YEAH GONNA CALL R.I.P.D.
kept are entrust scary and funny also had a plot and a love story to fun for all love the movie
This movie is one of Jim Carreys finest. I would tell anyone to watch this movie as you will roll off the couch laughing.
jim carrey always gets me :) this guy never fails to bring the humor in a comedy. lol this is a funny movie
Jim Carrey is an excellent actor and this movie is very funny and enjoyable to watch. We are pleased with the purchase.
i love this fil is just so crazy u just cant help but laugh at everything carrey does is just so insane you laugh ur a** off lol great family film.
This movie is as funny as The Ace Venturas but has way more of a plot and its an interesting one too, great!
this has to be the best Jim Carrey movie ever made. this movie is hillarious.  recommend it for everyone
Always love the comedy of Jim Carrey one of the funniest actors that I like to watch a lot man
I love how Jim Carrey plays the lawyer who tries to always win, but learns an important lesson thru his little boy! Way to go Jim C.!
Was sent to me in fantastic condition.  Delivery was extremely fast.  Will order from this seller again in the future.
Carrey rocks from start to finish.  Lots of laughs and a plot the holds together.  Definitely worth watching, very funny.
THE GREATEST SCENE IS WHERE HE ASKEDS HIS SECRETARY:ASK ME A QUESTION FROM WICH YOU KNOW I WOULD NOT LIE ABOUT.
This is a wonderful film. It is funny and sweet at the same time. The script is good, and Jim Carry makes you laugh all the way trough.
I enjoyed his movies for years and this is a funny one to get.
Jim Carrey is so crazy. I love this movie! Especially the scene in the courtroom trying not to lie.
I choose 5 stars, because Jim Carrey was fantastic in this movie. I would without a doubt recommend this movie.
Thos movie was excellent you will laugh your brains out so please watch! You can do it. just do it.
this has been my favorite movie ever since i was a little kid. i could watch this movie once a week and never get tired of it.
Funny movie.  If you like Jim Carey, you will love this movie. He is zanny as usual with an excellent story line.
The quality of this transfer, being HD, is fabulous. It is near 3-D. James worked his butt off (no pun intended) filming this one.
I love this movie. It is cool how the entire movie takes place in one day of the life of a Newspaper reporter. I can watch this again and again.
MY HUSBAND AND I WATCH ALOT OF MOVIES AND BELIEVE ME THIS WAS A ENJOYABLE ONE TO VIEW.THANK YOU JACKIE M.
this is a good superhero movie i think.  Alec Baldwin is the shadow.  full of all different kinds of characters through the movie.
I don't own the DVD but just saw it on HD yesterday.  Love this movie and see it as often as it is shown.  A great one for any video library.
If you like this type of movie, then you'll love this one.  Not the typical super hero movie, but The Shadow isn't your typical hero type.
I have always liked Alec Baldwin's portrayal of the Shadow.  I checked many sights before purchasing it.  A must for anyone's library.
I love this movie and was glad I could find it here in such great shape! The service was exceptional also.
just plain fun
I really like this movie in Blu-ray for sure. Bargain price too! Would recommend to anyone sitting on the fence.
We loved it it was like watching the movie for the first time. Thank u for the good time ahead
this is one of my favorite movies......the Shadow is a great  old time hero set in the 30s.......just fun to watch.
This was gift for a family member and they loved it. It is a very entertaining movie. Thank you so very much.
I especially love the music and the cars of the period.  Really great photography and no blood and guts and puking needed!
I saw The Shadow in the theator when it came out. I loved the setting, the characters & plot. It's fun to finally get it on dvd!
Purchased as a gift and the recipient stated that it is a good movie. I like the price too. Thanks
What can I say, I a fan of the Shadow.  Great Movie and Alec Baldwin wasgreat in his film Role as the Phantom!
Not so crazy about the Alec Baldwin of today, but I still love this fantasy adventure movie, it's a fun viewing.
I really like the series of the shadow ,the series was outstanding I have brought the oringal eries back in the days.............
It is an excellent movie of the comic book hero The Shadow. It is very well done.
Really enjoyed it the first time I watched it years ago , and even more so now with my daughter.
this was a great movie and I think it would make a great gift to give to some one and I would recommend it to some one
Great family fun. Safe for all ages.  Nothing offensive in wardrobe, language, or plot. truly a safe family fun movie.
suitable for wide span of ages, adults included... beautifully made. One of my favorite &#34;kid&#34; movies of all time! watch it
Great family movie.  I did not expect to enjoy this movie but, to my surprise, it was actually quite heart-warming.
Watched this several times with our great grandchildren many years ago.  Now we have great grandkids and want them to be able to enjoy it also.
A family classic that is funny but yet chalk full of teachable moments. Also I am so glad I am a vegetarian otherwise this would be hard to watch!
Laughter, sadness, tears, and triumph!  Who could ask for more in a movie!  The wife should really get much credit for the humor in this tale.
Wonderful movie! Came in the mail quickly and perfectly! I love the ease of being able to find any movie on here!
My favorite movie of all times!
That's all I'm saying - this movie screams out for Blu-ray! It's one of my top ten movies of all time, and has been for years. That'll do.
2 year old loves this movie., she watches it every day., she loves the pig in the movie and all the other animals
I bought Babe for my grandson. He calls it the "Pig Movie" and watches it daily. He loves to watch the animals talk and laugh!
They are so cute and funny movie for my kids, tape is in good condition. Thanks Guys & have a good day!!
Our family never tires of this great classic. You will fall in love with Babe & the crazy antics of the animals on the farm.
My son really enjoys this movie, he's watched it more times than anything else and he always wants to watch it again.
Recently bought this for my 4 and 6 year old children.  They loved it.  One of the best movies ever made.
OMG ... does it get any better than &#34;Pig&#34; sheep dog.  This movie is a classic repeat watch for my family.
Had to replace the VHS Babe as I gave it to my daughter and I didn't want to deprive myself of such a heart warming movie.
Love this movie. It was very cute and different! Animals are great and can do wondrous things! The mice help the little kids follow along too.
This was my favorite movie as a child. So happy I bought it on DVD to enjoy again. Will enjoy with my family.
Item arrived damaged free.A great movie for the whole family with a solid cast and several funny scenes.  Worth buying.
Timeless classic that's great for any age. Always fun to watch with the kiddos and just a good story with a good moral.
Replaced VHS for this. I love this movie and always will. Family movies are hard to come by when they are this good.
Great action film- set during the Stanley Cup Hockey playoffs. Jean-Claude Van Dam presents an exciting action hero in a fast-moving plot.
just goes along with all the other movies i have with Jean-claude, helping my collection to grow each month more and more.
HAD TO REPLACE MY VHS WHICH WAS BROKEN THIS IS A GREAT STORY ABOUT SOMETHING THAT HAPPENED WHEN I WAS I TEENAGER.
Edge-of-your-seat-for-the-whole-two-hours type movie. Awesome, awesome, awesome. Just watch it. Now.
The story is good and well adapted for ordinary people.It is easy to understand what those astronautes lived during their return to Earth.
Such a great story and told so well.  We forget how close we came to losing them but this movie will forever keep those memories alive.
This two disc special edition of Apollo 13 is awesome one the best two disc movies you'll ever own. this movie is awesome. I recomend this movie :)
Definitely a great movie! This is even better in wide screen on a 45&#34; HD TV (as opposed to my old Sony 19&#34; Trinitron & VCR)!
We love this movie.  It is much better viewing it in Blu-ray.  Much more crisp.  There are things I heard that were not audible on the DVD version.
Apollo 13 has always been one of our favorites so when I found it at a great price I snapped it up
A classic. True to life. A great piece of history portrayed well. Tom Hanks at his best. Entertaining... Ron Howard you did it again, the best!
This is an excellent real story movie, very good performances, a master piece of art
Fun to watch and watch again. Some of the actors do look a bit happy to be there, but then again, weren't the astronauts?
One of those rare movies that's so well done that even though I know the story and the outcome, I'm on the edge of my seat every time I see it!
This was a very good film and Tom Hanks was great in it. It had me at the edge of my seat during their final 4 minutes of reentry.
This has always been a terrific movie and seeing it in Blu-Ray (with a combo pack as well) just made it even more spectacular.
I had this movie in VCR format and wanted to replace it with the latest media in BluRay. A great, suspenseful movie.
we watch this on our new LED tv and it's totally clear, makes you feel like you are part of the action. totally worth the movie.
If you lived the story it was great to get a &#34;behind the scene&#34; idea of what exactly happened; really nice to know!!
I love the historical facts in the movie.  It helped us to understand more about the fact that space is dangerous, and that miracles happen.
Well done. Ron Howard directs this. Well done acting and good story line. Really close to the truth. Excellent job!
This is a great movie!  A fairly accurate retelling of a very important moment in United States space history.  A must see.
Arrived damaged free.What can you say about this movie.  It's based on a true story (some say, ha!) with an amazing cast.  Highly recommend.
Enjoyed very much.  A good way to view history, fact and fiction.It was well done the actors well chosen.
A well done movie by Ron Howard.  Great actors.  A must see if you wantto really learn about what happened with Apollo 13.
I LIKE THIUS MOVIE ALOT. I HANVE  NOT SEEN THE IMAX VERSION. IF YOU LIKE THIS MOVIE GET IT
After returning from the Kennedy Space Center with our 11 year old grandson this was a good movie to watch!Well done, fine acting almost a tragedy!
this movie is a really good movie that does not get old.  i still enjoy watching it as i did when it was in theaters
A beautifully filmed documentary type film to remember the pinnacle of human achievement.  Whether we go beyond it remains to be seen.
Tom Hanks as an astronaut in the early 1970's at a time when the space program was at its peak in popularity
I order 2 of these as a gift for and friend and one for the wife all were happy .....................
the dog that every one loves.  you will remember how they got the dog.  one family movie truly wonderful the dog that is the boss of the family.
Love it. My husband never watched this and my 5 month old loves dog movies. So it was a perfect buy. And my husband love it too!
My Grandkids wore out my video tape of this movie so I bought a new one. They love it!!
My husband loves watching this.  He is disabled from a stroke and watches this over and over and laughs each time.  I enjoy listening to him laugh.
I have seen Beethoven many times. I want my grandchildren to enjoy it as well:a real classic to  be remembered.thank you--Joanne
This movie is so fun. It is a family movie. I bought this to finish my collection of  Beethoven. Highly recommend.
great for the grandmother and the grandkids.  we love watching it together. thanks. am glad i have added it to my collection!!
I gave this rating because this is a great family movie that I can now enjoy with my two young children.
my kids love this movie, they watch it all the time since it was deliverd a few weeks ago.  good watch for the whole family
I loved The Little Rascals as a kid! This movie is a good remake of a great classic series with a good cast.
I really enjoyed watching The Little Rascals when I was a kid. Now my kids can this one. My son really likes this movie. He even does the Hi sign.
Had a copy for my kids, bought this copy for my granddaughters.  This is a fun movie kids will watch over and over again.
This is such a cute little movie. The actors are great!!! It will have you laughing through the whole movie. This is a must see! :)
This is a excellent kids movie & family movie just as i remember as a kid. Enjoy the gang!..those Rascals!
This is an adorable movie with some really adorable kids in it! It's very funny and is a total classic!
grand son saw this on tv one day and loved it was so glad it came in time for easter
Item came ahead of time in excellent condition, very pleased. Will buy form this seller again.
makes my aunt happy she is addicted to this movie because she loves it very much she watches it over and over
This movie is a movie that I watched when I was younger and I never forgot it. It made a lasting impression on me.
Great movie, love it bunches. Purchased it for a gift. Arrived quicker than expected and was well packaged for protection.
I loved Waterworld.It shows us the possible future if the governments of the world don't stop trying to blow each other up
Not a &quot;great&quot; film but a &quot;good&quot; film. If you liked Mad Max then you should like this film. It's like Mad Max on the water...:+)
Do yourself a favor get the DTS version of this movie. WOW Very good.
Global warming! No more land ? Water every where! Survive or perish! See it now! Weeeha, wet and wild! Yes!
I really like this movie. It was just wrong format. So I am returning it to you.  Sorry, Thanks anyway. June Walker.
This is one of Costners best. The cridicts  doomed it. but we the public loved it. Costner at his best.
When this came out the reviews didn't do it justice. I enjoyed it. It's a entertaining ride. I like Kevin's take on this fantasy world!
I am a SYFY fan and after watching this I fell in love with it.I wish that they would do a follow-up movie.
A very enjoyable adventure into a possible future.  Great action scenes and interesting look at man's never changing desire to survive.
I remember seeing this movie and decided I had to have it in my collection.  The packaging was great and arrived in brand new condition.
A real good movie to get lost in, like the adventure of it,tis a fun one to stay with along with a nice bucket of popcorn.
A true classic of mystery and suspense... Hitchcock was truly a master teller of stories with twisting and turning plot lines.
I found this film to be extremely good as it manages to take a relatively simple concept and then produces a film which is full of atmosphere.
This is one of my favorite Hitchcock movies. So suspenseful, exciting. Jimmy Stewart is always so good in Hitchcock's movies.
You have to love Alfred Hitchcock to appreciate this movie.  It was mysterious and romantic at the very same time.
Need I say more? This is a classic and if you love Hitch and have never seen this movie, well then I suggest you add it your DVD library.
I bought this as a gift for my son.  He really likes Alfred Hitchcock andloved this movie. And Jimmy Stewart gave an awesome performance.
Hitchcock, Stewart and Novak?  You just can't miss with these three in one movie.  Great suspense movie even when you know the ending.
By far the best of all Hitchcock's films, in my opinion, and I've seen them all. Kim Novak shines.
I could so relate! LOL The movie will keep your attention and honestly keep you guessing. But than again...it is an Alfred Hitchcock movie....
This movie keeps you on your toes and is one to be saved for Halloween or a dark stormy night. Jimmy stewart is awesome
One of my 3 top favorite Alfred Hitchcock Films. James Stewart totally unklike anything he' done before. Kim Novak's best performance.
Received the DVD in an appropriate amount of time and the disk and case was in great condition.  No hassles and nothing bad or negative to say.
WHAT CAN BE BETTER? HITCHCOCK, STEWART, NOVAK? A CLASSIC WITH A FAMOUS TWIST--ACTING BY ALL ABSOLUTELY PERFECT. A MUST FOR ALL STEWART FANS.
yup this is a must own im a huge James Stewart fan and this is definitely one of my favorite movies
This was a wonderful movie with a classic Hitchcock twist ending.  The plot was very complex, and the performances were excellent.
This is an excellent dvd with rich color and sound that does this great movie Vertigo justice ! Best movie of all time !
NOW ACCLAIMED AS #I PIC OF ALL TIME. SAW IT WHEN RELEASED AND ALWAYS THOUGHT IT WAS THE BEST HITCHCOK. IT APPEARS I WAS RIGHT.
In my opinion, not only is this the best Hitchcock film ever, but it's one of my favorite films, period.
I loved this movie. The actors, acting, plot and everything else was very good. The movie was funny and I'd definitely watch it again.
I love Sandlers Movies always makes me laugh and I never get tired of finding and watching his movies. collection time for this actor
I had this on VHS only & wanted a DVD copy. Love his work and movies. This helps complete my collection!
Love the suspense, stunts, and storyline.  This movie has a lot of action and has many great characters in it.
All is set in this one, A good movie great cast no dought about James Caan all his roles in movies make the film a success.
Adam Sandler is my favorite actor, so when he makes a movie i got to have it for my collection.
great movie!  if you have never seen this, i definitely recommend it!it may not be for everyone, but everyone should at least see it once.
Saw it in the theater and it is better now on bluray I never get tired of this one GREAT
This dvd arrived very early almost a week before the scheduled arrival time ...the packaging was ok and the dvd is also in great shape..
Great movie!  One of the best Sci-Fi movies of all times.  Have watched it probably 10 or more times over the years.
very well written futuristic very complated plot all time good movie has something for all sci fi fans
I remember watching this movie when it first came out and was just impressed.  I am happy to finally have my own copy.
My wife really enjoyed this and she doesn't normally like Sci-Fi.  I think this is the best of the two that are out there.
Used but in good condition, I love this movie and enjoyed watching it with my Adult children, I am pleased
I hate Dune and anything involving Sting, but my wife loves it.  It made a good Blu Ray transfer, so that's good enough for me!
Quick and easy review: I love dune and this is an excellent copy on Blu Ray.not a lot of extras.
recied fast and in good condition .. good movie , will buy from seller again ..
The actors and actresses did a wonderful job bringing the story to the big screen completely immersing the viewer!  Well directed!
Not only is Bruce Willis great in this film, it's a great film, period!  Terry Gilliam strikes again!!  AND ya get to see Brad Pitt's naked butt!
But, what puts this movie over the top is the incredibly, brilliant performance by Bruce Willis.  He makes the movie. So very impressive.
I love SiFi Flicks that deal with Time Travel, had to pay attention to this, has a very good and unique ending
I'd seen it many times before finally breaking down and buying it.  Bruce and Brad at their absolute best. What a great cautionary tale.
Bruce Willis and Brad Pitt!!  This movie is a classic!!  Even though I could get it free from our local library, I had to have my own copy.
This is a good movie, I knew that when I bought it.  I received what I expected,  it works great.
My favorite Brad Pitt movie!  He's so funny in it and his acting is fantabulous!  I love this character!  Awesome!
This movie is in my top 20 of all time. The story is not to be missed & Pitt & Willis give stellar performances
Well made movie from Monty Python's Terry Gilliam. Looks great on HD. Very good story with good acting on all sides.
What an excellent movie to watch. Everything looks great in it. The actors are nice. The acting is weird. It has some scary scenes in it.
Brad Pitt takes acting to the next level -- totally believable.Good script, excellent acting and directing.Buy this film for your DVD library.
love this movie great sequel, i love how she gets revenge on her cheating husband and his new bimbo girlfriend. to bad Matheson had to die though.
Great, Now I have both movies on DVD. It's great to have this set.They were both great movies but hard to find. So glad you had it on Amazon.com!
ROWRRRR, the Beast!!! It's Ok, for a TV Mini-Series. If its cheap, its worth your while. If u like CSI, you will like this.
Great movie and service. The movie was in great condition and I have added it to my keepers. Th out s dvd will be watched over and over.
I was so glad to find this movie in its entirity.  I had bought another DVD that was all chopped up with missing scenes...this is much better
Saw this movie on tv and was happy to see it for sale on DVD through Amazon.. It is a very good movie and William Peterson's role is well played..
This is a television movie it's fairly scary if you like giant squids  that gobble you up I give it a5
the movie beast was a very good movie acting is excellent I love monster movies. that's why I gave it a 5 star rating.
This is almost identical [in content] to my VHS copy. The DVD video and sound is far more clear. I'm glad to have it in my library.
seen before and loved it . Had a hard time finding this movie and I  could not believe I found this on DVD.
I love the extended version of this movie. It has action, suspense and romance. It was beautifully done and the movie is great to watch.
for a very long time i was looking for this movie to see it, it was great and for see more than one time of this great writer as peter blenchey
Cute and funny. Story line is a little weak, but the laughs gets you through the rough spots.
Slap stick British humor.  So silly it is funny.  If you enjoy this type of humor this is the movie for you.
This dvd was just what I wanted. This film reminds one of a classic 80's movie. Fun and entertaining for adults.
A very entertaining comedy with a unique premise: that a zoo needs to be sensationalized to survive in today's market.
Funny and entertaining. John Cleese is super funny as he delivers dead pan some of the best straight lines ever.
If you liked &#34;A Fish Called Wanda&#34;, this is a must.  Almost the same cast, and a really funny story.  We loved it and may buy the BluRay.
Is there anything Meryl Streep cannot do??  Same for Kevin Bacon!  I guess not.  Grab some popcorn, get comfy and hunker down for a Wild ride!
this movie was great and all acting was great.  the twist was great also.  i loved this movie and it is a realistic movie.
Ive seen this film before and its still a very good film. Actors play excellent. Buy it if you havnt seen it
It is a great movie. Kevin Bacon is a scary person in this one. Keeps you on your toes. Must see it.
MERYL STREEP AND KEVIN BACON ARE VERY GOOD IN THIS MOVIE.  MERYL HAS A LOT OF ACTION SHOTS WHILE KEVIN IS BUSY PLAYING THE BAD GUY.
she's always great
this was not only a good movie and I have told others about it and where I got it. Pleased
A great adventure story with the best of Meryl Streep. One of my all time favorites.
This movie needs to be seen first for the story and suspense and then a second time just for the marvelous scenery!
I ADORE Kevin Bacon so I have watched this one over and over and over again! IF KB is IN it..I WATCH IT!
I saw this movie a long time ago at the theater.  I remembered how good it was and I bought it so I could enjoy it again.
This was a great movie - really liked the special effects.
Action packed movie!!! Love Pierce Brosnan!!! If you like natural disaster movies, you will love this one!!! Glad I don't live near a volcano!!!
Another movie to add to my collection of DVDs.  I have always enjoyed this movie and building up me collection for when I retire.
Great Blu-Ray conversion. This movie has a great story line. It's action packed too. Very clear picture & excellent sound track quality.
One of many of my favorite movies. If you like adventure, than this is for you. With an all star cast it is quite the fun movie!
One of my favorite movies.  Love every minute of disaster drama.
Good drama. Pierce Brosnan and Linda Hamilton make a good acting pair. Good special effects and suspense well acted and well written.
really enjoyed the movie.  Loves weather and science related in nature to all details.
the movie arrived in a very timely matter and i was very pleased with it
Suspenseful action movie, love it even better on Bluray, keeps you on the edge of your seat, with surround sound is even better.
A great movie even if it is an older one.  I really like Pierce Brosnan and he is great in this movie.  Lots of action.
Love this movie, love the action and on the edge scenes.  Love Pierce Brosnan.  What more could you want or expect out of a volcano movie.
This is one of my favorite adventure movies and one of Pierce's best. The DVD arrived in great shape, so I am pleased.
i can watch it over and over again . i like it that much.It's a family favorite. id recommend it to others.
Great action packed movie with a super cast!  I have watched this at least 12 times and knew a copy would be a great addition to my library!
Bought this to replace my old VHS copy, A good sci-fi movie,that keeps you wanting to keep watching,Great story line.
This is a great action film but in Blu-Ray it's even more amazing. This is a must-have in your Blu-ray collection.
It doesn't get much better than this.  Linda Hamilton and Pierce Brosnon romance it up a bit while the sky is falling!
i loved it . it was in perfect condition and i will be ordering from them again.the quality was great and no scratches.
One of the last movies where they actually use sceince correctly.  It is a great blend of drama/action-pack/suspense. Highly recommend it.
Pretty good in it's own right. I prefer volcano. This one is equally good.
It's a wonderful movie. The photograpy is amazing. Seems like you are truly there. Great actors and actresses.  Not for small kids.
I love this movie.  It is great in Hi Def, but Toshiba threw in the towel, and now my HDDVD player is virtually rendered uselss.
just love this movie. good action. fun to watch. and i love pierce brosnan. i watch this movie a lot. love it.
blu ray quality was good. i could tell movie was much clearer vs previous dvd releases.good movie for a family nite. So get started on your popcorn
i enjoyed dantes peak very much i recomend every one to get this movie i had this movie dvd but it is 100 percent better in blueray.
I just like this movie and i love pierce and linda pluse i like disaster movies so i am very satisfied with the product
Hillarious naval school that is another classic that can't get old in humor And I love watching it with family
I got this for my brothers they grew up on this show so it was very good and funny as heck
This is one of my favorite movies. I love it, and I got a great price on it. It's the best.
This is a family favorite movie, we watch it over and over again. I just wish it was available to buy on Blu-ray.
Tom Arnold is hilarious in this movie and the cast of bumbling idiots. This movie will make you howl with laughter.  What more could you ask for.
We've owned this movie for years on VHS and it was time to replace it on DVD.  One funny movie.
totally unrealistic funny clean comedy we watch over and over.. even with the granddaughters there.. no bad language or nudity..
This is just a fun spoof on war time.  The movie is very tastefully done with little swearing so can be watched by the family.
I did not see this video. It was sent as a gift to someone else. But I presume it was satisfactory to the recipient.
This is a comedy that is hilarious! It is a fun movie to watch from time to time for a laugh
Was home for a visit and this movie came up at my mothers house. She loved this movie, so I ordered it for her!
It is funny and keeps you entertained.  The actors were great choices which I would have never thought of putting together.
Great product and service.  Film very funny and Bette Midler is at her best sassy self.  Recommend highly to everyone.
If you love Bette Midler and Dennis Farina you will absolutely love this movie!!!  Hilarious!!  You'll love it!!!
if more people would listen to their heart instead of their mind-well the possibilities are endless!  what a great movie!
Great comedy. Midlers singing in one part of the movie is a little dule (just mute it) But a great Saturday afternoon movie to watch.
I still get a kick out of this movie! A great cast of characters play their parts well. Movie came in time frame promised and in excellent condition.
Love the characters in the movie. Loved Bette Midler. Very entertaining and funny. Have watched it over and over and would recommend.
I love the story line, it's a comedic lover story. Also, Bette Midler is hysterical & who doesn't love her movies.
This was really a cute movie that the Nelsons did.  Thoroughly enjoyed it. Of course, their TV series was the best!
I grew up watching this TV show and wanted my kids to get the chipmunk experience.  This movie is so good, just as I remember.  Good music.
Cute cute cute!  The little girl chipmunks are adorable.Lots of music and action.Grandson loved it think you will too
this was such a great movie!i loved it!i think it is the best chipmunk movie ever!
Not only one of my favs as a kid but my best friend and I bonded over how much we loved it as kids. It's still a favorite!
This is such a good movie.  Best childrens movie I have ever seen.  I am 17 and I still watch it!
this is one of the best movies ,i am one of the # 1 fans I have the very fist case of it it truly unlocks youre child inside. MUST SEE.
I loved this movie when I was a little kid and I love it now still.
This movie is just as fun as I remember it being!  The DVD transfer quality is pretty good so it's worth the money if you are a Chipmunk fan!
My daughter requested this DVD because she was very young when we had it on VHS.  It was her favorite chipmunk movie.  I totally recommend it!
Epic in it's day, still great now.  Loved how they didn't need blood and guts to tell a good story and keep the audience watching!
so great to have a digital copy of this moviewe love this classic so muchwho wouldn't want to go to dinosaur land?!
I put this in and started watching the movie and if you like bass you will have it. 3-d effect is pretty good and the sound effects are amazing.
Do i really even have to say anything? If you saw this as a kid it was down right amazing!
My grand children love it. A lot of action to keep their attention. It was sent in great condition to us.
I remember watching this movie as a teenager, and it terrified and fascinated me. Now I can share it with my son, and he just loves it.
the movie is way to exciting to see what happens to the next scene to the next scene and the characters are hilarious and great.
An amazing movie and this combo pack does a great job of having a way to access the movie anywhere.
This movie is always good to watch. Unfortunately it was the only good Jurassic park made. Dinosaurs are cool, science is cool.
Hard to believe this movie came out in 1997, but watching in HD made it even better than the original!!
Classic movie whose computer graphics are surprisingly good, even though the movie was made years ago. The story is so engaging.
This movie was an AWESOME AWESOME experience when it was released in the theatres.  Very few people will forget the experience.  I know I don't
LOVE this movie in 3D! Highly recommend this movie to anyone looking for an action-packed 3D movie! The special effects are awesome!
was I expecting more from this transfer to 3D blu ray.  Yes i was.  Probably as a new feature film would have been more impressive
a fun movie.  have liked this movie since it first came out.  Great to add another movie to our growing collection.
I etched the movie was great very happy with my purchase looking forward to shopping with you again thank you
Scary and enjoyable 3dformat movie and once you start watching it you could not leave your seat till the end.
I just love watching this dvd and feeling the t-rex walk accross my liv room floor with the sub cranked all the way up!
It was fun watching it in 3D. It was a great movie before and made it even better. Never get tired of it.
Great movie. Great actors. Interesting subplots and of course, VERY COOL DINOSAURS. This movie was ahead of its time and is still great fun to watch.
I am a fan of jurassic Park. This is a great movie. It got delivered on time and came with everything they said.
Dindo 3-d mania! Fun in 2-d, superb in 3-d this is the same ole movie, but in 3-d it feels like a new adventure again.
Another good example of escapism and total enjoyment for the family. Just a little on the hokey side tho, and not quite as good as the 'LOST WORLD".
Jurassic Park is one of my all time favorite movies. I have upgraded my  TV to HDTV and Blu-Ray so this was a &#34;must have&#34; for my collection.
Awesome Movie. Best Out of the Whole Trilogy. Tyrannosaurus Made a Good Addition. I Cryed in the Third One When Spinosaurus Killed T-Rex
on of fthe best movies 3d moviesof the year !! love this movie dont miss ! very recomended for all!! 8)
One of the best dinosaur movie I have ever seen. Great for all ages. A great addition for my movie collection.
I think most people have seen Jurassic Park by now, but if not it's a fun movie about dinosaurs that try to eat people.  I hope the dinosaurs win
Item was as listed, perfect.  Fast shipping. Thx!  Great seller.  :)  Would buy from again.
I love this movie! I bought the laserdisc, and I thought that was good. I know this DVD will be awesome! I can't wait!
I can't believe how old this movie is and I would still rather watch it than a new movie.  Love it... Watch the whole series in order!
What an awesome movie.  It was ground breaking at the time it was filmed.  It is still a great movie 20 years later.
Great film from the begining, but extra special in 3D. You can not believe how they jump out at you, and make you feel your right there.
The DVD arrived in perfect condition. i bought it as a tool in teaching my Biology students about genetics, cloning, dinosaurs and evolution.
The best film I've seen in blue ray yet. worth re buying. One of the most creative pictures in film making history.
this an oldie and a goodie! and for the price, I couldn't refuse! That's the end of my review but I am supposed to keep typing for some reason.
Loved the original and like this even better. I love being able to watch 3D in the comfort of my home.
This movie is a classic. It would have been nice had there been more extras, but the movie itself is always a winner.
A top 3D movie.  One of the best 3D movies I've ever seen.  Even though it was not originally made in 3D, it's great.
Still great after all these years.Picture quality was very good.Still laugh at the guy in the bathroom getting eaten.
this is one of the best 3d movies i have seen and i have approx 20 of them BUY IT !!!!
A classic movie and a must have for any movie collector. Always good to watch. Price, quality was all there.
this is a great movie. sam neil shined in the role. it is a must see for the whole family. LOVED IT
Awesome. Great classic. Kept me on my toes the whole time. It was just as thrilling to me as when I watched it when it first came out!
The original movie was good, but put it on 3D and WOW. Spielberg did a great job on this one.
My grandson is nine and this was the first time he saw it, just loved it.  We'll buy it for our collection.
Arrived on time and was packaged well.  This movied was great when it first came out, now its even better with 3D T-rex running at you.
GREAT SHOW NOW ADD 3D IT BECOMES BETTER. GRAND KIDS LOVE THIS MOVIE ADD POPCORN AND YOU CAN HEAR THEM SCREAM 2 HOUSES AWAY
good movie.  clean and nice for all ages.  streaming quality is good.  was fun for the entire family to view again.
If you are into the 3D visuals, I don't think you will be disappointed, A good quality 5.1 sound system will maximize the effects.
We have seen no less than 3 times and still looks fabulous belt. My 9 year old daughter and I enjoyed every minute
WHAT A MOVIE TO WATCH IN 3-D. BETTER THAN THE ORIGINAL. YOU FEEL LIKE YOU ARE RIGHT THERE IN THE MOVIE.
I love this movie, but I wasted my money on the 3D/DVD/BluRay/Digital bundle. This movie is great no matter what format
This 'oldie' is always fun to watch. IMO the best Dino flick ever made!! The velociraptors steal the show everytime!!!
Had never viewed it.Well worth a few hours to watch.Very good special effects.A fun flick to watch.
This was excellent in 3D and they did a good job in converting the moive to 3D for a movie that was not originally shot in 3D.
Anyone who knows this classic dinosaur movie will love this!!! Who couldn't possibly love Jurassic Park?  Let the adventure begin...
its awsome and scare super and super cool and super awsome and scarey in 3d movie i like it mush!
C'mon it's Jurassic Park!  What's not to like?  Spielberg, state of the art special effects, a great John Williams score and dinosaurs!!!
what's there bad to say about jurassic park? it's a classic movie for all ages for all audiences in my opinion.
Plus, Blu-ray, DVD, Digital Copy, and UltraViolet?  That's forward thinking!  Great movie, the best of all of em :)  Enjoy!
I loved this movie as a kid. It's every bit as good as I remember age hasn't ruined this one.
Classic Movie- greatly enhanced in 3D !!would recommend if you like dinosaurs!! In right more words ... Great!! Must see!
I really enjoy this movie.  Have always had a fascination with dinosaurs, just glad I didn't live when they roamed the earth!
Very sharp and clear picture...I loved this movie on TV..but even better on blu-ray.  It is Just a real good DVD
A Classic in HD and 5.1 surround.  I probably saw this movie a dozen times before the age of 13, it was great to see it again in HD audio and video.
I haven't watch the movie yet but i know i will like it i have seen it before.This is the FULL version
One of my favorite mini-series of all time. Fits the legend very well. As for the exact events of Masada the historians have yet to agree.
this is a very good movie my wife loved it very much it had a lot of passion in it.thank you
the other half of Spartacus. Zealots of 70BC Judea rebelling against Roman oppression. Masada is the place every member of the IDF take their oath.
This is a great older mini-series and certainly an asset to my vast collection. Arrived faster than a speeding bullit too!
This is an excellent addition to any dvd collection especially dealing with ancient Israel
Masada - The Complete Epic Mini-SeriesThis is an amazing mini-Series, excellent quality great to have to view many times with family and friends.
This is a pretty good telling of the story of the historical situation that lead to the mass suicide of the Zealots.
I shall be as succinct as others have been long-winded.  This film has helped me shape my soul.  Only God could have created a greater masterpiece.
Gregory Peck's performance is 5 stars! Amazing the plot of this film is somewhat still happening today in 'modern' times.
Great collector movie. Got the movie and is good shape. Pleasure to do business with.
From the civil rights era, a reminder of the way things used to be, in film as well as society.
What a wonderful movie. To Kill a Mockingbird is a real classic.  Now I can watch it whenever I want to.
this is a timeless piece I always enjoy tripping back in time , and this show does that every time I watch it.
I cannot imagine the strife regarding racial inequality during the time portrayed in this movie. Acting was second to none.
I have always enjoyed this movie, I now own the VHS, DVD and Blu-Ray editions. If you have never watched this movie, you really should
So much has been said about this film.  There is absolutely nothing more that can be said.  Just watch the movie and enjoy it!
This is a very good movie.  I would tell all people who enjoy old classics to consider this one.
This is a tough story but anytime you're dealing with racism, it's extremely difficult!  It was better than I could have hoped!
I enjoy classic movies and this one is a must for any collector's library. I recommend it to everyone who appreciates fine acting.
The quality of this DVD on an up to date flat screen is amazing! This is such a classic movie and I'm so happy it's now part of my collection!
Love this classic movie. Highly recommend. This was required reading for high school freshman. Getting to watch movie afterwards was a special treat.
We've been waiting for a good well produced disc to come out of this classic.  Finally we came across this edition at a reasonable price.
We were glad to find this really great film  at such a good price to add to our video collection
This is an excellent piece of  literature with a timeless and thought provoking  message! Great book and movie to spark family discussion!
I have always loved this movie, ever since it came out on TV when I was a child.  Gregory Peck is one of my favorite actors.
my mother was very happy to have this, and she enjoyed it alotshe was very pleased to got this as a mothers day gift.
There are just so few better stories...everyone should see this movie at least once in their lives.
gregory peck was absolutely wonderful as atticus finch!  he deservedly won the oscar for best actor for that performance.
THE MOVIE IS AS GOOD AS I REMEMBERED. THE QUALITY OF THE PRODUCT IS EXCELLENT.  i WOULD RECOMMEND THIS PRODUCT TO ANYONE.
A great classic that never loses it charm.  Thank you Mr. Peck for being the best at what you do.
I gave it as a gift.  The person receiving it was very happy and thrilled to get it.  One of his favorite movies.
Great movie you want to watch over and over. Great performance. Seller was fair with price and great with delivery. AAA+++++++++++++
This movie captures the racial tentions in small town south. Like the book you are taken in with the injustices in the south during that time period.
One of my favorite movies as a teenager!Now that my son is in high school, it is a required book to read.A classic to add to our shelves of movies!
Dated, but this still is powerful. Great application of a powerful story to film for reflection and a powerful impact.
Classic film of life in the early 20th century south US, with Peck as the fantastic Atticus Finch. Lawyer movie with the best man for the job
Bought it for a birthday present. She really liked it. I love this movie, so that is why I got it for her.
I loved that I got to watch it from the very beginning so many times I have come in on it while it already started
A must see for any movie buff. This is an iconic picture about an important part of our US History.
one of the best movies ever. one of my favorites. when me son was 5-12 years old we would watch this several times a year (by his choice).
This movie is one of my all time favorites. I have truly enjoyed watching this with my family and friends. Love it and am glad I own it!
I love Old movies.  This one reminds me of my Grammar school days.  I like  how the kids are always friends.
Hard to remember that we had to read this in High School, Every time I see it I so enjoyed more and more
Very Good
A brillantly written and acted movie. It stays true to Harper Lees book and is intense with a great plot.
I gave this as a Christmas gift. I love this movie! For all you classic movie lovers get it! A timeless story with an incredible message!
Our family of six really enjoyed this movie.  Great production; very well done.  My daughter and husband love the book even more.
I watched to help my sister with her home work, so I was not that happy with the idea but after I finished watching it I was very happy. good movie.
this film is worthy of all its plaudits over the years.  Gregory peck is marvelous.  the story packs a thunderous theme.
A classic. The book and the movie both won major awards and any reader will quickly see why. It is great.
Would love to have this, but $44.00 !!!  I'll have to wait, or go to TCM, shop. Or save for 3-4 months!
A timeless classic. Gregory Peck is perfection as Atticus Finch. And a then unknown Robert Duvall is unforgettable as Boo Radley.
I think this is a all time classic  you can enjoy over and over. One of the movies I never tire of watching
I don't know how many times I've watched this movie (and read the book).  I always enjoy it.  Of course, it is a classic and in HD it's even better.
I bought this for my husband for his birthday and really loved it and likes to watch movies over and over again.
Fantastic acting and incredible story!  Gregory Peck was one of the greatest actors of all-time!  Watch this movie and be amazed!
An excellent film with an extraordinary actor. This is worth owning. We have watched it several times and it always has a little tid bit new. .
The movie is 5 star. What can you say about the DVD? it gives the movie as I remember? Well, it does.
Time less, classic and great performances. Nothing has changed that much, still fighting bigotry and racism under new names, now it's economics.
The best movie every made. The acting, the story, the filming cannot be beat. Best picture oscar deserved for sure.
Not a word for word enactment of the novel, but extremely good.  See if you can spot who was playing Boo Radley before you look it up.
Gregory Peck turns in a great performance in a timeless movie about the old south. Well worth the money to see it.
This one of the greats and anyone who watches it will be touched. I will always love this movie and it is just one of the great classics.
I could not fault this move.  Gregory Peck's portrayal of Finch is astounding.  Gregory Peck IS Mr. Finch.  It's a movie I shall watch many times.
Originallyi  thought i saw this movie , but found out I never saw it. The story is very good.  Peck did a wonderful job as a father image.
One of the best movies and acting performances of all time. Fantastic and raw look into our countries past. One of my favorites for sure
How many movies are as significant to our times as this?  Peck is superb as always.  This is an ongoing social statement.
Bought as a gift for my husband, who loves musicals.  He absolutely loved it!  He was excited to see it on Blu-Ray.
Saw this one for the first time when I was about 10 years old.  My sister actually named her dog Boo Radley - the whole family loves this movie.
What can you say about this movie that hasn't already been said.  It is 50 years old but just as good now as then.
I never tire of viewing this classic, and I watch it at least once a year, if not more often.
Anyone who doesn't love this has no soul. Based on one of the world's great novels and that rare movie that rises to the level of the printed word.
This is a great classic and the story line has held up well throughout the years!  A must have for movie buffs
I cannot find words good enough...deeply moving...important.
THIS IS ONE OF THE FINEST MOVIES EVER PRODUCED. IT IS IN BLACK AND WHITE SO MAYBE OLDER FOLKS WOULD APPRECIATE IT.
Took a little longer to receive since it came from Europe.  Arrived in excellent shape and was worth the wait.
Great assassin characters, great movie, great plot, I can't say anything bad about the movie, cause it was just wonderful
A really great movie. Alternate ending is better than the onechosen. More true to the story. Good acting by all. Even Gere!
We have watched this movie several times on the TV and found it very good.  We decided we wanted to have a copy of our own.
I watched this movie a long time ago and bought it for a friend to watch.  Very good action movie.
One of my favorites with Brush Willis. I like this better than the original. Keeps you on the edge of your seat
Great story line and acting.  High intrigue.  I recommend it to anyone that loves action.Willis and Gere are a super duo...
great movie, would recommend it to anyone.  fabulous suspense and action.  watch it a few times each year at least.
This movie is OUTSTANDING in blu ray.  For anyone who liked the movie, this is a must for the collection!
The story line fit the plot well. The rifle technology followed a previous movie &#34;The Shooter&#34; aka &#34;Point of Impact.&#34;
This one of the best movies of its genre. I thoroughly enjoyed seeing it again and it really rivals The Day Of The Jackal from which it was adapted.
This is a wonderful film.  Full of suspense and surprise.  Adding this film to my existing collections just makes the collection better.
I enjoy ordering items that can and will be a blessing to others.  I am for sure that every person will enjoy a small gift of appreication.
Each cartoon just gets better and better I love everyone of these movies and I hope they never stop making these classics.
Kids love it.
A great kids show with good lessons.  My son watches it over and over and he loves to sing the songs.
I would highly recomend this movie it was very cute and me and my daughter liked it very well.
This Movie is awesome.  I love it. Very great kids movie. Product was in excellent shape. Very impressed. I would def recommend this product.
I love this series, I grew up on it. I absolutely adore these movies I bought them all. Great for kids
this movie is so adventurous and comical, this movie has action by every turn and the directing is literally great.
love the effects  very entertaining  keeps you on your toes  another good one for  the family to watch is you love  special action adventure effects
Absolutely BRILLIANT,EXCITING,SUPERB,MAGNIFICENT,GOOD and well just generally WOW. This film is really good you should get it.
I enjoyed the other movies. Didn't have this one. I knew I could depend on Amazon to get it. Thank You
This was a fun movie and lots of action It was a good second movie to the first. hope you enjoy it
This was a fine movie however is definately was not as good and original as the first but none the less a very good movie!!!
Not the best of the three Jurassic Park franchise.  Still some good suspense and characters that provide a passable story.
Jurassic Park I think has been seen by everybody so I don't think you need a review it's a great movie
I have this movie on DVD and think it's terrific. The BluRay version is EXCEPTIONAL. The sound reproduction is beyond perfection!
I enjoyed all of the movie. this one is good with jeff goldblum. this is for any fan of the jurassic park movies.
one of the series. if you liked the others you will like this one as well. hope to see another  some day.
what can i say about a classic. this movie never grows old...i think i'm going to rewatch all of the jurassic park movies now....
this is a really good movie. great storyline and cast. in my opinion it is a must see. good for the whole family
I love all the Jurassic park movies so now I'm retina get my collection up and if very rare to find this one because they never released it
this movie is just as good as the first, with its amazing music and thrilling attack scenes, it doesent dissapoint!
Took me a while to find this one. And,I'm very greatful .Because,my collection is now complete! Thank You ,Very Much...
it was a very cute movie. I bought if for a friend and she loved it, would highly suggestion watching it
Had seen the movie with commercials on cable...and wanted it to complete the trilogy. Actually really enjoyed this one more than the third take.
Though I like all the Jurassic Park movies, this one is my favorite so far.
Plenty of action in this movie.A well written story as well produce.Very good special effects.The acting by the stars is very good.
The kids enjoyed the movie!  They are on a roll to watch the series. The video quality was clear and we had no viewing issues.
Very supencfull and good. Scary. Everything a dinosour movie needs.
into anything dinasaur love anything jurassic park has, loved it, just the right kind of spooky, alway's nice when they all get away in a plane
I have enjoyed this DVD.  It was received in a timely manner and it works well on our clearplay player.  It was purchased at a very good price too.
I loved the series for a long time. But eventually I had realized I didn't actually have the DVDs so I wanted to get them as soon as I could.
Love the participants, love the locale, love the story. May there be more sequels, hopefully as well-done as this was.
This movie is a classic and I was unable to find it in local stores. Price wasn't bad and you get all 3 copies.
This film is inspiring as well as action-packed. Two brothers, firemen, on the trail of an arsonist. Great special effects.
brackdraft; I owned it for years on vhs and wanted it on dvd this is a great movie and so very real.
Its one of my all time favorite movies Ron Howard is great director. The story effects are all great A must have for me
This is a good movie. I previously had it in VCR format and wanted to upgrade to BluRay. My collection is now up to date with this movie.
Excellent movie! One of Kurt Russells best. I really like this movie, I watch it often. and enjoy it everytime I do. Thanks, Linda Hall
Another Solid Performance by Kurk Russell...Great story, great acting & for a Baldwin, William Does a solid job! Easy 5 star rating
This is among my favorite movies. Very well done. This came very quickly after ordering. Some parts too graphic for most younger kids
I've always liked Backdraft.I've had it quite a while on DVD but the video wasn't very good. What a big difference now that is on BD.
great movie lots of action , but somethings are  alittle over dramatized  .  good price. easy to view for download.
Good movie, finally got it in blu ray. now it dont have to wait for it to come on the movie channels in hd. fast shipped with other bundled movies.
The HD DVD version of Backdraft looks & sounds excellent. This looks great in HD and is a big improvement over the DVD version of the movie.
This is one of my favorite movies of van damme, i like how the power of love for your family is stronger than even time!!!
THIS WAS A GREAT VAN DAMME MOVIE BUT WITHOUT A WIDESCREEN EDITION AVAVABLE, I WOULDN'T BUY IT.
One of my all time favorite movies.  I could watch it over and over and never get tired of it.
i watch this movie a lot along with part 2.  I like to watch Jean-claude in all of his movies
No one likes Jean-Claude Van Damme in my house but me and this is one of my all time favorites - they don't know what's good stuff
Excellent movie, good plot, able to follow, action packed. Perfect visual experience on hd dvd.
VAN DAMME all the way,good fight scene's with good acting...you can watch this over and over it never gets boring..Ron Silver plays his part well..
I really like this movie and Claude was so needed in sequels!! It appears a lot of Canada DVDs are region good for the USA?
This was one of Van Damme's good movies that he was in.If you like Sci-Fi movies you are sure to enjoy watching this one.
TIMECOP IS AN EXCELLENT MOVIE IF YOU LIKE TIME TRAVEL SCI FI I WIOULD HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO BE PURCHASED
I like this movie and it is a remainder for the past. Believe it or not it is a good movie for me.
Great movie from the top to the bottom. I haven't seen this movie in years so I really enjoyed watching it.
I love Jean-Claude Van Damme. I love this movie. It was the best ever. Haven't seen it in a while. Would recommend it to anyone.
Wow what a cool movie. My hero is in this movie. Everything balances here for the fictional Earth. A plus
a gift for my friend he loved it is a child movie and could find it anywhere but here, great price and fast shipping
Got this as a present for someone and the adored it. Great value and the movie itslef is difficult to find.
A fun, fantasy film.  Great for kids and even adults!  Enjoyed the actors and thought they really made this film.
The last time I saw this movie it was on Disney Channel YEARS ago! I never thought I would find it again, but this site really helped!
Great movie.  Such an imagination for a male fairy godmother that isn't able to do anything right.  Definitely a family movie.
My daughter & I think Martin Short is very funny! We saw this a long time ago so when I saw it was available-just had to get it!
Great movie! Smart adventure and of course if it is based on warfare I do enjoy this type of films!!!!
I enjoy adventurous and drama movies and this one gave me a bit of both. It was a fine movie that I truly enjoyed
I'd recommend this movie with it's fast past and really good actors.  My husband and I watched it and really enjoyed it.
Lots of action,  Great Acting.  Edge of your seat movie.  Enjoy.
OH YA THE RUSSIAN ARMY IS BETTER AND TOUGH AS SHOWN IN THIS MOVIE HA HAH A AND I CONIDER THE RUSSIAN MILITARY AND BE RUSSIAN ARMY SPETNAZ
I never get tired of this movie.  It is a great film.  Action packed, realistic, good story, great acting.  This is a great film.
Good movie based on the changes since the Cold War. Good scenes and action. The ending was a bit unrealistic but worth watching
Many twists and turns with a strong thriller plot that will keep you at the edge.  Giving this a 5 star rating - excellent!
Wonderful date movie. Nicole Kidman a much better actress after leaving Tom Cruise. Always enjoy George Clooney. Would watch again.
I see movies like this as a training film, hopefully more for the the heroes than the villains in this type of possible nuclear scenario.
Have always loved this movie. I like the way the chemistry builds between the two leads as the movie goes along.And a good history lesson.
Highly packed adventure starring 2 of my favorite actors, Nicole Kidman and George Clooney. I'm surprised it is only rated 4 stars.
I saw this movie a long time ago and it was great. I had to have in my DVD collection.
great action packed movie with great acting, filled with good adventure, popular theme dealing with nukes and Russians and power
This has always been one of my favorite movies made even better with Blu-ray.A must own movie for any George Clooney or Nicole Kidman fans!
Lots of action. The stars were not bad too. It also had a pretty good story line behind it. I would recommend this one.
This is a fast paced and high action movie from beginning to end.  Loved it and enjoyed another Clooney movie.
Loved this exciting movie, and Clooney was excellent, as were the other actors. Non-stop action and a touch of humor.
I have seen this movie in past and enjoyed it just as much recently.  Acting, directing all superb.  Good plot.
A great flick.Clooneys best work. Nicole kidman does not have to do anything.,she just has to be there and most men would love the movie
I really liked it, this is the only movie I have of Vincent Price singing and playing the piano. Interesting.  He also seemed to know his history too
Vincent Price is always amazing !! Classic story with good actors. this is my favorite version of this movie. You will not be disappointed
treat yourself to this wonderfully non-sensical movie.  Whether you're on a Mission From God or not, this is one of the best pick me ups ever
Hey, they're on a mission from God! What's not to love about that? I love this movie and have fun every time I see it!
Implausable to be sure but a real rocker the way many of us would like to operate; GO FOR IT !
We loaned our copy out and never got it back, so we actually re-purchased this.They are hilarious and the music is fantastic
this is - no doubt - one of the top 10 movies...doesnt get old..even 20 years later..forget about BBII..isnt even anywhere near the first one.
This is a good movie for the music alone.Its a raare comedy that makes you laugh at really funny things in life.
But I am amazed at the price listings of $80-$150.  Just wait until it is released again in 2005, will range in prices of $15-$20.
i love this movie could watch it every day!we're on a mission from god . . . . .
I love the Blues Brothers car with the microphone on top of the car. What's funny is that they crash thru the mall that was recently demolished.
It may be just personal bias, but there is not a better movie than this one! The cast rules, as well as the music!!!!!!!!!!!
wow, if you ever need to simply sit down and enjoy a few laughs and great blues - this is the one!
If you like the blues, great artists, car chases and a silly plot...this is your movie.  A classic American film.
Another blast from the past. Funny and with a slight message. It was their hay day for making a good movie. I love the music in it too.
I love The Blues Brother since I sow the movie for the first time. And I will love them for my rest of my life!!
we have been watching this film for years in VHS. Great improvement in DVD. great price
classic movie.  dvd in perfect condition, which should be a given...but i just had to return a brand new dvd with a defect, so go figure.
I will give this movie a 5, I personally haven't seen it yet but it was a gift for my boyfriend and he loved it.
Great music, Great movie. The dance scenes are hilarious ! A timeless classic ! Worth adding to your collection.! Recommend
A true classic!
It's a classic. Funny, good action, good music and just a good time. You'll end up watching this over and over. Good for our collection.
All the fun of the original, plus an extended version, interviews & lots of extras! Husband & sons laugh at this one over and over.
This is a Great classic movie with lots of laughs and its worth watching many times over! It is one of my favorites.
Not only is this one of the best movies but it was also cheap.  I highly enjoyed it and I think everyone should own it!
it good it good it good love, loved , loved lovrd loved loved loved loved loved loved loved loved loved, Iloved
Again, a movie from my kids youth and now the kids I am taking care of.  You can't help but laugh.  Lots of fun.
My husband usually does not like comedies, but he laughed and cried all the way through Mouse Hunt because it is so funny.
Mouse Hunt is a Hilarious movie and I highly recommed it.  It's one of thosemovies that you can watch over & over again.
Funny movie.  Nathan Lane is hilarious as usual.  Kids will love this film and most adults will also like it.
Mouse Hunt is one very funny movie. The mouse in this movie is well trained for it's comedy skits. This a must see comedy......
This movie is a very funny movie it will have u in stitches with laughter .And some times you will even cry.
That mouse was surely smart. He could out take on everyone. It was great he could helpout in the end.
A very good film. The intrigue is built well.  We pass by quite the ranges of emotion. The mouse is so smart. Great time in watching it.
You wont this movie on Blu-ray. Too bad to. Because it well made and the story is full of happy times of rolling on the floor.
My grandchildren loved it!  They are 9 and 6 years old.  They were giggling from the start of the movie.
The whole family loves to watch this movie. When we have guests the kids ask if they've seen it and if not we watch it again!
not only is this a very funny movie but also ends up with a great story line, will watch it often when the need to laugh strikes me
This movie is so awesome and great and so funny!! I would recommend this to anyone I love this movie.
This movie needs to be on blu-ray. This movie is fun. This video transfer is well done and it does upscale well in my Blu-ray player.
I saw the movie again last night and wow!!!!! i was laughing all the time, what a funny movie, well done.Highly Recommend !!!!!!!!
This is a funny and creative movie for all ages. I first saw this movie when I was very young, and loved it.
My girlfriends kid loved it!This is one of my fav's and I pass it on every chance I get.
Loads of family fun, although a few scenes may need parental guidance.  The trained mouse is hilarious with the mischievous things performed.
Dave Chappelle is always hilarious, then this movie is a must have for you fans. An awesome cast of actors and extras. Hilarious
Love to watch. Funny movie to enjoy while doing what the Title states. Dont expect Oscar material - just a lot of laughs
this is one of the greatest movies ever. it is awesome! dave chappel, jim breuer and a bunch of others rule! this one of my favorite movies.
allot of stoner movies are funny but not as funny as this hysterical movie. great movie with classic lines and dave chapelle. i love this movie.
This is just allot of funny guys doing what they do. And Scarface, you are right my brother. No one wants to die by a crossbow.
I like Dave Chappelle and I found this movie very funny.  I would recommend this to anyone who likes a good comedy.
this  is the  funnyest  movie  of  all  time any one  that has  not  seen it  should  half backed  is great
This movie is for serious cannibis connoisseur's. Whether you support the movement or not, this is a droll of a comedy.
&lt;3 it!!! 2 bad they dnt make movies like this NEmore!! Perfect cast! 2 bad there was never a Half-Baked 2!
Why do we love to see tortured actors portraying parts where they do good things? A suspenseful movie in its own right. Fast delivery!
This movie has action, suspense, and Bruce Willis need I say anymore. I like his movies and if your a fan like me then this is for you.
Bruce Willis helps save an autistic child from government bad guys to think the boy knows their secrets.  Another excellent performance for Willis.
this movie is still awesome and it was a great price,,cant complain when you get something and it actually works :)
This was another great movie with Bruce Willis and Miko Hughes does a wonderful job as Simon.  It brings some attention to autism.
An excellent character portrayal of Bruce Willis and his co-star: the little boy.  It was suspenseful, and well acted by all. I loved the story.
I first saw this film in a movie theater in 1946. Very exciting with lots of action. Well done movie
Definitely a must see movie!!!! This is the best version of Jesus Christ Superstar rock opera! Must have it in your collection!
I had always enjoyed the music from this, but had never seen the movie.  Sublime!  Happy, happy :)  Highly recommend.
Saw the original show many years ago;  have seen it 2 or 3 times since.So HAD to have the DVD.  Excellent
I am replacing a VHS tape with a DVD of the same title.  I am replacing only those films than are great.
My wife loves this movie, found it on Amazon, she is a happy camper now ! Ted Neeley was a good fit for the role .
This is a Great musical from the past to add to our collection of vintage movies and from the 70s
my teenagers had never seen it!  they loved it, as i do.  wonderful musical and wonderful cast.  made me cry, as always
We watched this over Easter and plan to watch it again Christmas.  It is a twice-a-year favorite for us now!
AS GOOD AS I REMEMBER WHEN FIRST RELEASED.  A GOOD TOOL FOR TEENS AS A DIFFERENT  LOOK AT CHRIST.
My oldest is a teenager now & I've enjoyed introducing her to all my favorite shows.  She loves this!
Enjoyed seeing this years ago. Now I can watch when I want. I can share the experience with friends.Great songs. Even better message.
This portrayal of Jesus might not be what you expect, but it's thought-provoking and well done.  Our teenage son has watched it several times!
This is an amazing musical with lots of great songs.  These songs are timeless and the film gives you a look at the last few days of Christ.
Enjoyed every minute of it. Now i was able to donate the VCR version I had. The music is outstanding in this broadway show.
Great movie! Reminds me of the 70's. The singing is wonderful and the acting is as well. Hope you like it as much as I did.
At long last on BluRay format.I can never thought it would come. I always watch it when I get a chance. Thjs js what made Ted Neely a JC Superstar!
I bought this as a gift for a member of my family.  She had never seen it before and she loved it.  Great product at a super price.
Love love love this movie.
I know this is old school and I am aging myself for everyone but this is hands down the best movie of our ( the new elderly) time.
The first time I watched this movie I thought it was hilarious, so when I saw it I had to get it.
Corny but funny.  Kind of a satire on women who don't want to age and will do anything to prevent it.
I loved this film it was so much fun and Bruce Willis was awesome as well as the two gals we all love and adore.
Fun and some great laughs throughout the entire film.  Great to have on as backup up while doing other things.
I love the actors cast in this movie!  They keep you laughing thru out the movie!  I am so glad I made this purchase!  :)
Great movie for all ages!  Funny, a little violence but no gore and it wasn't gratuitous.This is a great addition to the video library
I can watch this over and over again.Everyone is so over the top and hilarious. A must see.Plus Goldie & Meryl... MEOW!
This movie gives you the creeps but in a good way cause it is so funny and makes you think about when you get old lol.
one of my favorite movies of all time, great story, good special effects, fun & humorous, you won't be disappointed
Great to watch years later.  Kevin Klein is a great actor,  It's a shame about River Phoenix.  He played a great roll.
All three were fantastic in this comedy, didn't picture Willis to play a funny roll, I always saw him in action.
I have loved this movie since I was a kid.  If you are looking for a goofy comedy, look no further.
I love this movie...Its so funny. When she falls of the stairs was so funny and she scares the guy. Too funny. I am watching it now!
When this movie first came out it was rather strange. I grows on you. Im a Hawn and Streep fan so the two of them together is top!
Love this movie, I never get tired of watching it. It's a great movie to watch with my grandkids, they love it too.
This was a great movie I always love this movie it was the best the first time I saw it made me laugh.
I  have seen this movie about 4 diff. times, and still am anxious to see it again. Some movies are just like that.
DVD left something to be desired.DVD arrived in a very timely fashion.DVD arrived in excellent condition.
I just love this movie! It takes a twist on the notion of being young and beautiful forever! Also, be careful what you wish for!
I ordered this movie, because I watched it years ago and loved it.  I'm a huge Meryl Streep fan.  Probably wouldn't have been as good without her..
I would recommend this dvd to people over 16 years it is very funny and humerous. I gave it five stars
A keeper for sure.  Awesome acting and special effects and a superb, if not weird, storyline.  I highly recommend it!
This is an amazing movie. Lots of comedy, drama, and the plot is unique. This is a must for any movie collection.
If you haven't seen this movie, buy it, cuz you're gonna want to watch it again and again! Meryl Streep is just the best!
Hillariously funny. My kids couldnt believe that was Bruce Willis! lol  Loved it. Goldie Hawn never gets old!  :)  Sweet
EXCELLENT MOVIE, NOTHING LIKE LIFE AFTER DEATH! GOLDIE HAWN PLAYS A VERY GOOD PART IN THIS VERY FUNNY MOVIE! EXCELLENT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Great movie!! I paid a great price for it and it came with an amazon copy that I can watch whenever from my amazon account.
It does not get any better than this.
When I first saw this movie,I didn't think I was going to like it. But I'm so very happy to say I was wrong. I couldn't get enough
Kindergarten cop with Arnold Schwarzenegger is a wonderful movie. A cop poses as a teacher. Cute, funny and heartwarming. Fun for all.
The best movie ever but may be a little on the violent side for small kids.  The fact it was filmed in Astoria Oregon makes it even better.
This is one of Arnold Schwarzenegger's better movies.  Both my wife and I enjoy watching it over and over.  It is very entertaining.
One of my all time favorite movies! Its funny and serious and filmed where I once resided. Thanks, linda hall
funny funny  movie  love arnold  watch this movie at least 4 timesand i will watch it more times in the future  he is just great actor
Something you would never see a guy like Arnold Schwarzenegger do if you've only seen Terminator. Very funny!!  Buy this.
luv arnold  , will end up buying all his movies, this 1 was a great 1 enjoyed it so much
I love Arnold Swartzenegger (cannot spell it) and he is really funny in this. Great action, funny, and serious at the same time movie!
This is another one for my Arnold Schwarzenegger collection fantastic picture big upgrade over the DVD top-quality picture and sound quality
One of the best comedies , from a action actor, that I have seen in a long time. Hope there will be more. G.Goff
I think this is one of Arnold's best movies.  It not a blood and gore movie, but an comical romantic film, good for the entire family.
It has been a long time since I've seen this movie, and it was just as enjoyable as I remember it.
This is a great movie. We enjoyed it.  Good movie to watch with tweens.  Might be too suspenseful for small children.
ARNOLD AT THE TOP OF HIS  GAME. iT WAS WELL WRITTEN AND ACTED. A PLEASURE TO WATCH!LOVED IT, ARNOLD ROCKS!
Love this movie! We've watched it over and over again. Funny, sweet, great cast and entertaining film. All ages enjoy!
great movie and a must -see! Eddie M is amazing and his characters unique and some completely out of control.
Funny movie. Would totally watch it again and again. Can even watch it with the family. You will enjoy it.
I think that this film works, even though you can start to see the wear and tear of the &#34;play all the characters&#34; plan.
The best of the series. Eddie is so funny in all the characters he plays. Jada was very good. I know she cracked up during the filming.
This movie is one of my favorites. Eddie is so funny, and plays so many characters. Always a go to movie.
I abdolutely love this movie. It is such a heartwarming tale, and fun to watch. Very entertaining for people of all ages.
We love this movie. It's simple, effective and shows the power of being gentle in a rough and ugly world. That'll do...
I got this for my daughter and we both really enjoyed it! It's a cute movie and has some funny parts.
Good movie for the hole family to watch.Love it! I would recomed it any one who is looking for a good family film to see.
Gotta love Babe!
This is a fun sequel to Babe. Well written and played out. For children or adults and pet lovers alike.
I bought this for myself and one for my daughter! We both love this movie and the sequel also. Thanks again!
Heartwarming! Its not available in blu ray didn't want the dvd took the instant video instead. wish it had special feautures and captiond though.
If you are a guy and do not like High Plains Drifter...well...you probably aren't from around here.  What ever that means.
Classic tale of a wronged man exacting his revenge upon those who betrayed him. Funny yet deadly serious. Well done.
I love Clint Eastwood westerns and this one didn't disappoint me. If you're a fan of Clint Eastwood's westerns you really need to check this one out.
Another great movie with Clint Eastwood which made him great. Playing the roll of a cowboy
I love all the old Clint Eastwood classic westerns and this was one of my favorites.  1 2 3 4
I can't believe that this is a 30 year old movie!! It's just unbelievable. You better watch it or you'll miss all the fun!!
My husband and I are both Clint Eastwood fans and we love ALL of his westerns.  Am looking forward to purchasing them all in the future.
Clint Eastwood at one of his best. Would have liked to see extras with this. Making of bloopers etc. This one never gets old.
Very well done I really like Clint Eastwood a big fan. His start was in westerns and this is a classic if you like him. He makes the movie.
This is one of the best westerns ever made ... Period !!What more is there to say.
My husband loves the westerns that Clint Eastwood was in and I bought this for him for one of his stocking stuffers.
This is a great western with supernatural overtones. Typical Eastwood which means you should have it in your collection. Worth many viewings
This movie and Pale Rider are our two favorite movies of all time.  We cannot find High Plains Drifter on blu-ray.  We are surprised.
High Plains Drifter - Clint EastwoodOne of Eastwood's best in the old spaghetti western genre, certainly my favorite spaghetti
Aw man...What a cool thing to have my favorite Clint Eastwood Western on restored Hi-Def! If you like Clint...you'll love this!
It is possible to argue which of Eastwood's movies are his best, but High Plains Drifter should surely be counted among them.
never tire of client eastwood, he is a great actor and a great western movie star. this movie was good and the story line was well done.
a good film, here only avaeble in french, pitty that I had to change my videocode to canadian code for the right speed
Along with terminator the Conan movie have always been a classic and love to watch these movies all day long
I always loved this movie. In Blu-ray, It's even better. The HD is awesome. I recommend this movie to the fans of Arnold S.
It is nice to watch this on blu-ray. It is a classic Schwarzenegger move and every action movie lover should watch it. Fantastic music also.
This movie I love due too that Arnold is in it and its just fun to watch if you are having a relaxation night
Conan was the first to not be super campy.  Just a great movie and a big part of Arnold's foundation.
I like classical soundtrack music and movie combine together and I'll keep it for my lifetime on the shelf and watch it once a while.
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. It has action and a bit of suspense. What can I say, It's an Arnie movie.  Thanks.John
Pretty true to the comic. A great popcorn movie. Fun too watch lots of action good and bloody what more could you ask for.
Answer:  The special Blu-Ray edition of this film.I loved all the Conan movies.. Robert E. Howard would be proud!
This is so much better than the original release where the end just doesn't make much sense and you are left wanting.
a classic never gets old and this here is the best conan movie next to its sequel that Arnold appears in
One of the best!
This is a very interesting movie I enjoyed watching it with my grandson and with my daughter I will share it with my family
Not only is the movie & story enjoyable, the music score is rather pleasant. Like a comic book come to life. Just plain fun!
JOE PESCI AND ROBERT De NIRO..Together are great..we have Raging Bull,Once upon a time in america...But its all about Goodfellas and Casino
Who said Don Rickles can't act in serious roles?HA!  Donnie my boy puts on a great show.Anything with Don Rickles in it is a award winner!
And especially this duo, I really enjoyed this film. I have it in two formats. The traditional and the downloadable version
With this all-star cast, it will keep you entertained from beginning to end.  A wonderful movie.
It's a classic Robert DeNiro and Joe Pesci performance.  These two work SO well together it's crazy!!  What a fun movie!
If you saw the film, you know what to expect.  The Blu0Ray quality is near perfect!  That is all that needs to be said.
This movie was very good. But it felt very long. Very entertaining and a great cast. This movie is very disturbing and quite funny.
Having worked in a major casino, this movie is entertaining and educational.  What a time it was back in the day.
Cant get enough of gansta movies? Then you need this movie in your collection for sure! Everyone should go out and get this movie!
Why doesn't Casino get any love? It's one of the best mob movies of all time. Must buy for fans of the genre.
&quot;Goodfellas&quot; is as over-rated as this film is under-rated. This is far and away the better of the two.
such a piece of art;  story, photo, script, characters,everything goes accordingto the main topic of the film, just a classic!
Enjoyed watching this Old Time Movie that NEVER GETS OLD!!You would too if you like suspense and Mobster theme! Highly Recommended!
Timeless cult-classic brilliantly restored and preserved in highest quality possible today - 5.1 audio and Full HD video. What more can You want?
I really enjoyed this movie.  Yes, it is graphic and vulgar, but the acting is great - as you would expect from De Niro, et al.
This Movie is one of the best of all time.. Gives you a glimpse of how the Vegas life was & how the industry has changed from it..
De Niro, Pesci, Sharon Stone all AMAZING, especially together. This movie has been an especial favorite of mine for many yrs. Really enthralling!
Order arrived in perfect shape within promised time.  This movie is a classic and is enjoyable every time!
seen the movie years ago. needed to get it on dvd. only had it on vhs. still an all time favorite
Great movie classic.  Parts of the story took place in reality. De Niro and Pesche were at there typical best.
Violent, language...that said, most interesting, engrossing, story and characters. An absolute most see for anyone who enjoys film. And it is VEGAS!!
I was very happy about this product, it arrived on time and in the describe way it was supposed to arrive, I was happy and thanks once again
SO MUCH DRAMA AND CONFUSION PLUS SOME FUNNY PART'S TO. YOU HAVE TO WATCH AND SEE.
Best production of Robert De Niro, Sharon Stone, Joe Pesci and other classic stars all together that I've ever seen for some time. I love it.
This is one of the best movies in the world. Goodfellas is the best. Got them both on Blu-Ray now. Awesome as the day it came out.
This is a really cool video! It's great to see Hercules & Xena work together to fight the titans on Mount Olympus. I gave it all five ratings.
I am a fan of the TV series but this would have made a great cartoon series. Xena and Herc fighting side by side. One of my favorite cartoon movies.
I like good special effectsI have always had an interest in the time period of dungeons, dragons and Kings and Queens.
Great movie. Dennis Quaid is a great actor. Enjoyed watching Quaid and the dragon getting to. Know each other and becoming friends.
Great good over evil flick.  Very imaginative and just good fun.  It is always refreshing to see self-sacrifice prevail over selfishness.
great older movie.  The dragon is very cute. good for kids 10 yrs
My son loves dragon movies and it is hard to find a new dragon movie for him to watch. This one was affordable and definitely kept his attention.
He loved the story. He found a plastic dragon and promptly named it Draco. It does cause a few tears but it has a happy ending.
Sean Connery lovers won't be dissatisfied.  Great movie and Dennis Quaid is equally a winner in this one.
A familiar scenario, but a brilliant film.  As unique as the best of them. Very surprised with this purchase
GREAT movie. My video game-obsessed 12 year old little boy loves it. There is no cursing or sex, so the movie focuses only on the story line.
For lovers of fantasy and dragons, this DVD is a classic and loved by me as well as my grandkids.
The combination of Dennis Quaid and Sean Connery playing off of each other makes for a great movie. I would recommend it to anyone.
LOVE this movie.  Action, comedy, tragedy and great special effects. Can't beat voice and facial expressions of Sean Connery as the dragon.
If you enjoy a fantasy that is a total joy to watch for adults and children together. This is it.
Great story. It captivates my grandchildren.
This is a very fun movie to watch, love it glad i ranted it. Will tell people about it and how good it is.
This is my all time favorite movie. For one, Sean Connery plays a dragon. This movie never gets old. It's just fantastic. Just watch it!
This is a great movie if you like dragons.  I do.  I especially enjoy Sean Connery as a Knight of the Round Table.  All the Knight movies are great.
MY WHOLE FAMILY HAS ENJOYED THIS ONE SEVERAL TIMES. UNFORTUNATELY I BOUGHT IT IN HD FORMAT AND NOW HAVE TO REPLACE IT WITH BLU RAY.
I really enjoyed this movie. Sean Connery was a great choice for the voice of the dragon. This is a movie I will enjoy many times.
The DVD came in right on time and in excellent condition. Absolutely no wear and tear on the case at all nor scratches on the disk.
This is a great family movie.  It makes you believe in dragons.  Its funny and sad..I loved it.  Its a movie that u can watch over and over again.
My 7 year old loved it the first time, sort-of watched it the second time, and ignored it the third time.
One of my favorite movies. Great visuals, and I absolutely love the sound track. One you could watch over and over again.
Hitchcock's masterpiece was the first of its kind with a truly disturbing psychopath and suspenseful lead to finding the killer!
Yes I liked the extra features found in the blu-ray. It was worth the buy. And will go next too my Hitchcock bio movie staring Anthony Hopkins.
thank you i loved it i hope you have a great day and like i said thanks it was good
Great film, great transfer.  This film has never looked better outside of the cinemas than on blu ray.  Highly suggested.
A thriller from beginning to end, as all great movies should be.  Hitchcock just doesn't get much better than this one~5 STARS!
One of Hitchcock's finest works...Great picture and great extras. Another must.
What else can on say about the master of suspense at the very top of his game.  If you haven't seen this one you are missing a real treat.
STILL CREEPY AFTER ALL THESE YEARS..PSYCHO IS ONE HELLUVA GREAT HORROR FLICK AND BLURAY MAKES IT LIGHT UP AND SPIN...
Simply put, a masterpiece of filmmaking, story telling. Hitchcock is proven by this movie to be the best in suspence
Great classic movie by Hitchcock.  Fantastic picture in Blu-ray for a B&W film.  I highly recommended this movie for the serious collector.
'Psycho' is a classic with many memorable scenes.  It is one of Hitchcock's best.  Buy it if you can find it for a good price.
I love this movie and it is a kewl movie for anyone who loves scary movies or horror  films like me.
Psycho is by far one of the best classics to date. Anthony Perkins was a true GREAT in his time!!
Love it for the classic film maker, Hitchcock, who did things here that had never been done in film before!
Alfred Hitchcock this is a classic the best Horror movie of all time. Add it to your Horror stack.
This is one of Hitchcock's gratest films. The commentary that goes with it is helpful.
Great scary movie, reasonably priced, scared the daylights out of me, title very fitting, watch it and you'll know what I mean
Classic movie not much else to say. Saw this when I was younger, not as scary now lol but still a good movie.
If you like movies, you would have to like this well done movie. If your lucky you don't know the secret :).  Worth watching either way.
Scary, unpredictable, and a Hitchcock classic. Janet Leigh is gorgeous, and Anthony Perkins is a creep. What else do I need to say?
It's a classic, one of the best. You can't go wrong with this movie, it's up there with the Exorcist, Jaws, the Shining, etc.
PSYCHO is one of the greatest movies of all-time. Anthony Perkins (Norman) runs a hotel then some strange doings happen.
I have been looking for this disk for some time.  It came in perfect condition and on time.  The price was more than reasonable.
Psycho is a wonderful horror movie of its time.  A classic that should be viewed by all and appreciated for the piece of art that it is.
It is a movie I saw in a theater when it was first released.  I think Anthony Perkins is an interesting actor.
Black &amp; White photography at its best! Way, way ahead of its time. Thank you Hitch.
Great movie, great gift for the Alfred Hitchock fan in you life.  Pop the popcorn, and enjoy the show !!!!!
I love the movie and have owned it for several years.  I made this purchase as a gift for a friend.
First time I have ever viewed Psyco ! Truly the suspensful masterpiece by the great director Alfred Hitchcock.  Powerful story line too !
classic movie always have been a fan of horror movies and this is an oldie but a goodie. worth watching
This is one of the great all time classic horror movies. I never get tired of watching it.
Still think Tony Perkins is the best Sick  B@#*^&d ever! Not sure why I chose HD other than habit but the sound was probably better.
A disturbing look into the mind of a boy who's not &quot;all there&quot;.  Still holds up today.Very highly recommended.
One of those films that does everything right!  And it is a horror film no less!!!What can I say that has not been stated before.  A perfect film!
If you saw this and don't recognize it as a great film for a number of reasons, you need to stop watching movies and stick to TV sit-coms. Forever.
Anthony Perkins' performance is still great to watch but the real star is Hitchcock's camera. A black and white treasure that outshines its sequels.
THIS IS A CHRISTMAS PRESENT FOR MY HUSBAND IT IS ONE OF HIS FAVORITES SO I AM SURE THAT HE WILL LIKE IT IN BLUE RAY.
sCARY, HORRIFYING, BLOODY AND ONE TO WATCH AGAIN AND AGAIN!!!!tHEY MADE OTHER pHYSCO'S BUT THE ORIGINAL IS THE BEST!!! I PROMISE!!!!
There is really nothing I can say about this film that history has not already said.  But if I had to describe it?  PERFECT!!!!!
Great actors and acting indeed! Janet Leigh's role was just to short. I still think it was a good movie.
Everyone who enjoys being psycholigically frightened while remaining physically safe can enjoy this.  Not for anyone who is prone to nightmares.
Coming through, coming through, make way for an essential film, you need to see many times, the film is made impeccably!!!!
What can I say that the movie cannot tell you better. This is a chiller classic and can give you goosebumps to this day.
Product Arrived on time and in excellent condition.  The film is a classic!  If you haven't seen it, you absolutely need to.
This is not only a wonderful movie, but THE best DVD I've seen yet, with more features than you'll know what to do with.
We love this movie!  Very entertaining all the way through.  Robert Redford, in his youth, is always something to see!
Great movie, hard to find...made a great gift for a family member.......It is very enjoyable to watch...true classic movie Hats off to Redford!
I didnt care for the women actors could of gotten prettier.I always love these actors together a great classic film all should see.
Paul Newman, always good.  Very good plot, keeps you guessing.  I had seen it many years ago and I think I enjoyed itmore this time.
This DVD replaces a VHS tape of the same movie.  Robert Redford and Neuman are great in this film.  I am only replacing great films.
great actors, good story, great joplin music, good memories, glad I bought it here (have it on the old vhs)
great acting, storyline, awesome soundtrack and costumes,this is my favourite all time movie.  the cars and the greatsupporting cast alone.
I bought this DVD for my personal enjoyment.  I own it on VHS.  A fun film.
A great classic with great stars.  My husband and I enjoy it equally.  I would recommend it to everyone I know.
If you like Robert Redford and Paul Newman this is the movie to have. I think this started their careers.
My old DVD acquired feet but no matter as I now own this on blu-ray. A timeless classic and must see.
I loved the ending of this movie.  it keeps you on the edge of your sit until the last moment.
The team of Redford and Newman can't be beat and this one is a classic!
Excited to get this video - very happy with price and DVD.  Another old favorite.
A movie we have seen before, but it is a classic to us. Owning the DVDE means we can watch it again and again.
Newman and RedfordNimbly pull off con; It's likeDancing on the Sun
One of the best movies ever made. It is a must to own in your DVD collection.
I  love this movie.  It was extremely well done and timeless.It was very enjoyable and glad to see the comeuppance ofthe bad guys
Excellent of old time con operations with suprises and ending with things you didn't expect.Need more movies like this for family entertainment
This movie is a classic not only for the superb acting but also for the soundtrack of Scott Joplin tunes.
It seems Paul and Robert were made for each other:) both excellent actors and very believeable.
A classic.  You just don't  get this kind of directorial skill or cinematograpy in movies today!
This is one of my all time favorite movies. One that never (for me) seems to get old. I highly recommend it!
A really terrific movie, never slows down, Newman - Redford, great sound track - see it / buy it / watch it again.
loved it then, loved it still.  paul newman and robert redford plus robert shaw make this a movie to be remembered and collected.
Not a bum in the cast, not a fault in the plot, and deserved every Oscar it won!Good quality DVD.
I saw this way, way back, probably at a theater?! Loved it then, loved seeing it again! Highly recommended! Revenge is Sweet!
This movie is pure magic... just when you think you have it... You will be stung again. Sit back, this is family entertainment at it's best.
Don't blink or go to the bathroom or you might miss one of the many gems or twists on this classic.  Redford and Newman at their respective bests.
Great movie, the quality is as good as I expected. Please guys if you buy a movie do not tell us about the story, we all know why we want to buy it.
Great watch. Must see it from the start to get the end. Was not sure how it was going to end. Great ending.
This is one of the all time great films.  The acting, the story, the plot andthe filming.  One of the fifty all time best.
Robert Redford, Paul Newman, and Robert Shaw.  Great acting and fun to watch the tough get ripped off!  Good music too.
The picture was sharp and the sound was clear.  This is a very good blu ray copy and wort the money I paid for it.
My son loves all the older classic movies and this was a great addition to our collection. I love that it came with a digital download.
Always loved this movie. Had it on VHS, had it on DVD, now I have it on Blu-ray! Now my daughter (who is a huge Kevin Costner fan) can have the DVD!
This is one oft most favorites splurge because he gets to see his father again. That is my dream to
One of our favorite movies, even a story kids could enjoy, just would be nice if there was less cussing.
This is one of the greatest Baseball Movie ever made. i love this film. Kevin Costner is outstanding. I Recommend it for everyone
Great cast, story line and a must-see if you love baseball.  Peanuts, popcorn and Cracker Jacks all around for this one.
I love this movie and it is very well done.such good acting and I think this is one of kevin costners best films.
A quintessential baseball movie.  James Earl Jones makes it look so easy and the actress who plays the daughter is marvelous.
A good family movie.  Kevin Costner plays an excellent part.  It's a feel good movie to watch when taking time to relax.
Great I loved this film.I lost my father many years ago &this film hit the spot.if people wearnt around I mite of got emotional.lucky for me.
this too is an amazing story i love bb and loved how this was written , james earl jones is a great actor keven costner was amazing in this movie
Field of Dreams was a good Movie for Baseball Fans.  I didn't care for the foul language in the movie because it takes away from the movie.
Who doesn't love Field of Dreams.  Classic.
I loved seeing and hearing Burt Lancaster again! Kevin, Amy, little girl(name?),James Earl Jones and the others made the movie great!
This film was made at the height of Kevin Costner's peak. This is a wonderful movie & a must have for any baseball fan.
This movie is so rewarding.  And taking in place in Iowa just adds to the magic!  Beautifully cast, beautifully filmed. Brain candy!!!
I watched this movie when it first came out and decided to rent it again to show my children.  Definitely worth watching again.  Great family movie!
Kevin Costner has made some fine movies but this is his best (in my opinion).  And for all you metaphysical people, this is right up your alley.
I had not seen this in a while and it is just a  wonderful feel good movie and I love it.
Classic in it's own time.The actors are great but it wouldn't have even mattered. The story is one of a kind.It gives you goose bumps.
Still one of those feel good films, basing fact and fantasy in an entertaining film. Anyone up for another inning with a sequel?
Anyone expecting perfection from a film this old is nuts !! The blu ray is mostly excellent on my set(sony XBR). Classic, classic movie
We had this on VHS, but upgraded to DVD so my son could enjoy. He absolutely loved the movie (12 yrs old), as anything baseball I'd his passion.
I wish they made more to this good home-spun videos.  It a  moving story of America's favorite past time sport.
Kevin Costner fan.  Good movie.
This was a Christmas gift.Made for a great party stuffed in the stockingof a family for Christmas. Nice Surprise!!
This is a superb movie and even tho it is very old it is still a classic.  We enjoyed seeing it again.
This movie came in great condition and it didn't take very long to recieve it and if you haven't seen this movie than you are not a John Wayne fan
John Wayne was a icon in the movie industry. I have most of the john wayne movies. This movies stars 2 of hollywoods greatest.
My husband really enjoys John Wayne. Color in this old move is great. Hard to find where I live. Glad Amazon has what we need.
The one that finally got him the Oscar.  So worth watching, Katherine Hepburn is always good.  Glad to have it.
really, nowit's the duke for goodness sakeif you are too young to understand that, you are overdue watching
The shipping was fast and just love the movie and is my favorite.thank you Amazon.com for the opportunity to purchase.
you can never go wrong with buying A JOHN WAYNE movie , THIS IS A VERY GOOD ONE , I would recommend it
This is one of the better westerns and has two great actors that do a great job.  I would recommend this movie to everyone.
wonderful partnership of talent in this updated version of African Queen.love the verbal jabs and duels. They do it so well!definitely a keeper!
It was a very good movie.  It had alot of great stars in it and it was a very entertaining movie
Great movie even better in bluray.I enjoy John Wayne movies and recommend this one  in particular. it holds hands with True Grit to be a classic
This is a sequel to TRUE GRIT and one of the few sequels that I think worked although I admit that I am a John Wayne fan.
John Wayne and Katharine Hepburn were awesome in this movie. They were a match made in Heaven playing their parts.
John Wayne is my all time favorite & this is one of the best he has ever done. We love him.
This is a charming, feel-good western well-acted by John Wayne and Katherine Hepburn.  Good dialogue and plot.  I highly recommend it!!
The interaction between John Wayne and Katherine Hepburn is outstanding!  I like that she always manages to get the last word!
This movie is a classic.. The sort of movie that as it ages it still remains interesting and well worth watching..
Loved the clarity of the picture..... No extra feature on the disc, but still an awesome watch
All I can say is, John Wayne & Katharine Hepburn. two of my favorite actors. I was in heaven. They are wonderful together.
We love John Wayne and Katherine Hepburn.  He had made True Grit just before this movie and we enoyed that movie but this was a lot better movie.
This was a . Great copy it had no scratches and plays perfectly. It is great entertainment for me and my family
He is so hot.  I love watching a great looking guy that knows how to show his stuff without being vulgar about it.
Always enjoyed this movie and now even more on Blu-Ray. It's like watching it through a window. I don't regret the purchase.
I watched this movie for the first time in a blue ray player its was great and  still watch them to this day.
This is very classical soundtrack music movie with a lot of actions, I don't know what's else I have to say something.
I grew up watching his movies and I truly enjoyed watching him no matter whatdon't mess with the terminator he be back all the time
I like the action, suspense and a little magic in this old world flava movies.  Looking Arnold wasn't bad either.
I like the film.The audio and visuals are the best the film has been yet.If you like Schwarzenegger,why wait.
My wife and I have watched this many times and it is still entertaining every time. It puts a real dose of reality into family life in these times.
This is a fun movie. Great cast...Very entertaining! Would highly recommend.Have watched this a dozen times and still enjoy it!
Family Comedy Classic- No Humor section is complete without this parenting movie. Delivered on time and as promised.
If so you want this movie! Also a lot of real family issues, life issues. Loved this movie the first time I saw it.
Enjoyed it more than the first time I saw it way back when. The extra features were a wonderful treat
Steve martin is his usual funny and enjoyable self and he learns all about parenting.  Lots of laughs for all.
It's a movie and it played in my dvd player...works fine.. kids love it and watch it often.  Very please with order.
This movie is awesome!  Al Pacino is amazing!  The story and action is great as well!  I highly recommend this movie!
I enjoy anything Al Pacino does; if he is in it, it is good; bottom line. Scarface reveals more than drug cartels having a good time. &#34;Cuba&#34;?
My Al Pacino collection was missing this one. Now I'm saying hello to my little friend! It is the best.
love mob movies Pacino amazing actor. action packed and good story line great cast can't take your eyes off of it
I gave this movie to my husband.  He has always been a huge Al Pacino fan.  My husband is very pleased!
Ordered this movie for my son. I love this classic and wouldn't give my copy to my son. A must for your movie collection.
Buy it now, because this is one of the best films ever made. Extremely recommended.
great movie from beginning to end. i saw this movie a few time already but wanted to rewatch it again because it good.
Great movie, but very violent. Classic pacino.
This is my favorite ganster movie. For me this is the best ganster movie i've ever seen in my whole life.
Classic Movie!! That's all to it!!!! One of teh greatest movies ever made!!! The casting was excellent and it clearly depicted the early 80's!!!
It's scarface so there isn't much i have to add, great performance by pacino, great story, great directing by Brian De Palma, great film.
classic movie.  I love the metal case and booklet.  The movie is high quality video transfer.  It looks good, well worth the money.
I watched this movie for the first time ever since it came out.. I really liked it.. I would watched it again..
great movie and al pacino is excellent in it. would definitely recommend this movie. has a lot of action in it.
This DVD is of great quaility and it arrived before scheduled. This is one of my favorite movies that I had to replace in my collection.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE!!!!! This is one of the 1st movies I saw with so much violence in it!!! It is GREAT!!!!!
THIS IS A CLASSIC  MOB MOVIE, KIND OF BRUTAL BUT ENTERTAININGNOT FOR  YOU IF YOU HAVE PROBLEM WITH THE VIOLENT SCENES,THEY ARE PLENTY OF THOSE.
This is a must have for all the fans of Scarface and with a great price!!! You can enjoy now a great remaster of this classic.
Pacino excels in this movie, De Palma directs.  all actors perform like never before.  everyone is happy, but most die.
I absolutely love this movie not only was it great when it came out but it's even better in Blu-Ray trust me it's AMAZING.....
Excellent condition.  This was a gift for my daughter she had scareface on VHS.  If you love Al Pacino you will love this DVD.
bought this as a gift for my boyfriend, it is one of his favorite movies, so he was very pleased!
this is the best movie of all time. never will there be a mafia movie that will even come close
Wow, Just asked to review this---I gave as a gift to oldest Grandson long ago---He loved it as it is one of his favorites
One of the best films ever made.  Al Pacino is the man in this movie.
Brutal, honest, if  your into these types of movies you will enjoy it.  Pacino at his best and he is a lot younger here.
What can I say.  Al Pacino was at his best in this movie.  So was Mannie.  This movie is a must have for gangster movie collectors.
Great film and blu ray version was pretty impressive. Great buy for the price, will buy more as gifts when it goes on sale again.
All I have to say is that this film is a MASTERPIECE!
this company made my order right after i got the disc and it was bad give this company 10 stars for customer satisfaction
Robert De Niro - need I say more.  A true great classic.  Arrived in good condition.  It deserved every nomination and award it received.
This is a truly great film!Violent in the extreme but touching as well!Brings home the truth about Vietnam!
a real classic, i love it.  And with Meryl Street, Robert Dinero and Christopher Walken just starting out.  Excellent movie and not dated at all.
He enjoys movies like this. Its his thing not mine. But glad he enjoys watching it when he can. Good buy
very good movie.do not like this new system, makes me feel like I am in school and required to write a book report
One of, if not the finest movie I've ever seen,The cast is wonderful, the story is great.This movie is second to none!
Sneakers is a fun and suspenseful spy flick.  As usual Redford and cast are great. Clever plot with good humor.
Bought this for my boyfriends.  One of his favorite older movies.
i liked this movie when it came out.  robert redford was funny,witty and charming.  very interesting and entertaining for the redford fan.
I loved this movie. It's still relevant and it reminded me of college. Good acting. Great plot. Endearing characters. Very cool.
excellent rating fits, very pleased
This was recommended to me by a friend from work.  It's a great movie.  It has suspense, technology, comedy, and great actors.
I like this film.  It gives me the excitement of action movies without all the gore and bad language.  R.R. sure can command the screen at any age!
Awesome movie!  Suspense with funny moments!
Another replacement from VHS to DVD. Well worth the $$ spent for the replacement. It's so much better this way.
ClassicClassicClassicThe technology may be old.  The actors may be old. but hey, it's like saying The Beach Boys can't rock ... This one ROCKS
Someone told me about this and I was so pleased by the price as well as the movie.Great story with surpises all over it!
Great movie!  My boys loved it growing up, so I wanted my two grandsons to see it.  Can't go wrong with Redford.
A VERY ENJOYABLE FLICK AND A GREAT CAST TO BOOT.  IT KEEPS YOU ENTERTAINED TILL THE END . I'VE WATCHED IT OVER AND OVER.
This is a great movie. Fun and funny. Good twists and turns in the plot.A not too intense spy show!
GREAT MOVIE AND GREAT DVD.VERY HAPPY WITH PURCHASE.EVERYTHING WAS JUST AS DESCRIBED.
The disk was new and the packaging was intact.  This is a great classic movie and has a great cast.
I love the actors in this movie and I was pleasantly pleased by the way they put on the movie.
It's one if my favorites. Funny, wonderfully acted, and a great intelligent, suspense/ thriller that entertains. You will like this one!
Spartacus is one of the best movies ever produced.  It was in it's era what 'Braveheart' was in its'.  I bought it to add to my collection.
this is a wonderful movie about gladiators that then start there own war and fight against the roman army.  i do not like the end but real great.
This is one of the great movies that was made in the 60's. You will want to watch it over and over.
Oh yeah Nothing like this Criterion Collection Version,You gotta get it too,You won't regret it :)
It starts good and gets better and is very engaging. I think its Dougs best role.
This is a typical example of a perfect movie.  Every time I watch it, I find more and more in it.  I recommend it.
What a great movie.  Tough ending but so well done.  Action, love, freedom, spectacle and so well acted.
Bought this for my husband - it is one of his favorite movies.  It also has additional information which he wanted.
This movie made me cry. And I'm not kidding. Spectacular war epic, romance, and docu-drama.
ONE OF MOVIE GREATS.
It came in great condition and on time. It is a wonderful classic that the whole family can sit down and watch over and over again.
Spartacus is a classic movie from another era that is well acted by Kirk Douglas and Sir Lawrence Olivier.
was a great movie when released and remains a great movie noe.  excellent acting by Kurt Douglas with beautiful secenary
THE IS A CLASSIC MOVIE; wELL DONE, WELL CAST AND WELL ACTED, with plenty of action along the way. Wow!
Great stuff; makes "Gladiator" seem like an action/  adventure film.
The copy is absolutely gorgeous. The service was great and the delivery was within the time that was promised
I have enjoyed this movie over and over again and will do so for many years.
Kirk Douglas at his best in this period film. Lots of name actors, and lots of action.  I recommend to any fan of Douglas. (Like me)
There's a good reason this movie was so very popular when it debuted.  A classic by any definition.  Makes you really root for the underdog.
This CD is a part of my history as a young girl and will be added to my collection of memorables for the future.
I really like this movie.  I had seen this movie sometime backs years ago on TV and was hoping to buy it.
This movie has many good actors in it. It was well made move.
this espectacular film make me feel that this was a golden age of movie, good restoration , recommended , worth it!
Another highly recommended movie, we wanted to add this to our collection to have on hand for anythime waching. Thanks.
A great movie by Stanley Kubrick , please do buy if you have a hd-dvd forthe xbox 360, or a HD-DVD player do buy.
Great in Blue-Ray, and one of the greatest movies of all time! A childhood favorite that I never get tired of watching!
I enjoyed Spartacus when I was younger, and this brought all the great memories back .  It is really great.
A great movie that followed history very well. A well told story and some great special features as well. I highly recommend it for everyone
This is the best movie - the updated movie does not compare at all to the original.  The one with Kirk Douglas, Tony Curtis, etc. is the best.
the original spartacus kicks butt! kirk douglas gives a great performance as the legendary warrior. LONG LIVE SPARTACUS & KIRK DOUGLAS!
if you like old cars, great music and awesome acting you really need to buy this movie. Its funny and just all around awesome!
Absolute classic about young peoples' hi-jinx. It has it all--pranks, skirt-chasing, drag racing and drama. The soundtrack is great as well.
I still haven't watched this DVD yet, but I know there isn't anyone who has purchased this DVD, watched it and can tell me it wasn't worth getting!
This movie never gets old and a lot of fun to watch. Brings back a lot of good highschool memories.
This is one of the greatest movies ever.  It catches the true era of the early 60's in southern California.  My favorite Ron Howard movie.
A must to own in your video library.  Be sure to watch the directors cut for more enjoyment.  Get it before its no longer in production.
One of my husbands favorite movies, so I bought it for him as an gift and he loves it! 8)
From my generation so I felt right at home.  It's one of those movies I never tire of watching.  Just wish the world could go back to that time!
THIS FILM IS AWESOME!  I LOVE THAT IT IS BACK IN THE 60'S AND THAT IT HAD LOTS OF GOOD OLD MUSIC.
very very good movie about the teen lives from the early 60&#34;s
What can I say? Saw this for the first time after I bought I here, and I loved it in the first watch!
The telling of this story is so realistic and I just loved it.  So true to life as I remember how it was as a young man.
A CLASSIC LUV THE CARS GIVES A PEEK IN HOW IT WAS  HARD TO GO WRONG  I USE  JON MELNER NAME AS A  WEB PAGE ON SOME SITES
Good movie, good comedy, good story.  This movie launched the careers of many top line celebrities.  Need more like this.
This movie is an all-time classic film depicting the cruising era of the early 1960s in Modesto, California!  A truly great film!
This is great to have in your collection of oldies but goodies. I have enjoyed watching it with my family.
My husband was born in 1947 so this is his musical era.  He just wanted it for the car stereo and his lengthy drive to work every day.
We wanted this for our home library. It is a great movie and I love the time period that it represents. I highly recommend it!
Remember the good old days of cruising? Now it's outlawed in many citys which is so unfortunate, was so much fun.
this is the kind of story you remember and go back to over and over again... soooo many thanks, bill
I didn't want to watch the movie as much as dance to it.  It was nice they showed what happened to the men, but what about the ladies?
Simply a great movie. It is a blast from the 50's, simple times, a great time to grow up. A must have! You will watch it many times!! Enjoy!!!!
Entertaining, uplifting, funny and the cast is outstanding. Harrison Ford is the sleeper and went unnoticed until he played Han Solo in "Star Wars."
This is a great movie one of my all time favorites who wouldn't love this ,movie great drama and good story line
Blu-Ray and a remastering of the sound track make this a must have. Set it up in 5.1 and you are in heaven. A timeless classic!
Enjoyed the movie very much. Of course this was back in the time when I was the same age as the actors. Wonderful memories.
Who doesn't love this movie?  So many big stars had bit parts or got their starts in this movie.  Great memories!
I have watched this movie well over 30 times. Had to see it in Blu-ray. I watch every winter, it helps me get through it!
THIS IS A MOVIE CLASSIC ENJOYED BOTH THE MOVIE AND THE EXTRA MATERIAL ON THE DVD. THIS IS AN ALL TIME GREAT MOVIE
we have been looking for this movie for my husband the copy he had on vhs cannot be found and he was excited to get this for Christmas  thank you
I really only buy classic movies for my collection and this is about the quintesential funny movie of that decade!
Animal house is another one of National Lampoons greats. Classic comedy about frats and I believe the first. Nothing really compares since then.
One of the classic comedies of modern times. Hysterically funny and completely inappropriate for children.
This was and still is a great movie to watch. I've never been to college but I have been to a few toga parties in my time.
This is a true classic comedy. I think it's the best of the Nat. Lampoon movies.This is the blueprint for all college hijinx movies to follow.
What can you say about John Belushi he is awesome died too young and a whole generation missed out on his antics.
Mature humor mixed with immature behavior (typical of college students) makes for a fantastic film to be watched over and over.
This movie makes me laugh every time. It came in great packageing. and it played great. thanks for a great movie.
One of the funniest movies I've ever seen.  Every couple years you have to watch it again.  Not many movies deserve this.
This is a comedic classic with great acting from a number of well known actors of the future. The college of yesteryear.
Is there anything else to say about this movie that you already don't know?  Practically everyone's top pick for comedys.
This film is a classic. Great actors of today were in the film!  It also pushed a number of things that were ahead of the times.
How can you not love this movie.  Needed a copy of it, and why not go with an incredibly priced 30th anniversary edition.
Still the ultimate party flick, this edition delivers to the fans. Relive the pranks, the wild celebrations, and the late, great John Belushi.
This is a classic!  I really love the ending where they tell what each of the charactor's went on to become.
Great Extras.  Great film.What are you waiting for?If you don't have this in your library yet, you should.
i loved this movie. i laughed so hard i thought i was going to wet my pants. it's all good.
Loved it then, love it now. Wish it was in 4k. Not sure what else there really is to say.
I'm very happy about this being Blu-Ray, DVD and Digital Copy. A perfect blend of this, my all-time favorite movie.
Arrived fast (Amazon.com is the BEST!) and was a great xmas gift for my niece, she loved it (and John Belushi!)...Thanks!
classic crazy fun.  John Belushi is just a nut.  watching it now I'm kind of surprised at the language from a movie made in 1978.
What can I say about a classic?  Social values aren't its strong point, but the laughs just keep coming.
it was perfect.  The movie is in widescreen mode and now I can watch it anytime I want.  Genius.  One of the greatest movies ever made.
Classic movie. John Belushi is a crazy version of ourselves that won't give up his inner child. He's great in all of the sence.
I bought this to replace a broken tape I had of this movie.  A classic... you will watch it over and over.
Have seen this flick many times and never seem to tire of it.  What more can be said about a movie that perpetuates that kind of entertainment?
This is one of the best ever made. Is it dumb? Sometimes. Is it sophomoric? Frequently. Is it hilarious? Always!!
Brings back memories.  Loved this movie the first time and each and every time I watch it.  Now I can watch whenever I want.
One of the funniest movies ever.
this is one of the funniest classics that i know of.  one of the family's favorites!!!
I 1st saw this  movie in 1980 and its hilarious  john belushi gives a greatest performance, i liked it
This movie is a classic, and extremely funny. This in my opinion is one of the best comedy ever made.
John Belushie from SNL delivers one of the best preformences ever i love this movie.
What is not to like? Great episodes that led to a great series.  Lucy and Kevin are wonderful and Michael is also great.
Al Pacino is a great actor portraying an old retired crime boss, Carlito. Movie shows how difficult it is to get out of a life of crime.
The only reason you do not like this film is because it is a remake. ADMIT IT YOU MORONS!
cape fear was on my list also to buy,and i have a long list.But I am enjoying my movie,it plays very very good.
Added nicely to my collection of vhs tapes, I am collecting them have been for years. do not like dvds.
It was super Robert Deniro gave a great preformance of a scary convict down to tattos and a tuff bod a true actor.
GREAT movie . . . .  intense!!!  Much better than the original with Robert Mitcum.  (You can't say that about too many re-makes.)
watch this movie 3 times very good you will like this moviethe cast was great robert de niro there only one like the guy
Who doesn't love any movie when Scorsese and DeNiro get together. Nick Nolte and Jessica Lange were excellent as well. And so was Juliette Lewis
Is a very good movie. De Niro is great in this role.. He's scary & crazy... I would watch this movie over and over!
De Niro is a mad man and a must see mad man along with the great Lange and Lewis, Nolte is alright, the usual though.
I bought this movie used and was surprised, it was just like new. Great movie, great actors, definitely something worth watching.
A gripping plot, with suspense and &#34;Travis Bickel&#34; like insanity by DeNiro's character.  I can watch this one over and over..
THROUGH A MELODIC STREAM OF JAZZ ALLAN LADD AND CREW PAINT A CANVAS OF THE JAZZ AGE IN ALL ITS GLORY AS WELL AS JAZZ'S LITERARY HEROINE ZELDA
Big fan and this was a good one. almost like, &#34;BLOODSPORT&#34; but i liked it a lot. and glad i got it. i recommend it to anyone into Van Damn
Although the story was a ripped-off, this movie is excellent overall.  A quality production and bravo on the directing!
The beautiful hd transfer shows in detail Robert Richardson's amazing anamorphic photography.Very good extra features.A must for Oliver Stone fans.
while this is a great movie, I personally didn't care for this movie. there isn't any one thing to say why. the acting was good. the story was good.
I'm not the biggest Tom Cruise fan, but this is one of the best movies ever! Very moving and touching!
To sum it all up....I cant believe Cruise didnt win the Academy Award for this one.  Just an incredible performance.
This is What I expected. Great quality on both the B-R & DVD, decent case, great add on to my movie collection.
this product was brand new and looks great still had factory plastic it never skipped while watching overall great value
Tom Cruize. More of a hippie piece lover movie but I love military history and it does show a different angle.
Always worth watching.  Not for young kids.  A very emotional movie.  Also timeless.
The great only gets better when you add blu ray and digital. All you need is a thermos (lol). Great for any fan of Steve's
is a nut, a certifiable nut.  Great for any Martin collection.  I think this has to be the hardest I've laughed in ages!!
This movie always cracks me up! My boyfriend thought it was stupid though. I still love this movie and would watch it over and over!
A Classic. Gotta see it twice to pick up nuances. The young Steve Martin displays comic genius. Who wrote it?
A classic but demand a widescreen version.
THIS IS A VERY FUNNY MOVIE. How funny. theres a dog named s*ithead. and steve martin. who is very funny. the opening is a riot.
A rags to riches to rags story. One of Steve Martin's early and great little movies. Check it out with the lovely Bernadette Peters!
I love Steve Martin. And I love this movie.
...thanks to this movie. Great comedy in the Reiner fashion. Absolutely one of the funniest movies of all time. A must for comedy lovers.
This movie makes me laugh just to see the cover!  If you haven't watched it, do it now! Love what he names his dog in this movie.  :) Enjoy!!
Family is so important regardless of blood and This move makes you laugh. We need more laughter and smiles in this world.
Great movie perhaps One of Steve Martin's VERY BEST Movies Ever. Like I said it's a total classic and a must have for any comedy collection.
i love it.Steve martin is my favoritw actor of all time. I love how it comes with a digital copy.
This comedy has to be one of the all time fun movies to watch. Steve Martin is hilarious. Check it out, you will not be disappointed.
Great cast.  The story works.  And the "making of" feature is fabulous.  I have always loved this movie and this package is fantastic.
Its my wife favorite movie.. I think it is the cheesiest movie I have ever seen.. But I guess thats what makes it good :)
This is a great movie that is one of the best that I have seen. When you watch it you might like it depending on your taste of movies. Enough said.
This is a very interesting movie in my view. Sure could never happen, but can we be 100% sure it cannot happen?
I love this movie. Great actors, decent music, just lots of fun. Really nice picture also.
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  It looked better than when I have watched it on TV in the past.
I loved this movie the first time I viewed it.Great cast, music, dialog(lots of humor) and a killer location.Watching it on Blu-Ray was a real treat.
This is one of my all time favorite &#34;horror&#34; flicks.  It is funny and not to scary for young and old alike!
Whether it's your first or 10th time to watch it, it is a funny movie. Very well acted and the 'snake monster' was pretty good too.
This is entertaining, to say the least. Comedy, horror, thriller, violence, blood, gore, it has it all! Stupid, to some, but still a good laugh.
This is one of my favorite movies! The acting is terrific and the plot keeps you watching to see what will happen next. Thanks and God Bless!
just a fun movie with a unique plot. The characters in the movie are fun and suit the film. They make the film a great experience.
This is one of those movies that you can watch over and over.  Love the characters.  Easy and enjoyable to watch over and over.
I swear this is the best movie I have ever seen! It keeps you completely staying in your seat. The whole movie is just a masterpiece.
My husband and I both love this movie. Val and Earl are the perfect comic team. Funny, campy horror you can't go wrong!
It's not &#34;great science fiction,&#34; but it was fun to watch. I also liked the fact that it contains no profanity - at least that I recall.
I really like light hearted funny scary movies. Bacon and Ward were a good team to make this happen.  This was the best of the Tremor movies.
realistic thrills..this movie is amazing and must be seen...a  new dvd transfer would be nice too
Relentless, intense and intelligent. A great way to spend 2 hours and, at least in part, based on a true story.
Updated version of many before this story  It does have funny moments serious and moments This was a good movie to watch more than once
As a suspense thriller this movie rates as one of thebest. Very cleverly done. One can feel the tension and suspense.
Frederick Forsyth's best book made into an excellent and exciting movie - I highly recommend it!
This is a great movie, it keeps you on the edge of your seat!
We have a copy of this movie and decided to send a copy to our son for Christmas.  It is an excellent spy movie and we highly recommend buying it.
This fine, riveting film is a thousand times better than that disjointed pile of schlock starring Demi Moore's ex-husband.
Another great Fred Zinneman film. Love the detective and always love Derek Jacobi.  Edward Fox is a fox. Don't miss it.
Truly an &#34;on the edge of you seat&#34; classic. I have been wanting to purchase my own copy after seeing it presented on television. Keeper!
I have seen this movie many time and enjoyed it each time, a truly great movie.
This is an outstanding movie in every way.  Well made and directed.  I only wished it was a longer movie than it is.  Fantastic movie!  A MUST SEE!
A first class story and very well acted.Reproduction was also very good.This movie is worth seeing over and over again
I always liked Forsyth novels and the whole film was suspenseful. Iread thebook and the film captured the book beautifully
An excellent adaptation of the Frederick Forsythe classic. The movie is well cast, well paced. A perfect thriller or very close to it.
This just brings back the 80's all over again. This is a must-have for any DVD collection and is as fun to watch today as  it was 30 years ago!
This movie is a clasic. If you have not seen it, it is a must see. It truly is a great movie.
My husband and I are in our 40's and 50's and just watched this again over the weekend.  Love it! Love the music, the acting,etc.  Great fun!
I loved it when it first came out, and now my daughters (aged 14 and 11) are loving it, too.
Classic 80's, teen angst movie. Why don't they make movies like this any more? Great addition to our 80's collection.
I watched this when I was younger and recommended it to my daughter. She loved it so much she wants to get it as a gift.
The person I got this for loved it!
What a great movie - classic.  Great to show today's kids that things were not much different when we were in school.
I can't explain how great of a movie this is but I think everyone should watch it. The acting, the writing; it's a movie unlike any other.
A classic! This is one of my husband's and granddaughter's favorite movies. They watch it over and over again. lol
A must have for anyone that grew up in the 80's.A great movie, writer/director, and great cast.Movie to be enjoyed over and over.
This is a 80's cult classic and teens today can still relate to it.  Watching it brings me back to my teenage years.
What a great movie to have in my collection. I will watch it many more times and share the laughs with others
!~ Cute movie good price and no hassle t buy or receive. I recommend this movie!~ It's Fun and easy to enjoy!~
My daughter loves this movie and watches it every night when she goes to bed.  It helped me get through some rough times when I was young.
It was good. Taking kids with different backgrounds and thrusting them together and making discoveries of pressure from peers and families.
I grew up in the 80's......luved everything about this film. Great music and excellent soundtrack.
For daughter--she loved this movie and it was on her list.  Nice pricing--thank you - makes it easy to shop
Great story and acting by all. Worth watching over and over. Plan to drag it out for the grand kids.
love the scenario of this whole movie. and soundtrack is amazing too. cant go wrong with this classic. 80s well done
I have always enjoyed this movie. It's hard to find a place online to rent this movie but Amazon made it possible. Thanks
a great drama with lots of comedic moments, john hughes best 'serious' film of the '80s! think I'll watch it again right now...
Highly recommend!  This movie has so many good parts, I don't know where to start.  Definitely worth watching!
One the top 1980s films for me.....good story....great fun and laughs......definitely one to be added to any dvd collectors collection
Although I did not personally pick this out, the gift recipient had requested it, and has enjoyed it very much.
This movie is great!  When you put all these kids together you find out one thing and that is they are all the same, one way or another :)
This is another of my favorite movies that I had on VHS and could not find on DVD. I was so happy I found it!!!!
Classic movie for anyone.  This movie is funny, sad and dramatic.  You can watch this move over and over and never get bored of it.
how to get  your kids caught up on your childhood. And this one is from john hughes, a classmate at my high school.
A funny, clever, and historical view of different types of people at a certain stage in life. It's a look at the futility of selfishness.
This is one of the best classic movies from the 80s. This is the movie that made me have such a big crush on Emilio.
great moive love the song on it and the 80s are go moives in them great price on it to
We just got a Blu Ray player and were wanting to start collecting some of our favs onto Blu Ray. Love this Movie!!
i love watching old movies during the winter when i cant get outside and do anything or go anywhere or theres nothing on tv.
Another great John Hughes movie. I absolutely love his movies. I've been watching the Breakfast Club since I was little. Its a great movie I love it.
My kids watch this show over and over.  It's funny, sad and sends a pretty good message.  Also, the soundtrack is classic rock at it's best.
The Breakfast Club is a movie that brings back the 80',  it is so good you can watch It over and over!0
This is one of my favorite movies and I watch it all the time. This release was excellent I love the blue-ray and the features that came with it.
I am still happy to have grown up in the 80's, very little violence and a lot of good times.
This is a great movie that I enjoyed a lot.  Good casting, good performances.  Plot with meaning.  One to watch.
I love this movie. Watching it again on DVD is great. I'm glad I bought it. This is one of my favorite from the '80's.
Who would not like to own this classic move, I love it when it came out and is great to own on blu-ray
I don't have much else to say other than that I love this movie! It's a true classic and I never get tired of it!
I decided to upgrade my vhs collection to dvds. So glad I was able to find this one. It plays great and i am very happy.
awesome! culturel classic that every gereration will enjoy for many many years to come.it is a movie that never gets old
One of  my favorites of the Brat Pack; I own it, and the ones I ordered or had on hand already from Amazon I gave as Christmas Gifts.
This movie needs to be seen by everyone. The transformation of the characters from the start to the end is impressive. Judd Nelson is the man
This is a classic movie reminiscent of the 70's, or 80's. WOW  I enjoy it every time I see it!
This is a Classic 80's film. Including the key members of the Rat Pack. A good buy.
a john huges smash hit out of the park. so many of us in the 80's identified with this movie and still carry a special place for it today.
The actors, the music, the genre, the 80's. What a great back drop to the beginning of some fine careers in show biz. "Winning!"
ellen is hot in this flick-come with me to the sea of love  al is al
the movie is very good and the chemistry between lead actor and the actress is hypnotising.Hariharan VenkateshNew Delhi,India
Well acted, taut plot and interesting developments. Keeps your interest and Ellen Barkin very hot.Suspenseful till the very end.
The actor is at his best here....his acting &#34;gifts&#34; are on full display....plus it's a good story line.  Very fine film
Loved the song and the movie. Al Pachino gives a great perfomance. A very interesting thriller with a great soundtrack
Better even than I remembered...........Saw it a long time ago, and still forgot all the turns it takes......Well worth the price........:0)
This is a good thriller - very steamy - Ellen Barkin is sexy as hell, as is Pacino, of course!  Great date movie!
Love Al Pacino and the chemistry between Picino and Barkin is electric.  A great story and great acting.  Check out this one.
This movie is a greatly entertaining movie I would highly recommend. I bought it on Amazon for a great price.
The three characters in the DVD are really well matched up.  Thought John Goodman was terrific and Al and Ellen's characters were very believable.
Al Pacino, Ellen Barkin and John Goodman are all terrific, as are the secondary characters. It is a steamy, sexy mystery, and a lot of fun.
Starting to collect Al Pacino movies. Can hardly find any in stores. Great find. Always have loved this movie. Thanks.
purchased for my son - he loves it!  glad to be able to build him a collection of movies he considers classic at such an afforable costs
A classic comedy with lots of laughs, nothing out of line, a few adult content with lots of laugh also. Two gigantic actors. A great movie. PG 13.
My husband and I have always loved this movie, this movie is worth watchingat least once.  We bought this movie to replace a vhs.
Another classic Arnold comedy to which I highly recommend that you people should go out and buy for your kids
Just watched this last night and loved it every bit as much as when I first saw it. I like Arnold doing comedy, and of course,  Danny is great.
I am restocking my 80s and 90s collections and this was always one of favs.  The only thing missing is a Dog.
I never new about this movie until a friend told me about it. The acting is good and these two in one movie is very funny.
Arnold Schwarzenegger and Danny Devito are an effective comedy team in this movie.A fair amount of action and adventure as well
VERY FUNNY AND GOOD SHOW. 100%
This is a good movie with some action & drama through out.  Movies are a hobby for me.  I like a variety of genres.
nice film haven't watch in a long time since I bought it on dvd the blu ray does make it better to enjoy more .
I well buy form them for the dvd.I wich on my dvd or ps3 play them. that do the job on time
This was another Christmas present.  I ordered it for a friend of mine who has special needs.  I can only hope he likes it.  He requested it anyhow.
Awesome older movie that is super action packed from the beginning to the end!  A must have to keep in my library!
I saw this on tv and wanted to be able to see it anytime so since I was able to find it at a reasonable price I bought it online.
this product was brand new and looks great still had factory plastic. i have not watched the movie yet but i am sure everthing is perect
Another fast action movie by S. Stallone. It was put together  nicely.Story was great. Well put together.It made you feel that you were there.
You love action movies? This is a great one to watch! It's full of drama and stunts. It's also very scary if something like this was to happen!
This movie was awesome. Sylvester Stallone is a really good actor. I have quite a few of his movies. :)
All Grisham films are great. It's so nice to watch them every 10 years or so and appreciate the scripts and the acting. Not for young people.
I really liked this movie. Gene Hackman is a brilliant actor, and his part alone makes the movie worth watching.
Hackman shines as does O'Donnel. Excellent character progression. I highly recommend to anyone and not just Grisham movies affcionados. Great!
Jason Scott Lee is Bruce Lee. Great story about Bruce Lee with great acting and incredible actors. I absolutely love it!
I don't work as described perfectly and would not mind recommending to friends
Bruce Lee the legend. Very simple, if you love martial art films definitely add this one to your collection! Also Bruce Lee fans this is a must!
this title came perfect timing AND PERFECT CONDITION, THANK YOU MUCH I WILL SHOP WITH HIM IN THE FUTURE, ALSO SORRY FOR THE CAPS. grrrrrr
I love this movie. I learned a lot about Bruce Lee and his work in creative endeavors  such as martial arts and acting
I  always liked watching Bruce Lee and I remembered about a movie they made about his life The Movie  was great and the CD's  were excellant
I have always liked any thing that had Bruce Lee in it .This movie told all about what he did and how he died.I am very happy to own this movie.
I loved it so much. I couldn't stop replaying the movie. It is one of the best movies I ever watched.
Just as good as I remembered from all the years since I first saw it.  A must see for all Bruce Lee or martial arts movie fans.
i love pretty much all karate movies old one and new ones so once i seen Jason Scott Lee in it i had to have it
Good quality and love the extra feature. Very well acted. No tmuch more to say but needed more words! LOL
Jason Scott lee did a great job as Bruce lee. DVD in great condition. I was a huge fan of this movie.
kim bassinger is my all thime fav even more than sharon stone my second allstar cast 5 star movie
A classic, though mostly under-rated.  They did get married/divorced you know.  ;-P
Timing of mail was excellent and in great conditionOne of favorite movies and definitely am happy to have in my collection
I thought the movie was as good as Steve McQueen's movie,which was alsoexcellent.
The Gateway VHS that I purchased from Amazon arrived on time in an excellent condition as promised ;therefore, I am very happy.
You have to be old enough to recall Clinton's first run for President to really appreciate the film, but a worthwhile view regardless of age.
TRAVOLTA WAS AT HIS BEST IN THIS MOVIE -AS ALWAYS THE SUPPORTING CAST DID A GREAT JOB OF FOLLOWING JOHN'S LEAD
I enjoyed watching this movie. It is a combination of a bad situation gone worse.
You will laugh so hard at this I did  its so stupide its funny worth the time to get it
My family loved this movie, it is full of laughs. I would tell people to buy it.
I ordered this as a used VHS and it was in great shape. The movie is a lot of fun and we have enjoyed it over and over again.
For Richer Or Poorer is a great film for the entire family. Believe me.
This is a cute story, different, acting is odd - ending could be better.  Bit strange but can't help it - still like the idea behind it
I liked the theme and material, and I think it was done quite well.  A bit longer than normal but very engaging.
I just had to have my own copy of this movie to watch over and over.  I just can't seem to get enough of this movie.
This is one of our favorite films; a great movie, even greater in HD.  Six more words are required for me to submit this.
Great movie.  Great musical sound track.  Interesting story line. Very well acted.  Unusual part for Brad Pitt.  I Highly recommend it.
Don't be put off by the 3 hour running time. The performances and direction, the delicately-told story need the time and make full use of it.
Sexiest Brad Pitt movie, in my opinion. Also, loved the music score. Wonderful cast overall and I think this will eventually be a classic.
The background music is beautiful and Claire Forlani shines in her beauty.Hopkins is as usual very good and Brasd Pitt is good too.
I just love this movie and I have seen it at least 10 times, it is a long movie but so worth watching, product was in excellent condition.
I have watched it many time when I suggested it to my different loved ones!!!  I wld still keep watching it.
One of my favorite films.  I love all three of these actors and feel they did a great job.  They are so calm about the future for themselves.
I love this movie. It was a great buy. I still pop this in and watch it. Just can't get enough of it.
Go to the end to see the names of everyone and then watch the final 20 minutes again. Fantastic talent
very funny and good.they guys will tear you upi laugh all the way through it.you wiil enjoy itthe best music anywhere
It serves to prove that The Blues Brothers are still well received even with the demise of James Belushi.Great songs in the movies!!!!
Too funny. As good if not better than the 1st. The music is great, terrific band battle at the end. So kool to see so many famous stars
This is a fun movie, very entertaining, loved seeing all the different blues bands, Eric clapton, bb king, johnny pang, the list goes on
DVD arrived in great condition, as promised. I love the Blues Bros. Very upbeat, great music, fun video.
If you are a dan aykroyd fan then you'll love blues brothers 2000 add this to your collection.
I love how this came fast and in good quality. Im watching it now as I review. Im impressed with the transfer
One of the great classics of action from my past, I still enyoy the fights between all the remembered warriors.
again this is another movie everyone likes but no one admits to it. i loved it and think of it as one of the funniest movies.
I love Fred Williamson.  I love all of the old movies from the 70's and he is one fine man. :)
LOVE CHANDLER! HE WAS SO GREAT IN ALL HIS MOVIES.HE IS GREAT HERE AS WELL. THANKS MR. CHANDLER. A FINE ACTOR.
A MAGNIFICENT MOVIE FROM SPIELBERG.....I HAVE THIS MOVIE IN DVD BUT ONLY IN ENGLISHAND I LIKE SO MUCH WITH SUBTITLES IN SPANISH THIS MOVIE HAS.
Leave it ti Spielberg to make a good story even better especially when it is American history, full of insight.
I am VERY happy that my DVD not only was in great shape when it arrived, but it made it here REALLY early!
very good, very good ,love movie, would recomend, I love that debbie allen did this movie I had no idel about this boat, everyone should see this
ALL I HAVE TO SAY IS I ONLY BUY MOVIES WITH CERTAIN ACTORS AND HAVE NO DOUBT THAT THERE GOING TO BE GOOD AND THIS IS ONE OF THEM
Used this as fodder for a research paper into films, and their ability to sway the public sentiment.  Highly recommend.
Great story with great actors.  No single movie is loved by everyone but this is loved by my family. 'Nuff said?
A great performance by Daniel Day Lewis that is worthy of Oscar votes.  A great movie and great petition of boxing in Ireland
it is our family favorite - very funny movie we wish to have BLUE Ray - will you help us to get it
Steve Martin captures this character well. The movie itself is entertaining but Steve Martin takes it to the next level.
sgt.bilko is very funny its a classic 1996 picture steve martin is always funny i couldn't stop laughting it was great 10/10
This is one of my favorite Steve Martin movies. I love it. The product was in great condition, and I am excited to have it.
great movie, as it pay homage to the old tv show, it is full of laughs. I can watch it over and over
This is one of the best films ever made.  It documents an era gone by and is a hell of a lot of fun on the ride!
Bought this movie for my husband, he can sit and watch this movie over and over! Oldie but goodie! 8)
Alright! Alright! Alright! This was my High school class and I knew several people like the characters in the film.
Love Dazed and Confused good Movie! Love the Cast, and the time setting The Blu Ray is good, good Music in the Movie
You have to own this movie. It is great. It's a classic. You can't have a complete DVD collection without it!
If you like high school stoner movies, this movie is great. Very funny and a great price. Worth buying for the price.
This movie (and soundtrack I bought in addition) were gifts. The recipient loved them and was excited to have a copy on DVD rather than VHS.
Killer Movie ! Exactly the way I remember it around my own Town back in the early 70's ! Has some great Muscle Cars in it also!
insane cast featuring future stars and an amazing soundtrack. It inspired hazing across the country... A staple for gen x'ers everywhere.
I love this movie it is great to have in your collection could watch over and over well never get tired
very nice saw this on tv and had to buy it beautiful picture in bluray very nice great case also
Such a funny movie. I have seen it so many times and it still gets funnier. Not to mention the awesome songs on the movie.
A &#34;must see'.  John Candy as well as the cast of characters will delight you w/ many laughs and keep you entertained ..
I LOVE this movie. It brings back such memories. One of my favorite John Candy films of all time. :)
love john candy movies,collecting his movies.very good movie for the entire family to watch together.highly recommend anyone toi buy it.
what a great John Hughes flick! this looks better than ever on blu ray and everybody should have this in their collection for this great price!
classic comedy with all the fun of family life and John candy humor.
I love this move - John Candy is perfect with these kids.  Fun to watch anytime you have a few hours.
All-time classic.  Never get tired of seeing it.  This movie is one of John Candy's best.  Funny from start to finish.
This is a great movie for adults as well as kids, I've watched it now several times and enjoyed every time. :o)
classic funny...happy with this purchase I would  buy this again.I shop on Amazon for everything and think they are great!
GREAT Family Movie..  We laughed through the whole movie.  Funny, funny, funny.  Don't hesitate to buy/watch this movie, it is well worth it.
This is a classic movie, full of laughs! John Candy was a great actor! This is a very funny movie!
Great, great, great!  John Candy at his best.  Absolutely.  Funny, heartwarming, and endearing.  One for the library at home.  Great!
THIS IS THE BEST JOHN CANDY MOVIE EVER.....NO MATTER HOW MANY TIMES I WATCH IT, IT STILL IS SO FUNNY.....IT IS A CLASSIC FOR SURE
this movie is a John Candy classic.  had to order for my daughter's birthday  It arrived on time and made her verry happy!  Great price, too!
What can you say about John Candy but funny funny funny. I was sorry to hear he died but thank goodness we have his movies.
Still funny after all these years. The quality of the bluray makes the movie look like it was filmed 10 years ago instead of 20
Great John Candy film and one of my favorites. Is a classic in my book if you ask me. Great for the family and new generations alike!
John Hughes made some great comedies in th 80's and 90's, and this is one of them.
One the top ten 1980s films for me....., great story awesome cast, loads of fun...definitely one to be added to any dvd collection
John Candy is a Laugh Rioit in this off the wall somewhat unothdaox family comedy you'll LOVE IT. as much as I do
What more can you say about a great movie that needs to be in every home and enjoyed all the time
Funny movie!!!!! Buck is so funny. The kids are crazzy and its a mix of both worlds. You won't regret buying this movie.
Had to watch one of the classics from my generation with the kids and they loved it as much as I do.
Non stop laughing!!! Must get and must watch. It's good for the family 13 and up. John candy is awesome
This is an all time family favorite movie.  With the exception of a couple lines which may be more for adults, this is a classic family movie.
John Candys best film ever! This movie is amazing. I could watch it over and over. It's a classic for sure!
It is so hard to hire this movie. We tried to just before xmas a nd could not get it anywhere. Worth every penny.
Was a birthday gift, very funny family movie, laughed through whole movie, was for teen age boy but everyone really liked it
It's a great movie and uncle buck reminds me of what I would do for my niece if that situation would arise. It's a good and funny movie !!!
THANK YOU FOR THE MOVIE. WE ALWAYS ENJOYED WATCHING IT ON VHS. NOW WE CAN ENJOY IT AGAIN AND DVDS DO LAST A LOT LONGER.
This is one of my husbands favorite movies.  It is funny and some of it is true to life at the silly things people do
Anyone who was a kid in the late 80's early 90's has a special place in their heart for this amazing comedy!
I'm just a sucker for John Candy because I grew up watching this guy in movies.  So, I'm pretty bias about this because it's nostalgic for me.
Transaction was smooth and my kids liked the movie.  Uncle Buck is a classic.  It has a few bad words but not many.
One of the best family movies every.  Love John Candy!  This is one of those movies that never gets old.
Such a classic. I remember loving it as a kid, but it's much funnier watching it now. The two kids are so funny in this movie.
I have watched this movie so many times over the years, but it continues to make me laugh and appreciate the Hughes/Candy team even more.
love love it, one of my favorite stars Mel Gibson, very original, funny and crazy like him, love it do recommend it
Comical, good story and very good acting by all the actors, great scenes and scenery also the color quality is outstanding.
Mel and Goldie did an excellent job of creating an action comedy &#34;good guys chased  by bad guys&#34; thriller adventure.
Great Movie, Thank You!
Mel and Goldie are just extremely awesome together!! Such a action-packed, fun-filled movie. A great movie to watch with family!
I love this movie! Goldie Hawn and Mel Gibson make a good acting duet. it has funny moments and overall, thoroughly enjoyable.
excellent movie yes older  but some movies no matter there age are priceless this is a true gem  time has proven it still is a great movie  ageless
even though i've watched it a bunch of times, i still love it. it's not for kids though.  i think it's funny and am glad i bought it.
WE WERE DISAPPOINTED AT HAVING TO PAY FOR THIS OLD MOVIE BUT WE DID ENJOY IT.  WE HAD SEEN IT BEFORE BUT WANTED TO ENJOY IT AGAIN.
Totally funny movie, just makes you feel good.  Was a perfect casting decision, they feed off of each other.  One to be watched over and over again.
Funny and fun.  I've always loved this comedy as well as Steve Martin and Goldy Hawn. I plan on seeing it about 100 more times.
My husband and i really enjoyed this movie.  It was all around fun without a lot of garbage. We would highly recommend it.
Unbelievably funny. You have to see this little jem again in the clear DVD version. I'm really glad I bought it.
This is a really cute and romantic movie!  It's almost like good, fun marriage counseling, if there is such a thing! Great date-movie.
Hawn and Martin are such a great acting pair. This movie will really make you laugh and cry.
We downloaded this with the new program onto my son's iPAD and it is great.  Much more reasonable priced and you get it quickly.
Though a little cliche in the end, this movie is funny. Great movie. I recommend for any who like romantic comedy.
This used to be one of my favorite movies growing up. It still makes me laugh every time I watch it
A classic movie- classic actors and who doesn't LOVE Goldie Hawn and Steve Martin? great premise for the movie and enjoyable!
this is a great movie...anything with Goldie Horn and Steve martin will be funny and fun...so enjoy if you like comedy/love
this is my favorite movie and I watch it everyday.  it brings a warm feeling to me when I see couples make it against all odds.
this is an awesome comedy I love it it's Steve Martin and Goldie Hawn at their best they're hilarious together I enjoyed it very much
With a cast like those two don't expect anything but funny action. We enjoyed every minute of the movie.Itis a good bet you will ebjoy the movie.
I purchased this as a gift for a friend who hadn't seen it in years and is crazy about both actors. Fun movie!
Martin and Hawn make a cute couple in this one - both are great comics - really enjoyed the movie
One of my all time favorite Goldie Hawn/Steve Martin films. Totally worth the purchase/rental. I bought it. I love it. I think I'll watch it again.
This a funny movie. Not what you would expect, very interesting twist that you hope will happen, but not sure will.
THIS MOVIE WAS A REMARKABLE EFFORT FOR ALL CONCERNED.  ROBERT DUVALL IS ONE OF MY FAVORITE ACTORS, AND HE REALLY OUTDID HIMSELF IN THIS ONE!
This is one of my favorite movies.  Robert Duvall did such a great job on it.  Walton Goggins' performance near the end of the movie is amazing.
Robert Duval is such a good actor.  We enjoyed this movie.  There is only one Robert Duvall.  I hope he continues to make movies while he is able.
Got this movie for a friend of mine who loves movies of the Religion forte. She told me she couldn't get enough of this movie.
Well done on many levels. We watched this movie when I was in seminary and discussed it--a great discussion starter.
i think this movie ius another hitwith the pour wether in the winter thisis a greatmovie to wach
I love this movie. Really funny and incredibly entertaining, I could watch it twenty times in a row. Must like B Movies.
Seems to have set a lot of cliches that we view in many movies today. Its just funny to see where some of them came from
One of my faves!!! Its Bruce Campbell... Need I say more?! Army of Darkness is pure genius. I love it!
I am a big evil dead fan and I love army of darkness. Was so happy to find this copy.
where's the 6 stars button? This is the most awesome movie ever.Bruce Campbell rocks!!
The movie is a cult classic. What more must be said? Buy it and buy THIS edition, now! Bruce demands it.
i ordered this as a gift for my father and he really liked it, he still watches it to this day
My son and I really loved this movie. This was his first horror/comedy, and he was loving it throughout it all.
I loved this movie growing up its a classic in my eyes and who dosent love Bruce Campbell and now that its on bluray it cant get any better :)
Came free with the Blu-Ray purchase. Unfortunately these downloads are of horrible quality and are temporary. But it's free so no matter
For Raime, Campbell fans, this is a must see.The last of the Evil Dead series and the most off the wall!
I love cheesey horror movies! I love The Three Stooges!How could I NOT love this film? My God, it's sheer perfection!!
Bruce Campbell at his best!  Everyone should see Army of Darkness at least once.  Is great cult classic horror film.
this movie is such a b-movie classic. anyone who says they like b-movies HAS to watch this, as well as the two movies that came before it.
I love scary Movies, what can I say again can not go wrong with Bruce Campbell!! another classic no remake for this one
Awesome cult classic
This is by far the best movie ever made.  If you're reading this you already know that!!!  YEAH BABY!!
That was hilarious. I couldnt stop laughing at the small evil ashes. But not as gory as the first two but funnier then thembuy this.
I was just introduced to this series recently, and I love it! What a fun time!! Bruce Campbell is my hero!
What can I say about this classic other than Klatu, barata, nik....cough, cough!!! Love this movie. Watch it, trust me you'll thank me later.
Who wouldn't want the 3 rd book in the Evil Dead Series? Come on, you know you need it.These movies are great.
Great final to the Evil Dead trilogy. I am a big fan of the Evil Dead movies. Army of Darkness is good.
Fun movie, Great gift.Teenage cult classic.Every teenage boy probably wants a copy of this.
Buy it now, man! This is an numerated (limited) edition and ya have to buy it now. If you are an fan, you'll LOVE this one!!COME GET SOME!
Wonderful,the music is one of my favorite and the story out of this world....You will never regret watching this wonderful movie...
It was not until after I had watched this movie and I really thought about it that was really insightful and it had a lot to offer the viewer.
Bluray is of unbelievably awesome quality. PQ and AQ is superb. Way better than many modern movies.
Great movie, and best service. Kurt Russel is very good in this movie, probably his best role. This is a classic, which is made before Aliens.
I have always loved this movie, glad to see it on blu-ray when i decided to buy it, looks at least ten times better!
Classic movie. Good suspense and story. Great cast, well written. This is a must see for sci-fi fans. Will keep this one for life.
This movie freakin rocks period! It is the original and the best in my opinion! Old school and cool school! Buy it!
SciFi does not get any better than this.  This is a perfect example of the remake being far superior to the original.
Incredible special affects. Great story structure, characters and world building. An absolute must see for any film / sci-fi enthusiast.
added this movie to my collection for a good price part one and two''will shop again;;great for the holidays;;thanks amazon;;
TOO INTENSE FOR YOUNG ONE'S SOME 4 LETTER WORDS,BUT NOT EXCESSIVE.GOOD STORY LINE AND FINE ACTORS...I ENJOYED IT VERY MUCH.
one of carpenters best and one of the best horror movies ever made.
This is the best John Carpenter movie !  Watch it again and enjoy it !
nothing like it. it's tougher than romero. must be the toughest horror movie  ever. only dawn can stand the test of time.
We ordered the right one this time very pleased with all thank you
The transfer for this movie is amazing. It is so crystal clear it literally looks like a brand new flick.
John Carpenter and Kurt Russell do it again in this scary Science Fiction Horror film. This is just a great gross film, the alien is cool.
I loved it watched it many times and i even play the computer game a classic that never gets old great for your horror collection.....
One of the greatest horror/sci-fi movies ever made.  Not only is it masterfully crafted, but the old-school FX stand the test of time.
This movie is a great horror/science fiction film. If you like survival movies set in Antarctica then go ahead and buy it!!!
This is one remake that is just as appealing as the original.  Its a must see and must own.  Became one of my favorite horror films of all time.
This story is just plain scary. It is a perfect blend of terrain, characters, and storyline. It is easy to tell when something is well done..........
A classic.  Full of terror and suspense.Very highly recommended.
The premise of the film was frightening for it's time. The special effects are cheesy for today, but don't detract from a great story-line
THE THING is a real cool movie!!!The story is really interesting and creepy...the kind of movies that i like the most....This is a thrash classic!!!
what more can I say, it took a lot of special effects and makeup to make this one...truly the stuff nightmares are made of. Great oldie but goodie
I already that the original on DVD, but didn't like how it upconverted, so I splurged on the HD version.  Well worth it.
Kurt Russell does a nice job in this film.  The special effects are truly impressive and the suspense is riveting.  Highly recommend!
I love scy-fy just as much as the next guy but you have got to see this movie (WOW) five stars.
It's 2013 and in my opinion this is still the GREATEST special effects movie EVER, done by a 19 year old Rob Bottin. WOW, simply AMAZING !!!
A good sci- fi movie. I like this version of the Thing movies. Of course Kurt Russel makes this movie a hit to me. Loved it.
growing up in a african american house hold this was a requirement in our house. a good family movie .
WARREN WILLIAM IS GREAT AS HE ALWAYS IS/WAS AND CLAUDETTE VERY GOOD TOO. WATCH  THIS FILM AND YOULL LOVE IT TOO.
I grew up watching this movie and it is still good and outstanding today as it was then...Still makes me cry
This movie had love struggling being black and being a good mother single.  I WOULD RECOMMEND EVERY ONE TO SEE THIS MOVIE
I REMEMBER THESE MOVIES FROM THE OLD DAYS AND LOVED THEM THEN AND LOVE THEM NOW.  THANK YOU VERY MUCH.
I was amazed at the low price I paid for these two great films. Two for the price of one? A bargain!
This is a must have movie.  A great family movie.I reccommend this collection to everyone.
i absolutely loved this movie! thats all i can say its just that good there are no words!
It is great to have both versions of this important movie - Have also read Sam Staggs book! Top Buy
I love this movie because it has so much truth in it that you will find yourself racing for the nearest box of tissues.
I enjoyed both movies what a difference a few years can make.
This was a great movie. The actors are the best! I can always count on Amazon to get me what I want.
What great fun this movie is.  If you like humor mixed in with your dramas you appreciate this.  The chemistry between characters is wonderful.
I'd love to see Jen and George do another movie together.  They look and feel good on screen.  Great movie!
This movie was very good and i in joyed watching it.  there was lots of actions .other whys just ok.
I saw this movie years ago and it has always stay with me because of the music.Love the story as well!!
It's about time - now if they'll just put it out on Blu-Ray for the US we'll finally be good!
This is a great film for any pure rock and roll fan. It's timeless with good acting. It's a good escape film.
I bought this item for my twin sister. We both love this movie so I bought it for her birthday. Thanks for having it and the quick delivery.
Really plays well and my girl's Dad loves it. He's always talking about how much he likes it. And nice price too.
A great movies to have and it sure brings back memories. I am going to look for more movies on Amazon. Thank you.
All of the songs on this cd are exactly what I was looking for.  It brings back great memories of great songs and great stories
One that men can get into, and one women can appreciate and enjoy.  Truly a good compromise for both sex, and still have a great time.
Rock Opera at it best! Last of the Baby Boomer great stories. Was very happy to see it again via instant video.
A great rock musical with nonstop action. Very entertaining with good lanes you can use in your daily life that make you sound really cool.
I really like this movie it at action romance bad ass bikers and sexy chicks I definitely give it a thumbs up
I just love this movie, so happy that i could purchase this and own it
1980 over acting, future Hollywood stars, bikers, chicks and music.what more could you want?
Loved this movie years ago and was thrilled to find it for sale on dvd. It is still one of my favorites and I am happy to be able to enjoy it again.
A movie filled w/ laughs, great cast of characters, a family depicted w/ your &#34;different&#34; relatives which we all have in our families ..
Best movie! John Candy and Dan Ackroyd....need I say more? There are also a few scenes where the racoon noises are subtitled. Hilarious!
One of our family favorites.  Not an Oscar contender, but a simple move that is funny for the family.
I have always liked this movie, it's a true Candy, Ackroyd comedy without the nonsence of todays movies. It'll make you laugh.
Dan Aykroyd is a coniving fast talking relative of John Candy.  The interface between the two is amazing!Wonderful Movie
Watched this movie as a child. It's a great older movie. Very funny with great actors. Would recommend anyone to buy.
great packaging movie workes well and have been excited to have this  great movie.  great actors in it  it is a have to have movie
I love this movie! It's got to be one of the best movies ever! I just wish that it was more family appropriate, but it's good for me and the hubby.
This movies is sooo funny! I just loved John Candy and was sad when he passed away. This is a very good movie.
funny movie with lots of feel good moments my family really enjoy it love john candy movies always a good time
This is a movie that I remember from growing up that was is light hearted and funny comedy. One of those movies you can put on any afternoon at home!
one of beloved John Candy's best movies-he will be sorely missed yet can live on in this sweet and funny movie
I purchased this movie because I love John Candy, it a good family movie and every time I watch the movie my side hurt from laughing.
This movie is so funny!!! I couldn't believe how crazy this family was it seemed they were ubnoxous. But it's good:)
if you are a fan of john candy and Dan Aykroyd then you will like thiscomedy even the raconey enjoy this one.
So funny! I cant believe I have never seen it! Im really glad a friend suggested it. John Candy is really good in it
a great movie, love this one, can watch it over and over, the quality of the DVD is excellent, color and sound are good.
Now talk about a great movie, the characters are just so loveable. It's funny, cleaver, and one of Candies best.
Toooooooooooo funny. You forget how funny these guys are. Fun for the whole family. When you watch these old movies they bring back so many memories.
I enjoyed this dvd very much.  It was in perfect condition.  I would like to see more movies like this one.
I Am A Big John Candy Fan And This Movie Is awesome!!!I Recommend This John Candy Movie To All.A Very Enjoyable Movie Experience.
Funny movies with the late John Candy he and Dan Ackroyd were a wonderful comedic team! Have watched this movie several times and I laugh every time!
We loved this movie. John Candy was a great actor and we lost a lot when he died. Dan Aykroyd and John Candy work well together.
Non stop action. Wilford Brimley great as the uncle. Makes you wonder if something like this could actually occur around the world.
In the name of the father.Is a revising film.I was hoping for on BDEven with no extras at all .Still worth the 13.99 I payed
You must see it. This is when they made movies. It's funny, romantic and some drama. Excellent  actor's stared in this movie. I love it.
love the 90's this movie captures the feel of the 90's great acting in too can watch it over and over again
I think I fell more in love with the songs they had in the movie but of course this movie is wonderful ...will continue to watch it many times.
everything should see this.  wonderfully diverse soundtrack, always in play in on form or another in my home....ok yes buy
another gem from one of my favorite actors.. does not come off as a hero but a lowlife who lies like hell to get what he wants.
I thought it was a great movie. My wife didn't like it, she thought it was too mean. Surprise ending.
First saw it on TV and was surprised at the ending.  Still found it very interesting and decided I should have it in my video library.
Clint Eastwood is really good at being the nasty guy in this movie.  It has a great cast and you wont find it dull at all
This is one of my favorite Eastwood films. Too many feelings got hurt in this film that led to an usual way to solve the problem.
This is Clint Eastwood as I've never seen him before, a totally carnal character!  It's great for a collection of his film works, thanks.
This was a totally entertaining and thought-provoking movie!!!!! I had to watch this movie over and over again.  FIVE STARS!!!!!!
Spike Lee came through big time in this classic.An interesting look at Brooklyn back in the day.Can't we all just get along?
I LOVE THE MOVIE. I LOVE EVERY SPIKE LEE PRODUCTION MOVIE I HAVE EVER WATCHED. I LIKE THE TRUTHFULNESS ABOUT RACISM IN THEIR AREA DURING THAT TIME.
If you've never seen it, you want to. If you want to be entertained, educated, and inspired, GET IT NOW!
The eye opener of the year...I loved it. Excellent story line and a must see movie by mature audiences only. Very compelling!
This movie is one of the all-time classic late '80s movies.  As always, Spike Lee knows how to get the audience's attention.
I must have watch this film about a dozen times and still laugh.This and Fletch Lives must Chevy Chases best films.
My whole family loves this movies because it is soo funny. Chevey Chase does an excellent job in the role of Fletch.
This movie is a classic.Why has it not been released again?Its ridiculous that the studio is not re - releasing this movie.
Great flic, Funny stuff. Buy it, Rent it, See it, Whatever."Mooooon River, Phew... thank you doc."
A great piece of work from Chevy Chase! Funny and intriging, if you like Beverly Hills Cop, this is a must see.
Chevy Chase was great in both the Fletch movies.  They are so dumb they are hilarious.
I have seen this movie dozens of times and I must admit that it is the best and funniest moviethat Chevy Chase ever done!!!!
The quality of the video is so high def you feel like you could touch Chevy Chase right through the screen.  I recommend.
A great Eastwood western. Humorous and the long range rifle shots are great! Great cast!
EASTWOOD DOES A GOOD JOB AS A DRUNK HIRED TO TRACK. HE IS NOT FLASHY, JUST DOGGED AND MEAN AS USUAL.
This movie is vintage Clint.  Robert Duvall plays the bad guy and as always does a great job.  Clint Rules!
Great story, great scenery, and Clint!  You can't go wrong with these descriptions.  Anything Clint does is usually good, and enjoyable.
It's Clint as a Cowboy. How can that be bad. It's not his earlier Spegetti western but still entertaining. I added it to my Eastwood collection.
This is a fun western with a great supporting cast, very colorful characters, a great score, good scenery, and cinematography.  Highly Recommended
Can' help loving this weepie, watched it numerous times over the years and now get it in Blue ray quality
CHRISTOPHER REEVE AND JANE SEYMOUR ARE WONDERFUL IN THIS HIGHLY ROMANTIC FILM THIS ONE IS FOR LOVERS TOGETHER ALWAYSENJOY
I bought it as a gift. They loved it very much and have watched it more than once. Great movie.
This is a wonderful movie, and I enjoyed it thoroughly, and the music score is beautiful.  I could watch this over and over again.
I loved the movie when it first came out!  My feelings have not changed over the years!  I still cry at the end and I am a 61 year old man!
It is a real pleasure to see the widescreen format rather than the usually shown pan & scan.
This has always been a favorite movie. The music is so beautiful, the story line is superb and the actors are all perfect in their roles.
It gives you lots to think about....how we love, living in the moment.  It is my favorite movie with Christopher Reeve.
Jane Seymour and Christopher Reeve have mad chemistry in this timeless classic.  A love story that never gets old.  Call me a romantic.
if you dont mind sad endings this one is a keeper .  a true love story that will have you in tears.
This film grabs your attention from begining to end. Great acting and made at a excellent location,Mackinaw Island, Michigan.
Awesome movie, easy to follow, with great actors. A man falls in love with a woman from the distant past and longs to return to her arms.
Great movie, but I always keep wondering if it keeps repeating itself in time since it has to begin again somewhere in time!
This is a great old movie. The wife loved this movie. I bought it for her for Christmas. I think she will be happy.
I have always loved this.  Finally had to have my own copy.  Reeves brings life to this fantasy in a Believable way.
Just wanted this in DVD form, since I have it in VCR.  Always one of my favs that I like to watch from &#34;time to time&#34;.
Definitely the most heartwarming and romantic love story that transcended time. Loved the background music.
I loved this movie from the first time I saw it and needed to replace the VHS version with a DVD.
This is the movie my husband and I watched on our first date.  A family favorite for sure.  Now buying more copies for grandkids.
this is one of my favorite movies to have it now on bluray its great came quick and was in prefect shape thank you
I watched this movie 20 years ago and it is still one of the best love stories ever made.  Wonderful movie!
I love it! I love it! I love It!  He died for love, its amazing! I saw it yesterday and I like it!
The all time winner, to me, of the time-travel romances.  Heartwrenching, poignant and what a handsome hero!
This was a favorite movie of my Mother's and I when I was younger, so it has special meaning now since she has passed away!
What a great Sunday afternoon movie. Just an easy going and relaxing movie to sit and watch anytime...not just Sunday!!
This is a movie that I dearly love. I believe in the hereafter and this is one great movie. Thanks
Saw this movie on TV when it first cam out, I love any movie that has to do with time, in any way, it is a shame Reeve's had his misshape
A favorite movie of mine----a friend of mine told me about it years.  I had taped it but nothing like the DVD.
This movie is a classic in my opinion.  I've probably watched it at least 50 times.  I bought this as a gift & they LOVED it!
I saw it for the first time on cable and knew I had to have it in my library.  The location of this film is beautiful and the ending is unexpected.
I truly miss Christopher Reeves. This movie I feel was one of his best works ever. He was such a beautiful soul.
Great movie and a cult classic.. I enjoyed it very much and has been one of my best movies of all time.
I have yet to meet a man or a woman who dislikes this movie.It is now a Cult Classic and deserves to be so.
This story of love and time is the best in a romance for any romantic like me.  Would recommend to anyone who likes this kind of movie.
BUT it is great. hauntingly poetic  im not even in my 30s and have loved this for yrs, give it a shot....
Ever dreamed of a life long ago? This movie will take you there . Christopher Reeves and Jane Seymour do an impeccable job with this story
LOVE IT!!!  Loved everything about it!!!Recommend this is my friends and family!They did a marvelous job with this movie!!
I liked it very much because it showed that in spite of time distance, love can remain live and warm.
The wife loved this show. She Said it was an excellent movie. Glad I bought it. Worth getting if you like good movies. AAA+
This movie is one my wife could watch every week. The storyline is very good and the cast is remarkable.
Terrific love story. Acting wonderful. Quality of the film was poor, as far as color, and clarity. I may have to buy new next time.
They don't make movies like this any more ,too bad.  Such a wonderful cast and a good story that you don't have to worry about nudity and cursing.
I love everything Chris Reeve has done.  This is by far one of the best.  He left us way too early.
I saw it years ago and I remembered how much I loved it. So I got it on DVD and watched and I still love this movie.
The CD arrived on time and was packaged in such a manner that there was no damage to the cd or to the case.  I am very satisified with this purchase.
&#34;Come back to me.&#34; Travel back in time and fall in love all over again. Video and audio are handled well. A solid blu-ray. Enjoy!
Have always loved this movie, since it first came out.  As my wife says, it is a great &#34;heart&#34; movie.  Highly recommend.
Such a beautiful movie and wonderful music.  Just the thing for the hopeless romanic.  This movie should be in everyones libreary.
Was new and still in the wrapper. Got it very fast in the mail. So glad to get this, it is one of my favorite movies......^i^
If you've never seen this it's a must see at least once. It's kind of a Chick Flick but worth the Watch!
the movie was in good shape and i enjoyed the movie it was something that i have been tying to find for a long.thank you,melissa
One of my best all-time movies !  I would recommend it to everyone who enjoys a trip back in time.
I thoroughly enjoyed seeing this movie, so much so that I went out and bought 2 copies of it. One for myself and one as a gift for a friend.
This is one of the sweetest love stories to see. It's timeless and heart warming. Well acted also by two of my favorite people.
A good movie but have to watch it more than one time to understand it. the beginning was some what confusing.
The soundtrack of this movie is great.  The story is fun and the scenery is wonderful.  The movie was a big hit in its day, and it still holds up.
I love this movie so much. It was five times better than the original. It had way more action than the first. It was great.
great second better than the first i bought it and loved it great worms how the worms turn cool and superb specialeffects.
We love in John Wayne.  This is one of his great movies and we received it in 2 days and in great condition and great price.
This is one of my favorite movies.I like the characters and the actors.One that I would always recommend.
Lots of excitement and humor in this excellent movie.  You can always depend on John Wayne to give a good performance.
Excellent movie- The Duke at his best. The film was entertaining, had a great plot and the subtle humor was well done.
well it's a good movie some light humor a get even type movie.Enjoyable intertianing but you've  to know one thing Iam a big JOHN WAYNE FAN.
We have a copy and so I bought this one for a friend. John Wayne fans will really love this one!
Very good overall. Not any emotional enganglements. A good "Guy" film.  John Wayne and Kirk Douglas at their best, with a bit of comedy thown in.
This is a very good John Wayne movie.  It is action packed.  Of course I love all John Wayne movies.
John Wayne and Kirk Douglas ... it just doesn't get any better than this. Simple plot but the actors make this movie fun!!
i love this movie, always like to watch Jean Arthur and have  enjoyed many of her movies. great old movie
I bought this movie to watch with my grandchildren. We love movie time together. This is one of their favorite movies.
I didn't watch the DVD, but based on the reaction of our grandchildren it is very entertaining up through age 9.
this vender I have ordered stuff from for yeaRS  they do a great job and merchandise is always here when they say or before
This is a great show that offers hours of joy for the children.My grand daughter watch's it time and time again!It made a great Christmas gift.
Literally the best movie ever made. If you into counter culture this is a must watch. Flawless performance by both Johnny Depp and Benicio Del Toro.
Amazing cast director soundtrack and cinematography. Watching this film is like dropping acid. One of my personal favorites.
Lesson well learned: Paranoia rules!  After watching this movie, I will never do drugs again.  I won't even take an aspirin.
As one who does love Fields, I think this is one of his best.  Grocery story scene with Mr. Muckle is priceless.  The film has a happy ending.
Absolute genius!  If I were asked to select the best example of comedic genius on film, &quot;IT'S A GIFT&quot; would be it.
John Lithgow gives one of his best performances in this Brian De Palma film. Anyone who is a Blow Out fan should watch Raising Cain.
I watched it the first time in the 1980's when it came out. it is a great movie to watch while under the influence of psychedelics.
There is so much going on in the film having it in HD greatly helps one to see what is actually happening.
There is nothing I do not love about this movie.  That is all I have to say.
how can YOU not like this?how can you NOT like this?how CAN you not like this?how can you not like THIS?buy it, get the criterion
This movie is a must have for any van dam fan. One of his best for sure..The fight scenes are great.
If you like Van Damme, this is one of his older but better movies.
Very cool movie!!! One of Van Damme'S best Movies!! Buy it, because it's a very hard to find DVD!! A true collector piece!!
I loved this S.E. Hinton novel brought to life in this movie.  Very good movie to watch and is very close to the book.
This is an amazing film. It's much less well known than THE OUTSIDERS, but better, in my opinion. Mickey Rourke is hypnotic.
The music will haunt you, nothing like it, and the young actors here were so good, and went on to great careers.  A very good movie.
Was fantastic brang back memories when my son was a little boy. The package got to me on time and I would use this seller again for future purchases
I love this movie.  Great family flick.  Guess thats why it spawned so many sequels and offshoots.  Recommend this to anyone.
This product was in great condition and was a terrific present for my friend. I am very pleased with my purchase.
It was in excellent condition. I am saving it for a birthday gift.
love all little kid movies and Disney movies and the little mouse is so cute to watch and listen to him talk is even better
I didn't watch this DVD, but based on the reaction of our grandchildren it is great entertainment for children through the age 9.
A wonderful movie that my family watches over and over again.  It is a classic, with characters that just melt your heart.
Another movie I hadn't seen in years.  It's funny and touching.  Really emphasizes the value of family and not giving up hope.
I bought it for my kids (3 and 7) but they are in a totally different world now. My wife and i enjoyed it very much
I received my DVD very quickly and in great condition. I would definately recommend this seller! I was very pleased!
This is such a classic movie for me. The animation is not that good, but the characters and the story make up for it.
This movie is all our granddaughter talks about. She loves the mice, tries to sing along. Great family story for everyone!
loved this movie when i was a kid so i bought it for my kids and they love it. brings back old memories
great movie from Don Bluth that has a lot of historical accuracy when teaching about the 1800's but also a great fun movie
I bought this movie for myself as I like to watch these movies and also like to have them on hand for children that come to my house to visit.
This is a great movie! I never saw it when it came out but bought 3 fievel's stuffed so I had to try it.
This is one of our children's favorite movies, recommend it to anyone with kids.  We bought it new and sealed and was shipped as so.
I remember laughing my head off at this as a kid Tiger is just hilarious in this one, its great.
An American Tale- Fievel Goes WestI ordered this for me and liked it just fine. The animation was cute.Thanks,Dana
5 stars love this movie when i was a kid and now my daughter can watch it like i did.
This has to be my all time favorite cartoon movie of my childhood.. you can not go wrong with this movie
What a great film! Just as good as the original but geared more towards kids. With another amazing score from James Horner, how can you go wrong?
Cute, cute movie.  My grandkids enjoy watching it over and over.  This will remain in our library for a long time.
Fievel Mousekowitz. One of my favorite characters of all time since I was a little kid. Never a dull moment when watching
WE HAVE ALL THE FIEVAL MOVIES, MY GRANDDAUGHTER LOVES THEM, ESPECIALLY THE BIG GLD CAT, SHE LOVES SEEING FIRVEL GET IN TROUBLE AND OUT AGAIN
It's been years since I've watched this, because it was a VHS tape. Now I can pop it into the DVD player and watch when I like.
Had this on VHS but the VCR ate the movie so I had to replace it, one of my husbands favorite movies.
Patrick Swayze + Meatloaf + Randy Travis + Trucks = Pure unadulterated awesomeness.
My husband is a truck driver and loves truck driving movies..  Great price for the movie and made a wonderful gift.
IAM A BIG FAN OF PATRICK SWAYZE. THE DVD WAS WELL PACKED AND ARRIVED AT MY HOUSE FAST.THANK YOUFROMDANIELLE
Truly love it, but after a while of seeing it over 100 times, it's boring.
Loved it. full of action. My wife and I love most of his movies. He died way to young. Road House is another great one.
This is a great movie. If you have not seen this movie it is well worth a watch a good action type of movie
I am a big Patrick Swayze fan.  This is a great action filled movie.
I loved the movie the first time I watch it. I have it on vhs and wanted it on dvd.
Love this movie with both Meat Loaf & Patrick Swayze in it.  An interesting watch for both sexes. Good Movie.
patrick swayze need I say more ..whats not to like when he is invovled in anything its just a good movie
Patrick Swayze never made a bad movie and this is a great one lots of action plus it has randy travis and meat loaf in great roles
we loved it. We couldn't ask for a better movie.  It was full of action and Patrick did an amazing job.
Great movie & great seller
Kim Basinger is a very good actress and she proves her worth in this film, This movie is well worth the purchase.
Jennifer Connelly was so cute when she was younger and this movie shows her at her best.  Quality is outstanding and no issues with the DVD.
I have a Siberian husky and when I show this movie to my kids they instantly loved it because it is a movie about sled dogs
Good Movie for whole family. Teaches a story and lesson.Children will enjoy this movie,as well as rest of family.
This movie really brought back childhood memories, so I just had to purchase it. I was very happy with the buy. I watch it often.
I love this movie. It was based on a true story. Balto goes on adventures to bring the medicines to the kids and save their lives.
i bought this as a gift for a friend and i know ill buy it again for myself. an amazing movie and the shipping was quick!
We love this movie. It is a great movie for the family to watch. I highly recommend this movie for a family movie night.
Great story!  Just adding to my video collection for my entire family to enjoy.  These are hard to find cartoons!
I loved this movie when I was growing up, and I'm excited to see that they made more of them! I'm definitely going to get all three!
The kids can't get enough of BALTO.  They range from age 3 to 8 and they all love the movie.
This is one of my favorite movies from my younger years, the product was brand new and in perfect condition
You will not be able to get up and get some chips and pop while watching this thriller.I loved it,except for the dog part.
great movie to check out. mark wahlberg when he was young. pretty good movie. worth watching. also got a free online vid with it.
Whalberg is riveting as practically perfect boyfriend hiding an insane jealous streak. It leads to terror and a surprise ending.
Favorite movies of all times !!!! This movie never gets old and the soundtrack is to die for! Love all the actors in this movie!
WOW for Mark Wahlberg ... this one really grabbed my attention and kept me hanging on. Strong characters, great story ... a great thriller.
THIS IS A REALLY GOOD THRILLER.  BETTER IF YOU ARE A MARK WALBERG FAN.  I WOULD RECOMMEND IT FOR A MOVIE NIGHT, NOT FOR KIDS THOUGH.
This is one of my favorites. The actor are fantastic. David will do anything to keep Nicole in his life. He will hurt anyone who stands in his way,
I liked this movie alot, I liked it from beginning to end, I liked that is had drama the whole time, I hope another movie comes out like this one.
Love this movie and for as many times as I rented i should have bought years ago.  Stunts are a little cheesy in blu-ray.  Even my 8 and 11 liked it.
It was in good condition, had one scratch on it. Played great! The movie inspired me to get a basset hound.
This is Burt Reynolds and sally Field at their best. I just love this movie. A classic. A++++++ . :)
May be an old movie but it is still a classic.  Even better now that the movie seems to turn into a sing along with the music.
This movie arrived in perfect conditon.  One of the funniest movies ever.  All characters great.  If you haven't seen it buy it you will enjoy it.
I bought this movie on DVD the other day.  I Love this movie, one of my favorites.  Well worth the price I only payed around $9.00 WOW
One of the all time classic car chase movies. Any car lover should check this out. Great Blu-ray conversion. Still good after all this time.
No problems with shipment, received product without nreasonable delay and in good condition.
One of the top two &#34;Southern Good Old Boy&#34; movies. This is when America fell in love with Burt Reynolds.
Classic favorite... funny. And the car is just a staple. Car guy must have movie. I need five more words.
We showed this film to our 16 year old (who is familiar with Sally Fields from Spiderman).He loved it (so did we; it holds up well)
I love Jackie Gleason in this movie, with his nitwit son in tow, the remarks he makes make  my side hurt from laughter...
I have always liked this movie, it is funny and CLEAN, like they used to be.  Jeanne
A classic for all time.  you have to own the Bandit.  See the movie that Made Burt one of the best.
A GREAT MOVIE ,ONE OF THE FUNNIEST OF ALL TIME.JACKIE GLEASON WAS PERFECT FOR HIS ROLE.YOU DO NOT SEE THIS KIND OF QUALITY ANYMORE IT IS RARE
I like it when I first saw it and still like it. I guest that old movies are still good movies  Burt Reynolds still a legend.
this is a great action movie and burt Reynolds and sally field are great in it.  well worth getting. thanks
I love the first one much better than 2nd and 3rd one. Its lot more orginial and funnier in first movie :)
Burt had Great classic movies,As soon as i heard he was Sick, I wanted his movies  ,I aways loved his movies,Sally field  is GREAT  in here to  !!
I watched this movie as a kid to young to appriciate now even better jackie gleason rocks. One of the best all time greats thank god for blu ray.
This was a gift for my son who at the age of 5 loved this movie, Jerry Reed was his favorite!Very entertaining movie!
Christmas present for my son in law.  He's a big smokey and the bandit fan and is absolutely thrilled with it.
great movie to watch if you like the two in it and more colors and better picture and better sound
This is an old movie but still a good movie.  Burt Reynolds and Sally Field has great chemistry.  I totally suggest this movie.
Smokey and the bandit is one of the best movies I have ever seen and I highly recommend watching it.
Gleason is hilarious! This is a must have for every red-blooded American's video library. This movie will brighten your day. Laugh your pants off.
The best classic movie its one of the best ones i love to watch im going to get the 2 one all so
As enjoyable as the first time I saw it in the movie theater; it was a good buy.  Thank you.
The classic that sold a bunch of TransAm cars back in the day!  Loved this movie and it never gets old!
I always loved this movie, but got sick of watching it on TV and having all the racy dialogue edited it out. Good stuff, and funny as hell.
This has got to be one of the classic first run chase movies in the world with comedy mixed in through out.. lmao
What a great movie.  Makes you laugh all the time.  Great car chases.  A funny story line and the clasic boy get girl.
I loved this movie as a kid growing up.  I'm glad I own it now so I can introduce my wife to it.  This is classic 80's fun.
J Fox is awesome
Michael J. Fox is great in it. Love it. Saw at least 10x. Not for everyone. Can watch over and over.
This is a wonderful Michael J Fox movie.One of this best movies.Michael J Fox need a say more.
I love this movie. It is extremely funny and entertaining. The quality of the movie is good. The  movement of the plot is excellent.
1 OF MY MOST FAVORITE ACTORS,THE MAN IS A GENIUS.I LOVE THIS MOVIE.JUST LOOKING AT THE PICTURE ON THE BOX YOU KNOW YOU FIXING TO HAVE A GOOD LAUGH.
Good movie, entertaining, early Michael Fox, comedy.  Worth adding to any DVD collection. The ending is good, entire movie is fun.
This movie I watched before!  I love movies with Michael in them!  He is so good in this one!  Thanks!
An okdie but a great one had it on vhs and now getting all the movies i have on vhs and getting them on dvd and donating my vhs to the local library
This is a good classic movie that I enjoyed years ago.  Wish it was on Blu-Ray but this regular copy worked out just fine.
Although a "disaster" movie; this is one of MY personal favorites.  Has a "lesson" in it.
is a good movie with some actual footage of the hindenberg i remember the broadcast when she caught fire and burned
Very good thriller of a movie.  I saw this movie when I was a kid and enjoyed it then as now.
What excitement.  What adventure.  An amazing recreation.  George C. Scott played the part as the events  may have actually happened.
I forgot about this classic movie from so long ago. It was a good movie then and still today thanks to some great actors like George Scott.
great movie wish it were in the theaters it is a classic that should be shown more and more times
The person who received this movie liked it very much and said it was well done and that they enjoyed it start to finish.
Hadn't seen it in years and am big George C. Scott fan.A true epic - and enjoyable time and after.
I had seen part of this on U tube and wanted moor. I was pleased with it. Fair picture quality and good sound.
I saw this in the movie theater back in 1977 when they had sensorround.  I think it's awsome to have it on DVD complete with sensoround.
This is a surprising good old fashion Tom & Jerry movie. Good cast and a good story. I always enjoy the movie and laugh.
This educator has, since kidhood, like rollercoasters.  This film has plenty of 'coaster action!!
Perfect just as described I don't know what else to say but thanks I couldn't be more happy thanks a lot
This is one of Robert Redford's best movies ever.  this movie also offers a great history lesson about Castro and Cuba.
This is a fantastic movie - very well done and a classic. Acting is superb. Watched it more than once.
A forgotten classic - the scenes in the jungle (no CGI here) simply take your breath away - NOT TO BE MISSED!
This movie is an oldie but a goodie. I have liked it since I was in High School. The movie was delivered as promised and is in great condition.
Just another great movie by a good actor and we will continue to look for more that he has performed in
Love Roy Scheider movies.  This one was great, long slog, but great.
This was a gift. This is a Classic! They are happy with it and very happy to add it to their collection.
Old school movies are great this one is excellent.  The character actors were great.  Worth buying and watching often.  Well directed and filmed.
One on the all time greats with Gary Cooper and Ingrid Bergman and classic in the true sense,they really don't make films like this any more.
Buy this movie. The Hemingway novel is brought to life with gusto! Great acting, great story. I am glad it is part of my collection.
Nothing to talk about, my childhood movie stars at work. Incomparable.  Where are the professionals now?And all without four letter words.
Gary Cooper is fine as the leading man, but Ingrid Bergman and Katina Paxinou carry the film until the fighting begins.
Love the movie and the book.....Johnny Depps portrayal of Hunter was dead on its amazing would so recommend this to othes!!!!!
this film is a misunderstood classic, but it will be available on the criterion collection label so wait for that.
Such a great Cult Movie. This movie takes me back. Great picture quality and audio.
This movie is great if you're into movies about drug use/exploration, which I am. It's one of my favorite topics. Also very funny.
HUNTER S. THOMPSON WOULD'VE BEEN THE BEST DAMN SHERRIFF COLORADO EVER HAD!
I'm just seeing this move for the first time. And I am hooked!! Johnny Depp is a fool! OMG! cracked up the entire movie! Excellent!!!
This movie is a trip. Even sober it makes you feel high on something. Johnny and Benicio are amazing in this movie!!
When this movie first came out it got such lousy reviews I didn't watch it at first but did end up renting it.  It has now become one of my favorites
One of the funnest movies I've ever seen. Johnny Depp should have won an Oscar. Again not for everyone but very funny.
This movie is pretty weird at times, if you can last to the end, i think you will like it. Its a cool movie, but definitely weird.
love depp movies @ dvd 5 Star Service always great 2 deal with your co.see u soon Thanks  Kerry BUY IT.
You would have had to REALLY enjoyed your teenage years in the 90's, if you know what I mean, to really appreciate this movie. EXTREMELY FUNNY
The first time I watched this, I never liked it. But, when I found out who the disguised stars were, I caught on and enjoy the campy scenes.
very awesome movie, takes eveything from the book...wonderful acting and the dvd extras were very good.A must have for any Depp fan..
quite the journey, a fun frolic in a bizarre writers worlda great addition to your collectionbuy the book too
Great classic . Wish it were in color but nevertheless good acting good movie and one that belongs in your movie collection
this movie had to be funny. it has the guys from south park what more could u expect than very sick humor but very funny humor.
Matt Stone and Trey Parker. Enough said.
This movie is hilarious!!!!!!!! I saw it with my friend and we laughed throughout the entire thing.
This is really a cute movie.  My granddaughter who is 12 loves it.  Great movie for young girls and grandma's to watch together.
Reminded me of the movies that use to inspire something; anything but only s*x;  It had sweetness and meaning.  It was great.
its sad, sad,sad meryl streep was so good in this roll she was believable the father william hurt played a jerk very believable too
Even after seeing this a million times, it still is creepy. Jennifer Tilly and Brad Dourif do a great job with the voices of the dolls.
bride of chucky.it's funnier than it sounds.it's like bride of frankenstein or something.i was laughing my head off when i saw this
This is a very good movie, both scary and funny so I'd recommend this.
This movie made me have ALL the chucky collection!such a good movie besides Jennifer Tilly is HOT!Thank you chucky!
Definitely the best Chucky movie made. If you watch all of the series you can't miss this one. This is hands down my personal fav.
A Bible story presented in cartoon picture so beautiful and the songs also. All the miracles and moments well resume.
So glad I bought it.  Thought I had it already but it must have been what I have in VHS.  Worth seeing over and over again.
A very good movie taken from the Bible and told in a manner that children do understand and enjoy totally
I did not watch this my girlfriend did.  It was a good movie and clear.  The video was quick and no break ups while watching it.
Love this movie. Love cartoons, love Disney, love history. Not a fan of musicals, but the music in this movie is beautiful and not annoying.
'Nuff said.  This is a great movie--beautiful animation and a good (if one not always faithful to its source material) telling of the exodus.
I like this story and plot. When I was younger I always wanted a copy. A great childhood story and animation
Wonderful movie! Great music, beautifully animated, and it has a wonderful message about the treatment of others! Great movie for kids. And me. lol
My Girlfriend whom I loved very much got me to watch it and I fell completely in love with it.
This movie really was good.  It helped give my niece (7 years old at the time) a visual for the story of Moses and she understands it a lot better.
My children and I really enjoyed this movie.  It seemed accurate and it was very interesting.  A film well done.
This was a great movie for my 6th grade religion class. After teaching about this subject, this was a great way to end the chapter.
Love the story and great for Sunday afternoon TV.  Wish it was less expensive though, probably won't ever rent it again.
Came on time. Works great. Love it!
Really does a lot with the potential conflict between Moses & Ramses. Great music too! Hans Zimmer & Stephen Schwartz rule!
We absolutely loved this movie, the music is one of our favorites!
I bought this for my 4 yr. old grandson and he really likes it. We usually watch the Disney movies together.
Even though they didn't quite stick to the Biblical account, it was enjoyable to see it depicted on screen.  Wonderful songs!
Love these guys, so much personality! this is a great buddy cop film. Wish there were more movies like this
One of the top five Michael J Fox movies not part of a trilogy and James Woods is great too
Michael before his ravashing illness was visible; Wood playing himself as Mr Cool. Good stuff.But impact life? Violence is our way of life.
I grew up with this movie I recommend it to people. I think of this movie as just mindless fun just pop in and not too bad for the whole family.
My boys loved this dvd. It has been around awhile and continues to last and give enjoyment to all my children from toddler to teen years. Great buy!
I received  Before time which I was ,so pleased with. Would recommend to a lot of my friends as they have children older than 7yrs.
This movie is an oldie but a goodie.  For today's young kids they would enjoy it.  Everyone will love this movie.
I love this movie, great action, my niece and nephew love it even more, we watch this every Saturday, and it's keep my family happy
Such a great movie. It's nice seeing these young actors when they are first starting out, they did a good job.
one of the best movies since toy story. i loved this movie growing up. the monsters were of course my favorite.
I saw this a long time ago to with my kids and so bought it for the grkids and they loved this movie to.
I received all around great service from start to finish.  It was a gift and he was very happy with it.
Small Soldiers was so funny  its a great movie for monster lovers every where!
This is the best war movie ever!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! awsome special effects!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! And the Gorgonites and the Commando Elite, there funny.
Well I bought this for my sons in vhs when they was little now I have grandkids I am going to give this too my grandson.oh I like it too.
A DIFFERENT KIND OF EASTWOOD MOVIE, BUT VERY GOOD. HE HAS DONE A GOOD JOB AS USUAL. I AM AN EASTWOOD FAN.
I like this Eastwood movie; I always found myself watching it when it came on TV so I bought it.
An action filled movie, and filled with the usual Clint type action. Enjoyed watching it again after seeing it years before.
The drama of a spy movie and seeing Clint Eastwood perform many of his own stunts for this film make it truly a classic in every sense of the word.
If I have to explain why this show is so great, then you just wouldn't understand. Just watch it and enjoy.
Clint Eastwood as a  professor and part time hit man , when he's not ogling precious works of art and mountain climbing . How can you top that ?
I've always enjoyed Clint's films. I especially like his earlier films where he trusted composers to do the music !
The critics didn't think much of this movie, but I really enjoyed it.  Lots of action, and Clint Eastwood was still looking great.
this movie was fabulous!it was relatable!the product was great, no stracthes or anything!Hilarious movie!Add it to your collection!
My favorite Michael J. Fox movie...great cast...just all out funny!  Talk about 'twists and turns'...this movie will keep you amused!
I found this item on Amazon for a good price. I have a friend that has wanted this movie and now he is very happy.
My mom loved her dvd that I gave her for Christmas and has not stopped watching it lol, thank you!!
i love the idea that this movie presents. it give us (women) a chance to visit a world were men can have babies, should we choose not to ourselves.
I love the ridiculous so i can easily watch this over and over. Great cast for silliness. Heart warming fun.
Hilariously entertaining - a great movie for anyone that loves Arnold or just the movies of the 90's in general.
BOUGHT THIS AS A CHRISTMAS GIFT. CAME ON TIME. GREAT MOVIE. SHOULD BE A CLASSIC. WOULD BUY AGAIN FROM SELLER. SUPERFAST SHIPPING.
I really really liked this movie!  It explores some important issues. Also a great cast, and a lot of fascinating characters.
An old favorite movie.  It was very contriversial when I first came out but there are many truths and good elements about the film.
I LOVE THE MOVIE. IT'S THE TRUTH BUT I DON'T JUDGE BASED ON RACE, LOOKS, ETC. WELL, I TRY NOT TO JUDGE BASED ON LOOKS. I ENJOYED IT.
Works good and a very good movie that Spike Lee created.  Has good meaning be hide it.I thank you
This is an exciting SEA SAGA, CECIL B. DEMILL, JOHN WAYNE(PLAYS A BAD GUY), great cast and there's a love story, what more could you ask for!
It also I didn't have on DVD.  Have also on VHS.  I highly recomend it for John Wayne fans youg or old
One of my favorite movies, loved it on TV, had it on VHS, but the DVD is so much better
I like this dvd I just did not get why he was shooting. He never talk never ask for ransom.but I enjoy watching this movie
I liked the movie people before they got famous evil little kids .It was very neat thank you very much
Classic. For ages to come. I watched this when I was younger. I havent seen the original version for comparison. But this is very entertaining.
I loved this movie, especially because it is from a different point of view, the so-called "enemy". Well acted!
One of the first anti-war movies Great My Mother saw in it when it first came out and said the same thing. Sad Ending
I have watched this many times in the past.  A great classic movie.  Updated my collection with a blu-ray version.
I had gotten the movie for a friend, but watched it before I gave it to him. (Bad, me...) Seriously though, NICE DVD mastering!
this movie was a gift for a friend. he asked for it. this is a older movie and a goodie.
I really enjoyed this one.  great acting and character development.  Spike Lee's touch is throughout the movie.I highly recommend.
bride of chucky and child's play 2 are sorta both as good.see this.it's funny
THIS IS THE BEST OF THE CHILD'S PLAY SERIES! YOUR "CHILD'S PLAY LIFE" WILL REVOLVE AROUND THIS MOVIE! ALSO MAKE SURE YOU HAVE THE ORIGINAL!
I LOVED THE FIRST ONE, BUT THIS IS A LITTLE BIT BETTER! ITS FUNNIER,KOOLER DEATHES, AND A AMAZING THRILL! GIVE IT A TRY.....YOULL LOVE IT!
I love the all of the Child's play series. If you watch one you gotta watch them all. Great series. Thanx Amazon for having it.
I AM NOT GOING TO WRITE ANYMORE AFTER THIS THE RATING SAYS IT ALL GREAT!!!!
It was nice to show my kids where some of the creepy doll movies started from back in the day
I love this movie. This is one of the great movies. It has actors in it. I have seen it more than once.
I Love it ,Barbara
I love this movie. It is a bit out of the ordinary and some of it is absolutely unbelievable but still very entertaining.
He makes very few flops, the older he got the better he was.  I would of loved to meet him when he was around, he is one of a kind.
My husband is a huge John Wayne fan and he loves all his movies. It's nice to be able to find them here.
For all John Wayne fans,you won't be disappointed..Action packed with a load of stars.You will enjoy watching over and over.
I'VE WATCHED THIS MANY TIMES, JUST LOVE JOHN WAYNE. AND TELLS HOW DANGEROUS IT IS TO PUT OUT THESE OIL FIRES.
This is a fantastic story of Red Adair the oil fire fighter. I consider this film as a milestone in my life in Baytown, Texas
I grew up going to the movies every Saturday in the 60's, and I always enjoyed good John Wayne movies like this one.
This is mine. Great movie. Tells the story of the life of Red Adair....the greatest oil well fire fighter ever.
action packed film about oil workers and the dangers of their jobs. nice side story of theirpersonal lives and family dynamics
this is one of the few films of john wayne that is not a western,that he is good in and the people that star along side are good also
This is one of the best action packed moviesJohn Wayne ever made. Jim Hutton is great inthis one as well.
Good quality DVD and as soon as I can I plan on acquiring many more John Wayne movies. He is the best actor of all times.
a great movie. my library does not have it so i had to get it through interlibrary loan. now i have my own copy to wear out.
i was shocked that i found a movie releaswed in 1968 on dvd this is the one john wayne movie i like will recommend to friends
Love this classic and since it is not often shown on Cable or networks, we wanted to add to our collection!  John Wayne at his best too!
Great movie with John Wayne at his best as always.Made you feel the heat and terror those men had to endure in that line of work.Really enjoy it.
I have always liked this movie and just recently thought about buying it.  Great deal!  I recommend it to John Wayne fans.
It's John Wayne for goodness sake. What's not to love about watching the Duke in one of his greatest films.
John Wayne is always good in a movie but this was one of his best.It's exciting till the end.
John Wayne is best on horseback, but I love all his movies.  If I'm not mistaken, this is the only movie about this subject.
One of my favorite John Wayne movies. A lot of action, a little humor, John Wayne being THE MAN.
JOHN WAYNE WAS ALWAYS TRYING TO ENTERTAIN US WITH HIS VARIOUS ROLES HE TOOK THIS TIME HE PLAYS FIRE FIGHTER
ANOTHER JOHN WAYNE MASTER PIECE - WE HAVE TO REMEMBER THE STARS OF THE PAST TO KEEP THEM ALIVE FOREVER
Never, disappointed when watching Ms. Ryder's movies. She, does such a great job with this movie, I am never disappointed!!
It's a nice movie about women in a family and how they cope in certain situations.  A good movie to watch with friends.
I love movies like this.  If you like the films Fried Green Tomatoes and Divine Secrets of the Ya-Ya Sisterhood, you'll like this.
As an avid quilter I get a kick out of the symbolism. There's a lot to be said in the story in a quilt and the friendships they encourage...
This movie has a great ensemble of cast is a marvelous &#34;chick flick&#34; with interwoven story lines, strong women, and gorgeous men!  Yum!
The movie is another classic, very enjoyable to watch good story.  Winnona did a good acting job.  it was a tear jerker.
This was ordered for my mother in law who really enjoyed the show.  She was happy and came in good condition.
A timeless kiddie movie. I enjoyed it when it came out, my 6 year old girl enjoys it now. A winner.
Come on this movie is awesome, funny as can be, cracks me up no matter how many times I watch it, Awesome
Damon Wayans is very hilarious in this movie. I saw it on tv a couple of weeks ago and had to buy this.
If your looking for a funny movie to watch that'll keep you laughing, I would definitely recommend seeing Major Payne!
love this movie to death. cant beat it. its worth any price and I didn't have to pay ridiculously thank you so much
I love this movie!  It is very funny.  It is one of my all-time favorite movies.
I love this movie. It is pretty fun and lighthearted. I would recommend this movie to everyone. I've already watched it several times since I got it!
This dvd was of very good quality, the picture was true and crisp. It was well worth the price that I paid for it.
This movie is hilarious. Funny all the way through and a good story. Well worth buying. Im very happy with this.
I laughed so hard through that my sides hurt as well as my cheeks. This is a great movie if you like comedies then this is the movie for you
This movie is hilarious. You can watch it over and over again and still get a good laugh. Love it!
Wayans managed to morph Full Metal Jacket with Band Camp, resulting in a unique, funny movie that entertains on several levels.
I SEEN IT BEFORE AND IT WAS FUNNY  I SAID I WANTED TO SEE IT AGAIN WELL I GOT THE MOVIE AND IT WAS FUNNY
I personally don't care for this movie. I bought it for my husband. The only thing I like about this movie is how much it makes my husband laugh.
We had this in video but we decided to order in DVD. We love it when it first came out and we still enjoy watching it.
I am a former Drill Sergeant and the movie cracks me up everytime I see it. Great for the family as well.
I hadn't seen this movie in a long time and I just watched it a few days ago. It was just as funny as the first time I saw it...A+
if you like to laugh,then this movie is worth its weigh.if someone is a veteran of service,you'll laugh hard.get it.
This is A good classic for me having seen it as A kid & it is still just as good & funny today. I say this is A must own for any Damon Wayns fan.
This package arrived early and was a surprise for someone who is a fan of the movie.  He was excited.
Hilarious movie. Longtime favorite of my husband and I. We just introduced it to our 9 y/o and she loves it too!
got this for my son for christmas , he liked this movie . He was surprised and enjoyed watching it again
Paul Newman is absolutely fantastic as head coach Reg Dunlop. Everyone will enjoy this film, but it is must see for hockey fans!
Love the movie and the gift fit right in for Christmas.  Price and delivery were excellent.  We will enjoy this for many years.
This was bought for my husband.  Received in a timely fashion and in good condition!
A must have for any sports fan.. Side splittingly funny from beginning to end. Perfectly cast and it never gets old.
This is a classic Paul Newman flic that's incredibly fun to watch! Every time I see it, I laugh my butt off!
If you haven't seen this movie you're missing out. This movie is completely hilarious. Even though it's an older movie it's still worth watching.
Does this really require a review. A NEwman classic and throw in the Hanson Brothers and you have a great film!
This is a classic movie and is a must have for all hockey lovers.  Paul Newman is great in this movie.  Great movie.
This was such a great birthday gift for my father in law. If you are a hockey fan & like comedy you will love this one.
This is one of my favorite sports movies...the transfer to DVD is good and sound quality excellent...
Slap Shot to hockey is what Caddyshack is to Golf.  Monumental truths and laughs........got to love itl even if you see it 100 times.
Beautiful picture & sound with all the original music intact the way it should always be seen. A real classic.
I own 1&2! I love these movies! I think everyone should whatch this movie. You"ll laugh to you die!
Greetings All, I was very happy to receive this. A very good dvd, nice and clear, great sound, would buy from seller again! Cheers! William
This movie is such a classic it's funny , entertaining and endearing all in one.  So happy to have this as part of my video library. Thanks Amazon
u cant go wrong with classic movies.. i AM pleased with all of my cd's the specifics are quite clear, awesome keep up the good work
This is a great movie to watch and it's also one of my favorite movies. Highly Recommended
I just love this film, The story and the cinematograhy..Alfre is Brilliant. One of my favarite, She hate me and Clockers is next in my archeves.
IT'S A FUNNY& GREAT MOVIE. IT SHOWED THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN LIVING I NEW YORK VERSUS VISITING VIRGINIA. I CAN'T EXPLAIN THE REST.
Reminds me of the time I grew up in the city. The songs brought back so many memories and the good times we used to have.
Great movie and in great condition. This is a movie from my childhood that I will never forget. Must see.
I enjoy the story of Stephen Biko very much.  I loved the movie about how his story got out.
This movie chronicles the true life adventures of Anais the famous author.  The movie is very sexy,sensual, and risky.  Lovely flick.Enjoy:David
Love anything about Henry and Anais.. This is a really good book and in good condition. Enjoyed it very much
This movie is a very well cast and very, very funny. Every actor did his and her part, Very well worth seeing.
If you like slapstick comedy like my Husband does then you will really enjoy this one. It is one adventure after another
Addition to personal dvd collection.  Hard to find in stores, easy to find on Amazon.com1941 (Collector's Edition)
Love this comedy. Even though it's very silly and campy, it makes for a great late night movie. John Belushi makes me laugh just looking at him.
This is a great movie that takes a very funny look at how Americans could defend their coast.
This movie makes me wish I was back in 1941. I wish John Belushi would have lived longer and made more movies like this one.
This is an awesome movie. I have watched it alot.  My dad and I have always loved to watch it.
Most awesome of movies and let me tell you why it was the old SAT Night crew in a crazy WWII in America viewpoint. WIN WIN WIN!
One of John Belushi's best, I put this one up there with Animal House, very funny. Sad we lost Belushi at such a young age, great comedian.
Love this movie!! An oldie but goodie!! Item was as described! Great condition. With winter here this is a great movie to watch with popcorn!!
Funny movie with hilarious plots. The cast was EXCELLENT.  John and Dan, great together as always!The dance contest was a riot...literally.
trying to replace my vhs with my favorite dvd's and you make it easier thanks so much Merry Christmas and a happy new year blessed be
ALTHOUGH I'VE SEEN AND LOVED &#34;PAULIE,&#34; I WANTED MY GRANDCHILDREN TO HAVE THE SAME EXPERIENCE. BOUGHT THIS FOR CHRISTMAS GIFT.
Watched this movie a number of years back, and saw it on-line and just had to purchase it.What a heart-warming story with a sweet ending.
I really love this movie. It arrived on time and in excellent condition.  My grand kids love it.  Great for movie night!
Great family movieI love this movie, because it is heart warming. It is neat to have a story told by the animal.
This is a good family story.  There are a few swear words but mostly it is a great film. Our family loved it.
This was a very cute family movie. I would recommend this movie to anyone that is looking for a clean, entertaining family movie.
Love Paulie (the Parrot).  I watch it over and over.  Such a cute and fun movie.  I'm a real bird lover -- this movie is great.
This is a pretty good video and story line and is fairly good for families. Has a good ending and may reveal much about many societal problems.
This film my kids can't get enough of they keep watching it if you want quite kids this would be it
Very cute movie.  as always there is a moral at the end.  Good watching
Watched it many times, and feels great that I have the DVD somewhere.  All digital now and buy DVDs on a rare occasion.
I had bought this movie for my son and he loved it! Price was great, delivery went well. I couldn't ask for more.
I saw this on a bus!  This was a great movie. The same plot as 'A Bug's Life'. Good Movie.
Animation and casting was right on. It teaches about teamwork and hard work. No regrets watching this movie...a lot. LOL!
Its a classic movie i enjoyed watching as a kid and i want my kids to enjoy watching it as well
This dvd works exactly as advertised, Not much more I can say than that, I have no complaints and/or compliments.
I usually don't like Woodey Allen, but in this movie I surprizingly did enjoy his character in this ffunny movie!
This item arrived quickly & will be a great addition to my movie collection. Glad that I could purchase a VHS.
The story has a nice plot. All the characters are interesting and it has good coloring. My grandsons love it.
This animated movie is about an ant that is not happy with his lot in life and how he goes about changing it.
i watched this movie as a kid and i loved it and i still love it just how you would hope the Flintstones would be.
Great quality. Great shipping. Feel like I got my monies worth. This was a gift and he is happy so with that so am I. Would to business again.
Funny, family friendly, good adaptation from animation, sorry they didn't make more.
i loved this movie growing up, it was one of my favorites. i would definately recommend this movie and also to see the sequel.
Great movie very funny see it a long time ago and just had to have it on DVD to own
My grandson loved this movie! and had requested it.Got it to add to his collection. My husband and I had never seen it and also enjoyed it.
Rosie O'Donnell is Great in this movie. I Love her character in the movie.
Was a gift for my parents.  They are replacing all the old VHS tapes down to DVD's.They are They loved it.
This Is A Great Live-Action Flintstones Movie. John Goodman Does A Great Job Playing Fred Flintstone.
This movie is a family classic, and I still watch it frequently!
I had it on VHS for years and am still converting to DVD.  I had to have this long time favorite.  Jessica Tandy was such an awesome actress.
its a film the whole family can enjoy with its comdy in it the storyline its a good one i enjoyed watcing this movies
so great movie, and so cute, i was young i waited so long, i got this, i am so happy, love it thank.
I have always loved this movie. I lost my copy and had to have another one for my collection It's just a great movie
I have looked for this movie for awhile. It is so cute! The actors did a great job with this story.
I bought this movie for my collection as one of the movies I grew up watching.  This movie is very cute!!
I bought this because it was one of my fave child hood movies, but 2 & 6 yr.old watch it all the tme. It also got here w/in 2 days.
This is a movie for the whole family. It is a real cute movie of hope. You get lost in the story. Another .classic movie
This is an oldie but goodie. Everyone needs to see this. This movie is good for the whole family. You'll love it.
A funny and different movie that we have seen before and now we have the DVD to see it when ever we want.
I love this movie it is so adorable. I use to watch it as a kid. So a trip down memory lane.,....
I'm sure they'll love it! It's for Christmas and they haven't gotten it yet but I'm sure they'll love it
I bout this for my mother, when it came she was so happy and right a way put it on. seeing her happy maid me hapy.
This is a great movie that I loved watching as a child and I knew that it had to show it to the kids in my family.
I had been looking for a dvd version of this movie for a long long time and I finally found it in great condition!
Well worth owning at great .price.Got here on time and no problems.Kids are sure to love ths movie.
My son watched an old VCR tape of this move and my moms, and I had to get the DVD for christmas.  I love watching old movies with him.
A movie I grew up watching over and over. Very funny and exciting at the same time.Even mind blowing. It's a great movie
movie is good quaity good service good xxx xxx xxx xxx xx xxx xxx xxx xxx xxx xxx xxx x
I am happy with the dvd.  I had seen the movie a long time ago and was happy to be able to buy the dvd.Susan P. Keefe
Great movie what can I say lol. Don't want to do any spoiler alerts or anything. Flying robots are great lol
I saw this movie in the theaters and loved it then. It's a cute movie that one can sit down and watch with children, over and over.
Batteries not included, is a fun and heartwarming movie. It's great for kids of all ages (and I liked it too, and I'm 54).
I saw this movie a long time ago and wanted it for my library.  It is an interesting story line and the famiy enjoy watching it.
keep you rolling in tears and great comdey to see. put it in your case of movies to see. I enjoy it
Not sure why you have 2 reviews for this I only have the one and I really love the show
My five stars for Dead Men Don't Wear Plaid are primarily for Miklos Rozsa's beautiful and serious musical score, which stands alone by itself.
My dad n i love this movie. Pajamas! I will take care of them for you! Toothpaste on her shoe!
Brilliant concept.  Always great to see snippets of the old classics woven into a modern tale. Love to watch it again and again.
I love Henry Fonda and Richard Widmark movies. A somewhat tense movie with a great supporting cast. Harry Guardino, James Whitmore sr etc.
This movie has a sense of fun that you just don't seem to find in horror films today. Acting is great, music is great. Three thumbs up!
Winning was the screen debut of Richard Thomas. Luckily I got to see this in the theatre. Joanne Woodward provides wonderful support.
If you like early racing movies here's another good one. It ranks right up there with Le Mans and Gran Prix. It's a must see!
sean penn is fantastic and he makes most of the movie fit around his ridiculous antics which are non stop.
Non compare to fast times. Shawn Penn in his BEST role!1980'S fun and a pretty good soundtrack.See it now or Nipsey gets mad!
this is such a good movie, you won't want to miss it. it's a hilarious movie, and you should see it.
I have  Fast Times at Ridgemont High [ 1982 ] ON LASERDISC,'tis a great Comedy from Sean Penn That you'll Fall in love with. :P
I am actually not a Penn fan but he does a remarkable job in the role. Very very funny film.
80's classic movie that all can relate to no matter their age- classic teenage themes that make you laugh and cry remembering
Great flick and actor also. I watch this when i need a good laugh....A classic for sure!!! fun times right there.
very funny movie from the time I 1st saw it in the movies in 82 to now.  will watch over and over
I always loved this movie. Classic comedy at its best. Being in blu ray makes it even better! A must own
I loved this movie as a teen and I love it as a 50+ year old man.  If you laughed then, you'll laugh now... I promise.
Which explains why HD lost I guess. It was a nice idea though because at the time HD movies became cheaper and cheaper as blu-ray won out.
This should be a requirement for graduating high school! A hillarious though insightful filmKenneth Haft
Just wanted the classic movie.  Got this so I could have it three ways (Hopefully future-proof).  Price was reasonable and product as expected.
Love this classic. I love all 80s movies and wanted to add this one to my collection. Great price and came exactly as it was described!
very funny good movie
A classic teen comedy! A very well written film with a great cast. If you haven't seen this one yet, it's long over due!
Such a great movie, this is one of those movies that I can watch anyday of the week and still laugh like it is the first time watching it.
this movie is nonstop and high school adventures this is a classic throw back of the 80's so laugh and chill .
This is a fun movie to watch. It takes me back to my high school years. I like the music that is played in the movie.
This is my favorite Sean Penn movie and one of my many favorite comedy films.  Penn makes an excellent high school goofball.  VERY FUNNY!
a 1980's introduction to some the finest actors and actresses in the business today. and clearly sean penn's finest hour by a long long stretch.
I love old movies and this is one of them. Doris Day and Rock Hudson are fun to watch. Absolutely amazing.
This  movie is great no matter how many  times you see it; Doris Day and Rock Hudson were at the top of their game. It won't disappoint.
brought back lots of memories of watching Doris Day on the big screen, then on TV ... a classic Day-Hudson movie
I have watched this many many times and I enjoy it more every time.  The characters are fun but not over the top.
This is another great movie from Doris Day and Rock Hudson.  Well worth watching.  I have watched it over and over again.
Such an adorable movie!  Love Doris Day in this charming littlelove story.  Another good classic to cuddle up with.
Doris Day and Rock Hudson again. This movie is one of my favorites. It's funny, witty, silly and a good way to get things off of your mind.
this is part documentary and part concert. it has great sound and pictur quality. it has plenty of special features.
John Densmore put together a great video that pictured the early history of the doors. It was a real shame that he was out of control.
I enjoy high lights and music videos from back then. this is a great one to get if you like the doors.
I love the Doors.  This is great video for doors fans and will stand the test of time.  Thanks a lot.
MJ and Diana Ross star in this remake of the Wizard of Oz.  Add to your collection with this gem.
What an Awesome movie, wonderful for kids! Love this movie! Lets dance lets sing... Full of music sing sing sing
The was the best buy, it's came so quick as soon as i ordered it, and it was standard mailing, it's a classic must have!!!
This movie takes me back to my childhood.  You have to watch this one if you've seen the original,  diversity is a wonderful thing.
great movie for family , not really got great accliamed , but should have, you should have this in your collection
It was delivered on time and in excellent condition and I wouldn't hesitate to buy from them again,Thank you!2 thumbs way up!
A oldie but goodie. It is just like the Wizard of Oz with black people. It was very good. Loved it as a kid and it is cool now.
This was great we had so much fun that evening, we laughed and sang. the movie did come on time thank u so much everything was in great condition
i've looked for this dvd movie for a while. was worth the money and the bonus cd was a plus.
This is a Musical Classic that is a must in every Music Library. Features Michael Jackson, Diana Ross, Ralph Wilcox, Hinton Battle and many more!
I enjoy this.  I just love to watch and Michael Jackson, in this musical. It really reminds me, how much he is missed.
One of my favorite movies from childhood, now I can watch it anytime I like. Sing and dance along when I need a pick me up.
I remember this movie from my childhood on TV.  I had to get it just to see how accurate my memories were! Michael Jackson...
I love this film. My favorite musical film. A rare treat. I enjoyed this movie since my childhood. Pretty Good!
Excellent! Excellent! Excellent! It will hold your attention and keep you moving in your seat. Fun family movie. Loved the actors.
little sad but it was great movie
This is such a wonderful family story & entertaining in the process.  Boy does this bring back memories.
This movie will bring a tear to your eye. It is an awesome movie. I think everyone should watch it
Kevin Costner is great in these type roles, the boy was excellent, a nice movie to watch and it was entertaining
This movie always makes me cry...one of the few Costner films I enjoy watching over and over again. Get it!
this movie came well package i have not watch nor seen the movie i will watch and comment later to make sure it doent skip
You deffiantly have to rent this movie and watch it. This movie was one great movie! Well done and thought provoking.
Very worth the watching.
This is truly one of my favorite movies, ever! My grandson loved it so much I had to give it to him! Such a powerful message for everyone!
Love, Love this movie. I love Tom Hanks, Carrie Fisher and all of the crazy neighbors.
THIS IS THE FUNNIEST TOM HANKS FILM IVE EVER SEEN. EXCELLENT. MUST SEE. TOM HANKS IS BRILLIANT
Everytime I am in a bad mood...I watch this and the bad mood is gone in an instant.  Highly recommended for anyone who needs a good laugh!!!
THIS MOVIE IS HYSTERRICAL AND I LOVED IT, BUY IT AND YOU WOULD ENJOY IT.
this is one of my all time fav movies! it is hilarious! tom hanks is great! it has some classic lines.
This is an oldy, but a goody.  Very funny and great acting. I would highly recommend it.  Great service from Amazon.
I can relate, living in a neighborhood and all. This is such a funny wonderful 80's movie! Yo Rummsfield!!!!!  I Crack up every time.
One of Tom Hanks classic comedies. This movie has been a family favorite for many years. I hope others will enjoy it.
FUNNY,CLASSIC, and all around GREAT FILM!!!If you like Joe Dante Films, get it quick!!!CLASSIC lines and an ALL STAR CAST!!!!
One of my favorite Tom Hanks movies pick up this old school classic.
One of my favorite movies!! Such a hilarious movie and one of Tom Hanks best.  A must see! Great price and would buy again!
too much fun!
I loved this show way back when and still laughed and laughed when I watched it recently.  its a good one!@
TOM HANKS IS GREAT IN ANY MOVIE HE IS IN. HE IS SO FUNNY. THIS MOVIE HAD ME LAUGHING UNTIL I WAS ALMOST IN TEARS
Love this movie. I had lent it out to someone and had to replace it. The more I watch it the funnier it gets for me.
Buy this film, and buy Groundhog Day, and Animal House, etc.Good comedy to add to your DVD library.  Excellent acting and script.
My thirteen year old wants to be a zoologist.  She watched this movie with her mouth open.  A great movie then - a great movie now.
When our VCR no longer worked, we had to replace our collection of favorite movies.  Gorillas in the Mist is one of those titles.
it's a great movie..the dvd  is perfect and i will enjoy it for many years to come..i wd also recommend it for a great gift..
This is a really good movie and I would highly recommend it to anyone who loves this genre. Get out the tissues.
Definitely one of my best ones to collect, always made me laugh my a** off when I was growing up.
The first movie to put  a comedy team together with Universal's monsters. The funniest movie of this genre hands down.
This is one of the greatest movies ever made! A must have for any Abbott and Costello collector! You'll laugh yourself silly!
Movie is a lot of fun.  Great to watch around Halloween. It is campy and silly but just what you would expect from an Abbot & Costello movie
i like this so much its one of my favorites out of ten thousand movies
probably one of their best films ever.  highly recomended, incredible picture, this one is a rewatch over and over and over again
The very tops. Scary and funny at the same time. I hope no one tries to do a remake. This movie should be re-released to movie theaters, now.
bought this as a gift for my child and i am sure she will love it.  abbott and costello movies are quite funny!
Excellent old movie!  Used to watch Abbott and Costello with my dad.  Great memories, very, very funny!  Nothing like humor in black and white.
Funny movie with the classic monsters and two of the funniest people ever to grace the screen. I laughed continuously!
Great classic comedy that is a must see around Halloween.  Very funny and a great cast of stars.  A great mix of comedy and horror.
I LOVE THE OLD BLACK AND WHITE UNIVERSAL MONSTER MOVIES THIS PUTS A FUNNY TWIST ON THE OLD FRANKENSTEIN FILMS.
This is what my wife wanted for her birthday and she loves it it was here on time and movie was real good for her
cant go wrong with tiny cute animals having a great time and adventure.  colors are true to orginal movie. vhs is still great in my home.
I watched this movie as a kid and decided to buy for my little one. Its great to be able to watch this movie again.
Another purchase my daughter-in-law made at a great savings for my grandson! We just love Amazon!
I took my daughters to see this many many years ago, and I knew my grandsons would like it!  Such a cute movie with a great message about friendship!
Great and well done story hope to collect the rest of the series of stories about Littlefoot for my Grandkids.
Got this for my son for his birthday, he loves it. It works as expected. Thanks We appreciate that its good.
One of the  greatest movies for children.  My grandchildren enjoyed this movie very much.  It also teaches them about dinosaurs and life lessons.
I was excited to buy this for my 4 yr. old great grandson.  It was just the right thing for him to enjoy while learning.
Such a classic movie :) I don't even know how many times I watched this when I was a kid, and now to have it as an adult is just great
The Land before time., my granddaughter just loves this series., it's all about the little baby animals and she just loves that
My grandson loves this movie and wants to watch it every day.  I now need to find more movies like it that are kid friendly!
Great movie! I bought for my four year old son for Christmas. He loves watching the long neck dinosaur! :)
movies to watch over and over again; my favorite hobby to do;so try to have a variety to choose from on a rainy day
i love this movie.so does my son,best one in the set.but you have to have the whole set to watch them all.
I love this movie when I was a child I watched it repeatedly. I bought it for my niece she loves it and always talks about Sarah.
If their was something that sparked interest in science to the little ones this is one of the tools.  A fun movie for young and old.
The Land Before Time (Anniversary Edition) this is a very cute kids movie and it is the first and the best of the entire collection.
This is a very important childhood memory of mine and I am glad I can watch it again on DVD. Great price as well!!!
this movie if by far the best in the land before time series. i have enjoyed the entire movie set.
I have grandchildren now and thought this would be a great movie for them as their Dad and Aunt watched this as kids.
My two year old really likes dinosaurs and I thought of this movie would be perfect since I watched it a lot growing up.
Land Before time is Great to watch. Our Children & now our Grandchildren Love to watch this movie. Good movie.
My three year old loves this movie. She also loves dinosaurs. She often walks around saying my name is Littlefoot. This is a wonderful movie!
Really enjoyed this movie and glad to have found this at a good price since I bought it to watch it for the first time
This is a fun and moving story. I have seen the sequel and it's excellent, I will be getting that one as soon as it comes out to Amazon.
Good Life story - all the elements, friends, family, good times, bad times; this should be on TV every week so you can see what happens next!
Simply a excellent video!
The story line is excellent, it could happen to anyone....and probably has..
I bought the DVD of this movie when it first became available so I finally decided to get the bluray. I love this movie!
Taye Diggs is a hottie and I love all the movies he is in, also see The Best Man Holiday.  Also good movie.
very great movies to watch evrytime you are lonly and want something to keep you companywatch this and 1 & 2
I love this movie. Always makes me laugh. Great cast of characters. I am so glad that they made a sequel.
I love this great movie with a great storyline and a great list of characters who played their parts so well.
Incredible cast, solid plot line, and it keeps you laughing during the entire movie. This is definitely one to watch!
This is a great movie to enjoy with everyone that likes romance and a great love story. Friends get together for a wedding
Seem to find some good titles easily with out putting to much time into finding a good price or two.
My bestie and me saw this movie prior to going to see the second one.  My besties loved it just like me.
love the cast, love the story line, loved everything about the movie. will definitely watch the next best man movie
One of my top 5 movies of all time!
This movie gives a full range of emotions, laughter, tears, anger and sensitivity. Loved it so much we have passed it among other family members.
Such a good movie about friends, life and all the ups and downs that come with it.  The 2nd movie is even better!
I really like movie that keep you watching cause you really would like to know what happen next. This is one of the movie .
This movie is a classic and is smart and funny.  The sequel (many years later) was also smart and worth the wait.
Great Movie! I am glad to have it as part of my collection!
It was worth it to bring me up to date with its sequel. I enjoyed both movies. I recommend it!
Great movie,I thought it was funny and well written.T Howard is hilarious.The chemistry on film is awesome.I would def recommend it
Haven't seen it yet but have saw it before and it is a very good movie.  I wanted it for my DVD collection.
I love this movie so much.  It's so good.  It's a must see.
This was ordered as a replacement for a VHS copy that I have practically worn out over the years! Love this movie!
This version has the movie and lots of extras. The quality is better than I expected. If you don't own this version - get it!
Excellent movie...excellent gift for my mom. I made this movie part of her big present of claissic horror movies that she loves.
Very great condition, a movie that use to scare me now it intertains me, I can spook my grandchildren lol
A classic Boris Karloff from the 1930's, this movie must have scared the daylights when it premiered! Certainly worth watching.
Love the old black and white movies boris is a great actor he brings the movie to life I am a big fans of him
Anyone may confidently buy this particular release of a horror classic.  It evidences first-rate clarity and materials.  A flawless product.
The original mummy movie with one of the top horror movie actors! I am so proud to own it FINALLY!
5 stars for this is an old movie and I love my old movieyes, i would tell you to buy
Atmosphere.  That's what makes an outstanding horror movie.  Karl Freund and Carl Laemmle, Jr. knew how to create it.  Bravo!
Love the movie, old Boris was great as this character. He was creepy, and the ending with him reverting back was awesome!
Classic horror and the disc really helps convey the way it was filmed and is supposed to look like to appreciate classic horror
Patch Adams is humorous and fun for my entire family!  We watch it quite often. Laughing and smiling all throughout the movie!
Great story. Special for children and families. ALL AGES movie. Heart touching. Great true story. See it. Love it. Keep it
I think this movie is great. It is very funny and has a good story. I reccomend this video to any one who is looking for a great comedy/drama movie.
well, it stars Robin Williams. What can I say. An enjoyable movie. It was shipped promptly. Try it you'll like it.
Patch Adams really shows how the medical system and Drs SHOULD really work. Be concerned for the person, not the disease or disorder !
This is a truly charming rendition by Robin Williams of a great story. It is exciting to know that there are such caring people around.
A true classic.... You gotta love Robin Williams!  I wanted. An. Employee to see it, since the original clinic is here in WV!
I laughed the whole movie. It had everything. Humor, romance, and sadness. I highly recommend this one. It pulls at your heart.
One of the best actings of Robin Williams - in my opinion.It is a very touching story!If you like Robin Williams - please get it!
I have seen this movie several times and I get something new out of it each time. I recommend it to all.
This is one great movie.  Serious, but also funny.  Robin Williams is perfect for the part of Patch.  Highly recommend it to everyone.
Naturally it deserves 5 stars -- otherwise I wouldn't be spending the $$ to replace the VHS!!Great, fun movie!!
Bought this for my roommate for his classroom library.  This is such a great movie with a great moral of the story.  I love watching it.
Robin Williams is one of my favorite actors, I don't know why I waited so long before I watched this movie.
I love anything Frankenstein so there is no chance for a bad review. the movie arrived on time with no scratches. It plays well with good picture
Love Boris a must have love the old black and white movies he is a good actor pictures are very clear
The Bride of Frankenstein is still relevant after all these years as is the original Frankenstein, It is sad and intelligent and A Classic.
This classic is another must for your collection if you collect classic horror movies.  Good clear picture and excellent sound track.
absolute classic. great cinematography especially when you consider the year. every shot is a painting
A great Universal Monster Classic, now shown in crystal clear Blu-ray quality.  A must have for collectors of these classic monster films.
Remembering watching this as a little girl.  I love Elsa lanchester!  If you haven't seen this movie yet...you need to :)
Great collection of Adam Sandler movie classics. My favorite from this collection is Billy Madison. All of the movies come in one nice package.
I love Sandra Bullock.  I will own any movie she is in even if it is sub par.  She is great.
This is a really good movie, I love Sandra Bullock she is a great actress, she makes the movie great
Of course anyone a fan of Sandra Bullet, will love this movie.  It was sad but true to life.  Funny, Sad, Emotional movie.  You will love it!
I have never seen a cuter movie with Sandra Bullock I loved this movie thank you again for the chance to watch it
This is a very funny DVD to watch with your family, You will laugh and cry but you will be happy you bought it
any time you have Sandra Bullock in a movie, you have to give it a five star rating. She is GREAT.
You can't lose with Sandra.  A great little romantic comedy that keeps you entertained throughout the entire thing.  Really enjoyed it.
I bought this as a gift for my mother. she enjoyed hte movie and i admit it is a good movie but i can't watch it without laughing.
liked this movie alot Robert Downey Jr. really did a great job playing a serial killer in and out of dreams
Once again, write a review?  Really?  Classic Alfred Hitchcock...  Will say the same thing about Rebecca, and the rest of his wonderful movies....
I loved this movie. Typical Hitchcock style with a good mystery, plot and finale. I would recommend it to anyone who enjoys AH movies.
As a Hitchcock fan, I enjoy all of his movies and this one did not disappoint.  A must see - you'll love it
Love, love, love this movie
The movie is a good one.  The dvd arrived promptly and in the condition described by the seller.
I LOVE JAMES STEWART,  DORIS DAY, AND HITCHCOCK MOVIES.  I GOT ALL ROLLED INTO ONE WITH THIS MOVIE!  GREAT SUSPENSE!!!
I loved this movie ans doris day and james stewart  and the songs are the best mrs day ever sang i loved this movie
I highly recommend this great James Stewart movie to anyone, as it is super great drama, most suspenseful, and very interesting!!!!
very suspenseful and well acted.  Keeps you guessing.  Love Doris Day and Jimmy Stewart together.  Alfred Hitchcock at his best.
A good mystery with good actors & actresses.  Keeps you guessing in true Hitchcock fashion.  All around enjoyable from beginning to end.
EXCELLENT HITCHCOCK MOVIE, BUT THEN ALL HITCHCOCK MOVIES ARE.JAMES STEWART & DORIS DAY ALWAYS ARE GOOD IN ANY MOVIE.
I watch this movie several times.  I like the movie, this is one of the Hitchcock's best film.Worth to buy.
Hitchcock's humor is on full display here. Jimmy Stewart and Doris Day are great together. It's still a thriller--clunks and all.
One of the classics. Interesting to see Doris at one of her most beautiful and classic times. Jimmy Stewart also. It's inforgettable.
Any movie with this actor is outstanding and a great part of a personal collection. We love the works he is in.
One of the best in classic movies. Alfred Hitchcock at his best. Great scenes, takes me to morocco, London. Fantastic
I haven' t seen this movie in along time and enjoyed it as if this was the first time.  Blu-Ray quality was real good.
Great Hitchcock film reminding me of how things have changed as well as not changed with governments and the world.
I'm one of Alfred Hitchcock's most devoted fans!! Rate this one high up there with all the rest!! Great buy.
Alfred Hitchcock is my all time favorite and no one will ever top him!  Another great sitting on the edge of your seat from the master!  :)
I love this movie.  I had it on VHS and was pretty pleased to find a new one (wore out the old one).  I can't wait to watch it again.
I always loved Hitchcock, both in the movies and on television.  I always enjoyed the &#34;Hitchcock Twist&#34;.  I love it.
Funny,Lite Dark humor from the best Directors ever. I even made the trip up to Cratfsburry,Vt to see the the Church and area where it was filmed.
On of Hitchcocks greatest movies,just loves it whitty and funny all the time,you can't ask for any thing else....buy it.....
the trouble with Harry is a great comedic movie anybody that like Alfred hitchock would live these movie i would recommend its a great movie
I have always loved this movie. The acting is good. Great storyline. Fabulous New England autumn scenery...just love this movie.
I had never seen this movie before and enjoyed the concept of it.  Blu-ray feature was wonderful. Love an Alfred Hitchcock movie.
A MOST ENJOYABLE EARLY ALFRED HITCHCOCK THRILLER IN DRIPPY COLOR AND A GREAT CAST.  A GOLDEN OLDIE THAT IS EASY TO WATCH OVER AND OVER.
This is such a funny movie with twists and turns around every corner! This was Shirley Mc lanes first movie!
This is a good movie and my parents like to watch it at times. It keeps them occupied when traveling
One of Alfred Hitchcock's lighter movies. It is a pleasure to watch great stars in such a light comedy directed by a great director.
No particular words can rate this Hitchcock movie except that it's a &#34;wonderful classic&#34;!! One of his best!! Great buy.
fell in love back in the days now have it on blue ray. it was a good movie went it came out.
The movie ended without an ending as though there would be a Birds II.  Too bad there never was.  I enjoyed it very much, again.
Old movie but a great one use to watch when I was little. Mean birds but it was great to watch plus I like the older movies.
This is a classic Hitchcock movie and my Aunt is a Alfred Hitchcock fan too!  I recommend this movie to anyone who loves Hitchcock movies.
This  film  was  another  well  done  thriller  by  Alfred  Hitchcock.
One of the best early fiction films ever made. It does make you wonder if it possible? I watch it over and over.
This is such a great classic!  I love being able to order movies I will watch over and over, Thanks Amazon!
Great classic movie.  DVD in great shape.  Just as advertised.  So glad that I was able to find this after all the years of searching!
this is the best movie ever made just loved it  and cant wait to watch is again and again great price also
ONE OF MY ALL TIME FAVORITE CLASSIC ALFRED HITCHCOCK MOVIES....I NEVER TIRE OF IT NO MATTER HOW MANY TIMES I WATCH IT....
I grew up watching these types of movies. The Birds is a great &#34;scary&#34; movie for any occasion, it is just fun to watch.
I think Psycho and this film are my two favorite films that were written by Alfred Hitchcock, although, I haven't seen too many, yet.
I recieved this for my Birthday....thanks it's a grat movie a classic and I needed it for my collection....Darrell
This is one of my favorite classic movies! I was thrilled to find it and for so cheap! It arrived in new condition and I couldn't be more pleased!
What can you say, a classic movie by a venerated director. Oddly hard to find anywhere but online. suspense and action without nudity.
I saw this movie when it first came out and thought it was great!  Makes you view birds in a whole different way.
I use to hate this movie.  But I've grown to love it and the scenes of Bodaga Bay are really nice.
Came fast and was as advertised.  It was for my wife for her birthday and she loves it.  I would def recommend this classic.
This has been and always will be a favorite Hitchcock film.  I still think it is a very good movie.
tHE BIRDS, IS A OLD CLASSIC, GOTTA SEE IT, IT SCARY AND ACTING IS WELL DONE!!!!GIVE IT A CHANCE AND GET OUT THE POPCORN!!!!
Nothing like sitting on the edge of your seat, and biting your nails. He was the master of his time.
This this one of the top Hitchcock shows made, love the suspense but the ending could have been better, what a classic.
it was the most poupuler hicock films its my most favoret film of all because its where birds attack the students at the school in in the movie
really good movie one of best hitchcock movies in my opinion. wife said she liked bruce dern in the movie
a great movie this way and the actors look better and learn and fun to watch and movies looks better
I really enjoyed this film.  It's a charming mix of suspense and humor.  I have to admit that I love most everything Hitchcock did.
Just want to say this is worth watching. Quite a fun movie to watch; I was disappointed when it was over!I'm still laughing; I like the boyfriend.
This is an older film but it is really a good plot and a fun mystery.  It has always been one of my faves.  Hope you love it too!!!
Loved this movie when we were younger and watched it, but at 25 it is a litle less of a horror flick but still decent.
Could not stop watching movie. Very interesting and suspenseful from beginning to end. I recommend this movie to be added to all movie collection.
one of hitchcocks, greatest movies, well done, acting was well done, if you like alfred hitchcock add this movie to your collection
good story and the actors are cool and  I think it's worth buying. best movie made!!! thank you for having it
All I can say is this is a good movie. 5 star Alfred Hitchcock
I still enjoy watching this movie.  It played flawlessly.  I really like listening to the behind the sceens remarks of the actors.  This was great.
Of course Sean  is a wonderful actor and Tippi also good in her role. The story is well told and is intriguing.
I had not seen this one.  I really enjoyed Tippi Hedren.  She was great in The Birds and equally as good in Marnie!
I like this movie, specially the actor Sean Connery.  I collect most of his movies.  Specially the James Bond series.
Psychological intrigue stars Tippi Hedren and Sean Connery.  It is beautifully filmed and interestingly crafted movie.  An Alfred Hitchcock Classic.
One of Hitchcock 's all time greats!  If Sean Connery hadn't been so good looking he probably would have won more academy awards.
Loved the movie both lead characters are favorite of mine,its great to connect with them again.
A Great Alfred Hitchcock movie.  Tippi Hedren  makes a good disturbed woman.  I would recommend this movie to any Hitchcock fan.
This is a real classic! We enjoyed it very much. I would recommend this movie to anyone, not just Alfred Hitchcock fans.
Paul Newman and Julie Andrews create good chemistry in this thriller where a scientist thinks outside the box to complete his formula.
This is a great Cold War movie with a great cast.
This was an excellent depiction of some of the milder moments of Coldwar espionage.  intrigue and deception are the key here.Well worth watching.
Alfred Hitchcock always made good movies and this one kept me o the edge of my seat.  I bought this as an addition to my "old movies" collection.
This is one movie I would hate to be without.  Played lightly but deftly by both stars, the cast is superb supporting them
I wish there were more movies out there like this. If more people were able to see it, I am sure they would feel the same way as I.
Can't go wrong with Hitchcock. I think this is one of his best, the birds being #1.rate this procuct too
Fantasy galore. But so well done. The acting was great. The cast is Scott Campbell and Jennifer Jason Leigh, not Kate Capshaw etc.
I am very pleased.  Thank you very much. I got this movie for my sister and myself.  She said that she had not seen this movie.
this is a great movie and has entertainment for families who enjoy clean wholesome movies. its a twist in time and future
I bought this for my mom she loves movies that touch the heart, she just recieved it and will watch it soon. Can't wait
I really enjoyed this movie.It had people in it that you grew to like and care about.It was a very easy movie to watch and enjoy.
A great Chic Flick. An all star cast and a great little vignettes within one story. I love haw it is resolved.  A definite must have.
Kate is a total babe!  The story line is an old one.  But this one is worth a close watch!
About a saboteur during the second world war. This could happen today. Well told and acted by all. Highly recommended.Picture is a clear print. C6
Recommend to all who appreciate old movies and artistic craft. There is great suspense, humor, romance, and patriotism through out.
This film was on tv awhile ago and I loved it. I just had to have it again to review it.
This is a great film. It's vert adventurous, dramatic, and romantic.  Robert Cummings and Priscilla Lane make a lovely couple. It's  a great film.
So glad to finally find this movie after remembering seeing years ago when I was a child!
Good clean mysteryNo bad languageCould not know how it would endActual acting and not all guns and running
I SAW THIS MOVIE WHEN I WAS YOUNG AND ENJOY IT SO MUCH, THAT I AM GLAD IT'S ON DVD.  I WOULD LIKELY RECOMMEND THIS MOVIS TO ALOT OF MY FRIENDS
He's the family's favorite uncle but he's a serial killer.  Look out!  And what was the name of that waltz?
Classic horror movie and dramatic. If you love the old work then this movie fits in the collection great buy
This was a great purchase. If you like Alfred Hitchcock, then this would be a great addition to your collection. He never disappoints.
This is one of my favorite Hitchcock movies and it is great to be able to watch it on Amazon Prime.
My favorite Alfred Hitchcock film nicely restored on Blu. Great job Universal Pictures.Please bring more of your catalog films.Thank you.
so glad o ordered this movie. it is excellent. great story, wonderful acting and sure to be loved for years to come.
Joseph Cotten and Teresa Wright both play the roles of a lifetime in this Hitchcock classic!!damn, I'd love to see this on a big screen!!
Ordered this for my sister for Christmas.  She loved it.  I will definitely be ordering more movies like this for her in the future.
Joseph Cotton makes this movie worth watching. His understated evil shines through in this Hitchcock classic. Funny and thrilling at the same time.
This is my favorite Hitchcock film. It starts from a good premise and spirals into familiar scenarios.The acting is superb.
Great thriller! Great cast!
I love this movie.  Classic Black & White movie with lots of suspense.  It's great!
I loved this movie when it came out.  Don't normally likeAndy Kaufman but he is perfect in this movie; he and Bernadette Peters male a lovely couple.
this is a movie about robots wanting to be Human and the meaning of Love and happiness all wrapped up into one movie.
I love all the robot characters & think they are sweet & loveable.I just think the humans were hokey.
My granddaughter watches this movie constantly. Cute story line. Funny and cute movie. A must see if you have small kids.
Marty Feldman is tops, showing his skills as a comedian. I surely recommend it to anyone looking for a good laugh.
Great movie I gave it for a gift to a family member they like very much. They like Ede hes a funny man.
I really enjoyed this film, Eddie and Martin did a fantastic job and the supporting cast was excellent. you will not be disappointed!
once again he has brewed a home run and you cant resist to replay this classic over and over thanks eddie
I love this movie!!!! It was funny when it came out and it still hasn't lost its umph.  Great movie
Another one of my all time favs.  I know nearly every line.  Can watch over & over & over again.
So funny!  Bought this for my husband, and we laugh so hard when we watch it!  It is great! Love it!
Eddie & Martin together is a great combination. They did a good job. I laughed and laughed. I wish he really had the Boom-Boom Room.
Each time I see this movie it makes me both cry and laugh. I love the emotional roller coaster of this heart touching comedy.
IT SHOWS WHAT USUALLY HAPPENS WHEN A MAN IS IN PRISON FOR  A LONG PERIOD OF TIME. IT IS TRUTHFUL ABOUT ALOT.
This is a very funny DVD.  I love purchasing items from Amazon.  They are always in great condition.
So great this movie is packed with great actors, movie line and it is just a great movie all to together. Good for a movie night at home....
Very under rated because of the truth behind the all the comedy. You will laugh from start to end and enjoy a movie I will forever hold in my top 10.
Life what do you mean life?  One of the funniest movies ever!  A must see movie to uplift you when you need to laugh
This was A gift. It was a good surprise. Keep up the good work  I received this movie really quickly.
Funny, Funny, Funny from beginning to end.  That's all I can say.
This Movie Is A Very Enjoyable Movie For Eddie Murphy Fans To Watch.Eddie Murphy And Martin Lawrence Were Very Entertaining In This Movie.
the whole cast was stellar, i couldn't stop laughing. i can watch over n over again. kids like it awesome
I've watched this movie a number of times and it always makes me laugh so hard I cry.  Well worth the it.
Excellent movie.. Received it in record time .. Haven't seen it in years . So I was glad to see it again. Item arrived in. Ew condition.
THIS MOVIE WAS AWESOME ALOT OF THE ACTORS ARE YOUNG, I LOVED THE EFFECTS, FOR A OLDER MOVIE IT HAD SOME AWESOME UPGRADES. I AM SO GLAD I OWN IT.
I bought this DVD for a young lady friend of mine.  I have not personally seen this movie.  My lady friend really enjoyed this movie.
This movie reminds me of when me and my dad used to watch it together its not that scary but I love this movie the story line is cool too
Just liked the movie !! Why does everything these days have to be analyzed out the ying yang. What a world. !
I have liked this movie from the first time I saw it.  The cast is great and the situation is just spooky enough.
a great movie i got the vhs now is trying to get the dvd a great movie well acted and everything
A group of adults locked up in a house haunted by the most evil ghost makes for a superb thriller.
I liked the movie and the packaging was great! I only purchase movies I have seen and liked. If any asks my imput I would recommend this DVD
We got the DVD which plays good, thanks! It is Scary movie but we still want to watch it. Have a nice weekend 2!
Great movie for the home theater system.Make sure you get the DTS version!Highly recommended!
great movie, it had suspence and plot, kept  you wondering what else would happen.  would recommend to anyone who's into this.  acting was great.
The costumes, the songs, the acting - all great entertainment !!  Watch it with your pet cat.  Makes a nice gift for cat lovers.
Both the sound and the picture on this DVD is of the best quality. A definite good buy.
I've always loved this Broadway musical and really wish I could see it live. I would recommend this movie to anyone who loves musicals and cats.
Loved the costumes, music and dancing.  Almost like seeing it at the theater.  Easy to see why it ran for so long on stage.
A Classic . . . Wonderful . . . Wonderful . . . Wonderful . . . I Highly Recommend It.
This is not only fun, but you can actually visualize the cats....I love this musical.  Thank you Mr. Weber, please make more :-)
I don't normally like the movies that come from plays but this is one of the best ones out!
I saw the musical so many times, and when finelly I saw on TV (PBS)If you really love musicals and specially this one, it's a must have.
Although the movie can't come close to the excitement of the live play.  I highly recommend both.  See the play first, if you can.
This is such an awesome DVD. Can enjoy it over and over. Would recommend this DVD to all. Worth every penny.
I really enjoy this film, I bought this copy to replaced the original I had which was in VHS format.
this is probley one of my favs both acts are great act 2 is a touch sad it made me cry but its a great dvd
This is one of my favorite musicals of all time. I totally adore this wonderful and great muciscal. Well worth the buy.
I love musical and this one is very good to watch with the whole family and friends. . . .
If you don't get the opportunity to be there in person - get the DVD and experience the magic of CATs
It's simply the best film in the history of American cinema. Everything about it is really great.
Love this movie. A great one crazy tho.I have not seen it in years. Hence the reason I bought it. But I can't wait to watch it again.
Anyone who thinks this was a bad movie is clueless.  This is one of the better movies I have ever seen.  Five stars plus!!!
This is a wonderful movie and have seen it since it came out and still love it till now. Can really relate to it
Classic movie funny and tragic. Terrific performances by the entire cast. Definitely a classic.
This is a great movie.Every actor is awesome.The only disappointment is the ending.
This is a must have film for Kevin Spaceys fans. Well done with all actors in good rolls.
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1999. Had to add it to my collection.
I like Kevin Spacey Annette Bening are in the movie together it was a good one for me and I love that
I had not seen this movie in years. It holds up really well. Great writing and acting. What a weird film. It is worth watching over again.
my hubby's favorite movie! I ordered this for his birthday and we still whip it out and watch it to this day. GREAT MOVIE!
I loved this movie. Everything fit together to the letter. This film gives you an idea of how many people's lives get away from them.
This is one of those movies I just never got around to watching...incredible movie! Kevin Spacey is one of the best actors on earth!!
A typical american life style, keep up with the neighbors, this is a great story, Spacey does a great job in this flick
Great plot and very original no other movie like it.Great choice of actresses and actors.Overall falls into my top 10 movies ever.
This is an awesome movie..........Annette Benning is great in this movie!!  Strange things take place......it's so good!!  GOTTA HAVE IT MOVIE!!!
Now when I noticeFloating refuse on the streetI think of Beauty
I hadn't seen this gem in over ten years and really enjoyed it.  Thought provoking, inspiring, and sad all in one beautiful package.
Love this movie most men and women can relate. Great acting and actors.You will enjoy it .......never a dull moment !!!
this movie is so funny.it has got it all(dark,comedy and the real touching drama) on it.i did really enjoyed this movie from start to finish.
I saw this years ago when I rented it. Everyone is so young and as usual Kevin Spacy does an amazing job.
I revisited "American Beauty" again in 2010 for the first time in a decade. It truly is a masterpiece. A flawless movie.
Brilliant Film, to be watched again and again.  The cast pitch perfect.  Kevin Spacey in excellent form.  Chris Cooper as always amazing.
Well I haven't opened the case because I don't usually do it, I just get the movies i love and this is one of them.
Great music, a compelling story, and three dimensional characters make this a classic American tale.Highly recommended.
What a great flick can not believe I have only seen snipets of it on the tube.... Decide to buy this , what a great purchase ...
twisted but amazing the whole time your excpecting somthing only to realize what you think youve vigured out isent what it seems at all!
What's not to like...Kevin Spacey always delivers! The classic memorable lines of the zany characters will stick with you forever.
Great suburban drama...speaks to the late 90s very well...Superb acting, direction and well deserved oscar winner. Sam Mendes and Alan Ball
One of THE funniest films I have seen in years!!!  Truly classic!  Had to buy a copy...love it that much!!
We rented it, but it is so brilliantly funny, we are buying it.  Excellent script, acting and directing.
Love love this Movie! So much to learn from it. Some of my favorite actors. Never gets old. I would recommend to anyone's collection.
Bruce Willis is a very good actor no matter what role he plays. The ending of this move was very nice - I like happy endings.
Works great  aaaaa aa  a a  a a  aaaaaa  a aaa a aa  a a a a a a a
This movie was so true to life. Pfeiffer and Willis made a great team too. See it!
I bought this movie when my kids were young in VHS. They are gone, but I love this movie so had to get in DVD.  No problems at all with this vendor.
I've loved this movie since seeing it at the cinema many years ago and I purchased it so I could share it with my grandchildren.
I realy loved the movies in it cuz u had one AND two in the same dvd! i watch over and over again! delivery was fast and satisfying! thank you
this is a great double movie pack to a great movie series. the first is always better than the second but both were definitely great
This is really a good movie and exllent both actor.It is a clasic for me and the panorama is one of the best of Africa.
If you like Out of Africa then have a look at this as well...The Flame Trees of Thika
This is a visually beautiful picture, it is well acted and I think the actors match the characters,  Not very deep, just an enjoyable evening.
Glad I bought it. Sad ending but the whole movie is good. The movie is one you want to watch over and over again.
Out of Africa is a classic Redford movie excellent cinematography , beautiful views of Africa great story, and Meryl Streep is excellent as usual
I did enjoy watching this movie very much. The scenery was just outstanding. The acting was great and I shall watch this numerous times
I loved this movie 30 years ago and I still think it's an all time classic. If you love great love stories, this one's for you.
It has humor, talent, skill, action, and extremely good acting.  I really liked this movie. Anyone would like this movie; I think.
totally excellent, very pleased
An epic love story, the characters were engaging, and the plot was good.Great acting by Robert Redford and Meryl Streep .
Now that we have a big-screen HDTV, I decided to replace my VHS copy of this movie. Scenery is wonderful. The story is moving & heart-breaking.
its a great movie. its a good movie to enjoy. the playwright did a good job writing the play for this movie. thanks, kate dougherty
The movie was interesting.  Most interesting was the photography of the African wildlife and outback.  The soundtrack was outstanding.
i love this movie, one of my favorites. movie came as described and on record time. i cant wait to have all of meryl streeps movies.
This is an excellent movie! Meryl Streep and Robert Redford give stunning performances in this-plus the scenery is totally fabulous!
Best African movie ever made.  Great cinematography.  Good actors, good story.  I don't like love stories, but this is an exception.  Get the DVD.
This is one of Meryl Streep finest movies.  A moving love story of a man and Africa.
The culture, the acting, the scenery ... truly a masterpiece!  You will fall in love with Africa when you watch this one.
I love this movie.  Makes you think, remember and feel.  I have seen this movie numerous times over the years.
I was able to carve out some time this past weekend to watch the BlueRay version. I enjoyed it very much.
Another classic. Winner of 7 academy awards including best picture had to see it. Great movie.
This movie is one of the best ever made. The story line is very interesting, and the cinematography is breathtaking. Everything is real--no CGI.
Enjoyed it again. got here in good time and good condition. Robert Redford gets better with age.  They made a good team in this movie
this has been my favorite for years. I watched it in the movie theatre and got it when it first came out on VHS and now have it on DVD beautiful
I've watched this movie so many times on the VCR version, it is worn out!  So glad to find it on DVD!
We missed this gem of a movie its first time around. It includes great acting, a great story line and beautiful scenes.
GIVEN AS A GIFT TO A FRIEND. SHE LOVED IT.  HAVE NOT SEEN THE MOVIE SO CANNOT COMMENT ON IT MYSELF.
If I had to make a list of my top 10 movies of all time this would be one of them.  Wonderful story, sad ending.
This is one of my favorite sports movies. I enjoy watching it over and over. It is a great movie.
One of the best sports movies of all time. Kevin Costner is great as Billy Chapel. The nostalgic movie is romantic and riveting
Received in Excellent condition and on time, an Excellent baseball film to watch from start to finish a 5 out of 5 mega
this is one of my favorite movies! in great condition when it got to me! if you havent seen it, watch it
I love this movie and the acting in it was great.  I love Kevin Costner and I enjoyed the preview and insight to the movie.
The theme and acting are superb.  A sure to become classic.
Great film.  One of Christian Bale's earlier works.  He's stunning in it.  Great story.  Interesting characters.  I enjoyed this immensely!
A mystical dancer introduces us to all the many components of ballroom dancing. Intensely exciting to watch. Beautifully choreographed and staged.
I love the dancing on this DVD.  it is amazing how the dancers keep going and never seem to get tired.
Donny is good in this one.  I have read the Bible over and over, so it was good to see a story in it coming alive on the screen.
This movie is great. I love the actors, I love the songs, I love the story, and I love the way it was filmed.
I found this movie entertaining.  I really like the music and Donny Osmond.  It was great.Thank you so much, candpfoote
Broadway - I love it.  The music is great.  The production is done beautifully.  The colors are outstanding.  Very enjoyable.
A GREAT MUSICAL! FUN FOR THE WHOLE FAMILY!!!! A MUST SEE!!!!! NEVER GETS OLD!!! WATCH IT OVER AND OVER! TRANDSCENDS GENERATIONS!!!
I have been a fan of Donnie Osmond for a very long time. It has a good cast. loved it.
the story being told.  The actors are pretty good and they can definitely sing.  The biggest reason I purchased this DVD is the singing.
All I have to say is that I love it! The music is awesome, still love Donny Osmond and he's excellent in this production.
i think the 297 reviews at a 5 star is enough to tell you if this dvd is good or bad. loved it!!!!!!!!!
Joseph was written before &#34;Jesus Christ Super Star.&#34; This version is a little silly, but still tells an interestin version of the story.
Excellent singing, acting, costumes, all of it.  So well done.  One of the very few Bible stories I ever got my daughter interested in on tv.
Our family loves watching this show together! Great songs and the performances are very good from all of the performers.
great sound, picture and i love the movie, a must have for the musical collector, and it can be played in US regi&oacute;n,
Joseph and the Amazing Technicolor Dreamcoat is a GREAT fast moving show with great voices.
This movie is one of the best musicals that I have seen. I absolutely love this movie. This  is so worth the money and seeing this movie was amazing.
Love, Love, Love this play.  I had been looking for this on DVD for a while but it was always to expensive. Finally found it here, and I am SO happy.
I love love love this movie. Donny is so much fun to watch, the music is really cool...my kids sing the songs all the time, so catchy.
This is one of our favorite musical.  We got this copy for our nephew. Our grand daughter loves it.  Great for all ages.
A very good film 2  of the best actors together it gets a 5 of 5 looks and sounds great
I saw this movie a few years ago and found it very suspenseful and engaging. Both Denzel and Angelina are great.!!!
Very good movie one of the best
Really a wierd but good movie. Denzel Washington has some of the best movies on the market. Get It !
This movie is a great thriller.  Even after you know the villian it is still a great show to watch again just to see what you missed the first time.
Jeffery Deaver's first Lincoln Rime novel made a great movie to watch also. Very disturbing in both cases. I recommend it highly.
Danzel W is great.  Angela Jolie is also great.  The two of them make for great action flick.Thank you
I would place this movie up there with se7en and other suspenseful movies. It's a good ride and holds up well.
Bud and Lou at their very best. If you are a fan of these two great comedians then you will want to buy this video.  It's terrific.
LOVE LOVE LOVE ABBOTT AND COSTELLO THEY ARE THE VERY BEST AND I LOVE THEM THEY ARE VERY FUNNY FUNNY
This is a great movie!! If you want an inspirational & motivational movie for the kids, this is a great one!
Love the movie especially since it's based on a true story. A young boy from small town who dreams big. Great movie for the whole family.
I have wanted this movie for a long time and finally got it. Enjoyed it. Yes I woulf recommend this.
Great story about the guys who went on to be a part of NASA!  Family will love this great rocket launching tale!
Saw his movie in the movies theartre years ago then I tv-ordered so my kids can watch it was a great story a really good movie
It's a great story,and maybe  we as a country need to get back into space. Can't leave the adventure to other countries,can we.
The reason why I like It was an eye opener for the space programs of United States of America NASA
It's been a while since I've watched a nice movie like this one.  10 stars.
A favorite movie - great storie about believing in your dreams and not giving up.
This was a very thought provoking movie. I would have liked it to have far less profanity. All I all in the end it was very enjoyable.
This movie was so uplifting I wanted to stand and cheer at the end. It is all the better because it is based on a true story. Loved it.
what an entertaining movie about a fun group of kids, well worth the money as well it is worth to buy the book about the real characters.
This movie is a wonderful movie about a boy and his friends with their ambitions and dreamsduring the space age.  Must watch!
This was much better than I thought it sounded like it would be.  I was very pleased to find it better than I expected.
one of jakes best movies. definitely a must buy . would recommend it for the entire family to watch .
fiction or non-fiction I loved this movie. Its a movie of hope. A movie of thought. an inspirational movie. A great kids movie also.
This move is fanatic because it talks about the boys who were amazing of there talent and space race era.
I highly recommend this movie. It is so positive in it's message, beautifully done and gives hope to the viewer. A great movie!
WORTH THE MONEYWHO DINT LOVE THIS SHOW , THIS SHOW WAS GREATI LOVE THIS VHS, BRINGS BACK LAUGHTER AND MEMORYS AND YOU NEVER GET BORED WITH IT,
They should really make an updated version of this movie. The original is fantastic and it would be cool to see it brought back in a new light.
This movie and &#34;Them&#34; scared the hell out of me as a child. Watching &#34;Creature&#34; in HD still scared the hell out of me. Great stuff.
This movie is the story of a creature that time forgot and the greddy men who won't leave the creature a lone. Great underwater shots make the movie.
I love the old movies and collect as many as I can afford. This is a real buy and I was happy to find it.
The first and the best, an excellent sci fi film, one the best ever made. I thoroughly enjoyed it and it is excellent condition.
We just love the Creature from the Black Lagoon series of features and hope they willbe remade with today's new technology.
Poor quality DVD's frustrate buyers and ruin viewing.  This one is of the highest quality and a virtually flawless production.
Good old fashion movie from the old.  Classic film making at it's best.  I give it two thumbs up, they don't make them like this anymore.
This is a must have for only fan of classic horror,well done and never gets old.  Nice underwater scenes and the actress is a knockout beauty.
again, it's universal monsters. you can't go wrong with classics like the universal monster movies. we love all of them.
Big halloween movie night for older grandkids and what better than a little old-timey fright fest! They loved the movie!
Great film something about old horror movies that just makes them better then the new ones, oh that's right acting
this has to be a cult classic. the monster suit is so cheesy, but you have to watch it. great price
visual effects in this movie, real scientific, yet funny at times, true actors. do not see many quality movies these days.
A great classic movie , Claude rains is once again amazing in a complex role , the effects for the time are great as well
Ordered for my friend who loves all these early &#34;horror&#34;-type movies.  Fantasy / fiction, loves them.  I also hada seen before and recommend.
Been looking for this for awhile and finally got it. A great movie in the tradition of Frankensteing, The Wolfman, and Dracula.
I really enjoyed this old favorite,it is a nice addition to my collection of oldies!! Still Have Some Others I Want
this is a great collection of the movie from back in the 30's and is good to watch when ever you want
the old b/w movies are the best.well known actors.lil comedy.good setting.claude rains is one of the all time horror/drama actors.
H G Wells fantastic writer.  A movie you have to get and watch again and again.  You can't miss with this movie.
I'm a HUGE Claude Rains fan!!! I get a kick out of watching the invisible man.  My sides get sore from laughing so much.
Great set of classic films!!!Brought back memories of watching these as a kid,and they are STILL great fun to watch.
if you like classic horror films this is a really good horror film and is a must have for you or any horror fan you know. enjoy
although it is old and in black and white it still stands the test of time as a scary movie and is still well done. I really enjoyed it
Then look no further, here it is. Acting was great,sometimes funny then a bit mysterious.  See this now if you can? That is if you can even see it!
This is the classic Phantom movie. Claude Rains is one of the greats and has done a Great job in many movies playing his character role.
While not close to the actual Phantom story, this is a very interesting take on the story.  It also has a touch of comedy to lighten up the drama
This is a very underestimated version of Phantom. The Blu-ray really brings out the color and the singing is pure greatness.
Great cast and in true Universal style.  A good horror story.  Good production, great sets, a big hit.  Very nice music and great costume piece.
this is a good movie to watch and maybe learn about this in the opera and watch as much as you want
Because it was just what he wanted to complete his classic horror single collection.  We really loves the old horror movies.
I really enjoyed watching the Phantom of the Opera" movie. I am very glad to be able to buy the DVD version of this movie. It is a classic.
i think the movie should be a big hiti like the movie a lot i rented a copy from a videostore a month a go it is funny
Terrific cast and funny, funny, funny take off of space TV and space movies.  Great for a gathering of good friends' evening of entertainment.
Commenting on the product received (rather than the film): The slightly thinner than normal bluray case was new to me, but fine I guess.
I have it on DVD but it was easy to choose it. Always a fun family evening to watch together.
Wonderful sci-fi humor for anyone who is a fan of any of the Star Trek series with lots of inside jokes about the entire fandom culture.
Amazing!!  I just enjoyed it with my little girls and it was fantastic!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  Tim Allen will always be Tim Allen.
Very funny, little bit stupid, good for kids and adults, I  think. May be good for &#34;family watch together&#34; time.
Another great film with Tim Allen, from tool time. Love the space reference, as I am a Star Wars nerd. Lots of humor and great story!
Perfect balance of sci-fi and comedy. Good acting love it!If you are a Trekkie and have the sense of humor this one is definitely for you.
Heartfelt and snarky at the same time.  Not an easy feat to accomplish, but the cast and director pull it off.
This it fun for Star Trek fans and those that are not. In our family we have both and we enjoyed watching it together.
This movie is awesome!  Best science fiction movie satire.
Love love love this movie. It is so campy and all the actors are some of my favorites. Grapthars Hammer!
So glad they did this movie without too much trash ( OK for older kids)Its a bunch of laughs for sure
Excellent movie. Today's movies can learn a thing or two about how to make an engaging movie without all of the nauseating CGI.
This was just plain outright funny. Pokes fun at the Trekkies out there. Tim Allen is super as is Sigourny Weaver. Two thumbs up.
The dry wit of this movie will live on as one of the best parodies of the space movies. One of my all time favorites.
I am not going to go into story, etc. The upgrade to Bluray us worth it. The picture looks amazing with this new Bluray. Very happy I purchased it.
Galaxy Quest is one of my favorite movies.  I never get tired or bored watching it!!!! It is a cult classic!!!
If you`re a fan of Tim Allen,this is a good one!Sit back and enjoy.Fun over the top comedy/SciFi/Tim Allen d`ont need to say any more.
When I need to laugh, relax, or to share a funny film with friends, I pull out this one. I love Tim Allen's humor.
Price was great. Movie is funnier than I remembered. Recommend for people who love Sci Fi and want a good laugh. Great cast.
I just like the comedy of Tim Allen....
As long as you keep a sense of humor, its a really classic flick.  Takes big jab at Shatner.  Watch it.
I love this movie. Great acting all around. Always reminds me of better days when movies were made with good actors.
Lots of action and fun. I enjoyed this movie very much and the friendly aliens were lots of laughs. All actors played their roles perfectly.
One of our favorite movies to watch over again. So funny, and they nailed the Star Trek needs in all of us.
Spoof in Star Trek with a lot of great actors making fun of the series....it's hilarious but you need to watch it twice.
Another older show but delightful and quite a ride, restores your faith in the good guys. I also ordered to have a disc instead of video.
Only the idea was enough to deserve five stars. THis movie is magic, intelligent, expertly crafted. One of the ebst comedies I've ever seen.
Brings back good times memories and the movie is family friendly to watch at home, and Tim Allen is funny talented.
Good story, great cast, and a lot of good humored jabs at classic science fiction shows and movies, i.e. &#34;the choppers.'
I love this silly movie. Good parody on Star Trek, lots of fun, good actors, character development,  and a good ending...what more could you ask for?
I loved it so much, that I watched it several times!!!  It is a classic, especially if you grew up watching Star Trek!  I plan to buy the DVD.
Have seen this movie at least 10 times and will see it another ten.  Just plain fun.i It is a must see
Great movie, pokes fun at genre, while still paying tribute to it. Great cast, must have been fun on set.
Still funny after not seeing this movie for a while. Just hits home with the Star Trek crowd. Good for the family.
Absolute Classic!  I love this movie, just s***es n giggles all the way through.Taking the monkey outta typical SciFi and making it fun.
I absolutely love this movie! I bought it for my mom's birthday and it brought back good memories. Go Amazon!
I know its cheesy, but you got to love all the great actors in this show. Excellent viewing, can just watch this over and over.
It was a good funny spoof of the Star Trek series.  I thought they did a good job of portraying it that way.
I think this is the best thing since sliced bread. I have always loved star trek my whole life.Todays science fiction is tomarrows science fact
I loved it.  It was a little quirky, and I like quirky.  A comedy Science Fiction. I liked it because I get tired of the some old, same old.
Some movies you just can't get enough of. this movie will be around for many years. It's a well done spoof. you;ll love it
i have seen before this movie and i like it, the only movie  have seen Sigourney Weaver as a sex symbol
I decided t purchase this movie after I had seen it in a movie theatre, I thought it was entertaining and funny.
THIS IS A GREAT COMEDY THAT DOES NOT GET ANYWHERE NEAR THE CREDIT THAT IT DESERVES. A GREAT CAST&#8212;ESPECIALLY ALLEN RICKMAN.
It's Tim Allen. Need I really say any more?!?!Great cast, great movie, great all around!Trekkie fans will love it!
The best Star Trek Parody out there hilarious every time I watch this movie it never gets old.  The aliens are awesome..
This is one of the funniest movies out there. My daughter is a big Alan Rickman fan and wanted this for Christmas. We've seen it countless times.
This is a great movie!The only thing I would change is not to by blu-ray.Seem like blu-ray is being fazed out.Not as many available to the store.
This is a great comedy and its filled with a bunch of action and laughs!  You're gonna love this quirky comedy, especially the action filled ending!!
I don't know why I like this movie, but I do. Silly, stupid, ridiculous, no plot, insane,..........but I loved it.
This is a fun sci fi movie.  The cast was great.  Sigourney Weaver looks beautiful as a blonde.  I liked it so much that I wanted it in Blu-ray.
This was a gift for a friend and he loves it.  It arrived on time for his birthday and we are all quite satisfied.  Thanks for the service.
I have seen this movie many times and it is one of my many favorites.  The actors are great too.
Wasn't sure when I watched the trailor but this is a reat comedy and a great cast
I am, not a big Tim Allen fan, i did watch his show, I liked it this was funny for the family you'll like it.....
A brilliant and fun parody of Star Trek and other series' stars lives, post-fame. A classic that you should not miss!
I have always enjoyed the is movie. It smacks of old Star Trek episodes. The one liners are VERY cheesy but also good for a laugh.
Greatest Sci-Fi humor movie EVER!! DVD is great. I never get tired of this classic comedy. They did everything right.
I really enjoyed this movie!  I think that it has a lot of heart as well as laughs.  Would recommend for the 13 year old we all once were!
Spoof on Star Trek. All the Actors are superb! We watch it about every 3 months. You must view it about 2 to 3 times to understand how good it is.
Great for the whole family.  Teaching people to care and be there for people and do the best you can.  Even if they aren't people but aliens.
This is just a funny movie with a great cast of characters.  Entertaining every time I watch it.  Love it!
We are a Star Trek and star war family.  This parody was great.  The whole actor/actress area were great.  It has comedy and some suspense.
This movie is funny, clever and I like it more every time I watch it. That's saying something because I have watched it a lot.
This product works exactly as advertised, Not much more I can say than that, I have no complaints and/or compliments.
Tim Allen at his bestA very entertaining Movie, FUNNYGreat cast and specials effects, would recommend to a friend
This silly movie is under rated.  Watched it several times and always enjoy it! This is a popcorn flick for sure!
Product was as advertised and arrived on time.  There is nothing like a good funny movie that stars such big name actors.
Galaxy Quest successfully takes a SyFi movie and adds a homorous cast. A lighthearted view of the love people share for the space traveling cult.
We enjoyed watching this movie. It's funny and has a pretty good story line. We recommend this movie for wholesome fun.
Galaxy Quest was a perfect &#34;spoof&#34; for the time! Tongue in cheek all the way, yet done with charm and humor!Highly recommended!
Galaxy Quest pokes fun at the original Star Trek, but in doing so is extremely entertaining in its own right.  I highly recommend this movie.
Probably the best Sci-fi spoof ever. If you like the original star trek it's a must. Really funny to watch no matter how often I watch it.
One of my Favorite actors spoofing one of my favorite TV Shows, Star Trek. Thank you Hans Gruber, thank you.
A very very clever and touching script on many levels. Great cast ensemble, with some now classic performances.  I love this movie.
The film is funny, well produced and has a great cast!  this is one of my all time best sci-fi comedies!
this is a great movie and i had it on dvd but the blu-ray is well worth it. this movie makes me laugh every time i watch it
If you like movies that are really funny and have nice special effects then you have to see Galaxy Quest. You'll laugh till you cry.
Great movie!!! Funny story. Takes a great cast and a great twist on the Star Trek era shows. Laughed the whole time.
I've seen this movie several times and i enjoy it every time I see it.  I expect it to become a cult film.
I don't know why....but I love this film. Always did like Star Trek and this was a very good spoof
This is the type of movie we need more of these days. Good for a few laughs and a happy ending.
I hadn't seen this film since it first appeared (20 years ago?) and it was still as good as I remembered it back then.
a great movie with a spot on parody of star trek. a sequel would be a welcome addition to the movie world.
One of the all-time funniest movies.  Will be enjoyed best by those who grewup with the original &#34;Start Trek&#34; television series.
As a Star Trek fan, I just love this movie.  It arrived in perfect condition and has brightened up my library of DVDs.  It's a hoot!
Jim Carey does an amazing job acting as Andy Kaufman making this movie not only very funny but wrenches on your heart strings at the end.
Man On The Moon is a story about andy kaufman and jim carrey plays him. i think jim carrey plays andy kaufman very well. this is a great movie.
Jim Carrey as Andy Kaufman - what a piece of work!  Andy Kaufman was out of this world, and Jim Carrey captured him perfectly.
Jim Carrey nails his performance in this movie. Sheds a great light on such a unique mind. I highly recommend this movie.
There is not much really to say, this is THE Jim Carrey movie to see, and  the extras are cool too. Don't hesitate, get it now. tenk you veddy much.
This is a Valentine gift for my Hubby.  It came in on time.  He wants to watch it cuz he remembers about the late entertainer, Andy Kaufman.
I liked, this but sad, but this was a good movie, well you'll like this. If your a, Carrey fan watch this.....
In depth on Andy Kaufman with fine acting by Carrey. I loved it and learned a lot about Kaufman. Yes!
I had really wanted this movie, but the seller and the warehouse was out of stock. It is a funny movie. But things happen.
Actually anything that Denzel Washington plays in I find to be very good.  He is one of the Great Actors of our time
Movie came just as it was ordered; new. Never heard of the movie before, and I loved it. Great movie.
Denzel Washington continues to be one of my all-time favorite actors. This movie is AMAZING! You will not go wrong with this purchase!
Fantastic, outrageously good. Didn't know what I was in for and boy was I pleasantly surprised.
I love Denzel Washington in any movie he is in.  I would buy all movies staring Denzel. He is a great actor.
What can you say about a guy who has sex withan apple pie! Great movie...loved it. After this one youhave to get the rest of them.
It was such a good movie and was such a good price. I recommend the whole american pie series to everyone.
This is just a great movie.  It was in great condition as well, and I'd recommend it to anyone who has a sense of humor.
this was a funny movie but nadia saves it with the famous bedroom masturbation scene.
The funniest movie of 1999! One of the best comedys ever created. Jason Biggs Shines
Great movie, Great cast, Great soundtrack... Is there anything better than that?
This was, good I liked it well Julia Roberts is a good actress and Hugh  Grant is good too well you'll like this.....enjoy this movie!
I am a big fan of Julia Roberts and this is one of my favorities...Great shape and fast delivery at a perfect price.
I rented this movie on a cold, wintery Saturday, and watched twice the same day!  A well done film with a happy ending.
I really enjoyed this movie.  I love the quirky characters and all the ways that the film makers made time pass.  Great movie.
Very good story and acting by both of the principles. Transfer and color very good. I never tire watching this show.
I love Hugh Grant, and I love Julia Roberts; this movie has a great story line and great chemistrybetween the characters.
We love it so, we watch it over and over.
I love anything Hugh Grant.  Not a huge Julia Roberts fan, but she is good in this.  If you like romantic comedies, I recommend.
My daughter has seen this movie several times and has really liked it so I purchased the movie for her!
This is one of my favorite movies.  The characters, their interactions and friendships make this movie dear. Love, Love, Love the roommate!
Wonderfully creative screenplay with clever characters. Fun script. My go-to chick flick! Love it and watch it over and over.
The DVD arrived early and was in the condition promised. I had seen the movie before, but I really loved the story line of the movie.
An excellent DVD to own.  Excellent picture quality and great sound on Dolby 5.1.  The acting the story, and the music is great too.
this is just such a delightful movie.  I purchased it because it's not always on t.v.  sometimes you just want to watch a good romantic comedy.
Great dvd for only $4 with a great dvd case! This movie is funny and touching I would definitely recommend it! :)
I love this movie, it is one of my favorites! I am a romantic and I can watch it over and over again, plus it's funny too!
I finally saw this and I get what everyone loves about it.  It is charming and sweet and there is a little realness in it that I liked.
All I was doing was replacing the VHS tape we already had... this is one of our favorite movies -
Who does not love Julia Roberts and Hugh Grant?  It is entertaining and delightful!  The group of friends add so much also.
This movie was an old fashion romantic's and funny too. Loved it. I recommend this movie. The actor's were excellent in this.
The music, scenery, dialogue, acting and story were well done. It provides for a fulfilling viewing. I would watch it again.
Wonderful, and sweet.  One of Julia Roberts best.  Hugh Grant is great also.  I love this movie.
love julia roberts in this movie...great way to spend a snowy afternoon! Hugh Grant's not bad either...comedy romancegreat british humor
One of my favorite movies and now I can watch on my Kindle Fire....watched it while I was on my elipitcal...it was great!
This is one of my favorite movies of all time.  Great actors too!  Everybody should own this movie!  A true feel good movie.
Watched 100 times and love it every time.  I am a romantic and this is one of the best of all
Light, funny, tender. No great truths, but Hugh Grant and Julia Roberts send off believable sparks. Great views of London. Great supporting cast.
Love this movie, think it's one of her top movies.
This is a very funny and yet poignant movie.  I feel all the actors do a great job and the story is well developed.
A great but simple story played by wonderful actors. Could play this back once a month. And it includes two beautiful songs.
Julia Roberts is one of my favorite actresses. No matter who or what she does she is the best. Her smile is so great
Hugh Grant well, doing what he does best, a bumbling, fumbling Brit. Julia Roberts doing a version of herself. Lovely romantic comedy.
THIS IS THE TOP CHICK FLICK IN MY COLLECTION - INCREDIBLE CAST AND WELL ACTED... GREAT SCORE.
I like every thing the stars are in - it's kind of like getting your favorite Pizza, you just know you'll enjoy it.
It's a great story. I love the sequence with the changing of the seasons. Hugh Grant and Julia Roberts are perfectly cast. A great love story.
I already had this movie on VCR and loved it.  I loved the cast as well.  Good laughs and good times.
Just a good boy meets girl , boy loses girl, boy gets girl back at the end. Good cbaracters funny situations
GREAT MOVIE!!!!  THIS IS A WONDERFUL ROMANTIC COMEDY - A PERFECT MOVIE FOR A COLD RAINY DAY ON THE COUCH.  :-)
this movie may not be for everyone, but everyone should watch it at least once to find out.i love it...
This is a favorite one of mine that is so funny you laugh all the way through the movie. The costumes are so weird for allthe characters.
Very funny and all of the the people in the movie are great together.  I like to watch this movie over and over.
I take this out two to three times a year and LMAO. One of those movies I can watch over and over again. This is my favorite superhero movie.;)
I love this movie! It is just so much fun!!! I love the acting...what a great cast!!! If you didn't like it, watch it again! Just plain fun!
this crazy movie arrived quickly and in great condition.  If you have kids or if you think bathroom humor is funny, you will love this movie.
Great cast a writing. Hilarious. Ben Stiller and the rest of the actors did an amazing job at poking fun at superhero movies.
Package arrived in great condition and the price was great and on time. Love this movie, so funny. Gotta add to my movie collection. Thanks
I loved this movie it's so funny and keeps you laughing the whole movie long and with the price I was a very happy person.
This movie is worth the watch anytime for me, if you like goofy comedies (at least ones that are not so predictable) you will love this movie.
I have fond memmories of watching this movie with my mom as a kid.  Its still hilarious and I would recommend it.Not for children under 15 or so.
this is disputably Eddie Murphy's best performance and his most overlooked. You cannot help but smile throughout this whole film.
Excellent satire of the movie making process as well as Scientology. Recommended for anyone with a sense of humor. There is no animus intended.
I watch it over and over and I love it! Steve Martin and Eddie Murphy are a blast to watch! Such fun!
Loved this movie so much I ordered it  and gave it as a gift. Love Eddie Murphy in this character.
I have seen this movie several times and just love it. It is so funny!! Fun movie!!  Luv Steve Martin & Eddie Murphy!
I enjoyed the performances, especially that of Jonathan Rhys Meyers, who is still considered a newcomer although he's made a number of movies.
I don't ever rate movies, but I had to this time. I loved this movie. The actingwas excellent. I would recommend it to anyone.
I liked this movie as it told of the history of the part of the country my ancestors were from and it told the story well.
I love this show and it took me a while to understand it..have watched it three times and I love it.
I have seen this movie so much I need a new copy lol. Great movie a must buy... you won't be sorry
I got this for a friend and he loved it. I've honestly never seen the whole thing uncut from beginning to end, but whatI've seen so far, I've liked.
I really enjoyed hearing Arnold's accent in these movies. This movie was well made and entertaining and I would watch it again.
I for some reason really like Schwarzeneggar. His movies may not be academy award material, but they are always entertaining and full of action.
IF THIS MOVIE COMES OUT ON DVD, I'LL BUY IT.  A GREAT AUDIE MURPHY WESTERN.
This a good action packed western starring audie murphy andI enjoyed the story. I would highly recommend it to all western fans.
A good old Western.
I am an audie murphy fan. But even a newcommer would enjoy this western. Audie Murphyis the undisputed King of the B-Westerns.
I LOVE ALL WESTERNS. NEW AND OLD ONES.  I CAN NOT WAIT TO ADD THIS TO MY VAST MOVIE COLLECTION.
Needed this movie on VHS and someone had it. Thank you for having it on VHS, and now my search is over.
I mean, come on! What else is there but the best monsters ever in the best format ever! 'Nuff said!!
Super Cool keeps the original glorious B&W; but more coolnessSuper Cool keeps the orgicanl glorious B&W; but more coolness
This is an extraordinary collection that will have you riveted to your HD flatscreen. The sound and detail are out of this world.
My husband loves the classics, got my grandson hooked now too! It is scary movie night every saturday night at our house.
Bought this as a gift for my grandfather. Totally worth the price! Amazing quality packaging and the movies are great!
I can't give it ANY HIGHER KUDOS !The transfers are EXCELLENT PLUS !JUST GET IT AS SOON AS YOU CAN !
I love this.  I remember watching these movies throughout my years.  Its nice to have and so I can show my kids the monster movies I use to watch.
the movies that started it all...fantastic.can not get enough of these movies.glad to add this set to my collection
Yes, it's true. Head over to "amazon.co.uk" and pick them up for $55 delivered. A great price for a great set of Blu's
the classic monsters is the best box set i know the bluray is great you will just love this set the films look great and they are all restored
Great DVD for children who love Alvin.  Good teaching tool for showing kindness to others & my grandchildren just love the songs in it.
It was so funny and I loved the songs they sould do one with Dracula!
Incredibly cute, great for children and entertaining for adults. Thankfully the music was kept to a minimum and the story was actually intriguing.
Jake Roberts made this video worth watching. The story about his dad was really hard to watch
One of my favorite documentaries of all time! Great behind the scenes interviews and footage. You can easily watch it over and over again
very good behind the scenes dvd, love it.  great seller
This was a good movie i will watch it again and share it with others it really was very good.
This frigthtening movie is compelling...because ofChristian Bale who is probably the best young actor in the business.
I haven't watched this movie yet, but it's got the guy from Newsies. I just assume it's going to be like Newsies and I love musicals.
I love this film, It's one of those I watch over and over again. I find myself still laughing at some scenes.
A great, sharp, clean blu ray movie that trumps the DvD version. Perfect in every way. Bale before he was the Bat.
HE DID A GREAT JOB.. I think he did hard work on this film and really portrayed the characher well
An American classic -- what else is there to say? Stylish, entertaining, humorous, suspenseful and funny.  I watched it twice.
Bale is int it, enough for me to stay and watch it he is so diverse in all his roles plus he in easy on the eyes lol I love him..
Christian Bale is fantastic in this movie. If you like movies that deal with the psychotic killer, you will like this one.
Good movie. Good price. Done.Came in good condition and works fine.Interesting, and strange film starring Christian Bale,worth a watch
It held my attention.  Murder and nudity, or was it all in his head?  Interesting to see Christian Bale's early work.
Super good very scary and confusing. I would suggest this movies to anyone, the actor is great, and you are both attracted and scared by him.
I've got more and more respect for Christian Bale the more I see his movies.  This one is excellent.
You'll Like My Mother is a great film. Patty Duke is marvelous in this gothic thriller. I was lucky enough to see it in the theatre.
Another Classic Horror Movie that i saw as a youngster at the old Major Theater in Burbank, ca
This is a great collection and in great quality. If you are a fan of classic horror this is a must have.
I purchased this for a little old lady in a nursing home. She loves it. I have nothing else to say,take it or leave it please.
This is a very good dvd disc set. The movie's play excellent and if you like classic horror, as I do, it is great.
I am very satisfied with this purchased. I received it in a quick manner, and am enjoying the classic creature. 2 Thumbs Up
This set may have been done the best, and you just can't find some of these rare films anymore.
Great set of classic films!!!Brought back memories of watching these as a kid,and they are STILL fun to watch.
I love the old scary movies!  This is another classic.  If you like the old scary movies this is a must for your collection.
Great Movie Way cool  One of the best movies  made  I love  how it is well written and a great story
I am thrilled to now have this version of The Count of Monte Cristo in DVD format. I highly recommend this version, very well done.
Been Waiting to get a copy of this for a long time now. It's all good!! Can't say enough. Thanks!!
I bought this for me neighbors and they liked it a lot.  They have added it to there library of movies.
I like the count of monte  cristo with Richard chamberlain in it. He makes a great count and very believing!
We enjoy this version just as much as the newer version and we own them both.  Good classic story well acted.
If you are looking for the Richard Chamberlain production of this movie in English.  This is it.  Quality is excellent.
One of my favorite movies.Love him.Classic story of revenge.As you might expect, turns out badly for him.
Well done.  makes one stop and think.  Wish quality movies like this were made more often!  Actors portray characters well.
the dvd's  was fine and service was great...I have no problems with them  and would recommend them  to anyone who needs them.
I saw this movie on the TV a long time ago, and wanted to buy it if it was available. And here it is.!
This is my favorite version.  Everyone 12 and older should see this movie.
This is one for the best version of the show out there. Anthony Perkins is great as Javert and Richard Jordan does a good job as Jean Valjean.
Husband has always loved this movie and this version is his favorite. He simpy loved it! Brought back childhood memories.
I love this version. In my opinion none of the others can compete with this, sorry Leonardo. I love Richard Chamberlain and Jenny Agutter.
There's not a whole lot to say, but that it's one of the best ever movies.
I have enjoyed this movie several times since it arrived in my mail.  This is a very delightful movie with delightful acting!
I have always appreciated this classic tale. I saw it on tv as a kid and loved it. Very engaging movie- albeit a bit dramatic at times!
One of my favourite movies ever.  Anthony Andrews is amazing in it and so is Jane Seymour.  So very good
My favorite movie of all time.  I watched it at least 59 times and love it every time i watch
This is a great story and the acting was well done by all of the cast...especially Ian McKellan and Anthony Andrews.  Great romantic love story.
One of the best historical films of all time and a favorite of mine. Great for French Revolution fans.
I loved it and was happy to be able to buy it.
This is a great movie for all ages.  It is a great story that is performed well.  This is a movie that can be watched over and over again.
It is very entertaining. It has the historical aspects of the revolution, and  it has also the author's story that mix very well
Picture and color transfer were good.  The story was well done and the acting excellant.
Good remake of classic.  Well acted and good quality of filming.  Is closer to the books than earlier Hollywood pics
This is a wonderful story of gallantry and history. A wonderful program for ages 10 and up. I'm hooked on the whole series and the actors!
Great story line, Easy to follow. Sandra Bullock is one of the best actresses, and I watch all of her movies.
Great movie.  Surprise twist.  I loved it the second time around just as much as the first.  Everyone should watch it.
A movie full of surprises!  It's an English noir film!  Very off-beat story, but well worth watching.  Excellent performances all around.
Was outstanding  in 1992, a bit dated but great story and acting. Thank you Niel Jordan start of many great films
Wasn't a bad movie.  I enjoyed this movie a lot.  I think it is worth having.  I purchased this movie as a gift for my mother.
I highly recommend this movie ! You are in a time of upheaval both social and very emotional  time !
I had seen this movie before and wanted to see it again it was better the second time. I will probably watch it again.
The movie was remarkably well done for the year.  The special effects were pretty good for the age of the movie.
Terminator two has always been one of My favorite movies even though I Don't watch it often when I do is great
I love this movie! If you haven't seen it you're missing out! Spectacular!
The terminator series makes a great blu-ray dvd.  Sounds and picture are an obvious improvement.
Love the movie of the Terminator 2. I love it that it came out on bluray.. This is great to add to the Terminator series.
This is one of the best movies that Arnold has ever done while he has been acting and I'd personally recommend this movie to anyone.
This is a review of the UMD versionI loved this movie!MC White
This one is the cream of the crop. Still tops my Schwarzenegger films.  It has everything you are looking for in an action film.
This movie has the coolest action I have ever seen!Rated R for strong sci-fi action,violence,language,and nudity.
After all these years, it still rocks as a movie.  One of the best films ever!WATCH IT AGAIN! SUPER!
Its funny how some SiFi films can be seen over and over again and still hold my interest.  The video quality of this Blu-ray edition is outstanding!
I watch this movie from TV since my childhood. from Tape &#62; VCD &#62; DVD &#62; BlurayI love it so much.
One of my faves, love the follow up to one of the best si-fi movies of all time. Love Arnold as a good Terminator.
I'm a great fan of the Terminator series and have liked every one of them.  I highly recommend them to those who like action and science fiction.
It's Arnold ! , I can't think of any movie that he is in that I don't like .Buy it!
Definitely the best Terminator of the franchise! I love the crisp quality of the blu-ray and the fact that it offers different versions of the film,
I think by far the best one in the franchise!  This is for sure one of my go to movies for action/adventure.
It's not often that a sequel is anywhere near as good as the original, let alone any good at all, but this one is better I think.
Hello,The best Terminator of them all.  Sit back and enjoy.Thanks
I enjoyed this movie, Good acting.I want more movies like this one. Amazon. Please change your new movie selection. more often.
I already had the 1st and 3rd Terminator movies on blu ray, and I just had to get this one to complete the set! It's always fun to watch these
Every thing was great my brother loved his Christmas presant and will enjoy it for years to come. Great movie.
My father and I liked the 2nd one a lot that i had to get it for my father and watch the different ones that came out over the years again.
The DVD looks clean and it seems there are some additional scenes I don't remember seeing....well either way the DVD was brand new as advertised.
best terminator.best arnold movie.best james cameron movie. best of the best of the best. one of the best action movies of the 90's. do something!!!
Just saw it with my girlfriend, who has never seen one of these before.She thought it was pretty good.
DVD arrived in a excellent condition and quality. DVD arrived in a very timely fashion.
By far this is the best of the Terminator movies.  Well worth finding the uncut/directors version for the additional scenes
Really nice copy in BD.  Good picture and sound. I would recommend this to anyone that enjoys the Terminator series.
I have always liked this movie. Great special effects and action from beginning to end.  Never get tired of the liquid metal man!
This is a must have for those that have Home Theater. This movie will make your sound system shine.  Pick it up.
This is one of those classic science fiction movies that will always be good, the special effects, the music and the starring.
This is one of the best moview I have ever watched.
arnold.  great sci-fi film.  the best terminator movie of the entire series.  one of arnold's better acting role in his career.
Blu-ray picture quality was awesome. Just a non-stop, action packed movie that will leave you on the edge of your seat. The sound is awesome too.
This is my favorite of the terminator series I love it, It's a classic, always will be, Had to have it in my movie que
the best movie for check the sound of the home theater technicsis so good really!! have new scenes not view in the theater very very good!
Fast action like the first movie.Great acting by all the stars.Well produce and well wtitten story.The secondary cast players were great.
This Terminator 2 Limited Edition Set is simply the best I've ever seen! My friends went crazy about it... I recommend! A must have!
It's rare that a sequel is as good as the original and this one is right there alongside T1 as a sci/fi classic.
If you're a Terminator 2 fan, buy the Skynet Edition to have all the extras you will ever need for the movie and top notch picture and audio.
I've seen this movie several times and it's still cool to watch. Rare combination of great action and a great storyline.
Great movie, great action that had me sitting on the edges.  Edward Furlong was especially good, considering it was his first major movie.
One of the best sequels of all time and one of the best science fiction movies ever made. James Cameron can make a damn fine movie when he wants.
A true CLASSIC...terminator 2, skynet edition  blu-ray is great..beautiful picture and the extra features with an extended version is worth it! buy!
This is a good copy, a clean transfer to Blu_Ray of this classic Sci-Fi movie.  There is additional footage yet unseen on regular DVDs.
I enjoyed this movie it continues from part one Terminator I enjoyed watching it with my grandson and with my daughter
This movie has all the features you'd expect from a blu-ray movie, not to mention the audio and picture quality is amazing.
This movie was definitely ahead of it's time and by today's standards is still a masterpiece in the technology dept.
As good as the original Terminator was (and it's excellent), this sequel is even better.  I've seen it several times and still haven't tired of it.
Great action film!  I especially enjoyed seeing Robert Partick as T1000 after getting to know him in The X-Files. DVD extras are really good too.
One of Sharon stones best work it really shows how much desire and sexual manipulation can really let anyone lose everything.
THIS WAS A GREAT SUSPENSE THRILLER! THIS WAS A GREAT MOVIE BECAUSE YOU WERE NEVER SURE IF SHARON STONE WAS GUILTY OR NOT.
A must to view and keep in a library.This thriller was quick moving and a classic to watch.Heard about this in theatres and magazines. Great movie.
This is a great movie. Sharon Stone shows... nuff said.
I previously had this title in VCR format. This is an upgrade to BluRay. A good movie and one I wanted to keep in my collection.
This is a very entertaining movie that keeps you on the edge of your chair. Stellar performance by Michael Douglas, Share Stone and Ann Archer.
This movie is better than when it came out in theaters. The extra items are super. buy it and you'll like it.
This movie will be an iconic classic! Does not disappoint!
has some juicy things that i never saw on the others.. i love this movie and wish there was a #3.  !!  has everything you want in a good mystery.
It is a outrageous film. Sharon Stone is simply exotic. The argument is good. The photography excellent.
I moved from the first time i saw it. I actually had to by part II as well.
Well-casted flick.  Sharon is hot.  Michael Douglas does a very good job.  Well worth your time.
tho very pornographic, I liked it because of the coolness of Katherine.The first time I watched it the ending is a huge surprise
I thought this was a really good movie.  The woman was very beautiul.  I got excited watching her.I felt sorry for the man though.
Bought this for a gift for my sister whom finally got a blu-ray player. This is one of her favorite movies ever, so I got it for her for Christmas.
The Keepsake edition with he beautiful photos and the extra Special Features DVD make this collection well worth the money.
nobody puts baby in a corner!!! this movie always fits any mood for movie watching!!! best of patrick swayze!!! who doesnt love forbidden love???
full of songs that we all heard of.  2 disk set special features some of them are commentary and alternate scenes.
Great movie. I enjoyed the dancing plus the story line with Patrick. Jennifer was Excellant.
I adore this movie! And the fact that it is a limited edition just makes it that much better! &#9829;
OMG! I think everyone should own a copy of Dirty Dancing! funny, emotional and romantic all at the same time.
This is the second time I have purchased this movie. It is my favorite movie of all time. This is a must buy!
The movie you've seen 1000 times. It's a DVD, it plays like a DVD. Nothing special about it, just a classic movie.
Love the Movie, the Songs, and the dancing.  The story line is great. have watched many times on VHS will someday get it on DVD.
A good film from long ago. Brings back good memories. We new the plot, knew what was going to happen next, but still just kicked back and enjoyed.
This movie has been a favorite of mine for years!  It is exciting, mixed with sexy scenes and a fabulous love story!
The chemistry among ALL the actors was outstanding.  I loved Jennifer and Patrick, absolutely excellent actors - you really felt everyone's passion.
Really if you have to read this you never watched this movie. It's a Classic. And it's Dirty Dancing. :D
What can one say about Dirty Dancing? It's a classic 80's flick - and has a great soundtrack. If you're not aware... No body puts Baby in the corner!
The kind of music i grew up with - SUPER! Patrick Swayze is fabulous! I'll watch this more than once for sure.
my mom and i both enjoy watching this movie from time to time so it was awesome to find a used copy for only 38 cents! thanks so much!
Had to have a copy of this movie.  Who does not like 'Dirty Dancing'.One of those feel good no problems movie......buy it !!!!
anyone who grew up in the 80s knows that this is a great movie .. jennifer grey and patrick swayze are the best in this
Again one of my daughter's favorites, she wears out these tapes by watching them over and over again.  They are getting harder to find.
its as good as the first time I saw it...no scratches or any kind of damage. could not be happier
How can you NOT love this movie with Patrick Swayze ... and Jennifer Grey before her plastic surgery.  Its a great classic film and I love it.
Classic movie!  Good quality DVD, no extras, well priced.
I've liked everything that Patrick Swayze was in - but this was the BEST!  Wish he was still here to make more.......
This is such a classic! Who doesn't love this movie?! I've watched it many times. Great love story, wonderful dancing, and excellent cast!
This movie has remained a fave  through the years. I couldn't believe it when my hubby said he loves this movie too!
I had a friend tell me about this movie I had never seen it so I got it and watched it will enjoy watching it again and again
What's not to love about this movie? I could watch this move a million times and still not be tired of watching.
I have always loved this movie since I was younger. Lots of dancing and romance. A great movie to watch over and over again.
Just love this movie. Patrick Swayze....that's really all that needs to be said.  Like Jennifer Grey, too & of course the late,  great Jerry Orbach
One of my favorite movies to watch again and again.  The music, dancing, and actors were well chosen for this movie.
Great musical drama by Swayze & Grey. A feel good movie for the ages. Great dancing & great music along with a good story & good character actors.
classic movie featuring real life issues of the time in a realistic way. who doesn't want to watch them dance?
One of my favorite movies.  Had to have a copy for myself to watch again and again.  Love Patrick Swayze, miss him.
I remember this film when it first came out; it is still as good as I remember it! Love it!
My all-time favorite movie.  I wore out the VCR and am working on the DVD.  Never tire of watching this!
love the movie the dancing is what i like the most its different just like it its different movie from way back
Watched it as a kid still love it today. Now my kids are watching it! It's a classic must find it on DVD.
The music and dance moves make this an all time favorite!  The story isn't the greatest, but makes a great vehicle for the music and dance.
You better watch this one.  Fun and makes you want to get up and dance!  It may be old but it's a keeper!
This classic movie is terrific!
Nobody puts Baby in a corner! I absolutely love this movie. I never grow tired of watching it and singing along to the songs.
I was in high school during the 60's .  Seems I know the words to every song and can't help but sing along (and dance).  Such a classic.
A great romantic movie that's good for date night.  Patrick Swayze at his best!  &#34;Nobody puts Baby in a corner!&#34;
Worth the extra couple of bucks for all the special features, and the fact that the other version isn't in wide screen like this one is.
What woman doesn't like Dirty Dancing? I have watched this many times and will in the future. Thanks a lot!
I love this movie; I watch it all the time; and i never get tired of it. Great condition, great quality, and great features.
I bought this as a gift.  I know she loves it because this is her favorite movie of all time.  Incidentally, it's mine too!!!
i am from this genration which makes me different because i like movies from the 80s.  well this is a must see.
Great music, terrific dancing, innocent love story, and Patrick Swayze.  One fantastic chic flick!  One of my all-time favorite movies.
another classic with great music, great dancing and of course the georgeous patrick swayze. can watch this one over and over
I'm a guy.I like girls.I like rock 'n' roll.This movie has all of that.I recommend it for guys like myself.
My wife loves it, but hey, you gotta love Conan O'brien for bringing this film back to the theatre for its 10th anniversary.
gr8 movie filled with heart love music and dance moves i say swazy made gr8 films he will be missed
This movie is the most wonderful movie. I can watch it and never ever get tired of it.  Its the best.......
I really loved this movie . I watched it years ago.it reminds me when we watched as a family. we really enjoyed it.
What an awesome, now classic movie. I always enjoy watching. And no body puts baby in the corner. I can watch this over and over.
Very entertaining movies.  I have the DVD, but was able to watch this on the road by downloading the rental to the Kindle.
this is a classic all kids shoud see, the music is fabulous, and the actors are wonderful. so sad that that he has passed away
this is one of the best movies of all time!!!  DO NOT REMAKE THIS MOVIE!!!  this movie is perfect as is leave it alone!!!
I really like this movie and the music is good to listen to.  The two dance together real good.  Sorry the Patrick died
Still like it everytime I see it.  Great dancing and Swayze was soooo handsome.  One of those wonderful timeless movies.
i love the movie!!!! Jennifer/Patrick were great in the show and the dancing was amazing.its one of my favorite movie.
This is one of my favorites and I watch it over and over again.  I am a romatic at heart.
This was a Christmas purchase for my sister last year. We grew up watching this movie and she absolutely loves it!
This DVD was just as expected.  Had already seen the movie and knew i would like it.  I am glad i purchased this
A heart stopper, the best movie next to Pretty Woman!  I can't watch it enough!  Miss you Patric! Rest in Peace!
The DVD was in great condition. The story to me is timeless. One of the best coming of age movies.
I prefer older movie that have a believable story line that is unlike most of the films produced today. I'd watch it again.
One of my favorite feel good movies, it arrived as promised in perfect condition.  it was such a treat for myself to add this movie to my collection.
I really loved the music in this film.  I also thought the acting was very good.
Love this movie, it's a classic. Lots of fun, love the music and dancing. Not sure what Else to say.
I watched when it was first in theaters.  I loved it then and watch it again every few years and it's great every time.
This movie is a classic! The music is fantastic. The acting is superb. The last dance will have you dancing where ever you watching the movie
That seemed to be the question when this first came out.  Then, when my girls were old enough for it, it happened again!!
I've seen this before, still awesome!  Glad it is still out there so I can watch it again and again.
this is my second favorite movie and its a classic. who could go wrong with buying this? came packaged very well and not a scratch to be found!
This is one of my personal indulgences.  I watch this movie at least twice a year for the music and the dancing.
What can I really say about Dirty Dancing that has not already been said?  Instant CLASSIC one never gets tired of watching.  R,I.P. Patrick Swayze
This is a great movie. Even though dated, it remains fresh. The sound track is great and the dancing, too!
Best dance and music video ever made. They will never be able to remake this movie. They've tried and failed. Leave a classic alone..
A classic movie of the dusk of an era of innocence captured through the music and dance of the time.
I just love this movie.  Deliver was fast and timely.  I loved the recent comments by Jennifer Grey.
Nobody puts baby in the corner.......what a line. The dancing was great along with the moral of the story.  Would recommend this movie for anyone.
Really good rework to get it to go to Blu-Ray.  This version really POP's when coming from a Blu-Ray player
One of my all time favorite movies. watch is over and over agin. Just love it. hope others feel the same.
I've loved this movie since I was 5. This DVD Includes a concert, Behind the scenes footage, and the movie theater trailer. Enjoy
So glad we purchased this on DVD. I loved it when we had the VHS tape, but when the player quit we decided we needed to purchase the DVD.
I am so glad to have this classic on DVD! The color and sound is great! I love this movie!
Great songs, good acting, fun scenes, and a steamy romance, makes this a total package. Almost makes me want to learn to dance.
I loved this movie. Wonderful dance numbers and songs. Well packaged and would definitely buy this movie again if the need arose.
i have watched this movie time and time again. will continue to watch it. it is just that good. buy it.
I love watching Dirty Dancing. I loved Patrick Swayze in this movie and will miss him. My daughter and I love this movie.
Ask  my wife for Christmas to me and it do come in time.  My son & I do watch the great movie.  It si geat to see Dirty Dancing.
Great BD transfer with wonderful sound track to match.  Love the sound track, and wish Patrick was still with us to do more movies.
Whats not to love about this movie!  This is my all time favorite movie and its on Blue ray!  This makes me very happy!!!
it is our family favorite - very funny movie - it is simple movie but it is funny and good for English lerning
Me And My Wife Love To Watch That Movie We Were Laughing So Hard It was Good Comedy That Is The Best One.
This is an awsome movie.  It stars Jim Bekushi and Arnold Schwarenegger.  I like the part where they chicken with a bus and almost kill the bad guy.
I guess we have become used to Arnold shotting up the town (or planet) In his movies so multiple deaths seem natural.  Movie arrived in great shape.
this is a great movie it is funny and action pack.need to get this if you are a fan of AS and JB.
its his usual action movie - works great...  he and Belushi work well togetherthroughout the movie  - cops and robbers.
I already said that i got this on time and although I haven't seen it yet, sure its good, yes
Classic movie, a must own.  Great soundtrack with memorable characters that provide an excellent story that is both violent and entertaining.
the ear scene alone makes this movie great.  sweet plot too.  get it, got it, see it!
once of the greatest movies of all time! if you havent seen this buy it! you wont be disappointed at all!
gangster movie wont can you say guy thant fite and kill for money a bade way of life i say.
crazy movie,, loved it
what can i say, its a classic must have in your collection kind of movie with an all star cast!
Great collectible edition of this, whether you're simply a Reservoir Dogs fan or a Quentin Tarantino fan in general!  Super cool!
Like other Tarantino's movies... This gets the 5 stars cause it's worth watching and also has a great cast which is common in Tarantino's films!
My all-time favorite Tarantino flick. A must-have for any movie buff whether or not you enjoy his other films. Do yourself a favor and pick it up.
Blonde heard Stealer's WheelsThen chopped off the poor cop's earSo he won't hear it
Time goes by and this movie is still incredible. Tarantino proved here why he is a living legend. Highly recommended!
I new this was a good movie when I bought it, and I received what I expected.  No surprises here.
One of my favorite movies. I have watched this movie over and over. It never gets old. All the different movie stars plays their roles perfect.
I absolutely love this movie. It has great actors as well as a good amount of action. It easily gets 5/5.
Do not miss this movie, a crime classic. Violent, disturbing, and simply awesome. The music is really sick too.
BOUGHT THIS MOVIE FOR MY SON. HE JUST LOVES QUENTIN TARENTINO MOVIES ALL OF THEM AND HE ESPECAILLY LIKES THIS ONE THE BEST
Whatever color you like this movie has a character named after it. You will be on the edge of your seat watching the twists and turns.
Another Classic Tarantino movie! Great actors and it's a Tarantino !! One everyone should have in their movie collection !! Buy this one!!
Amazed by the quality of the bluray...that along with this grand movie makes this this a good purchase.
A film I like my favorite actor William r. Moses is in it he is great in this plus the other actors
ARRIVE RIGHT ON TIME GREAT DEAL I LIKE THE ACTOR BOKEEM WOODBINE THE ROLES HE PLAY HE SHINES IN ALL OF THEM
If you like the Doors music and interested in the live of this prodigy, you must see and have this movie. Recommended
If you just want to have a good time and not worry about details related to biography, this is the perfect The Doors movie.
what can i say, a classic movie about a classic rock band on high def blue ray.....get it.
ten Doors songs. First ....The Soft Parade, Touch Me, Roadhouse Blues, L.A. Woman, ....the rest is for you to decide
Great story bout a great innovative band. One of the best roles Val Kilmer has ever done short of Real Genius.
this is one of my favorite movies of all time. lisa bonet is wonderful in this movie as is the entire cast. well worth your time and money.
This is the type of suspense film that really gets under your skin in a really creepy way! The quality of the Blu-Ray image is outstanding!
This is a very good movie. It is a little gory, and includes satanism, sex, and voodoo. The end has an unexpected, surprising twist.
The acting in this is excellent. The plot twists and turns and made me a nice kind of dizzy. Scared the hell out of me.
one of those thinking movies.  great stuff though.  about some ex-military dude who has severe problems after the war, possibly from the government
Other reviewers can articulate the mastery of this movie much better than I can. It truly is a movie that stays with you.
Took me seeing it twice to get it, but thought it was really good!!!
I enjoyed the movie when i saw it back in 1990. it was a great movie to get if you are a fan of tim robbins.
Fun and a game that you can share and still be challenged  It still is not a game you can place aside so be ready to be entertained
Great movie that keeps you wondering what is going on until the end. Good one to watch while eating a bowl of popcorn on a snowy night.
This movie is a great thrill ride.  I had never seen it before and I didn't know what to expect and I was not disappointed.  Very entertaining
THIS IS WERE IT IS AT. THE BEST MOVIE IN THE WORLD
I enjoyed this movie immensely, actaully watched two times.I enjoyed the story line, everything about this moviem would recommend
I seen this movie many years a go and loved it then . I got this for my adult son and as I loved it ,  so did I . Great movie !
A love story of the strangest sort, but one I continue to watch over and over and never tire of it..
I can see why Holly Hunter won an Oscar for this movie.It's a brillant movie.You have to see this.
Should be in the 100 best American films list of the IFT. Could watch it over and over.  Fantastic portrayals!
I love everything about this movie. The cinematography, the casting, the acting...all of it. Albeit a love story, it's different than the norm.
I love this film.  If you've never seen it, you should.  I am very happy that I am now able to add it to my DVD library!
Just as i imagined puritanical immigrants to a 'backward' land would act. Great view of the 1800's. Sure looked real to me.
It was outstanding in 93 and it is still a moving film. and you get to seeanna when she was 10 and starting out.
I love this movie!  Holly Hunter and Harvey Keitel are superb.  And what can I say about Anna Paquin? She definitely earned her Oscar.
Interesting film, enjoyed it a lot. Acting is great, story keeps you engaged. It's an inside look at the medical profession, not for optimists.
played well
This movie should get six stars but you can only go as high as five.  I love this movie due to its action style with a decent story.
Loved it in the 80's still love it now.
It looks excellent considering how old this movie is. I say it is worth it considering how cheap it is as well.
Inspiration for all out cast's!!!Some of the best scenerey ever as well!!!''NOTHINGS OVER''!!!!!
GREAT MOVIE....EXCELLENT SHIPPING AND HANDLING!!! PRETTY MUCH FULLY SATISFIED WITH EVERYTHING!!! WILL CONTINUE TO SHOP WITH YOU ALL!!! THANK YOU!!!
Action, guns, death, fighting for what's right!  Can't be beat, one of Sylvester Stallone's best movies, the beginning of the series
This is the start of the rambo epic, and a must have for your Rambo collection I love the story of Rambo, hope you do to. Enjoy !!!!
good movie for all of my family. enjoyed the story line and the actors that played in the movie. would recommend for families.
I am of the Vietnam era so this movie plucks a certain chord for me.the rest of the Rambo franchise is the clumsy shadow of a great movie.
Can't comment on movie since it speaks for itself. Blue Ray quality is excellent. Surprised me.
Good quality and the good guy wins!  These type of movies I always enjoy so load em up and lets get our troops out of there.
When I first viewed this movie I had just returned from Nam and his work in this movie really came through for me,  I watch it all the time
This is a great sequel to First Blood. In my opinion it's a lot better. It's the best out of all the earlier Rambo movies.
A must for all serious movie collectors. Has been, and still is one of the best adventure/action series ever.
Looks sharp and clear. The sound is explosive for an old movie. This is even better than the first. Try it.
i loved the rambo movies, oh dont let your young ones watch the last one Rambo4, it is bloody
I love the movie and I wanted to get itI want to get this movie because I saw it before
THE BEST AMERICAN PATRIOTIC MOVIE. DON'T MISS IT.
Rambo IIISylvester StalloneGreat movie by a great Actor.  Love all his movies and can't wait for more.Highly recomend.
I've always loved the Rambo triligy but this is the best one by far in the meaning of knowing what's right.
I'm a native from Afghanistan, and this is one of the best Rambo movies made with Sylvester Stallone. Lots of action.
My favorite Rambo movie ever , great quality excellent ! Thank you as always Amazon blu ray rocks for a 20 year old movie.
I call it my old favorite
one of best movies stallone did. i mean yeah could have a rocky feel but at the end he did his thing.
In my opinion LockUp is the best sylvester stallon movie ever.  It is a great movie with the best performance of stallone.  A must see.
I've always liked Lock Up. I like it even in HD. I would recommend it to any fan of Sylvester Stallone.
The Punisher is one of marvels darkest and cooliest heroes. This older movie of the Punisher is awesome. I Love this movie.
This IS the original Punisher! This movie is better than the newer ones. This is a must have for the movie collector.
great movie and was delivered as scheduled.  thank you
really really awesome thanks a bunch much appriciated its a great movie n ive been looking for it for awhile haha
This is by far the best Punisher movie made. Dolph fit the role perfect! I just wish this movie would get its just do and have a Blu-Ray release!
great movie, would recommend to anyone.as with most movies, it is not for everyone, but it is for you if you have any taste!  : )
This is a great DVD with much action. I would suggest if you like action get this DVD you will like it.
great movie with lots to think about.  great action, great romance,great direction and great filming of all the story line.
I recently saw this movie and loved it. It is cheezy but a great SciFi.
will tell all my friends about the good quilaty of the movie look forward to more dealing with you.thank-you.been looking or this awhile
Hokey, corney, call it what you will, I love this movie.  I may be in the minority, but I usually am.
Mitchum is his usual  great performance. he is Marlowe. no one is better. he is far better than Bogart.
mitchem is not bogie but who is loved sarah miles and her little sister(candy clark) showing their stuff
Jessica Lange always comes thru. Worth the money!Pick a nice guy out, munch, be merry and let the good times flow.
Really well done with exceptional acting in this heart-wrenching story. Jessica Lange did an amazing job. The story was well-crafted and believable.
Through the whole movie I was hoping for the best for the main character.  Ending is suprising and believable.  I love this.
Great movie, great acting, great script; Still a joy to watch after all these years!Too bad they do not offer this movie in Blu-Ray
it was good to watch, brought back a lot of good memories. it was well worth the cost the charged
Great performance of Mel and Robert Downey, for my great movie, that could not miss in my collection ... thanks..
Few movies show real history with humor. music trackwas spot on too. Bet CIA hated it being released to public
Product arrived on time and in EXCELLENT condition. My compliments to your vendor for his honesty and integrity!
My DVD came to my home, quickly, and without a scratch.  Amazon is fast becoming my first mode of shopping.  Great movie, and a fair price.
Christopher Walken is an excellent man of importance. these kids in the movie, superb job in creating the roles of first time kidnappers!
It got here quickly and in great shape.  Thanks a bunch, Suzette! This is exactly what I was looking for a fraction of the cost!
Good condition, had a neat case that opened and you could see the characters through bullet holes. I loved watching Emillio strutting his stuff.
I have always love young guns better and young guns2 on Blu Ray it's like it new the first time it came out.
One of the great old west movies. Love history about the old west or Billy the kid this movie says it all...great quality
I have Young Guns (Special Edition) dvd,'tis a great Western movie,A Must See For Emilio Estevez's Fans :P
I love all kinds of movies. But I was raised watching old cowboy movies. So this is a favorite movie
Told from a different angle,it holds your attention.Even Richella was great.No glory,no sob story..just a treat for all to see.
Great movie, love Keifer!
I got this specific product for my husband. He loves all these types of movies and this was the only one missing in his collection. He loves it!
Being from the south this is one of my favorite movies ever and the blu-ray transfer isn't that bad I noticed a lot  reviewers complaining about it
got this classic Special Edition for a good price I really enjoy it and it came in good shape! &#34;Emilio!&#34; lol
Young Guns is an excellent western movie filled with great talented actors who came together and put on a fantastic movie.
Young guns is an excellent movie.  It may not be historically accurate, but it is highly entertaining for the evenings moviethon.
good shape good movie good price, tis movie is a good one to watch on a rainy day popcorn sit back relax
Very entertaining and fine acting by all that makes this movie enjoyable.  Blu ray is a winner.  What's not to like, it's a Western.
One of the best movies of its time.Dermot Mulroney was just starting out in this movie.  Great western.
I love this movie and always have it is a good story and keeps you entertained from start to finish.
I am a huge Billy The Kid fan.  I've read so much about him and these movies are pretty true to life.  A great western.
I bought it cause it was cheap and i really enjoyed it, it has a alright story but its a great 80s 90s action film
this is a good action pack movie me and my son enjoys. we are collecting all the soldiers adventures of this movie.
I am glad I am not there where the soldiers are. I just sit in my chair and watch their horror and pain.
I still wonder how much of what the media tells you is true and how much is fantasy.....don't you?Fabulous movie, either way!
Excellent film and wonderful story,Excellent actors and actresses.Good experience for better view memory.Wish have more so highly quality films.
This is a great older movie and certainly an asset to my vast collection. Arrived faster than a speeding bullit too!
The original Bad Lieutenant &#34;this one&#34; is jam packed with thrills all the way through.  It would be in my top 10 films of all time.
a very good portrayal of a really bad cop. Excellent action film and well worth watching. Harvey Keitel gives an great performance.
Very funny, even in 2013.  Brilliant writing, and directing.  An amazing movie!As soon as I see this remastered on Bluray I will buy it again!
I used to watch this as a kid and I just love this movie.  It's old, dry witty humor and it's just delightful
Needs no review.  The Fonda's and Hepburne are great.  It's one of a few movies I can watch over and over again.
i am not the one that bought this movie. but i am sure that she is glad to have gotten this. thank you
This movie is one of our favorites.  The actors are very tru to life.  We could watch this movie over and over again.
I watch it over and over. Favorite line:  What good is it keeping a dwarf if he can't do chores?
I saw this film years ago and wanted to see it again.  It is one of those films that is a classic and want to have in a home film library.
Love this movie!!  Had my kids watch a good ole classic.  My kids really enjoyed watching the movie.  Thanks, thanks!!
a must see movie. Katherine Hepburn and Henry Fonda were so good in this film
I wish life was so simple. This movie touches your heart.The characters are all endearing.This has always been my dreams.
If this does not make you value & look fondley upon spending the rest of your days with you partner, nothing will.
I saw &#34;On Golden Pond&#34; when it was originally released. Now, years later, I see it with fresh eyes - more poignant than ever.
This is an all-time favorite in our family. Bought this for my Grandson at his request for Christmas. Has humor, pathos & wonderful actors.
I have enjoyed this movie and wanted to have it so I can watch it anytime.  This is about life and living.
One of the best and great movie as far as I am concern.  Any member of the family can view without a problem.  It will make you cry.
i like to buy movies once in a while on VHS and got this for a penny.  Good movie.  would buy again.
What else can you say. Though I don't care too much for Jane Fonda, this movie has always been one of my favorites. I've seen it numerous times.
I'm waiting to watch this with my family. But it's got to be a great movie if K. Hepburn is in it!
Wonderful, wonderful movie.  Great actors!  Really enjoyed it when I saw it when it first came out.  Bought it as a gift this time.
Touching story of a disjointed father and his daughter, played beautifully by both Fonda's. Kate Hepburn, too, was excellent, as always.
Katheryn and Henry, a great coupling.How great that Jane got to do a movie with her dad.I wish they would have done more together.
Thank you for sending it so fast. It got here just in time for a birthday party.
My wife had to watch this movie for her class... I forgot how awesome it was. Great story and acting. Four big named stars.
and where oh where is the blu ray version??????? there are Blu ray copies of any old movie now, but not this classic&#62; why?
This is one of the best all time movies there is. I think anyone would enjoy it and agree with me.
a real keeper and a movie you will watch again and again...humorous, touching and really enjoyable. shipped fast and efficient.  my ultimate favorite
This one will hit true if there is a summer home that you go to.  Very true to life, enjoy
A keeper. Buy it. Make your kids and grandchildren watch it.
Catherine Hepburn & Henry Fonda play this movie like no one else could! Makes me cry every time I watch it!
I had not seen it in a while and it is always good to watch on a quiet, lazy afternoon.
this is one of my favorite movies. for one is is peaceful and two it is loving and caring and heartwarming. Very touching!
I really don't know much of this movie! This was bought as a present for my mother who really likes this movie!
Golden Ponnd is a great movie for Henry Fonda to finish with.  Every facit was perfection and completely enjoyable.
Glad to have it. Just what I Needed. Arrived right on time. A must have. A great buy at a great price. 2 Thumbs up.
Funny, funny, funny is the description that fits this movie.  I wish someone like him would come here to Earth for me. Loved it.
Love this movie.. A camp classic. And seeing two new faces was so much fun.
A very silly movie that made me and my girlfriends laugh.  A good choice for a girls night get together.
I found this movie to be a light hearted romp.  Deliberately written, I think,. as a satire it is very funny.  Recommend.
I guess the kids didn't learn there lesson the first time all well time to kick the crap out of some young punks school's out.
I have the three Substitute movies and thoroughly enjoyed each one.  Mr Williams does a great job as a teacher.
Great movie preview!I loved it a lot .Rated PG-13 for nudity and language.
Robert Downey, Jr at his best -- an oscar performance. CHAPLIN is great!. You'll want to see it again and again.
I would watch Gene Hackman read a phone book so maybe I am not the best judge but the movie was very exciting and fun to watch for me.
GENE HACKMAN WHAT CAN I SAY OSCAR CALIBER ACTOR ALL HIS MOVIES ARE GOODHE IS THE FRENCH CONNECTION OR I CAN SAY THE BEST
One of Gene Hackman's best movies. Well worth the five stars I have given it. I have watched this movie five times, it's that good.
Gene Hackman at his best. Good story line great acting by everyone. Definitely worth wtaching Gene Hackman performong great as usual.
IT IS A GREAT REVIEW TO ANALYZE WHAT HAS GOING ON WITH THE MURDER AND THE ESCAPE FROM GETTING KILLED IN THE HOUSE AND IN THE LONG RIDE TRAIN.
This is a very good movie. I have watched it several times on TV and finally bought it for my own.
As always Michelle Pfeiffer is great. I think this is one of Jeff Bridges' best roles.
I know I had seen this movie back when it came out, but had forgotten alot. Definitely one of Meryl Streep's best ever...
Great fan of Meryl Streep who is so versatile as an actor.  Glad there is a source at amazon to get great movies at a reasonable cost.
Cannot believe I had never seen this movie. Streep was fantastic and so was Kline. Enjoyed the plot line and highly recommend people watch this.
Emotional movie....the ending plot is so touching, i cant ever imagine having to make a decision like that! Meryl is fantastic as usual
Meryl Streep was brilliant as usual and Kevin Kline was fabulous.  Fantastic movie.  Compelling plot, would be easy to watch a second time.
Heard many reviews and finally got to watch if. Meryl Streep is amazing, as always. So was Kevin Kline. So worth watching.
One of the greatest films of all time. Brilliant acting,directing and writing. Get out the box of tissues before you watch this  masterpiece
alway's wanted this movie, loved it, story line was excellent, but such a sad ending, a must have and a must see
Twists and turns and lots of drinking but definitely worth the watch! This movie really keeps you on your turns and makes you think.
Can that somehow works in this very moving story.  Some may be disappointed in the ending, but the journey is well worth your time.
Movie is at best, odd.  BUT...it's worth the watch.  Just allow yourself two bags of popcorn - buttered would be best for this flick.
The actor has to go through a mind-crunch. It so good for the young academic. I like the mathematics. A
The best movie ever. The whole family really enjoys this movie. Download download this movie. I recommend this to anyone
This movie was a favorite from my past and re-watching it with my kids was fun.  The visual effects were pretty good for such an old movie.
The beginnig of one of the best franchies of all time, arnold at his almost best. A must have for terminator fans.
Me and my dad absolutely love this movie and enjoy the quality of the movie it self. One of the best classic movies to exist
The movie is good and entertaining and terrible in outcome. Schwarzenegger is at his best in one of the old hits of the ninety's.
nothing to say, wonderful classic best movie still today the best this and the second movie, the best of Cameron, and Arnie of course...
Dont waste your time with the DVD.... this version is much better...soundwise anyways.....
What could I say? It's The terminator! The sound and video is excellent. I saw things I hadn't noticed on the DVD.
Can't get much better than Terminator. Still holds up in almost every area for a modern audience.
This movie is still awesome even today. It has Sci-Fi, action, a love story & a morality check all in one!
My order was put in July 2,2012.it came before due date like express, couldn't wait. I am very pleased with.
1080p HDTV with my PS3 playing this movie is so freaking awesome!  Looking way better than the VHS and DVD with the standard TV.
This is one of the best Sci-Fi movies ever made.  The special edition DVD has been done quite nicely, and is well worth it.  Tons of extras!!!
A definite Classic to have, from the first to the 3rd, superb.  A must have to add to a collection
I love this movie.  It just gets right into the action at the beginning and I love that.  Not the best of the trilogy series, but still great.
Being made in the early 80's, the Special Effects, story and acting are all really good, right up there with &#34;The Running Man&#34;.
A fun movie for thise with apocalyptic leanings. It comes with a very quick shipp and delievery, was quite surprised at the efficiency.
This movie is great. It has a lot of action in it. The story and the idea are amazing. This movie is kind of like matrix.
Love Schwarzenegger movies.Great action, suspense movie.Great to watch with family on a relaxing afternoon.Co-actors perform awesome as well.
This movie is one of a kind. Nothing even comes close to it. There is nothing else to say this movie is a classic.
Whats not to like this is an all time classic.  Will pop this in and crank it up for great entertainment.
I love the terminator and the original is my favorite. I bought this to expand my son's collection since he is loving the terminator series.
A solid, fascinating time travel story, replete with action, romance, and a strange sense of the unknowable.  One of the best stories of its kind.
I have nothing negative to say about the Terminator movie.  Loved it in the theatre and love it on DVD.  Good choice.
Classic movie that takes you back in time. Classic lines, classic clothes, classic Arnold. The movie of the 80&#8217;s that started it all
This is one of the best Sci-Fiction movies. If you haven't seen it before, watch it now! Then watch the sequels in order.
I love this movie. My mind changed when I actually sat down and watched one of these movies with my family.
The movie is always a fun time. Great action, excellent actors. A great way to spend an evening with a bowl of popcorn and a classic movie.
This is one of my most favorite movie I enjoy watching it with my grandson and with my daughter we love Arnold
whats not to like about this - full of Schwrzy action and has a good story line  I have all of them
AWESOME!  Classic!
This is a classic movie, it was in perfect condition and with the drone problem we face today in America, I recommend watching this classic.
This is one of the best action film of the eighties.  Even today, it holds up well.  One of Arnold's best films.
Gripping Vietnam War Movie only second to Mel Gibson's We Were Soldiers.  Good acting and action and memerobale scenes that stick out.
Vietnam veterans are portrayed well in this rugged and realistic re-enactment of one of the fiercest battles of the Vietnam era.
If ur a fan you'll love it. If not ur not a Fan U won't. I must say good memories.
This movie is priceless I cannot understand why it has not recieved the recognition it trully deserves. Buy this dvd before it goes out of print.
i have always love this movie. it is very good and entertaing. i think it is a classic. i might buy a extra copy.
Peter Selles movies are for god moment and enjoy with your friends is very god actor and I love how he worked.
Peter Sellers at his best! He is so ridiculous . . . and funny.  I think this is the best of all the Pink Panther movies, Steve Martin included.
this a classic = brings back great memories and even my 13 year old daughter and her friend loved it
We are very pleased with this purchase.  We enjoy watching this movie whenever we can.  It will always be a favorite.
this movie is one that i can watch over and over. Peter Sellers is wonderful as a bumbling detective. The story is comedy at it's best.
Very funny movie in the Pink Panther series with the comic genius of Peter Sellers. You will laugh out loud.
Need one say more -- this is one of if not the funniest of the PINK PANTHER movies. Brilliance and full of laughter.
This has always been my favorite of the Pink Panther  movies. There was no one like Peter Sellers, he was the best!!
Sellers at the top of his form in Return of the Pink Panther. Many hilarious moments.  You should see it again.  And again.
The headline says it all...More of the  Inspector's antics solving far out crimes with a great cast of supporting actors
One of the best Pink Panthers.  I suffer from depression and try to curb it in one way by comedy.  Sellers is a great doctor!  RAD.
This is my favorite Pink Panther film.  I love the monkey scene and the vacuum cleaner scene.
If you like Peter Sellers dont miss this,The old Pink Panther films are so much better than any remake, laugh your head off with this one.
BOWIE WAS REALLY SEXY...NO WONDER JAP CAPTAIN WOULD LOVE HIM...NEVER WONDERED THIS COULD BE RELEASED BY CRITERION, A LITTLE MIRACLE.
seen this movie. But, if it contains all of David Bowie's pizzazz I would recommend it.I love David Bowie.
Gregory Peck was at his best and the story was believable.  I have always enjoyed this movie and was glad to finally purchase it.
One of Gregory Peck's great movies!!  this is one movie I wish they would remake.  It is a must watch again on my list.
Enjoyed the movie.The DVD was perfect.
I liked the idea of Nazi doc (Mengele) living in S. America and doing his experiments there and what he is trying to do.
Great flick, really outstanding performances, great to see Peck as an evil bad guy... A great deal of thought and intensity... really a fine movie.
This is an excellent movie to watch. It was very well done and the acting was incredible. This is defiantly a movie you should watch. Great stuff!
The movie was great, I didn't think I would like  anything that Charlie Sheen was in but I found this to be a very enjoyable movie.
A very entertaining movie with good acting and a very interesting story. Acting was well done and scenery very good!
Good thriller!! Little known by the director of Pitch Black. Very underrated,  Just the right amount of suspense and intrigue to keep you going.
What can I say - at the end you are afraid to turn out the lights!  Good movie!  Should make a smash success
Some call the special effects dated but I was quite taken by them.  Good story left open to a sequel.
This was a welcome departure from the juvenile antics of Sheen. Good plot if you're a true sci fi fan.
I enjoy these alien type movies that seem more like something that can happen and this is right in line.
I was pretty upset with the DVD version of this film. But the Blu-ray really comes through. The picture is great and so is the sound.
got for my collection not much more to say except is a great movie to see again and wanted it for collection
This is IN Fine Condition have finally been able to watch it.Chuck Norris is my favorite actor.  Thank You So Much Connie
Who is the best, the dog or Chuck Norris. Well worth watching for a laugh. Maybe Mr Norris should do more comedy films!!!!
a great movie to watch if you like chuck norris and all of his movies and how he works with dogs and people
Chuck Norris is awesome in this film and the dog is cute too. It's a film for the whole family. A real good popcorn, Soda Pop, and Candy film.
What can I say? Its Sylvester Stallone! Its RAMBO!A must have for any Movie Buff! Just an Awesome Box Set!!!
this was great and full of laughter watch this all the time and i hope yall have a great day today ty and bye
My kind of movie..... I love Kevin Bacon/ he just is the best in about everything he does.  All the actors were good. you will like it....
awesomeness!!! high-quality dvd, loved it, bought a 2nd one for a friend who watched it and loved it! NO PROBLEMS!! great seller!
This movie keeps you on the edge of your seat. Just as you think you have it figured out something changes. Great acting by Kevin Bacon.
I really enjoyed this movie alot.  Kevin Bacon did an excellent job.  It will keep you glued to the screen till the finale.
This is one of my favorite movies. I try to watch it every time it is on tv. It has a great ending too.
Although it doesn't seem as original as The Sixth Sense, Kevin Bacon carries it off.  A fun scary popcorn thinking flick.
Seller sent disc to me very fast.  Good condition, plus a hot movie to boot!
Dvd in excellent condition.  Movie terrifying, yet interesting.  It is something you can get very involved in.  Not recommeded for anyone under 16.
I enjoy watching Kevin Bacon.  This is one I watch over and over.  I would recommend it to anyone who likes a good spooky movie.
NICE CLEAN FAMILY VIEWING LEAVES YOU WITH A REFRESHINIG FEELING.WOULD RECOMEND IT FOR ALL FAMILY  ANY AGE ENTERTAINMENT,EVEN ADULTS!LOVED IT!
the little boy and the bears interaction with each other seemed almost hard to believe. good family show . i enjoyed it very much.
When a female grizzly gets her cubs taken, she takes the man cub! A great family film you can enjoy over and over again.
I liked his sence of humor and personality, so I had to have this great show. He's very muched missed!
I bought this ages ago and I like it a lot.  Good workout.  It's two workouts and I like both.  Outdoor scenery is nice too.
This was my first kickboxing videos. I am hooked. This is wonderful if you are just starting out.
I got this DVD for my husband who likes Ronald Regan. He was very happy with it. And I would reamend it to any one who likes Ronald Regan.
Loved the music.  Brought me back to my younger days.  Recommend this DVD to anyone!  Great seeing musicians from the Sixties!
Cute, warm & funny.  Not the funniest sitcom ever, but who cares.  Doris Day is something we'll never see again. A true original.  She rocks!
Great show!  Wonderful family entertainment.  Also stars Denver Pyle (Dukes of Hazzard) and James Hampton (F Troop).  Fun stories too.
You know that I like Doris Day too much if this movie as not like the best of her , but it's enough to looke to Doris Day ,she is only one .
Wonderful! Wonderful! Wonderful!  They just don't make em anymore like they use to.  Highly recommend.
A must for Sherlock Holmes fans!  Wonderful reproduction!  Treat yourself and get this collection.  You will love it.
I purchased this product from Amazon strictly because of the price. I find the product manufactured well and visually free of major defects.
It doesn't get any better . Sherlock Holmes on BLU RAY for Basil Rathbone fans . Fantastic
I enjoyed seeing all of these at the theatre when I was a little girl  and am certainly enjoying them again at home at age 84.  Very nice set.
No one plays Holmes better than Rathbone, and Nigel Bruce is the best Watson ever.  The unabashed propaganda in these movies is hilarious!
Beyond expectations. Picture and sound quality is perfect. Highly recommend for (Basil Rathbone) Sherlock Holmes fans. Nice little extras too.
5 stars for the oldies are the best of the best.great greatyes i would tell you to go buy
I'm a fan of the famous Sherlock Holmes and I'm very glad to own the collection, that I can view any time I like.
I enjoy the older Sherlock movies-not the newer ones. I like the older scenes.  I have been to London and enjoy the scenery.
A must have for all who collect Sherlock materials in print and film. So glad the restoration of oldies is possible.
Clean up well done.  Images are so clear that at times, one feels a bit of awe, watching &#34;Holmes&#34; and &#34;Dr. Watson.
cyrstal clear black and white with parts that haven't been seen in years ( cut for commercials).I never get tired viewing these classic movies
Loved the dvd....as always I love Tim.  The package was great and arrived quickly.
My kids are in a We Love Disney phase.  Cinderella is well re-mastered, with everything you need to enjoy.  Love it.
My kids loved this movie! They never left the TV as it was playing. This was the 1st time they ever saw it.
New, still in plastic, and with reward code.  Very satisfied with my purchase.  And at a better price than walmart.
Great movie classic. I had to own it since my boys loved watching it with their cousin. I was just glad it was a &#34;girly&#34; movie they enjoyed!!
A true Disney Classic.  It's the favorite Disney movie of my future daughter-in-law.  So, Merry Christmas Becky.
This Blu Ray and DVD combo have only improved the quality of the picture andclarity of the songs.  A masterpiece plain and simple.
I love this. And so does my 6 month old daughter now. She has been watching this from the time she was 1 month old. :D
Cinderella is a classic story, and we like the Disney version .  We're glad to have this movie at home.
Getting the blu ray dvd and digital copy makes for very good flexibility of playback.  For the price seemed like a good deal.
its a classic that you watch once and never forgoton the movie as an adultcan wacth any time you want it in your collection now
It was in brand new condition, great A/V presentation, and lots of bonuses. Recommended to buy before it goes back into the vault!
A love my disney movies and just had to get Cinderella! very decent price for two discs!Ad recommend this to anyone
A few things retain their original charm and delight. Beautiful colors, fluid animation and a timeless story. Everyone should see this masterpiece.
this movie is a great remastered edition of this classic movie and this movie is great for little kids and is very entertaining for little kids.
its out on DVD October 4thit'll be good, like Bambi & Aladdin.So get it.
This is a great classic.  Completely forgot how good this movie was.  Would definitely recommend for any movie collection and any age young or old.
No one will go wrong purchasing this!  The quality is excellent.It's wonderful to see favorite Disney movies restored and improved!
I purchased this for my kids who love this story. It is classic disney. There really isn't anything else to say!
It's my daughter's favorite movie and they have games for older kids on the 2nd DVD.
Great classic Disney movie. Still enchants new generations. My 3 yo daughter loves it and the characters.
I recommend to every one - such good deals on movies I buy all the ones I like for myself and my kids
I gave this to an 18 year old girl.. she still loves it.. It's great for any girl at any age..Who wouldn't want to be Cinderella?????
You can't go wrong with this classic Disney film. Be sure to add it to your collection before it goes in the vaults.
The DVD was in excellent shape and the movie plays great.  Grandkids love it.
I saw it when it hit theatres and wanted it on hand to relive the fun of that first moment.
Always a favorite. A must purchase for those who have kids, grandkids or who are just young at heart! It's a keeper.
This is one of the many classic Disney films I have bought latey and I love it of course (it's disney)
This was a gift for our grand daughter.Cinderella is truly a Disney classic.This seemed to be a good deal of gettign the Blu-ray/Combo pack.
one of my daughter's favorites.we've gone from VCR, DVD and now we needed the Blu Ray version.it looks so much cleaner then the old DVD version
Cinderella has been a favorite of mine since childhood.....what girl doesn't want new shoes and a Prince Charming.  Works for me.
My granddaughter has about every Disney movie classic there is.And she is going to love this! She is such a princess!
I enjoyed it more on Blu-ray than when it first came out years ago. I enjoyed it than also and so will my son.
The product was as advertised..Arrived on date promised..Service was really fast as always..Greatest place in the worldto shop for gifts.
I like how this Disney movie works because who can balance a flat surface on your head? No one I know.
This is one of our most played movies by Disney.  We had been waiting for it to come out in blu-ray.  I ordered right away.
Who doesn't love this movie?super fast shipping!!From generation to generation this and snow white!!! I'm sure everyone agrees with the great quality
It's a classic! So it's a must have for all Disney movie collectors. Disney Collection would not be complete without this movie.
Thank you so very much for allowing me the opportunity to share this terrific classic with my child!Highly recommend to EVERYONE!
Just replacing my daughters VHS tapes one by one, to keep the memories alive and well. You are never too old for Disney!
It's a movie about a Disney princess -- For little girls (and big( WHAT'S NOT TO LOVE?! She enjoys it.
this is a great movie , it brings back  old memories for me, realy great for kids, they would love it.
I've always liked Disney movies!!!  This is one of my favorites!!! I intend to build my own Disney movie library, soon.
I love Cinderella. It is a great Disney classic and the quality of this Blu-ray DVD is superb. A wonderful addition to my collection.
A true Disney Classic to be shared .  A heartwarming story for all ages. I enjoyed as a child and now as an adult with my grandkids
This too is a movie that I replaced for grandchildren that I gave to my niece with a fatal illness
even after disney locked it in the vault, im glad to have found it on amazon to add it to my collection :)
Cinderella will always be one of my favorite classic Disney movies! Its difficult these days to find the classics. Great movie for all ages!
Wonderful in Blue Ray, brough back old memories of my childhood...A great buy for he price....Love it!!!  I recommend it
As great as I remember it. After having 2 boys it is nice sharing this movie with their daughters thank you
Just as I remembered it as a child. The colors are more vivid than I remember as a kid. Buy it.....you won't be sorry !!!
This movies is so timeless and my daughter and I were so happy that we could just buy a digital copy.
i love being able to buy DVDs at affordable prices and I really love that i get to own this special disney classic in my home now.
Remastered version of this movie in a clear, blu ray quality, sound is better than vhs LOL, buy it now
This is my daughters favorite princess movie, and the songs are my favorite out of all the princess movies. The characters are too cute.
Another gift that we bought and gave it to someone and they loved it! Disney is great at making movies!
A classic.  Cinderella is a story for the ages.  It never gets old, and the movie quality on DVD is well done.
Bought for great niece. It was actually bought by her great gramma who still loves to watch all the Disney movies.
Purchased this one for my 3 year old niece and she loves Cinderella!! Now she can't stop talking about her though:)
My kids love it, and it really holds up.  You'll really enjoy this DVD.  Its a nice transfer, and the picture and sound are great.  A classic.
Haven't replaced our Video tape yet, until now! Great price! Our Granddaughter will love it! Haven't watched it yet, but will soon.
watched this as a child , now my 21/2 year old granddaughter absolutely loves this movie and watched many times over!
ALWAYS HAVE LOVED CINDERELLA AND THOSE ADORABLE MICE!!!  It's a sweet movie letting people believe dreams can come true if you really wish for it....
This goes with the rest of my disney movies that i have i have love all disney movies ever since i was a kid
By far, one of my favorite disney movies. I am so glad with the purchase and that I'll be able to share with my future daughter.
What a sweet movie. It teaches many lessons on the proper way to treat others, forgive others, and to never give up on your dreams
I bought this for my 4 yo. granddaughter's birthday.  She loves it with the dress, shoes, wand, crown and matching phone.
We got the tape which play very good like exactly described it. Our kids were very happy by their collections. Thank you so much & have a good day!
My 2 yr old is not a big tv person but she is quickly coming to love the princesses and their stories
My granddaughter's favorite princess and favorite movie.  how could this not be a great purchase.  really pleased with this movie
From ashes to riches! This gives hope that dreams can come true and that tomorrow may bring manu wonders in one`s life.
How can you not like Cinderella?  It is a classic story for all ages.  Time to upgrade your VHS to DVD.
Great movie and it looks good too since they remastered it. My daughter could watch it all day long if I let her.
Who doesn't like a classic disney animated feature.  If you love one you love them all.  This is as good as any.
One of my daughters favorites.  You just cannot go wrong with any of the classic disney movies.  Love it in blu-ray.
One of the best movies ever made such a cute story and the singing and lesson taught have such great value.
Classic Disney. One of our children's favorites. No more rewinding!!!!!! If you haven't seen this movie shame on you! It is a classic story.
Cinderella is a classic what else do I need to say. I loved it has a child and my children love it. I still love to see it.
Great, one of our favorites.  Classy great music &amp; not to be forgoten.
The classic Cinderella on Blu-Ray - what else is there to say.  Now I get to share the magic of my childhood with the little ones.
This is a Classic Disney film!  This was bought as a Christmas gift for a young girl.  It was on her wish list.
this is a Christmas gift for my new grand-daughter. getting her started on the Disney classics. I'm sure she'll love them as much as we all do.
Received this item within a couple of days after submitting the order.  Love the Disney Classics.  Bought this for my 3 year old granddaughter
My granddaughter and I love this classic!  Disney provides wonderful songs and animation that she loves to view over and over again.
It was worth waiting for.  The blu-ray is the definitive edition of this beloved family classic that many of us first saw when we were children.
What can I say about my favorite Disney movie?  It will never get old.  This edition is worth it for the avid collector.
I love the Disney movies. Who doesn't? I would recommend it to any one. Just trying to get the ones I like the best in CD's
Received it very fast and brand new in the package.  No problems with receiving item in time for Christmas and packaging was spectacular.
What can I say, it's a Disney classic that children love.  Who doesn't love a Disney love story.  For adults as well as kids.
I gave this to my daughter for Christmas.  She is thrilled, and can't wait to watch it in our theatre room
My little girls love princess movies and Cinderella is one of the biggies! If you have girls who love princesses, get this one!
My granddaughter wanted this, so I bought it for her for Christmas. I should have bought myself one too! I love this movie.
I owned this movie on DVD, but needed to have it on Blu-ray, especially with the bonus features- which are awesome. good service. Good price.
This is a classic. I loved it growing up and hopefully my daughter will too.
You are never to old for Disney. One of my sisters fav disney movies it Cinderella, but I just like all the disney princess movies.
Disney's timeless classic is for young and old alike! It's very well done. Songs and animation is excellent! Holds up well, not dated.Recommended!
Bought this for my little 3 year old granddaughter. She is just starting to love princesses and she loves this movie.
well - this is the classic... in HD... it loks good, its got everything you know and expect... Cinderella as Cinderella as can be ;)
This movie is for my grand niece but if she does not like it I want it back.  Cinderella is a wonderful movie!
A classic tale of a lost abused girl who gets rescued by a handsome prince and lives happily ever after. I love it!
We're happy to have this as part of our Disney collection. It's a fun family movie that we've had on VHS and enjoy being able to watch on DVD.
Another good movie for the little ones.
Cinderella has always been my favorite "Disney" Princess.A joy to watch for all ages. Glad that Disney put it on DVD!!
Great love this movie and it came in great shape
The four and five year old BOYS I purchased this for claim it as their favorite movie. They watch it every day. Can't beat a classic.
This is just wonderful!!!!
This product works just fine, and I really love this movie. I hope that my brother will maybe get into the songs.
Always a favorite among kids.
Pocahontas was one of my favorite movies as a kid and was just as enjoyable to rewatch as an adult. Def worth the buy!
Pocahontas is a true story.  maybe not how hollywood tells it.  this is a great story lets young kids see how the world was like back then.
Can't get enough Disney; can always depend on a quality movie from Disney. Enjoyed the story line and the music.
Disney has always proven to provide great movies that all ages can love. Pocahontas is just another example of that. Great for all ages.
This is a great classic.  Completely forgot how good this movie was.  Would definitely recommend for any movie collection and anyone young or old.
I love the song and score of Pocahontas, great Disney movie and very beautiful package
Nice video....I really wanted to purchase the DVD and bought this by accident....It is nice but I wanted the DVD....
We loved this story and it has a great message for all .  The animals are fun and the witch tree is fun.
Bought this for my daughter, it was one of her favorite movies as a child. We got the movie in record time and didn't pay extra
i loved this movie. wonderful songs. great story. truly a classic disney movie.would recommend it to anyone.great family movie just add popcorn.
my daughter watches this at lease twice a week and i'm right there with her. it's a classic and staple every household should own. love pocahontas
This is one of those movies from my childhood that I just had to have. Good quality and in great condition.
It is a great movie. I bought this to finish my collection of Pocahntas. I highly recommend to anyone who likes family movies.
i was really surprised at how many there were to chose from.  I am very happy with my purchase.  I'll be buying again.
Purely classic. One of Disney's best! You cannot go wrong with this one. Just the songs are worth it! My kids love it dearly.
I bought this for my 5 year old for Christmas and she loves this movie and the history that goes with it.
Pocahontas is a good family cartoon movie for the whole family to enjoy. In any culture.
this movie is about a young woman trying to find her way to the right path. She finds out that all you have to do is listen your heart
This movie is SO GOOD!I really like frodo and his inner struggle! It gives my life meaning!five large heavy stars!
This movie will always be one of my favorites, no matter what age I am. The classics never fail me!
The old Disney movies are the best. I love this movie, it's one of my favorites & I hope my son enjoys it too when he's a bit older.
I loved this movie!  I know it is not historically accurate, but it is visually stunning and an unforgettable love story.
I love this movie! Better then the first (boyfriend disagrees) but I bought it because he had never seen it before. As great as I remember!
Disney films are always a good bet, for enjoyment and content. this one is no different. My niece loves it!
I love watching the lion king movies. They area part of my childhood that will not go away. All of themare awesome to watch
I loved this classic Disney film since I first saw it in the movie theater. Both discs played just fine.
Everyone no matter their age would enjoy watching the lion king movies. I recommend them to all age group of children.
bought this for my grandson for christmas, so don't know the quality of it yet, but the service was great. it was mailed out very promptly,
The Lion King ii completes our collection of Lion King movies.  Next to the Lion King 1 1/2 I think this is my granddaughter's favorite.
I've seen it before but enjoyed seeing it on Blu-ray. It was better. My son will always enjoy it but he liked it better on Blu-ray also.
I'm so glad I got this movie.  It was a great price especially for a 2-disc DVD.  I am very happy!
bought this for my grandaughter i like the movie more than she does. the movie is band new and plays great. got the movie fast, thanks so much
The original 'Lion King' was beautiful and magnificent. This sequel does the first movie justice and is every bit as good as its predecessor.
I love anything lion king and this one is fabulous. The songs are catchy and wonderful and the story is well told.
We got the tape which play very good like exactly described it. Our kids were very happy. Thank you so much & have a good day!
Yesterday I watch it and it was so cute. I love it. I never see this before when i was kid.
Our grandkids have watched this movie over and over and over again. Grandparents and moms and dads love it too!!!
Great movie, my granddaughter was always watching it when she cam to grandma's
this is worth every penny!it contains english,german and turckish languages!if you are a die hard lion king fan buy one of these!
Love Bambi, who wouldn't, happy with my purchase no problems! I bought this movie to add to my Disney favorites collection.
The blu-ray of this movie is crisp and beautiful. I love that you great special features, too! Great for kids of all ages.
This movie is sooo good. Sad parts as per any Disney movie family dysfunction and a happily ever after tale.
CAN'T GO WRONG PICKING UP THESE DISNEY TITLES FOR A GOOD PRICE. THE GOOD ONES NEVER GROW OLD AND ARE ENJOYED BY EACH SUBSEQUENT GENERATION.
I love this movie and cannot wait to see this again. thanks for sending it so quickly. Will use your site again to purchase
Bambi, love the movie.  Got it for my kids, they loved it also. Picture quality was great!  Color was fabulous!
This movie is a classic and one of the first movies I remenber have seen In my ilfe.
BEAUTIFUL.  One of my favorite Disney classics preserved for the ages.
Fast shipping. I love this movie and so do my kids. I bought it for movie night. They were happy I bought it for our collection.
the vhs tape was excellent.it played under perfect condition and no mishaps.even played in 20-30 year old vhs vcr! thanks
This has always been one of my favorite Disney movies. Hope my grandchildren will enjoy them as much. Thank you
I love my bambi movie so cute and all kids would love this movie I know I loved it the best all the animals in this movie are so cute
This movie is a must have for any DVD collection.  Children and adults can enjoy this movie over and over again.
For the grandchildren, and of course for me to remember happy, unencumbered, and peaceful years.  Disney was at his best then.
I am so glad I purchased this.  It brought back a lot of memories of seeing it in a theatre for the first time.
Childhood memory favorite, really enjoyed seeing it again and having it bring back many fun and happy memories of my youth!
The DVD was new in package and the product was well packaged for shipping, arrived in excellent condition.  Transaction went through well.
Great movie for all ages. Don't remember it being so sad when I was younger haha! It will always be a classic!
I'm a big fan of Disney movies and was surprised to find and original Bambi in the eggshell case. Thanks.
It's just as cute as I remembered as a kid and with the combo pack we can watch it at home or in the car.
our 2 year  granddaughter loves this movie, she just sits and watches it., she love the music and all the little animals
Bambi has been a childhood favorite since the 1950s.  I will collect all the Disney classics for our Grandchildren when they visit.
Disney has so many classics that at times, it can be difficult to list only one favorite.  Enjoy this great throwback.
Classic!! It has always been a classic movie for any Disney collection! We could not go without it!! The disc worked great too!
I bought this movie for my great granddaughter. for a 4 year old she sat there. and enjoyed it. thanks again
I love it, it shipped quickly and it was what was promised. Bought it on Saturday got it on Wednesday.
It is so nice to be able to pass down the movies that I loved growing up to my children. Great quality, no complaints here.
This is a wonderful addition to your Disney library of DVD's for those rainy days.  It's a sweet story beautifully portrayed.
Its Disney!!! Whats not to love?! I have almost every Disney animated movie ever made. If you love Disney this is a must have!!!
A Wonderful Family All Time Classic, it is timeless and is loved by children and adults. Would be hard to be a deer hunter after watching this movie
Disney classic on DVD.  What does one write that hasnt already been written.
Always breaks my heart but then the rain song plays and I remember why I love this movie. Still charming and wondrous after all these years.
This was Walt Disney's favorite feature he made. This is certainly one of the very best Disney features ever made.
I adore this movie. This is one of the few Disney classics, young and old can enjoy it. Took me back to being a kid again.
A great movie for all ages!! Very nice classic movie! The way Disney made movies.  Very nice and clean and no hidden meaning, out there in the open.
I loved this movie when i was a child, and i am 26 now.  My children love the movie too!
Excellent DVD.  My grand-daughter simply loves it.  You just can't beat Disney.  I highly recommend this product.
Brings back the joys of my 1950s childhood.  To witness all 7 of my grandkids spellbound by this incredible piece of art is a dream fulfilled!!
This movie brings back such good memories of our childhood!  Our children and our grandchildren are enjoying this movie with us!
What a truly great classic Disney movie.  I can't help but cry when Bambi's mom is shot.  Bring a box of Kleenex!
classic Disney movie that every kid would love. it takes every adult back to there childhood, it's a classic Disney movie.
Another wonderful film that I have the VHS; the DVD is a great &#34;upgrade&#34; (especially the combo CD and BluRay).
This is so sweet...a must have!!!
This is such a beautifully animated, classic movie. I got it for my almost-2-year-old brother, and he shows some interest in it.
The movie is really funny, and even though the story is highly improbable, it is enjoyable.
This is a very cute movie.  It is perfect for children.  I enjoyed this as a child, and wanted to watch it again.
great disney movie, fun and great actors. a movie that is family friendly, with no violence or bad langage. very kids friendly
One of my favorite stories growing up.  I was so happy to find it on DVD I had it on VHS.
Would recommend this to any young girls and is just another great Walt Disney Movie - Any body would like it
This was purchased as a gift for my wife, who is very happy with the material.  We had the VHS, but the quality of the DVD is improved.
I have enjoyed watching the dvd and shipping was once again very fast.Thank you.
By far my favorite Hayley Mills movie...with the drama, action, and romance.  It's fantastic.
Going back to my teen years, re-watching movies starring one of my favorite actresses, Hayley Mills. Trying to find them all to add to my collection.
I read the book first and the movie did it justice.  Hayley was charming as ever and I don't thing I have ever seen a bad movie she was in.
WE used to have it on VHS but the tape broke and we wanted it on DVD.  It is a cute movie.  Haley Mills movies are always good.
It came quickly and well packaged.  Great film from childhood.  Now we are sharing it with the next generation...  Highly recommend.
Totally entertaining - kept our interest all the way through.  Beautiful scenery of the Greek Isles. Enjoyable for the whole family.
Anolther great movie by disney and hayley mills as she become an adult from a child actor. . . .
This is a great movie for the family. It is very much suitable for younger children to watch as well as adults.
I ordered this as a gift and it definitely hit the mark.  Lots of Laughs and fun for the whole family.  Product arrived quickly too.
I have loved this movie since it first came out. It has Tim Allen. What's not to love? Good move for the family.
I love movies with Tim Allen & this movie is no exception & price was great 2 thanx. I love amozons it's great 4 quolity & rice.
As a 30 year old, the enjoyment of this movie is probably mostly some sort of nostalgia taking over, but who cares, this movie is hysterical.
Good movie. Suitable for all ages. Funny. It would be a good addition to any ones movie library. Like movies? Get it.
I watched this with my kids they really really really love it I hope everyone can share this together be blessed!!!
This is a great movie.  My boys loved it when they were younger and they still love it now grown!
It is very cute movie and my kids like it very very much. Tape plays very good too and thank you!!
Be careful showing this to children because it is very entertaining for adults there are a few things in the film not suitable for children.
Grandson for some reason  wore out the old DVD we had. Was unable to find at video store. Reasonable and works great.
This show is hilarious to watch.  Our grand kids practically roll on the floor laughing. Really recommend this one for the family.
This is a great movie. Good, clean, silly fun.  Good for the whole family.
This is a good movie for my grandchildren.  They find it entertaining and choose it fairly often.  The price could have been a little cheaper.
Gotta love Brendan Fraser! Ever since this movie came out I have always loved it! It may be super cheesy but its still a really good family movie!
I really enjoy the dvd, its wondeful, i would definetly recommend it to anyone who enjoys George Of The Jungle.
If anyone could play George of the jungle, it is Brendan Fraser.  Cartoons don't always move into live action with success, but this one does.
This is just a fun, silly movie.  It is family friendly with just enough imagination that all can watch it.
We and our kids like movie which is cute and fun and DVD is good condition. Thank you & have a nice day!!
I bought this as a gift for my daughter. We love the movie, paid a good price for it and received it right on time.
The recurring theme of the human raised by animals of the jungle.  George of the Jungle is a comic striation of that.  Funny and enjoyable.
Movie was great. kept our grand-childre laughing through-out the movie.  They even continue talking about it after it was over.
I like Pocahontas II: Journey to a New World. It's a good movie. I don't like the fact that Ratcliffe is back though.
a must have to your collection if you have the first movie. it is a gold classic and i hope it will be on blu ray
It's nice to have the continuation of the Pocahontas story. It was too long of a tale to be on one disk. Now we have the complete story.
Another delightful anima story, kids and adults should like this as an alternative to disney and pixarCharacters are cute
this was a great film and immossible not to love miyazaki hits another home run  with zany charaters and heart warming story
My 9-year-old daughter loves this DVD.  The animation is perfect for the story and the story line is excellent.  Definitely work watching.
Wonderful movie to add to your collection. Great kids movie and a classic. Also see Howl's Moving Castle and Ponyo.
This movie is one of my daughters favorite Anime movies. They just love the idea of a little girl being ability to travel with a broomstick.
A wonderful movie for all ages that shows how to believ in your self and the meaning of friendship.
It is boring to some but I just enjoy the simplicity I have seen almost all his other movies so maybe its a 5 rating out of respect.
This was a cute movie and good for the whole family.  Interesting story and characters and good animation.  Would recommend!
I loved this movie as a child, and am very happy to have a copy. It arrived quickly and was exactly as I hoped it would be.
This is a magical, creative, and entertaining movie. The cat in the movie is so funny. It's a must see.
Good story.  Fascinating artwork!  I'm glad I bought it. I also recommend Spirited Away and Howl's Moving Castle (by the same director).
We love the Studio Ghibli movies and this one is no exception. Our son (5) enjoys it a lot and so do we. Not loud or flashy but lovely :D
It proves you do not need villains or violence to make a great movie. It is entertaining, warm, and family friendly. Enjoy it many times over!
I saw this anime long time ago. I enjoy this story a lot.  I use to have but sold it. Now I went out and pick one up.
My son tells me it was a really good storyline.  He really enjoyed it and it was a really great movie.
This is a delightful movie as appropriate for adults as it is for children! It has magic, adventure, and a nice life lesson.
Haley Mills is always fun to watch. Burl Ives brought back memories when he sang &#34;The Ugly Bug Ball&#34;.....way too cute!
Saw this movie as a child and enjoyed it. I thought it was just as good if not better now.
This is a great movie I hope some one gets it for me this one is for my youngest.  super
It's a cute movie with Haley Mills.
Hayley Mills was such an incredible addition to the Disney Family. This movie was no exception and sure to please.
This movie is fluffy to the nth degree but I LOVE IT! Disney at its best!!! A relaxing, old-fashioned story and who can resist Burl Ives??
I enjoyed this show with my grandchildren.  The G rating made it very nice for all of us with no one being uncomfortable or not getting the story.
I've loved this movie since the second grade. This is the way Disney movies were meant to be. Perfect. If I could give it more stars I would.
I love this movie it is so wonderful the actors are great and I would recommend this to anyone love it
This is a delightful charming, fun movie.  I enjoy it everytime I see it.
Haley Mills....awe....every girl should be exposed to her movies.  She was/is and will always be great!!!  Now one of my kids favorites!
Good vintage video for a gift to our granddaughter and her family.  Saw many years ago and remembered it again.
We have it on VHS but wanted it on DVD.  This is one of my favorite movies of Haley Mills.  Pollyanna is still number one and this is #2.
The movie had good songs and a pretty decent storyline. Another one of Hayley Mills delightful movies she starred in.
g'daughter love it
This movie is charming.  It's cute and clean.  It's got humor, it's got music, it's got young Hayley Mills.  Highly recommend it for families.
I wouldn't have ordered it if I didn't want to see it. A nostalgic fave as there is nothing else worth watching nowadays on tv.
The Barefoot Executive is a great movie.It is funny and has some great actors we are all familiar with. Love it.
The end drags out a little, but this is one of the really great Disney movies, with a great, and very satirical, premise.
This will make just about anyone ball like a baby.  Acting was wonderfully done and deserving of the multiple Oscars it won.
This is an excellent Movie which is well acted and written. The sets and scenery are what you would expect from a Movie of this caliber.
Excellent transfer of a well made film. Lotsa extras. A most enjoyable David Lean-like epic romance. Terrific value. I highly recommend this.
I like this movie a lot, but if you are someone who does not have much patience, maybe it's not for you.
I try to make it a point if purchasing movies to buy oscar winners, this was an exceptional movie! A must see!
Scenery spectacular, actors outstanding, and a love story (2 love stories actually) convincing and moving. A joy to watch again and again.
a favorite film; I watch it at least once a year
What a great story and fabulous acting.  Ralph FIennes is a favorite of mine.  This is a classic movie that will endure forever.
If you don't cry like a little girl while watching this movie, you don't have a soul.  The cinematography is breathtaking as well.
The Apple Dumpling Gang is very entertaining, wholesome and worth watching again and again.  Good story, good actors and good family entertainment.
This is another of the excellent movie category, and makes for a good afternoons entertainment. A great kids movie.  Thanks, Bobby Jack.
An old favorite, rediscovered in HD.  Such a fun revisit to my youth.  Love this movie and was so thrilled to see it again.
This cute movie has been making us laugh for years. And now I watched it with my grand kids. We loved it. God bless.
Perfectly captured movie. Don knotts is Hilarious. I would highly recommend it to anyone. Childreen of all ages will love it.
I recommend The Apple Dumpling Gang for families who wanta fun time together. A great clean family fun time movie.
This is my husband's favorite movie. It takes him back to a simpler time when he did not have to worry about the world.  We both love it.
This movie is much funnier than the sequel. It's enjoyable for the whole family and the extras include bio-info on the actors.
I order video's from Amazon quite frequently and am always satisfied with their quality.
Watched this many years ago.  I like all the actors and purchased the movie for entertainment value and for the nostalgia value.
one of the old greats, very enjoyable and very thankful to find it after all of these years. didn't even know it existed.
Video came fast in good shape.  A fun movie for the entire family.  Great humor and great acting.  You will watch it over and over
one of disneys funniest movies don knotts did a great acting in it.he is so funny. a must for your collection
Funny. Adventurous. Crime doesn't pay, but crime skills save a life. No cussing. No using God's name in vain. Real crooks get punished.
One of the Great Variations on an old Book: The Ransom of Red Chief.... . . . . . .
Because I saw it on T. V. and laughed all the way through. It keeps my spirits up. I loved it
IT IS IN GOOD CONDITION IN MAILING.  IT MADE US LOTS OF LAUGH!!!!  NOW DON KNOTTS AND DARREN MCGAVIN WERE GONE.
vey good copy of movice and still as funny as it was the first time i sqw it.  don knots always funny
A Disney family classic, this is a great DVD for both boys and girls.  A must-have addition to your DVD collection.
I received this days before I expected it to arrive.  This was great.  My son will be so excited on Christmas.
What's not to like about Peter Pan?!?!?  My son loves watching this movie and this is the one I remember as a kid!
all kids love this classic story. it's fun for everyone in the family, nothing scary and nothing to give the little ones nightmares
Factory sealed upon arrival and still cheaper than at walmart.  This was a great buy, I'm glad I waited and bought online.
I was happy to watch Peter Pan again as an adult. What a great movie to show your friends and family.
A DISNEY GREAT, NOT MUCH MORE TO SAY HERE. BOUGHT IT FOR A GOOD PRICE,  AND I KNOW WITH MY 4 YEAR OLD WE WILL WATCH IT MANY TIMES.
This movie is so great. It's a classic. My boys have been dancing around and singing the songs the Indians sang.
Peter Pan is delightful...I saw it with Mary martin when it was first produced and it just gets better - also got copies for all of my grandchildren.
I purchased last year when it came out the 2 disc version. I never rated it. Great quality and clear picture!
One of the first Disney movies I can recall seeing, back in the day, still LOVE it ! I'll never grow up too !
Great edition! Peter Pan now available on Blu-ray for second time! Three-Disc Diamond Edition: Blu-ray/DVD + Digital Copy. Check it out!
I bought PETER PAN as a gift for my five year old grandson. It's his favorite movie. Lots of adventure and not too scary.
I enjoyed watching Peter pan as a kid and I still do. I love nana in the story and It's a walk down memory lane.
My wife and I are getting ready to have a baby boy.  When I saw this movie I just had to have it.  thanks amazon
for the entire family. I've loved this movie since I was a kid and was so glad to own it on dvd.
I love all these disdney moves there great. I have a collection on VCR. Know I'm want to have them in DVD thank you
Purchased a number of the classic Disney videos for my grandson and as you would expect they are great.
This is one of my favorites from my child hood and it looks wonderful. The Package should have been  a book packaging.
My son and his father are obsessed with this movie. I think I have seen it over 100 times. Thanks
I used to watch it as a child.  Now my son watches it.  It is a great classic movie to have for your Disney Collection.
I have really enjoyed the movie and am glad to own such a great work in my collection. Get it.
All our four grandkids love it. It is a timeless story. One of Disney's classics. I would recommend it to anybody with kids/grandkids.
Definately worth the price. one of Disney's best movies, but the lack of musical scenes hurts the almost perfect picture.
We love the stories of Peter Pan. It was new sealed and no damage. I appreciated the honest price. Thank you.
This was such a terrific movie!Great classic treasure to have.  I enjoy watching this with my son!Thanks so very much!
The children love the video. They havent stopped watching the video&#62; the digital copy is the best part. Works well with Apple TV.
We played this item for our grandchilren while we in the car [on the back seat DVD player system of course] going to and from WDW.
STILL LOVE THIS MOVIE!  It's an absolute favorite and I still enjoy watching it.  Entertaining, exciting and so much fun.
Wanted a dvd copy for my library before it goes back in the disney vault, one of my disney faves
its great if you love the classics my daugher really enjoys watching this and the picture is better than the VHS im used to.
A Disney Classic to be enjoyed by all. A must for children. The magic of a good story to be shared over and over. A timeless tale
A true disney classic, Peter Pan is a fantastic film! Great for all ages and I couldn't be happier I bought it.
How can you grow up with Disney, as I have, and not love Peter Pan. I bought this to expand my collection.
I love that my kids get to use their imaginations and play make believe after watching this movie! Such a great movie!
LOVE that I finally found a good price on Peter Pan DVD edition, looked a long for it, everyone loves to borrow it.
One of my childhood favorites, now in great quality image and sound. All disney's remasterized versions of their movies are absolutely outstanding
Bought this as a Christmas gift and the little girl was excited over it.  You can't go wrong with Peter Pan.
It was so fun to watch this again as an adult with my grandson. We both enjoyed it to the fullest. Great seller and shipped quickly. Thanks.
This is one of the most wonderful movies for kids and grown ups, lots of adventures and fun, one of the classic Disney's masterpieces ,a must own.
this three disc set is great.  the image quality is amazing and the sound is superb.  Thank you Mr. Disney.
Peter Pan is my all time favorite Disney classic.  I have also given it as gifts to friends with kids.
Although not my favorite Disney movie, i was very glad to add this to my collection! It has a great picture and tons of extra features!
This is karl metzler's son one of the best disney movies ever this is my favorite disney movie. My family love's this movie
You can't go wrong with Disney animation. The VHS format completed my existing set. This is a wonderful fantasy story
I Love Classic Disney Movies... Peter Pan is sooo good, I Love it! and I love Tinkerbell! Shes awesome! great Movie!
Ordered this for my son so he can have some old school Disney movies for when he gets older. Obviously it's an awesome product.
I GREW UP WITH PETER PAN AND REALLY ENJOYED IT.  THIS IS GREAT FOR FAMILY NIGHT OR ANY NIGHT.  A MUST HAVE.
Arrived on time, Great condition as always, I've loved Peter Pan since I was a little girl. Im happy to have to share with my 5 year old boy.
Best movie ever! Loved it as a kid and then my kids and now enjoying it with the Grandkids! Love it!
Peter pan is a wonderful Disney movie classic. Definitely a movie to have in your Disney collection or movie library.
My grandchildren (okay, me too) thoroughly enjoyed this film.  The extras are informative and interesting for adults and children.
Very good movie, but must have seen another one as a child because it was definitely not the movie I remember. Great condition and arrived on time.
Well done - it's like watching it on the big screen.  Sound and graphics are great - It's now part of our collection.
Disney, Disney, Disney how do you change a classic?  Upgrade to DVD.
This was a Christmas purchase for my niece. She has a lot of Disney movies and this is a great addition to her collection.
This is a classic movie that every child should have. This was purchased for my granddaughter for Christmas this  year.
The movie arrived in great condition and perfect packaging.  I am buying all the vaulted movies for Christmas.  My kids will be surprised.
The movie is great as it always has been. Great classic Disney. Everyone should have this for their collection :)
My three year old is in love with Peter Pan.  This movie is his favorite and you can't go wrong with a classic.
Trying to fill my Disney library with DVD's and of course, Amazon has them. Very happy to have it.
I waited for this to be at a reasonable price, leave it to Amazon to get a good deal!  It will be added to my grand babies disney classic collections
Very well done - it brings back childhood memories from long ago.
This movie is hands down my favorite Disney classic. Something about Peter Pan sparks imagination in EVERYONE, regardless of age.
This is a classic.  I loved it as a little girl and my children love it too.  It is fun and funny and magical.  A Disney classic at it's best.
Love the story of peterpan. This edition has great pict quality. Enjoyed it very much. The extras are very interesting.
This is a great DVD. There was nothing wrong with the product at all. My family loves this movie. Thnk u!
I've been a Peter Pan fan since childhood. When it became available on blue-ray I had to add it to my collection, replacing my other copies.
Relaxing, enjoyable, fun and tells a  meaningful story with great taste.  loved it a great deal. very nice old fashioned ideals.
It`s great!!! I love that it has the spanish track also for muy baby. Great buy!!!
What can I say??? I am a sucker for the classic Disney cartoons and always will be  one of the diehards.
Bought this for my daughters, as it was one of my favorites as a kid, and they love it as much as I did :)
This has always been a favourite you just cant beat the classics they are time less and need to be watched over and over
A favorite of my daughter's family, this movie holds the attention of two grandkids,their parents and the granparents. Great Friday night movie.
The DVD arrived in great condition and came to me in the time frame suggested. Now the family can enjoy it.
The DVD was perfect. I love this movie. Reminds me of the time I saw it as a little girl and I wanted my granddaughter to watch it as well.
I was very happy with the product, was as described and a wonderfull addition to my collection of Disney movies.Thank you!
Peter Pan is a great movie. For young and older. I being 23 still enjoy watching it from time to time.
Peter Pan like you've never seen him before! I'm so glad Disney is releasing all of the classics on blu ray with bonus features.
It is very funny movie!! Our children likes it and tape plays good too. Thank you so so much & have a nice day!!
Robin Williams ... What more needs to be said...funny at times, manically weird and entertaining.  The grand kiddies like it.
Fun and excitement throughout the movie.This will be part of a Christmas give along with the original Disney classics starring Fred McMurray.
I love this movie. When I got the DVD, the box and disc were in great condition and the movie was great.
Robin Williams nearly always seems to be very funny when he wants to.  The movie was in great shape and it was good.
Always loved this movie when it first came out...good family movie to watch plus Robin Williams was funny in it
AWSOME FUNNY KID AND FAMILY SHOW 100%
it was great to me and it was funny to me as well it was wonderful to me as well.
One of my favourite Disney movies along with Aladdin, Beauty and the Beast and The Lion King. Lives up to expectations
I was the luckiest kid to find this movie dubbed in italian on this website. I watched it and it was a blast.
I am such a Disney fan and to get this now was great. I feel as if I saw it for the first time!!1
We love watching this movie at home with the kids. It never gets old and they can't wait to watch it over and over again.
This classic Disney film has been restored to a unbelievable level of clarity and sound.  If you liked the original in theatres, you will love this!
another clasic must have seen it as a KID and loved it so another one to add to my collection
This was purchased at the request of my beloved grandchild.  She watches it all the time. Another Disney classic. It's a beautiful movie.
Little Mermaid was always a favorite as a kid, and a must buy for any Disney collection for adults or children.
Good hearted movie and adorable under the sea characters. Clean entertainment for the whole family!
Watched this in HD with family and grand baby and loved it!  The picture is so sharp and clear versus old VHS or DVD.  HD/Bluray is the way to go!
What can you say?  A disney classic.  A little much for little kids, until they are able to handle it.  But the songs and characters are great.
I loved this movie as a child and still as an adult and I have a child of my own and she loves it too alot than a DVD and cannot scratch a vhs
Love this Disney classic!  So glad it is finally available on blu-ray!  This is a keeper for generations to come!
this dvd l got for my daughter,she loved it.lve already pre-ordered the new version for her highly recommend this dvd for everyone.
This is my all time favorite Disney movie. I made my kids watch it and now I can share it with my grand children. It's the best!
Disney hit gold with The Little Mermaid, a charming, beautifully awesome film that is up there as one of the best animated films of all time!
I buy movies all the times and love to see good deals on the especially classics - I watch this with my daughter
This movie was great when it first came out and it's even better as a Diamond Edition! Totally recommend it!
A masterpeice of animation - and one of the greatest - most essential love stories ever.  Must see.Her name is Ariel. Remember that.
This video has been seen by my Grandaughter at least 50 times - It is a classic - I never tire of it either.
A great movie typical of Disney, the good and the bad of life that makes a hero.  I liked it and I hope my Grandchildren do as well
AWESOME animation! A beautiful mermaid! enchanting music and memorable characters. Ariel is truly the best! A must for your Disney collection. A+++++
I loved it when i bout it for my kids now i am bout for my grandouthers. and they love it
I love this movie and my son (yes son) who loves fish and water gets lost in the excitment as well. This was a great buy, great quality and value.
What a classic! And who doesn't love this movie?! Had to grab it before it went back into the vault again.
I love this movie. The songs and animation are super. My favorite Disney ever.
This is a great movie, has  lots of cute sea creatures.My grandson loved it.Recommend it for your collection.
One of my favorites. Sabastian if my favorite character. This is an Awesome Disney movie. I am also going to purchase The Little Mermaid 2.
I liked and highly recommend it for all kids and disney fans.  The movie is one of disney's best film to see.
Happy with the product and most especially happy with fast shipping and handling.  Thank you.
I love the Little Mermaid. It was may favorite movie as a little kid and when it came out on Blu-ray it was a no brainer.
My sister just loves this movie so much, i decided to purchase this for her as a gift. she loved it
Who doesn't love this movie. It captures the teenage spirit exactly. It's a cute movie with good songs to sing with.
Thank you so very much!I LOVE this cute and musical classic, and I'm so happy I can enjoy it with my son!GREAT in every way!
Otro regalo para mi esposa ya es parte de su coleccion de dvd's.
I gave my original to a little girl who never saw this classic.  Finally replaced it in my library.  One of my favorites.
The price was great. Video new as promised. Condition was excellent.  Digital copy works with iTinues and other media. Blue ray extras are great
I love the little mermaid. This is the diamond edition. Love the extra footage.. My grandchildren really enjoying this movie.
One of my favorite disney characters is Ursula the Sea Witch!  Wanted this on dvd before the mermaid went back in the disney vault
This movie is a classic and was worth every penny! I was so happy to find this movie for such a good price.
One of my kids favorite and now, one of my grandkids favorite.  Great movie to enjoy with adults and children
I bought it for my grandchildren and they are enjoying watching it! I highly recommend it for children and adults!
Someone stole mine. I never thought I would be able to find one in the original case. Thanks to you my collection is complete.
came quick, priced ok, was cute and made great christmas gift for lil girl, great quality and was very happy
Every little girls fantasy. To live in the sea and also fall in love with a prince. Excellent DVD
They are so happy that Grammy got this movie for them to watch when they are at our house.  It is just beautifully done.
WAS IN GREAT SHAPE AND REALLY ENJOYED IT EVEN THOUGH IT WAS A OLDER MOVIE THE TRACKING ON IT WAS GREAT
This is one of manny great disney movies ever I like how they used Alissa Milano for Ariel face it is great
I got this movie for my granddaughter and they watched it.  it is a good movie with underwater grafics.good buy
The staff at CHOC requested this film to show to the kids when they are hospitalized. The girls love it.
A great deal on an absolute classic, this is a must buy. We absolutely love the little mermaid and were so happy to have it finally out on bluray.
This movie is a good. It is a family movie. I bought this to finish my collection of Little Mermaid. Highly recommend
Great!  My Granddaughter loved the movie.  It seems wonderful that these movies go from generation to generation.  I enjoy also.
No resemblance to the little statue in Copenhagen's harbor, but a great tale and one of Disney's best, I think.
My daighter loves this movie!
This movie is just as wonderful as when it first came out, will be a great addition to our movie collection.
My grand daughter already has this movie I'm just updating it to blue-ray for her.  I hope she will notice the difference!
So happy with this 3 disc Diamond edition - great for any Little Mermaid fan out there, young or old :)
Love this movie!!! So glad that it we re-released. Happy that I can now watch with my children. :) :)
I love this movie. The color is a bit distorted but still watchable. My daughters have been watching this movie for days.
Purchased for my 6 year old daughter. The Little Mermaid is classic and I am happy to add it to our collection.
A favorite movie from my childhood, and I'm glad to finally see it on Blu-ray. So glad Disney re-released it! :)
Love this movie; it is one of the best classics from Disney. I can't wait my child to enjoy it as much as I do
Have seen the little Mermaid since my 28 yr old daughter was young.  I bought this for my granddaughter.  Great movie for all ages!
We were quite surprised to find that this was a platinum edition at this price.  A very good value item.
my mini loves this movie just like I did when i was growing up. you can never go wrong with this disney classic
I love this movie and it is wonderful to watch on the big screen.  The Diamond Edition definitely is clearer.
Every little girl needs to have her own copy of the great movie.  My grand-daughter loves it and will sit and watch it over and over.
Love it, A fave movie of mine. Perfect condition and can enjoy for a long time with my grandkids one day!
It was a little hard to be sure from the description if this was a DVD or Blu-Ray and it was in fact Blu-Ray.worked just like it was supposed to.
Beautifully remastered and the 3D put a major boost in the likings, brought back some memories. Disney has not failed :)
An upgrade to DVD.  Wonderful movie to watch, beautiful coloring and music.  Ariel can sing the pants off a crab.
You want thing-a-ma-bobs?  This movie is dope.  Ariel seems cool.  I'd love to have her over for a barbeque and just politic with her.
SAMR CHILD AND PARENTS COMMENTSI GUESS THE WHOLE FAMILY ENJOYED IT BECVAUSE OF THE FEED BACK I GOT FROM THE PARENTS,
Disney movies are awesome and I loved this one growing up and was excited to get a good deal on its release!
It is a children's classic.  My girls loved it.  The animation is what is expected of Disney.  A fun and visually rich movie.
purchased this dvd for a family member and they simply love it.  Disney should continue to make movies like this.
The characters are amazing! You will sing a long with the great songs.Sebastian the crab is hilarious! You will love it :)
Really great songs and a perfect story for both kids and adults.  This one will be a long term favorite.
had it on vhs... glad it came out of Dvd the vhs was about worn out
very colorful and good story line.  my favorite characters were sebastian and the seagull
One of our favorites. We have been waiting for this movie to be released again to add to our Disney collection.
A DISNEY CLASSIC MY DAUGHTER HAS BEEN CRAVING FOR MANY YEARS.  PIXAR IS HER 1ST CHOICE OF MOVIES BUT I HAVE TO BUILD UP HER DISNEY CLASSICS FOR HER.
bought this to have if i ever have grandkids...my kids watched it when they were young..and i want my grandkids to see it as well
Always enjoyable.
this is my favorite movie off all time I recommend it to anyone and your never to old to believe and dream
bought this on black Friday as a gift for my wife.  she loved this movie as a kid and the blu-ruy copy looks great
For my granddaughter - she has watched it on tv over and over. Good movie for children's entertainment. Excellent Christmas gift.
I've seen this movie 100 times at least.  BLU RAY COMES OUT IN THE FALL OF 2013!!!!!  YAY!!!!!!!  FLOUNDER IS SO CUTE!!!!!!
I love this movie - it is one of my favorite Disney animated movies.  This is my niece's favorite movie character - She still loves Ariel.
Not all that much to say.  Every one knows the movie.  If you like it then buy it here. Made the wife happy
quality blu-ray remastering. colors looks great, lossless audio is clear and encompassing. brought back good memories.Get it. It's worth it.
Little Mermaid: Diamond Edition [Blu-ray] is a classic Disney that must be in any ones library. Got it at a great price.
This delightful favorite is actually enhanced by the skillful 3-D rendering. It gives a new edge to a very delightful film.
I love this movie  and good one DVD and love it and is my favorite since little thanks for bring it to dvd
If you love the Little Mermaid this is a good addition to your disney movies especially to see them in High quality.
Anyone who has a bad thing to say about the Little Mermaid is evil, though and through. Sweet as pie and twice as great. have to love it.
this movie is the best classic ever! its so sweet and loving and fun. i love the little mermaid. the music is good too
Good quality and purchased as a gift.  Nice to be able to purchase VHS tapes for those that still have a vcr.  shipping time was also good.
This is a classic and my granddaughter wants to collect them all for her future children to enjoy (as well as her renewed enjoyment now)
I love this movie, it's fun and engaging. The quality it pretty good. It's not HD but it still looks nice.
We saw the musical together and she just HAD to have this.  Hard to find in stores.  It's a nice set and she loves the movie.
great movie for the kids for todays kids yip with the combo standard good to enjoy with the kids 2 see..................
Great movie. Had a family Movie night and this was a total hit. Would highly recommend! My kids wanted to watch it again and again!
this has always been my faVE fairytale! i love it! another outstanding of the meaning of true love conquers all!
This is my favorite Disney movie from childhood. I love watching it now and feel the same love that I did for this movie when I was little.
This DVD was in very good condition, it had a slight scratch but it did not affect the viewing quality.
Had to get a new one to replace the other one that the granddaughters had worn out, they love it.
My grandkids loved it. They watch it over and over and over again...which may or may not be a selling point.
This is my favorite movie. The HD restoration was wonderful. So happy to have this in HD digital to enjoy.
This is a TRUE CLASSIC that has been beautifully remastered.  The animations and colors are stunning.  This is a MUST HAVE!
the little mermaid is a great Disney movie, every kid will love this, as well as the adults, buy it.
Have loved this movie since my older kids were born.  I'm now enjoying it with the my granddaughter.  This will never stop being a great movie!
I love this movie, and I'm so happy it was available on here. It works great. I would definitely get it again.
One of the best Disney Movies.  It is always perfect when the adults can enjoy the movie as much as the children.
My daugher asked for this for Christmas and I purchased it as her gift.  She loves this movie and is adding it to her collection
It wasn't you i just don't have alot of money right now to buy it or i would. But this movie is really good.
Love Kirstie has always been a favorite of mine.  She does not disappoint in this family friendly movie.  Highly recommend!
I was thrilled to find this movie.  It is great entertainment for all.  Brought back memories of when my children were young.
Got the DVD in great shape and really fast.  All my kids had to watch was the VHS copy and that copy was getting old, great to get it on DVD.
Toothless is a great movie for the whole family. It will make everyone,no matter how old or young laugh. I definitely give it two thumbs up!
Our whole family loved this film (ages 4, 6, 8, 10, 48, & 58).We highly recommend it!
It's a pretty cute story and i liked the angels in it.  I like happy endings.  It has a pretty good caste of characters in it.
A good fantasy movie for the whole family to watch and enjoy together. Love Christopher Lloyd, such a good actor
I LIKE THIS MOVIE. THIS IS A GREAT MOVIE. THIS IS A GREAT FAMILY MOVIE; I WOULD RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO ANYONE WHO ENJOYS WALT DISNEY MOVIES!!!!!
Dude, it's Old Yeller.  How can it not get 5 Stars.  Anyone who gives it less is, well, un-American or something.
this is one of disneys great classics
loved this classic thank you grandma for having it for me to watch and fall in love with it and the story
Hard to find movies that are old to watch or buy. So it streamed well with the rental purchase.Enjoyed it fully.
I watched with the kids and they loved it!! I have not seen this movie since I was a child! A must see and good family movie!
Have always loved this movie....the story of a boy and his devoted dog.... lots of laughs and some tears but still one of the great disney classics
this is a great old time movie that the whole family can enjoy. it was made by disney and is really well done.
What can I say...The greatest movie ever...Tell me you didn't cry when Old Yeller was shot!A Classic...
It is a old movie but still enjoy it even older. would recommend it any ages will see it again soon.
The location. The scenery. The kids. The dog. A feel-good story. And it's based on true events. Great for all ages.
The blu-ray of the classic movie is crisp and gorgeous! Probably better than the original in theaters! Love the special features, too!
Disney knows just how to put it in a Movie.  Kids and Adults love their movies.
Great price for the combo pack.  The extras were actually reallly interesting and my daughter even likes to watch them.
I chose this rating because I like the Lady and the Tramp DVD. Trusty is funny because he won't admit that he's lost his sense of smell.
like i said before thease i saw as kid and stood with me now as an adult i can buy them and enjoy them when evri like by my self or with family
Yeah, it's Disney at its best.  What more can be said about this classic?  Not much.  You'll laugh, you'll cry.
My grandchildren and I love this movie, we have watched it several times on family movie nights. We love Disney movies.
This movie is the best. It is one of those moviesthat says that nothing should stand in frontof you for the one you love
Just as I remembered it with my son (now 42)and enjoyed equally with my grandkids (3 & 5)
A classic that I enjoyed when I was a child that I can now enjoy with my own children. Good clean fun!
When this movie first came out we went to the theatre to see it. It was precious and entertaining then it still is today.
I LOVE TO WATCH IT OVER AND OVER AGAIN. IT  ENGULFS YOUR HEART OF FANTASY, BRINGSTHE CHILD IN YOU, NO MATTER YOU AGE ! VERY ENJOYABLE FOR ALL AGES.
Lady and the Tramp is one of my favorite movies. It's so sweet. Love the Italian resturant scene; it was so romantic
It's a Disney collective. I would define lay recommend it to anyone that loves Disney movies. It's too cute for words a Five Stars.
One of my favorite Disney movies that I wanted to add to my collection on Blu-ray Disney movies that I enjoy.
I must've bought this for the kids some time ago. I think they like it. As long as it's suitable materials, then that's fine by me.
Great movie, beautiful transfer. It has a number of neat extras. A movie that both a girl and a boy can watch and not fight over
Mom & the kids love this movie & watch it every once in a while when they're not watching Pokemon & Beyblade..
the sound and quality of lady and the tramp vhs disney is perfect!arrived in a week!thanks for everything!this movie is rare on vhs
It is a great stroy I loved this movie when I was a kid and its still awesome
i loved this move when i was a kid ! so now i buy it for my little ones.and now they love it to!
Walt Disney studios created this timeless classic for all ages! A charming story, with great characters and a lot of meaning~!  MUST OWN THIS!
IU saw it when it first came out and it is one of my favorites. I also enjoyed it more on Blu-ray.
I have wanted this movie for so long and thanks to amazon, I finally have it. Great prices and free shipping, you cant go wrong!
Love having blu ray & DVD.  One for the grand children's house & one for our house!  Enjoy watching one of my favorite movies with them.
Thank you very much for the movie! It's very new just like you go to the store to buy it. I will order anything from that person in the future!
Another delightful Disney movie that's enjoyable for children and all family memers.  You can't go wrong with this DVD.
I am so happy to be able to let my son view and enjoy this wonderful classic!Thanks very much!
MY WIFE'S FRIEND WANTED THIS FILM FOR HER GRAND KIDS.SEEN THIS WHEN I WAS A KID
I got this for my wife, but we both enjoyed it. Most Disney cartoon movies are good, but this one stands out.
this one of my favorite dvd i remember seeing this when i was young this a true classic in my book one of the best
I've loved this film since childhood! I had forgotten how fun and heart-warming it was. Now I can enjoy it anytime I want to.
I have never seen this movie look so good!!!Disney has done a great job on this one showing it in its real OAR.Totally recommend it!!!
got this for my son and his wife.. they love it... and so will there kids when they have them
This movie is a classic! I am so glad I was able to find it. I had done some price shopping and Amazon had the best price.  As usual.
This movie will never grow old.  For all your kids and grandkids ...And the &#34;KID&#34; in all of us !  Awesome !
I'm a big fan of this movie and wanted to add it to my family's Disney collection.  It is great for animal lovers and kids.
Really good movie. Great for al ages. One of those movies that you love after seeing it once. : )
So wonderful to watch Lady and the Tramp again. It's ageless and one of Disney's best. Great seller and shipped quickly.  Thanks.
This movie is awesome. It is a family movie. I bought this to finish my collection of Lady and the Tramp. Highly recommend
A very good movie for dog lovers. A classic that will last longer than the DVD.
This is a really cute movie. I bought it so that my grandchildren and I can watch a nice movie together.
Wonderful story, classic animation,  What's not to love. This was produced during the golden age. This heart warming tale was a must have for me.
This is a great family movie, great way to talk about relations, expectations and friendship! I like the moral of the story and embellish it.
This is the sweetest movie and really stands the test of time! I loved this movie growing up and my kids love it too!
This was a gift for my daughter and she loved it! Excellent pricing.Loved this classic.
Lady and the Tramp is a great movie for all and a must see for kids, I enjoyed it as much as when i first saw it.
First i got the wrong one, I let them know and they sent me a new one right away. I love diney movies and this one adds to them all.
Lady and the Tramp have been my favorite since I was a little girl, and now my 2 year old grandbaby is following in gramma's love for it!
I purchased this DVD for my 2 year old grandson and he loved the dogs!!Their animation excited him immensely!
such a sweet and cute film! We both love this film and the blue ray edition is so amazing!  We love it
Really? Review Lady and the Tramp? Come on - it's a classic. Great movie, great story, happy ending - what's not to like?
A great movie for kids, dog lovers, or just about everyone.  Beautifully animated and a sweet love story. I would recommond for all ages.
It is a great movie for kids becasue you can rest easy that there is no sexual content or curse words
I love this movie. It harkens back to more simpler time. I would recommend this movie to people of all ages; men and women, boys and girls.
vhs was about worn out.. glad we were able to get it on dvd
Love this old classic.  Added it to my collection so will have for my grandchildren, while it is in the Disney Vault.
A Disney classic if there ever was one!However!  I own a DVD of this film NOT the Blu-Ray version.  I own NO Blu-Ray discs in my collections.
Great price for this product and it works wonderfully.  Another classic for the family, it is an old film and my 3yr old loves it.
This is my daughter's favorite movie so far. The video quality is great and I couldn't have asked for anything better.
love cartoons that are cute and clean no stupid magic or witch craft or wizards like some supposed family or children movies
I'm a grandmother with almost grown grandchildren.  But this movie takes me back to my childhood and everyone needs a copy.
You will enjoy this age old classic.  Especially that spaghetti scene.  My grandkids adored this movie and it willstay in their collection.
what can you say? who doesn't love this movie!!!???  great gift for anyone who hasn't seen it!
This is a timeless movie that my daughter loved growing up and now my grand-daughter can have the same experience.
Growing up this was my favorite Disney movie and to this day it still is an excellent movie.
Loved this movie as a kids and wanted it for my kids. They loved it too.
I love all Robin Williams movies, but was a little set back when I saw previews.  I am so glad I bought it - one of my favorites.
A very good movie to watch with the family. Good performances by Robin Williams, Matt Damon, Ben & Casey Affleck and Skaarsgard.
Anyone who enjoys a good movie will like this movie.  It is an excellent movie overall and everyone I know who's watched it has liked it.
This has to be one of the best movies ever. Robin Williams plays a psychiatrist with a big heart and a passion for his field.
I don't have to say how good this movie was.  I could watch it all the time and never get tired of it.
My husband and I really enjoy this movie. It's very well done, and a lot of good actors. Lots of &#34;heart&#34; which is what we like in a movie.
One of the best movies for both Damon and the most serious for Robin Williams.  Touches on many thought provoking issues.
Love it forever and ever. This movie could possibly be too good, but I'm not sure yet so I'm going to watch it a few more times.
Great Story. Quality performances.A Movie That.I Will Watch Again And Probably A Third Time. Williams And Damon Are Great Together.
I loved this movie.Great cast, great screenplay.Best line:How do you like them apples!This movie rocks!
Every bit as good as everyone says it is.
This movie was very good and we bought it to replace the VHS tape.  Liked the story very much even the second time around.
I hadn't seen this in years, but there it was on my Kindle for free. So what the heck. Was it worth it? Yeah, it was.
Love Matt Damon and Robin Williams. This is a great movie, excellent subject matter. I love the part where Damon is talking to the NSA fools.
This is by far one of the best movies I have ever seen.  Definitely one of my all time favorites.
love it. love it.  This movie is a true classic. One of my go to movies of all times.  Highly recommend purchasing it.
Character development at it's best.  Written and on the screen. It draws audiences to see it and big name talent to be in it.
I loved this movie.  The acting, writing, directing - everything blended together superbly.  Lots of intense emotion.
Loved it! Good story, good actors, not particularly a Robin Williams fan, but i did like his character in this movie.
If you enjoy a good drama, this is a must see!You'll watch it over and over and over again!
Do not miss the opportunity to buy and watch this movie.  It has its sad moments and not recommended for kids under 16.
I can't think of a better movie.  Storyline is Excellent, acting is superb.
One of Matt Damon's better performances, and a movie I think everyone should watch at least once in their lives.
Powerful performances by two actors (Williams and Damon) as they forge a productive and meaningful relationship that impacts them BOTH.
Acting, story, script are great.  I've been watching it over and over.  Robin Williams, Matt Damon & Ben Affleck are great in it.
Everyone involved really played their parts well it was just one of those movies where everything was put into place and it was gold.
I love everything about this movie.  Great acting. Great story line. It is written so well. I am so glad to have my own copy of it.
Robbin Willias is always great and in this movies he plays the role of a psychologist who deals with &#34;Matt damon&#34; who is a genious.
matt damon one of my favorite actors as well as robin williams  great conbination never get tired of watching this movie  PAUL
so many feels.  This is a great free prime movie to watch.  Haven't seen it in years and it was better than I remembered it.
One of the best movies of our day.  Classic actors and scenes that will make owning this a common pick of movie night with the fam.  LOVE IT!
Watch this movie! You won't regret it and since my review is short you can start right away even today!
Tender, hard core but very good!  It's one of the best movies I own!  I highly recommend it if you are a Matt Damon fan!  It's great!
Naturally it deserves 5 stars -- otherwise I wouldn't be spending the $$ to replace the VHS!!Another great performance by Robin Williams!
Great movie.  To be enjoyed by all over 27.  Story about a genius with a lot of emotional issues to overcome.
I can't lily-gild here, the film is far too precious for that nonsense&#8230;just get it, see it and have your life enriched by it. Period.
I enjoy ordering items that can and will be a blessing to others  I am for sure that every person will enjoy a small gift of appreication.
Classic film, one of Robbin Williams last best films. Such a great movie to watch. I'd pair it with &#34;A Beautiful Mind&#34;
Arrived in the condition I had hoped it would. This movie is definitely among my favorites. Matt Damon and Robin Williams are great!
This movie makes you feel good. Eddie Murphy is delightful in this film. His comedy is clean and family friendly.
I find Eddie Murphy hilarious and this is another of his fun films.This movie is sort of like a &#34;Being There&#34;.
This movie touched me, I bought it to see it over and over again. I also love Abba music.
I purchased this to replace my old video of this movie. Such a great story for kids and adults alike.
A great film for young people.  It demonstrates how people who are different can make a difference.
One of the best movies i have ever seen! This is funny, Heart warming, sad and Inspirational, A Must watch Movie!
DVD arrived very quickly and was in great shape.  No complaints of any kind.
This is one of the most heart felt drama's I have ever seen. I loved it and it was in perfect condition.
This is such a great movie. When you watch this, have some tissues ready because you will need them. Great actors.
Hands down, one of my favorite all time movies!!  Do yourself a favor and just buy it...incredible movie, very touching.
Whole family enjoyed! There are a few tough moments but viewers are rewarded with a story that is fun and worth viewing.
Someone told me about this movie and I love it.  Good for company.  It's funny, sad, good message,  and makes you wonder and have more compassion.
It is a really cute mother and one of my Christmas lists had this item on it- Amazon usually has the best prices on movies!
This movie is just a great film from start to finish.Ashley Judd is the perfect mom,kinds like Ralphie's mom in a Christmas Story!
Great Purchase. This item was sent  tremendously speedy. Item was as described in description. Will recommend  to other people to purchase.
love this movie she ment for them not to get her kids she loved them so much and I love Beloved everybody should look at this movie
This is a great movie and the story line is wonderful and exciting. It keeps you on the edge of your seat.
Oprah! Oprah! I saw this when it first came out, and it still gets me now, just as powerfully. Amazing story.
I had this movie on VHS and really wanted to get it on DVD. Even my husband reminded me that I need to get it on DVD, great movie!
Simply loved it!!! Took me back remebering the first time I watched it when it first came out with my daughter...
A stirring and exciting movie, filled with passion and heart.  I was by far one of the best movies I've seen this year.
Helena Bonham Carter is outstanding as she makes this film work with interesting tones and twists.  The scenery is beautiful and the passion is hot.
This movie stars Elle McPherson. It also stars her left and right boobs. Special appearance by her butt. This movie has a great cast.
My mama say my mama say that the waterboy is one of the best movies Adam Sandler has made. Real talk
I had this movie and it got stolen but I am glad I got it on dvd now it was in good shape thanks it came really quick
Great Adam Sandler movie, a classic! And on Blu-Ray! Not necessary, but I like how sharp everything looks. ! !
Have loved this movie since the first time that I watched it !! Great story !!! Adam Sandler is always great !!!
Another great Adam Sandler movie! Would recommend it to anyone who enjoys a good laugh! We watch it a lot!
Price is reasonable, condition of the CD as well as the box is great and quality of the viewing is excellent.
this movie is so silly and dumb,it had me laughing to the very end of the movie.if you like Adam Sandler,this is your movie,he is very funny in this
This movie is always fun to watch. I had to make this movie part of my comedy collection. I had to have this movie in 1080p!
I like Adam Sandler he is very good in this movie not only funny but serious as well. If you like to laugh then this is the movie for you.
one of Sandlers best
Great movie for when I need a pickmeup! There are a couple of minor inappropriate scenes, but for the most part, it's great!
This is added to my crazy movie selection. thank you, I really love this movie and it's nice to be able to watch it whenever I want.
i rate this at 100%. this movie is is off the charts and i recommend this movie to any body. thank you
It arrived on time and in perfect shape.  Adam Sandler is great.  He is a very good actor and I loved the movie,  Thank You.
excellent condition excellent movie, kids love it. excellent price. better than vhs. I would recommend anyone I know to purchase this movie
I really enjoyed watching this movie, and plan to watch it again soon! Anyone who likes movies, will likeit too.
Always enjoyed &#34;My Favorite Martian.&#34; This movie is just as cute and fun to view. Recommend it anyone - family and friends.
This Is A Very Good Movie.I Enjoyed This Movie Very Much.I Suggest This Movie For Adults Dark.It Was Very Very Good.
This movie is worth the money paid, very entertaining, packed with action, blood and shootings. IMHO this movie is better than the first one.
We collected all the VHS tapes in back then for our children. They are play good & kids like them very much. Thank you & have a good weekend!
I think this is a must own dvd for anyone who loves winnie the pooh and more
Been wanting this movie for a long time.  I watch it over and over again.  Excellent condition.  Well worth the money.
A absolutely great movie. Julia Roberts and Richard Gere have an amazing on screen chemistry that make this movie a winner. A must see.
bought for my mom. she has Alzheimer's and is really enjoying watching the old classic movies! df dfd dfd dfd
I never will get tired of watching this old movie.  It is really fun and good for laughing a lot.
A feel good movie.  Julie Roberts is at her best.  I have watched this multiple times and it never gets old.
Love this movie!  I can watch it over and over.  The chemistry between Julia and Richard make is great and make it a very funny movie.
Excellent movie.  A must have movie if a fan of Richard Gere and/or Julia Roberts. A excellent story how two different individuals find love..
Please I love it another romance movie with a good storyjsut that real life your prince charming isnt there
It was wonderful and we really enjoyed watching it and will watch again at some point. My mother-in-law had never seen it
Now I don't have to worry about losing my DVD copy because its online and I can watch one of my favorite movies anywhere.
Packaging was sufficient to protect the DVD and the Bluray added to the quality of the film that I remembered.
What a beautiful movie, so sad I waited so long to watch it. One of my new favorites! Can't go wrong with a Romance movie :-)
Very good transfer to Blu-ray. Always a great plot and acting. One of those movies you can watch over and over! Highly recommend it.
I have watched this movie time after time and always get totally wrapped up in it.  The chemistry between Julia and Richard is so special.
Love this movie! It's a classic I would recommend this to all woman. Payed a good price for it too
Richard Gere and Julia Roberts are great in this film and it's easy to see how Julia Roberts became a star because of this movie.
I'm not really a Julia Roberts fan, but this was a present for my wife, and she loves it, so I am happy too !
This is the best pretty woman dvd out there.I like the orignal theater version which this is. All other Pretty woman dvd's have extra scenes in them
This is definitely a fun movie and the music is just great. I like the actors and will look at this movie whenever I need a pick me up.
We have loved this movie for years and I am so happy to add it to our movie collection.  I never tire of it.
I bought it for a gift. I think they really enjoy watching it. It was shipped in great time also.
That movie was at the top of my list to get so I can watch it again and again.  What a transformation for her.
This is a great movie! love the acting and story line! Watch it over and over again, never get tired of this one!
love julia and love richard. love them together. classic american romance. feel good and will stick with you after :)
I have to live vicariously through tall, slim, pretty women like Julia. This movie always makes me smile.
This movie will be remembered for ages as one of the best romances. Few pairs top the romance chart like Julia Roberts &amp; Richard Gere.
I've always loved this movie so when I found it on amazon for sale, I scooped it right up. This film never lets me down!
This is one of those movies that you can watch again and again!  Julia Roberts was a perfect choice for the female lead!  A classic!
I never get tired of this movie.  It is a classic that will move through the ages, and I am never unhappy after watching it!
I haven't seen in awhile. But, it is one of the best movies I've seen.Would suggest for all.Thanks, I appreciate!
I really like this movie.  I have watched it lots of times and it is good as the first time I saw it.  Blu-ray is even better.  Great price
i own this on VCR tape, and I thought some day my VCR will die, so I ordered the DVD, now I can watch it all the time one of my favorites
we are replacing some of our vhs movies with dvd's and thought enough of this one to buy a replacement.
My mom and I absolutely love this movie. So I bought it. And got it on blu-ray just to build my collection.
Can't miss - great music, Richard Gere, Julia Roberts, happy ending....And lots of fun! Holds up well over time and always makes you smile.
Pretty Women is a great movie what more can I say. always enjoy watching it.Richard Gere and Julia Roberts both play good parts in the movie.
What can I say about this movie! The Actors are all wonderful and they are all endearing! Classic fairy tale movie!
GREAT CHICK FLICK, THE CINDERELLA STORY WITH RICHARD GERE, WHAT MORE COULD YOU WANT??? -SMILE-
The whole movie is great, but I especially  love the first third of it when Vivian goes shopping and then goes out to dinner at the fancy restaurant.
I love this movie so much so I was very pleased to get it on blu-ray so I can watch it whenever I want. Great price, fast shipping, great seller.
I love love love love this movie. My all time absolute favorite growing up as a kid in the 80's.  I can watch this over and over again.
The best example of a Fariy Tale love story ever.Julia Roberts is brilliant in this movie.A must have for any collector.
A very good performance by both Julia Roberts and Richard Gere.  Would recommend it to all adult audiences.  Very cute movie.
Even after all these years, this movie is still great. The chemistry, the story line, great actors, it all works. Definitely a chick flick!  : )
What a combination of two great stars.  This one is one of my favorite movies.  It will make you laugh and cry.
After watching runaway bride, I just wanted to see Pretty woman again...It never fails to make me feel good even after all these years...
A classic.  Totally unrealistic.  But you have to love it anyway.  Romance, comedy, great clothes, Julia Roberts and Richard Gere.  A winner.
We love watching these old movies and TV shows.  They make us smile and take us away from our daily stress.
I watch this every couple of years, and each time it is as fresh, funny, poignant as the first time.
Will be a classic movie for years to come.  I never get tired of watching it.  The soundtrack is one of my favorites as well.
This movie never gets old! No matter how many times I watch i fall in love all over again! Watch it over and over and over
This classic movie is one of the best movies made. You have a princess, love, and happily ever after. Adventure for all.
I thouroughly enjoyed it once again. The animations were so incredible,and you  just wanted to be like Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs.
This is a wonderful classic for my granddaughter to watch as she grows up. I am sure she will enjoy it.
We love watching this movie at home with the kids. It never gets old and we can't wait to watch it over and over again.
This movie is a classic from my childhood, and in true Disney form: never a disappointment!
What can I say...a classic. Every one has got to see it.  Some parts scary for little ones...but they will want to see it again anyhow.
Snow white is he first Disney movie I have ever watched and Snow White is my favorite princess. This box set is awesome!
Loved this movie as a child. Passed it down to my children, and my grand children. I really love Disney movies.you will too.
This rating is what it deserved - no question neededTips are always welcome and also guidelines.  Am completely satisfied
Saw this at Radio City Music Hall at age 5.  The witch no longer scares me but I still love this movie at age 73.
My granddaughter loves this, as did her mother & grandmother! A true classic!
Me, mom, my sis & her kids love this movie & watch it any chance we get (when they're not watching pokemon or beyblade)!!
It arrived very quickly no damage to package. and my family and I love this movie it is a classic after all.
This is a classic that I can share with my grandchildren in the future. I hope they will like it as well.
This is a great movie. Even my 9 year old son love to watch it. Great addition for your movie collection.
My grand children  really do love this DVD , It was a bit costly  but worth it
I was adding the Disney movies to my grandchildrens collection, they were happy to receive it. will keep adding to there collection
Thank you so very, very much!I LOVE this movie, and so does my son now!Highly recommend to EVERYONE!
Very satisfied with the product quality and condition.  The delivery was timely.  Would buy from this seller again.  Thank you.
i bought this dvd from a seller on amazon and this seller was quick in mailing this dvd and it was like brand new.i would order from this buyer again
Timeless story, a little cheeky but it was Walt Disney's favorite and my niece's favorite too, she sang Hi Ho right along with the dwarves
This movie is a classic. I absolutly love it. And I was able to find an older edition that was more affordable.
I received my order very quickly and in great condition. I would definately recommend this seller.
I am a big disney fan and a big Snow White fan so I was so glad that I was able to get this wonderful movie
Nice to have a modern version of this classic.  My VHS copy was starting to get very warn, not to mention my VHS player.
Our children had several disney movies, but did not have this one.  I was happy that I could find it for them.  It is a great movie for children.
i loved this movie as a kid and i still do. classis disney at his best. i loved watching this movie with my oldest granddaughter.
Now I liked this one., in time my granddaughter will love it too.  She is only 3 but should be into the princess's soon.
A perfect movie classic.  I would definitely make this a part of your Disney collection.  I have also given it as a gift.
It is a good movie. This platinum Edition movie was awesome. It is better than original movie. I am glad I waited to be on dvd.
Disney Classic enough said!!  Just adding to my video collection for my entire family to enjoy.  These are hard to find cartoons!
Love Snow White and this Disney Classic.  It still stands up all these years later.  My daughter loves this and watches it all the time!
This is a true Disney classic!  I saw this movie at Walt Disney World when I was 7 years old.  I totally forgot how much I loved this movie!
Very good movie. This is a Disney classic and will be part of our permanant Disney collection. I love the dwarfs!
I got this on VHS,and I would love to have the DVD,too. The Wicked Stepmother/Witch gets it in the end,and Snow White marries the Prince.
This is one of great Disney classic. It's done in the old Disney style with alot of detail in their artistry. And it even has a good plot. Fantastic!
I bought this as a gift, so I only relate the info I received from my grandson and his family.  they were very pleased.
follows the classic fairy tale - has good animation. the characters r great and the cast 2.
Snow White is an excellent classic film that is really enhanced in the Blu-Ray edition.
Snow white a disney classic!  One of my favorite disney movies! You got to have for your disney collection! Great!
It is a classic and a must have especially on VHS because that is the classic way to watch disney movies
Of course this is a wonderful movie! Classic story, and just like I remember from my childhood! We love it!
What can I say other then this is a Disney Classic. Good quality picture and sound. My 3 year old enjoys this movie.
a must buy gift set for snow white fans. a well maid product with lots of extras that collectors will enjoy.
Got this for $9.99 with the special. Amazing PQ and AQ. I love extras so his one was a truly awesome purchase.
Another gift purchase - given to a friend who is building her collection of Disney classics.
How can anyone not love this movie. It's probably the best Disney movie ever!I recomend this to any family
This movie was a classic when I was a child and I still love watching this cartoon as an adult.
Arrived as expected and when also. Easy to open. I lo ed this movie n my daughter too. Now I have did for grandchildren to enjoy when they visit
Buy this one for your kids, They'll love the Disney magic and songs.  Adults will like it too.
Hi, Ho, Hi Ho, it's to purchase Snow White as a CD we go. Another one of those classics. What home should be without it? Certainly not mine.
It's the original musical in digital form so how can you get more than that! Perfect picture and sound, excellent.
This movie is one of the all time great Disney classics ever made, a real family favorite for young and old alike.
This was a nice cartoon set in Hawaii with Elvis Presley music,  modern day parenting struggles and a happy outcome.
The movie was really cheap and it is in great condition. I'm happy all around iwth my purchase.
This is one of my son's favorite movies.  He has to watch it at least once a day and loves to talk along with the characters.
a another Disney classic the whole family can enjoy or by your self well told story if you like disney movies this another one you like
O;) adorable, awesome, I loved Lilo and stitch, thank you !!
The kid and I love watching this movie. Which is good because she wants to watch it every day over and over.  It will always be a favorite.
Lilo  & stitch are no. 1 in my book when it comes to Disney cartoon movies  I hope the make more great cartoon movie like this oneAlan
This movie didn't get that much hype but it is one of my favorites.  The dvd was in good shape for being a kids movie and used.
This is one of our all time favorite Disney movies. You can't help but fall in love with the characters, the setting and the music.
I remember this movie when I was growing up.. My kids loved it just as much as I did.. great kids movie..
if you don't have it, you need to get it. this movie is charming and has one of the more wonderful messages about family.
My granddaughter loves the movie.  She wants to watch it over and over.  So glad I purchased.  Hadn't seen this one before and it's most delightful.
Funny, Funny, Funny and very touching.  A wonderful movie with a wonderful message.  Everyone can identify with the message in this one.
This may be the finest film that Disney has released in decades.  A true treasure, and not as treacly as other Disney fare.
gotta love Disney. cannot go wrong when it comes to Disney movies they are the best.  was added to the dvd collection that we have
Lilo & Stitch Is One The Best Movie of Disney!Cute, Charming and Astounding!!A GOOD MOVIE FOR ALL OHANA!
I loved the emphasis on family, The acceptance of all creatures great and small. The action scenes were pretty good too.
Love this move always have. Couldnt find it any where so i bought it, the next day its free on Netflix lol.
Bought it to replace a ruined VHS tape. My grand kids love this movie!! Cute and entertaining! It was a must to replace.
my kids and I absolutely LOVE this movie! I am also a HUGE elvis fan!!!!! We have watched this several times since we have gotten it! :)
I really think this is one of Disney's cutest  animated shows.  I really enjoy the Elvis Presley music they used
I love this movie it is my third favorite out of the set and a great movie i like it
I bought this movie for a gift and it was in excellent conditions.  Really like the product and the movie.
An owesome & timeless Disney movie. Me & my grandaughter won't get tired of watching it any time soon. Just like I did with her mom way back then.
We love the original Lilo and Stich movie. This movie has been watched many times at our house and on the road.
I fun movie of the broken family that pulls together to stay together. Even with the help an odd ball (puppy) helping.
In many years, I never had intentions to watch this movie. The movie is well done. Good message, has action, fun and emotional moments. Recommended!
Words cannot express how much I love Lilo and Stitch. In my top three with " Uncle Buck" and " Tarzan".  Great!!!
My girls can't get enough of lilo and stitch! love this movie too! It's a great mini history lesson on Elvis too!
It's a great movie for my children. My daughter is pretty young, and she enjoys listening to the music. She gets really into it
If he likes it then it must be okay in my book....I personally liked part 2 better. But its cute.
She loved it. Even got her grandmother to watch it. Now she wants to see the latest version of Lilo & Stitch.
I bought this movie for my kids ages 6,5 and 2. they love this movies and I feel in love with it too. great kid and family movie.
I bought this dvd for my son it just got here.. I think he's wathed it 3x today. (He's 4) would i recommend? Yes
Lilo and Stitch 2 was the greatest bouns features and excellent visuals ,great storyline of a funny scifi carttoon !
I like this movie. It is funny & nice....I hope you feel the same.
This is an excellent movie and really makes you tear up and cry. It is as good as the first Lilo and Stitch movie.
I am simply in love with Lilo and Stitch. I just can't get enough of it. I love the sequels and the TV show.
i purchased this one for my grandson. i also purchased other lilo & stitch dvds and my grandson loves them all.
My grand daughter loves the Lilo & Stich  DVD's.  I like hearing Elvis songs so it's fun for me too!
This is an awesome sequel to the first. The kids love it just as much and gives me a break from watching the first one over and over.
This is a terrific movie about golf and well done.  Even my boys who are not golfers greatly enjoyed this film.
Great movie and an incredible true story of a young man who beat the Brits for a US Open when they were the best players in golf.
All around great movie, Based on a true story. I don't even like golf but this movie was well done.
It's a nice story and the acting is well done. A good family movie... Reminds me a bit of &#34;Rudy&#34;.
This movie is excellent and I mean it the actor are great and the kids more, I enjoy this movie alway I see it
Loved this movie as much as "Stroke of Genius".  I'm not a golfer, but love good movies.
I had seen it once before and liked it. I bought to keep building my Disney collection and just because I enjoyed the movie.
Great entertainment, What ever you do don't miss it ! ! ! ! ! !
The excitement in this movie is great. It keeps you up all thru the movie.This movie plays great.Blu-ray,what else to say!
I am a sucker for period pieces and I love under dog stories about early sports figures.Love the clothing and the time period.
I bought this movie for my husband who couldn't stop talking about it when he watched it on TV.  A great underdog story.
We had this in DVD but always wanted it in Blue ray so was glad to find it with you
I love this true story of a golfing ledgend and his caddy who became life long friends, It's the perfect movie.
I was happy with the product that I recived. It was in the condition as listed. I am happy with this product.
Like the true story nature of the plot.  Great movie to have in my collection.  Will recommend it to others who are golfers at heart.
I have not saw or open yet, but I bought it for my godchild gift. He loves Pooh and it got here on time!
Very cute movie that any toddler will enjoy. I originally saw the movie on tv and fell in love with it so I had to buy it for my daughter.
LOVE IT SO HARD TO FIND BUT I ADORE WINNIE THE POOH SO MUCH I COULDN'T PASS IT UP JUST ADORABLE
In my opinion this is the best Winnie the Pooh Movie every made...completely adorable and heartfelt.  One song will make a mama cry, so touching.
I'm still partial to earlier Pooh movies, but this was a good one.  The heffalump is very cute and the story appealed to our daughter and to me.
Another great addition to the Winnie the Pooh series.  Provides an outlook on how not to be scared of everything you encounter and making friends.
This will be a great addition to our Disney movies and my kids love it. Good songs that they all love to sing and listen to over and over again!
Great movie my kid enjoys this movie, she loves to sing along with all the characters especially roo and heffy.  used product in great condition.
THIS IS MY FAVORITE POOH MOVIE SO I HAVE TO BUY EVERY TOT I KNOW ONE  THEY ARE EXTREMELY RARE
Much better than the remake, although I like both
I have watched this movie close to a hundred times and I still enjoy watching.
I love Hayley Mills. She was a wonderful child actress. She also makes wonderful family movies. I wish she still could make some more.
my gram was super ecited love it!:) it was an amaing movie and it is also a great price hells yeah
I watched this so many times as a child. what i love now, i watch it with my own daughter. its a great family movie.
I like the first movie the best.  Hailey Mills does a great job and how can you miss with Maureen OHara
Thank you. I am very happy with the product,the seller,and the whole experience. I will be back looking for other films.
The first movie was good; much better then the remake.  The second, when they are grown; don't know.  anyway I watched it.
Who doesn't love Hayley Mills in the parent trap. It was a must have for m and my family. Thanks.
Very happy with the product and timely receiving of it.
This old movie are childhood favorite of mine.  It is a joy to view it in the comfort of your own home.
HAYLEY MILLS IN PARENT TRAP IS TIMELESS. AS FAR AS I'M CONCERNED, IT'S THE ONLY PARENT TRAP. FAR MORE CREATIVE THAN THAT UPDATED VERSION
no problem, great movie.
Haley Mills with Disney plus a great movie script ( Original vol 1) equals a really super good time at movie watching.
This is a great older movie duo and certainly an asset to my vast collection. Arrived faster than a speeding bullit too!
This is a great family movie. We watch it over and over again. We like it a lot better than the newer version. It's a great Disney move.
I've always loved this movie. I recently saw the remake with Lindsay Lohan & altho good it doesn't compare with this classic.
Good story line and classic movie. A good family movie and great for retro movie buffs as well. Great scenery.
One of my all time favorites.  I have it on VHS so had to get it on DVD so I can share it with my grandchildren some day.
Just fun and nostalgic
Robert Rodriguez, the one man film crew, knows how to give the audience a good time and this film is no exception, this movie rocks!
Sin city is pretty much base on the name of the movie it's fun, crazy and even sometimes scaryyou'll love this movie for dvd and psp.
I've seen it on DVD and Blu-Ray was ten times much better and the audio is ten times more better also. I love the smoking hot chicks in this flick.
This is a movie that will be loved forever.  It's not your tradational movie but that is what makes special.
One of my favorites, Sin City reminds me of back in the day when Madonna did Dick Tracy. Love the colors in the movie too.
Great movie. It's even better in HD. I love the extra footage. I can't wait for Sin City 2. :-)
I love love love Sin City.  The photography is out standing.  The plot and characters couldn't have been better.  Must see.
Great movie. Awesome visuals. Never seen a black n white film look so colorful. Will definitely recommend this to my friends.
Great movie, the ability to watch the story in order is a pretty nice feature of the extended edition.  Looks amazing on Blu-Ray at 240hz.
A MUST OWN for your Blu-Ray collection.  The picture UNREAL and of course it is SIN CITY. The movie itself ROCKS!!!
I save all my gratuitous violence for Frank Miller films.  This movie is not for the faint of heart but it full of superstars and so very good.
Take your graphic novel and noire films to the next level! This is a superior Blu-ray in every aspect. Buy it you'll like it
I bought used and the quality was better than expected.  It came with comic book in new condition.  I was very pleased.
It 's beautiful package color. It's a great movie with a lot of special features, the sound e imagem was amazing too.
Sin City is an awesome addition to anyone's collection.  The acting is great and the story is fun and creative.
Two words says it all, &#34;Sin City.&#34;  The movie will keep you on the edge of your seat from one movement to the other, well done Mickey. Thanks
Sin City is one of my favorite movies. I looks and sounds good on DVD and even better on Blu-ray.
Great movie. Great cast of actors. I have watched this movie over and over and it had not dissapointed yet. Nor will it!!
Great variety of actors in this movie!!! Totally love it!!!!! You cant beat the cast of characters in this movie, very well done!!!!
This movie is heaven for the underground.  The blood runs free.  Only thing missing is a vampire or two.  See it, and you'll know.
The actors seem to actually look like the charactors.  The dialog fit the format perfectly.  Sin City is now one of my top ten favorite movies.
It has it all....drama, fantasy, adventure.  I loved it and I'd think anybody would.
lost this to a used to be friend and I was happy to find it for a steal. 5 bucks. very pleased. great price and fast shipping
We highly recommend all the Chronicles of Narnia movies.  We love them and watch them regularly.  The books are good too.
Must See video! It is one of the best adaptations available.It is a excellent movie for people of all ages.
Again another outstanding movie...so glad I have this movie in my collection ....and glad I got it!  U SO ROCK! `
This is a gorgeous movie with beautiful characters.  I love the whole concept and did not grow up reading these books.  I will read them now.
a classic - hard to give away as a present - it arrived safely and was enjoyed - sorry for the delay
I love movies n when I saw the price for it. I said to myself that I have to have this movie. I love this movie a lot.
A classic Blu-Ray I wanted to add to my collection that my family has enjoyed for many years and we will enjoy it now on Blu-ray.
Have all of them but I think this is my favorite.  Just a wonderful movie for the whole family to watch.
One of my favorite movie series.  If you like fantasy, you should appreciate this movie.  No issues with the product itself.
Super movie just like the book, I read all the books as a child then again when I was older.
good old fashioned fairy tale--loved it and the special effects.A movie for all ages...
This also arrived in a timely manner, along with the other two DVD's. Now the kids have something to watch as they grow up.
My grandson loves this movie, he enjoys playing it over and over again, we like watching it as a family, Good Movie!
had the 2and 3 so I got it so I would have all 3 and at a great price so its complete
I was very happy with the movie and the speedy service.  The movie came quickly and I enjoyed watching it.
The best in Narnia Series. The first is not always the best in a Trilogy. But this one is an exception.
We love this movie and have watched it several times already.  This is good for adults and young people.  Thanks
Very Good Movie this is really a great movie for the whole family or just the kids. You will love it
I absolutely love this movie, and don't have children but believe that this would be great way to explain sin and forgiveness to a child.  Loved it!
themovie was great played like it was brand new very happy camper i will buy more movies thank u very much
i  always  love  to  watch  on  my  blu ray  playermy  girl friend  got  it  for  memy  family  and  friends
I never have read the books, but I thought this movie was very good.  It kept me interested.
C.S. Lewis writes many different kinds of books.  The movie was just as good as the book.  I've watched it several times.
I like this movie but the second one was kinda crappy and off story the third one was ok ll
This is a classic movie, just like the book. The cinematography and special effects are wonderful. Everyone in the family loved the movie.
I purchased this to show to my students after we read the novel. It is so much easier having it on my account than trying to find the DVD every year.
So happy to order this ahead of time before it came out in the stores.  Everyone came over to watch, what a great time!
Just wonderful!  It is a fantasy yet you could feel yourself being pulled into the story as it progressed.
The best of the best of children's stories...based on a book by the incomparable CS Lewis, it offers everything to inspire both children and adults.
Great escape. What to say, if you read the books in the series you will love this. Its a more current version of the Land of Oz.
I'm a huge fan of the Chronicles of Narnia.  I love the plot, the action and the characters.  I will be buying all of the sequels soon.
I recommended it to a friend who was a school teacher. She had never heard of it. She was very surprised when she watched it.
I watched this on TV a lot, but had not bought it.  It is in my collection and I am quite happy with it.
This is a great movie that was fun to watch and has a great spiritual message. I was reminded of the greatness of Jesus' kingship.
Great movie for the whole family. A good movie for all ages. Very beautiful visually. The child actors were amazing.
This was a good start to what could have been a great movie series.  Sadly, the writers departed from their source material, and therefore failed.
This is an outstanding movie that I wanted in my collection to share with my family, I was not disappointed!
very well done and very entertaining even if you know the storyline already
Would watch it over and over again!  Rented it for my kids while traveling and it was a great entertainer during car rides!
I wasn't sure if I was going to like this movie but I really enjoyed it
i did not know how many time i been watch this movie but i still love it that why i would like to have all the time where ever i go.
This is a great edition of the Chronicles of Narnia.  It is very well done.  I recommend it to anyone who loves Narnia.
This is one of the better blu rays out there. The picture quality is fantastic. Also, it is one of my new favorite movies. Highly recommended!
Bought this for the Family collectiion of movies.  Everyone loved it. Would recommend this for any family to add to their collectiion.
I liked the war at the end- the queen was powerful.I like how the kids worked together and were brave and became king and queen at the end.
Excellent movie!!! They did a good job; it's very close to the contents of the original book. A must-see!2 Thumbs up!!!
Even from the beginning this is a wonderful show for the family to watch.
This is an excellent show. I recommend watching it.
If you want to own a season of Grey's then this is still the best season to have.
Although the season was really short, I think it brought the series to life really well. I love the characters and the storylines.
I think that it was really good and i recommend to buy it! I stayed up all night and watched cause i wanted to see what happened next.
Greay's anatomy is one of the best series on TV at the moment. Luv it
If you like the medical shows on tv that include drama, medical situations, and even some humor.... then this is a great series.
The service and the condition of this item were A1, I'm glad I was able to purchase from you
Favorite episodes are of all 8-9 seasons. Bomb two part episodes best ever. Great humor and I miss some of the original actors.
Best season of Grey's Anatomy. The true cast shines. I just love it. Seeing them all from the beginning is amazing too. I highly recommend it.
We love this show!Finally broke down and bought all 8 seasonsAll DVDs are in great condition.Watching them over and over again.
This is probably one of my favorite seasons of this show.  The characters are endearing and the story lines are fun to follow.
I am a greys anatomy fanatic. I've watched season 1 more times than I can count. I love the stories interwoven in the hospital setting.
This was bought as a gift for someone else and she liked it, so it is good enough for me!
I was hooked by Season 1 of Grey's Anatomy and continued watching all available seasons.  Great show -- Love it!
the beginning of a great show.  good disc quality too. ten nine eight seven six five four three two one!
This show is so HOT and every season,just keep on getting better and better.There is never a dull moment."KEEP THE SEASONS COMING"!!!!!!!
I don't know how I missed the boat on this series when it first aired.  Great writing!  Great casting! Great, great story lines!!
Grey's is so good. Never saw the first season but now so glad I did.Great show, wish it never ends.
Amazing cast.  Great writing. Perfect story lines. Missed the show so much since it went off the air and this has helped.
She really enjoyed this show. Very sad when they cancelled it. I bought her all the seasons. She couldn't have been happier.
Nonstop entertainment, could not stop watching one episode after another, arrived quickly and in perfect shape.
Desperate Housewives has to be watched from season 1, I laughed my way through the series, every season is as good as the last.
EXCELLENT SEASON 2 OD DESPERATE HOUSEWIVES espacially with the hidden secret of the Applewhites !! I recommend it !!
I love all the characters in this shows always something new going on
It's a great Series and good to be able to keep and watch agaib
Any Baby Einstein is my daughter's favorite and when I need to get something done, it's great to have these dvds to let her watch them.
SWIFT RECEIPT OF PRODUCT THAT WAS EXACTLY AS DESCIRBED BY SELLER. GOOD SALE - THIS SELLER IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED.
It was worth buying, my baby girl love baby einstein, including this one. They explain a lot about instruments, very educational.
Greys Anatomy is my FAVORITE show!! I absolutely love all of the characters. It's so addicting and always full of so much drama!!
I live for Grey's Anatomy. This season was excellent filled with much love, drama, and changes.
I miss George! I like this season a lot, many things happened doing it. I enjoy going back and watching how it all began.
An amazing season to an amazing show! The story lines are real, and you begin to realize what all the hype is about. Highly recommended!
I Love it ....but I'm very upset....it was taken off Prime and I can't get it without paying now.....Very Upset
It has a great story line and Im not much into TV dramas.  In my opinion you really need to start from season 1.
It is so great to have such an amazing show on demand all the time.  I never get sick of watching this.
My daughter wanted Grey's Anatomy DVD for Christmas,and you did not disappoint. SHe was thrilled. Thanks!
I didnt think this series was so good and now im stuck. So worth money, time, and searching for a satisfing purpose to pamper myself :)
I luv the first season, this is just as good. Luv all the drama. Can't wait for the next season
If you watch Greys Anatomy you know that the first few seasons are the best. I recommend! But be careful you will get hooked!
Grey's Anatomy is no 1.  The second season is great and i can't wait to buy the third season on dvd.
I am trying to catch up on all the seasons.  I love the show because of the positive messages I get with a lot of shows.
A great season again, a lot of tears and of course a lot of hope for our two favorite doctors to get (or stay) together. Can't wait for the next one.
I love Grey's Anatomy and highly recommend.  THis show is funny, serious and addicting.
Loved the show when it first came out! great story line, great cast, one of my most favorite shows! love it!
best season of this show. good quality discs. twelve, eleven, ten, nine, eight, seven, six, five, four, three, two, one!
So far this is the best season lots of love,action you name it it was great season
As much as I loved ER, I love this show more! It has some of everything.  Most of all though, the writing is brilliant and so is the casting.
As with the first season, this is a wonderful series. I would recommend this dramatic series to anyone that loves medical shows.
bought it to replace an old copy that was lost and I really do love this series and this box set was when it was really good
What can I say the smile and the full attention that my nephew pays when watching this cartoon, its priceless.
I bought this for my boys for Christmas.. It came just like it said it would and was in great shape..
We love all mickey but anything mickey Christmas is awesome!We love  chip and dale too. My sin giggles hysterically at them.
My nephew loves Mickey Mouse since we've just returned from Disney World.  It was his second trip. Thanks for having the DVDs.
The grandson loved it.  The first day he watched it 3 three times.  He wanted to see more Mickey Mouse.
What more can i say, Mickey Mouse still one of the best cartoon characters every
Got this last year before Christmas and my grandson watches it all year long.Great Mickey Mouse movie for all the Kids
We bought this for our grandson. He loves Mickey Mouse and he loves watching Santa Claus shows. He sits there and watches the whole show.
This is one of my favorite scary movies. I liked the story line and wish they would make a sequel to it. Very reasonably priced with quick delivery.
I remember going to see this movie at the theater's  and it was good. i like the unrated version. I found this scary movie interesting
great dvd and movie was good and clear nice thriller just the way I remember it love the movie great
May be a hard watch for some, but I love it.  All star cast, great story, and a bit disturbing, I must admit.
This movie has THE BESTEST bad guy EVER!!!I recommend this movie to anyone who wants to watch a well written story and interested characters.
Added this great thriller to our Coen Brother's collection - this is one of their best.  Great acting by Javier Bardem.
Arrived quickly & as described :) My mother & I love films & Amazon makes it much easier for us to collect them!
Ending was a shock but this movie kept me on the edge of my seat. Hopefully there will be a sequel.
This is one of my favorite movies of all time. I can't say enough about this movie so I won't.  It's already been said.  Amazon's deal was great too.
I liked it. having grownup in Texas, much of it was pretty realistic. Being an old man also, helped me understandwhere they were going.
The Coen brothers make some of the best movies, and this is one of their best. A definite buy.
The movie only varied from the plot of the book a few times. I found it refreshing to watch a movie that remained faithful to the book.
This is a GREAT MOVIE! I couldn't stop watching it. Great plot and actors, would watch these guys in anything.
This movie is incredible. The slow nature of the movie actually does add to it. Get over it and watch.
This film has the right amount of tension throughout. Great acting. Not for the faint of heart. Will watch again someday.
Drama, action, pursuit for the money, Bardem, Brolin and Jones, great movie, a lot of action.. there are no clean getaways you must be view...
this movie is so action packed and is an awesome movie. i love Tommy Lee Jones's performance in this movie. I Recommend it for everyone
Excellent movie showing the saga of retrieving contraband. Quite realistic in showing the evils and determinations in the drug world.
I love this movie, it started well, got very good in the middle and finished nicely. What more could you want from a movie?
Awesome price for this Collector's Edition of an amazing flick.  Couldn't pass it up for the price when I was purchasing a ton of films.
This a great movie.  One the best movies I've watch.  The acting is outstanding, this is a must see Movie.
This movie is simply well done.  Javier Bardem really earned his oscar, and is simply a great villan to watch on screen.
great movie, the hitman is weird but somewhat funny. great acting for all the actors.
You will love this movie. I don't always buy Blu-ray. This is a classic! Everything is as listed on the site. A great purchase!
Old west, meets modern crime scenario. Money hungry thrives whom are willing to take any life in their way of their millions.
The actors in this movie were well chosen.  Bardem was so persistent and evil he was mesmerizing.  I've watched it only once, but it stayed with me.
...just an awesome movie. Javier was excellent. Tommy lee jones as well. Also josh broilin did a great job in the lead
No Country For Old Men is one of the best of the best. It has all the suspenses of a old western thriller. Its a keeper
favorite movie of all time. Love javier as the villain. can always watch this over and over again. great movie
This is a great movie!  This is very serious and entertaining.  Great storyline and great acting skills for Jones and the other cast members!!
An excellent movie.  I would recommend it to all, but it is no film for the faint-hearted.
love this movie. ive watched it 4 times and i know ill go back and watch it some more. nice extras too. the movie is one of the best for the year.
I got this movie during the holiday season, as I could not pass up a blueray at that price of a movie my husband enjoys.
Wonderful Tommy Lee Jones movie-- set in a time I still remember.  Really chilling and great cast.  Well worth owning.
I got this because I always enjoy Coen brothers' films.  I was not disappointed -- it was one of their better ones.
Really enjoyed the movie...it had some twists and turns that really made it enjoyable. Tommy Lee Jones and Javier Bardem were awesome!
This is one of those movies that I can watch every few months and not get tired of so I bought it. One of my all time favorites.
I love all the actors in this movie even the creepy big dude with the cattle killer! Creepy Memorable movie!!
This movie is a must have, one of the Coen Brothers best, Javier is just excellent in this movie if you haven't seen this it's worth it
Very touching,  loved it over and over again. Had saw it before our purchase. sad ending.  did his wife die also??
i love how plot develops , its mysterious ,intriguing , keeps you rivited , one of few good movies i have send in last decade
If you like a fast paced movie with suspense this is the movie for you.  I've watched over and over and really enjoy.
I like this movie. It made a hick out of Tommy Lee! I would recommend it to everyone. I love the weapon in this movie.
This movie has a good story line and also has that bizzare coen brothers touch to it. I would reccomend it for anyone who likes coen brothers movies!
Top to bottom a great movie with no weakness'.Call it.
this movie was for my husband for xmas and of course he loved it.  I had talked to people for i bought it and everybody said it was a great movie.
Excellent directing and acting, and filmed outdoors on location.  A movie that keeps you intensely focused for every single minute.
please do listen to all the great reviews here and give this a watch(you'll probably need to watch it more than once though).this is brilliant stuff.
Good movie on modern day mind control-it was also supposed to depict some type of future society.  I loved it.
Great movie, Blu-Ray enhances the experience. Malcolm McDowell is frightening and still relevant in today's society.
Fantastic movie in blu ray format.  This blu ray really does the movie good justice and the up-scaling looks perfect.
Very good vid transfer to HD.  Great movie, and fun to watch in HD.
That's awesome.A great digibook with pictures of the movie and info.2 Disc with a lot of extra materials.Need to have.
This movie is amazing.Kubrick was so far ahead of him time, it is amazing.
One of the best movies of all time. Stanley Kubrick's best film. A film that transcends time. This movie will shock you.
thank you very much, i like it. ^_^ i haven't seen this movie in a really, really long time. have a good day.
I saw this movie off of some previews for another movie and thought it looked good. Once got it wasnt exactly what expected but was still good.
I think this is one of the extrangest movies I have ever seen, but I Believe it is a Masterpice of the movie art. So I would recommend it.
I have the book.  Published when banned in UK  This is a good coppy and will be enjoyed over and over
If you have never seen this before then im sorry,rent it or buy this masterpiece.
Video Quality is great considering it was on VHS tape. Movie is a great classic as most people know. Good
We know how pefect the movie is, so I am only here to honor it.
Some people understand this movie and some people don't. Either you like it do or don't, I like this movie and that is just my opinion.
What a movie. If you havent seen this movie yet you are missing out. Watch it!!! Its a classic cult movie.
A good story of a young man up to no good and his droogies... dirty deeds , betrayed and medical science gone wrong.
If you haven't exprerience Kubrick you're missing on a substantial proportion of the world's most remarkable films
A Clockwork Orange is one of Kubrik's greatest works and I enjoy it thoroughly. His adaptation of the novel is incredible.
Thank you for an excellent quality DVD!  A great product and sent to me in a timely fashion!  Couldn't be better!
Viddy this, my poor wankers.  You will find bliss in the old super violence.  Sweet emotion.
ONE OF MY PERSONAL FAVORITES OF ALL TIME.....IT FIGURES DIMMY WOULD BECOME A COP...  A WEAK ATTEMPT...THE HURRICANE( BUT TOTALLY OUT OF CONTEXT )
This is one of the better movies made by Kubrick, and it could be his best in my humble opinion.
Absolutely awesome lead in to the meat and potatoes RVN flick for those of us who weren't actually there.  Great entertainment.
This is an excellent transfer to blu-ray, 100% better than the previous release. You can really tell it has been cleaned up, even on smaller screens.
How would you explain the most perfect military training ? Rent this movie.Emotions aside,This time in our lives, needed to be told.
F.M.J is a movie that i will enjoy and have everyone in my family enjoy forever. one if not the greatest film!!!!!
he loves it. good deal for the price.  I don't know what else to write about this.  It's okay is all I have to say.
A great insight into how the toughest soldiers in America think and react in their jobs.  Keeps your attention throughout.
War is ugly and military life is not easy.  Shows the real life and treatment of men who will become soldiers
A great movie with a lot of stars.  It is definitely one you have to have if you are a collector.
I like boot camp the most, so many good lines :-)If you like gritty war films, this one is for you!
A must own for a serious movie collection in my opinion, buy this movie, great acting great story line, and a must have for the old movie collection.
I rate the first part in PI 5+  stars. The second part is not as good but the PI part is so good that it elevates the final count to 5 stars.
Great movie. Very emotional. I love it. I am a fan of pretty much every military movie out there and this one is definitely one of the top ones.
This is one of my all time faves. I loved the war scenes and had to follow this flick because it is gripping.
Greatest movie ever made. Well the first half anyways. I usually only watch the basic training. I recommend it,two thumbs up.
A little bit of everything in this movie, humor, action, some drama, good effects.  Great actors, very realistic.  Have watched it many times.
I am a Kubrick fan and I love this film especially in the beginning of the film I really enjoyed.
Excellent film, but not for those who are upset by violence and bloody scenes.  There is a surreal feeling at times.
Awesome, to say the least. Hard core, and Hard Corps. Of course, R. Lee Ermey makes it. But still a good move overall.
this is my all time favorite war movie. it is powerful and shocking. i think everyone should see this and get a good cry.
All other Vietnam war movies after Full Metal Jackets, have it as a starting point. Incredible. Good HD quality but not superb.
THE MOST REALISTIC EXPERIENCE OF THE MILITARY..
my husband really liked this movie i am not into these kind of movies but he really liked it ,most men like these kind of movies
In this film, R Lee Ermey gives the best performance in any movie ever made ever.  And a bunch of people get shot.  Pretty sweet flick.
There are few movies that every man should own.This would be at the topof my list!Kenneth Haft
Item was as described or better, arrived very quickly, professionally packed. Recommended.  the Great Stnley K's take on Viet Nam.  A classic.
Not really accurate but good flick!Had to have been there to appreciate the real boot camp and war experience
I have watched this movie many times and enjoy the action. Get one for yourself and form your own opinion of this movie.
If you want to get a look into Marine Corps boot  camp this is the movie for you great movie!
This item was a present that my sister wanted to get her boyfriend. Didn't watch it but the item came very promptly and was in excellent condition
Even though this movie has been out for a long time. It still holds up as one of the best movies out there. That is just my opinion.
If you like Jar Head or Mail Call, you'll love this movie.It's a raw, great commentary piece on the Vietnam War, seriously a must own!!!
this rating system is without merrit.  am happy with this movie.  honest this is a first class movie....i love it
Very classy woman and she makes the movie... and Ed Norton helps as well.timeless movie.added this movie to my collection
The Trnasfer is of a very High Quality,  The only artifacting problems are with the shiny bullet chains and tha's a minor one at that :)
Fantastic Movie with great actors.  Reminded me of my time in the Corps. I have watched this many times. Outstadning
one of the best war movies out there, if you like the real feeling of life in the service get this
This is a classic that deserves to be in Widescreen on DVD OOOH-RAH!
Great American classic war movie about Vietnam. So many great quotes from the drill instructor that will last through the ages.
One hell of a war movie. Examines the weakness of men being put in an unwarranted situation and the pride of some. Would watch it again.
A great story about Vietnam and boot camp. Loved the actors included in this film such as Vinnie and Lee.
Ever wondered what becoming a Marine entails? If so, then this film will give you a good impression of the miseries a recruit faces.
loves this.  Jack Nicholson is again his best.  If you want an edgy, disturbing thriller ... this flick is for you
Stanley Kubrick and Stephen King make the perfect couple in this instant classic.  Jack Nicholson's mesmerizing performance didn't hurt either.
Awesome film and worth having to add to my Stephen King Collection as it is a great Classic Horror film. :)
So scary I fell lol not must watch for Horror fans So amazon makes watching movies great and easy boom
The best movie ever adapted from King's novel, a timeless masterpiece, great story and really creepy, a must own....Enjoy.
I AM SO HAPPY WITH THIS BUY. THIS DVD IN HD IS TOTALLY AWESOME. A JACK NICHOLSON CLASSIC. A MUST HAVE IF YOU REALLY LIKE THE SHINING!
This is simply the best horror film ever made!  It really is that good.  Jack Nicholson's acting is amazing!  Very highly recommended!
As always it was a great movie this movie was watch by my grandson he is watching all the great old movies to keep him busy over the summer!!
I purchased this as a Gift and they loved it !It is a movie that you can watch again and again !
One of My All Time Favorite Movies !I could watch it 100 times and never be bored !I purchased this as a gift and the loved it !
Great acting and scary scenes. Nicholson is awesome. His facial expressions are the best. Still the scariest movie ever.
HD makes it that much better.  You know this movie.  Yes, it's still scary.  Yes, it's totally worth the high def release.
This is a classic and one of Jack's best. It's an edge-of-the-Seat type of movie from start to finish. Kudos.
I JUST LOVE THIS MOVIE! WHAT A THRILLER. JACK NICHOLSON WAS PERFECT FOR THIS MOVIE. IF YOU LOVE THRILLERS, THIS CLASSIC IS A MUST TO OWN!
Hands down, this movie was simply a masterpiece.  Shelly and Jack did it.  What else is there to say?  ???
One of the best horror movies in creation.  An absolute mind bend.  I do not know why it took so long to watch it.  Kubrick and Nicholson....perfect
This is an iconic performance by Nicholson and a great Kubrick film.  I love the winter setting and everything about this movie!
Jack is great in this film saw it two or three times, and still enjoy it great acting from Jack Here's Johnny.
Infinitely complex, there's simply no other ghost story that is this meticulous. Watch it on a cold winter night for the optimal viewing experiance.
see how many people have gotten this dvd and you should have no questions about getting it. love the movie and the BTS stuff is great.
I don't care what anybody says but Jack Nicholson made this movie.  The remake was a dud.  Jack makes a good &#34;HERE'S JOHNNY&#34; scene.
I loved this movie and thought it was a great horror movie. Just absolutely perfect.
This is one of the best classic horror movies, and I had to own it on Blu-ray after first watching it.
i bought this movie because i wanted to see what friend talk about it and i loved it and i loved it
This is one of those great horror films that never gets old.  It is so freaky and every time I watch it I get scared.
If you like scary movies this is the one to own.  Every time I see I still jump out of my skin even though I know what is going to happen.
Directed by Stanley Kubrick and starring Jack Nicholso! What more do you need to know? Buy the movie. You won't be disappointed.
This version of the shining is the best version...can't get over the creepy twin girls! Highly recommend this classic. Great movie
I saw this movie when it first came out in the theaters and have wanted it ever since.Now I can finally enjoy whenever I want.
Most everyone knows of this movie based on the book by Stephen King. It is one of the best and a real thrill ride.
One of the best Jack Nicholson movies of all time.  This is a classic that everyone must see. Jack really brought his character to life.
it was great to watch again, I remember watching it years ago and it's still as great as ever. I would recommend it to anyone to buy.
This is a truly classic horror film that has reached 'cult' status. This is truly one of Jack Nicklson's BEST performances of his career!
this was a gift for my husband he had never seen the movie .He really enjoyed it ,We both like Jack Nicholson .
This movie is a classic. It is a must own for all movie lovers. There is nothing more to say.
Great movie. I just love this movie. Very vintage, good lighting, good plot, very good acting. Some of Jack Nicholson's best work.
i enjoyed the movie very much, i enjoyed having this classic movie to my collection. Nicholson in one of my fav roles.
absolutly perfect it got here in a great time period and works perfectly! ive been lookin for this everywere! thanks
Love this movie! I am happy to finally own it. It is very convenient to have in my video library
Best horror movie of all time.  And my favorite Jack Nicholson movie.  This movie makes you jump out of your seat with just the word TUESDAY.
I had just read the book Doctor Sleep (sequel to The Shining) and decided to watch this again. Classic King!
Amazon, again why won't you post my review?Good HD DVD of a good movie.
Jack is awesome in this radical movie about someone who has gone crazy and tries to kill his wife in the  maze.
This is one of the greatest horror or suspense movies of all time.  The building up of Jack's insanity was done superbly.
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  Loads of suspense.  This is one movie which I cannot live without in my collection.
awesome all time thriller, been watching this since the 70's...it will scare the heck out of you for sure.Loved it
This is a cherished timeless classic horror film. The cast is amazing. This is just a fun movie that I can enjoy over and over.
A great Classic by one of Hollywoods Premier actors...Still as memorable as the first time I saw it.Jack at his best...
Thrill seekers unite.  Was awesome to watch, it's a classic for sure! loved it. Never gets too old to watch
really cool movie, long as well but worth it. presentantion it's not really shinny it's simple but no extra packing or material needed
Excellent item ,great picture.Quality is awesome.An old classic presented the way it should be.Totally worth its money
a very good movie  my favorite horror movie thank you. i watch it a whole lot .never get tired of it .
I must have seen this movie 23 or 24 time by now and to be honest i still get the chills..
I love this movie. I must have watched it ten times when I got it. It truly is a classic horror movie, especially when its based off a book.
This film may not be scary, but it has chills and thrills! Fine acting and chilling music! Kubrick is a master! Grade: A+
Yet another classic from my youth.
See this movie or die.  The ghosts wil eat you alive from the inside.  You will be scared to go to bed at night.  It's as good as The Exercist.
To put it simply, this is the best horror film ever made.  They don't get any better than this.
This is a great movie.  It arrived new and undamaged.  I would recommend this show to anyone who like to laugh.
This is one of my all time favorite movies. Chevy Chase was at his best in here along with the rest of the cast. I laughed through the whole movie
this is by far the best movie of all and it is my wifes favorite movie to watch she loves it
I always forget how great this movie is until I sit and watch it again.  It is back to back non stop great.
Classic Chevy Chase. I watch it at least 5 times a year. It's ridiculous, but also exactly like my family holidays.
What better way to keep all those family members busy than watching this movie as a tradition?
This movie is full of great quotes and just perfect to put you in the Christmas spirit.  I want the moose mugs!
A staple of Holiday Tradition. A must see! Chevy Chase is fantastic - the sled scene is the greatest. A joyous romp for the whole family!
There is nothing in words i can say accept watch this movie. you wont be dissapointed.
This movie is so funny and I havent seen it in a long time so I bought this movie. I loved being able to watch it with my family!
A true Christmas  with great humor not to be missed before every Christmas, the best of the Vacation Series !!
Video came in good shape, and was on time. Good vendor. Hilarious movie for those who like Chevy Chase's sense of humor!!
I watch it every year. I like comedy.i also like movies that are just fun, without any sentimental attempts to try and add  seriousness to the show.
We watch this movie every Christmas season.  Very funny, and we have memorized almost every line.  A real hoot!
This is our family FAVORITE!!!! It would not be Christmas if we didn't watch it at least once.
We love this movie and watch it every year.  Seriously funny.  A little bit of bad language but we love it anyway.
This is my all time favorite Christmas Movie.  And to now get it in blu-ray it is so cool. Thanks
This has got to be my favorite Christmas movie, it is HILLARIOUS. The Laserdisc version plays GREAT. A must have for Laserdisc movie owners.
A must-see Christmas classic that gets funnier every year. There are so many funny scenes in  this movie that there are too many to mention
This movie is so funny, it's a classic. Chevy Chase is the best.
arrive in excellant shape and on time. quailty of disk perfect, movie was very funny and very good. makes it nice to watch at xmas
OMG this movie was so so so funny. My family and I wached this movie during the Christmas Holiday.We are looking forward to ordering second sequel.
If you haven't seen this movie- you should! It's very funny, and it's my favorite of the "National Lampoons". You'll really enjoy it.
Every time I see this movie I laugh!  it is exceptionlly funny and the kids love it!  the story never gets old.
We watch it every year!It'snow a classic-kids andgrandkids laugh each timeand I've given it as Christmas gifts.
Have to have this movie in your Christmas Collection. When you need agood laugh, this movie is it. Good condition and plays like a charm..
great christmas movie or for that matter a great all around make you laugh movie when your down in the dumps chevy chase is crazy.
This movie is great! There are sooo many gut-busting laughs in it and I am serious! Its soooo funny!
One of the very best Christmas movies of all time! This movie is funny every year, over and over. We never get tired of it.
Chevy Chase seems to have a long string of funny movies and this is another winner , the entire cast very enjoyable movie even after all these years.
super funny great holiday movie (with some quirks like real life) who doesn't like Chevy Chase ? if you don't then don't watch this!!!
This movie has always been a favorite.  We all have a cousin Eddie.  And we all have a little cousin Eddie inside
This is the funniest Christmas movie ever.  Randy Quaid has the best lines and steals the movie.  A must see for the holidays.
Definately a great buy! I would recommend it to everyone.  The remastering is done very well and the picture is great.
What can I say about this classic?  It is as funny now as it was when I first saw it in college in 1989.  I never get sick of this in any format!!!!
My absolute favorite Nat'l Lampoon Vacation movie...Chevy Chase at his finest...It is a movie I absolutely MUST watch at Christmas time every year!
great movie for those who want a laugh! Chevy chase is so cool when it comes to dry humor.....expect to laugh
Watch this at least once every Christmas.  Cousin Eddie is a classic and this is vintage Chevy Chase.  Watch for the Walleyworld reference!
Classic movie that is great for the whole family minus a bit of bad language. If you want to LOL I recommend you get this movie!!!
I wash they had the righter today as they had back then The movie made me laugh from beginning to end. I rate it a 10.
I hadn't watched this movie for years and I had forgotten how funny it is! A classic Christmas flick for all ages.
great movie can watch over and over never get tired of it.  Chevy chase is great as always  all his moves are great.
One of the best National Lampoon's movies.  Something about the stress during the holidays and watching this movie takes it away.
A holiday classic at its rip roaringest best with Chevy Chase doing his best of the Lampoon Vacation movies with Randy Quaid making it even wilder.
i use to watch it all ta time when i was younger great lv it lv lv lv funny lv
All of our family members have loved this movie ever since it came out. It is definitely a Christmas classic.
One of the Geatest Movies Ever,this is a Classic Comedy a must have! I would recommend this DVD to anyone who enjoys Comedy!
Arguably one of the best Christmas movies ever made.  Chevy Chase has created a holiday tradition with this hysterical 90-minute holiday favorite.
One has to love this Blu Ray version of a great Christmas classic.  Great picture and sound - a must have for the Blu-ray player.
Great movie for the holiday.  I haven't seen this in a while.  One of the classics if you want to enjoy comedy over the holidays.
One of the best Christmas movies there is and I watch it multiple times during the holiday season. Will keep watching it every year!
We watch Christmas Vacation every Christmas, it's Tradition.  This DVD is great quality and packaged well.  Not much else to report!
Funny timeless classic, Chevy Chase at his best with the Hilarious Randy Quaid!Great cast!  Amazon seller fast shipping and professional!
what can i say about this movie. so funny love it. my whole family like it.so glad that i brought it.
From the start just the look on Chase's face made me smile. The rest of the movie was funny from beginning to end.
I had not seen it in years and forgotten how funny it was.  It is truly a Christmas classic for the family.
Hysterical movie.  Definitely not for small kids, but very enjoyable for teens & adults.  It is my favorite of the National Lampoon's movies.
What can be said about this movie?  After all Chevy Chase is in it and was a laugh riot. Good suporting cast also.
I WISH MORE FUNNY MOVIES WAS LIKE THIS ONE. I LOVE TO SEE MY IN LAW WATCH THIS SO THEY CAN STOP HANGING OUT MY HOUSE
National Lampoon's Christmas Vacation is a really funny Christmas movie always love to watch it around this time of year.
If you have never seen this, do yourself a favor and watch it.  It is a classic that is a must see!
This video is a favorite traditional Christmas movie for my family.it is funny,bitter sweet and everything works out in the end.
Very nice to see the movies from my childhood! There should not be a minimum number of words required for this. It is asking too much.
very goodhate writing reviews. makes me not want to order . have i reached 18 words yet  only 2 left  DONE!
This is such a great movie. I love it. I MUST BUY THIS DvD!!!!!Get the others too. SNAP!bye..
This, along with The Ref, are two movies I watch every Christmas. They still crack me up every time. Gotta love Chevy!
this is the best one of the Vacation flicks, a Christmas classic, this is so funny, it will make your sides hurt from laughing so much
Can it Really be Christmas without watching this wonderful Movie. We have a family tradition. We watch it every year.
I got this movie in a few days! It was brand new, never opened, great quality, and just a great movie!
The movie is almost an entire video of laughter.  Even though it was filmed about 30 years it's still a good movie.
Bought this to add to my holiday collection and watched it several times. Forgot how funny this and the original were
this movie is by far one of the best Christmas movies ever. it is no doubt in the top 5 on everybody's list. and bluray makes it that much better.
Wanna laugh, like a bit of sarcasm? Relax and enjoy Christmas with the most idiot family of America. Of ALL Americas. Funnier than their Europe trip.
This movie is timeless for anyone who has had a large family visiting for the holidays. We love our family very much but sometimes things happen
For many, many years we start our Christmas holiday by watching this right after Thanksgiving dinner. Funny, funny, funny, funny!!!!!!!
glad to have the dvd.  had it on vhs and watched every year.  glad to add the dvd version to my collection
Great movie. Great, great movie. A true Griswold Christmas. Cracks me up everytime. If you've never seen it or seen it 1,000x, I suggest buying it.
Great movie.  Just fun.  Yes it's stupid too, but so funny.  Have to watch it at least once every year.
I love to watch this movie with my family every year. My daughters asked me to buy it so we could watch it more often without the commercials.
An all time family favorite that is sure to get you into the holiday spirit, and that every dad can relate to.
I've always loved this movie and it makes me laugh as much as it did the first time I watched it YEARS ago!
I watch this every year and it just seems to get better with age!!  I love it, I will watch it again next year.
I gave this movie 5 stars, because I Love Love Chevy Chase... He's definitely a character. Always get a good laugh with all of his movies.
THIS MOVIE WILL MAKE YOU LAUGH.  IT IS A GREAT FAMILY MOVIE. IT WILL PUT YOU IN THE MOOD FOR CHRISTMAS
THIS MOVIE IS ONE OF MY FAVORITES...SO FUNNY...THIS IS CHEVY CHASE AT HIS BEST...WE WATCH THIS EVERY YEAR AND WE STILL LAUGH SO HARD...
Whenever I need a good laugh at Christmas I watch this movie.\It is truly one of the best comic holiday movies of all time.
This is my go-to movie when I want to get the Christmas cheer started.It's funny and great to watch again and again.
It would not be Christmas without this flick. An all time favorite, super super FUNNY.
I always buy my videos and cds from AMazon-top quality-quick ship. Best source for the best products you can buy
Family watches this every year at Christmas and like all the other favorites they were on VHS and just had to upgrade to dvd.
This movie has become a part of our Christmas.  Really puts you in the Christmas spirit.  One of our three favorite holiday pics.
this was one of Chevy C best films but it should have Been a Better Quality Tape--These Early Films was the Best of chevy
One of the all time best x-mas movies, and on Blu-ray.  How can you go wrong?  A must buy, great on HD big screen.
I already reviewed this and don't know why I have to do it again.  It's a great movie that I will be watching over and over again.
Still love to watch Chevy Chase and all the vacation movies. We watch this one every year so we decided to get the blu-ray. The kids love it.
Absolutely hilarious movie that I've watched more times than I would care to admit.  This one will have you rolling around on the floor.
This is a great movie!! Definitely one of my favorite holiday movies, I laugh the entire time. Chevy Chase's best movie.
I bought this movie because it is one of my favorite movies,I can watch it year round and not get tired of it
This is one of the most funniest movies to date. If you want to laugh, you have to see this movie.
This is a must have for anybody with a collection of Christmas movies. This is by far my favorite Christmas movie ever!
I love The Ref (as my fav Christmas flick), but it's not suited for ALL viewers so this is THE movie for the Christmas collection!
We watched this movie several times during the holidays. We never get tired of it and glad to own it finally!
Our whole family watched this movie on Christmas Eve. This will continue to be a family tradition each year. This movie is super funny!
This is without a dobt the best Christmas movie ever made! It reminds me of a lot of holiday shebangs I have been to over the years!
My favorite Christmas oriented comedy, period.Some folks have a Christmas tradition of food. I have a tradition of watching this.
Excelent Movie for those days and for enjoying with family, refreshing, funny, pop-corn movie. Chevy Chase is fantastic and very classic scenes
SO FUNNY AND CAN WATCH IT EVERY YR OVER AND OVER.  Great entertainment for guests, too.  It's a classic movie.
very happy with purchase, fast service, my family has watched this movie several times, and enjoy each time.
a classic, i've seen it a million times and i still laugh my head off.  i think we can all relate and that is what makes it so fun and so forever...
A must see every year.  I never tire of watching this funny movie. Every scene causes a laugh.  Chase never disappoints
This is one of my favorite all time Christmas classic. It reminds me of my uncle Doyle let bust the power grid with as many lights as possible.
What a great movie! It's so much fun and we watch it year after year! Finally had to buy my own copy.
How much do you really need to write in a review of one of the best comedies of all time.  This movie is awesome...go buy it!
Just a good old fashioned laugh at families stuck together for the holidays. Checy Chase at his best, lots of 80's outfits...just fun.
Sorry Christmas Story fans, but the Griswold family wins out in our house.  Arrived fast and picture looks great. Merry Christmas!!
Best movie ever!!! One we watch every year around Christmas time, Who doesn't love this movie? no complaints buy it!
This arrived in great condition and on time.A movie to add in with your Christmas movie favorites! Gets smiles and lugfhs everytime.
By far a Christmas classic and a tradition for our family to watch and it's all the better now in blu-ray!
Best movie ever very funny and well made. I loved all of the characters and how well they interfaced. Loved it!!
One of the best Christmas movies ever. I even watch it in the off season, I can probably quote the whole thing line for line.
We find this movie to be wonderful family entertainment. Have seen it before but it continues to be a favorite.
Great Christmas movie!  Chevy Chase and Randy Quaid is absolutely awesome in these roles and this is the best Vacation movie! Hands down!
Came very fast. One of the best wild and wacky movies ever made. Each of us has our own favorite scenes of chaos or disorder.
I see a bit of all of us in this one.  A hilarious twist on the Christmas story.  hehe ho ho ho
no Backward or Ahead as far as the Lip sync goes. This Dvd works well and lips are in sync with sound and words.  its Nice Thanks!
Personally, I don't get it. But my husband adores this movie. So, I guess it's a good one...according to him.
At our house, this is a christmas must see. Lots of action,  Thankfully our christmas always goes more smoothly then the Griswalds.
From beginning to end, this movie is full of laughs. It's the best christmas movie out there by far. Chevy Chase shines.
as always chevy chase is being funny for Christmas in this movie just like he was in the Vegas vacation and others
Hilarious, a classic!  It is so much fun to watch.  My family and I watch it every Holiday Season.  We never grow tired of it.
The Vacation series are so funny.  After the original one, this one is my second favorite.  I never get tired of watching this movie.
This is one of the must see Christmas movies!  It is hilarious and very entertaining for the whole family!  Enjoyed it!
Everyone I know has seen it so I bought it for me to keep up.  It is so funny and sweet.
How could you not love this movie? There're so many classic one liners in this movie that you'll be thankful you bought it.
Our family loves this movie and it is our tradition to watch it every Christmas. The lines and scenes never get old.
I love this movie, we watch it every xmas.  The quality is good and I am glad I bought it.
this is one of the funniest movies that i own.  a deffinate must have if you love to laugh and it is also fun for the family
A Classic to be sure......I found myself chuckling throughout this movie.A holiday favorite!It should be part of your collection.
Got this film for a good price. It's a classic at Christmas time. I can't say much more than that.
I love this movie! I have watched it at least once every Christmas since it came out. It is on my favorites list.
I enjoy all of Chevy Chase movies. In my opinion, this was one of his best comedy's & it will make you rock with laughter!
Chevy Chase is a must for Christmas holiday viewing. Make sure you ass this to the family collection for hit down fun during the season.
Love, love, love this movie.  Seen umpteen times and never get tired of it.  We like to have it playing while we decorate the tree.
A great addition to my Christmas movie library. It is my favorite of the &#34;N L Vacation&#34; series of movies.
A classic Christmas time movie.  We watch it every Christmes time.  Of all the Vacation movies it is the best movie.
One of the al time BEST holiday movies to have in your personal collection! Then add more lights to your house for Christmas.
Had to get this classic in blu ray.  It is a must watch every year during the holidays.  The quality is much better than standard DVD.
who's ever put christmas into a better and more realistic light than the makers of this film? it is a masterpiece!
I love this x mas movie. It got here in time as always and right b4 x mas day. I must have watched it 5 times already. thanks guys as always
A family tradition! My family and I watch this EVERY YEAR, a must for the collection! Classic humor, good fun for the holidays!
This is one of the most hilarious Christmas movies I have ever watched. I highly recommend this DVD to spread holiday cheer it will make you laugh.
got this for a gift and from what I have heard, they thought it was funny.  Have always enjoyed the national lampoon's movies.
I love free willy.  This was the first time I heard Michael Jackson sing.  He did a wonderful job.  I bought this movie for our great grandson.
I have this film, its really great for the family,amzing ending too that will shock us, just get this film for the family if u never saw it yet.
Very good family. this move will keep you watching until the end. Then will leave you hanging with what the next movie will bring. I love this movie.
I like this movie as well as the keep case. I have seen it a few times. Still love it.
My family loves this movie. It has several great messages all in one movie. I highly recommend this movie to any family.
Watched it with our grandkids -ages 7 and 3.  We all loved it.  It's great to still watch movies of this caliber.
how could a movie be so moving and have a beautiful soundtrack. it always makes me cry every time i watch it.
what a wonderful family film. the movie is realistic about troubles of a foster kid. who doesn't love willy?! amazing movie.
Free Willy spread the word about the plight of orca's held in captivity.  It raised awareness of how wrong it is.  A must see for any animal lover.
This is a great adventure movie that children and adults alike would Love!
another one I watch over and over I have forgotten how many times I have watched it.  I love it. the little boy was GREAT...good actor.
Good for the entire family to enjoy on movie night.  It's entertaining, fun and light-hearted.  I would highly recommend to other families.
i like this movie, it has pretty colors
ordered this to replace copy I gave a special student who really loved the movie...came quicker than I expected....Thanks so much
Even I liked the movie, It was well done and an uplifting movie. As everyone can guess, I am not a writer - so now I have enough words.
This is probably the 8th time that I have seen this and every  time it just gets better. Period pieces are interesting to me..Love the scenery.
This purchase was for me to share with my grandchild.  We both enjoyed the story and the time together.  I love making memories.
Great movie for odd and adults. A nice movie that people can learn from. It teaches about love, respect and all great things.
I definitely enjoyed this movie.  I think I had seen it a long time ago on Cable maybe. A very good family movie.
This was my favorite book as a child.  I wasn't disappointed with the dvd.  Brought all the memories back. Still a keeper!
I have seen several versions and this one is my favorite. The acting is wonderful and the story is very sweet. A very well done movie.
Best filmed version of this gentle tale.  Best actors, direction and photography.True to the story and with it's own added charm.
its nice to see sweet movies where good overcomes evil,  Also shows hope, dreams, ideas that take planning and time to fulfill.
Excellent condition.  Very prompt service.  This is a story my daughters loved when they were young.  A wonderful story everyone would like.
very nice movie to watch with the kids.I really enjoyed this movie.It will now go into my movie collection .
I really liked this movie and it is good for the whole family to watch.  I would highly recommend this movie to families to watch together.
Very well done drama with pint sized stars.  Great story and great acting.  Very enjoyable and entertaining.  Recommend it!  YES.
Very old story, well played in this version. My mother loved this story. Tugs at your heartstrings, good for all ages.
My daughter loves the old version of this movie.  I hope this is the one.  If it is, then I would buy it.
My daughter loved this movie, now she has children of her own.  Delightful way to spend a night enjoying this family classic.
Beginning to think I really like British movies.  Great for understanding the time period.  Story line was captivating and the scenery was very good.
This version of the Secret Garden is by far the best version.  Adults as well as kids will love and enjoy this movie.
Every child should see this movie. Remembered lovingIt as a kid.. Still holds true today. Beautiful imagery!A great family film!
I wanted to have a movie to watch with my little 5 year old girl and she loved this.  would recommend.
This is the best screen version of the book. All the characters are well-played by talented actors. Beautiful settings. 5 stars for children.
This is a good family movie. A father learns that even though his wife passed away, he still has a son that needs him.
Even as an adult, I find this movie to be wonderful and magical. If you have children or just want it for yourself this movie is a delight!
The story was enchanting and Margaret O'Brian was exceptional.  I have watched this movie two or three times and still find it wonderful.
Good classic movie for any age and any family :-) just one of those movies that's always good to go back too.
product came very quickly just in time for easter grandkids will be happy also great prices.  will look on site again for more.
Love this movie!  The girls were so cute when they were little and this is an excellent,kid-friendly movie.  My grandchildren will love it!
I love old school Olsen twin movies. This is a Halloween classic that I'm happy to enjoy with my set of twin girls!
I loved this movie as a child. It is great to watch around Halloween!! So glad that I found it!
This is the kind of movie the whole family can enjoy.  A great story line and a wonderful cast.  Is a Halloween movie without blood and gore.
Bought this to remember my childhood and it was every bit as good as I remember, definitely having my kids watch this!
Cute. We love Kate and Ashley Olsen's movies. Very hard to find these days though. Wish they had more of thier movies available
This is a classic for Halloween. My daughter loves this movie, it's not scary. All of the Olsen sisters kid movies are fantastic.!
My son loves to watch this movie - has a great message of hope in it and that good will triumph over evil!!  Highly recommend!
A perfect story for pre-teen to young teens that parents will love as well, VHS so older media but story is great.
I bought this as a gift for a 9 year old girl and she was ecstatic!! Great for young girls.
This was my sister's favorite movie when she was younger. As a present to her, I think this was just what she needed.
I loved that it was different yet had the same principles. Enjoyed watching it with my son. Would recommend this as a good family movie.
I loved it and they loved it at the Nursing Home.Thank you very much. Received promptly.RustyMindy
This is a really good movie; well done and good actors.  I enjoyed watching it.  The girl playing the Little Princess did a great job.
this movie is old but is really nice so sad, and sweet  my 2 little nieces love  it so much  I highly recomended
This was a great adventure movie for kids, with nice moral values and thoughts to boot.  it had an exotic side to the story, different than most.
I love and enjoyed this film i never get tried watching it, i also love it in black and white with Shirlee Temple ^i^
I have the VHS,of this.I love this movie,one of my favorite scenes is when Sara and her dad are touring Miss.Minchin's seminary in New York.
Must have for little girls it shows good and bad in the world and offers hope! This movie is different and has some sad parts but it teaches as well.
I am proud to own this movie. The story is beautiful,deep,touching, huge. I am 25 years old and It made me cry like a little girl. I love it!
Bought as a gift for a special little girl and she loved it.  I would recommend it for all little girls.
My Grand daughter has watched this several times and loves it. The storyline was interesting enough that I enjoyed watching it with her too.
The young actress did a good job and I think placing the story in NYC was nice also.  I thought the city looked like it should for early 1900s.
This movie is heart warming. Moms everywhere should watch this movie with their daughter. It will have you in tears at the end of the movie.
just loved this magical movie...the main character was just precious and how she made the best of her situation...good for kids.
This is a darn good, nostalgic flick any little girl or most old ladies would love. I love it and bought this for my granddaughter.
This was very entertaining and I would recommend it to anyone. It was very heartwarming and I would consider it for all ages.
This is from my favorite book as a child. Very happy to have found it in dvd to share with my children.
An interesting story line that held my attention.  Wasn't sure I was going to stay with it early on but glad I stayed with it.
This is a wonderful movie.  I have loved it for years and was thrilled to recently introduce my children to it. Highly recommended!
This is a great movie.  My little girl loves it.  The movie is as described.  I am very please with this purchase.  Will purchase more movies.
The show was wonderful I love when they put music in the show. I didn't know much about the cast but the show alone was fabulous.
I like this movie because of Mary Kate and Ashley Olsen. They save Nanny's farm from Nanny's son. I love horses.
Really liked the animation in the film. This is a cartoon version of the remakes of a great classic story.
It was a different turn from most DC comics I enjoyed it very much. and hope there are more like it
Great animated Batman movie. It is an enjoyable version of the comic book hero and his compatriots, Robin boy wonder, and Batgirl.
Out of all the movies they could have chosen, it was this one. It was a reward for being so good during snow days off from school
It's Batman and a great batman cartoon what is not to love. Freeze is a very good villain and the voice acting is top notch
DVD was received as advertized and in a timely manner.  Highly recommend this seller
Steven Seagal and Keenan Ivory Wayans definitely played off each other extremely well in this movie! Both are awesome in their roles!
One of his last great 3 title movies he made. I really liked it alot! One of my favorite Steven Segal movies ever!
The movie was fabulous and Segal himself was brilliant.  How can you NOT like the calmness in this great actor
I loved this film and you would love it too if you like Steven Seagal.  He lives up to his reputation as usual.  WOW
A son and a wife to love, now that is all gone, he is by himself with only a dog for company. He helps guard the juice.
I think this one delivered the most bleak and entertaining view of the three movies. Each has its own merit.
Just a fan of the Mad Max movies.  The movies are old but I still like the movies just because I do.
This is the major action movie of it's time, Mel Gibson is perfect in the role or an avenging warrior - highly recommended..
I am not going to bore you with saying I know everything about quality and imperfections. Enjoy the movie. It doesn't get any better then this.
Outstanding - they don't make movies like this anymore. Now it's all politically correct b.s. and boring pap with endless sequels of crappy movies.
A classic of its type - and not for everyone, but for those who like Mel Gibson and his adventures in the down under, it is fun to watch.
Great movie. The Mad Max series does not disappoint but The Road Warrior is by far the best of the series.
this is a good dvd concert from woodstock . my only observation is that this dvd has different songs then the original woodstock concert film .
Great music, great memories of that time period. It takes me back to a wonderful time of being young and free.
This has all the great bands from the late '60's, except the Stones and Beatles.  Changed the world.
Great for those old enough to remember and those young enough to find new appreciation.
Great transfer of a great film!
Classic movie filmed in documentary fashion. Sound quality very good - those musicians sounded so good live!!  No studio technology needed for them.
I can't wait to surprise some of my friends with this superb anniversary edition of the Woodstock music festival of 1969
I love it mainly for the Ten Years After video, I wish their entire set was shown and a lot of thos other stuff could be on disc 4 or someplace.
It's a shame I didn't go to this I was invited everything. The movie is very good. Lots of great groups played there.
Captures many of the timeless memories of the era and those magical days and nights of Woodstock. I recommend it.
A Pure delight of a film. I will think you will like it. With actors like these you will have to...
Finally added this movie to MY dvd collection.....I so enjoy watching this over & over, love a GREAT love story
This is a wonderful movie, and I watch it almost every night.  It arrived in great shape and was packaged very very well.
This movie was exceptionally good.  I have watched it several times!  Must see!
Bought this DVD to replace my mom's VHS copy. It is a favorite movie of hrs and she is very pleased to have it on DVD.
Clint Eastwood and Meryl Streep- it doesn't get any better than this. I definitely recommend watching this movie if you love romance.
GOOD FILM MAKING BY EASTWOOD BUT HE DID NOT FIT THE PART THIS IS A FILM THAT FIT ROBERT REDFORD  MUCH BETTER
I just love this movie! It is similar to a part of my life and I really relate to it.
One of my favorite movies. Meryl Streep is super. Also worth making a trip to see where this film was made.
One of the saddest movies I ever watched but I was very happy to be able to add it to my dvd collecton
Great book!  Great movie!
A movie that makes a tear come to my eye every time I watch it. Another one of my favorites.
This is a fantastic movie. I love to watch this at least once a week. Good story and an outstanding cast. A movie I will never tire of watching.
This movie is excellent.  Even though it may be morally wrong, it is well written and tugs at the strings of one's heart.  I highly recommend it.
beautiful love story, Clint Eastwood is great as a romantic lead and Meryl Streep never disappoints, would recommend this DVD
I bought this movie because it is a great love story- even though the woman was being unfaithful to her husband.
:)  great!!!!!!
Love the movie and have seen it many times. It is a classic that I watch at least once a year.
Wish they would make more like this. A beautiful love story.Everyone who like romance movies should see this.Highly recommend!
a great movie. have watched it  30+ times. love the era it is from .. grew up in that time.
I love this movie. I can watch this movie over and over. This is a must for any movie collection.
I have no idea why anyone would call this a "snooze-fest". I can't add any more besides whats already been said. This is a great movie.
This movie was great. It had a great cast which brought the story alive. It followed the play word for word keeping true to the author
Wonderful movie! It's easy to see why this is a classic. Vivian Leigh has relapses into Scarlet occasionally but it's ok. Great psychological drama
A wonderful rendition of the Tennessee William's play. Phenomenal performances by Vivian Leigh and Marlon Brando. A Must See classic.
Outstanding movie and DVD.  I tell you, this cast and movie should have swept the top 6 categories at the academy awards.I bet it could today.
It doesn't get any better than this! The exorcist is one of my favorite movies. I prefer the original version.
the movie is one of the earliest movies I've watched to scare the kid in me when watching it and now as an adult to watch and enjoy!
A Classic.The standard that set the bar & pushed the limits.Nothing else needs to be said..this is the one to watch.
After all these years, it is still one of the greatest horror movies ever!!! l have one adult son that will never watch it again!!!
Yes, very good movie and scary!! You must see it and don't be scream hahaahah!
One of the most classic horror stories of all time. It is as frightening today as it was in the 70's. Truly a masterpiece and timeless classic.
The Exorcist is a horror classic which cannot be ignored.An extended review is coming shortly.
Dug this up for Halloween. Still a hair raising chiller to behold with real acting and a great story line plus the surprise ending.
they dont make horror films like this anymore, not for the children, but a must have for any horror collection
Outstanding movie with a fright factor of one.Nothing to dislike, this is a classic movie that will scare anybody that sees it.
This movie was good , i mean classics are always good. they remake The Exorcist alot but the 1973 version is the best.
Beyond reviews and discussions. Had never seen this version before and truly enjoyed the movie. Still can scare the .... out of you. Must buy
One of the all time greats. However its not in the top 100 of AFI'S best ever films! Shame! Thank for the great service!
This is the most frightening movie ever! You will be scared beyond belief.  Sensitive veiwers should steer clear.
Always thought this was a scary movie. Seems there has been an increase in movies where possession takes center stage. I think this one is the best.
One of the best "follow the novel" movies made.  It is finely acted, and much like possessions are described.  Definitely one to watch.
The Exorcist was amazing even without the deleted scenes.  But if it's one of your favorites, the director's cut is a must see.  Loved it!
back then with no cji fake affects so forth this movie is the one to learn from u can without all that CJI animation make a great and scary film.
This is classic horror and it arrived in mint condition. I am pleased with the movie and will watch it again & again. Thank you. Kim Jones
This still has to be one of the best all time horror flix.  I had not seen it for 15 yrs and it was was still creapy.
It had been many years since I had seen the movie.  It is still as good as the first time I saw it.
Every time i sit down to wacht this movies it gives me the creeps,I really enjoyed this version.
If you havent seen the Exorcist then you should see it already. This is one of the best horror movies of all time.
Great DVD, was really very graphic, and enjoyable, I guess were just strange, my husband and I really Like these kind of DVD.
When I saw, this for the first time I was scared, I own the 25th edition the making scared me, well if you like horror films this is the, one.
People, I'm sure I speak for everyone when I say this is an all time classic. The people who made this on DVD should know that!
If by chance you believe in Heaven and Hell, this movie is spooky!  Especially if you watch it by yourself!
Excellent film, even after over 40 years! An excellent addition to my horror collection! I bet if you rent, it,  you'll buy it!!
It's a great movie. Don't watch it alone. One great horror Film. They don't make movies like this anymore :(
Highly recommend seller. The movie was suspense, very scary and great actors! Loved it! Thank you, I will watch it often.
One of the great older horror films.  Actually had a story line and who can forget Linda Blair as the little girl possessed.
God vs Devil so damn creepy! I wonder what a remake would be like in our time now with all advances in film...
This is always my go to thriller. I watch a couple of times a year. It is a classic of it's era!!!
A masterpiece, though the first act runs too long.  Never been equaled.  I hope that no one gets the idea to remake it.  It's perfect.
this is still the scariest movie i've ever seen ,when i fist seen it year's ago, i had nightmare's! it's amazing what the devil can do to someone!
This is a multi-faceted, in-depth film.It made me think, love, and cry.I would recommend it for an adult audience!!
The best film I've seen in a long while.  it is so engrossing and so many surprises.  I'll watch it again.
The cinematography and acting are just amazing!  While the plot itself is a grim topic, the story line weaves in and out so smoothly.
Great film a lot of action and quite suspensful.  The actors were great and Robert Dinero and Brad Prit were exceptional
A story of kids being friends in their early years, and remaining friends through bad times and through the good.
Great movie. Solid characters and story. None of the big stars dominated the plot or over acted.  I enjoyed watching.
Wow what a great movie!!  I didn't know what to expect when i clicked to watch it but now it is one of my favorites!!
This movie was a great story but disturbing too. I was well done and I was swept away with the story and the telling
I really enjoyed this film.  Not the subject matter I would normally choose, but this movie kept my attention throughout.  Loved it.
This had been one of my favorite movies for a long tim! SSince I was a kid I appreciated th is story, you won't regret it at all!
Very thought-provoking and well done.  Some great stars and great acting.  I had seen this years ago but enjoyed watching it again.
Said situation, but a really really good movie. From the old days. Brad must have been younger in this movie
It is a sad story, but wow it is a great movie with awesome actors!!!
Can you ever really go wrong when you have a movie with pitt or De Niro in it?  How about when they are in the movie together? Great movie
This one is a little old but very well acted and good.  The story line is unique and not so predictable.
Great story line. One of the few movies I truely enjoyed seeing this year. Some of the best acting one could ask for.
Not a sci-fi.  But really a human story.  Why are people so mean to one another?  Well you just have to watch!
I watched this movie on my kindle fire and had no problems watching it.  It is a good movie filled with lots of excellent actors :)
Interesting story. It has a great cast of actors who perform well. You won't be disappointed. This is not for chldren
THis movie is really good. It's kind of sad, and disturbing. It seems like something Scorcese would've produced, it was really good.
I've watched this movie several times.  I have always enjoyed it and it has a great cast.  I consider it a classic.
This is a well acted movie. I have no doubt that horrible things like this do go on in some institutions.It'a probably not a movie for everyone
acting and true story line great! nostalgic for New yorkers and people who visited it,make part of your home library
"Justice in the courtroom is blind. Out on the street, the bitch has eyes."I love love love this movie. Friendship and loyalty go a long way.
An excellent movie depicting how bad things can be in a juvenile detention center.  Terrific actors!  Sad, because it's based on a true story.
Liam Neeson is excellent in the lead role. A long film, but very much worth it. A good explanation of the period of Irish struggle.
Great actors, great story.  And the fact that it is true makes it really special.  Of course Liam Neisen is so likable.
An excellent 'documentary' of the fight for independence from the British Crown and  early stages of the subsequent Irish civil war.
I really knew nothing about the history of Ireland so this film was quite informative.  The performances were wonderful. I highly recommend it.
Great depiction of Michael Collins and company. Liam Neeson bad ass as usual. Great acting, powerful story. Love the movie!
I have seen Michael Collins more times than I can count.  It looked amazing on my Kindle Fire!  Will probably watch it again!
You will certainly love this product. you need to get this if you don't have it. it is great. yes
I've always loved this movie, and it's very hard to find in stores.  It's exactly what I expected, and I'm quite satisfied--
Another good DVD to watch. some people can write a book on nothing, I can't and won't. All I can say is I liked it, I think you will to.
Wonderful action movie that I truly like.  When it became available in DVD, I bought it.  This will go with the rest of my action movies.  Thank you
This review is simply for the Blu-Ray quality, which is very good. I'm glad I bought this as I like the movie.
I watched it on the silver screen many years ago and loved it. Just got the video and still love it. I highly recommend it. Great action movie.
Blu-Ray In Excellent Shape.  Very Fast Delivery. Awesome Seller.  Will Buy From Again.
Great Movie very entertaining lots of action, I really enjoyed watching it. Arnold Schwarzeneggar played his roll real well.. It has a happy ending..
I enjoyed his total recall, terminator 2 and kinder garden cop. but this one is a good one to have.
Certainly not the greatest movie out there but still fun to watch. When I saw it was released on bluray I jumped on it for a very good price
An exciting movie of the working of our government to hide informants and the underworld's attempt to get to them.
Arrived quickly, in time to give as a gift and my son loved it (14 yrs old), he's a huge Arnold Schwartznegger fan!
Great movie for Arnold. Vanessa did a great job as well. The Blu Ray transfer is Fantastic!!! A must for your collection.
it is a very great movie filled with a great cast of stars maybe one of arnolds best just buy
Love this movie and love how fast I received it. Just as described. One of the better Schwarzenegger movies out there imo
getting my favorite movies in DVD.my VCR no longer works.do not have a VCR to play my tapes.so all of my favorite movies-Im getting in DVD.Thank-you.
Probably one of his better, later movies....i enjoyed every minute of action. Bare bones release but the price is cheap for Blu-Ray.
I enjoy Arnold's movies and needed this for my collection.  This was just another replacement for an old, used VHS tape.
Classic, great action and light humor. Weapons are still cutting edge. Supporting cast is above par. Just showed my 16 year old son he loved it.
Wow! What picture and sound. "You will not be disappointed", oh and the movie is pretty good too.
Come on, how do yo not like Ford? This is a great set of movies. I highly recommend them! Love!
Loved it the first time and again and again. Can't believe its already 20 years plus old. Classic movie with great effects
Excellently done!  I would highly recommend this DVD.  The drama is well acted and the finale is worth watching.
AWESOME MOVIE HARRISON FORD AT HIS BEST
one of the best films that harrison ford acted in. there is action and very good story. if it was on the big screen again i would go see it again.
How can anyone fault this man!! I've seen most of his movies but somehow missed this one. Suspense was great. Would see it again.
Love this,  it was a great movie and TLJ was superb...Hope these stories go for a long time but am afraid they will just stop after the U S Marshals
very exciting and will keep you glued to your seat.  i have just watched (2006) for first time......
Excellant remake of the series. Enjoyed it very much a great additionto our collection.
Excellent HD picture with no problems.Enjoyed movie and Amazon service.Watched it streaming via my Roku.Great action movie.would recommend to anyone.
Great movie, excellent acting, photography, special effects, and an enjoyable story.  A must see!  Few movies have achieved this level of excellence.
I was happy to have this on DVD, this is a classic. I wanted my kids to watch it and renting it is about the same cost as just buying it.
Really action packed suspenseful flic. No nudity no gore. Just clean action. I miss this kind of movie.
This movie is one of our family's favorite movies.  I would purchase this DVD again, and for my children and grandchildren.
This is one of my favorite movies. It was great to finally find it on bluray at such a great price.
Harrison Ford I Can't Get Enough Of. He Plays An Excellent Part.Harrison Really Stirs The Emotions. Have To Fell His Pain.
BUY IT NOW - Simple it's a good movie to see it and enjoy it with friends and family in HD-DVD.
You just can't beat Harrison Ford. He did very well with a very well written script. Awesome movie.
Excellent movie.This movie will keep you on your feet.Harrison is awesome in this movie. Totally action packed.What more can I say.
I love old movies. This one turned out Perfect. No problems with it at all.  I love the company that deals with you
Great movie! AN oldie, but a goodie. Harrison Ford and Tommy Lee Jones at their best. It even had subtitles, a big plus for me.
i love Harrison Ford and he really does a great job in this movie. I loved it and could watch it over and over again.
This movie keeps you on your toes and the inventive ways that Harrison Ford avoids capture will keep you watching.
Great Movie with lots ofexcitment. This is one of Harrison Ford's best movies. Great supporting cast. I loved Tommy Lee Jones in this movie.
I loved this movie as a kid. It seemed like it took a long time to come out on blu-ray. It was worth the wait.
a great remake of a good series I was honestly surprised at how good it was, and I have watched it over and over
Innocent guy, done wrong, tries to recover.  Cops, large machines, suffer most.Formulaic.  The best bits happen early.
No matter how often you watch this it is always exciting. One of the greatest movies ever made...
I was updating my collection of movies from VHS to DVD because we love this movie I definitely wanted it in DVD.
A wonderful classic.  With an epic train crash.  Always love a Harrison Ford movie.  Tommy Lee Jones just adds more spice to the movie!
This is a very good movie to watch and learn about so in case someone falsely accuses you of murder what you can do to get out of it.
We just got our 1st Blu-ray player and this was one of the movies we wanted to upgrade from DVD. Love these movies especially on Blu-ray.
I was completely satisfied with the product & the service. It was in great shape and arrived earlier than expected.
This is just a great movie!!!!  Harrison Ford and Tommy Lee Jones together......this is a must own.  We just watched it last night AGAIN.
A great movie.  One of my all time favorites.  You will also definitely enjoy U.S. Marshals.  Both fantastic movies!
A remake movie but well done by Ford a a a a a a a a a a a a
Great picture and sound on this Blu-ray release.  A excellent movie for any one's sci-fy collection, and well worth the money!
What is there to say ... this is a early genre classic that set the standard for years for futuristic movie settings.Just get this already!
riveting from the start. this is a master work and visually gripping. the story line is powerful and compelling. the acting is superb.
This fully satisfied my completionist tendencies, coming as a book-style case with all the different versions of the film and some production stills.
Several versions of the film a nifty collector's case and an excellent film.  GG's! You can't go wrong with this movie.
One perfect DVD! :)  It runs great and will play on the computer :)  I will definitely make more buying from you!
Extremely well written, directed and acted. I'm not one for revisiting films I've already seen, but this one was worth another viewing.
A great classic from a time past. Amazing how the author seemed to know this might come up in today's age of robots and such.
still great dystopic vision of future Los Angeles. Picture quality is good. Story is intersting. Acting is good
The best of sci-fi noir, which is an underused but always good genre. Pure spectacle. Also try Dark City.
Finally, a beautiful transfer of the movie to DVD. I like it even more than I did back in the day. Thanks Ridley for another great scifi romp.
Everything I hoped it would be. Beautiful BluRay. 5 versions, all beautiful to watch.  A true classic.  An amazing work of art.
Not your typical Harrison Ford movie, but very entertaining.  Some of the violence wasn't necessary for the script but it was still a great movie.
This movie has always had a special place in my heart and always will. A classic that will last for generations.
always an amazing movie, and the Blu Ray edition just makes it that much better! this will always be a classic to me.
I LOVED THIS ONE IT WAS PRETTY AWESOME MY FULL REVEIW WOULD JUST BE A WASTE JUST OWN THIS MOVIE AND THATS THAT!!!!
Long time no see, but as good as I remember!!!
Just thinking about the sequel they're going to make made me want to buy this fantastic movie that Ridley Scott directed.
It was a little different verson from the one I had on VHS, but it was just as good and the quality was excellent.
Stille on of the best sci-fi movies ever made and will always be timeless. Much better without narration although one can turn it on.
This 5 disk set for $27 is a good deal. 3 blue ray disks and two DVD disks are in the box.
Sharp and great color; this is a classic and in Blue Ray it really shines!!! A must have!
Such a treat to have all the various versions on one bluray.  The transfer is gorgeous and well worth purchasing.
A beautifully realized vision of an ugly future, Blade Runner is one of the early examples of why Ridley Scott is our greatest living director!
He say you Blade Runner, my all time favorite SciFi Movie and this collection is the Bomb!
I've only seen a certain version of this and I'm glad I now have all the other versions. It's great!
Keep your eye on this film. This film easily makes onto anybodys top 100 list. I plan on upgrading to blu-ray.
Finally a collector's edition they got right. Nothing more to be said than 5 stars.
A classic.The original cut was also good.  Somware betwen the two would be perfect.
What are you waiting for? If you're bothering to read this than just buy it, you won't regret it.
this is one of my all time favorites! i dont have alot of movies on blu-ray but this one makes any collection seem complete!
This is by far the best treatment this movie has ever seen! You can feel the attention it got!Now I hope I can sell it to get the Blu-Ray version!
Great Movie with Excellent features ! A must for fans of Bladerunner or Harrison Ford Fans. Who knows a few years from now we may need Bladerunners.
On my wish list for a long time.. for upgrading my favorites to Blu-Ray. Excellent, bold, crisp video, fantastic sound.
This movie is so much better without the narration. It seems to flow much easier and makes the characters more three dimensional.
This movie prooves Harrison Ford is one of the best actors in the history of cinema.
I am a huge fan of Blade Runner so purchasing these dvds was like a trip to heaven for me!
Very Enjoyable, Harrison Ford does an excellent job, I've enjoyed it for many years and wanted to add it to my collection.
Loved this movie when I first saw it in (1989?)  Rutger Bauer is outstanding, as is Harrison Ford.
I always wanted to have this movie in my collection so it was great to buy the Collector's Edition. Very pleased.
I can sum this up in one word...FINALLY! I still watch this film in awe.
One of the best SF movie, I ever seen. I imagine that could be a real story and it is not easy predictable.
Great set of 5 discs, a classic movie, love it on blu-ray!  Definitely would recommend this for all my friends
Great concept that was greatly presented. The omnipresent state was accurately portrayed and the chosen cast's performances were spot-on.
A CLASSIC~~~~BUT WE STILL NEED DTS OR DTS-ES FOR THE FINAL TOUCH. OTHERWISE IT'S FLAWLESS~~!!!!
The music by Vangelis ... the atmosphere ... the story ... the characters.  This movie is a masterpiece.
A true classic!And the picture is so crisp on Blu-Ray!Very highly recommended!
Love the packaging for this great, ahead of it's time sci-fi masterpiece.  Still like the original, rather than the re-issues.
This covers all endings and so satisfies everyone!  A great movie- love it- and all the players are unique in this movie.
A definitive collection, no doubt. Voight-Kampf case design is very cute and chic. Most valuable piece in my archive after LOTR Extended Edition.
Love the film, in all incarnations, love the explanations of the different versions and the commentary.  A very nice package at a great price.SJ
Superb quality for a true classic Sci-Fi. This is a work of genius and it was wonderful to see it in all its brilliance after so many years.
This package is a great package for all that love this movie. I recommend it highly.
Have a friend who wanted this because he likes making home movies and is interested in making movies for his family
2nd best SF film ever, right after 2001. Rutger Hauer improvised the line about 'tears in rain' near the end of the movie.
the special effects alone are enough reason to watch this masterpiece
I have enjoyed this movie and loaned it to a few friends. Quick delivery in perfect condition at a bargain basement price. NeedIsaymore?
As sci-fi goes, this ain't half-bad; in fact it's great
cinematic poetry. the finest sci fi movie of it's time and maybe of all time. romantic and eerie and deadly.
THIS IS GREAT FOR DATE NIGHT OR JUST MOVIE NIGHT WITH OLD TEENS......GREAT OLD SCHOOL MOVIE MAKE IN 1982..GOOD BY YOURSELF
my son is way into tornadoes, so this was a fun one that's not so scary for my son. just entertaining
I own this Limited Edition Collector's Set and 'tis one of my Favorite Movies ever :P
A great movie that I enjoy watching in the spring. It's a seasonal thing. Much better than watching the cut version on re-run.
I absolutely love about how this DVD has plenty of special features for me to enjoy including two previews of it.
I ORDER THIS FOR ONE OF MY BEST FRIENDS BECAUSE HE WANTED IT ON BLUE-RAY AND HE LOVED IT. IT IS A VERY AWESOME MOVIE.. MUST BUY..
love this  movieyou wont be sorry you got thisyou can watch with your  boy friend or kidsthank  you  got this on time
I am happy to report this is a great version of one of my favorite movies.  Plenty of extras and great quality overall!
a host of good actors in this movie make this stand out. u don't find too many good tornado movies. but this one was .
This is a wonderful movie about twisters, educational with a little bit of humor. It leaves you in awe, and grateful to all the storm chasers
While it's a little hokey seeing a cow flythrough the air.  You get caught up inthe chase for the perfect storm.\Enjoyable movie!
I have the movie, it is a great movie.  I enjoy watching it over and over again.  It's a very exciting movie.
avatar has nothing on this movie this is the best movie in american history. the era it was made in considering that everthing looks very real.
Great acting by everyone.Love the story. Great action and love for everyone. Even funny at times too. Would recomend to anyone.
Great action movie.  Enjoyed performances of all actors.  Story action moves fast and exciting.  Loved it.  We show these with company on occasion.
I love the action and drama of this movie.  I am a big fan of Bill Paxton and Helen Hunt.  Together they are great
The product was very high quality and an enjoyable movie experience.  I highly recommend it to anyone.  The product was very high quality.
One of my family's favorite movies and a great transfer in Blu Ray...great picture, great sound. Well worth the wait...
Shows the destruction of tornadoes and how much needs to be learned about them with a cute love story thrown in
The funnest game of Twister I've EVER seen! Good movie, good cast. Watch it miss this house, hit that house, and then come straight for you.
This movie is awesome. I makes you feel you are right there. The effects make the movie. Actors are great too!!!
I saw this movie years ago and it has always been one of my favorites.  I had on VHS and wanted to add it to my DVD library.
liked this film for many reasons. the top being that is was funny. it also had enough action in it to keep your attention without being gruesome.
I like disaster films, I don't have to live through it. I like Helen Hunt.  The special effects are great.
This movie was excellent, the scenes and action were excellent. This is a must see dvd movie for everyone who love these action movies.
the dvd I got was in good shape the disk was in good shape twister is very good  very dramatic
I loved it when it was at the theatre; i saw it twice then and it's still a great movie.
This movie has a great cast and plot. Awesome special effects.The tornados are so realistic in this film it is scary at times .Worth a view.
Awusume movie I love this movie its funny in some parts I watch this all the time i would recommend this movie to everyone.
Special f/x hold up even 11 years later!  My son and I love this movie and watch it in the winter when we're longing for summer!
Okay, suspend reality. Sit back and enjoy pure entertainment. Isn't that what all the best movies do? One of my all time favorite action movies.
I love the movie anyway and I knew what was coming.  I still ducked when the twister came.  Blu-ray is the only way to see a movie this good
A thrilling yet it has some funny and very moving moments with romance mixed in a great movie to get and watch
Looks good to me on Blu-Ray. I don't see any grain like someone said before.
the reason i hate bill paxton now. this movie made my ass hurt. nothing tastes right anymore. i start to smell funny every time this movie comes on.
I love this movie..had it on VHS and wore it out, so I had to replace it on dvd. One of those movies that I can watch over and over.
I have seen this movie several times but I wanted to get it for my collection. I received it very fast. I do appreciate that very much.
Helen Hunt did a bang up job in this movie. Her study of tornados is really done very well plus the romance is done very well.
excelente producto, me trae gratos recuerdos, muy buena calidad de dvd, lo compraria de nuevo para regalarlo, lo recomiendo a todos.
Had this movie on VHS, so bought it on DVD.  Good movie.  It has been on TV so I think at this point, everyone has seen it.
Had to have this movie.  I had looked for it everywhere and finally came upon it here.  A classic to watch time and time again!
I have seen this movie countless times on TV and would always stop and watch it and I am happy that it is now on Blu-Ray.
A classic and a must see!  First-timers, you'll love it and you will watch it over and over.  I never get tired of this movie!
Twister is the best move I've seen on Tornado's, a must watch for all.  Twister is one of those movies you can watch over.
Full of love, romance, and plenty of edghe of your seat action. This is one of Bill Paxtons movies. And definatelty worth to buy.
the product was great, and the service faster and better than I expected.  Will be happy to do business with you again
alot of suspense in the twister movie great actors wil shop again soon thanks bill
We are getting this movie for my husband, he loves it and we could never find it in our stores, so we got now
This movie is wonderful! My dad loves clint eastwood movies and I know he will love this one!  Thanks for getting movie to me so fast!
The show was exciting . I moved along and kept you interested. Really liked  the action and acting. The plot and people were intresting.
Great movie! If you're a Clint Eastwood fan like me, I guaruntee that you'll love it.
Because my husband likes this movie so much, purchased for a friend who also likes it.  Don't make movies like this too much - too bad.
Bought this as a gift for my husband as this is his favorite Western.  Love the bonus disc!
I always liked the anti-hero film, and it seems Clint deconstructs his western hero in this one. Still, a great replacement of my VHS copy..thanks!
Im a Clint Eastwood fan so most every movie he make i like to watch.Go ahead make my day.
If you are a Clint Eastwood fan Unforgiven is a no brainier fantastic acting by Eastwood,Morgan Freeman AND Gene Hackmen.
a little dark for what i like in a western but classic Clint all the way.  loved it.  Wish he would do more
love these videos and my husband loves them all the time and so its apart of making my husband happy
Good movie with a lot of action and adventure, some suspense and a good cast of characters that execute their roles well.
I think this is one of Eastwood's best movies, and I love most of his work. Gritty and powerful, and the writing is just superb.
This movie has tremendous realism, and almost believable context. Loved it. Good guy always wins. Roy Rogers taught me that.
I have never seen this movie and I enjoyed ever second of it.  It is a must watch and a recommend to friends.
Great Eastwood movie! Recommend it if you love Clint. Caution, there is some sex and violence. I wonder if this is based on a true story?
It's the best western that I have seen in 63 years. Eastwoood, Freeman, and Hackman, and Harris at their best.One hell of a movie.
I personally haven't watched this DVD; however, others in my family have and said it was great.
Received in a very timely manner and in great condition. I would definitely order from this vendor again!
A classic, high quality Western with strong characters that define the times. One of the best.
This one was a great movie to get and was great to see. this is for any fan of his.
Very Good Clint Eastwood movie. Not fully action packed as some might think but the story is good and very entertaining.
More true to life than most people know.God Bless America! .God Bless America! .God Bless America! .God Bless America!
Clint Eastwood at his finest.  This is a great movie and a must see for any western film buff, or even an Eastwood fan.
Pretty awesome movie. Old movie but still a great watch. Very well made. A great buy for the personal collection.
MY SON WANTED THIS FOR THE LONGEST TIME. HE IS SO HAPPY WITH IT. GREAT MOVIE.
Awesome Clint Eastwood in this Western. Since A Fistful of Dollars,this film is so great and Clint back on top in 1992.
Its a clint Eastwood movie. This is my favorite C Eastwood western topped with M Freeman and G Hackman makes it great.
This is a great movie, wonderful acting and not with the 'good ending' most movies have.  I love all the actors in this movie
Great classic western. Keeps you thinking. Clint Eastwood is great. If you like westerns of old this is a must see.
clint is a great actor and director.  admire most of his works, this included.  wondered why he became republican though.
There's not much to say. Great movie. I had it on VHS. I needed a clean version for my DVD collection. It a class of it's own.
what do you have to say.... OSCARS great action  like SCAR-FACE Western...style OUTSTANDING for any-one whom  does not have this in his collection.
This is one of the great American westerns of all time.  Period.  All the performances are excellent.  Look at the cast!!  Are you surprised?
Another excellent western movie by Clint Eastwood.If you like his other western movies then you will not be disappointed with this one.
Arrived in perfect condition.  Good plot, good acting, plenty of action. We would recommend it to anyone with any interest in this genre.
Whip up a bowl of your favorite popcorn and settle in for an excellent movie. Great story, great acting, beautiful cinematography.
the movie was excellent, aAND I WAS VERY PLEASED THAT THE TIME AND THE ITEM WAS AS DESCRIBED BY THE SELLER.thanks.
You can always count on Clint Eastwood for a good movie.  They are all very entertaining.  I never mind seeing them over and over again.
Clint Eastwood was really good in this movie. I really loved this movie. Showed another side to Clint Eastwood, Amen.
One of the best Clint Eastwood movies I have ever seen. I love all the old ones and the new ones...Watched it several times and will again...
Enjoyed, good action
What can I say.  I really loved this video.  It will very likely become a classic.  Smiles, Beverly C. Sanders
Micheal Keaton was the best Batman of all and Jack Nicolson as the Joker made to movie as close as you can get to the original comic charaters.
A classic movie from when I was young. The condition is great and both of the discs work great, and play all the way through fine.
no issues with the dvdgreat classic moviemust havefun fun funhow many more words do you want?
They did a good job on this blu-ray, great extras from the dvd, sound is great and so is picture. No dts, however as the dvd had.
Michael Keaton was the best Batman ever. His acting ability of having good and dark side was simply amazing. And Jack need I say more!!
i loved it its still a fun show to watch after all these years and its look sooo coool on blu-ray
The Best Batman movie. Val Kilmer was the 2nd best. Michael Keaton has a nice black Batman costumeBatman (Two-Disc Special Edition)
Works good..I love this film always have. Trying to get most if not all of them.
I loved this as a kid and i still love it now,all batman fans should own this.
Love this series. I found the price, quality and content to be exactly what I was looking for. Worth the price.
One of Jack Nicholson's best roles. Burton really did do an amazing job on this. I think Keaton was like his Depp for the early 90's there.
This was a great movie. With a lot of excitement. I just love a good movie with michael keaton in it. LOVED IT.
Love the original Batman with Michael Keaton.  Classic movie.  The other Batmans just were not as good as the original.
My son loves this movie he is into super heros and watches this all the time.  It is a real good movie and teaches kids good is best.
Great movie, great price, great watch.  Definitely a must see!  One of the best Batman movies yet.  Can't miss it!
Just as great a movie as all the other ones.  This is the one where Keaton made his first movie and again a great performance.
I love this movie when it first came out. This is a great movie. Tim burton kick butt for this film.
This is a GREAT movie, all star cast, excellent in entertainment. One of my faves...
The box and disc labeling are great and the disc is operating perfectly.  I look forward to watching it over the years.
I am not the world's biggest Matthew McCounaughey fan, but I love this movie, and he is fantastic in it.
Great Movie Entertainment.  Very well done.  Matthew is great in thisSandra plays a small part-disappointing.  Still great talents involved.
These two have the best chemistry in this movie and the trail and drama in between are head on.One of the best movies I've ever seen.
This is a very good dramma. this movie is really good. samul l. jackson is awesome in this movie.  this is a must see
This looks great in HD.  I didn't think it would look this good since it is so old.
This movie was a very good one to watch. Great actors are in it and I would highly recommend it.......
Great movie!  Brilliant characters, acting, direction and story. One of my all time favorites.
This screenplay improves on the novel - though it helps if you've read it to know that..  Great cast, well acted.  Good story
i like this movie. it's not so much a whodunnit as more of a why it was done. the courtroom drama is great.
Sandra bullock does a wonderful job in this move. It really makes you think how how things were done in the past.
The theme of this movie is that of "To Kill A Mockingbird" with a modern setting and a guilty but justified twist. Wanted it for my Library.
This moive was excellent, my whole family watch it and was very expressed, the color and sound in perfect condition, Thank you for a great movie.
I read the book and the movie was very close to the book. I really like this movie. I have watched it many times and it is worth seeing. again.
very very nice
A great story about a white lawyer defending a black man who was jailed for killing two rednecks that raped his young daughter. Not for the kids!
One of Grisham's best.  The movie is very well adapted from the book.
this was a great action thriller movie awesome but only recommend adults to see thank you for the DVD it arrived on time an as described
This is a great movie to watch also and it is wonderful to add to my collection want be loaning this one out neither.
great movie .I enjoy the actors in the movie. any one that enjoys watching movies. I liked the movie. I think 0ther people would like it.
THIS IS A CHRISTMAS PRESENT SO I STILL HAVE IT BUT I HAVE SEEN IT BEFORE AND IT IS GOOD.
This DVD came on time and it was neatly wrapped.  I have watched it on rainy days time and time again.  Great book too.
Wonderful movie i love it and the people in the movie are some of my favorites..such a heart felt movie..
I think this is a perfect movie for anyone who has doubts in capital punishment. Shows a lot of &#34;character&#34; in many of the characters.
GLAD WE BOUGHT THIS ONE- IT WAS REALLY GOOD! YOU WON'T FALL ASLEEP DURING THIS- LOTS OF INTRIGUE! IT WILL STAY IN OUR COLLECTION TO WATCH AGAIN.
I think that this is one of the best movies that Matthew McConaughey has done. Excellent preformance
This is my favorite movie and the price was right at auction.  Came speedily and in brand new condition!
great movie fast delivery
One of the best vampire movies out there. Great story about the things an immortal would go through. If they actually existed that is.
The cast in this has surpassed themselves. Fantastic movie to watch. I loved it and so will most others!:)
This was a great movie for all the Twilight people to see. Brad Pitt is great as a vampire. I would recommend this.
This is the greatest vampire movie of all time. I read the book a long time ago and was pleasantly surprised that the movie got it right.
Great suspenseful horror with a plot that keeps your attention.  If you like vampire movies you will love this movie.
Who doesn't like a well played in-depth vampire movie.  from a book and a great film.  Beautifully created and an excellent story
i loved this. tom cruise did a great job and it was well made. bradd pitt plays a vampire and so does tom cruise.
I could watch this movie over and over.Almost makes me wish there were vampires.What a great story and the cast was perfect.
Although I loved it much more when it first came out, I still find great charm in the movie, even if it can be gory at times!
There was a lot of controversy regarding Tom Cruise taking lead in this movie.  He was a pleasant surprise, indeed.
Great cast, plot, acting, and the men are very easy on the eyes!!!!!  Got it for my Kindle Fire HD and the picture quality is fantastic!!!!
I saw this in the theater, during a Vampire Chronicle phase... it's ridiculous and amazing. A guilty pleasure, to be sure. Rainy day...
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  Tom Cruise and Brad Pitt are at their best in this one.
you will want to find a vampire and interview him or her your self ... it is the perfect fantisy ...
Great movie. Great actors. If this movie is not a part of your DVD library, purchase it today, you wont regret it.
I had not watched this film for 3 years and it is still good. Fun to watch. Buy it today.
was very impressed with quality of this movie one of my favorites on blu ray.
This was an excellent picture in HD. If you have never seen it, you will fall in love with vampires if you're not already. Awesome performances.
One of my favorite movies.  Pitt, Cruise, and Banderas do such a great job as actors and really get into their roles.
If your a fan of this film, read all the vampire chronicles ( I prefer the ones that focus on Lestat.
love the movie use to have it on vhs,if you love vampire movies ,you must see this one.my children are grown but they love it to.
This is the most real vampire movie this is what i think vampire are if they we're real things.The best band is Kiddstir
LOVE THIS MOVIE IT IS A GREAT MOVIE.  LOVE THE BOOK TOO. CAME IN CLEAR ON TV AND EVERY THING
I had this in vhs and now have it in dvd.  I have always loved this movie in any form.
I read the book and love the movie just as much. I have watched so many times. I would recommend it.
If you are into vampires, movie is great. It comes off of a book series. If you like this one, check out &#34;Queen of the Damned&#34;.
This is a great vampire movie cause it shows the side of vampires you never see, the soft side. You might say vampires do have a heart.
I absolutely LOVE this move. Great cast with great acting and a wonderful story line. Kristen Dunst was an amazing child actor.
This movie is great.  I recommend this movie.  Blah blah blah blah.  This is a review.  Blah blah blah.  Blah.
Had to have it for my collection. I watched years ago. Decided to buy because the price was great. would recommend the movie for anyones collection
This was the best of the series.  Good humor and action scenes.
Saw the last 20-30 minutes of this movie on TBS and loved it.Rated R for violence,language,and nudity.Canada:18A.Not for children.
It's a good try and transfer of old movie to HD-DVD good action and interesting topic.
this was exactly what I was looking for. found it at a good price and arrived very quickly, ahead of when they said it would.
The quality was great and it was nice to get to see this movie in it's true form once again.
I love this one the best VHS has nothing on this DVD copy DTS audio and wonderful picture. I have loved the film since I was five.
I really enjoyed the main characters and the relationships they portrayed.I need more words to complete this review, so I added this sentence.
Another great Whitney Houston Classic. What's even better, is hearing her voice throughout the movie. Miss that lovely and amazing voice!
The best movie ever.  Love the romance, drama and action that this movie has in it.  Will always be one of my favorites.
Just wanted to be able to watch it whenever I wanted.  Always loved this movie. Costner and Houston just perfect together.
This was bought as a gift for my wife, however I forgot to indicate that on my purchase.  It's a good movie.
Love the movie both for the plot and the music,  Enjoy.
The story is action packed, the music is great, the ending is exciting. I am glad to have found this on DVD.
I purchased this move for myself but I have not yet watched it.  Hopefully I will do so soon so I can pass it along.
This was one of the best movies. I would recommend that you purchase this movie. Whitney Houston and Kelvin Cosner were great in this movie.
This movie I purchased because my mother abolutley loves the bodyguard. A gift for her. What... $5.00 for a DVD. Yes, of course was a good bargain.
This is a great movie.  I am please to have bought it.  It was well worth the inexpensive price.  It is a very good buy.
This is a classic and no matter when I watch it I still cry at various scenes, great classic movie
One of my favorite movies.  I really love this movie. will be looking for more of the same movie soon. Thank for the fast shipping on this order.
One of my most favorite movies always will be and to now have it in blueray great quality will always treasure this one
If you know this movie, you know it's noting spectacular, but Kevin Costner pulls the movie together and makes it enjoyable.
The Bodyguard is an excellent movie and glad I have added to my collections, Whitney Houston was great and is sadly miss, 100% please with my order.
the best movie watch it for yourselfwhiney and kevin are the best in itgo get it then you say for yourself
I'm not much of a fan to speak of, but my wife loves this movie.So I would give this a five-start rating based on her reviews.
love you whitney :) this movie was great. there was great acting. loved every minute.
Love this movie of course it's not Whitney's best acting but the singing and the love story is like watching the movie Ghost.
The music score was fantastic.  The acting also was very good.  One of my favorite movies.  Have seen it many times
I think this was a great movie, both Kevin Costner and Whitney Houston were just great.  I think they played off of each other very well.
I always loved this movie and wanted to update it to my Blu-ray collection and glad I did . It is very nice .
One of the best movies Kevin Costner has ever made.  He is so awesome in this movie, I fell in LOVE with him.  Buy it
RIP. Goodbye to Whitney. We will always love you. The greatest love of all is your voice. The voice of many generations.
A great movie and the music is just simply excellent. It will be a classic I'm sure. Kevin and Whitney simply devine.
i never knew how much the world will miss whitene houston's beautiful voice. the movie was a fun one to see.
Very good movie of early Whitney and Kevin. They sizzle and yet it's sweet at the same time. I can see why it got so many awards :)
My favorite Kevin Costner role and Whitney Houston is wonderful in it also.  I could watch this over and over.  In fact, have done so.
Love the movie and the soundtrack is great as well. I think that this being Whitney's first movie, she did a good job. Good love story,
this is my favorite movie! I love Kevin Costner soooo much! he's awesome and Whitney Houston is also fantastic in this movie!
This is a great movie and I had it on VHS and wanted it on DVD.  The picture was great
This is a great movie with our dear departed Whitney Houston and of course the handsome Kevin Costner.  Thank you.
Great aspects and excellent reviews of two great stars that came together to understand and protect one another. Excellent movie!
This is one of Kevin Costner and Whitney Houston's best performances. If you have never seen you need to. Good pricing and great shipping time.
I enjoyed this movie from start to end, Picture was quality and came through clearly. I would recommend it to my friends any time.
I love Kevin Costner so this twin pack is excellent in price and quality. If you like Costner movies, will like the pack!
I love this movie, and Whitney Houston And Kevin Costner were amazing. This is a must have for any fan of Whitney Houstons.
I always have loved this movie, but seeing it in BluRay is incredible.  This is a purchase you won't be sorry you made!
I had this movieon Vhs and had to have it on dvd. Great movie with Whitney Houston and Kevin Costner. Makes you laugh and it will make you cry.
this is a great movie, kevin costner is awesome, whitney, god rest her soul, is amazing! queen of the night for sure!
By far, one of my favorite top 10 movies of all time!  I have watched this movie over and over and over again and NEVER get tired of it.  It's great!
I have seen this movie man times and enjoy it all the time.  More now that Whitney is a fond memory. RIP
Have always loved this movie, so I had to watch it again.  Very Romantic for the women and also has action for the guys so it's a win-win.
I've always loved this movie!  And Whitney Houston and Kevin Costner make a great pair in this movie!  The music as well is awesome.
Kevin Costner What more needs to be said. The voice of Whitney Houston, not bad, but put them together, MAGIC.
one of the most sensitive and caring movies ever made - heartfelt, thrilling, tearful - a delight to watch. A sequel would be nice.
Whitney Houston was such a good singer.  It was too bad how she lived her life and how it ended so tragically.  Kevin Costner is a good actor also.
I love this movie.  Love Whitney Houston's songs.  Love Kevin.  Love the love story.  Wonderful.  Nevery tire of watching this.
The delivery was fast and i'm so glad I waited to by Whitney's movies on blue-ray. It's like going back in time when I watch this film.
I love this movie. I had been looking for This movie at a reasonable price and I found it.  Thanks.
I Love Whoopie Goldberg!!!  She's another actress that is top notch in everything she stars in.  She gives a stellar performance in this movie!!!
The color purple is a great tale for today's audience.  A story told in a way that makes you laugh, cry and get excited for Miss Celie.
A movte that gives heart to the era in which the story derives. Loved everything about it! Great Job,great production!
I love this movie I can watch it over and over again. The actors and actresses are wonderful I enjoyed every minute of this movie.
This movie is a classic and one of my all time favorites, even if I thought the book was better.
I watch this over and over. The 2nd disc is very interesting in the making of the movie.  Whoopie Goldberg is great in this.
love this movie .seen it many years ago just needed this awesome movie in my collection good price also.:) cool
Who could not love this movie?  The acting is top shelf and the story most interesting and entertaining.  A must see and must have movie.
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  A great story, great history, great acting, a must have for your movie library.
I consider this movie a collector's item indeed.  There are also a lots of outstanding actors and actresses in it.
and watched it at home. a wonderful story. interesting insight to life in those primitive days of the south. ugh.
A must see WONDERFULL movie,Opal winfry  is great,I bought this used,The  Dvd was good,the cover is good Like brand new !!
Without the doubt a great copy of one of the best movies ever made. Can and will watch it over and over again.
Thank you for sending the Color Purple so quickly. We just enjoy the movie so much that we watch it over and over.
This is a great movie! Direction, acting and script are all excellent. I laugh and cry every time I watch.
Good movie and my sister love it - thank you for the price too - hope to buy more from you come the holidays
my son loves this movie and was happy to purchase it for him for Christmas.  Nice to find everything I need here.
THIS MOVIE IS SUCH A CLASSIC. I WATCH AS MUCH AS POSSIBLE. WHOOPIE GOLDBERG, OPRAH, DANNY GLOVER, OUTSTANDING WORK.
The color purple is one of my favorite movies i can watch it over and over again it's a must have..
This movie is just the right movie for about everyone to watch again and agin. It seem's like your loving it from the very begainning.
Ladies will find this classic movie GOLD. Danny Glover & Opra winfrey give their greatest performances ever in this great movie.
I had to have this movie to add to my collection.  It is a classic that I love to take out and watch over and over!  Love it!
This is one of my favorite movies.  Whoppie Goldberg is awesome!  The entire cast is just fabulous.Happy I bought this to add to my library.
This movie is great, because it is part of real life, there is a lot of Abuse going on in the worl
I love this movie; it's so funny and touching; plus it plays like new. Thanks again and hope to do more business with you in the future
Great movie.... Good Price.....
A classic!!  This is such a great movie.  A true mobster genre fan has to have this in their collection.
Great movie, these three should make more movies together , buy this movie just for that fact plus the movie is very good.
Good good classic movie. DeNiro never disappoints.
Great cast, one of the best mobster movies ever made. Would reccommend this for every one.
Great moive and the acting was for the record books!I would recommend this moive to someone who likes the mob type moives!
Im not that familiar with the mob but this is the best movie. Even funny although not a comedy. The best actors ever in it a must buy!
Fantastic movie, will watch it again and again. If you like Deniro and Pesci, you  will be in love with their performance.
This is a classic movie and everyone should own it....Pesci , Liotta and Deniro are stellar performers in this classic mobster type movie.
What is it that makes me so funny?  How am I so funny?  I am here to amuse you?  I'm a clown?  Tell me!
I'll keep this short and simple:The Godfather is the best MAFIA movie ever.Goodfellas is the best MOB movie ever.  Period.
Martin Scorsese's best work. Which is saying a lot....
This freakin movie is so bad ass! I love everybody in this movie! It is the ultimate flick! Plus it came in excellent condition and came really fast!
One of the best insider Mafia movies made  -  thank you Henry Hill, Martin Scorcese and Ray Liota
This is a must have in anyone's movie collection. I am so glad I was able to get it at such a great price.
I buy a lot of movies that star Robert De Niro.  I have not watched a movie that he play in that is not a good movie in my thinking.
What can I say that hasn't been said? Ray Liotta was brilliant at his part portraying Henry Hill.  this will be in my collection forever.
Another great film from Marty! DeNiro, Pesci and Liotta...a great trio. This film has it all. The NY mob in a really true story.
Timeless mob cult-classic brilliantly restored and preserved in highest quality possible today - 5.1 audio and Full HD video. What more can You want?
My absolute favorite gangster movie!!! It is violent with a comedic undertone!! I love Deniro! The only thing missing from this movie is Pacino lol
Priceless movie.. If you don't know about this movie, then you've been living under a rock for a couple of years.. Top 5 in Gangster Movie List
packaged good, i recieved it in a timely matter. the dvd was perfect flawless. the movie is really good and i will enjoy it for a long time.
My husband bought this movie, and I am not big on gangster flicks but I liked this one because it was based on a true story.
The acting was superb as was the writing, casting and directing. Robert Diniro was wonderful as always and so was Lorrain Bracco!
goodfellas is the balls, please print this the balls means really good
This movie is a must have for any movie collector, its really one of the best gangster movies you can watch
&quot;You think I'm funny?I'm a clown, amusing you?&quot;Well, yeah Joe.  Of course!
if you enjoy mob type movies, u don't want to miss this one. i had seen it a long time ago still great second time around
These are awesome characters, I would watch this movie again -  It has a nice story - interesting and easy watch.
Another great film like Casino or GoodFellas. a must see movie. It never disappoints I can watch it all day long.
This takes place near where I grew up and when I was a teenager. While I did now know these guys, I knew a lot like them- ah memories
All star cast,and one of the best gangster movie of all time.Buy this!
Robert De Niro has always been one of my favorite actors, and this movie is another favorite. Joe Pesci  with De Niro is always an amazing combo!
Good movie if you're into the mafia gangland type movies, lots of mafia type executions. I really enjoyed the movie.
One of the greatest gangster movies of all time. Never let's me down no matter how many times I watch it.
Whats so freaking funny about me ?If its just to watch that scene .. buy this movie.
One of the best films ever made.  Well shot, great acting and dialog.  Excellent sound track.  Scorcese at his finest.
This is one of my favorite gangster movies. I have seen This movie so many times And it still Is so entertaining.
I wanted this movie in blurry for my DVD jukebox as I try to fill it up with all of my favs, it holds 400 and it's about full!
Come on really.  If you don't know already this movie is a classic.  Buy it now.  Stop reading.
This is a true story.  Tells the story of how the mob won project after project, yet in the end ended up loosing to the authorities.
it's just a great movie. watched it again recently and it really holds up, but you already new that didn't you...
This is one of the greatest mob movies of all time - right up there with Casino.  You just can't beat the DeNiro-Pesci combination!
If you're a gangster lover like I am this is a movie to see. Great actors. All looking pretty young back then. Great story line as well.
Joe Pesci, love to hate him. What a cast of greats! Plus Scorsese writing and directing...
The REAL Henry Hill says it's 99.9% authentic. The acting is great and the sets are so Italian art deco.
Well written, directed and acted.  All three main characters deserved an oscar, glad Pesci got one.  And to think it was a true story, wow!
This is one of the best movies ever! Every actor is fantastic and there are just too many to name !
I think this is by far the best gangster movie of all times. I had to order this so that I could watch it any time that I wanted too.
I have watched this movie several times, I like MOB movies. This has a great cast, and brings home the truth, that it is a violent world
What a movie. You just cannot go wrong with a cast like this. If you havent seen this movie yet you are missing out. Watch it!!!
A Great Film. I have watched it many times. Anyone that loves gangster movie will enjoy this very well made film.
This was a gift for my husband and he took a few hours off and seemed to really enjoy the movie
Movie buffs already know that this is a great movie. For the collector this is a really great addition to any collection.
One of the best gangster movie. Full of accurate fashion and great acting. A must see!!! No regret- pure pleasure
I choose five stars because this is a great story with great characters. This movie gives the audience a glance into the life of the mob.
Dark but honest about the loves and lives of those underground crooks that we never really see on the surface of our lives. Great acting by all.
Of course this movie is wonderful. Joe Pesci, Robert DeNero, and Ray Liotta. Enough said. Excellent acting, great story, lots of action.
Does it get any better than Italian mobsters?  Nope it does not, and Goodfellas is one of my favorites.  Great film.
This movie is a classic and stands up as a great gangster flick. So many great scenes and characters and great writing.
this film is a thousand timez better then scarface. joe pesci aint no joke. this iz tha best of all tha mob moviez. i highly reccomend this
mobster movies never did much for me ,but this one was execellent has a story to tell and de niro actting was awesome
This is the best gangster movie ever made. plus it has some of the best actors, Joe Pesci is awsome
15 minutes before the picture ends ain't enough time to wipe out how much fun and how great it is to be part of The Mafia.
This was a great movie and I would highly recommend it . Always kept me wondering what was going to happen next
Great movie...  Good Price....
Non-stop laughs and thrills! Ridiculously over-the-top!  You'll be in tears and probably have a coronary when Joe Pesci shows up!  Pure genius!
This was purchased to replace a VHS version that I already have ! ! !  I really do like this movie ! ! !
I have JFK The 2 disc Set and I love it much,'tis one of my Favorite movies for all time :)
I was 15 when JFK was killed and have been suspicious of the Warren Report ever since, kudos to O. Stone for this.
Wonderful movie.  Very good movie which presents a lot of what did actually happen in Dallas with some interesting fictional theory injected.
Stellar performances throughout, this movie really makes you wonder...possibly my favorite movie!
JFK is a great movie. I like Kevin Costner. JFK has been fastinating to me for years. I have read many books on the Kennedys.
Excellent movie and highly recommend to any history buff or any one who is in to Kennedy and his presidency.
Perfect movie for any JFK conspiracy fans. Really gives you things to think about that you would have never considered.
This is a long movie with excellent acting by excellent actors.I definitely recommend it to everyone who likes history movies or Kevin Costner.
I got this after i saw it with my Father and it was a great movie and a great one to get.
I love learning about jfk and history and his time as president and the investigtion behind his murder and time in office.
If you haven't watched this you need to. Couldn't find this in stores anywhere. Happy that I  own it now.
Long time fan of this movie and great time to watch this since the 50 year anniversary of this terrible day in American history happen.
Great movie  to watch, many interesting points are brought out, rethink history a bit..I will watch this over and over...
Sit through this fact based movie documentary and you'll be a wiser person for it.
A great drama in a real life event, well acted.Casts well deserved shadow of doubt on the single shooter theory.
great movie, with a twisted plot. I just couldnt believe what he did though in the end.  Creepy...just a tadwatch it you'll like it
One of the most fearful movies I have ever seen.  Just outstanding acting and suspense.
This film has a very good and original film. This is one of the most refreshing movies I have ever seen.
We really liked this movie.  I would recommend it for everyone.  We have bought it and added it to our collection.
Was a good movie just as I remember it and it was as good the second time around just trying the movie's for fun!!
Definately worth buying. This movie is so sick and twisted and keeps you wondering what is going on until the end.
This is a great movie and one you can't figure out until the very end.  I think this will become a classic.
A wonderful performance by the great chameleon Kevin Spacey.  The movie is dark and chilly and leaves you feeling that way long after it's over.
Seven is a very different movie.It is a thriller that takes you on a journey.  You may not like the ending, but hey, that's life.
Watch Freeman's body language as the tired, soon to retire, detective.This is when we realized he was more than just that incredible voice.
Good acting, great suspense and an amazing conclusion.One of the best movie about a serial killer.
THE DARK SCENS BECAME BRIGHTER THAN EVER DVD EDITIONS, SO I'M SURE I CAN MORE DETAILS IN IT, WITH THE STARS' GREAT PERFORMACES.
this movie is amazing. it got here quick after I ordered it and he really love it. I would recommend it.
How can I be disgusted and yet,unable to turn away? Pitt and Freeman are at their best in this gritty, gruesome, insane horror detective tale.
when you see a realistic movie you know it's good. i liked this movie to every extent. it's a likeable movie.
This is the best who done it triller ever, right up there with Identity, with a great shocking ending. Would recommend to anyone.
BRAD WAS GREAT IN THIS STRANGE MOVIE, THAT AT TIMES IS HARD TO FOLLOW, BUT STILL A GOOD MOVIE  BUY!
Beautiful acting, a great story, and more morality them most people find in a church. Not for the faint of heart.
This is one of my favourite movies ever so I got it original and I really love it. It was dlivered pretty quick and was properly packaged.
Perfect transaction, DVD in great condition. Movie is an oldy but always a goody.It is a keeper! Thank you
This is a movie that we saw many moons ago but we enjoyed it so much we purchased it for home.
Great premise, great dialogue, great pacing, great acting and great actors = Great movie!This is a &#34;watch it again&#34; movie over the years.
Love the blu ray quality and I love the movie and the price. Happy to add this to my collection.
A thriller movie depicting the Seven Deadly Sins.  Terrific actors!!  An extremely suspenseful movie!
Had this movie on DVD,had to get it on Blue-ray,and i could not beat the price either.Super fast shipping as well...thanks so much!!!!!
Very real, captivating, horrific.  You've got to watch until the very end when the last ounce of horror is delivered cold and shivering.
Seven is a movie before it's time. It's a high intensity Criminal Minds type of movie. I really enjoyed it.
I played the game on both Super Nintendo & Gamecube so I bought the movies. I actually have everything that I grew up on DVD.
Mortal Kombat is awesome in any form. i loved this movie. the characters are sweet espicialy scorpion. this is a must see for all mortal kombat fans.
This came in today and Im pleased I finally go tthe best video game adaption movie and this film has passed the test of time. I love it.
This product arrived timely and in "like new" condition. Works great. Excellent deal for my money.  Luv u, Amazon.com.
My favorite comic book character is and will always be Catwoman. Her storyline (intertwining with the Batman's) makes this a great movie!
Loved the movie and love blu-ray.  Decided it was worth the purchase in Blue Ray.  Amazon has specials o blu-ray that I look forward to.
this is a good movie if your a fan of tim burton dark and moody like a old horror movie with batman throwin into the mix great just my opinion.
i remember going to the movies to see thisstill a good moviebat man movies of today are better
I've lost track of how many Batman Movies have followed but the first was the original and the best, period!
Love having the dvd in the series. It's fun and I love the way Michelle moves. Fun and campy. great.
it loks very good on blue ray it feels like im at the movie theater watching it, and at a very good price
Our Grandson's have this Batman movie on their Christmas list so We are purchasing it for them. so they have it to watch..
I had this film on laser disc, I love it for the sharp images, color and sound. I retired my laser disc so I had to get the DVD version. It's great!
This was another great movie when the Catwomen joins him in fighting crime.  Again I added this movie to my collection.
I was so happy with this DVD. The Pinguin was Awesome. Catwoman was so perfect. Everything about this film is just so Perfect
Amazing HD transfer for this movie, forget Dvds and VHS. If you have the chance, get this steelbook, it looks wonderful.
this is a real classic. tim burton did an amazing job like he allwayz does. i also reccomend beetle juice.
I loved the movie because it showed the flip side of a man being sexually harassed.  Demi Moore was wonderful in her role.
Demi Moore is hot and very sexy, Michael Douglas and Demi Moore play a very good suspencful cat and mouse game, very good show
Enjoy a lot this movie. I reccomended to all those who enjoy a good drama. good quality dvd. excellet addition to my Library
Replacing my well used vhs with this dvd was a great move.I can continue to enjoy for many years.Perfect Service - Perfect Product
THIS ITEM ARRIVED IN THE CONDITION PROMISED, AND BEFORE EXPECTED DATE.WOULD RECOMMEND THIS SELLER.
This is a powerful movie, full of suspense and drama.  Well acted and a great story line that will keep you on the edge of your seat.
did not care for the sex part but overall the movie was very good and held your interest to the end!
this is a good movie. but the sex scene is wild and crazy. Good movie though, computers have came a long way
loved it, everyone should read it. the folks in the book made it a great read. it had lots of twists and turns and holds oneinterest
This movie is an old favorite and first introduced me as a child to Morgan Freeman. I cry every time I watch this movie.
Oscar winning performance by Miss Tandy also best picture. I liked everything about this movie. I always enjoy watching it.
I have been trying to replace my VHS with blu-rays if I can and this was decently priced! This is a good movie for any family to watch.
Goldie Hawn and Kurt Russell are delightful together in this DVD that I have seen many times on Video tape.
Bought this for a gift. My friend said she really liked it. Had seen it years before and wanted it again. Great actors and great movie!
GREAT STORY OF HOW A WEALTHY WOMAN BECAME FRIENDS WITH THE BLACK  MAN WHO WAS HIRED TO DRIVE HER AROUND
This is one of those rare, first rate movies........a real keeper!!!  Good for the whole family.  Gives you an idea of times gone by in the south.
This is just a gem of a movie.  Great Saturday afternoon film.
Two superb performances.  The dialogue is smooth and easy to get involved with.  Haven't seen this in years and forgot how much I liked it.
One of Morgan Freeman's best movies in my opinion and he's got many great ones overall. He's a wonderful actor and this is a wonderful movie.
Lessons in growing older,needing help one never thought they'd have to ask for and being able to extend a kind helping hand to those that need it!
I purchased this because I like movies that help in developing learning in pre-teens regarding history without getting too heavy.
All I have to say about this movie is BUY IT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Morgan Freeman, is acting skills, I can't describe!!!! The man is that good!!!!!!
Timeless classic for sharing generational differences in communication and changes experienced in the 60's as the result of policy changes in USA
Morgan Freeman and Jessica Tandy are so good in this movie. the story is so good. This is a movie that you can watch over and over for years.
cool shipment nice in good condition. Great movie! get it all of u out there!
Love this movie and had to have it for my own !  All the actors are perfect and I never tire of watching this DVD .
Who in the world doesn't have this in their top five movies of all time.  What a story.  Jessica Tandy, and Morgan Freeman clicked.
love jessica tandy she is an amazing actress she was funny and this is a heart warming movie , love it
I will never get tired of watching this movie. Friendship and life should not have color and this shows that perfectly.
A warm look at a real lasting friendship.  Resisted at first but worn down over the years. I love the story and the acting couldn't be beat.
It is one the greatest movies.  It was given as a present to a friend of my sister who lives far away.
Morgan Freeman and Jessica Tandy you know it has to be great.However, I really like Fried Green Tomatoes - a brilliant Tandy film.
Great movie good transfer, not more to say, very pleased with price and shipping speed. Could watch this 100 times and never lose interest.
An excellent portrayal of some of the issues of era of segregation in the South. A sensitive issue handled  discretely.
I love to watch a good movie and this is a really good movie...deffinately more of  a chick flick, but so enjoyable.
This is a great movie.  thanks for sending it. I know I'll enjoy watching it again and again. The price was right and everything.
having watch a live show of driving miss daisy i was interested to see the movie. i enjoyed it and had something to compare it to. great film.
Jessica Lange & Morgan Freeman are two most perfect actors for this movie!  They are both great to watch in any movie!
I really like this -- Driving Miss Daisy -- is a wonderful movie.  I enjoy Morgan Freeman as her chauffeur.
what do i need to say, an Academy Award winning film. Cast and well written, really a must have for anyones collection.
What can I say except if you can you order this DVD, Jessica Tandy, and Morgan Freeman did a  great job with show.
ITEM WAS SHIPPED IN A TIMELY MANNER AND THE ITEM WAS EXACTLY AS DESCRIBED. +++AAA SELLER!!!
Great movie. Watch it over and over again.  Great family film with no bad language or other elements that would require parent advisory.
This was a very touching movie and I really appreciated the narrators comments and the extra footage on the DVD.
One of the best movies I've ever enjoyed, and the growing bond between Morgan Freeman and Jessica Tandy is most touching.
I love this movie I'm so glad i purchased it ..It's funny sad and just plan good i can't get enough of this movie..
The storyline is so true to life.  This movie is a treasurer and a must see for all ages!  Time warp treasurer!
Bought this for my mother for christmas. She loves it. It was hard not to give it to her early. It arrived on time and packaged well.
What a delightful relationship to witness.Tandy righfully won an oscar for her role as the matron of the house.
It is an excellent movie about people from entirely different circumstances becoming true friends over time...
LOVE THIS MOVIE! Always have, always will!  A great way to spend a rainy, lazy, snowed in, down with the flu, day!
This is an awesome movie and a must have for anyone who like watching good movies!! One of my favs and I have over 500 movies in my collection!
Don johnson plays a great jerk.
Fun movie and I don't even like golf!  I still don't like golf but the movie is great!  definitely worth the money!  Would use this merchant again!
If you play Golf or just like the sport - then this movie is a good one to see or buy
My son loved this movie. He is a huge batman fan and this is one of his favorites out of all of them.
These are always funny to watch after having seen the Nolan versions. Still, for their age I still love to watch them.
Was exciting and great to have as part of the series. Watch it a lot with the others. Good delivery.
I found this movie very brilliant and outstanding!!!!I loved it very enjoyable, since I was a kid!Batman Forever (Two-Disc Special Edition)
except for the first movie, this is the only Batman worth watching. The others just seem to fall apart.THIS IS QUALITY BATMAN
This Batman movie was on Our Grandson's Christmas list. So We are getting it for them & they will Love the movie..
I had to get this on umd. I love this movie out of all the batman shows. Great price thank you.
Another great movie of the famous BATMAN.  I have all of the movies now and I can just sit back and enjoy them over and over again.
I love this movie my favorite bat man movie out of all of the its hilarious and also really kick ass can't beat that
The music in this cd is different, but I still like it. The music made up by Prince. Its not like the other cds of Batman and this one is good.
Filled w/ inspiration, exercise your faith as well as a fantastic story.  Highly recommend. A story of &#34;how to&#34; run the race of the life ...
It was a great product, and timely arrival.  Price was good as well.  I would recommend them.
We try to show it when grandchildren are with us. It is a powerful movie for all to be inspired.
A true Classic.  You have to see this one if you haven't yet.Great music and Great acting. You can't ask for more from anAcademy Award winner.
Watched it before and in the theater,This time with my grandson who is a runnner and right before his last race of the season.
I may have watched the movie years ago, but I wanted to have it on my shelf to view and share when I wanted to.  It is great.
Another Oscar winner for Best Picture. This won in 1981. A great film with great music and a great story. Another addition to my collection.
A pleaseure to revisit this masterpiece.  The music alone is worth it.
This is a wonderful movie and is so inspiring to watch. A++++++
This is an English movie starring  Ben Cross and Ian Holm about the 1924 Olympics in France where England won gold for track and field.
The extras DVD is well worth watching.  Hearing the true story and behind the scenes action was fascinating.
Nothing I could possibly say would add to this films legend. When I started collecting films 26 years ago this was a must have. It always satisfies.
Excellent story, very uplifting movie. It earned the Academy Award for that year. Music was great as well. Highly recommend it. Hiram
The music is very good and  it is one of my favorite movies of all time.  A person wants to be there at the Olympics.. The soundtrack is great.
A real feel good movie; this is a testament to faith and the human spirit. It should be required viewing.
one of the best sports movies ever produced. Well worth every dime; I'll enjoy it time and time again. A+
My favorite movie of all time!Everyone was well chosen.It is a perfect film.
I liked the movie and saw it several times over the years so I decided to add it to my DVD library.
Watched it for a college class, fell in love.  It is a great movie and captures the attention until the very end!
Great service. Love the film. Hitchcock's daughter did a wonderful acting job in her father's film. Happy to add this to my Hitchcock collection.
This is a very good movie--a classic. Bought for Christmas for a movie collection. This movie will become part of a collection.
Another terrific, high-quality, engrossing, entertaining Hitchcock film! The climax, in and of itself, makes this definitely a film not to be missed!
as expected another greatmovie by the master  they do not make them like this any more. Have watched several times again.
I had never seen this Hitchcock movie, and I believe it to be one of his best. And his daughter is in it as well.
I really love this movie.  Of course, I am a huge Alfred Hitchcock and Robert Walker fan!  If you like Hitchcock, this is classic!
Another old Alfred Hitchcock movie that was well done. Definitely old time scenery and plot, but enjoyable and full of intrigue.
Well constructed story, very entertaining.  The mystery keeps you interested in the plot.  Worth the time and rental to  watch.
Hitchcock at his best.  Keeps you hanging in suspense.  Great acting. Keeps you on the edge of your seat.  Great storyline.
I love a good thriller and especially one with more than blood to &#34;shock&#34;. Stories, characters, thrills only with Alfred!
I really liked this film.  It's very entertaining and well worth seeing.
This is such a strange movie.  I saw it on TCM a while back and decided it would be good for my suspense library.
The dvd is in excellent condition. Fast delivery - it arrived before the due date. Ecstatic about this purchase. Thanks for the great service.
I liked that the plot was totally different from other films. It isn't typical and yet they made it work and made it so it was halfway believable.
One of my western favorites.  Picture quality is great.  I have this movie on tape and DVD. This is the best.
Another tradional classic western, much action, anyone who hasn't seen it and is a fan of westerns should.
Love the movie when it first came out and needed to upgrade to a DVDStill as exciting and bloody as before
Good William Holden movie and one of Sam Peckenpah's best. Great action scenes and photography. Good performances by all the actors's.
A story you will always remember with many of Hollywood's greatest stars in bravura performances. This is the director's best movie.
This film is easily the greatest western ever.  It revolutionized the genere and film violence. A must see.
The story is great! The action is nonstop! The wild bunch on bluray is a must buy! Buy it today!
This is by far one of the best western movies ever made. The shoot out at the beginning and the ending is classic.
I always liked this movie. It has a lot of action in it with all kinds of bad guys. One of the best.
An action packed movie that kept you spellbound.  Lots of violence  and foul language.  Not recommended for  Children. .Great acting and real life
My hair was blown back. I lost my shoes and socks. It totally crushed my funny bones. Turned my brain to mush. In other words, it was a great movie!
funny  comedy film FOR THE ENTIRE FAMILY DUDLEY MOORE AT HIS BEST AND OF  THE REST OF THE CAST.JUST GREAT
Always thought Dudley Moore was a great wit. Loved him in Bedazzled with Peter Cook and throw Bo Derek into the mix how can you lose?
This has to be one of the best Dudley Moore films you will see.
A great movie with some great acting.  Helen Mirren is good as always, with great support.  But where's the DVD?  Way overdue.
It's one of those movies that I grew up watching. It's not meant to be plausible, it's not meant to make sense. It's just meant to be fun.
this movie is very good .  your children and grandchildren will too .my family wants watch it again this week .
The movie has been my favorite since day one. And what a great thing to have it now on DVD.
This is a really good movie. It is fun for the whole family. funny, good values and very entertaining. Love it
This was a truly entertaining young person's movie but qualifies as a real baseball fan's delight. An unorthodox event with an unorthodox solution.
I love this movie. So funny and great for the whole family to enjoy! Everyone should own this movie. Great!
This movie is a wonderful comedy. It is so cute. I would recommend it to anyone, who wants a good laugh.
Please check it out, especially if anyone's every had a &#34;Harry&#34; in their life! One of my all time favorite classics.
This is a great classic movie. I love this movie because I never get enough of this movie, just as if I never get enough of the Daryl Hannah remake.
I used to watched it in LD. It is great classic. Although I weep at the end, but it's real classic. Come on, man.. I should collect it on DVD!
This movie is so realistic, the special effects were great, Story was believable and the actors supperb.  Thoroughly enjoyed this movie.
I had enjoyed this movie when it first came out and was thrilled to see it on DVD now.
Very suspensefulf story of how a pandemic realistically could've got out of hand. With dire consequences nearly averted avoidingDisaster.
movie has a good cast and has very good visuals to go with it becase most of it is real not special affects or computer animation
I think this is a great movie. It's actually one that I watch over and over. It's suspenseful and keeps you on the edge of your seat.
excellent acting , story line and will keep you on the edge of your seat. So glad I bought this
A good movie.It really gets you thinking,happy this is not going on here, for real.
So glad this came in Blu-Ray. The color is so much more vibrant. One of my all time fav movies at a great price I originally had on VHS.
My kids are 5 and 4 and they LOVED this movie, as did I when I was their age. So, yes its still a good movie even though its pretty old.
This is the cutest show and very hard to get. My sons watched it when they were young , Now My daughter gets to see it too, Thank you.
A comedy spoofing an alien attack from Mars; very funny and with an all-star cast.  A Tim Burton movie the whole family can enjoy.  Thanks!
My wife hates Jack Nicholson but this is one of his very few movies that she would watch and enjoy.
Tim Burton's weirdness translates well in this alien invasion film with a great cast. Cheesy-fun 50's-60's meets now vibe. Looks GREAT in blu ray.
With all the top stars of that time makes this a really good comedy sci fy. I really enjoyed it. The DVD was really great shape also.
Totally crazy spoof of a lot of Sci-Fi movies. I can't believe they could get so many big name actors to work in a movie like this.
Great. One word is plenty to rate anything. Like it or hate it or anything in between can be done with one word.
just another great old movie that our family loves. funny, crazy and enjoyable..never thought we would find it. thanks, amazon!
To me this movie is absolutely hilarious and fun.  So glad to be able to watch it whenever I want now!
Probably watched this film half a dozen times since it was released.  This movie  is just great entertainment.  Satire at it's best.
I'm glad to have remembered this movie, i remember this when i was younger and I've been looking for it forever. the rating fits what i ordered.
This is a great comedy and also something for the kids older than the age of 11. Well have a nice day.
This movie has a multitude of stars and a great story line from beginning to end. Action/comedy that will become a favorite of yours.
I see it on TV and just had to own it on blu ray great movie funny to great blu ray transfer
To see Pam in that belly dancing outfit is the only reason you need to see Mars Attacks. Good flick.
An amazing star studded cast and a very bizarre take on a topps trading card game.  Of all the movies based on trading cards this might be the best.
A silly movie, but with a great cast that makes it very funny. This was a well done movie with a crazy plot, but it kept you interested.
My granddaughter absolutely loves this movie.  It is very cute and I couldn't believe the stars that were in it.
i only bout=ght on of these but have 2 reviews. I think is was funny all the way through and you should watch it.
very funny
really love the movie and can not find it anywhere for sale I think that it is great to be able to order and watch anywhere
What a great Tim Buton movie . . .  quirkly and humorous. Many A-list actors give a great performance.  I believe this is now a cult favorite.
A family favorite that can be watched so many times. I always love this film. You'll never think about Slim Whitman in the same way again.
OH I LOVE BURTON'S ANIMATION!  A story, well told, about trusting the wrong person in hopes for peace.... Brilliant.  Must Watch!
SO many stars and the story line is GREAT. In a nutshell, the martians are total jerks!! LOTs of stars in this flick! You will laugh your butt off!
Can't wait to watch this again for family movie night.  I love Tom Jones and this movie will give us the giggles.  So much fun!
This is a great classic movie done with a host of famous people. Wonderful spoof. Have to like the corney
This movie is so funny and enjoyable. Jack Nicholson is the President of The United States! So Cool!!!!!!! I love satire and this one has it all.
I use to watch this movie with my little brother and sister. I enjoy this movie so much. It is funny with great animation. This is a must see movie.
My favorite movie is Casablanca, I have seen  this movie, I am buying this movie. Draw your own conclusions.
Very funny and strange! Lots of stars and strange happenings. Not too realistic, thank goodness. Good one to watch with the family.
He's told me many times how great a movie this is and that if it ever came out on Blu-Ray he had to have it.  Well it did and now he does.
This movie is well acted. The whole family can watch it. We would recommend this movie to anyone that wants to watch a fell good, funny movie..
I really like Jack Lemmon and James Gardner together.Still laugh every time i watch this show!Will watch again soon also!
I loved watching James Gardner and Jack Lemmon working together in this film.  The straight line humor was great and the ending superb.
Loved this show so I bought it. I like the way it portrays the fight between the Republicans and Democrats.....fun!
Got this for my husband who loves James Garner and watched all the Rockford Files shows back in the day.  Great movie.  We both loved it.
these three presidents were perfect for this movie.this is a MUST see.i can watch it over and over again
Wife and I love this movie great storyline and both characters in this movie we grew up watching over the years.
My Fellow Americans is good entertainment.  Jack Lemmon and James Garner are perfect together.
Take a respite from the 2008 presidential campaign and enjoy the performances of two old pros!  You won't regret it!
This movie is a hoot with Jack Lemmon and James Garner.  I was very happy to find it on DVD.  It arrived promptly and in great condition.
you can't go wrong w/ jack lemmon, james garner and a funny script! give it a shot, well worth it.
Love the movie. It's entertaining and funny. It's nice to watch when you want something light and love the Jack Lemon and James Garner.
It you're looking for some fun you have found the right movie.  Laugh out loud and don't worry who hears you.  Tooooo Funny !
I love this movie and there is really not much more that I can say besides that right there that I said.
A great, classic movie.  Funny, yet creepy at the same time.  We always watch Beetlejuice together when Halloween season arrives!
I grew up watching this movie and the cartoon.  So of course I had to purchase it!  Hoping to pass on a great movie to the next generation :)
I just realized they misspelled the title. Weird. Classic Tim Burton film from my childhood and was a joy to watch in BluRay.
this is a great movie! baldwin and keaton shine in this one! the bluray version of this looks cripsy clear!
One of Tim Burton's best movies.Early Alec Baldwin and Gina Davis team up in this one.Very original. Michael Keaton is amazing as Beetlejuice.Get it.
This movie is a classic and I'm so excited that I finally got to add it to my collection at a great Black Friday price!
This is a awesome movie and awesome quality sound is good as well. Would recommend if you are a fan of these kind of movies.
Has a nice story to go with the movie, I have it in tape waiting to change it to DVD, I say buy it.
Of course my opinion, but you can't beat Michael Keaton as BeetleJuice.  Very funny, and full of Tim Burton's style.
love this movie.  the actors played in this movie fit the parts very well. great packaging . recommend this movie
I purchased as a Christmas gift for my son who wanted this on Blu-ray... He was pleased.  He has been a long time fan.
great we didnt watch yet but i have vca too so i no the picture good lv it lv it lv it
Just about one of the best comedies on death ever! cant wait for the sequel Great cast and belly laugh material Burton, Keaton and Elfman rock it
everyone growing up in the 90's knows this movie and it just gets better with age.  Some of the greatest actors of all time doing their best work.
Always one of my favorites! Again, made a mistake and received two. This will be a gift in the future.
well one of the best you just have to have a copy of this.
Micheal Keaton does an excellent job as Beetlejuice - great fiction and great entertainment for any age and any group
Funny movie. Great way to spend time with family and enjoy a laugh or two. Michael Kenton does a great job.
Always enjoyed watching this kooky comedy every few years. I RECOMMEND this movie for all steroids film buffs. It is a must see.
I mean, it's Michael Keaton! I love him and this is such a classic movie.... too bad Balwdin is a nut now.
An awesome film that I wartched growing up and now have on DVD.  One of my favorites added to my DVD collection
This is one of my favorite movies. It is very funny and keeps your attention the entire time. Even my wife likes it.
Very funny movie even with Alec Baldwin in it, one of the most over rated stars ever, Keaton carries the movie
A really fun film on DVD and the supplier sold me a perfect disc and shipped it right away-REALLY HAPPY
Love the cast and tim burtons point of view as a director, The story line was excellent. Michael keaton was aswsome
Fond memories from childhood. I loved Beetlejuice back then. Still enjoy watching it now. The silliness of it always makes me smile.
Watched this as a kid and loved it. Watch it now and it still has that crazy, weird vibe but in a more funny way.
this movie has been one of my favorites for a long time!! the DVD gives great sound and picture!a must buy if you like funny horror movies!
Beetlejuice is an icon of all great comedy Halloween movies! Watch it at least once a year - and this year no different!
Fantastic - as good as it was waaay back in 1988~A CLASSIC, MUST SEE AGAIN!  Nothing much to say except it is a great experience.
You laugh at this movie so hard. Honestly not a movie for kids but this movie kicks so much ass. LOVE THE ART OF TIM B. Michale Keaton is a genus!
I have had the movie as a vhs for several years. I was happy to find it in a dvd.
I loved this movie when I was growing up. It was so funny and creative. Great storyline. I had to add it to my DVD collection. I really recommend it!
There are a few risqu&eacute; parts, but this is a funny, black comedy great for families with older kids. I wouldn't advise it for anyone under 12.
Watched it for the 1st Time couple months ago.... its really good, funny, it has good actors love Winona Ryder one of Tim Burton's Best Movies
You know you love this movie. Tim Burton directed it. Michael Keeton is BeetleJuice. All-star cast and great story telling. Buy it.
This movie was always awesome when I was a kid beetle juice! Beetle juice!  Beetle juice!  Lol always funny to watch
I love this movie but was unaware I was buying it to view on the computer. I need to pay attention.
I know this movie is old but it is cute and almost any age would enjoy.A great asset to your list of comical movies.
I absolutely LOVED this movie when it came out!! I was hoping my preschooler would like it too, she loves it!! We have to watch it at least 2x a day!
Sat down and watched it with my kids who are young teenagers.  They loved it and they wanted watch again.  Great movie with good values in the end.
I absolutely love this movie. It doesn't matter how old I get its a classic! A must see for all ages
The last time I watched this movie I was young Alec b.was very young in it the plot is great good movie for kids on a rainy day.
I wanted this in my video library.  There are a lot of excellant movies that have been produced in the last seventy years and this is one them.
I purchased this a a gift for someone special, and she has told me she really loves it.  So there, another great movie.
Bought this as I didn't have a copy in my collection. Still funny as. And probably the only movie I will watch that has a Baldwin in it.
One of the best movies! Seen it several times and its funny every time I watch it :P Great acting
We introduced it to our grandson who enjoys it as much as we do.  Always good for a laugh or few
I loved watching this movie when I was younger and I still Love it today!
This is another classic Tim Burton film, remarkably without Johnny Depp. I love to just watch this movie over and over all the time!
this is a must see for the whole family, Michael Keatons best work . just hillarious. Love It with a great cast and storyline.
I bought this as a gift for my boyfriend. This is one of our favorite movies and I would tell anyone and everyone to get it. Such a classic!
This is a bit on the scary side, so small kids might be too frightened, but still teens and adults will find it enjoyable.
This is a must watch. It has demons, dead people, and weird stuff though. The movie is funny and interesting. Beetlejuice is a huge  jokester.
I love the movie I watch it atleast once a month it reminds me as a kid watchen it and I got it at a great price
A very good movie I watched it as a kid, my kids watched it also and I still watch it when I can. Not for children under 10 at all.
Love this movie! One of my favorites. It's great quality! I loved being able to stream it straight from my ipad
Awesome, fun movie! I never tire watching it over and over. Great cast.This film is the one to watch to get in the Halloween mood.
This is one of those classic fun-filled movies.  It "aged" well and kept a room full of 10 and 11 year olds happy.
Another great movie good for kids to watch also michael keaton is great in this role cant say enough about it
Always fun to watch this...never gets old.  If you like the odd and funny this movie is a classic ~
Always great, first time kids watched it, language is a bit bad for my 7  & 10 yr old kids.  They had no problem with it being scary.
I saw this movie on TV a very long time ago and been wanting to see it again.  Still great!
A favorite movie that was easily viewed through Amazon.  No problems with video or audio - or streaming.  Enjoyed seeing it once again.
Its a great movie, and in new shape. It got here very quick and I recommend this site to very one.
This is a great movie! While it does not have the paper insert, for the price the movie is worth owning!
Bought thew Blu-Ray version, really enhanced the picture quality, The picture quality is outstanding compared to the dvd edition color is way better.
I loved this movie and I had forgotten how great it really was. I enjoying being able to revisit with this classic.
I love this movie and Micheal Keaton in it. It was well casted and it brings me back to simpler times.
My family loves these older movies it is great for a family movie night, we watch it regularly (my kids are 4 and 6).
This is a replacement for the VHS I have. After all these years it's just as funny as the fist time I saw it.
This is one of my all-time favorites and I think it's Michael Keaton's best performance, Perfectly cast and deliciously weird classic Tim Burton.
I got this movie because, well it's awesome! It's hilarious and all around entertaining! It also has a few of the Beetlejuice cartoons on it.
Great Music! Actually had my wife dancing to the beat. This is a sort of family movie, probably PG-13. Good acting and storyline.
Loved this movie when it came out years ago.  I now watch it with my Grandkidson Halloween , lots of fun , even better now.
Great Movie and Great Buy! Excellent quality and a wonderfully funny movie. Definetly worth the money I paid for it.
always loved this movie and when it was offered at such a low price, I couldn't pass it up.  Great buy!Vikki
Classic! one of the best of Tim Burton's movies with great scares, scenes and music! a fun movie for halloween or even just for a laugh!
You can't beat the one liners, double entendres, the great acting from harvey Korman, Madeline Kahn, Mel Brooks and Slim Pickens.
Saw this movie in the 1970's, owned the VHS tape, and needed to now have it on DVD.  Still a classic!
Maybe you have to have somewhat of a warped mind to truly enjoy this slap-stick western...it's a classic in our house!
It is one of Mel Brooks' classic movies.  I saw it many years ago and I had to have it in my collection.
Classic Mel Brooks.  This is one of the funniest movies I've ever seen.  The anniversary edition is great!  This will always be in my collection.
This movie is hilarious. One of my favorite Mel Brooks movies, but of course you cant go wrong with them
There's no way that this classic movie can be duplicated.  Everyone must have it in their video movie libraries.  Get it
One of the funniest movies ever.  The racial slur is nothing that you haven't heard in every rap song ever written.
This is another one of my husbands favorite movies of all time. I am filling a dvd rack with movies for him and this one is on the top of the rack!
If you can get passed the raunchy words and scenes this is one of the funniest movies ever made.  TOM
Not for the kids, madcap humor at it's best. Pokes fun at racial stereotypes a lot.  Mel at his best.
Another great movie and it is very good! How could some one hate this movie?????? It is fun! :)
You really have to be open minded when watching this movie and not hate other races, just enjoy the movie.
I love this movie as I do all of Mel Brooks movies. Thanks for helping me to just about complete my collection
One of my husbands & kids favorite movie, bought the special edition for his birthday, knowing they would have fun watching it.
Cleavon Little , Mel Brooks & More .What a Great western Spoof !!!!If you have not seen this , shame on you !You are missing a lot !
Mel Brooks rules! This is a very funny movie . If you like Gene Wilder you are going to laugh your butt off on this one.
how could this movie not be part of your collection? this is a great classic that will never get old.
good luck trying to make a movie like this now...all the bleeding hearts cant allow such silliness....they can pound sand
I gave this as a gift to my brother-in- law. He says it is a great movie to watch. An older movie you want to watch over and over again.
Blue ray really helps this movie - I saw things previously hidden by the mediocre resolution of standard dvd.  Highly recommended.
Another one to keep on hand for any sort of pizza and movie night. It has some more mature humor but is fantastic all the same.
This is a Comedy Classic, Makes you laugh from the start to the finish, Mel Books did it More than once.
Still funny after all these years.  I know just about every line and joke in this movie and it all never gets old.
..because it is so goldarned politically incorrect, but it sure as hell is funny.  Slim Pickens does an especially good job!
One of the greatest movies of all time! Such a great cast of stars!
Great movie!  I will watch it over and over and over again.  Even better on Blu-Ray!  Rated R for adults though...
I love this movie.  Mel Brooks outdid himself with this.. I could still rember when I first saw it..still laugh just as hard
Mel Brooks is a comedy genius, and this movie will forever stand as one of his best and one to watch over and over again.
Blazing Saddles was funny 30 years ago, it was funny then, and even funnier now!
Great movie and the quality of this DVD is very good, especially for the price. It's a great purchase and we are glad to have it :-)
I have this movie in sd also and just the movie itself is GREAT!!!!!! When seen in HD,  a WOW!! is in order. Love the movie, even better in HD-DVD.
this movie was funny the time it came in was good it played very well thanks to everyone who help to get the movie out to our family
This was fine. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . .  ..... . . . . ...
A Fantastic addition to any collection.  Especially for Mel Brooks Fans
another Mel Brooks, Classic movie, Every one I know who watches it, wants to see it again, this movie is so damn funny
Best Mel Brooks movie! Young Frankenstein and this back to back is a can't miss movie night!!! Fun all the way!!!
Everything is fair game in this move. This is Mel Brooks at his best, and it's one of the best comedies ever made.
This movie pokes fun at everything that is taboo....racism, nazis..etc. Cleavon Little does an excellent job of being the town's new sheriff.
I love this movie.  Many jokes and I have memorized so many lines in it.  Mel Brooks was ahead of his time.  Pity he does not make movies anymore.
...in one of the best comedies ever made.  Mel Brooks' mixture of sophomoric humor and satire provides a biting indictment of ethnic prejudice.
I own several copies of this movie. We love all the extras that came with this one.. Blu-ray is the way to go..!!
This is one of the best classic Filmsin Hollywood CA. It is VERY VERY FUNNY!!!You should own it on BLU-RAY DISC today.
A must see movie. You will rarely stop laughing. The characters are great. Really a classic movie. Safe for kids to watch!
Anything with Mel Brooks is funny in my book. I especially like the fact that they have a black police officer.
Blazing Saddles, Great Film or Movie. Great ActingGood Film by Mel Brooks.Starring Gene Wilder and Mel BrooksAbout the Old West.
I remember seeing this movie as a child fell in love with it then and I just had to own it now as an adult
Blazing Saddles is one of my very favorite movies of all times.  Classic acting, classic charm, good clean America fun.
The classic western comedy and still the best one.
This is one of the greatest movies every made. Hubby loves Gene Wilder. This movie was an excellent purchase, end of story.
Another great movie with the perfect cast! Fabulous to watch over and over. Every actor in this movie is a great comic genius!
Truly one of the best comedies put out by Mel Brooks.Best scenes: Campfire scene &amp; Mongo slugging the horse.
Political correctness is out the window with this movie.  Just sit back and enjoy a comedy that is funny and with great action.  Mongo rules.
Had seen this one many years ago--now my Grandbaby is loving it---she  laughs till she cries..Thank You...the oldies are the best always
Liked it when it first came out, liked each re-release and still fall out of my chair with this one.  Nicely done Edition.
This movie is a classic!!!  I have watched this movie repeatedly and never get tired of it.  The humor is priceless!!!
i have seen this movie many times but never was it as good as whrn i saw it in blu-ray
One of the best Mel Brooks movies of all time!  No movie collection should be without it!  &#34;That's Headley, not Heady!&#34;
The humor in  this flick never changed a bit in all those years.  Open and real it just made a believer in fantasy out of you.
classic mel brooks movie spoof from the 70s using some of the greatest comedians from that era love mongo comedy was still clean
One of the all time classics!!!  This is Mel Brooks at his best.  On my top 10 list of favorite comedies!.
What can you say when one of your top 10 movies comes out on Blu ray for 4 bucks delivered. Nothing, except here's my CC # !!
If you're a Mel Brooks or Gene Wilder fan, then this should be a must have for anybody's collection. Definitely recommend.
funny as hell, great to be able to find this movie in blu ray, looks great, sounds great im sure to be laughing for years to come!
Yet again, another great film by Mel brooks.  Finally had to upgrade to the DVD and this movie never gets old.
Mel Brooks' at his best, with the likes of Gene Wilder and many other people that made this film funny to watch and you'll be glad you did.
Best movie ever! Received it in a timely matter and love love love this movie and recommend it to everyone.
This movie is a classic for any Mel Brooks fan. Recommend this to anybody who likes smart and thoughtful comedy.
It's a Classic, what more can I say?  The quality is great and the movie is just as funny as it was years ago.  Definitely one of Mel's best!
Great movie and it arrive on time. good to do business  with. I will order other CD and DVD's when I need them.
The film had plenty of action and plot.  The acting was fabulous.  Does go to illustrate how persistency can pay off!
This is my favorite Paul Newman movie. It's a classic. He's so great in it, and there are so many memorable moments and lines.
Play it cool, like Luke -- you can't go wrong.  This movie flat-out ROCKS!  p.s.  The entire cast is USDA APPROVED GRADE A TOP SIRLOIN SICK~!
I saw this movie a long time ago and just ordered it to watch any time, you will love Paul Newman cause he is just a super good actor.
I didn't see it.  I sent to my college co-ed G'daughter.  She said:  &#34; Love it&#34;.If she loves it.  I love it.D.A.
If you love Paul Newman movies than this is a must to add to your library. You will recognize the big name stars in it and also the debut of some.
Got as a gift for sister in law and just loved it she was tickled to get it . arrived early and in great shape. Would order again
If you like Paul Newman, you can't help but love 'Cool Hand Luke'.  The ending is quite a suprise but I suppose in those days it could have happened!
Always a good watchLove how the plot develops and the rest of the cast all play there personal roleThe ending is fantastic real COOL
This is a great movie.  Man they don't make like this anymore.
this was a gift for my husband.  he loves this movie and i am very glad i could find it there.  thanks.
Cool Hand Luke is a Classic.  My husband has watched many times.  He has it on VHS,CD and now on BLU-RAY.
Great Movie, A Must See. Cool hand Luke Is awesome. This was my First Time seeing this movie, and Loved every minute of it.Five Stars
Everytime I watch this film I wonder how it could happen.  I always end up angry at the system.  This is a Must have Paul Newman film.
This flick is awesome! A classic by any definition! Highly recommended viewing! And Blu ray just brings out the best in the movie!
Newman scores big!  The cast is great, the plot is simple, and the story really tells itself.  Never, never, never give up!
This is one of the best movie's that Paul Newman maded and I just had to have it. I have others but I love this one the most.
My favorite Paul Newman movie.  One of the few movies I can watch anytime.  Instantly compelling.  Is he a nonconformist or just a screwball?
The egg race and two years of hard labor prison camp for cutting the heads off three parking meters. Just amazing tail about cool hand luke.
As good as ever.  The individuals struggle against the forces of conformism lives.It is amazing how may movie careers this movie started.
I loved seeing Paul Newman again in this movie.  My husband even remembered some of the dialogue from the movie.
It was a wonderful movie back in the day, and still interests and fascinate those who have not learned the true history of the depression.
One of the best movies you can ever see. Paul Newman is great in this and i suggest blu ray so clear
I have to add this to my list of all-time favorite movies.  I loved it.  And of course, Paul Newman...
My favorite Paul Newman movie. He is 100% badass and charming as Luke. It is in my top 10 favorite movies of all time
I Have Seen This Movie Quite A Few Times.It Is A Very Good Movie About Prison Life And Paul Newman Is Awesome In This Movie.
What's to say, it's Paul Newman at his best.........best line EVER, &#34;What we have here is a failure to communicate.&#34;  Get it, love it.
Maybe Newmans best effort, thats saying a lot! A story of a man subjected to deep south penal farms, his spirit could not be broken.
This has some of the best actors in this movie and our whole family loves to watch this movie over and over.  Will keep forever!!
Great lines and a good story to add. I would definitely watch this one if you're in for a laugh and a little drama.
Have always loved the movie and wanted a DVD to replace my video/vcr version ... love the chemistry in this one.
This movie is such a classic.  It is just delightful to watch and filled with so many funny things.  Pure enjoyment!!!
On days my wife and I don't feel like doing anything we love watching this movie, two great stars , Love this
Very good movie with great actors. Fun to watch. I thought it would be otherwise the second time through, not so. CARL SMITH
Purchased as a replacement for my Dad who lost his on a cruise. He loves both movies and Lemmon and Matthau are a classic comedy team.
This is a great movie, I would recommend because its a great watch all around. A must see for everyone.
Funny and nice to watch a movie without swearing.  Burgess Meredith was hilarious in this movie.  I recommend to watch the movie.
A very great movie. Will keep you laughing through out it's entirety. I would highly recommend this movie to anyone wanting a god laugh!
Watched this with my teenage granddaughter and it was the first time she had seen it. She thought it was very funny too.
This was a great movie so much so that you didn't even want a break.  I stuck with it to the end and that came to quick.
Jack Lemmon is good in this movie, really enjoyed it and glad we added it to our collection of movies.
You cant help but enjoy these two together and I will watch this over and over again , its just FUNNY
I always liked this movie. How two neighbors could hate each other but be there when the other one needed them.
My daughter and I watch this movie every Christmas season.  It is a feel good movie with lots of laughs.
Jack Lemmon and Walter Matthau are very good in this movie, I would say some of their best work since the odd couple.
The old guys are still in great form making lots of laughs about commonplace lives.  I love the feeling it gives me all the way through.
We have watched this movie several times over the years. It continues to be a favorite of ours. It is so Minnesota in the winter.
Ann and the boys made a wonderful film.  Who would have ever though this team could be so good together.
One of the best movies made ever.  My wife and I love watching this movie as it is funny and has serious life moments too.
Loved this movie.  If you want to sit back and laugh and enjoy lifefor at least a short period of time I suggest this movie.
Great pairing of two amazing actors. It's funny, sentimental and worth watching over and over. They make em like they use to!
If you want to be entertained totally, this is the movie to watch.  I loved it,
One of my favorite dramas with Julia Roberts.  I don't usually buy her movies, but this one had a good story line.
You know they say Art sometime is like life, well the Pelican Brief is like the government today. Power and Money and Greed.Aaron Givens
Love this movie.Two great actorsGreat service.On time delivery.Thanks
The movie does justice to Grisham's novel.  Plausible plot; a genuine thriller.  I like it.
Good drama flick, espically if you like Julia Roberts and Denzel Washington. Play both sides to watch the whole picture.
Great classic movie.
This is a great musical in the urban sense.  The high definition only adds a great enhancement to the beauty of pruple.
This DVD is great and the sound effects are awesome.  I love watching Purple Rain and it was great adding this DVD to my collection forever.
PRINCE-what can I say? This movie has fantastic music and takes you back to the day when Prince was all the rage!
Prince debut movie was tops.  The soundtrack, the movie story line everything was just out of this world all leading to the great song Purple Rain
always loved the movie and of course the music. You need to buy this classic while it's available!  LOVE PRINCE & LOVE THE MOVIE!
I love Prince. This movie hasn't lost it's kick. I love it. Doves Cry, and I would die for you still rules.
Just like his 'Sign 'O The Times' concert movie, this is prince at his purple best!! This is a great two-disc set with lots of good extras.
i ordered this movie for my grandmother and we both love it. it makes me want to learn more about prince and his music.
This a old but good Prince Movie. Will recommend to anyone to watch. Got it a reasoble time and now i am enjoying the movie.
Prince can really make a movie, can't he??!!! Great movie, great music which leads you into the CD purchases!! Thanks
Thank you for the Prince movie. It was an excellent movie. Arrived great. Great quality, crystal clear DVD. Thanks again
Purplerain is by far thee best true to life drama brought to life via filmography and I like the that I was given the opportunity to see it.
BR looks and sounds pretty good for such an old movie. Cant beat the 80's folks. Turn it up and get ready to move.
i bought this item as a gift for a relative and i was told that it played fine with no complaints
loved the music, story line and Morris Day.  Has a great story with a good moral outcome even for Prince!
Come on it's Prince, great music good story line...good acting a classic, gotta love it. If you're a Prince fan you have to have this one.
Classic.  Who doesn't love prince's purple rain lol  I always did enjoy this movie.  Take a ride back to the 1980's
Who doesn't love Purple Rain or Prince? This is an all time favourite of mine. First saw it as a teenager, and it is still a favourite.
This tells the story.  Almost a documentary.  This brought a 12th grade class up to speed on the space race, the politics, and the pride.
this is about when they were starting the moon voyage and competing against the Russians.  i think this movie goes in good detail.
Clearly, test-pilots are the right choice for astronaughts, as this film shows. It also catches some of the excitement of the times.
If you are into space movies, you will love this one.  The only draw back to this movie is that it is very long.
A favorite movie of our entire family.  Great historical perspectives of America's journey into space and told in well directed and acted film.
A treasure of a film. Having seen it not once but several times is a must have for the American family quality time
My husband and I had not seen The Right Stuff in a long time.  He asked me to order it and we really enjoy watching it.
This is one great movie.  Very interesting to watch these guys from different services become friends and trust one another.
While giving some historical facts, this was a very interesting movie, and a very patriotic one, as well.  I recommend it.
I had this movie on VHS and finally bought the DVD.  Worth every penny and could watch this over and over again!
We have had this movie in VHS format and are switching favorites to DVD.Excellent movie. It's a visible history lesson!
This film has everything.  Bravery, space travel, comedy, romance. And it is a true story. If you haven't seen this you are in for a treat.
What a great movie.  As an US Air force Airmen.  It is a must see for the history of flight.
Love this show!  It gives a great entertaining history of our advances in aeronautics that eventually landed us on the moon.
Thismovie is long, maybe cheesy to some, but I love it. The great actors make for a great story. If you don't get inspired by this, you are unusual.
Always a great movie.  Inspiring.  Maybe President Obama should watch this movie.  It might show him how real men are.
Another great mockumentary from Christopher Guest. Hilariously set in the world of community theatre, this is one of his best films. Check it out!
Anyone who's ever done community theater will love this movie!! It captures every character you've ever known. Just a fun movie!!
The funniest movie I have ever seen.  The best comedy ever.  A MUST SEE for everyone!
this is the best version of all the anna karenina films available on dvd. i have been waiting for 6 months to purchase this dvd.
Sophie Marceau's acting is incredible!! I really could not ask for a better adaptation of the book/story. To me it's the best version :)
This is a very fine version of the classic Tolstoy story.  I always love Sean Bean in any role, so I was interested to see him in this part.
This is my Fav movie out of the 2. I could watch this over and over!
It made a wonderful birthday gift for one of my kids and it arrived on time and in great shape. Would buy from this seller again.
This one was just as good as the first one and just al little bit funnier. My whole family enjoyed it alot.
this is the sequel to the smash hit Ace Ventura, true it's not as funny as the first but it's still really good and funny.
This is my favoirte jim carry movie. And im a hudge fan. It verry funny and mutch better than the fist one.
I love this movie even so many years after its release!!  It is absolutely hilarious and my kids really enjoyed watching it with me!!!!
One of my favorite movies. I was so happy to find it on Blu Ray so I can add to my collection!
Again the disks looks great and Carry still makes it funny. He is definitely one of the funiest men around
Jim Carrey's movies are hilarious and are entertaining throughout the whole film.  This is one of my favorites to watch!
"Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls" is a fantastic movie. It stars Jim Carey. A fantastic comedy totally rocks! A great movie. Five stars.
This is my daughters' movie pick. I can't seem to sit through it, but they like it.
I loved the first Pet Detective movie and I loved this one too.  Jim Carrey is hilarious and it's a cute movie for the kids to see.
Classic!! Love Jim Carrey in almost all his fims! Always a good recommendation. I enjoyed it like usuall. great late night.
Ah, Ace Ventura. . . Jim Carey was never better!  Too bad he doesn't do more of these.  I'd even say that he only went downhill from here!
i have loved this movie since i was a kid, its hysterical, jim carrey does amazing work as Ace Ventura!
Another favorite of my grandson's and was ordered for their Christmas Bag; they love this as much as I do.
in this sequel Ace is called upon to help an African Tribe in recovering their stolen sacred animal, will he find it in time? watch and find out.
Barbra Streisand is one of my favorite singers, actors and directors. She is always good in everything she does. Once again she did not disappoint.
came in great shape
A lot of the women I work with are Prostitutes and this movie is a good demonstration of what they go through on a day to day basis.
Great DVD.  Arrived in great condition and got it at a fraction of the cost.
So much talent, Every body makes every body work in this one. This was the right cast through out and Barbara carries the field.
A great acted film.  Again Barbara doesn't let you down.  She is so multi talented. Great actors and story line.
This was a great movie and i will watch it over and over again. It was just plain good all the way around.
had been looking for this movie along time thank u for getting it to me so fast very clear movie
Wanna dive into Seattle in the early 90s? Wanna hear some outstanding songs written by incredible bands? Wanna see some good acting? Buy it!!!
fun movie---as described---a great date movie brings back many memories of many dates with various ladies.  they enjoyed as I did.
I love this movie...love the actors and the music is awesome. If you grew up during this time period, see it.
I think this whole series is hilarious. Chevy Chase is classic in all of them.  this is just the last I needed for the whole collection.
I've watched this movie many times and laugh everytime...........this is one of the funniest movies ever made.....Cousin Eddy is hilarious
Chevy & Eddie oh my what a pair...love  his movies..he's the bestSid at the end when he won and wanted to share priceless...
Very entertaining.  Silly, stupid stuff and good for the whole family to watch.  The first vacation with Chevy Chase was also hilarious.
lv lv lv lv lv it great memoreys good 4 adults n we watched it back in ta day on vcr
This is one of the best Griswald Family movies made, in my opinion.  I never tire of watching it.  Good price also.
Very funny! I love Chevy! and Beverly DeAngelo is gorgeous! And I love the cars at the end! Have fun folks!
Love it.  Watch it and seen some of the places we seen in Vegas on out vacation in Oct.  Chevyis hilarious  !!!
This was hysterical. I have seen all of National Lapoon Vacation movies. Loved them all.  The Vegas movie kept me laughing the while time.
The last of The National Lampoon's movies. Not as good as the others, but still enjoyable. Different kids again.
good humor, fairly &#34;clean&#34; all the Vacation series are really good.  Love Chevy Chase and most of the goofy comedies of the 80's
I loved the scenery and the side stories.  It reminds me of all the trips I've taken to Las Vegas and always had fun.  It's just a fun movie.
The movie is great.The movie contains some offensive words and scenes.I think the movie should be rated as PG-13.
I loved it, the product arrived early, without a mark on it, and it was packaged correctly which I loved as well.
Well made major motion picture.  Good entertainment value, nice for an evening of sitting back and enjoying classic americam made cinema.
Of all the Vacation Movies, this one might be one of the best!
Really enjoy Christmas vacation (seasonal), so had to see Vegas vacation.  It is really funny and good too!  My family really liked it.
i now have them all. this movies is just as great as the rest of them . came on time . perfect condition
I loved Chevy Chase in this movie, he is so funny,  I watched it a long time ago and needed it for my collection
One of my all time favorite movies.  I laugh all the way through the movie.  I have watched it more times than I can remember.
I was very pleased with the shipment and the quality of the VHS. I love this movie and it was worth buying it. I was very pleased with this purchase.
This movie is funny, cute and in one part very sad.  If you like Dudley Moore then this is one you should buy.
Great piece of film.Dudley moore is good with his laughs.Rated PG for language,some sexual content,and brief drug use.
Dudley Moore is a loveable, hilarious drunk in this classic 80's movie.We've seen this movie a 1/2 dozen times and will watch it again.
My favorite movie of all time!!!  Dudley Moore and Liza Manelli are AWESOME in this movie!  A definite must see!
Classic! How could anyone not Love this movie? A must have if u collect movies! Just too Funny! Dudley is Magic!
i find watching this movie to be the most heartwarming experience, and recommend it to anyone in search of a laugh and delight
This is a story of someone looking for love in all the wrong places, but he eventually finds his heart.
There are so many laughs in this movie. I love the scene where Arthur wants to know where the rest of the moose is, love it!
this has to be one of my favorite movies ever made , way too funny. a must have for every video library :)
Funny, entertaining, and unforgettable.  Love the butler!  A few hours wellspent and over too soon!  Wish they had made more movies together.
It's a classic that I remembered from seeing in the theatre all those years ago. How could I not love it?
Still a very funny and enjoyable flick. Dudley did a great job with acting like a drunk and Lisa played off him well.
Perfectly cast and wonderfully heartfelt. Didn't like the sequel and will never watch the remake but I'll toss this in the DVD player again.
Dudley Moore is hysterical in Arthur. It is one of my favorite comedy movies.  I could watch it over and over.
Is there anyone who really dislikes this movie? Citizen Kane it's not, still, it's funny!! Sir John Gielgud makes this worth the price alone!
for some reason i had never seen this movie before.. i bought it because Halley Berry was in it.. .she as well as Kurt Russell did a great job
Kurt Russell is probably one of the most underrated actors in Hollywood. Love him in this great thriller! Buy and enjoy!
This is a must have movie. Great plot, serious scenes, great all around two thumbs up. I should give it ten thumbs up but I only have two hands
Great action movie, a little bit more of a thinking mans action then just blow everything up and a great supporting cast
I have seen it before and it is enough to keep me interested but not too violent or suggestive for my tastes.
I am a fan of Kurt Russel and Steven Seagal. So putting them together in a movie makes it even likable. But sad because Seagal didnt make it!
Again quality and cast makes the difference here very entertaining because it kept me on the edge of my seat all the way through loved it! loved it!
I am a big Kurt Russell fan, have been since he was twelve. It's a shame he never won an Academy Award.
This movie is a classic in the terror drama genre. It depicts a brazen act that was close to subsequent reality.
Gave this movie as a gift to someone who had never seen any Lampoon movies.  It was really a great gift.
how did i never see this before? so darn funny and real and a joy to watch...the Christmas movie, too.
This is a must see movie.  They don't make movies like this anymore.  I laugh every time I watch it.
Not many comic movies make me laugh like this one. Great actors that make the film seem to be a real road trip by a regular American family
lv lv lv it great i own vcr too we always watched when my kids were young lv it lv
This is a classic comedy starring Chevy Chase. Anyone that's taken a road trip with the family will relate to something in this movie.
Love Chevy Chase and this is a classic movie that will always remind me of when I was a young man, first watching this great and funny movie.
This movie rocks!! Chevey Chase it such a spaz! I love how wrong this movie it and how everything goes wrong.
If you are not able to take a vacation, this is the next best thing  :) A must see and classic comedic adventure that requires little thought
The first of the Vacation Movies, and it is a Classic, so funny to watch, you can watch this over and over again
Between this and Christmas vacacation, They are the best comedys to date.Chevy Chase is a excellant actor. Also love the new commercial.
Can't go wrong with Older Chevy Chase movies. Love all of them. great comedy for the family. Better than today's comedies .
This is a great movie.  Is even better on blu ray. Fast shipping. If you have not seen this movie what is your problem.
Excellent, Excellent movie!  Funniest movie of all the Vacations in my opinion.  Chevy Chase is again totally awesome.  Own two!
Who hasn't had a vacation like this!!??  As goofy as it is, I still seem to come back to watch it every 5-6 years.
this is more the squiggly drawing of a penis on a bathroom stall than great art, but it is powerful and stunning and oddly, one cannot look away.
This is second behind the Christmas Vacation movie in terms of best Chevy Chase comedies, and still one of the best comedies of all time.
It was a good movie. I've seen it as a kid but I have not watched in since 2005. I do not regret this purchase.
My wife and I have seen this movie several times and I decided to purchase this Video to have for watching anytime we like to see this movie
another great movie going in the future from the past ageing as he gos thru time see this movie so so good
This is one of my all time favorite movies so I purchased to share with my sister & she loved it also.
Excellent DVD for the whole family and arrived on time in great shape. Would buy from this seller again.
A new classic.  Another level of Mel Gibson that astounds me.  He is such a great actor.  Buy or rent this movie, you won't be dissapointed!!
it's great to finally see a romantic movie without all the visual sex that fimmakers think everyone needs to see
A nice romantic movie with an interesting story line.  While it could never happen, its fun to watch if you take it on face value.
A movie the whole family can watch and be comfortable with.  Nice love story, with a good story and a happy ending.
People with Imagination write beautiful and heart warming stories and glad that this older Hollywood movie leaves the viewer with good feelings...
Excellent feel good movie.Highly recommended.  Gibson is a verygifted actor!!!
movie. Have not seen in awhile. But, I know that you will enjoy. Suggest it for everyone.Get it. You'll love it!
I Loved it - So did 100 plus Vets I've shown it to  at out Veterans Home here in Yountville Ca
What a wonderful and timeless love story.  Mixes the presentwith the past.  Very entertaining.  Enjoyed the movie very much.
A very nice love story, but have a tissue ready.  This will have you laughing and crying all at the same time.  Nice work with the air planes.
While no longer a Mel Gibson fan, I do like his older movies and this is a great love story! Highly recommend for all ages.
this is a great movie and I suggest you have your happy tears kleenex handy as you will need it
This was one of best movies that in my opinion Mel Gibson ever made. I saw it twenty years ago and I have never forgotten it. It is great....
This looked great on HD-DVD. I can't wait until everyone moves to HD-DVD so the prices get even better.
I bought this for my husband & he loves it and can't wait to get the rest in this series!!!!!
Saw this movie on HBO and loved it.Rated R for violence,language,some drug use and sexualty.Canada:18A.Not for children.
this was a very very good movie to watch the kids loved it the movie had  lots of action in it
I love this movie. Just like the first Lethal Weapon, this one is just as funny.  I am so glad that I have bought this, to add to my collection.
I have always loved Mel Gibson in any movie.  This part is not as good as 3 but pretty good considering the feature
I love this film, good fun action Science Fiction with that 1980s feel and Tina Turner just steals the show. Well worth watching!!!!
Amazing film, not as powerful as 1 and 2 but miller's direction is a total blast again. The bluray transfer is excellent. Recommended.
This is my most favorite in the trilogy.  The first two are more violent.  This one has comedy and adventure as well.  Great actors.
classic movie when mel gibson was normal master blaster gotta love him best of the mad max movies too bad there wasn't a sequel to thunderdome
Great Movie & wonderful picture in Bluray!!!  This movie is a classic early Mel Gibson film that is action packed!!!!
This product is so much clearer than the ones I copied from my TV that it makes me wonder why I ever cpoied from th TV directly to the disc.
We like this movie for no particular reasons.  Got it because I like the Mad Max movies - do not buy if you don't like.
it is a great movie in the series. 2 men enter and 1 man leaves. well, you better be good. Love the viewer and &#34;Mrs Walker&#34;.
All the Mad Max movies are superb. They are well done with a great cast in each one. Wish there were more of them.
This is an old movie but still a great one to watch.Not for the faint of heart however.It is a little rough to watch in places.
love this movie.  saw this as a kid and always wanted to own it. saw it, bought it, watched it, loved it still. thanks!
This is an excellent movie if you like fast moving action movies.  Mel Gibson does an excellent acting performance in this movie.
GREAT PRICE GREAT MOVIE, IT'S ALWAYS GOOD TO HAVE GOOD CLASSIC MOVIES FOR COLD AND RAINY INDOOR DAYS AND NIGHTS
good american movie in western style with some twist in it) so it worse to watch it and enjoy it
I always liked the TV series Maverick.  This just keeps the memories fresh and the excitement of a good western.
A great cast does a fabulous job bringing us top-rated humor and excitement. Lots of fun throughout. Good to see Maverick again.
it is the funniest movie iv'e seen in a long time,it is just great,i watch it at least 2 or 3 times a day,i will recomened to any body.
Great movie.  I saw it when it came out in the early '90's.  A really fun movie.  Just wanted to add it to my 'Jodie Foster' collection.  8}
It has it all for everyone to enjoy.  Romance Comedy Action.  A great watch.  It keeps your attention through out the movie.
Old enough to remember the old Maverick series on TV.  Really enjoyed this movie and glad to have on DVD
Very enjoyable movie .....
This is a great old movie that I have seen many times and still enjoy it.  Jody Foster was great is in this role.
I wanted to add this movie to my DVD library and of course, I love the movie. I always enjoyed the TV series and this is just plain fun to watch.
It's a creative, well thought-out, and funny movie. The acting is great with surprises at every turn. I enjoyed it.
It ws great I enjoy watching this movie over and over again. Thanks
Mel Gibson, Jody Foster and James Garner do justice to this old classic. Highly entertaining and can be watched several times.
This is  a super film.  James Garner helps put it all together.He IS Maverick & he always will be.
A fun movie with great acting.  A well written script and some very funny scenes.  A good family movie.  Highly recommended.
Great western love all the characters, Good Gibson movie a a a a a a a a a a a
i love this movie as well as the entire collection.a must have for all those who love clint eastwood.
I saw this at the drive in back in the 60's.It always has been on my top 10 lists.
Great Dirty Harry classic.Clint at his best. I plan to watch the rest of this series very soon. Do you feel lucky?
This is a movie classic. Everyone should be required to see this movie before you could see any other police themed shoot em up!
We wanted to go from VHS to DVD for this movie. lt is one that my husband likes to watch over and over again.
Great movie; it's astounding to watch this early fight against the insipient political left. America needs Dirty Harry today more than ever.
They don't make movies like this anymore. Liza Minnelli is fabulous. Seems like she inherited many talents from her famous mother.
Cabaret is one of the all time wonderful musicals.  Not to be missed!  Lisi Minnelli is magnificent!Her voice is beautiful.
Is there any one any better than Liza? I loved her mom and I love Liza too.Wonderful entertainment for the evenings.
This is one of the greatest movies ever - watching if before a live production is not a good idea as nobody can live up to Liza's performance.
Great service and a great product.  I had the movie in VHS. When the tape broke I had to get it on DVD.  I am really glad I did.
This show is a timeless classic.  It's nearly impossible to not sing and dance along.  This is the show that made Liza an icon!
EXCELLENT MOVIE.  EXCELLENT PERFORMANCES.  HIGHLY RECOMMENDED FOR ALL AGES.A REAL CLASSIC.  NEVER OUT OF DATE. SHOULD BE ENJOYED BY ANYONE.
Classic Liza.  Wonderful musical.  Stage craft at its best.  Joel Grey is great.  Watchable again and again.  Must see. Great.
better than i thought it would be for a classic film. great entertainment. acting was awesome, great purchase for the money.
The Caberet with Liza Minnelli DVD was a 2011 Christmas gift.  Our sister-in-law absolutely adores and loves it.  She watches it frequently.
I love this movie.  We wanted to add the Blu-ray version to our collection.  It is a movie that you can watch multiple times and enjoy it every time.
This is a great classic movie. The acting is superb. And it has reference to Nazi Germany, a meaningful allegory.
the picture and sound were awsomeone of my favorite liza minnelli film.the extras were great also.i highly recommend it
Fabulous movie.  Love it every time I view it!
Amazing improvement over the older DVD release. If you love the film you can't do better than this. You won't be sorry.
ONE OF MY ALL TIME FAVORITE MUSICAL WHICH HAS SUCH PASSION, FUN,AND NAUGHTY MOMENTS IN THIS CLASSIC FILM THAT MUST BE SEEN BY ALLGENERATIONS.
Deserving of every award it received.  This is really the best way to see it.
This was given as a gift.  It arrived so quickly; packaged well; was a highlight of the holiday.
This is a great film. It wasn't new to us but it is so much fun to have it in our library
After recently seeing the stage show version, I bought the DVD ...and I liked it better than the stage show.  It was easier to understand.
I watched this movie many years ago and really liked it.  I saw it on Amazon for a very cheap price and decided to purchase it.
great movie. didnt have a scratch on it and played great. its widescreen and and has 1 disc inside .
This movie is superb! It is 40 years old- and as good any movie put out in today's media selection- maybe better!
A great movie that stands the test of time. It even looks better in Blu-ray. The extra features are great too!
Love the banjo scene! This is a great movie, it's a classic! I recommend that everyone see it at least once.
kind of a good old boy movie not for young kids rate this a R rating outdoor  and action stories actors were great.
NOT ONE DULL MOMENT IN DELIVERANCE - WELL EDITED AND WELL DIRECTED AND TOP OF THE LINE PERFORMANCES - R.D.A.
Saw it in theater in 1972. The DVD let me watch it again for first time since in great color. TV cannot match the DVD presentation.
This is one of the best all time movies. The book is great read, Deliverance by James Dickey. I give it 5 stars.
Great color,scenery,music and action this is a very entertaining movie.I would recommend this movie to anyone that likes Burt Reynold or Jon Voight.
Outstanding movie. A cult classic. Superb acting from everyone. Believable. Scenery. People in hollows.
I watched this one twice and then went over some of it again.  Such good characters.  Such a sad time in our history.
This is an amazing true story, beautifully told, good acting.  I have it on VHS tape, and was so grateful to now have it on DVD so I can watch it.
This is a movie I wanted to see for a long time it was great very deep and real it was great!!!!!
This is a great look at the underbelly of USA history on our racial struggles and our effort to resolve these issues in today's time frame..
I really enjoyed this movie from beginning to the ending.
I have always love this movie and shows how, not that we did not already know the things that happen within the politic arena.
I go right for this movie when I need to take my mind off daily problems.  How can you think of anything else while you're watching this?
This was a great action movie with some humorous lines.  The ending was a complete surprise to me.  I have watched it over and over.
Not getting paid for my reviews, but this is a good movie (if you like attempting to be one step ahead of the plot!)
enjoyed the interplay between the 2 main characters. nice plot with great twists and turns. unexpected betrayal in the end
I got it within the dates promised and it was new just like they said
Wesley does an excellent job and mysteries are always entertaining.  This movie is suitable for adults but not recommended for children.
Wesley Snipes always manages to be in these great movies.  i hadn't realized I had seen this before, but i still enjoyed it.
We were a little upset that we had to pay for such an oldflick, but it was great.  Very suspenseful with a good ending.
If you love political movies you will love this one.Lots of twists and turns.The action is never ending.Wesley Snipes is awesome.
I love Jim Carrey. I didn't really enjoy the 2nd Ace Ventura, but this one always makes me laugh! A joy!
Probably one of the top ten funniest movies of all time.  This movie is what really put Jim Carrey on the map.
This movie was awesome my family and i laughed so much we were crying at times in this movie. 5 Stars.
this is jim carrey at his best ace ventura is one of the most funniest movies his done. this movie will keep you laughing from start to finish.
it evens looks better on blue ray as Jim Carrys talents are showcased. the comedy still holds up and wish Carry would do another
"Ace Ventura: Pet Detective" is a fantastic movie. It stars Jim Carey. A fantastic comedy totally rocks! A great movie. Five stars.
I love Jim Carrey! This movie is one of his best early comedy films. It's funny all the way through, and it will keep you happy.
This movie is great. Ace Ventura is really funny in this movie. This movie is classic of comedies. Whoever have not seen it, I recommend that you do.
This movie is still just as funny as it was the first time. The production value is not holding up but like any great comedy..... who cares?!
Very funny movie, as always with jim. I guess I don't have much to say, Bye.
I LOVE this movie!! Jim Carrey had me laughing so hard during this movie, I couldn't wait for my kids to see it.
This is an old favorite of mine that was really nice to watch again. One of Jim Carrey's best films, just plain stupid slapstick fun.
It's silly but funny! If you can't laugh at something silly than don't watch this movie not great for kids without parent supervision.
Have not watched in a few years, gosh my stomach hurt from laughing. Pardon me, I would like to &#34;ass&#34; you a few questions....hahhahaha
This is a classic movie that should be in the lineup of all comedy fans.  My sons saw it for the first time and absolutely loved it.
If you like wacky off the wall movies this movie is one to watch.  Crazy but funny if that is your style.
This is a classic movie, I saw it over 30 years ago and was so move by it I had to added into my movies collection
I had not seen this movie before buying it and wanted to give it a try.  Definitely worth the money!! It was a great movie!!
Excellent.....I had forgotten how well written this movie was and the actingis superb....
Great performance with a difficult topic. The story and acting are top notch. Very enjoyable movie even though no happy ending.
One of the best movies ever made.  It's one of those movies I watch every few years, because of its excellence.
Great movie. Nicholson is great. Nurse ratchet is evil. The story ends sadly however.
Great price great movie, transfer quality was extremely good and this is what I consider jack nicholsons finest movie he ever made.
After visiting one of these facilities, I could see that a lot of research went into this movie.  Which came first though, the chicken or the egg?
One of my favorite older movies.  Jack Nicholson is fantastic in it as is the rest of the cast.  Mmmm, Juicy Fruit.  Love it.
This is a classic that everyone needs to watch!!  Jack Nicholson is at his best in this movie.  Watch it!
One of my all time favorite movies...perfect blend of humor, drama, pathos, morality tale and underdog struggle.
This movie stands the test of time. Jack Nicholson did a great job, helping us to forever change our views of mental health.
this movie is a classic and this digi book is a must have for a collector. Awesome transfer, great features and the book itself is beautiful.
This is one of the classics and Jack is awesome in this roll.  This special edition has a whole DVD filled with behind the scenes and extra stuff!
A classic two disc treatment; well conceived and packaged in a slipcase.  Nicholson deserved the award given.  Best picture as well.
though i'm not that big on Nicholson as i once was this film has held up remarkable well.very solid story&amp;direction.a must see&amp;have.
One of the greatest movies ever made ! Jack N is fantastic in this movie!! You simply must buy it.
The book was bad ass and the movie rang true to it.  Great acting, strange music and Jack's eyebrows.  Why wouldn;t it be good?
i PURCHASED THIS FOR MY HUSBAND FOR CHRISTMAS, BUT HE PASSED AWAY BEFORE HE COULD WATCH IT. bUT IT CAME WHEN PROMISED AND WAS IN EXCELLANT CONDITION
Just a good movie, very deep, yet persists with a jovial tone to the very end. The performances in the film were all fantastic.
This is a very good American film.  If you've never seen it and are interested in films, you should watch it.  You'll like it.
All these years later the film still holds up! And check the little guy who went on to become really FAMOUS!!!
This is one of Jack Nicholson's best roles as an actor in my opinion. The DVD came in as advertised, and was listed at a great price.
This was a fabulous movie, in content and also Jack Nicholson is one of my favorite actors!  I enjoyed the movie from beginning to end.
Inspiring and interesting movie.  I waited too long to watch it.  Glad I did. The captions were great and timely.
Jack Nicholson plays the crazy guy in this and he is great.  Even tho it's an old movie it is still great.
To know this was Jessica Langs first real film, is just mind blowing! Of course having Jack as a co-star didn't hurt. This is a great film!!
It was a great movie. The movie followed the book. Acting excellent I enjoyed it. A must see for classic movie lovers.
THE KITCHEN TABLE SEE'S MOST THE ACTION, CANT MISS IT. JACK IS A AMERICAN CLASSIC CREEPY MAN !! GOT TO LOVE EM
I enjoyed this film in my early 20's and now delight in sharing it with the next generation. Perfect to show to high school students.
No Doubt Risky Business was a great Movie back in 1983,I have it on LASERDISC And I bought it on dvd too,A MUST See for Tom Cruise's FANS :p
This is a coming of age movie done tastefully (if I remember it correctly).  What's not to like about that Tom Cruise smile? or Rebecca De Mornay?
I had seen this when it came out in theaters and I fell in love it. It is the very first movie I saw Tom Cruise in.
I absolutely LOVED it on DVD, so I had to grab this deal when I saw that it was on Blu-ray! CLASSIC CHICAGO MOVIE!!
I had this movie on VHS but it was borrowed and never returned, this blu-ray copy is a lot better than the old VHS.
One of my favorite Tom Cruise movies. My son is 15 and at some point I want him to see this movie.
I remembered this one from years back and was not dissapointed. It is a delightful comedy. More like this would be welcome.
I loved this movie it is a great classic movie back in the 80s specially for its time. You will love this tom cruise movie its a must see movie.
This movie was streamed through Amazon Prime and as usual, came through perfectly.  Great movie too.  I recommend watching it.
THIS IS A GREAT WAR MOVIE.  STEVEN SEAGAL IS A GOOD STAR IN THIS MOVIE;AN ENJOYABLE WATCH.  THANKS, SELLER.
Have enjoyed the subtle confidence of Seagal.  Definitely R rated for adult content and violence.  Recommended watch and has a good sequel.
A very good action movie, with Steven Seagal and Tommy Lee Jones, says enough!! Watch the movie, you will enjoy it!!
This movie is awesome.Rated R for strong violence,and for language and brief nudity.Canada:13+[Quebec].
Good plot and great supporting actors, Gary Busey and Tommy Lee Jones. If you like StevenSeagal you'll love this movie.
Great moive, action packed thriller, good story, and very good acting. Would recommend to anyone of is an action flick junky
I'm sorry, but I just LIKE this movie.  Not the best-looking Blu-Ray, but respectable looking/sounding.
great action film, mixed with some comedy. keeps you on your toes.keeps your attention while still being entertaining. loved it
Better then most steven segal movies. Great action movie. Liked it better then alot of action movies.  a must see movie
My husbands favorite movie, he enjoys watching it all the time; the movie arrived on time and sealed just as they said it would.
One of Seagal's best movies probably the best. The streaming quality was excellent. Look forward to viewing more movies through Amazon.
Ya gotta love this movie..... Best shots of the 63...steve is at his best..... Its just a fun to watch..... Miss July...... Yieeks
it was great
Die Hard on a Battleship, one of Seagal's early best flicks, non stop action that's not to be missed. Highly recommended.
This is just camp classic at its best!  Both Davis and Crawford make dynamic performances!  This is defiantly a must have for any classic collection!
this movie is great and the dvd had no scratches and plays perfectly. I had always wanted to see this film
This movie is sick and twisted.  I love it!!!  It's a cult classic.  If you belong to the Westboro Baptist Church this might not be for you.
This movie is a classic.  Everything came perfectly packaged and it arrived to my house super quick!  I would definitely recommend!
you must really try and watch this.  Forget Bette Davis et all.  Different film.  Brilliant, Redgraves at their best.  Recomend it to all.
I love the older movies.  Bette Davis is one of my favorite actresses!  As always she gives a great performance!  :)
i gave 5 stars because their tranfer and quality are the best.i love this movie with two icon of hollywood.
I bought this for My Brother as a present because he was very good tome when I was in the hospital.
Because she beat up Joan Crawford good in this movie! this was great and suspenseful!
I was thrilled to finally be able to add this to my movie collection. I am a ture Bette Davis fan and this is by far one of her best films.
CLASSIC MOVIE, NOTHING NEGATIVE TO BE SAID, I AM HAPPY THE STUDIOSARE REMASTERING THE OLD CLASSICS ONTO BLU RAY!!!
This movie will keep you on the edge of your seat to see how far one sister will go to stay free of her sister's control
What more can be said about this classic that already hasn't. The actors shine in this captivating, haunting & humorous tale truly a classic!
Both Bette Davis and Joan Crawford at their best ! Top Notch Suspense at it's best. A "MUST HAVE" for any classic suspense collector !!
The two best actresses of all time Bette Davis and Joan Crawford.  This movie is a classic, and I can't wait to show it to my kids.
I am an old movie buff and this one is right up there.  For as old as it is the dvd is clear and the sound is great.
My mother had my sister's and I watch this movie many years ago. Still enjoy it.
This is a classic horror film staring Bette Davis.  It was bought as a gift.  Hope she has many years of viewing.
this is a clear looking Blu-ray if you like old movies like I do you will love this one its a good one
A much talked about film when  it was first released.The cast were impeccable  and the shocks  had you on the  edge of your seat.
This film is one of best horror movies of all time. This movies is good as Hitchcock's style of directing.
If you do not own this classic film with two of the greats, there is something wrong with you. Buy it.
This has to be my all time favorite Bette Davis movie. She played someone so evil and did a fantastic job.
The actress's name speak for it self. This is a classic, one to be cherished for years to come.
Great performances, great dialog, great cinematography, great music. It just doesn't get any better and I don't think it ever will.
Richard Burton and Elizabeth Taylor deserve their accolades for their brilliant performance in this movie.
A Taylor and Burton classic. This is a must for your library if you are a Taylor and Burton fan!
I wondered how much of it was really acting.  I loved watching this movie.  I am sure it was a shocker for it's time.
Great drama with 2 of the best
dvd case seemed  a little worn per the description but plays really good, husband just loves this movie, thank you
This film is hard to watch.  It is one of the best performances by Elizabeth Taylor as a film actress.
Like all of Elizabeth Taylor's movies, this is a great movie. It's hard to think someone so beautiful can act so ugly. I loved it!
Brilliant performances by Sandy Dennis and George Segal. As to Taylor/Burton combo, it hardly ever got better than this. Period.
This is an awesome movie and to me, one of Elizabeth Taylor's best. Great movie at an unbelievable price, who could ask for more?
There are no words to describe Elizabeth Taylor's and Richard Burton's performance in this movie other then to say amazing!!!!!!!!
Burton, of course, is great, but Liz is simply spectacular.  Her best performance, ever.
I love Jack Nicholson, I had a great time watching the movie. As usual Jack is just perfect for the role.
One of my favorite movies. The best actors ever...!
love this movie its too naughty and funny. i really recommend it to everyone its great during Halloween but also the rest of the year too.
Great movie not pg but funny and great actors.  Cher,Phiffer & Nicholson are teriffic.these reviews require too many words.
What can I say about Jack Nickolson that hasn't already been said? He is great in this movie as the devil. And what a devil he is! Fun to watch.
It is a great witch movie. My wife hates Jack Nicholson like poison but this is his only film she loves! He and his girls were wonderful actors!
This is absolutely just a fun film to have on hand for fun during Halloween or any other a fun film is needed.
great movie. owned it on tape years ago ... upgraded to this because I missed watching it so much! Classic
One of my old favorites, filmed mostly in Scituate Mass where I used to spend my Summers.  Also areas all around, were places I visited.
One of the classic Nicholson movies.  His monologue about women during lunch with Cher's character is one of the funniest moments in movies.
Jack, and the Girls are outstanding in this movie it is one of my favorites. I recommend this movie. Thumbs Up.
so good
Classic story, Jack Nicholson, Cher, Susan Sarandon, Michelle Pfiefer, and lots of great folks make this a wonderful, good time.
Excellent actors and storyline. Very fun to watch. I'm glad I purchased the DVD for my collection. I highly recommend you watch it!
this was a great movie--i like cher alot and i have enjoyed wating it again and i know i'll watch it again
Nicholson at his best, the three ladies are in the height of their careers. a very funny movie, leaves you laughing.
This item is exactly as described and is greatl.have had the girls over for movie night,this s a keeper KLM Mn
Love this movie. This is another great movie to add to my collection. This is a movie I can watch over & over again and never get tired of seeing it.
This is a movie for the ages. Good movie and J Nicholson is great. If you havent seen it, Take the time. Its old but its good
This was a great movie. Oldie but goodie. I had never seen it and am so glad I purchased it.
This movie is funny as hell.  The actors in this movie were awesome. I enjoyed the movie greatly and i loved how the women kicked butt in the end.
I just love this movie. When I saw it on TV I just had to have it. I never get bored watching it :)
I had to look a while to find a copy of this movie, thanks Amazon!
I loved it! Brought back memories of a great time in my life.The actors in this movie and fantastic! I will watch this movie many times.
I wore out my VHS tape watching Jack, whose ability to be diabolical is unmatched. The cello scene is hot, hot, hot.
Great Movie. Enjoyed the characters and story line. Can not think of a bad thing to say about the movie.
Arrived in the condition I had hoped for. Not a bad Halloween movie. Pretty entertaining, if you like Jack Nicholson.
this brings backs memories 3 beauties and 1 little Devil. ME great actors and supporting cast, well I can't say anymore might get in trouble (LMAO)
One of my most favorite movies. Full of funny moments and over the top punch lines. A great movie as a great price. A must have. 2 Thumbs up.
If you like arnold in it and George clooney the movie is Ok , I just prefer a little more action!!
Item was received. It plays clearly from beginning to end. I am satisfied. Thank you very much. Respectfully; Edward Shayne
My son enjoys this movie, bought this for him for his birthday.
we loved this movie since the time came out, we watch again sometimes and still nonbored. Thanks & have a great day..!!
Bought it for my nephew and he is crazy about the movie. He was surprised to get it and he is now ready to go on the road...
I love this movie. It is great to watch with the family. It is one you can watch over and over again.
I have been wanting to watch this movie for years. I am so glad I finally did because it turned out a lot better than I expected.
he was tickled to receive it! so glad it was available to buy and I got it sooner than I had expected, so that was a bonus.
Great family movie with an engaging, funny & somewhat dramatic story line.  I've watched it multiple times and look forward to seeing it again.
A nice little picture for family viewing, something different. If you like animals mixed with alittle bit of fantasy, then this is the movie for you.
Some language isn't appropriate for small kids, but it is a very good funny movie and one of our favorites
I got this movie today in the mail :) And of-course love it!! it came quickly and is such a great movie!! :D
The product came before it was scheduled to and in great condition. Great classic - good for most any age.
full of laughter and thrills,great movie
This is a great kids movie it is action packed and very funny very enjoyable and a great family movie
It's a great movie . I remember it when I was younger . Everyone should see this movie it's got alot of wild life in it .
A very funny and sexy romantic comedy.
Might as well face because I am addicted to love this movie! Meg Ryan and Matthew Brodrick are amazingly funny together.
Surprise me that they look like a pretty pair.LOL.
Meg & Matthew do a WONderful job - THAT is why they are ACTORS for a living!!  :>D
I ordered it and really enjoyed this move.  I would recommend it to anyone who likes Meg Ryan:  Great movie.
Love it, watch it when ever i feel down, Love makes people crazy, and these guys are all nuts for the love.
I love this movie.  Sadly there were no new extras for the BluRay version. Picture is fantastic and so is sound.
And yet capturing some of its essence in what is otherwise a wonderful little dissertation on what makes life meaningful.
I have watched this movie quite a few times, and am happy to have it on hand. Inspirational and beautiful.
One of the best syfy movies ever made,Jodie Foster and James Woods totally makes this movie,i'm glad i finally got to see it
I like this movie, it's really interesting and engaging. The premise is interesting and original and captivating. I highly recommend this movie
I grew up watching Jodie Foster. I never thought that I would see her in a scifi though but she does a great job of doing her role in the movie.
This is a very well made film.  It is one of my favorites of all time!
Fantastic movie. Jodie Foster is great. Definitely a MUST SEE. Enjoyed every minute of the movie, interesting story and would recommend.
This is such a great movie. Jodie Foster is really good in this. It Makes you think and the acting is so good
Saw the movie when it first came out and really liked it. It's every bit as good as I remembered - in fact, even better.
This movie will be a classic if not already.....Jodie are you half way out of the closet?....it does not matter still a great actress...
Jodie Foster does a great job in every movie she is in and this one in no exception.  Loved it and will wTch it more than once.
Thoroughly enjoyed this film and would hardily recomment it!  Absolutely entertaining! Jodie Foster did a great job!  We love her films.
If it could happen this is the way it would happen... Foster played it exactly correctly... the casting people know their business.
Another great movie!  Packaging was good and the quality of the movie was really great!  Loved this purchase and movie.
I've always loved this movie, and I imagine I always will. I consider this one of Jodi Fosters best roles and she performs it excellently.
Jody Foster's best movie.  Carl Sagan's brilliance shows through!!
Jodi Foster shines in this sci-fi story, and Matthew McConaughey is very believable as a spiritual man.  The story is engaging and well told.
I love this movie! Makes a person think a little bit about the possibilties of life outside our own little world.
Everything well done. A must for Sci Fi lovers!
This was purchased as a replacement for a lost copy on vhs! A classic, in our opinion. So happy to have it back in the library!
As always Jodie Foster was great in this movie. It kept me on the edge of the seat, as most of her movies do.
This will be a movie that i put in  with all my other movies and tell friends about it. thanks
Or is it?  Jodie Foster, Matt McCauhahay, everyone in the flick is great.  Got it on sale, a great buy as I love Sci-Fi, especially when it'son sale.
I bought this for my mom for Christmas. I didn't know she already had it, but fortunately for me, her old one was lost.
i love collecting movies and thought i would add this one to my collection and this is one of my favorite jodi foster movies.
This was a great movie. With a lot of twists. I just love a good movie with Matthew McConaughey in it. LOVED IT.
a very good movie that is a special edition. didn't cost to much to buy it i haven't seen this cd but i have seen the movie
i have seen this movie many times in the past, is an excellent movie, want to own it...I would recommend it to anyone.
The story and beauty of this movie are enhanced by the Hi-Definition of the Blue Ray. I reccommed this to any sci-fi fan!
This is a movie that I have liked  for many years.  Finally bought  me a copy and really enjoyed it
I really liked the entire movie.  I simply can't get enough of J Foster.  The Si Fi  stuff is greatThanks
This is a great movie that I can watch over and over.  The script develops the characters well and represents Carl Sagan's plot without compromise.
I thought this movie was great. I am into Science fiction and love the way this movies story came along.
Jodie Forest in Contactis just awesome.  She plays her part well and this is a great movie to sit back and just enjoy the science and fantasy!
I have seen the movie and I loved it.  This is a thoughtful and intriquing movie.  Pop some corn and sit back and watch.
I enjoyed Contact the first time I saw it.  Jodie Foster did an excellent job in this movie.  I like it.
Love this movie and the people staring in it!  Never thought about actually purchasing it for my collection until recently.  Very glad I bought it!
Ive always loved this movie because its such a great story and im so glad I have it in blu ray now!
Loved this movie when it came out and is still one of my favorite movies. Lots of great stars in it.
It's one of those movies you can watch over and over.  Jodie Foster at her best.  Highly recommend this movie.
the message that this movie tries to put forth is marvelous. it is really about karma and how tightly we are all connected.
Don't think they could have put a better cast together for this story. Plot twists were just enough - really liked how they ended it!
This is a very good movie that I added to my collection and will watch it over and over again.
as it suggests, it's about a conspiracy theory.  very good movie, well produced in every aspect.  very realistic in every regard.
This is one of my favorite movies, so I sent it to a friend for her birthday.  I hope she enjoys it as much as I do.
Movie way ahead of it's time. Who would think the government would be spying on us? Lol. NSA loves this.
Both the actors and storyline were great, both movies were of good quality and in perfrct condition when they arrived.
This movie never gets old.  The acting is superb, and Mel is his whacky self.  Julia Roberts is wonderful in this movie.
It's something that keeps a person on the edge of his/her seat til the end.  It's good entertainment for men and women.
I had watched this movie before and therefore wanted to own a copy of it since I really liked it.
It's a must own , Gibson is great in this movie, and Roberts , well she's a very good actress and not bad for the eyes.Buy it !
A thrillingmovie that keeps you glued to watch and figure out was is to happen.
The title of the movie tells a lot.definitely a good script and good acting..  Have watched it many times
GOTTA LOVE JULIA ROBERTS AND MELGIBSON. I LOVE ROMANTIC MOVIES. And this one hits the spot. I can't get enough.
Excellent cast that carrys you with them. The movie has some twists that keep you guessing. Well performed. Enjoy!
Great conspirary story with great actors. If you like suspense, intrigue and romance, watch Conspiracy Theory. You'll be glad you did.
A really great movie with a great plot.I have watched it plenty of times.Probably should have gotten the bluray version.
Outstanding action and mystery as well as intrigue. One of the best movies along with Tequila sunrise that I have seen in a while.
This is one of Mel Gibsons best movies ever, you can watch it over and over a a a a
Good movie. Very suspenseful. The acting was good and so was the storyline. I would recommend this movie to anyone who likes thriller type movies.
I have always loved Clint Eastwood and his portrayal of Dirty Harry is superb. Would watch it over and over again.
Clint Eastwood as Dirty Harry and the magnum force including the younger actors it was great. Very good acting movie.
This has always benn one of my all time faves. Wild, zany, violent , romantic, and comical. Cristian Slater and Patricia Arquette are badass.
Impressive cast and great dialog make for an unforgettable film which I enjoy time and time again. Definitely a must see for Quentin Tarantino fans.
REST IN PIECE SIR TONY, DIRECTOR OF TRUE ROMANCE. HOLLYWOOD HAS LOST A TRUE GENIUS OF A FILMMAKER. SO PROUD TO BE A FAN AND TO OWN ALL HIS FILMS.
THE best action movie, ever! Forget 'Pulp Fiction' or 'Desperado'!
stop reading this review and go and watch the best movie i have ever seen.........
love this movie so much.  I have had everyone in my office borrow it from me to watch it.  I found it here too for the best price
Cool movie.  A must have for any tarantino fan. Good thing this is so popular cause its often on sale for cheap
Lots of twists that all come together at the end.Great acting and great line of actors.This is a must watch if you have never seen it.
When I found out that the bear jew's relative was in this I had to see it no questions asked. I love the whole lore behind everything.
My husband has raved about this film for years. Not your usual love story, but well played and engaging. Watch it.
Excellent Movie I Have had yard sales, but this movie will never make the sales tables. Thank you  for the opportunity.
I love dark comedy's. There are some great one liners in this movie. I have watched this movie over and over..
It was a good movie. Favorite part was what his dad said while he was being detained. Don't let the title make you think it's a chick flick.
This movie really has it all, and it's one of my absolute favorite movies of all time. Highly recommended to anyone.
This has got to be one of the best movies I've ever watched.  It's action packed from the very beginning to the end.
what the hell is tony scott doing??? quentin tarantino really knows how to ruin something potentially good.
Loved it for both a romance story and a drama!!!  Wow, it really keeps you on your seat for the next move!
The casting alone tells you that this movie is going to have an impact you will never forget.  One of my favorite movies of all time!
Sort of like Reservoir Dogs & Foxey Brown, but totally unique on it's own.Either way it's a killer film if you dig Quentin Tarantino's stuff.
I love this Movie very much i had to have in my collection. full of action and suspence.
Boyfriend loves this movie. It kept him happy over the holidays. Made a nice Christmas gift and easy to package and ship overseas.
This is my favorite movie of all time.  Gritty, witty, packed with awesome actors.  I have to watch it at least once a year =)
got the movie cuz i liked the tital and my now 23 year old son loves tarentino movies. we both loved it a read watch highly recommended
This is a hilarious movie.  Just as funny as the first.  "You have the right to sing the blues."Buy the pack right when it comes out in april
Have them all and loved this one along with the rest of the series. good light family entertainment for adults.
I have watched this film more than once. Sylvester Stallone is excellent in it as well as Michael Caine. Excellent story line.
fantastic movie any soccer fan or anyoneinterested in conflict without bloodshed will love this dvd
Samuel is one on top of his game in this picture, so much so, that I'm looking for this in a Bluray format. To purchase
Super intriguing. Gritty, yes, but the movie and scenarios call for it. It's dark, but it's a really great movie. Definitely under-rated.
Love everything that Sam Jackson stars in.  he is a great actor and i look foraward to anything that he performs in.
DVD came in very good timely manner, box was a lil scratched, but movie played very good.. no problems
THIS MOVIE IS LIKE REAL LIFE JUST KNOWING WHAT TEACHERS HAVE TO PUT UP WITH OTHER PEOPLE KIDS,DRUGSI WOULD GIVE 10 STARS IF I COULD.A MUST SEE MOVIE
I love Bugs Bunny cartoons...they were really the best cartoons ever made.  The cartoons today suck, I miss normal cartoons.
I love the Road Runner cartoons and so do my grandkids.  We need more of the good 'ol time cartoons like this for kids.
The kids loved this movie I would watch it again because the kids watched the whole movie why do we need to write such a long review any way
Very entertaining for the kids, they sat and watched it the whole time it was on, It wasn't full of adult content.
My eleven year old son watched this and loved it. Good, harmless, fun for the whole family (assuming you like wacky cartoons).
I love the cartoons in this movie and my grandchildren do to.  I do have to reinsure my youngest that no one really gets hurt.
Just love the classics, nothing can beat these type of cartons, and my kids love them just the same as I did when I was a kid
Movie like these will be always loved by many both children and adults.  Simply delightful!  Will be watched and re watched many times more&#128522;
I wish there were a lot more cartoons of this nature to see, meaning Bugs Bunny/Roadrunner, etc. Great family fun.
I have loved watching Bugs Bunny and all the Looney Tunes characters since 1955.  I'm only wish the cartoons were still on TV.
Me and my children 3 and 9 they love this movie bugs and daffy are there favorite. we've watched it at least 30 times
I like these old cartoons, they don't make them like this anymore, need to remind our kids how it used to be instead of the voilence they see now..
Grand kids introduced to the Road Runner and Coyote, laughed for the whole show!! Watch it, you wil love it. Timeless humor.
I've adored this movie since I was a kid. Together with Quackbusters.  Great fun for the whole family. Go buy this movie.
Me and Bugs have been buddies for a looooooong time. This is Bugs at his classic best. The Road Runner is pretty good too!
grandson loves this movie. he would love me to let him watch it more often, but want him to do other things than watch tv all the time!
it was a really good movie i enjoyed watching it i would let my son watch it if he would sit still during the movie
I love most Looney Tunes characters but Bugs and Road Runner are two special favorites.  Who could ask for anything more?
It was so great to watch the movie from 1979! Love the cartoons from childhood days. Retro shows are always fun to reminisce.
My kids really enjoy this movie and we have watched it multiple times.  It's classic and good to have in our video library.
Fun for the parents to see some oldies but goodies, and fun to introduce the kids to some classic cartoons.  They loved it!
A great reminder that some of the best movies don't have any special effects. If you like great dialogue and romance you will love this movie!
I love this film and found it on a whim from a friends suggestion its a great intellectual film. Peace TMU
This is an enchanting tale. Ethan Hawke is one of my favorites. Don't forget to purchase the Sequel; just as charming!!!!
One of the most romantic movies you'll ever watch. The director really knows how to visually tell a compelling story.
This movie creates a desire to find out what happens next. Great movie with a great sequel as well. Thumbs up!
I feel sorry that I watched "before sunset" before "before sunrise" but both were brilliant!
This is possibly the best chick flick ever made. There have been several sequels. This is the one to watch.
We enjoyed watching &#34;Before Sunset&#34; with Ethan Hawke and Julie Delphy.So much so, that we watched the entire triology.
I enjoyed this follow up of the original movie. It was interesting. Enjoyable. It kept the storyline going,although is was love unrequited!
I love the whole premise behind this movie. Ethan Hawke and Julie Delpy were perfect together. I would recommend it.
Great Relationship flick !!! Definitely recommend it . Left it open for another movie. Actors have great chemistry. Must See.
I watched this in preparation for Before Midnight. I can't believe I hadn't seen it before!  Wow. Such great writing. Phenomenal acting.
Great Movie a must watch.  significant historical movie , captivating to the end
This is an excellent representation of this time in history. If you couldn't figure it out then, you'll get the straight poop here.
It's time to revisit this classic film.Nothing short of brilliant and filled with great performaces by Redford, Hoffman & Robards, watch it!
I like the idea of bringing down a president that was a crook.I lived though that time in our turbulent history!
I orderd this movie for my mom as a gift, because I know she is a fan of Dustin Hoffman, She will be so happy!! Five stars all the way!!!!
I thought this to be a good movie to review the Nixon years right before and after his election of the 70's.
The topic is timeless and should never be forgotten.  The medium is dated, but the dial phones & general inefficiency of communicating adds suspense.
Excellent drama and suspense.  Relentless pursuit of the truth.Great film for those who remember the 70s and the Watergate scandal.
This is an awesome movie telling the story of wire taping, that is legal today.  But at the time changed a nation and just a good movie.
The film was excellent and well done.  It was suspenseful and kept you guessing until the very end.
Awsome movie IT has been years since I watched it again and it was as good as when I saw it
What can anyone say &#8230; one of the greatest thrillers of all time.  And, it was all true.  Great acting by Dustin Hoffman and Robert Redford.
In my top 3 all time. Great.  If you like movies based on real events you'll love this.  Great acting, directing and story.
A thriller without mystery.  We knew the end before it began.  All the more thrilling.  One of the great films.  Power corrupts so gently.Tim
A classic.  The plot slows at times, but has the greatest car chase ever filmed, and a great ending.  A great story, well told.
BluRay makes this movie classic better than ever. From VHS to DVD to BluRay, we have had them all !
Still the classic with the best car chase! McQueen at his best doing what he loved. The old ones are hard to beat
I had never seen this movie before and was not sure if I would enjoy it.  But I do!  This is a great action movie with a great plot and great acting!
This was a very interesting movie.  The driving was very exciting to watch, especially going down the hills in California.
The best car chase in all movie history!  They don't make movies like this anymore.
Clue, I thnk, to my enjoyment of &#34;Bullitt&#34; is that I've watched it about six or so times since I got it.
One of the greatest action flicks ever made. Its a movie that will always be popular for generations to come.
Got this for my husband for Christmas. He and I both loved it. Excellent commentary. Learned many interesting things about the film.
classic movie, best iconic car chase. awesome cars, steve mcqueen was one of the best actors of his time.
This is one of the greatest movies ever.  It is especially good from the late 1960's.  The care chase is the best ever made.
Great flick, McQueen at the top of his game, not that he was anything other than at the top and worth watching just for the chase thru the city.....!
Great movie,  I will gladly recommend this movie to any and all my friends interested in a classic Steve McQueen movie
item was the one I wanted, sent the item with no delays, very good price thanks I am a very happy customer
Bullitt and Mcqueen Good classic movie! Great to see again and again. I hope this helps however, nothing else to say.
What is not to like with one of the great movies and action scenes. Then toss in Steve McQueen. Wow
very awesome car chase scene from bill hickman and steve McQueen.
Why wouldn't you own this other than it is on a dead format.  Classic film, classic McQueen.  This film was great on VHS!
This movie is a car lover's dream.  Excellent movie with a parade of fantastic cars; both classic muscle and period cars.
Great classic film with the best car chase scene ever made. All real cars and drivers. Enjoy!!!!
What can I say, I just love Steve McQueen movies and Bullitt was my favorite years ago.  I enjoy this movie even years later.
The original RIDE!!!!  This movie is still as good as when I saw it released in the cinema.  Definately worth the watch.
Steve McQueen in one of his best movies. Usual style and very interesting plot. I have enjoyed watching it again.
This has the best car chase in movie history...a must have for any car guy and car chase lover, love it.
Best long, continuous car chase scenes in the street and outskirts I have ever seen. Would like to see the rest of this movie.
this cd is the best.  we had looked for it in several different places and could not find it.  thanks.
It arrived on and its what I ordered, cheapest price I found on the whole world wide web, hands down.It's a classic movie everyone should own.
A classic movie with a pretty great storyline...it's interesting to see this movie and recognize how influential it was on the genre.
I watched this on cable many years ago with my dad such a great movie and one of the best car chases ever.
Always like Steve McQueen , this is one of his all time Greats . That is the reason I ordered this Great Movie
Bullitt is a classic!  We love to watch over and over, sometimes just the chase scene.  Steve Mcqueen is awesome!
As usual, Steve McQueen is Mr. Cool.  The car chase is great.  This movie has a very high degree of realism.  I've loved it since it first came out.
One of my best movies is Bullitt. Steve Mcqueen is the number one star till this day. The movie is great.
it wasn't a great movie but did have one of the best chase sceens in it and every one thinks so.
this film is great and mcqueen is as tough as ever. check it out
I can't believe how long I waited to see this.  Great car chase, Steve Mcqueen is a super star.  Awesome movie.
Just get it, you can't go wrong with an amazing american instant classic. Has the best chase scenes ever and great views of SF.
Classic Steve McQueen. Great stock footage of San Francisco, Great cars and a great car chase!! I Highly recommend this flick !!
Steve McQueen was great in this movie. There were some great chase scenes in San Francisco. It was fun to watch.
if you love a good old fashioned car chase movie through the city streets, this is the movie for you! Great cop movie from back in the day
Just added to my dvd collection. One of my favorite "guy/car" movies. also purchased " Dirty Mary, Crazy Larry" & Vanishing Point".
I thought the video and audio quality was very good and it made this classic more enjoyable than ever. Great.
This movie has the best car chases and is full of action.  This one will also keep you on your toes and is a great classic.
very good movie a lot of good chase scenes Steve McQueen does a good job like you always does well worth the money
Steve McQueen is a movie icon. This is a good movie with cool cars and one of the best chase scenes on film.
This is one of the top 100 movies to own. How can you go wrong - Steve McQueen - cars - Steve McQueen - cars.
I've seen this many times. Good movie. Well acted. And the best car chase ever put on film (sorry, Seven Ups).
This is a very high quality DVD to watch it also comes with a great case to store it in.
A great McQueen movie. Refreshing to watch and before political correctness ruined our nation. Awesome movie and well worth the time.
This is obviously one of the famous SM movies. I've seen it numerous times over the years. Wish it had more action sequences, but still outstanding!
Any movie with Al Pacino is sure to be a winner.  I've always liked this one because it showed his future genius.
I've seen this film many times already. It's my favorite Lumet AND my favorite Pacino.Buy it. Watch it. You'll see.
Al Pacino is 1 of my favorite actors & this film's a classic. This is one of my all time favorite Al Pacino movies.
A great movie, a classic movie. Al Pacino at his finest. Sometimes stories do not get any better then real life. Attica. Attica. Attica. Lol.
i seen this when i was a child and i loved it as much now as then you will learn more about this movie than you may think
This is a great movie to have in your rainy day collection, Al Picino in NYC 1970.s bank robery gone wrong with a bizzar twist.
Dog Day Afternoon did not win any Oscars because One Flew took all!(Just mentioning this to underline the greatness of this movie too)
Received as described. Perfect addition to my Pacino collection. Cannot find many Al Pacino movies in stores. Great find. Thanks.
Based on a true story and a true gem of a movie. No matter your day, it will likely not go this far awry.
This is the movie that, in my opinion, put Al Pacino on his way to super stardom. This one should not be missed.
Except that I would like to move to a country called Wyoming.This is one of the films I watch every couple of years because i like it so much.
One of the best movies ever ! Love Natalie Wood movies. She was a great actress!If you haven't seen this movie I recommend you do so.Barbara
One of my all time favorite movies, so glad I could get the DVD, NOW I, can watch it anytime I want to, Great buy, on my part!
Fabulous movie. Great Natalie and Warren in their earlier roles. I recommend it to anyone who loves movies and it's directed by the great Elia Kazan
I loved this movie.  I am not sure what age group I would encourage to see this but I would encourage everyone in the 'people' professions to see it.
Excellent movie.  I remember watching this 45 years ago and it was still as good as ever.  It's a classic!
I had been looking for this movie for a long time. Glad I finally found it on Amazon. I'd forgotten how great Natalie Wood was in this movie.
Not quite in the top 20, but a fringe buy - not disappointed - held up as I remembered - a testimony to the whacky values of the past.
Saw it when I was a teenager and enjoyed it then; now I have the DVD and can enjoy it and introduced it to my grandchildren who are teens.
I bought this for my moms and she likes it. I never seen it. She likes old movies so I got her this.
This movie is a classic and I only rented it but I sure should have purchased it. I am sure I wil go back to make the purchase
This is one of the best movies I've ever seen. Deserves blu ray treatment for sure. The acting is superb.
This movie is poignant and moving. The acting is of top caliber. Every word, every scene, spot on. I love this movie.
I highly recommend this film to anybody who loves Mozart or at the very least are interested in Mozart. I loved this film so much!
Christmas gift, but he has seen before, he asked for this. so no reason for him not to like it.
Complete set of everything needed to fully enjoy the movie. Neat and compact, the set takes little space but gives much enjoyment.
Compulsory for anyone interested in good music...I saw it long ago and had to buy my own copy.Bravo!
I bought this originally on Laser Disc because I loved the movie and it's music. Now it's even better on Blue Ray. I highly recommend it.
A great movie.  I had seen it myself and my daughter asked for it as a Christmas gift.  I agree.
Addictive movie. About three hours long. Its a good insight to Wolfgang Amadeus Mozarts life and the people who surrounded him
loved it. i remember watching it in europe years ago when it came out and loved it again after so many years.
I have owned this before. Beautiful period piece about Mozart. Acting is superb, especially F. Murray Abraham. A musty see, if you haven't.
Blue ray would be the only improvement for this. I love music, and this story. Together it definitely made me happy to order this set.
Very entertaining almost completely fictional depiction of Mozart's life and death. Fun to watch. Music is wonderful. Casting and acting is awesome.
This is an example of an excellent film by excellent actors and all the while describing a 100% true account of the worlds finest composer ever.
Tom Hulce owns the role. Too bad he never seems to have found a significant role since. This is a masterpeice nonetheless.
I first saw this film in high school and I fell in love with it. I had to get it on dvd.
This movie is a great glimpse of Europe at its best. The time is one of the most interesting in history.
This is a great movie.  Worth the price and excellent picture quality on my Kindle Fire HD.  I would recommend it to anyone.
I know it is not historically completely accurate but it is a powerhouse movie just the same.
Hight quality image, twenty minutes of new material, great music. Spanish subtitles, I really love this movie!
Such a great movie a complete historical fantasyThis is a one of a kind movie the three hours just fly by
One of my all time favorite movies!!! I was so happy when I remembered that I didn't own it and was able to find it on here right away
This DVD presents Mozart's life in a much more controversial struggle with Salieri than does the movie show. Better presentation of the movie
acting,story line, musical score all superior.  an absolute delight.  the emotion conjured up watching this story awakens your soul.sublime
This is just absolutely great. Grand film, great set, awesome packaging, worth the price. I really love the quality and the content.
Just a brilliant movie! enjoyable even after all of these years later.  It asks me for 8 more words so I can submit....
I've always loved classical music, this movie only made it stick! I love how this movie talks about Amadeus life and death in an interesting manner.
One of the best Steven Seagal movies made.  He needs to stick to these types of movies.
Great movie. Have enjoyed this flick each time I watch it. Read an article several years ago that this was a bio of Seagals early life. Possible?
REST IN PIECE SIR TONY, DIRECTOR OF THE LAST BOYSCOUT. HOLLYWOOD HAS LOST A TRUE GENIUS OF A FILMMAKER. SO PROUD TO BE A FAN AND TO OWN ALL HIS FILMS
Awesome action movie!  If you liked DIE HARD, you'll love this!  I really reccommend this movie!
If you like classic one liners than this is the movie for you. Full of action and funny at the same time.
A classic to watch again and again. hilarious and witty. great one liners and lots of action! T must see this every time its on.
This film I saw years back and loved it,the actors are all great.I would say if you like Willis and Wayans you have to see this movie
lmaoo..I am laughing because not only was it an action movie, but it was also hilarious and easy to follow
Haven't seen this movie in years and when I saw it for sale I just had to have it. I love this movie and the picture quality is fantastic.
Love, love, love Bruce Willis. Have seen all his Die Hard movies. He is Mr. Action star! He is the best!
I actually have this movie on VHS, and had to have it on DVD. My kids watched it with me and it is now a favorite of theirs.
I like Bruce Willis and usually buy any Movie that he stars in. This is a good movie to watch over and over, Bruce does it great.
this is also a bruce willis classic...ties in well with the die hard movies...action packed and never gets old. love it
Absolute classic! Hilarious! This is an old favorite in our family. It is just as funny as the original Lampoon's.
Great movie, always have loved this series, Christmas vacation is my favorite. Funny weekend movie to watch with your family.
A must have Classic Flick, all four that were made staring Chevy Chase are all very funny simply awesome classics
This is the best of all the sequels & the rest should not be bought. The credits alone lift my spirit as i think any true american's would be too!
Chevy Chase has always been one of my favorite actors. Your DVD store should do well with quality DVDs. Thank You
It was a very funny and enjoyable movie. I could watch it again and again. Wish there were more Vacation movies made in the future.
chevy chase in his euro trip was quite funny and exciting to watch im sure you would enjoy this movie and its comedic tour of Europe :)
I love this of all the sequels I like this one the best  It resembles the original vacation the most more then Vegas or  Christmas
If you want to watch something funny this is the show to watch. You might also try Christmas Vacation also.
The griswald family wins a trip to Europe and manage to insult the locals and wind up with some bad guys.
received it quick and it was well packaged this was one of my favorite movies with chevy chase the dvd was in good shape thomas a
I have all the police academy dvds and each one is great for laughs and this one is a great one.
This was purchased to replace a VHS version that I already have ! ! !  I really do love this movie ! ! !
Beautiful fantasy film.  Enjoyed all the performers and the sets.  Semi-tragic but like all love stories everything is ok in the end.
DO NOT overpay for this dvd, most countries already have this movie in blu-ray region FREE for less than $20. Just go to
One of my favorite movies.  I had been looking for quite a while and am so glad I finally found it.
Wore out the VHS and so updated to DVD.  Love this movie.
A GREAT LOVE STORY WITH BEAUTIFUL PEOPLE!! MATTHEW STOLE THE SHOW MOST OF THE TIME. LOVED IT THEN STILL LOVE IT NOW!!
Ladyhawke is a beautiful movie, a love story but not one of those mushy ones, lots of excitment in this movie and great acting too
It is a very good movie to watch.I would recommend this movie to anybody.I would let anybody watch this movie
Excellent color and definition. One of my favorite movies rendered as should; its like watching a new movie when you compare it to the DVD format.
The dvd had more clearer image than the [vhs] which i also have.A good movie with a happy ending.  GREAT
My dad loves this movie and thanks you for the fast service so he could watch it again. We didn't know it was on DVD
To bad I waited so long to get the DVD.  It had become rather expensive.  I saw them in a store a few months back for a more reasonable price.
Really happy to have this favorite in blu ray format at last. I wish it would've had some extras, but just glad to own it.
Another film that has it all.  Action, comedy, romance and good soundtrack by Alan Parsons Project. If you haven't seen this you are in for a treat.
My daughter hates the music, but it was great for its time!!  Love this story!!So glad to find it on DVD.Arrived quickly and in great shape!
This is one of my most favorite movies. I was really glad to receive it so quikly. Thank you.
One of the great ones they don't carry in stores. Wonder what stores are for anymore. Great favorite with great actors.
Great story, movie and blu ray. I would recommend this item to others and know that they would enjoy it as much as I have.
Our family never gets tired of watching this classic love story, it's got it all. We love this movie!
TERRIFIC MOVIE!!!! Have seen it over & over & never get bored. Tis a movie from the roman days giving spells that work BUT awesummmmmmmm !!!!!
Fabulous movie, Rutgar Hauer, Matthew Broderick & Michelle Pfeiffer and evil bishops - gotta love it! Great horse too.
Very much worth watching. Excellent acting and script.Time well spent watching TV . . . . if you like to watch TV.
This was the fastest service I have ever had. Great movie. Will use this company again and again.order was received 2 days after ordering.
This has a great storyline ! Kevin Spacey is awesome in this.  Set in the ol South, very cool !
I have always wanted to read this book. The movie did not disappoint me. Southern families never fail to make a great movie.
A real gem, and Kevin Spacey does a great job in his role.  A true story that turned Savannah society upside down.
I love this movie!!!! It has some of everything that makes a movie great.  A must see.  Has the quality of real life performance.
EXCELLENT MOVIE. Another view of New Orleans and decadent living that will appeal to people who love vampires, voodoo and gays.
Outstanding actors, great director and a very intriguing story mix together for a marvelous film.
One of the best movies EVER... WE HAVE SEEN IT MANY TIMES and it remains right up there with the best of the classics...
It closely follows the book written by Mr. Berendt, and like the book it captures the feeling of Savannah aristocracy.
This one has twists and turns, humor, murder, mystery, voodoo, and intrigue! One of the best movies I have ever seen!
The story was really interesting and the acting was terrific.Makes me want to go to Savannah to visit the sites that were in the movie.
I totally enjoyed Thais movie. Great cast and very intriguing stor.I  was planning a trip to Savannah and wanted to see the great solo cations.
Clint Eastwood at his best! Love his directing and he does not disappoint! Kevin Spacey is superb and the shooting in Savannah was beautiful!
Based of a true story this movie is superb.  I have watched it several times and the depiction of Savanna Georgia is wonderful.
Great story and excellent acting
Great movie, love the sucpeance and the colorful cast.
Great Example of our stupid Legal System ! Movie is far from how it really goes but close enough to get me angry.
The story and the acting are very good-the actors did a great job. It is well Worth the time to watch.
Definitely keeps your attention and is entertaining from start to finish
GIVEN TO A FRIEND AS A GIFT.  SHE LOVED IT. I WATCHED IT. I LOVED IT. RECOMMEND FOR WINTER NIGHT VIEWING.
very intricate, good acting and scenery in savannah.  a must see if going to savannah
This is a great suspense movie.Gives a realistic view of how the media circus sometimes go to far.Hoffman and Travolta are marvelous in this film.
This was a really great movie.  Sad also.  It hits home for a lot of people.  You can see why Russell Crowe is such a great actor.  They both are.
great stuff, so glad i found this movie.  few movies rival this level of ingenuity.  will likely rewatch, something i dont do often
This is in my opinion is the best and funniest movie that Bill Murray has ever been in.  An instant classic to any movie collection.
This is a funny movie, BIll Murray is great.  You will enjoy this movie.  Great family time. Its an older movie but a good one.
I really enjoyed seeing Bill Murray.  He maxes out the role!  The action is hysterical, and keeps you on the edge of your seat.
I don't laugh out loud at many movies, but this one is full of those moments. It's got heart, too. Recommended.
ONe of my favorite movies of all time. I watched this as soon as I received it.
This is a great movie to watch when you just need a laugh and don't want to take any thing too seriously!
Really a fun and funny comedy.  Enjoyed watching sometimes the older movies are more entertaining and have more heart.  Would recommend.
This is a great movie, and you'll see Bill at his usual wit. If you like Bill Murray, you won't be disappointed.
If you like action , drama , mystery ... then this movie is for you .Its for of great actors and actresses , and keeps you guessing till the end .
Love it, a fantastic film. Great cast, and period detail
As I said for Hollywood Land this film has it all another true Hollywood gem if you love old Hollywood films then this is for you
I highly recommend this very suspenseful crime thriller. Be aware that it is violent with a lot of sex (off screen.) Superb cast.
Two discs for great price on a modern classic noir film. Thanks for the opportunity to add this to my collection!
The stellar acting in the film by Spacey, Crowe, and Pearce make this film a vintage film for any film lover.
LA Confidential is a great movie.Great acting, great story line, etc.If you want a really entertaining movie, this is it.
Another great addition to our library!A classic addition to any collectors library of great movies -A good movie for a lazy afternoon!
A story of good cop, and bad cop ... both achieving good things.  I hope the corruption they portray is not real but I fear it is.
Great story, the exterior locations were perfect and the acting was impeccable.  Wonderful cast. I have no criticisms about this film as you can see!
This was one of the best movies in recent memory. All the actors were fantastic and the plot was multi-layered and thorough. This is one to own.
Gee I'm glad I bought this on DVD, the s material that came along with it make the movie so much better.  The cast was great it reaped what it sowed.
Thrilling, gritty, great acting! I thoroughly enjoyed this film, a definite classic in my book. Based on a novel by James Elroy.
We had seen this movie in the past and enjoyed it just as much this time as we did the first time.  Kevin Spacey and Kim Bassinger were fabulous!
I knew this movie was great when I bought it and I received what I expected.  No surprises here.  Enjoy.
Everybody did a great job. A good story, neat old cars. Probably more cops smoked then, though. An easy watch.
Good movie , good twisted plot, keeps you guessing.Lots of good stars so its pretty believable, i would reccomend
Excellent cast. Excellent acting. It's a movie that my husband and I have watched a few times. Worth watching more than once!
ENJOYED THE MOVIE, INTERESTING PLOT, GOOD ENDING, WOULD RECOMMEND IT. ACTING WAS VERY GOOD, WOULD WATCH IT AGAIN. SAT THROUGH THE WHOLE MOVIE.
Awesome performances, quick pace, and a script that doesn't dumb anything down. A must see for fans of the genre.
L.A. Confidential  is a great movie. I saw it on TV & just needed a copy of it for my Library.
Loved Russell Crow in this movie and Kevin Spacey. Liked the era it took place in. Russell was one tough cop.
Great movie, great actors.  Debated for a long time about picking this up, but no matter what it is a good movie to see.
This is a great movie. I watched it on television and bought it to have in our collection. It has a great story line and is very good.
This is a good movie of California police police department in the early 50's.  With Danny and Kevin Spacey makes this a great suspense movie.
This is a very suspenseful movie which had a great script. An excellent choice for anyone who enjoys Mystery/Suspense Dramas.
I enjoyed this movie very much. I've watched it 3 times. Each time I see something I didn't notice before.
lots of twist and turns, its an old movie so the young folks had to be brought up to speed on the stars and the story line, they liked the movie
This was a great action movie and to me it is what happens in allot of the mpolice departments across our country
I've seen it before and it just felt right for a quiet evening.  Lots of attention paid to getting the period feel right.
This is one of my favorite WWII movies behind Saving Private Ryan.  There is good action and dialogue and worth watching.
This presentation is a historical review of a storied group of heroes who deserve well earned glory.  A must see!
Any movie with Lee Marvin is hard to remake  without Lee Marvin.One of those stars that enhances any feature with him in the cast.
This new release, made the movie even better than the original, which was one of my favorite war movies, making it a must see.
Oustanding movie with the additional footage. Will recomend to friends. The movie was a classic before now is even better. Thank you for offering it.
This movie now flows like it was originally intended.  The reconstruction effort adds needed footage that better explains the whole story.
I remember watching this years ago. I have added this to my collection so I can continue to watch when I have extra time. Good action and plot.
I only order movies I like, and these are all excelent movies that help me kill time in the winter.
I have seen this movie on cable but the DVD is great!  Bruce Lee is the best in Martial Arts, too bad he died very young.
Purchased for 88 year old aunt. Quick shipment, great price. Would purchase other movies in the future. She loved the movie...
took forever to receive from shipper but damn when i got it... i could smell the ink drying from the disc... classic and awesome!
If you're a Bruce Lee fan nothing I can say - It's obviously one movie you must have! Wished they were all as good as this one.
This movie has been a classic for as long as I can remember,since I had first seen this movie in the Drive in almost 40 years ago.Enjoy.
Every time I introduce this old movie to a friend for the first time, they always get fascinated. Great collection too.
Enter the dragon,  great action and a variety of kung fu star action scenes with brilliant fight scenes by lee.
Enter the dragon is the best movie i ever seen.If you are a real Bruce lee fan you will get it.R.I.P. BRUCE LEE.
Bruce Lee would have been proud of this HD treatment. Buy it and enjoy the single greatist martial artist in history.
The best Bruce Lee movie of all times!  The fight sequences are amazing! Highly recommend it to everyone. You will not be disappointed.
Super deal , price wise , and of the Movie.
A true classic in HD. Lots of extras, most of them on the DVD edition. It's worth the upgrade if you are a fan.
This is a great movie. Everyone should have this movie. It is a tribute to the greatest martial artist ever.
The legend in one of his legendary movies. Thanks for having it available. I recommend this dvd to any karate movie fan in the world
This is one of the Best classic Movies Stephen King has ever made! I love it!! I remember watching it as a kid... and now I own it...
another of my additions to the SK collection. got a few to go. will keep on searching for good buys. this one was $7
Everyone afraid of clowns. Although, Tim Curry Did It Again. A Master At His Own Work. A Must For Collectors And Steven King Collectors.
This, after The Stand, is my favorite Stephen King movie.  A great cast and true to the book, you will enjoy this movie.
Great movie was just a bit disappointed in the end in but it was still a great movie would recommend it to friends.
what else can you say, IT is it, show IT to your kids and watch them crawl. - LOL. hey its steven king and he is always good for a good fright.
Another great stephan King adaption.  A true tale of fear, and Pennywise was cast perfectly.  True Horror!
The disk and case were in very good condition. I'm a very big Stephen King fan so its great to add it to my collection.
I love this movie, this movie is one of my favorites....I am a big Stephen King fan & i recommend any of his movies & books.
Chillingly frightening movie every time I see it. You can watch this over and over again and it is still as good and as frightening each time.
Great movie, was a tv made movie years ago.  Came on time and great condition.
Great movie, good quality, no issues with disk. Thank you, I enjoyed watching this movie and will continue to do so
Stephen King is my favorite author.  I have read th e book and watched the movie.  They are both good and scary at the same time.
VERY GOOD CD VERY CLEAR
IT the movie is the scariest movie I have ever seen. The movie is best for fans of Horror. It is not for kids
I am very happy with the condition of my dvd, I will use this company again and recommend to friends and family.  Melba Hyatt
I have watched this movie at least a half dozen times and will watch it again and again.  It is a really great story, scary, etc.
I love this movie.  Works great, not one scratch.  So happy I finally found it.  Nothing wrong with it, didn't take long to get here.
stephen king's it, scary and suspenseful. plays on our fears of childhood. aren't we silly for letting that happen? worth the time.
This movie has been a classic horror for years and I don't think it will stop. This movie is great! If you're afraid of clowns... Even better!
If you hate very scary movies you better not watch this and watch a family movie.This movie got me like 1o nightmares.Trust me on this.
All Vincent Prices Movies get a 5 star rating from me , Just love the mans work. , Greatest actor that ever lived
A fantastic movie!  One of the best Vincent Price movies, imo.  Highly recommend.
A typical Vincent Price vehicle, slightly over the top and tongue in cheek. I loved it!
excellent job,i love it.great sound and picture.i dont know about 3d version but on blueray looks amazing.is really clean and clear.
Vincent Price never disappoints. His movies are all wonderful. If you are a fan of Vincent Price and of really great movies, this is a winner.
Love this classic Vincent Price performance. A classic horror movie delivered brilliantly as only Price could. My kids even love this movie!
This is another great classic movie, Vincent Price as always does an excellent job.  you will enjoy this if you like 50's classic horror movies
This classic 3D movie should be revised in 3D IMAX.I wish the CD was capable of 3D.
Great classic finally in original format... 3DBonus of 1933 version House of wax inoriginal color.  Just loved it.
Kudos to Warner Bros. for releasing this dynamic duo and big kiss to this seller for being so prompt!!
i bought this for my buddy as well as a copy of the remake! should be fun to watch the original first! cannot wait...he will get them for christmas!
with a good story and a nice cast too and very good 3D with lot,s of bonus stuff too nice to have now on bluray as it is now.
Very quick delivery.  Well packaged.  I'm very pleased with my order and will order again from this vendor.  Thank you!
Masterful 3DThe first TRULY major studio effort of artistic merit.Excellent ExtrasIf you love 3D, you need to own this.
I hadn't seen this in years.  I watched it the other day and it was as I remembered.  Fun to have in my personal collection.
I love these old TRUE horror movies.  The classics will always be the best for me.  I LOVE Vincent Price!!!!!!
Love me some Vincent Price! His movies are amazing and I could watch them over and over and over again!!!
A classic and so very well done. Horror fans will consider this first rate!!! This film really explores the development of the " Frankenstein"Story
Love this old Peter Cushing movie.  Would definitely recommend this movie to anyone who likes old horror movies.  Love it.
Christopher Lee was the best as Dracula! I love his first turn as The Count.
Hammer Studios is one of the best horror movie makers. Christopher Lee and Peter Cushing are the best actors for the job.
One of the best Dracula movies, the acting was great.  Great creepy Horror film, amazing atmosphere and scenery too.
OF COURSE THIS IS AN EXCELLENT MOVIE....DRACULA IS MY ALL TIME FAVORITE VAMPIRE FOR SURE....I JUST LOVE THESE OLD MOVIES
DON'T MISS THIS CLASSIC. IT IS A VERY WELL MADE MOVIE. GOOD ACTING, COSTUMES, AND VERY ENTERTAINING.
This movie is fantastic.  It has a wonderful love story, the costumes and settings are beautiful and the fictional history is not far from fact.
I love this movie! It is very intelligent... Informs you about women's options in the era... Empowering... Thought provoking... Sexy... Love it!
great movie with historical references.  A really enjoyable film and I have shared it with friends and family and they liked it too
I really like romance stories and this was extremely good.  I liked this one so much I bought the DVD
I have seen this movie at least 4 or 5 times. It is a wonderful historical romance and the acting is superb.
I love this film. Artistic, entertaining, romantic and great story. I recommend this to anyone who loves love and freedom!
This movie was highly recommended.  I was pleasantly surprised by this different love story.  There are lessons here for all women across the ages.
I love the time and location this movie was based on.  Oh, and it was based on true events.  I had lost my other copy and needed to buy a new one.
The actors were great.  Venice was real and the story was amazing.  Romance novel come to life, with a great story line. Awesome.
An interesting study of love and social mores of long ago. I love the music from this movie. The soundtrack is amazing!
This is a great movie and she end up marrying into royalty, which is every girl's dream or the American dream.
Good coverage of the entire culture of the Courtesan in Venice.  A young Naomi Watts is good in her role and Jacqueline Bissett is always a treasure.
A beautiful flowering masterpiece. Superbly acted and incredibly poised.  A bit spellbinding and enchanting in its own way. Enticing and wondrous.
Truly a Cerebral film, Just like SIGNS, if you don't get it! you won't get it. Mankind's inner thoughts will kill us in the end.
I really like this movie and in Blu-ray it is even better it feels like I am right there & has some big stars in it so how can you go wrong..
Was very pleased with Sphere.  It was received in timely manner and in excellent condition.
I loved the old great movies that I grew up with. They don't make them like they used to maybe doesn't apply but they still are fun to watch.
Tommy Lee as usual plays a good part with lots of good suporting players it is good to see a movie where justice finaly wins out.
Have always enjoyed watching these movies, lots of action and intrigue.  Always enjoy these actor in movies and they are usually action packed.
Good to watch the first and second time. Action, plot, suspense, characters and intrigue. Tommy Lee and Wesley Snipes are two of my favorite actors.
wish there were more stories for Gerard but only if Jones in playing the lead. He fits the character perfectly
This movie has the drama, presence and great acting and little to no profanity.It has what it takes to be on my got to have list.
I had this on VHS and I wanted it for DVD and I can say I didn't go wrong in getting it.  It is a great movie.
I really like this movie. It is fast action like the fugitive and kept my attention. I also liked the price of the DVD.
we loved the movie it had a very good action all thorw the movie that made it good to watch
love to action and the thrill of the film they have made movies with all the same characters and relate to this movie as well
TLJ was awesome, but Wes needs to hang it up. Enjoyed but not as good as the fugitive. I would recommend.
GREAT MOVIE TO WATCH AND IT HAS WESLEY SNIPES IN IT. LOTS OF ACTIONSWELL WORTH THE BUY, I HAVE WATCH THIS MANY TIMES AND STILL ENJOY IT
Tommy and wesley at it again good chase scenes and everything . I really like this movie and recommend it to all
We really enjoyed this movie.  We both try to watch all of Tommy Lee Jones movies.  He is a good actor and did a good job in this movie.
I think this is a wonderful movie had a lot of action and a very good story like.  and Tommy Lee Jones is great in it.
This movie is a good action film. Great actors, nice camera work and a plausible storyline. You wont be disappointed if you watch it.
...that a film can be so funny and devastating and sensitive all at once? A brilliant movie with brilliant acting!
This is sad funny and happy and this is just a grate movie. This is a must see.
I saw this movie years ago and liked it so much that I have finally purchased it. Its a great film watch it
really enjoyed it while watching on my ps3i would recommend this movie to anyone who is interested in foreign movies
this is a very interesting movie and has many surprising scenes that you would not expect to see from that year
I like this movie also like water world. Though many dont i did. This is a great postapocalyptic movie i enjoyed it.
This movie is already one that I like I just wanted this for my own collection. I like Kevin Costner
This movie is one of the few that I watched when I was younger that made such a positive impact on me, that I never did forgot it.
This is a good movie well acted and just enough action mixed with emotions to keep one interested in the main character
Somehow this movie seems more relevant now then when it first came out.  I enjoyed it and also took some lessons from it.
Everything looks so real. It is a great movie about human courage and hope. i Loved the movie. Worth watching.
I can watch this one over and over and over and still love every minute of it.  Cant get enough of these post apocalyptic thrillers
Kevin Costner As A Loner Does His Best To Restore The WorldAfter A Major World Event. He Is A True Hero In This Movie.
i enjoyed this movie. it was a fun if not overlong movie.
And, this one is another one I love. The Postman and Water World are 2 of my favorites. Kevin Costner is awesome in these roles.
A movie worth watching over and over. Since this is at least the second time I have owned it I would say that say's it all.
Great movie, a little long, but what do you expect out of a Kevin Costner Movie.  Enjoyed all of the movie.
I just love this movie and have watched it several times.  I recommend other to watch this one and enjoy.
Kevin Costner was panned for Waterworld and this is another post apocalyptic saga and Iliked them both. I liked this one more and recommend it.
I bought for my Grandson, as he caught part of it on television...He hastruly enjoyed this classic Costner movie...
It is a great movie you need to see this please go get it now. What are you waiting for.
Great movie with Costner. One of my favorites. This DVD replaced my VHS copy.We watch a lot of movies at home. Love westerns.
It was more of a guy movie and I got bored, but men like these action movies. It was well done, though.
The movies Kevin makes himself are not for everyone. They are all very long. But, they all have good stories, good action and are well made.
The Postman was one of the best movies that I have ever seen.If you want to purchase this dvd,I would  recommend it,
This is one of my favorite &#34;after the apocalypse&#34; movies. Kept me fully engaged throughout the entire movie.
One of the best post apocalyptic movies out there. Don't take my word for it, buy it for yourself, grab a snack and enjoy!
This is by far one of my favorite futuristic movies to watch.  Kevin Costner and the less of the cast are great.  I was so glad to see it in Blu-ray.
I just finished watching this movie for the first time. It was better then I thought it was going to be. I really enjoyed it and so did my hubby.
I throughly enjoyed this movie. Almost 3 hours long and I didn't even notice because I was totally into this flix.
this was one great movie to watch !!all though this is a 17 year old movie, but it deals with the year 2013, we gave it 2 thumbs up !!
Absolutely Wonderfully Done!!!  Loved all the actors in this film!!!
This was very well acted with Pacino as the devil in the context of trying cases. I enjoyed the story and the acting.
STORY LINE IS SLOW BUT ITS WORTH WATCHING AGIN AND AGAIN FOR THE SURPRISE ENDING. RECOMEND THIS ONE FOR THE DEVIL.
A little slow in the beginning, but then speeds up and is a good and entertaining movie. The ending has a big surprise that I never saw coming.
This a wonderful movie. It has a good cast,story line, and the effects are great. I know this an old movie, but it is still a great movie!
Alwasy have loved the movie.  It's so nice to have it in Blu Ray.  What a difference in the quality.
This movie had me on the edge of my seat.  I liked it all.  i would recommend it to mature audiences.
This movie is a master piece from the cast. It took it to another level in ways I'd never seen on film.
this is a great movie! al pacino is a great satin, and his monologe at the end is as good as gabriel byrnes in end of days!
A guilty pleasure.
I'm a big Al Pacino and Keanu Reeves fan, so this movie hit the spot. Great service and great product.
Robert Deniro is excellent in this movie.  i also loved keanu reeves.  This movie has you jumping from your seat.
me and my sister love this movie, if people open up spiritually the would see this movie for what it is. I love this movie
great movie alot of action and drama that i look i for in movies thanks again bill
Fast delivery and came in great condition as advertise brand new. This is more of the most unprediable movie. Keanu did a great job against Al.
clint eastwood at his best ,pale rider is the 90's  shane !it also stars the lawman from the early 60's JOHN RUSSEL !
I REALLY LIKED THE MOVIE, CLINT WAS GREAT IN THIS MOVIE, LOTS OF ACTION, BILLY&#34;S ROLE WAS REALLY SHORT THOUGH, IT WAS STILL A GOOD MOVIE.
It's Clint.  What's not to like.Death, in the guise of a preacher, enters riding a Pale Horse to help the down trodden and to avenge a wrong.
The famous &#34;Man with no Name&#34; returns and his righteous actions come full circle in an action packed western with an heart!
This a classic Clint Eastwood movie. Some violence, laughs and lots of action. Guns blazing and in the end the good guy wins.
I've been a fan of Clint Eastwood's Westerns for such a long time. I saw this movie only very recently and enjoyed it. Don't miss it!!!
One of Eastwood's best! Right up there with The Outlaw Josie Wales. Outstanding. What else can I say? Top Notch.
I have been watching the actor eastwood from the days of rawride.Pale Rider is one of his best efforts.
i love this movie
I have always enjoyed this movie.  When I saw it was available on Blu-ray I decided to buy it.  I'm glad I did, the Blu-ray picture is great.
This great western doesn't get enough credit. Acting is good and has a good plot.
I got this for my husband, as he is a big Clint Eastwood fan. I love John Wayne. Sorry Clint! Terrific movie in blu-ray.
Clint Eastwoods vision of what Cowboy Badass Moralism looks like . Just like High Plains Drifter . Clint's gotta teach the Locals a Lesson .
I enjoy his westerns. this one is a great one to get if you like later westerns and his movies.
I just needed to add this to my clint eastwood collection. its an oldie but goodie with clint as a preacher
what better way to spend inside on a rainy day / night or anytime for that mater and watch a top westen.thank you
If you haven't seen this movie lately, see the Blu-ray version.  It's like you remember in the theaters.  Eastwood at his best!
I BOUGHT THE SERIES OF THREE MOVIE PACKAGE THEY ARE ALL EXELENT!!! YOU CAN WATH EASTWOO GET BETTER & BETTER!!!!
Very good movie that will keep you guessing for the movie on just what type of person clint eastwood will turn out to be.
nice movie, movie night folks love this movie and it made for a good discussion item. there is nothing like a good western they are here for ever
I had forgotten all about these shows. I loved the series when it was on tv and watched them on Netflix too
B5 Flicks are nice addition to the TV show franchise.  In addition to providing some good stories these also filled in some backstory/
Finally the creators of babylon 5 wrote A script about the rangers,the cast was excellent special effects good and the action parts alright.
If you like the TV show 'Babylon 5', this is a must-see - a very nice add-on to the series!
i also don't understand why they didn't release it with the movies?!i'm happy they finally did!
wish there had been more legends produced, it was interesting to watch and enjoy.  I liked the characters and the interaction written into the plot.
This is another B5 spinoff that was interesting but got the ax.What a shame.
I prefer to watch the seasons again and again but the movies fill in some of the blanks. (except Crusade).
I am not a fan of comic but I bought this for my brother as a chrismtas stocker and he loved it and I enjoyed it.
This will be included on the Superman Volume 2 set from the Animated Series.  So don't waste your money unless you want the special features.
Classic John Ford/John Wayne western, one of my favorites of all-time (along with the Searchers).
John Wayne at his best. This is much better in Blu Ray.If you are a JW fan you need this one for your collection.But gfet it in Blu Ray.
I already have this DVD and this was a gift for my son.  We are all John Wayne lovers in our family. It was received aspromised.
This is the Dukes greatest western film ever. Bar none. You cannot get a western that has more. A little comic comes with it. TOM
One of best westerns ever made. Bases on true story of texas abductee Cynthia Parker & her uncle's decade long search for her. John Wayne at his best
This is such a wonderful film with a well done Blu-Ray transfer.  The extras are well done and really add to the film.  Highly recommended!
John Ford's movies are so great and this one is not exception. Each time I watch it I get lost in it. Good buy.
never been a John Wayne fan, but this film was a required film that I had to watch. it was good, and I enjoyed it
My father in law loves old movies. He wanted this one in particular and he was so impressed that we found it!
Nothing better than the Duke and Natalie Wood and her sister Lana. Terrific fight scenes between Marty and his fellow suitor.
One of the three greatest Westerns of all time and surely a singularly great American movie in any genre. Don't miss it!
I was glad to hear that an old classic was redone in blu-ray! Love it. It's a classic I just had to add to my collection.
Loved it!  A good book and background story about one of my favorite movies and actors.  Puts the whole thing in perspective.
Congrats to warner bros.for a magnificent transfer of this classic movie to blu.Keep bringing the oldies on blu.
i love this movie. it one of john waynees best. i'm glad it arrived quickly vor viewing. i;ve wanted to own it for a long time.
I LOVE John Wayne! This wasn't my favorite movie of his, but was good none the less.  I enjoy the action and some comedy of his.
Great western.  Really nice in BD, great picture and sound. Wayne's acting is good as is the supporting cast.  Worth buying.
john wayne was in so many great movies it's hard to find one that isn't really great. this one is well worth the money.
Great classic western. Keeps you thinking. John Wayne is great. If you like westerns of old this is a must see.
One of John Wayne's finest performances. A must see for the John Wayne western fan. Love this movie as one of my favorite all time movies.
We love John Wayne and have seen all his movies except this one.  It is an&#34;oldie&#34; that's for sure but we enjoyed every minute of it.I
Love this movie.  John Wayne acts so tough thru most of the movie, but in the end he has a soft side.
I am I glad I bought this on HD DVD even after owning the Standard DVD 4 disc set.
JOHN WAYNE.... A GREAT AMERICAN.  A great movie and it looks great after all these years and brings back memories of a simplier time
John Wayne at his best.  The intensity of the character, the scenery, the story, all wonderfully blended together into a superb film.
Had this on DVD but wanted to see it in all the glory that J Ford intended. I am very pleased.
The Searchers is one of my favorite John Wayne westerns. It is in the top 10 of my favorites. It is a must have.
We had this movie on DVD but with the wondeful outdoor scenes we couldn't wait to get this one in Blu Ray when we got our player.  We loved it.
A classic film about human emotions regardless of genre and on the same footing as Casablanca.
The story is great! The action is nonstop! John Wayne is one of his best roles! The searchers on bluray is a must buy! Buy it today!
John Ford's classic still stands the test of time
An epic classic in color. John Wayne & Jeffery Hunter at their best. A must have for collectors of westerns. Highly recommend.
One of John Wayne's best movies and over the years we have watched it repeatedly.  If you love cowboys and John Wayne this is your movie!
This has been a favorite of mine for years.  Can't beat the cast and a very special western - can't tell you how many times I have watched this movie
Product was as described! It arrived on time and it was packaged correctly. Great movie for anyone to enjoy anytime
One of the greatest John Wayne movies!
Just a grand movie to watch a real classic for " John Wayne" fans. A real must have for your collection.
John Wayne, don't really need more words. I am a John Wayne fan I enjoy all Wayne movies and will say great
"The Searchers" is an epic and great western story. I saw the movie many years ago and it was wonderful to see it again.
Great movie, have watch many timesI would recommend this to anyone, great movieI hate having to type so much
Was shiped to me on time. Was packaged right arrived  in good shape. Like the movie. The movie  wasn't expensive.
This is one of my favorites. It's a great love story with talk of angels and other things that will make you think! I highly recommend this one.
This movie is a must.  There is no foul language and it shows that Angels do exist to those who doubt.
One of my all-time faves!
Great movie to watch on date night.  Excellent acting from two of the best!  A love story even a guy can get into.
This movie is a must have for your movie collection.I love watching it and love the atmosphere and state of mindit pusts me in
Found the item to be of good quality what was said was what I got found them to be reliable and effficient. Thank You.
One of Nicolas Cages better movies.  Great movie that is simply enjoyable to watch.  Has a interesting story line also.
I love this movie.  Nicholas Cage and Meg Ryan are excellent together in this Superb combination. I'll watch it over and over.
I love this movie, as it combines a fantasy element with a powerful romance, and the actors are two of my favorites.
This is one of the greatest movies of Nicolas Cage and Meg Ryan.  I loved it and the looks Cage had in his eyes wowed me.  Buy this movie
this is a great movie, a must have.  Beautiful music.  Two wonderful actors with very expressive eyes.  upgrade to DVD
Be careful what you wish for.........a sweet little movie though. Nicholas Cage is always one of my favorite actors as is Meg.
I loved this movie! Sad ending but still an uplifting story. I had seen it years ago and glad I got to see it again.
I am  replacing the copy I already own on VHS. I love this movie and bought the soundtrack just so I could listen to the wonderful music.
Meg is once again fabulous. Nick C. plays a great angel.  The story line is very interesting and leaves you wondering.
I started watching it and was drawn to the story. It's a beautiful love story with a sad ending to me. Loved it.
This is truly a classic. Love the romance and the whole plot of the movie. Would definitely recommend this for date night.
OMG OMG he is sooooooo cute in this movie!watch it if you haven't!Love it! Watched it again and again! My favorite movie of all time!CAGE FOREVER!!
I have seen this movie several times and still love it and will cry every time. It's such a good love story.
I loved all of this movie!  I would recommend this movie without hesitation. Angels are needed everyday in our lives.
Many think we have angels watching over us and this sort of shows it as being real. A great story line and love story but sad ending.
this is a classic romantic comedy that hits all the marks.  its a little old but its a great date night movie or sleep over movie
THIS MOVIE WOULD NOT APPEAL TO ALL, BUT I BEINNING FROM THE NEIGHBORHOOD AND TIME PEROID, I COULD RELATE TO IT.
I love listening to this soundtrack throughout the day- it really puts me into a great mood and such catchy fun songs.
This movie is fantastic, and hasn't lost anything over the years. I haven't checked out the other options, but the quality is awesome.
One of the best musicals of all times. I have watched it over and over.
NOt much to say here except this is compulsory for all lovers of musicals on film. Maybe Robert Preston is a tad too old ... but so am I !
I thoroughly enjoy this movie because of the Great Music and acting. It shows how a rascal can be turned into an honorable man.
How could anyone not love this movie.  Makes you want to get up and march around the room.  Love it.
I love this great classic.  The stars are great and so is the story.  I own on DVD.  I regimens to all to watch.
This is another very fun story. Robert Preston at his best. Many people aren't aware of this guys ability. Great cast. We really enjoyed this one too
Definitely undershown!  A must-see for any music lovers!  Tunes are awesome & unforgettable!  Great lyrics too!  Don't pass this up!
Wonderful music, compelling story, a real gem.  I bought it on Bluray and am very sastisfied.  A must have for any collkection.
I have always loved this movie - I'm a big musical nerd - so I was excited to buy this for my collection
There is only one &#34;Music Man&#34; and Robert Preston is it. The remakes don't make the cut. This is the original and the very best ever.
Excellent service! Excellent product!What can I say...when you're good you're good!  How can you get any better?  Nuff said!
Have always loved this musical.  It is timeless for all ages to enjoy over and over.  Can't recall how many times we've watched it.
Another great classic. Enjoyed seeing it again. Will pass it along in the family for their viewing pleasure. Loved it.
Very pleased with this video. There are not many good movies on Tv so having this video on my Kindle makes it easy to watch whereever I am.
NOW THIS IS A GREAT FAMILY MOVIE. NO NEED TO WORRY ABOUT ANYTHING YOUR CHILD SHOULDN'T SEE. SIMPLY GREAT MUSIC AND ACTING. A MUST HAVE.
we wonder how we survive the good old days as we watch a shyster convert to an average person, one
This is a really excellent movie. My mom will love it. Five stars all the way!!! Great Service and Mercindise!!
I missed the original movie, am going to watch this when a neighbor returns.  We enjoy viewing movies at home once or twice a month.
I love everything about this movie! The humor, the music, the cast and the time setting. Great family film too!
My husband talked about this movie for years. He was delighted when I presented it to him as a gift. It arrived in great shape.
Another great movie for my musicals collection.  Love the music in this one.  Lighthearted movie and great for all ages.
a delightful classic musical filled with great acting and great songs!you will want to watch this one many times and share it with family!
This movie is a good view.  Love the music in it and it is just a feel good movie.
A true classic a staple for anyone that enjoys a good musical. Worth picking up by anyone that loves film.
I wanted to see the movie version of this classic.  It was very entertaining.  All the music is well done - love the Buffalo Bills!
This is one of the all time greats, right up there with Hello Dolly and My Fair lady! Preston and Jones are perfect together.
I have watched at least 7 times.  Great film to watch with your children
This has to be one of the best musicals ever made. The turn of the century period costumes are beautiful and the dancing is incredible.
This was a very surprising movie; I had not expected it to be funny nor a comedy-love story, but it had both.
Great musical with wonderful music and story line.  Definitely a family movie that leaves you ready to join a marching band at the end.
Shirley Jones and Robert Preston are totally awesome in this classic musical!  The music is so well done that I can 't help but sing along!
This is a timeless movie with spirit and excellent acting. Robert Preston has the energy and personality for this type of movie.
This one sure brought back some old memories of the tunes I used to hear when I was younger...very well done.
Musicals are great. Love the songs in this movie. Don't make movies like this anymore. Music keeps me pumped up
Let me emphasize that again: if you don't like this movie... then I am sorry, but there's just no way of convincing me that you've got a soul.
I was involved in a production of Music Man at the local college.  This is a great show with lots of great music.
My husband & I loved this movie and it arrived very quickly in great condition.  It is a classic everyone should see.
Fabulous performances by all of the players, especially Robert Preston! Great music, fun story, superb choreography...what else do you need!
Nothing but fantastic.  This movie has got to be on the top seller list.  The color is great and the transfer to bluray is great.
was a great musical for the whole family. love to hear shirley jones sing. can't believe how young ron howard was.
I wish I had seen this sooner, it was awesome and my 4 kids loved it too.  A great family show!
Great music, funny characters, and a bit of a moral.  The time period lends authenticity.  Enduring classic, it never gets old :)
One of my all time favorites, and certainly number 1 on my favorite musicals. Great songs, excellent acting, supper message.
Movie is well done and includes many actors who are no longer with us. A rare find. It has become one of my personal favorites.
Very funny, songs that won't get out of your head, and a transfer that is to die for.  You will love this movie if you like to smile!
I first watched this in middle school.  I loved it and have loved it since.  The Blu-ray is absolutely amazing!
i highly recommend this film.  It's a very wonderful musical.I'd give it more stars if I could, filled with great dancing,singing, and costumes.
A simpler time, a love story, and a marching band in early 1900's Iowa. What could be more fun! Enjoy!
Get on your dancing shoes and enjoy this old time favorite. My mom loves every minute of it. You will too.
A movie with the most fantastic cast. Superb band. A good comedy in the classic sense. A must see movie for kids.
The Music Man is a wonderful movie,good story, good music, good acting.  It is a movie that can be seen more than once and greatly enjoyed very time.
A favorite of mine for a long time.  So glad to get it on DVD, as I already had it on VHS.
great music, great acting, and just an all around fun movie.I would recommend it highly for family entertainment.definitely 5 stars.
Another classic Mary Kate & Ashley movie. These movies are great for young girls, entertaining and wholesome!
So glad to of found this movie and now it is check off the wanted list. It was a movie I grew up watching now I am glad to see it again.
WONDERFUL!MY BEST FRIEND LET ME BORROW THIS,AND I COULDENT STOP WATCHING IT!THIS IS SUCH A GREAT MOVIE FOR THE OLSONS TO PLAY IN!
I think this is definitely one of the best movies the girls have made.I highly advise seeing this one if you are a fan of their movies.
I think the movie is kinda depressing but still great! Mary-Kate and Ashley look extra pretty in it. One thing I did miss were the bloopers.
Great Price!! It's also very Funny and Hillarious!! Can't stop laughing everytime I see it.
When is Leslie Nielsen NOT funny? This guy cracks me up soooo much! Had me laughing from start to finish....RIP Leslie Nielsen!
This movies is so funny that I can not watch the Fugitive without thinking about this movie. If you like spoof movies, you will love this one.
Lesie does it again a very funny slap stick comedy, i expecially like the part when he is driving in the malfunctioning car.
Hilarious spoof of the suspense/thriller ( The Fugitive) . Do Not Miss !!! Leslie Nielsen is a comedy genius who never disappoints.
I like it. Everyone here is charming.
Yeah I loved the movie version of Avengers with Uma Thurman and Ralph Fiennes Sean Connery had a great part also as Sir August dewinter.
I love all the Lethal Weapon Moveis alot. I think the action is always top rate from start to finish in all of them.
Love the Lethal Weapon movies ... action filled, funny ... have the other three just didn't have this one for some reason
Great writing, lots of action and adventure. My favorite of all four and you can't go wrong with any of them.
I have seen this movie before and it is great and funny.I recomand this movie to anyone 9 and up.Rated R for violence and language.
If there was a person who made things come true...These workers are very good at what they do...They get things done.
I loved it, had a great cast and story line. it was very funny and good adventure so a must to watch.
We love the lethal weapon series. This was a nice wrap up to the other great movies in the series.
Not the best of the Lethal Weapon series, but it is a pretty good movie. A great way to end a wonderful series.
I usually go for Blu Ray, but I don't mind a bargain on DVD. I had to own the whole series. It arrived quickly.
This was the only movie that i was missing in the Lethal Weapon series and am very happy to have finally acquired it..
I got this for my Man Boss for his birthday. He likes all of the Leathal Weapons & so do I. I have watched them serveral times myself over the years.
Ladies and gentlemen of the class of 99,buy Badlands.If I could offer you only one tip for the the future buying Badlands would be it.
Malick's genius is as relevant today as it was when it first came to the big screen.  The original Natural Born Killers.
this it a good movie to get and be able to watch whan ever you want to watch the people
This is a calm and beautiful movie with beautiful scenes of Martin Sheen when he was younger. Love it very much.
I remember seeing this movie before Martin Short was well known. He and Sissy Spacek give incredible performances. Her inner dialogue is tremendous
A great erotic thriller that does not take itself to serious.  Nice action and adventure. Great for a Femme Fatale collection.
Such a fan of  Arquett and Ellen is great as the cop.  Amazing collection of cast and hilarious.  A nice rent.
this is a really cool movie- its set up like a documentary but its not boring like one could be.  Awesomely created.
I really enjoyed this movie.  It's easy to see that it was filmed a while ago but it's still good.
My brother and I really enjoyed this movie so much that I have decided that I am going to buy it for him!!!!!!!!!!! Peter Smith
Love this movieLove movies basis on true stories. This is a little sad but it's life. It's a great movie
I love this movie....
This movie is great. There is so much that goes on that it is well worth seeing (in fact I have watched it 3 times).  LOVE IT!
Really didn't understand it when I first start but once you get into the movie wow what a movie it is really good.
Truly enjoyed this movie. Love Samuel L. Jackson. He is an excellent Actor. It was truly an action packed  movie.
I have watched this movie so many times.  I never tire of it.  Samuel Jackson does a great job in this movie.
Great dialogue, intrigue, with many twists and fantastic acting.  Fourth time I watched it.  Never loses its quality nor impact.
Really the only movie I like with Samuel L Jackson.  Kevin Spacey is always great.  Can watch this movie any time, any day.
Great movie even though it is a older production.  It had a great storyline and was very unpredictable.  Worth watching.
This movie was very good.  Two blockbusters like Kevin Spacey and Samuel Jackson were electric.  I highly recommend this show.
This has action suspense and surprises. The actors are first rate. The plot is first rate and I loved the ending.
A very good movie that is thoughtful. Both the main characters are very well done and written. I enjoyed it amessly.
I loved this movie.  Spacey was great ...Jackson was great, and it was a duel of words to the finish, but also full of action and suspense!
An excellent movie from beginning to end. There is no lag in the action and a few surprises along the way.
they did a great job on this movie it was full of excitement start to finish I would recommend buying this movie for any movie collection
Samuel Jackson was great in this movie and im going to watch it over again.  Shows you what is happen in our police departments
Older movie but excellent acting and great story plot.  Actors played their role very well and clean language, no obscene talk.
I watch this movie every couple of years .  It makes me laught and i enjoy the scenering. I love it.
This movie is so  funny and Ihave enjoyed seeing it many times and now I can watch whenever I want!
the movie is really funny, and fresh,never boring . the stars make the movie.it is one of many movies ,that I would watch over and over again.
Chevy Chase.....what's not to love?!  Good clean, gentle, silly fun.  It would be great if he'd come out with a new movie.
This is a great movie that I found very funny.  It is a very cute story and the characters are very amusing.  Worth getting!
Great Movie, I believe it was Chevy Chase at his best and one of the better and funniest movies of his.
One of my favorite movies.  Very funny and love it around Christmas time.Startted off my season of watching Christmas movies.
A great Chevy Chase movie, one my husband and I watched and enjoyed, laughing at all the problems that happened with their move
great movie to watch with anyone, I really enjoy Chevy Chase and I would recommend this one. Funny, funny movie.
A delightful movie, showing two city folks wanting more from life and finding their way to it - even with some obstacles.Humorous yet sweet!
my son loves this movie and asked me to get it for him, just too hiliarious for words, get it.
it arrive in good shape and recommed to all my friends and family love this movie very much and very funny
Chevy Chase and Vermont! Love his car and his wife in this film. Very funny farm! Very funny movie! Laugh, laugh, laugh! Lamb fries!
Funny farm is funny! Chevy chase is great . Love this one and all the Vacation movies. Suggested for anyone.
Very funny movie that is a favorite with young and old.  &#34;Chevy Chase&#34; what more can you say.  Classic fun!!!!!
This movie holds up to time and is as funny now as it was when I first saw it. It's played fine and looks and sounds great!
This is a that is how live goes movie. Also we like to watch it a Christmas. It can really put you in a good mood.
Love this movie Starts out funny and ends funny Fun time for the family.  Love old dog, and the covered bridge scene.
If you liked Money Pit, you will love this one. It is Chevy at his best, I think. One of my favorites.
Love this movie.  I have found all my favorite dvd's at amazon.  They have always arrived in perfect condition and very quickly.
Everything was just as the seller stated if not better. Would recommend them and use them again.
I love this movie.  It is so hilarious! I have watched it over and over.  I also bought it as a present to my mother.
The movie is hilarious and I have always enjoyed the early Chevy Chase films like Fletch. Funny Farm is right there.
This is a very funny movie. This movie was a great fit for Chevy Chase type of comedy. Brighten your Christmas holiday with this movie.
Funny farm is, well funny. My favorite part was when they found the dead body in their backyard, well better not give to much away...
I don't like Chevy Chase but this is one of his best movies.  The musical score adds much to this funny, funny film.  It's suitable for all ages.
Early Chevy Chase is awesome.  Loved this movie for its humor and cuteness.  I watch it at least once a year
This movie is a little low keyed but I find it very funny. Chevy Chase does not do a lot of slap stick in this one and I like the whole movie.
IF YOU WANT TO LAUGH, AND IF YOU LIKE CHEVY CHASE, THIS IS A MOVIE TO SEE.  IT'S VERY FUNNY.
Very funny!  A timeless movie.  Perfect to see anytime of the year.  If you wanna laugh hard, get this movie!
Great comedy. Love it.
lol this movie is really great. i love sandra and nicole in this film. its really funny and unique check it out!
I have watched this movie over 50 times and love it each time that I see it. it's a girls movie
great movie that has a wonderful plot with very very funny moments.excellent movie that every girl should see at least once.
I'm a huge fan of Sandra Bullock. It's just a sweet, funny movie. I recommend it for mothers and daughters to watch together.
Great Sandra Bullock film to add to my Sandra Bullock library of her old and new films.  Nicole Kidman is also great.
I love Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman! Great movie about Wicca witches, so good that my wife wants me to get the book for her.
This is an excellant family movie. Especially if you are into Halloween,  fun, and magic.
I just love the story line. I love the acting. Sandra Bullock is always wonderful and such a great actress.
I enjoyed this film.  I like the actresses and the story line was good.  It really is an upbeat film and a fun one to watch during Halloween.
I purchased this for a Christmas present.  The Movie pack showed up quickly and was packaged really well.  This is going to be a great gift.
The movie was enjoyable, it held my interest. I would love to see this again, I would like to own it. Sandra was excellent  in this movie.
I bought this movie for my friend's birthday.....we both love it!  When you're in the mood for a little witchy behavior, Practical Magic is a hit.
This is a movie that makes you cry and laugh.  An all around good movie that I watch over and over
Magic and comedy seem to really do the trick. These characters click throughout the entire movie.Plus these two gals are great.
Yes, it is a bit kitschy, but the love between sisters can get that way sometimes and there is nothing wrong with that!
I love this movie....it was funny, touching, engaging and entertaining for the whole family. Charming!!!
This is such a great movie, its whimsical and scary and full of the magical love that every woman hopes for.
A little off center but a good movie. Good story line with plenty of &#34;up&#34; moments to keep you interested.
Excellent cast, script and acting.  Bullock and Kidman are great together and I'd love to see them in a movie again.
Excellent movie. I love Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman in this film. Powerful, yet opposite in their abilities. Truly enjoyed it.
This was a gift for someone I don't know if it was good or not. She requested it for Christmas
I keep watching love SANDRA she's always great this is a very intertaining movie love the ending a must have for halloween
I liked it, witches, love, good humor, jokes... Sandra Bullock is one of my favorite actress (Demolition man...) . I passed a good time.
Mom couldn't find her copy so i found and bought her a new one. Yeah for making mom happy. :)
I watched this a million times growing up and still do and it's just as good then as it is now.
Great halloween movie, or anytime else. Alot of fun and a few pointers about treating those who are a bit different.
I highly recommend this DVD movie its was real good with a great story line.  I am a fan of Sandra Bullock she did a good job.
I'll watch it cos its got two hotties in it. Haha. Not a bad movie tho. It's one of the only ones my wife will watch over and over.
This is an interesting and funny film about a family of witches featuring beautiful and talented Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman.
A quality movie that you can watch with the entire family. I really enjoyed this movie. It was very cute.
Classic, well maybe some day.  The wife never saw it, and she loves Sandra Bullock.  She also loved the movie.
I have watched this over and over.  Just ordered another for my sister for her birthday.  I enjoy movies that are more true to witchy things.
This was so funny........Of  course anything with Sandra in it is just awesome. She is the best of the best in my books.
I love the actresses, love the movie. One of my favorite movies to watch with the girls. Remember there's a little bit of magic in all of us.
It's been years and the movie is still great to watch! I have just recently watched it again, and it is truly a classic.
I like this movie, it was well planned and Sandra Bullock is a favorite of mine.  I would recommend it.
Excellent buy for a now classic movie, at least 15 dollars more everywhere else, made a great halloween gift for my grandaughter
i love witches. I love SB, their braids, the dancing, the ending, its short and sweet and to the poijnt
Such a good movie!!!! No matter how you believe,  just a good movie about the bonds  of sisters. Funny and heart warming.
I freakin LOVE this movie! I didnt expect to get a free digital download when i bought the dvd so im very happy about that.
I REALLY LIKED THIS DVD.  THE MOVIE ALSO HAD ONE OF MY 80'S FAVS...AIDAN QUINN...NICOLE KIDMAN IS ALSO GREAT IN THIS MOVIE.  LUV IT! =)
This is a story about the bond of sisterhood and love. Humor and humanity and mostly the strength of women when they come together.
this is a great movie with an a plus cast. this movie is great and fun for the whole family...MUST SEE&#62;&#62;&#62;&#62;LOVE IT
I love this movie Nichole Kidman and Sandra Bullock are grate in this movie. This is a must see movie.
Good family type of movie and as always Sandra Bullock is super,I watch this movie over and over,makes me feel good.
A must watch for any fan of Sandra or Nicole! I watch this every few years and always enjoy it.
Great movie! Loved it, the color is vibrant and so clear. A love story, a story of family and acceptance. Good quality DVD.
I've enjoyed watching this movie ever since it came out.  It's a fun premise and the acting is first rate.
Two of my favorite actors.  This movis is one that I can watch over and over again.  Which I have.
Love this movie. Perfect at Halloween time. My husband gets a kick out of all the frogs showin up in their backyard! Good storyline. Very eventful
I love witch movies & shows so I very much enjoyed this... funny, romantic and a little creepy. Great rainy day, staying in, wine alone movie ;-)
I have always loved this movie and can watch it over and over again. Sandra Bullock is amazing in it.
what a cute twist on witchcraft. if i was gonna be one would like to be like them. loved the sea side town, and house this was filmed in very good.
It is just a movie that I really enjoy and watch over and over.  I would not recommend for children under 14.
If you love Sandra Bullock, romance and magick, this is a MUST HAVE in your DVD library!
a great old fashioned love story. a chick movie at it's best. it'll always be on my mind. for sure!
although this movie does have a hint of cheese.. I still love it. This is one I can watch over and over again
nice story, this movie is happy, sad, funny and interesting. Everybody can see it. would be a good halloween movie for the kids
Funny movie, it kept my attention.Enjoyable movie and it was my first time seeing it.It is a movie that I will watch several times and recommend.
nothing much to say...I love magic stuff and I love Sandra Bullock.a combo of the two is just a perfect mix.
I was very happy with the purchase. It's nice to be able to buy an older movie in such good shape and at such a good price!
I love this movie and borrowed it to the point I figured I better buy it :D Couldn't ask for a better dollar value
this is a great movie great for the whole family I enjoys all of them it arrived in a fast shipping and delivery I was happy with the product
This is one of my favorite movies. Packaging was original, got it as expected and nicely packaged in the box.
Three generations of practitioners of the Craft. Incredibly acted by all parties involved. And a great score as well to move the story along.
This is one of my favorite movies!I love that the sisters are witches, and I love both Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman...
This has a great case. A really good movie so I decided to buy it & add it to my library.
these actors have all moved on to bigger things, but it is hard to top this piece of americana. touching and wonderful in all the right ways.
My personal highlight from this magical little film: The dance sequence set to Pat Metheny's "It's For You".
... and finally bought my own copy! Wonderful music and great casting make this a modern American classic!
Wanted this in my video library.  A great story to be viewed on some margaritas and beer.  Very touching music by Pat Methany and Lyle Mays.
Another good movie from Steven Seagal. I've watched this one several times, too, and am still liking it very much.
This is an older movie but it gets better in the middle of the movie.  He is getting better with age and knowledge.  You have to see it for yourself.
This is a great movie to watch.,the best part is the action/martial arts Steven has some great moves here.in the movie.The plot is a simple one.
I loved the actors in this movie. It is a very intense movie, but well worth the time to watch!
I liked the suspense, action this movie had, I would recommend this movie because it keeps you watching till the end.
This movie is one of my favorites, but what I realy like is the apartment. I wish I could have a place like that.
THIS MOVIE IS A REAL GOOD PLUS MOVIE ITS A CHALLANGE OF GOOD AND EVILBUT INTERESTINGIF YOU BUY THIS DVD YOU HAVE TO KEEP IT
i had been looking for this movie for a long time and finally found it and enjoy it very much
Good thriller, great characters, well-acted. Weaver and Robert Downey Jr make for interesting studies. Good plot, good pace. You'll enjoy.
I like movies like this cause they keep you on the edge of you seat. Its a real nail bitter and pretty scarey actually
This is a great murder mystery that starts out with a bang, and keeps you guessing on what will happen. Keeps you on the edge of your seat.
this is a great movie. I have watched it many times. it works perfectly and am glad I bought it
This is an old school movie I saw b4 and still loved great movie must watch drama and the mystery you're looking for
Great movie and a great cast, I had seen it when if first aired. I would recommend watching this movie.
Harry Connick Jr as a psycopathic killer?  It doesn't get better than that!!  Very tense drama with some major starpower.
I liked this movie when I saw it after it first came out.  The actors are exceptional.  I will not tire of watching this movie.
Great twists & turns along with a who-done-it. Not to mention a very surprising performance by Harry Connick Jr. Great fun!
I loved this movie when it first had shown on television years back. It is a delightful movie. It is hilarious!
Nice to imagine it would be like this when the time comes. Love the food scenes and past lives part.
I really wish we had more films from these two together.  They had a very nice chemistry and great charm in this delightful comedy.
this was a very good movie, funny, sad, happy, like all the feeling in the rainbow, makes you think about the here after
A must see, great story and great ending, watch this movie!!!!  Perfect for a slow Sunday afternoon or a could day when you are snowed in.
This is a good movie that takes a look at what might happen after to us after were dead, and how we might be judged.
I love movies that make me challenge my beliefs and this movie kept me rethinking my spiritual concepts all along the way.
This was my first al brooks movie and and I loved it. Great funny way of looking at death. I can watch it over and over again. Must see
This is one of the best comedies of all time. The story by Albert Brooks is great, The ending is perfect. Loved every minute of it.
I realy enjoyed this movie. It was funny to watch with my children and see their reaction. I watched it more than once already.
I got this as a replacement gift for my husband after he gave our first one to our grandson who loves it
Funny movie, a bit odd but very funny. Something of a classic...if you have that odd sense of humor this is movie for you.
Had to have this one for my collection!  Love this movie and all the actors in it.  Have watched it over and over again!
I like this DVD. Great movie even with some of the scenes some would think is stupid.
I bought this DVD because my wife is a huge fan of Drew Barrymore, and it was worth buying and adding to our massive DVD collection of over 1,500.
I bought this for my pops, he likes it, thinks it's a classic funny movie.
this is really a hysterical movie and great for anyone who is a dreamer and also dreams of telling their boss to take a hike!
This is a masterpiece.  It's as simple as that.  It's Albert Brooks' very best film.  No film fan should miss it.
Pure comedy...that only Brooks can totally deliver!The movie is a pure joy to watch, pure meaningless fun.
I was happy to find you had it and it's really funny too.I'll look for more from you soon JV.
A hilarious movie !  A must see for fans of Albert Brooks and people who are tired of the rat race.
If you are an Albert Brooks fan, then this is a must have for your Albert Brooks CD collection. Lots of fun.
this is another 80&#34;s movie, maybe 70&#34;s. saw it at drive in. really takes you back, glad i got it
I loved this movie when it came out back when, I still love it today. I would recommend it to anyone who wants memories.
Billy Jack is timeless and becoming more relevant as the political begins to mirror the Vietnam era.  Great movie and even better on Blu-ray.
It's a classic.  I remember the first time I watched the movie,the debates and conversation that arose over the story line.It is worth watching today
Still a good action movie even after all these years!  If you like action movies, you'll like this one.  Good music!
Very good action movie, lots of good fights scenes. I like all the Billy Jack movies, they are all really good. Highly recommend.
Loved this movie when I was a kid, love it now. Billy Jack is a true hero in every sense of the word.Tom Laughlin rules.
Billy Jack is an excellent blend of martial arts action, racial intolerance, and the counterculture movement of the late sixties.
Love this movie. Billy takes no crap.....Strong silent and very mean when he's pushed. A 60's classic. Everyone should see this movie.
A great movie at a great price.  This is among my favorite movies and I ordered it as a gift for one of my sons who I am sure will love it.
Hello,This DVD is lots of fun. Great comedy. If you want a good laugh, you should watch this race.
This is a funny movie, a good time laugh and to think of the funny stars we have lost since.
Still funny
If you liked cannonball run you will love cannonball run 2 . I highly recommend watching this movie, and, or getting a hard copy.
This is a classic movie and is funny from beginning to end I would recomend it to anyone who likes the classic movies.
SCARY, SUSPENSEFUL, TWISTED ENDING.  HATE ONE ACTOR HE PLAYED HIS PART SO WELL.  :)
great acting, the end has a real twist, worth watching over again.  Sean connery is ageless and sexy.  It's a must see
Good movie with great cast and twisting plot.  You never know who you can trust in this film.  Added plus is always Sean Connery.
A very suspenseful movie. The ending was not what I expected. You really had to stay on top of the story.
I saw this movie several years ago and realized how intriguing it was, so I purcdchased it.  Great acting by Connery and Fishbourne.
Great movie, especially if you're a Sean Connery fan, or Laurence Fishburne. Came on time and in excellent condition.
a best movie, a lot of action, you don't like to know that Seagal is angry and thirsty of vengeance and justice...
This movie rocks!Rated R for strong violence and language,and for sensulalty and drug use.Canada:R
This is hands down one of my favorite Segal movies ever and a must have for anyone who enjoy his work.
Awesome classic Seagal. By no means is this 'Citizen Kane,' but it is a great action flick. A definite must have for Seagal fans.
This is one of my favorite of Steven Seagal films,The sound is improved and the picture quality is improved.
Once again, Seagall takes on the "bad guys."  Even throws in some sarcasm and humor, to top it off.  Good Stuff!!!
cd in great condition enjoyed watching it as always Seagal is just great and it was fast moving and the time passed quickly
steven segla is out for justice in this new movie of his was very exciting to watch this high packed action flick
I own everthing on Steven Seagal! Except Exit Wounds! I didn't buy Executive Decision. I don't like Kurt Russell
Great movie. A must see movie. You won't be sorry if you rent this movie. It's a life changing movie for the better and not for the bad !
Very good movie but a little tough to take at times. Not a movie for the faint of heart. Definitely got the point across.
i gave this as a gift to three little boys and they loved it so much they watch it once a week. good price also!
I loved this movie growing up and I still do. It has a good story, decent effects, and its just a classic! What more could you want from a 90s movie?
I love this movie and anybody who likes Anjelica Houston, see this plz! I am glad I bought this movie!
I had never heard of the movie before but my daughter and I saw it and I ordered it. She loves it as well.
A perfect mix of dark fantasy and modern drama , The Witches offers some creepy fun because of The Grand High Witch
Angelica Huston is remarkable in this whole family Halloween treat! Great special effects as well. A must for the family vault!
Love Witches, its a great Halloween movie that I have been watching as a tradition every Halloween. Anjelica Houston makes a great witch!
I haven't seen this movie in years so it was great to watch it again after so long of not seeing it.
I loved this movie when I was a kid and still love it 20 years later.
This is a really good movie . It may bea little scary for the little ones, but those a little older will really enjoy it. My kids really liked it
One of Angelica Houston's crowning role. Simply amazing. The makeup and special effects were phenomenal for the time and even today. A classic!
Fun movie, saw this when I was younger and still is a good movie now.  A fun witches movie to see.
A classic childrens film that may scare younger audience members.  I loved this movie since being a child and finally added to my DVD collection!
this is one of those movies that we loved as a kid, and had to get the DVD to share with our kids.
Excellent family movie! It has the feeling of an old fairy tale, Angelica Houston is a perfect villain as the head witch.
I have always enjoyed this movie. First with my own children and now with my granddaughter. A nice family movie
bought this for my daughter who watched it while growing upstill it is one of her very very old favoritws
My kids and I used to watch this movie all the time and now I can enjoy it with my grandkids. This is a really great family movie. We all love it.
This movie was enjoyable to watch with good acting and not too scary (although it did scare 7 year old when children are turned into mice).
As an adult, i have to say that i am charmed by the movie, moreso than our children i think, i love it
Even though though I am 15 years older than the last time I saw it, I love watching it.  It is light and fun!
This is one of Anjelica Huston better movies she is really pretty good in this movie, so if you like witches great one to get
Great movie at a great price what moreCan u ask for.got here on time wellPacked. Kids will love it.
This is a surprising movie. A bit scary for a younger audience but cleverly done.  A great movie to watch at Halloween.
This was one of my favorite movies from my childhood. I use it as a lullaby to fall asleep to now. :)
I love this movie, it's a great old movie to add to my collection!!! I absolutely loved the story line. :)
It was a very entertaining movie. When it started I thought I was going to be disappointed, but I was glad I watched it.
I remembered this movie from childhood. Funny and cute. It's a relatively well made adventure consisting of live action and a few small puppets.
I saw this movie and it was fantastic. It was very great and that's all I have to say about it. Thank you very much, yours truly, Zaida M Quijano.
This was a great movie that I had watch as a kid in the 70's with my mom and dad. I've watch now at least 6 times.
My only complaint with this movie was that Anthony Perkins' role was too short. One of Mr Newman's best movies
i  had  never  seen  this  movie  i  watched  it  last  nightloved  this  movie  and  will  love  watching  it  many  times  to  come
Fun film with Newman in a classic role.
Judge Roy Bean, the watch bear, and Miss Lily.  Wow, I had forgotten how great this movie was until I went back to watch it again.  Fantastic.
I've been looking for this many years & it was better than the first time I saw it 30 years ago.
I had forgotten what a great movie this is. I am glad I purchased it. The watch bear is my favorite character.
a great story fo the west, the law and the oil industry. Miss Lilly Langtree...so you need to watch this one and remenmber the Watch Bear.
This is one of my favorite westernsBeatty is a classic and the script isstrongThe disk is in good shape and I've watched it several times
Wow! Cool man! This movie is like so cool! Wow! It is just really great and neato and rad!
Such a fun movie! Doris Day is adorable!! I have watched this movie twice now and will watch again. The music is fun.
Again, the same comment - a relaxing movie, with lovely music and a simple themeJust a movie to relax and enjoy!
This is a very good musical movie with a great cast.  It also has wonderful songs.I adore Doris Day.
I love musical theater, and to have these musicals on DVD added to my collection is great. Can &#34;Wicked&#34; be in the wings?
Anything Doris Day does is good.  Good family entertainment; lots of good musical numbers; fun to watch and well worth buying.
I've loved this movie since I was a little kid.  It is one of my favorite classic musical of all time.
I love Doris Day and Eddie Foy, this is a great musical.  I have been looking for it for quite some time.  Thank you
Bill Murray and Ted Knight are fantastic in the film.Chevy was awesome too. EVERYONE SHOULD OWN THIS FILM!Nipsey loves this film!
this movie is the best i recommend you to get it if you love golfing movies as this is a funny one
Between Rodney Dangerfield and Bill Murray, you have the makings of a classic. The scene with the candy bar gets me every time!!
Caddyshack is movie is overly funny, it is just like a National Lampoon and pretty [] cool.!a must see!
You have got to check this out! The only comedy that comes even close to this is Home Alone. You will love this stuff! Check it out.
Great comedy from dangerfield. Adult humor.  Watched many times over the years. Still gets me laughing. A must see movie.
Caddyshack is a great classic comedy, you can watch this movie over and over again. This movie is a must buy
Great and very fast service!! The movie is a classic!! I especially love the music, the story line and the actors!
I love this movie. i can watch this one over and over again. This will always be in my collection!
excellent comedy. good choice if you need a good laugh. rodney dangerfield and bill murray at thier best
one of the best movies of all time.  everyone should buy a coppy.  CANNONBALL.
This movie still makes you laugh after all these years. After the gopher, Bill Murry and Cheve Chase make this movie a classic.
Everyone, golfer or not, should see Caddyshack at least once. This is a great price on a FUNNY movie! Get it.
Thi shas to be the funniest classic movie, I can watch this over and over!
Classic movie, should be in every movie collection.  Great acting, good writing, very funny.  Pure fun and constant nonstop laughs
Classic comedy that you can watch again and again.  Picture quality is great and the laughs keep coming and coming.
Gift for my Dad.  Being a golf geek, he loves it.  I made big DD points.  It doesn't get any better than that.
This movie brought me back to the 80's for sure! All the one liners.  The amazing actor line up. In appropriate at times, but FUNNY!
Ordered product, it came in on time. I've watched and enjoyed the movie yet again. This has got to be one of the best comedies of all time.
Caddyshack has been one of the funnest movies over the years and had a great cast. If you like comedy you will love this DVD like I have.Thanks Ken
This is a classic movie that ages very well.  Love it.  There are very few movies that I would own and this is one of them.
This is just the best movie and remains a classic for all of the member of the family to enjoy.
This is a great movie for any movie collector. It's a must have. Hilarious from start to finish.
A Laugh a minute! Some of the best humor written down and performed by the best too. Always a good movie to watch to cheer people up!
This movie is so screwy it's not my usual type of humor, but somehow this works for me and it always makes me laugh!
Classic!  A must see.  Not good for kids.  But I don't think youngster will get the sexual references anyway.  Hope this helps.
I have seen this movie many times on TV and am glad that I have a copy of my own to laugh at all the time.
I have always loved this movie. Wanted it in blu-ray. Bill Murray is a scream. I love Rodney Dangerfield. A great comedy.
Great movie that provides countless laugh with its witty humor. Love it. It is very endearing, Rodney Dangerfield at his best.
One of my favorite comedy films of all time!! Utterly brilliant.
Really glad this was added to Prime.  I could watch this movie every day if I had the time and my wife didn't care.  lol
This movie is excellent!  Filled with great actors and some funny dry humor.  A must see classic movie for all :)
I'm a golfer add in Rodney Dangerfield at his best and you have a movie full of laughs. Also, great preformance by Bill Murray and his rodent friend.
Didn't think I would enjoy this movie that much but it really was enjoyable. Loved Rodney Dangerfield's wisecracks. Give it a viewing.
This is one of the best comedies ever made. The dialogue has become part of the American lexicon. A great cast. Ted Knight is the best.
hilarious and just plain funny to watch the gopher takes the movie and Rodney is a hoot to watch anytime
If you don't have this movie in your DVD collection, you should!  It's a classic that will always stick around!
A true classic.  Can't ever get enough of Bill Murray, Chevy Chase or Rodney Dangerfield.  I laugh every time I watch it.
Who can not like the movie with a gopher? He i the star of the movie, but everyone else does a good job too!
One of my five all time funniest movies!
Great comedy--and the story behind its making is even better.Funny, funny stuff from some great comics and one really great straight men (Ted Knight)
1 of my favorite movies  i was never a caddy, so I cant relate  I was a bagger at a supermarket
It's Caddyshack, either you love it or you don't.  I loved it, still do.  King of it's era of comedy.
MY KIDS AND I LOVE THIS MOVIE THIS IS ONE OF THE GREATEST MOVIES OF ALL TIMES TO BAD SOME OF THESE GUYS ARE NO LONGER WITH US. LOVE IT
This movie is a great comedy because of its light-natured approach and it's most excellent cast of innately funny people.
great cast of funny people and a great ending ,the good triumphs golfs crazier side exaggerated.easy watching relaxing no brain exercise needed..
Good old funny movie from days gone by.  Old fashion style of comedy that are made much any more now a days.
audrey Hepburn at her very best.Top cast and wonderful movie.The final scene is one of the greatest in the movie world!
THIS MOVIE TERRIFIC.  ANYTHING WITH AUDREY IN IT IS SUPER.  IT IS NOT ONE OF MY FAVORITES.  BUT STILL GOOD.
Very good mix of Bette Davis and others  work. MY favorite being Now Voyager and Splender in the Grass.These are hard to find by themselfs....A+
Hepburn does a wonderful job again...Great delightful film.
This movie allows us to follow a young girl who believes she is in love with a much older man. What an awesome older man!!!!!
Very romantic, funny comedy for people who love love.  Cooper's debauching ways merely titillate Hepburn and he becomes her first and only love.
My 11 year old is obsesses with Ray Bolger, so glad she loves the &#34;old&#34; movies. they dont make them like this anymore
Lee Horsley is one of my favorite actors.  Haven't watched the movie yet, but wanted to get it before it was no longer available.
Different from any other movie.  Like Tom Hanks & Meg Ryan together.  Enjoyable for the whole family. Great Movie anytime
This is quite simply one of my favorite movies of all time. I have no explanation as to why, it just is.
Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, who doesn't love that? Fun and amusing story with a great lesson! I love it!
You have to love 3 love interests played by Meg Ryan (pre-surgery) and Tom Hanks is totally in his sweet spot with this character. Very amusing.
A great story with lots of laughs wonderfully told and orchestrated. It is impossible for me to watch this movie and not laugh out loud.
A &#34;B&#34; movie, but just so enjoyable to watch these two.  A favorite.
Love this movie , simply one of the best movies I have seen . You have to watch this one !! What a show .
Great job in getting me the DVD on time.. and the movie was GOOD. I am glad to add it to my collection!
This movie has everything in it, romance and murder.  Very exciting with a lot of twists to the plot, with a good ending.
i really like this movie. i have seen it before and i really liked it. it also came when you said it was suppose to come
It was a fantastic movie that I would recommend to anyone who loves suspense.  Both Michael Douglas and Gweneth Paltrow were excellent.
this is an interesting and inventive murder mystery and it;s got a great cast.
One of my favorite murder movies!  Great twists and turns.  Michael Douglas did such a great job of being sly and slick.
it's kind of old, but a good Michael Douglas and Gwenyth Paltrow thriller. Viggo Morteson is also in the movie as the other lover.
an awesome movie.  have watched it many tines. Michael douglas is awesome as is gweneth. I am so glad I purchased it.
To make a long story short, if you only ever own one Michael Douglas movie on dvd, it should be this one! Great story, great movie!
True thriller.
this was a very good movie...held your supspense until the end and kept you guessing what would happen next! good!
I love this movie, Michael Douglas is a great actor. I can watch it several times, it still entertainers me. Great copy
This is a great flick, a plot movie that was well thought out and surprising.  If you like thrillers you should see it.  ...
Great suspense.  Normally don't care for Sandra Bullock but she was perfect for this role.
this is a great trio! i love all three movies and these dvds tend to be much cheaper in the end instead of buying them individually
I love this show. It's has some great acting in it..  I've seen it probably 100 times. You should see it if you haven't
Three movies for a little of nothing! Murder in the first is the best!  I haven't looked at the other two yet but my wife all of them
Great story. Basically a great chick flic with an excellent musical score.Highly recommend the film AND the CD!Enjoy!Frame Girl
A must see for anyone who wants a touching story with some laughs and love. A very nice plot that connects some way to all of us.
very sad yet funny but beautiful story to this movie i loved every moment of the movie beautiful thanks allot
I have seen it over and over and I always get moved to laughter and tears throughout, loving seeing it again after several years.
One of my all time favorite movies. Even if it is a 'girl movie' its a great feel good story.
I had this movie on VHS and updated to DVD because I like it so much.  The message about friendship is timeless.
Great Movie and wonderful blend of "star" talent.  I have loved them all singly and appreciate them even more together.
This is a movie that can make you laugh and then cry within minutes.  Not a new movie but certainly one worth watching over and over.
This film is way out there, but it is fun to watch.  I agree that it is not as good as the book, but it is still decent film.
I believe this is possible, and with the right meditation, we can all achieve the unbelievable. Good adventures of OBE;s...
See the movie many years ago and loved it then. William hurt was fabulous. However it does get a little far out.
I love sci fi and fantasy movies and this one is very thoughtful and entertaining. For the age of the film, the visuals are really spectacular.
I like warewolf movies especially to see each film maker's ideas on what a warewolf is how they transform from a man to a beast and visa versa.
Historically correct, with good action and excellent story.  Great actors and filmed in locations that seem to fit the period.  Highly recommend.
Totally different.  Totally enjoyable.  Great service.  Hard to find movie.
I love this movie if even it is a lot of subtitles based a different sign language. It's a great movie.
I wish they had made productions of the rest of the series with or without Darryl Hannah.  She did an excellent job at portraying Ayla, though.
i really love this show i use to have it but the vhs broke so i watched and loved it very much
I loved it ans was happy to be able to buy it.
This is a movie I had never seen but heard it was an excellent movie and it is a very good movie would recommend it for sure
I bought this movie for my sister so I didn't watch it. But it arrived quickly and my sister loves it.
I would love to see this movie,I wonder if it's on DVD?
Love all three of these movies.  Great to have them at this awesome price.
One good action Movie with Carl Weathers and Craig T Nelson When I have nothing to do I put it in the player if you like action its a fun Movie.
I really loved action jackson iis a must see for any carl weathers or vanity fan, all the action packed action and fun.
great so so so so so so so so so funny we watched when it was 1978 lv it lv
a good movie , not quite as good as the original but still a good movie to watch. I would recommend watching this if you have seen the first one.
One of my favorite performance by here.  This one shows what a phenomenal performer she is.  One of the best!
Yes this is a time capsule but a  must have, Bette Midler Shines on stage and Her Characters will make you laugh for sure
Miss M's classic show that set the stage for many more wonderful thing in the future!! She the best! Yeah.
What can you say about Bette Midler, singer, actor, comedian an general all around funny bawdy lady.... love this woman.
Outstanding film, great service from vendor, terrific price.
So emotionally raw that that watching this movie will exhaust you.  Be prepared to live through a plane crash.  Peter Weir is a genius.
Realistic story about everyday people coping with tragedy. Excellent acting, and important themes are covered in this movie. Well done.
This is a story with a lesson about life, about not being selfish; about caring for others.  Some things are more important than your own agenda.
Arrived on time, did not have a case but this was put under the comments.....love the movie, very smooth transaction!
I've enjoyed watching this movie several times.  I believe it's a wonderful story and the actors are excellent with their performance.
Brandon fraser and Joe Pesci at their best. great trans action. great movie, real tear jerker. great addition to my movie collection.
This book was thrilling and they did a pretty good job of transforming it to the screen.  It doesn't loose it's impact over the years.
Frank Sinatra is a detective going after a serial killer.  This was just as good as the book!
Always loved this movie, now have it in my collection.  Looking forward to watching whenever I want.Frank & Faye are excellent in this production.
A funny movie about the witness protection program.  Steve Martin looks hilarious cutting the grass in a sharkskin suit!  Just a fun movie.
Steve Martin is so funny in this movie. Rick Morannis makes this movie believeable. What a great team for this movie.
One of my favorites. Many one liners you will use for years to come. Great choice of cast as well.
This movie is great especilly when someone's turtle flows down the drain of a sink.Rated PG-13 for some language.This movie is suitble for children.
Steve Martin does an outstanding job as the former mob guy in the witness protection program. Rick Moranis is great as his hapless handler.
Love this movie! Steve Martin and Rick Moranis are a great team. Happy to have found it at a great price."I'm witch you!"
This movie is great. Steve Martin is terrific as is Rick Moranis.  Very funny, light and happy.
Very pleased with this purchase got it for a good price and the disc was in great condition. Thank you
For me, it was really good, seen ot 2 times now
It's one of those movies they fortunately don't play on cable so it retains it's hilarity.  A must have for anyone who enjoys a light hearted comedy.
It's a good movie not the movie I thought I saw on tv . That's on me not the saler  the movie was new not a downloaded movie it's a good movie .
This film contains the right amount of suspence, humor and romance to make it another Hitchcock hit! I thoroughly enjoyed the film.
This was a gift for my Mom and she loves it!  My parents and I love Alfred Hitchcock and have been able to enjoy this together!!  :)
Foreign Correspondent is among the most thrilling movies Hollywood has ever made.  If you love the classics, I believe you will love this movie.
Love old moovies with just a great story and no cursing.Love Montgomery Clift and this is one to add to my collection
I loved the acting and the story line, as it worked for me. It was believable, and kept my interest.
I love Tom Hanks and that is why I gave it 5 stars.  I can't say I hated it because he was in it but even he must wonder why.
This is a good remake.  I have always liked this movie.  I recommend this anyone who likes horror movies and remakes.
Some new characters and unexpected plot twists give new life to the beloved classic.  I real treat for both young and young-at-heart.
The movie arrived in great condition and perfect packaging.  I am buying all the vaulted Disney movies for Christmas.  My kids will be surprised.
i see this movie when i was a kid 1 am 25 now what a good kids movie.  I always thought that it was from a small movie company.
found it loved it been looking for it for years. the story holds up to the test of time and the movie brings beck memories of my youth.
A great classic cartoon with a great storyline and characters. If you like the last unicorn or the animated hobbit series you'll enjoy this.
this was a great flash of the past, i remember watching this when i was little and i can't wait to share with my nephews
old fav...always scares the hell out of me
An amazing very scary Movie, the exorcist trilogy (and the new Bginning) are a must have for horror fans!
Movie came within the correct time period and excellent sirvice and was what I expected.
Much better then the abomination that is Exorcist 2. Just erase that from your minds and pretend it never happend and watch this instead.
I was never a fan of the first Exorcist but I find this one absolutely fantastic. Much different and very creepy.
Had this movie on video tape for years it wore out.  Glad to get it on DVD it's amazing to see animals with human traits.
I loved the DVD.  The color was wonderful, the subject matter was very entertaining.  Thanks so much.
I have owned the VHS of this movie for years and was tickled to finally have the DVD version of it.  Great service, quick delivery, reasonable price.
I have always like gremlins but I don't like gremlins 2 as good as I done with this one he so cute.
So glad I found this! Had not seen it since I was 9 years old and almost 30 years later the movie still holds up!
I LOVE THIS MOVIE. THIS MOVIE MADE ME LAUGH; IT DEFINITELY WASN'T A HORROR MOVIE IN MY OPINION. I LAUGHED MY HEAD OFF  WATCH THIS MOVIE!!!!!
is great movie , is funny  and i love this film , your actors , gizmo and the gremlins .
I  like how the movie starts off as a cute and cuddly film .  Then it switches off to a scary film. Classic!
added to my granddaughters collection she loved it thank you hope you had a merry christmas and have a wonderful new year
This was a movie on my daughter's list.  She loves this movie & was thrilled to receive it.  Great surprise.
Movie was a great buy so much better then watching it on VHS so much clearer and it brings back the good old movie watching experience.
This movie is just as good as I remember it when I last saw it years ago.
this is such a great movie. i remember when i was a kid and saw it for the first time,think this is gonna soon become our new fmaily christmas movie
Great movie, and the sequel is just as wonderful!  I love this movie.  Glad i finally was able to purchase from amazon!
I watched this movie as a child so I had to add it to my movie collection. It really is a creative story line. You won't be disappointed!
I love this movie. Gizmo is so cute. I haven't had a chance to watch the movie yet but will probably do so this weekend.
I received the product DVD within 5 days of ordering and using paypall.  I am well pleased and my daughter enjoyed watching Gremlins more than once.
This is a classic. Introduce your kids to what a scary movie was at your age! Mine loved it and I was glad to see it on dvd!
This is one of my favorite movies!!  My son loves Gremlins and this is a birthday gift for him and he is going to love it!!
I bought this as a gift for a family member. It is a nice movie and we have enjoyed watching it together.
I saw this in the theater and couldn't wait to share with my daughter. FUN! Remember don't get them wet!
Great classic! My parents still speak of it, I feel like every family  should own a copy of gremlins! nh
I love the gremlins ever since i was a kid i could not get enough of them and now that im older i love them even more
really like this movie its really funny and the best movie to see and will see it again and have friends see it
I have loved this since I was a kid and now my kids love it! Enjoyable,suspenseful,and full of action. It's a must have!
Good and funny clean movie. It is good for the whole family and kids. You should try this movie yourself.
GREMLINS is a classic...The story is really nice with a mix of little monsters and fun that even a kid can see...GOOD MOVIE!
I enjoyed this movie when i was a kid. I love it then i and i still love it now.
What can I say about Gremlins. A great family movie. Many little monsters making trouble for everyone around Christmas. A must see movie
this is a old timer but is still a great movie to have. it a classic for watching anytime of the year not just for christmas.
Ive always wanted this movie since the first time i saw it when i was a kid , i just like Michael Douglas in this movie.
My very favorite Michael Douglas film.  Robert Duvall also has an exceptional performance in this film.  It also arrived very quickly.
It was a very entertaining movie.  It kept my wife and I were glued to the TV set.  Michael Douglas played a good part.
Glad this finally got released with special features. The film transfer looks great, the box is cool. An amazing film/DVD all-around!
Hey! We've all been there, this may be a little over the top, but we can all identify with Douglas's character.
Live by the rules of society, and society along with the Political Correct police will push you over the edge.
Loving the old school movies on Prime. This was good to view again and I can't wait to rent it again.
michael douglas is so good and mentally twisted in this movie. he is so convincing and really makes you fell bad for the bad guy
I love watching movies and it is nice to know that I can purchase just about any movie ever made. My collection is growing nicely.
I love this movie. This guy is so crazy. just shows you that anyone can just snap. what a great movie
Movie arrived sooner then I expected,and in GREAT shape. I would do business whit this vendor again. Thanks for the GREAT service.
very good movie its a must have for any dvd collection the story is very  realistic and michael plays the part  with complete mastery
I love this movie.  It has so many hilarious scenes.  There is no message.  It is not serious, just amusing.  Buy it.
An engrossing story of Marine culture and its sometimes difficult impact on the family.  Suvall gives his usual wonderful performance.
Duvall was excellent as always! Movie has a great story line as well. The ending was very well suited for the story.
Anyone who has spend time in the military will appreciate this story line of military life. Very realistic and great acting. Duvall is always great.
I bought the DVD to replace the video which took up too much space.  It is an excellent movie in many ways
I have enjoyed this movie since it came out.  Wonderful casting, great setting and excellent writing.  Love reading Pat Conroy's other books
I am a huge Pat Conroy fan and had seen this movie many years ago so I was thrilled to find it on Amazon for such a reasonable price.
this movie is just amazing, it's very haunting and has a great music score! Charlton Heston plays perfect the only man on earth!!must by!!!
One of my all time favorites as a kid, which still plays well now. An absolute &#34;must see&#34; for all you &#34;Last man on earth&#34; fans.
love it classical movie, if u get this, u should get last man on earth n i am legend great
This was one DVD I had to get.  I saw this one when I was a kid and thought it was one of the best Charlton Heston movies I've seen.
Great movie, but doesn't work on my computer, it must require some some type of media player. I'll just have to watch it at home.
why are you still reading this?! chuck heston battles zombie cultists!! it don't get no better than that! order this NOW!
The movie was great full of excitement original and spine tingling and most of all not a remake great buy
Cool movie like it and like the whole LA sci fi thing.  Especially like the car Charlton Heston is driving in the initial scene.  Great 70's movie.
The clarity of the picture was remarkable. It looked like it was filmed yesterday! I only purchase Blu-Ray Hi Def movies.
Charlton Heston gives a great performance.I have added it to my collection along with Soilent Green.Great Product - Great Service
I bought this for my son as a Christmas gift.  I've never seen the movie, but my son loves it.
If you love cheesy sci-fi movies from the late 60s and 70s as I do, this is a must have movie for your collection.
This is a classic science fiction movie that is entertaining to watch. Charlton Heston is a fantastic actor in anything he is in.
exploitation movie..real powerful then but kind of seems like what would happen if the Obama crime family took over. yep
This was made many years ago.  It's a sad ending but the acting was very good and the out come was almost expected!
**The Omega Man !  *** Excellent Movie!  Remember- seeing this film back in the '70s.  Would recommend film to anyone !..
This is one of my favorite movies with the great Charelton Heston. The music I thought also made this movie.
It you haven't seen this version of I am Legend....you should!  It's a classic!  Plus, it has a great 70's feel to the movie
Picture quality is very good. Movie in same genre as "Last Man on Earth" Vincent Price and "I Am Legend" Will Smith.
A true good job . The tape came in good shape and you send it very quicky . Thank's. I will enjoy it . ART
I like it because it scared heck the out of me! I like the cast also.
I am a fan of Stephen King.  He is my favorite author. I have quite a few movies that was made from his books.
This movie is great.  One of the best horror vampire movies ever.  It is now a classic and I enjoy watching every Halloween.  Best scariest vampire.
This is a very hard item to locate for one thing, and another is it's a classic. I like the  actors, and the storyline.
Love Stephen King!!!!!! Like the original best of all. Read all the books, watch the movies and usually like both.
well acted and great addition to my WW II collection for research.  I and my family are Nazi concentration camp survivors
One of the best wwll war movies, cast with some of the bestactors in hollywood.
Another awesome submarine movie - have a collection of them and they can't be beat!  Great quality also!  Don't miss this one!
It's a movie. Nothing on the level of Ben-Hur but good anyways.This reveiw process wants twenty wors or more.
A great war tme movie with two of the bestactors, Peck and Moore.
Great movie.Lots of old, but familiar Hollywood actors. Wow.  Missed this movie when it first debuted.  Thank you for making it available.
I have not watched to movie yet. It has a great cast of actors so I'm sure it will be good.
this is a great movie and about true story, great actor , great movies, about hard times ,in great setting
This was bought for my brother.  He loves old WWII. This came on time and the DVD was in great shape.  The art work was in great shape.
Reminded wife and me of someone we knew like the character played by Jody Foster.  Many attitudes and actions the same, even the appearance.
I don't think this film got the recognition it deserved...such an interesting and TALENTED cast, and who can't love the musical number at the end?!
Seen it three dozen times. I marvel at how good it is, given the process that went into the writing the script.
This is absolutely great on blue ray. That are a good amount of extras and commentaries also. Well worth owning!
An unparalleled classic. Bogey at his best. Never get tired of it. A movie you must see if you haven't already.
and this is both DVD AND blu-ray.  and the collector's edition.  Great packaging for a wonderful classic movie.  Would definitely buy again.
Both my husband and our adult son love Casablanca.  My husband was happy to receive it as a Christmas gift.
The movie is a classic and I can pick it up at any time and watch it without getting tired of it....
I've watched this movie so many times in my life that I have parts of the dialogue memorized. A great film....great actors, story and production.
Casablanca has been beautifully restored and the extras only enhance the movie experience.
I have watched this movie many times over the years. It never fails to entertain me, great acting, great story.
bought for my mom. she has Alzheimer's and is really enjoying watching the old classic movies! rgj retr rett rteer
It is one of the best DVDs in my collection.  Would recommend this DVD to anyone wanting a wonderful film with perfect sound.
This is one of the best films and the actors as well as the film are classics and will be viewed as very good for all times.
What a love story and it still works.  Classic is always a classic.
There are so many classic scenes and lines that this movie never gets old.  Bogart and Bergman as well as many great others.
The best movie in history, presented in excellent quality. Round up the usual popcorn, and enjoy this classic.
classic. that  just sums it all up. the story is timeless. but its slow and you have to be patient
Amazing edition from one of the best film in the history of movies!!! Limited edition with serial number, don't wast your time, buy it!
A classical is for ever.  I bought this video for a good friend. This is her favorite movie of all time and mine too.
This movie was made by real movie stars with a great story.  Great unforgettable lines and characters.  A movie for all times.
I was using it in my English class.  Our copy was not working.  I needed it quickly and got it quickly.
I like alot of the old movies and casablanca is no exception. I think bogart was one of the greatest actors ever.
Excellent story line and never is out of date. Writing was wonderful. A classic love story with an appropriate ending.
Classic film continues to be one of the best ever made.  Bogart and cast are awesome and movie is over before you know it.
The hd really brings out that crispness and quality in the film highlighting the technology used by the film industry in the 1940s.
An unforgettable edition, high quality, truly an item collection. Very cute! I recommend to everyone! It is a great buy
The transfer was excellent.  The video has been noticeably improved; without being distruptive. It is still is good old B/W.The sound is very clean.
A classic love story with a real ending, not a fairy tale ending.  The guy doesn't always get the girl he really loves.Would recommend to everyone.
This is such an nice old movie. I loved it, everyone should watch this. It's great for people who are into old classic movies.
One of the all time great movies. Normally don't like B&W movies but this is so exceptional I can overlook it.
Casablanca - The more you watch - the better it gets.This movie is just so great!  And it gets better each time you watch it!
I gave this as a gift and they were elated.  The colors are vivid and video is sharp.  A great gift for Nastalgia.
This is such a classic movie.  I love it even colorized.  I enjoy watching it over and over again.  This is truly a favorite.
Finally was able to enjoy this movie and get all the jokes and puns from the character's quotes from this movie. Great storyline.
This is one of the best movies that I've ever seen, and I highly believe that most people would really enjoy it and remember it forever!!!!
Legend says hell has no fury like a woman scorned. However, hell has no fury like a mans love.
Excellent!  Stays true to the director's black and white filming, but "cleans it up" and makes the images much clearer!
All time favorite Bogart movie.  Can't beat the cast of starts as well as the story line and action.  Must be a 'Ricks Americana' somewhere!
You just can't beat this classic.  Do it again Sam and watch it!  Great performances by great one of a kind actors.  Enjoy again.
Timeless. The greatest movie of all time
great movie, just chock full of classic lines that have become part of our culture.  Great and timeless love story.
One of the best. Ingrid Bergman is such a wonderful actress. Humphrey Bogart I always enjoy. He is also good in the African Queen.
This is a classic that should not be overlooked.  It is wonderful and romantic. Great for Valentine's Day! Music is good, too.
Great classic with some wonderful lines.  Have been meaning to watch it for years and glad I finally took the time to watch it.
Wow! This is required entertainment for everyone if all ages. Bogie at his best what else needs to be said.
If asked what is wrong with today's movies, just set them down and show them this movie. It was what was right with movies that is long lost.
Wonderful - All time Classic.
Rick and Louis startA beautiful friendship whileIlsa gets on plane
A wonderful classic. Ageless. Bogart was great. Everyone should see this movie at least once. I have several times. I will probably see it again.
Great classic, must see and have in DVD collection.  Recommend to have and loved the time period of the movie.
Casablanca, an all time GREAT.  LOVE this story, what's not to like--wanted to own it on DVD collection. Beautiful, Love Story.
A definite must-have for fans of the movie. It looks even great in bluray and keeps urging me to ~play it again~. :D
Great movie, even more great if you now a bit of history about WWII, the actors and the social norms of the time.
Great movie.  Have seen it many times. One of my favorites.  Recommend it to others. A classic of all time.
One of my all time favorites. Can watch it often and still get the feeling of a first time viewer.
Don't be surprised if it becomes a classic.
You must remember this a kiss is just a kiss a sigh is just a sigh&#8230;&#8230;.and a great movie will always be great
As usual, Bogey is at his top performance in this one! Worth every cent it cost.
I can't believe how great this movie is.  I'm going to see it over and over, because it's one of those movies you'll never want to forget.
I like good old movies. Had always heard about it but this if the first time I have ever seen it.
I bought this movie because I want to see more movies with Humprey Bogart. I never expect how it ends. He is great, he is a great actor.
Casablanca is one of the greatest movies ever made.  I really enjoyed this movie and would watch it again. The film noir style is so intense.
I have always wanted a copy of &#34;Cassablanca&#34; and now I do!  Now it is in my collection for good!
one of the greatest romantic films of all time, great for everyone of all age. i recommend everyone to watch it and again and again.
What can I say about this movie? It is simply the best! The plot, the actors, the setting, everything! Got to have this in your collection!
This timeless movie is a must have for any movie buff who enjoys the classics!  I am thrilled to have it as part of my collection!
I have been watching this movie over and over for over forty years. It is a classic. You can't rate classics. They are in a class all their own.
Fabulous movie, incredible actors, unbelievably great movie.  A must to have in your collection.  You won't be sorry, trust me.
One of the all time greats for Bogie and Bacall. I could watch this movie over and over. Great plot. Great movie. Fast shipping
This is one of the classic movies that should be in everyone's library, If you don't own it buy it.
So glad it is available on streaming video. It was easy to show it to our movie-loving 25-year-oldgrand-daughter, who had never seen it.
This is a classic!! Everyone needs to see this movie! It's timeless! The actors are top notch!  Very well made!  Buy this for your collection!
I BOUGHT THIS FOR MY HUSBAND FOR CHRISTMAS AND HE JUST LOVES IT. IT HAS LOTS OF EXTRAS THAT YOU JUST DON'T GET WITH A REGULAR DVD.
The best movie ever made!!!  The chemistry between Bogart and Bergman can&#8217;t be beat.  One of the few movies I watch over and over.
As good if not better than the first time we saw it - the quality of the digital transfer is wonderful, and the sound excellent.  Thank you
Great movie, bought for my Grandmas birthday and I watched it with her and was surprised by how good it was.
This is the best movie period. The actors the script, the suspense carries well after so many years. Love it.
I think that Casablanca was Humphrey Bogart's best movie. I enjoy watching it every so often.  It is a great movie.
Absolutely loved it! They do not make movies like this anymore. It was intriguing and the love story was freshing and a nice touch.
If you do not have this in your collection but it and you won't be sorry ! A noir classic . Bogart at his best ! This is a ten !
Hey, when Bogy gets after the bad guys, and everybody gets out of his weight.. we are off and running with good entertainment.  etc.
What's not to love about Casablanca? Nothing!! And this DVD is the perfect addition to any movie collection. Recommend for all!
K one of my favorite movies and im not even a old guy ha i would recommend this to any one
wonderful black and white .. recalls how effecive this format can be.. with of course superstars and a wonderful plot... a keeper...
Received item quickly and as promised.  This is a great movie and the extra features only add to the package.
a gift for my hubby is favorite movie, he can watch it over and over I will look at it one day
This movie is a wonderful classic to watch and to own. Got a really great price on Amazon. Bought one as a gift and one for myself.
A Must See Classic! Bogart, Bergman, and Rains are fantastic!!
Every character, every actor down to the smallest supporting actor and every line is absolutely perfect.  There's a reason no one's done a remake.
This is worth seeing again and again and each time you see it you feel like the first time your saw it .
Certainly one the all time masterpieces of Classic Movies.  A must have in the collection for movie lovers.  Humphrey Bogart at his finest.
another film that defines classic and quality cast and film.
a classic that we have seen many times, purchased the dvd as the old vcr recording just wasnt capable of doing it justice any more
I've always enjoyed Humphrey Bogart and Edgar G. Robinson whether together or separate.  Just another classic that will survive the ages!
Good movie, interaction between Edward G Robinson and Bogart is great. Oh and Lauren Bacall is there too.
Classic action suspense and greet effects shot in one room. Some the greatest actors young people don't know and need to discover.
We don't care for the snap case cover, but the story is really good and the storm was horrifying!!  The DVD quality of sound and picture was great.
It's Bogey and Edward G. at their best with Clare Trevor giving a remarkable performance.  Received this DVD in excellent shape and timely.
I love most of Bogart's work, but I especially like his collaborations with John Huston.  This one is a gem.
My husband loves these old movies and the quality can still be found on the DVDs that are available after all this time.
Great DVD's. my brother likes old movies.  Came in record time in great condition. No  problems playing it. Artwork in good condition
Love this movie. Have seen it twice already and wanted my own copy. This is my favorite movie with Cary Grant in it.
It is rare to find the quality of a definitive movie experience matched and enhanced by a technically superb , visually enthralling print! BRAVO!
A classic movie that I can watch again and again.  And the blu-ray edition is outstanding.  Makes it worthwhile to upgrade from DVD.
Hitchcock at his finest! Cary Grant is as debonair as he is handsome, while James Mason is sinister to the max.
A great classic movie with no objectionable material and a good story line. All time favorite actors--action moved right along with no dead spots.
I love this movie, it's a great classic and I watch it every now and then. I heartily recommend it.
It's a family classic,  aged gracefully &  good for everyone.  It's old fashioned effects require a bit of imagination, but still wonderful.
Hitchcock at his best. I believe this is one if not the best of his films.The quality is superb. great buy!
Had seen this movie many times but not in HD it was like watching an entirely new movie. Thumbs Up on this one.
There is not much to say that other reviewers have not already said over decades.  This is a great movie if you like Alfred Hitchcock or Cary Grant.
If you are an Alfred Hitchcock fan you know this is one of his best (in my opinion). It just gets better every time you watch it.
Love these old movies. Really worth watching and having.
Great movie and highly recommended. Preferably you should buy it on Blu ray but if not the DVD is not bad either.
I love this movie, and I am glad to finally own it on DVD. It's an excellent thriller that I will watch again and again.
One of Hitchcock's best and while it's unlikely business, it's a treat from swarmy James Mason to Cary's mother (whose name I can't remember).
Great film.  You got to have it if you love CG.  That house they made for the film is beautiful.
THE VERY BEST OF CARY GRANT STORY IS SO INTRESTING THAT YOU WANT TO SEE WHAT NEXTTOO BAD THEY DONT MAKE THIS KIND OF MOVIES ANY MORE
What can I say?  I love Cary Grant and anything he has done but his show is one of his and Hitchcock's best.
Train rides, plane chase, abductions, mistaken identity - good old fashioned suspense. This is a classic. Well made and timeless.
My favorite movie. I just love the scenes and the acting is the best. Eva Marie Saint is very stunning
What's not to like with Cary Grant????  It was a little risqu&eacute; for the time it was filmed and added some allure.
You can hardly catch your breath when something else happens. Cary Grant is, as usual, wonderful in this role of mistaken identity.
A classic Hitchcock thriller.  The story has many twists and turn.Besides Cary Grant you will recognize many well known actors.
Cary Grant is great in this movie.It is far better than Psyco. If you love Hitchcock thrillers you will love North by Northwest.
Cary Grant: Hero.He tries to save his own faceAnd George Washington's
This is one of my all time favorite movies, and the Blu-ray is wonderful.  Would recommend this to any Hitchcock fan
His movies are always great and this is no exception.Loved it.  If you don't own this, you should.June M.Canada
This is classic.  Can watch over and over again. Bravo another great one from Hitchcock.  I would definitely recommend this one.
Cary Grant and Alfred Hitchcock team for one of their best. Grant's most economically successful film, according to some reports.
Hitchcock couldn't have done it any better than he did in this one, &#34;North By Northwest&#34; is another must see movie!
Really enjoyed watching this movie and my 16 yo did too. Kept us pinned to our seats the whole time
It is a classic. I love Alfred Hitchcock mysteries. Cary grant is superb in this role. The plot has you at the edge of your seat.
He plays a little different part in this film. And as always he does well. Good story.  Good acting all around.
The scenes in the railway car with Eva Marie Saint and Cary are sexy and totally clever. Hitch again.  He was such an inventive director.
It has been 20 years since I have seen this movie and when I found it, I was extremely excited.
This is one of my all time favorites.  I received in as soon as it was released and in excellent condition.
I didn't know where this one was taking me, but I loved the entire trip!  If you like old mysteries, this is a must.
What fun to.watch this captivating classic, worth watching every so often,  and for free with my Prime membership. Thank.you Amazon!
Great acting,suspenseful. One of Hitchcocks very best,in my opinion. And Cary grant! Need I say more?? Really love this movie...
Cary Grant at his best! Great suspense, acting, excitement and plot! Eva Marie Saint is breathtaking. The cast is superb! 4 thumbs up!
one of my top ten favorite movies - Cary Grant and adventure - if you have never watched it don't miss it - if you have watch it again
Amazing the first time you see it, the 2nd time you see it, and every time after that!!!  I highly recommend this film.
I saw this movie as a child and it was great seeing it again. Great movie about spies, secrets, and love.
Cary Grant during his best film days - love the airplane & the corn field chase scene and seeing Mt. Rushmore as a backdrop
Great movie with Cary Grant I love all his movies there is lots of action and it will keep you on the edge of your seat.
Great music, great acting and Eva Marie Saint to boot.  With James Mason as the &#34;villain&#34; what more could you ask for?
Great movie.  It's a true classic.  There is enough humor mixed into the mayhem to make it tolerable fro all.
Wonderful classic movie - great for older kids and the whole family. It's exciting, full of twists and  unexpected turns.
This has been a great classic. I saw it years ago and it is still compelling. I would recommend it to all.
VEry happy with product, beautifully presented and the shipment of the item was very fast. I really enjoy this very entertaining movie.
I highly recommend this film!  It is reallyentertaining full of adventure!
This movie was filled with surprising turns.  It had me guessing a few times.  Cary Grant was terrific in his role.
This was an awesome movie.  It is a thriller with a lot of romance, and you get to look at Cary Grant for several hours.  Well worth itl
Another great one by the master of suspense. Love Cary Grant's sense of humor throughout and Hitch's choice for cool blondes.
This is a great movie! I love Alfred Hitchcock films and I love Cary Grant so this was just another addition to my collection!
Cary Grant at his best and Alfred Hitchcock at the top of his game.  Another Hitchcock masterpiece.  A must have for any movie collector.
This movie my husband saw on a tv show as a great movie.  He wanted to see it and I couldn't find it.  So, I had to reorder it
What is to be said about a classic like this other than it stands the test of time, all great films do:-)
My generation most girls were gaga over Elvis ,no no no !  I was in love with Cary Grant ,who I still think is the best male actor ever.
We love Alfred Hitchcock moviesI think this is his best work - funny and serious, very suspenseful, great acting
A spellbinding adventure from beginning to end. It has everything from murder to brief comedy. Gloriously Hitchcock!
Classic film. Three film giants. Such a simple story, but such great dialogue. Not much great dialogue in film today.
The movie that rescued Ms. Hepburn's career is fantastic.  One could gush, but it speaks for itself.  Go on.  Watch it.  You know you want to.
Love this movie!  Can't decide which version I like better - this one or the one with Grace Kelly and Bing Crosby!  Both are great!
I just love Hepburn, Grant and Stewart in this movie.  It is fun to watch this great trio working together.
This movie is funny, the story line very easy to follow.  I am a big fan of Cary Grant, K. Hepburn, Jimmie Stewart and others.
This movie has so many wonderful actors.  One of my favorites.  Cary Grant and Jimmy Stewart and Katherine Hepburn.  Just wonderful.
I bought this for one of my nieces, and am very happy with the set. It's a great, classic movie, and well worth the great price!
One of the greatest comedies of all time, Cary Grant, Katherine Hepburn, a young James Stewart. I am a great fan of all, a most have movie.
Katherine Hepburn, Cary Grant, and James Stewart were at their best! They were all charming in this funny, lovable movie. Enjoy!
I've seen this 100s of times great acting , funny, and who doesn't love Cary and Hepburn together a must see...
LOVE LOVE LOVE this movie! Carey Grant is one of my favorites and this movie has him and a great cast! Very funny and charming.
Excellent movie for all movie lovers.  Good, old fashion fun with the best possible cast.  Worth watching a lot more than once!
I never get tired of this movie and it seems everyone who sees it feels the same.  Buy it and enjoy.
This is a classic and one of my family's favorites.  Jimmy Stewart is exceptional in it.  Lots of fun scenes and interactions.
If you like the cast, you will love this movie.  This should be the standard for movies today.  Fast talking, good storyline, classy actors.
I have alway been a fan of this movie. Very funny and touching, was so happy to see it on amazon prime.
A great old classic with Katherine Hepburn and Cary Grant. A romantic comedy from a time when they knew how to make romantic comedies
Much better written compared to other films of that genre or era. Funny, sad and excellent acting by all performers.
I loved old, classic movies.  Since this was a movie I have enjoyed from my youth what a bonus to add it to my Kindle library.
Great movie, I love Kate. I will advise anyone to come and use the Amazon site for movies, music and anything else they need.
This is one of the greatest movies ever made and it stars the late great Katharine Hepburn and Cary Grant!
All star cast at their best. Cary Grant and Katherine Hepburn shine. Charming story and worth seeing! Amazons word requirement is moronic.
I love this film!  This is by far one of my favorite classic films.  How could it not be, with such a great cast?
Anyone who likes classic movies will love this one - this is a true CLASSIC and with Grant, Hepburn and Stewart what is not to like?
Reason i gave a five star is because its a perfect trio- romantic comedy which is a great classic and i love it
As someone who likes all kinds of movies, I thought that this selection would be a worthwhile watch. It was classic.
a must see great movieJimmy Stewart as you rarely get to see him - magnificentCary Grant - at his bestKatherine Hepburn - young - lovely - talented
A true classic.  One of my all-time favorites.  Wish they still made them like this. Having this available on Prime makes it even more of a bargain.
Who doesn't love a Katharine Hepburn movie? And then add Cary Grant and Jimmy Stewart. It's a total package of brilliance!
With a cast like this, you can't miss.One of the best!
These actors are the best and the movie is a classic that stands the test of time.
I love this movie.  it is very entertaining.  I've seen it many times on TV over the years and have enjoyed it every time I've seen it.
In this day and age you could never get three stars of this caliber to be in one movie. Hepburn, Grant, and Stewart are GREAT!!
This is my all-time favorite movie!  It has three of my most favorite actors in a wonderful, light hearted comedy.  Very fun!
A all time favorite of mine , I must say I watch this story at least once a year .
You can tell this was made from a good play. Top notch cast and performances by all. Stewart definitely deserved an Oscar.
All my favorites - Especially Jimmy Stewart.  Can find a fault in this one.  They were the best of the best.
This was a Christmas gift for a friend who loves the film.  Who could blame her?  I already own this one myself.
Early Hollywood at its best. Fast humor and clever sexual innuendo. Grant at his best and Stewarta real treat.
Five out of five stars.One of my favorite James Cagney films of all time. Great price, fast delivery. This is action packed.
I mean you can never go wrong with cagney this is such a good movie classic for any gangster movie collector
IT HAS ALWAYS BEEN ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES SINCE I WAS A KID AND I FINALLY BOUGHT IT EXCELLENT MOVIE.
I like this film as a kid I watched on saturday mornings in the 1970's when they would replay black and white movies
now u have 3 of the best bad guy actors in this movie.and the bowery boys too how can u beat that .
No spoiler alert but one of my favorite CAGNEY films ever.  Ya gotta watch it.  This is one of those timeless classics that stand the test of time.
A bit of a strange story with a surprising ending, but a must if you like gangster films.  I loved it.
One of my favorite movies of all time!  Cagney when he was young literally 'taking over' the screen...how can you NOT love this movie?
cagney takes it away in the classic.no one can beat him.and the sence with the grapefruit is the best.
This movie is great and is almost true to fact, but there are some Hollywood in it.  For the price, it's worth it.
The purpose of this picture was supposed to show crime don't pay.  But fiften minutes before the end of the picture weren't enough time.
A rousing patriotic part of our history that entertains as it arouses your love for our country.  Don't pass this one up.
This is a very enjoyable musical. Watching James Cagney dancing is a real treat. I had forgotten how good he was.
What's not to like in this movie?  If you like musicals (I do), a great theme, then you will enjoy Carney in this patriotic show.Rene'
this is a great moive an a must if you have a collection. dont pass tis up its a feel good movie to have.
No technical difficulties,  special features very informative, would recommend to any Cagney fan. So happy  to add it to our collection.
We watched this video as a family!  Great film.  I recommend this movie to other families.  It is an all time classic!
One of the best musicals of all time, James Cagney is at his best in this production.  It is a timeless movie.
No one could have played this part better then Cagney. Even if you aren't a Cagney fan, you will love this movie. He brings real life to the part.
The tap dancing; the singing; the costumes; James Cagney at his all time best! I'm proud to add this to my home collection.
Love the music and the movie.  George M. Cohan played by one of my favorite actors, James Cagney.  You cannot get any better than that.
Love the movie and the extra DVD with Michael J Fox. I bought this for my daughter to have a 4th of July Celebration away from home.
This is an all time got to see classic, if you like Jimmy Cagney. One of our favorites in our household. Thanks for making it available.
My family enjoy watching this DVD. It's a movie classic. I would recommend this to everyone. The picture quality is also very good.
Jimmy Cagney is just too much fun to watch.  Nobody dances as well.  Nobody!
Love this Old time favorite. James Cagney is just marvelous in this movie.
GOOD MOVIE. WELL PUT TOGETHER ABOUT AN IMPORTANT PART OF AMERCIAN HISTORY. IT WAS A MUSICAL I LIKE TO WATCH AND CAGNEY WAS A GREAT ACTOR IN IT.
One of my favorite movies...singing dancing and the auto biography of this famous American treasure is a plus! Marion Edwards
AND I HAVE TO SAY, DADDY JUST LOVED IT. IT WAS AS HE SAID LONGERR, AND BETTER THAN ONE HE SAW YEARS PASTTHANK YOU
I LOVE this movie
This is a classic musical/bio.  The DVD is clear and the sound is excellent.  It is also uncut which makes it all the better.
James Cagney at his best.  The songs are wonderful and all very well done.  Francis Langford is a great bonus in the film.  A true classic.
Here is a chance to let your children see and hear how great music was written.  A piece of musical and acting history.
LOVE LOVE LOVED this movie.  I love the old time actors and boy could Jimmy Cagney dance!  Would recommend for any age!!!!!
I got this as a gift for a family member. They loved it and was happy to add it their movies.
love the video  no matter how old its always a classica must see for all who like musical movies
Great gift for my young niece and nephew who need to be exposed to this laugh out loud film. Fast shipping and condition as expected. Thanks!!!
Great classic movie! Fun to see these talented stars in their prime. I always wanted to be Debbie Reynolds when I was growing up.
My oldest daughter loves this movie and wanted to get it for her 12 year old sister to enjoy, also.  All the family enjoys the classics
It may be the showgirl in me, or the fact that I want to sing and dance for a living, but this is one of my favorite movies ever
This is a classic movie and  I will enjoy seeing the movie from time to time.  I never get tired of seeing a movie like this over and over.
As one of favorite movies of all times, I finally own this wonderful copy.  Now to sit back and enjoy.
I've always been a fan of this movie and I loved the extras. My stepson loved it for the singing and dancing.
I could watch this one once a month, great stars, good story line, and lots of Singing and dancing.
A great movie to watch over and over.  Great story, great song and dance, especially with O'Conner's number, and a great feel-good movie for anyone!
just the singin' in the rain sequence is worth getting the movie
My older sister was in love with this gift the second i gave it to her for her birthday I am very happy with it.
We all remember the &#34;Singing in the Rain&#34; dance Gene does, but there's lots of other good dancing and singing in this one.
This movie is great.  The music is nice and so is the acting.  There are extras so you can just watch the songs.  The picture and sound is good.
I found the movie extraordinary.  The characterization intriguing and captivating.
My sister and I are always waiting for the older musicals to come out in blu ray.  This is a delight.
Excellent transfer to blueray (sound and music). A great story with many spectacular dances and acting by Gene Kelly and friends. Highly recommended.
Oldie but goodie
First off my wife wanted the umbrella! This movie is probably ageless. This is a great buy for any collector.
AWESOME . JUST PLEASED TO BE ABLE TO SEE THIS MOVIE ANYTIME I WANT TO.
Great music. Great acting.  Great movie.  One of the best of the old Hollywood productions!  So happy to have found it on DVD.
I saw the movie years ago, enjoyed it, have not yet viewed my DVD, am going to watch it with a neighbor soon.
This is a pure delight for anyone who likes Singin' in the Rain
I wish there was a 10 star rating. Loved it! Loved it! Loved It!.
Stunning restoration... the movie's great and the colors really pop. You won't believe this movie is 60-plus years old. It looks brand new.
Beautifully done! They did a wonderful job with the picture and sound! I am extremely happy! The extras on here are a lot of fun to watch.
One of the best movies ever made!  Includes Donald O'Conner's famous &#34;walk up the wall&#34; scene, and the title dance by Gene Kelly.
Grandddaughter adores this movie as she is a great dancer herself.  On a dismal NW day, what could be better than this movie and some warm cocoa?
It has been a long time since I have seen this movie and it really impressed me. I had forgotten how great Donald Oconner was
The only thing better then this is the huge collector's edition that even includes an umbrella. Any musical and Gene Kelly fan needs to own this.
How nice to watch an happy film from beginning to end. It is full of great performances from all of the stars in it.
A favorite at our house! Good price, fun for the whole family, made a great present! Debbie Reynolds and Gene Kelly! Just makes you feel happy!
What more can you say? This is one of Gene Kelly's best rolls, acting, singing and dancing in the rain.
The PQ and AQ is quite amazing and I would rate it a 5 star out of 5 star.Only wish it had more extras on Blu.
love watching it, never get tired of it, very cute story line, they should make more. Very nice movie. Thanks
Love this movie. Great correlation of professionalism & fun.Debbie, Gene, Donald are the bees knees. The cat's meow.Thanks
This blu-ray came in perfect condition. I am glad I purchased it and have already watched it several times. Good value.
I didn't know what to expect with blue ray of this very classic movie, but it was awesome.  My niece loved her present.
Spoiled myself and bought the movie. It's wonderful to watch and the music is great. Great quality movie time, wonderful!
There is a reason it is the best musical film of all time. You don't see talent like this anymore. Never gets old!
How can one not enjoy this great enhanced reissue. The singing and dancing and the hit scene is just wonderful!
had alot of laughs it is a very interesting musical, fun for the whole family sound quaility though wasnt that great, but still worth it.
Another great movie that has been remastered and it of good quality.  I would highly recommend this blu ray to all.
I haven't watched this DVD yet, but it looks to be in excellent condition.
this movie is a great classic of all times. gene kelly and debbie reynolds are two great performers. need to see it.
I love musicals and Gene Kelly.  So I had to to have this now that its in blu-ray.  Glad I bought it
Stroll down memory lane with an authentic old time broadway musical, before full orchestras gave way to synthesizers.  Classic song and dance
Singing in the Rain!  What's not to like?  Great talent, great music, great fun.  And our grand daughter loves it.
Excellent movie and very enjoyable to watch. Wish there were more like it today. I recommend for all to watch.
If you've never seen this before, you owe it to yourself. Just a great, uplifting movie. One of my favorites.
the blu-ray version is awesome, combined with the one of the greatest dancing musicals of all time makes it more awesome.
If you like good old movies then this a good one for you. Try it you will love it. I recommend this one and I have added it to y collection
Best musical ever made and even better in Blu Ray. I love watching Donald O'Connor dance sequence in this movie. A must for any fan of musicals
This has always been a favorite and Gene Kelly is one heck of a dancer.  The story may be old fashioned but it is still entertaining.
Dated, but still fun. Gene Kelly is a pleasure to watch.  He is a great dancer and very charming. The rest of the cast is good too.
It is such a fabulous movie!  I never get tired of watching it (especially Gene Kelly's &#34;Singing in the Rain&#34; number!
This may be one of my favorite musicals.Really was easy to download and looked frankly amazing in HD.My children loved it too and they are 8 and 10.
it came here in great shape i choose this rating it is one of the best musicals ever made, great cast i really enjoy Gene and his co stars.
Just the right thing for my 90 year old uncle.  He, of course, remembers the film from it's original release.
Excellent DVD.  Classic.  Bought for a Christmas gift and could not part with it.  Packaged well and shipped promptly.
Very funny, songs that won't get out of your head, and a transfer that is to die for. You will love this movie if you like to smile!
No way you couldn't love this movie.  Bogie is so smart, Bacall is so gorgeous and smooth.  Not true to the book, I understand, but great fun.
What can I add to this awesome classic but to say that I loved it!  You can't beat Bogart and Becall together in a film.
Purchased for my husband and he loves them.He watches movies again and again, so well worth the cost when you have a movie buff.
This is a wonderful movie! I love Humphrey Bogart and Lauren Bacall together and this movie doesn't disappoint. I absolutely love this!
Come on, don't their names say it all?  You don't have enough stars to rank this wonderful duo in their great films.
I looked for this dvd for 2 years. It's Bogey and Bacall's first movie together (and I think their best).
In my opinion, one of the best movies ever made.  Bogie and Bacall all the way.  A true love story.
These two teamed always work.  I never did see why she fell for him in real life, but it takes all kinds :)They work well together in movies.
It doesn't get any better then this,except maybe (Casablanca.)  Humphrey Bogart and Lauren Bacall really turn it on in this one.
Love old movies and love this set. Really worth having especially now when you can't rent movies. The old movies really were the best.
What's to say?  Bogart and Bacall.  Great story, on a great DVD, and at a good price.  Winner all around.
Bogey and Bacall need I say more. If your a fan of old movies like me this is a must watch.
Bogie & Bacall light up the screen. This is Hollywood Royalty at its finest. All the films in this set are great
Bogie and Bacall?  a great addition to your library if you like old films and bet you'll watch more often than you think!...
This was their first movie together.  It has intrigue and suspense.  All the characters are interesting.  The setting is on a remote island.
The plot is very close to Casablanca, but still very entertaining.Bogart and Bacall are a classic!  Must watch this movie!
great old movie, bogie and bacall were a great team.  Would highly recommend the movie to those that like oldies
Movie was a classic Boggy n Bacall. Great!  Streaming was finally excellent and couldn't say how I appreciate that.  Thanks Amazon!!!!!!!
I highly recommend this film.  It's a great drama.I'd give it ten stars if I could.
Arrived in perfect condition.  Case was perfect as well as the disc.  I have no idea what else to say. Lol!
One of the greatest films of all time. Bogart and Bacall. Was you ever bit by a dead bee?  'Nuf said.
They coulda used a stump for leading man. Bogart is great but Bacall totally walks away with this.
bogart and bacall, what can you say about the perfect on and off screen couple, i never get tired of seeing their movies
As a die hard fan of Humphrey Bogart I must say this is an excellent collection of his films.
Dark passage was new to me.  It was OK, but the others are real classics.
One of the all time great classic movies.... what can I say that hasn't been already said ?
Bought this as a gift for my father-in-law for father's day. It came quickly and looked very nice. It was a good price as well.
This is one of my favorite movies with Humphrey Bogart. This movie is timeless and I watch it over and over.
WHAT A CLASSIC!!!! Now on Blu Ray makes it even more enjoyable!!!!!One of the All Time Great Films!!! Walter Huston steals the show!!!
I love Humphrey Bogart movies! And it is one of his very, very best. Great story about greed and consequence.
This movie is funny and terrifiying both. &#34;We don't need no stinking badges &#34; is a classic line from this movie.
A classic movie and one of Bogart's best, everyone should see it. Many good quotes from it. It is a timeless movie.
It's a great movie worthy of 5 stars!  We are glad we took the time to watch it.  See it and you will be glad you did.
Back when films were well thought out this was wonderful -- it still is.  It is for adults, NOT PG and possibly NOT PG13.
A very good me, of course Humphrey Bogart was one of the best actors.  Jeanne
We don't need no stinking badges!If you don't know what I'm talking about then you know nothing about classic movies.
This is truly a classic Bogart movie.  One everyone should have in their collectioin if you are a Humphrey Bogart fan.
Bogart is a great actor that had wonderful parts and made then better, He made his character real and different even though it was Bogart
I think it's his best performance...over The African Queen and The Caine Mutiney..and he didn't even get a nomination.Hollywood hasn't changed...
Great classic western. Keeps you thinking. If you like westerns of old this is a must see. Teaches a good lesson on money too.
JUst like Casablanca and African Queen, if you have even the slightest interest in film history, this is a must-see and must-own. End of story
High quality DVD that gave us the famous line &#34;Badges!! We don't need no stinkin' badges! A John Huston directed ultra classic.
It is one of a kind. Everything fits perfectly.  I never tire of watching this great one of a kind classic.
This is a great movie, one of his best.  In the beginning he plays a regular guy, but before the end he is a real jerk.  Engrossing movie.
One of Bogart's best and a great treatment in the re-mastering.  A must have for any movie lover.
James Cagney at his best!  He put the G in ganster. Besides Yanky Doodle Dandy this is one of James Cagney's greatest movies.
I saw "White Heat" years ago and it made me a James Cagney fan. He is great in this film!!Too bad they don't make movies like this anymore.
there is no one like the old time gangsters and classic b&w; movies.cagney is a naturel in the movie.
Great movie.  It's also great to be able to find those hard to find classic movies in an easy to use format.
The first time I saw this movie I wanted to see it again. James Cagney is excellent. The ending is magnificent.
I remember when this came out in the theatres.  My son's received this movie as a gift.  I know they will like it.
Good suspense thriller that demonstrates that you do not need a megabudget of special effexts to make a good movie
very suspenseful, well done & well acted.  Tom Selleck had his first part.  I was on the edge of my seat!!
A great suspence movie I been looking for. Nice to find this.Everything as promised. A very cute Tom Selleck has a small part at the beginning.
Excellent Sci-Fi movie.Alot of well knowen actors in this movie as they first started out in  Hollywood.See if you can pick them out.
I have seen this movie several times over and over. I am glad it came out on DVD. It's one of the best movies ever made .
I ENJOYED ALL THREE !!!!!! LOVED RICHARD ROUNDTREE, LOTS OF ACTION , SOME FUNNY MOMENTS TOO, GLAD TO ADD TO MY COLLECTION.
I was very pleased with the order and will continue to order from Amazon, everything went smooth and the order came as stated no problems.
one of the greatest actors in the world i have all of these movies and when i have a movie nite this is one of the movies i play
It must have been great, look out for the re-make coming soon.  I'll stick to this version.
I like this movie collection because Shaft took charge of every situation that was put before him.He was an associate of NYPD.
classic movie from the 70's era, roundtree portayal a true private investigator protecting the rights of his clients to the bitter end.
Shaft undisputable. This man wore leather like it was his skin. Richard Roundtree is a great actor of all times.
Gave this to my cousin, who has always been a Shaft fan.  He loved all three movies and watched them while traveling.
Mr cool. Shaft is a cool movie. Glad i got the set.  Which they could have made more Shaft movies.
This is one of my fave movies and I loved having each copy in one package. A great buy for any fan.
I have added this movie to my collection of classic movies I've watched growing up.  I do like this movie very much!
The stage play transmits well to the Screen and who can do it better than Cary Grant and a host greats?  This Classic IS a Classic!
A favorite movie of mine and a great Halloween feature. Cary Grants comedy just makes his great looks even better.
One of my favorite movies.  Keeps me laughing.  Cary Grant isn't the debonair leading man this time but a funny fellow.
Cary Grant and a marvellous cast and script - its fast and furious comedy from start to the brilliant finish.
Great movie, everyone should see this one.  Watched it with my grandchildren, they loved it from 14 to 4 years old.
I love this movie.  It is a good movie for the family and very funny.  A good addition to any library.
this is  really nice capes movie.  can be enjoyed at any age.  it still makes me laugh.  it has some good funny parts.
Cary Grant is unforgettable! I can watch this movie over and over and never get tired of it. Everyone needs to own this one!!
Funny movie. Love these old movies they are just great.
Clean comedy at its best. If you like the old films that are funny, clean and family friendly, this is it.
Frank Capra was terrific with movies he made and this one is hilarious.  The idea, the stars, the laughs -- it doesn't get better than this!
One of all time favorites!!!  I watch as often as I can.  I never can get too much Cary Grant
This is a wonderful movie, one of my favorites.  And it was a joy to find it on DVD.  Service was quick.  Product is as advertised.
I received the movie in a few days in plain wrapper, but the quality was excellent.  I will look for this seller again.
cary grant is so good in this movie. its so funny. all kind of thing happen to him.you just need to see it. to find out what I mean
an interesting story of a crazy guy in a crazy family in a crazy town with crazy relatives, I need
I am not much into older movies at all, but this is one I could watch more than once and enjoy it every time.
I have never found any movie that Gary Grant made that I did not like, this one was very funny.
If you haven't seen Arsenic and Old Lace you are really missing out.  One of my favorite Cary Grant movies, and that really is saying something!
Any time you're feeling blue, this will cheer you up.First saw it as a child and still laugh every time.
It's fun to see  Cary Grant in a less-suave, polished role. I've wanted to see this movie for years and am glad I did.
We don't have many actors like these any more.  Brando and James Dean were unique; this film is packed with hard working, great professionals.
This has to be one of the best early Hollywood Screwball Comedies.I could watch it over and over.Cary Grant is just perfect.
Good video no problems funny movie came as described...A+ thanks...I still don't mind watching old movies on VHS...Cary Grant Rocks
The movie is great, and came just as described.  There were no problems of any form with it.  I was pleased.
This old classic is such a fun movie. It is one of my favorites ever. I watch it again every couple of years.
Have loved this movie for years. All of the actors are great. A good sunday arvo movie or on a rainy day.
A classic.  Good price and a good value.  Priced where all dvds should be.  One that you have to own for your collection.
Love old movies!!!! always loved the old movies they are clean and fun no violence humor is great makes your troubles go away!
One of the great classic comedies of all time.  The DVD presentation is flawless.  It's unfortunate there are no extras.
Cannot go wrong with Cary Grant in this crazy comedy.  Love to watch it during Halloween.  The old ladies are too much fun. Highly recommend.
Underated Halloween movie. You can't beat the cast and the quick funny story. Moves fast and is funny. Try it in Oct
Cary Grant is timeless. Such a great movie; the Aunts are cute as can be! Ward Bond is in it before his Wagon Train days.
I have loved this movie for years and still get a kick out of it. Carey Grant is at his comedic best!
Not to be missed. I had the video but needed space and bought the DVD. Such a funny film, Classics stand  the test of time
The best dark comedy that I've ever seen. Everyone I know that have watched it love it. Oldie but goodie. See It.
I had watched this movie years ago, but had to have it because, you know, Cary Grant is a No. 1 actor! The movie is hilarious.
It's a movie about little old ladies who poison people! But I still love it and my whole family likes to watch it together.
This movie, even though old, is fast-paced and funny.  We keep it as part of our Halloween cannon.  It is great for the parents.
Finally watching this on disk was nearly as much fun as playing in it some 30+ years ago What fun!.
i just love this movie. it is  just as good as i remember it to be. thank you so much
Great movie. Bought it for husband and he absolutely loves it. Great price also. would buy more if they are all that price
This is a terrific film. It's Cary Grant at his goofiest. If murder can ever be light-hearted, this is where you will see that
I AM AN AVID SCIENCE FICTION BUFF.  THIS IS A TRUE 1950'S SCI FI CLASSIC.  THIS IS A GOOD MOVIE ALSO.
Excellent work by Disney. Walter Pidgeon has his role now pat and Robby the Robot is a scene stealer. I highly recommend this to any Sci-Fi fan.
The planet of Altair 4 is home to Robbie the Robot and its creator and his daughter.  Quite possibly the best sci-fi movie in the 50's!
It was good the first time I saw it, even better this time.  And now I can see it any time I want.
Forbidden Planet is up there with War of the Worlds, and other classic sci-fi flicks.  I particularly like its sound effects.
Wish they made them like this still.  DVD colors are good and excellent quality.
Sww this movie when it first came out in the theater.  Loved it then and love it now. A true SciFi classic.
Collecting old sci-fi movies these are movies i saw as a kid.  I love watching this and remembering my childhood days.
What can i say about this classic besides Breath taking and ground breaking. The effects and acting remain relevant decades after it was released.
This is a great sci fi movie.  Not to be missed by anyone who loves this genre. Leslie Nielsen is great in this.
LOVE the special effects of this movie, Is great for all times. All audience movie. Hope you like it as I like it. Roberta from Hamden, Ct.
&#34;Forbidden Planet&#34; is arguably the best sci-fi movie to come out of the 1950's and maybe one of the best ever.
great story of the Tempest a la Sci Fi framework. Never tired of watching this film. The robot is always the favorite part.
in outer space science fiction, there are many strange worlds, planets and adventures that await the readers imagination. It's fun.
This is a great old movie that is treasured. This is watched over and over and will be viewed for many years to come.
Product was in excellent condition when it arrived. Quick turn around too! Would deal with merchant again!
Childhood memory favorite, it was wonderful to enjoy this again and it brought me back to my childhood with happy thoughts!
Was very happy with both the quality of the DVD and the service.Item shipped very quickly and am 100% satisfied.Would recommend this vendor.
Transfer to Blu Ray is great. Very Classic Sci-Fi movie of it's era. You will not go wrong in its purchaseBeware the Id.
Absolute classic science fiction classic. Leslie Nielsen, Walter Pigeon, Robbie, and Ann Francis make for a truly believable and engaging story.
This movie is one of the best older science fiction films of all time. The DVD is great and the purchase is well worth it.
This is absolutely My All Time favorite......How does one fight the Idd, how does one fight a whole world of Idd?
This is the first of the best SF. Has the best of the past and the future GOOD movies learned from this one.
A great movie and I love the blu-ray format. Still a classic after all these years that belongs in any sci-fi fan collection.
I always like his comedys and this one is a great one to get if you like his early work.
Great movie that proves that you do not have to use illiterate language (profanity) to get your point across, loved it.
It's an old movie that I remember when I was younger,it's a classic.Have not looked at this copy yet but it should be nice in blue-ray
Great to have a favorite movie in my collection at long last.  Enjoy the extras.  Made an afternoon of ironing  a real pleasure.
LOVE THE MOVIE.  IT HAS BEEN A FAVORIE FOR MANY YEARS
SURE TODAY'S SCI FI MOVIES ARE GREAT AND WE LOVE THEM, BUT THEY ALL STARTED FROM MOVIES LIKE &#34;FORBIDDEN PLANET&#34;.
The Blu-ray DVD is an excellent reproduction of the original, visually stunning. The audio tracks by the Barrons sing out in pristine form.
A favorite movie growing up and now I've introduced it to mine an they love it.  A definite keeper for our video library.
BluRay was made for classic SciFi movies like Forbidden Planet. If you love this movie you have to get it in BluRay! the detail is amazing.
A true cinematic masterpiece. The rendering over to DVD is perfect in every way. worth every single penny I paid for it
One of the great 50s science fiction movies with very good actors. Beware the &#34;ID&#34;. It scared me the first time I saw it with my dad.
Excellent movie enhanced with lots of bonus features.  Forbidden Planet is the grand daddy of todays blockbuster sci-fi and fantacy movies.
Good Sci Fic film. There should be more films like this.
Forbidden Planet DVD is excellent.  The DVD was received in excellent condition and before scheduled delivery date.
This is one of the greatest Sci-Fi in its time. I love Robby, the Robot. The story line is great. It was done very well.
Love this classic movie. Watched this with my mom when I was young. This is what good sci fi is all about.
Great scifi classic to add for a collectionThe bonus dvd portraying more of Robbie the RobotAre great too
I have always liked Forbidden Planet.  It on one of my favorite science fiction movies.  I watch it every so often.
This is one of best sci fi movies I have seen for its time it is the best I have seen.
Great stars, great acting. A very good story line and the people to make it work make for a wonderful Sci-Fi flick for the whole family.
Forbidden Planet was a great movie for cheap entertainment. The special  affects were pretty good also. A nice movie to add to your collection.
Been a long time since I've seen it the first time.It's just as i remember and not being interrupted by commercials is a good thing.
It's odd to see him play a serious role. I like this old classic and the quality was very fine.
Classic movie.  Remember watching it on Sunday afternoons with my brothers and sisters on the Creature Feature. Just good clean fun.
Had to get on BR, the classic Sci-Fi of all time, Spielberg wants to make again. I remember saving cereal coupons to get free ticket.
I love this movie as it was the first sci fi movie I saw which attracted me to science fiction
Great movie!  it was in great condition My brothers b day present.  he loved it  and had been looking for it
it looks better today than it did 40 years ago when I first saw itwell worth it will watch many more movies
A classic that I've enjoyed from my youth. It is great to seeit again and to share with friends.
Great movie movie for the whole family. The special effects on this film were groundbreaking for their day and are very good even for today.
this is great and i love some of these old syfy with robbie the robot and how they made these movie a neat for there time
The first big budget Science Fiction movie, and one of the best.
The 1st really big color sci-fi movie. The acting is campy in parts, the special effects for the time are spectacular.!!!!
Anne Francis.Sci-Fi classic.You've probably seen this movie over NTSC, which doesn't do it justice.Blu-Ray does. My whole family was amazed.
What a fantastic movie. It has all the colors of the past age. An excellent collection in the Captain Kirk library.
This is a great old Si Fi flick.  Funny to see the old actors being dramatic.  Hero gets the girl in the end.
Grew up with wholesome sci-fi like this - always good to revisit classics and compare to today's high tech productions.
Love this movie from the past. Very well done for the year it was created. Should be any sci-fi fans
I never have seen a more funny movie than this one. It has always been one of my favorites. I am so glad I was able to purchase it from you all.
Another wonderful old musical with a wonderful cast.  Scenery is gorgeous and the music is wonderfully nostalgic.  Don't miss it.
I bought it for my birthday.  A true musiccal classic you can watch many mes.  I highly recommen it.a good love story.
AND I STILL ABSOLUTELY LOVE IT! As a kid, I could enjoy the music. As I get older, I can enjoy the humor.
GiGi is such a wonderful classic musical.  The songs, the costumes, the theme, is just great.
The music is wonderful, the period costumes and set are lush, and the performances are great.  Buy it and you can enjoy it anytime you want!
i love gigi. it's one of my all time favs. love the stories, love paris, love the actors, love the clothes. great show!
I remember years ago watching this on TV.  This is so much better in widescreen and HD.  I love it.
This arrived well packaged, and quickly. The musical is a true old school favorite, and it is a pleasure to have it in my collection.
Played it twice in a row, and I've been singing the songs ever since. Thanks for having this in stock.
A must for anyone who is a Leslie Caron fan and I love Maurice chevalier in this he is so French and funny
A very romantic classic coming of age  film. See it when you're in the mood for a good love story and singing.
An enjoyable movie with good music and good acting.  A nice love story with a nice ending.Fun and laughs throughout.
This story does an excellent job of telling how Love converts superficiality and immorality. I'm afraid I didn't see this as a teenager.
GiGi,is a wonderful film.I've watched it for so long,now I own it.It's such a great classic & now in my DVD Library.Thank You.M.McKinney
Great movie with wonderful songs that get into your head so you sing them over and over.  Great movie for a girls night.
I brought my daughter up on old musicals, she loved this movie so I was happy to have found it for her now.
The video plays as seller indicated.  Gigi is a wonderful musical, enjoyable and memorable.  Performances, direction, costumes... all a treat.
love this movie and love the actors in it. will watch again and again will never get bored of this
Some Classics Never get old, they are like old friends you call over on a rainy Sunday morning. View Well!
I am  replacing the copy I already own on VHS. I have loved this movie ever since I was young.
Loved the songs and loved the acting.  Just wish Leslie Caron's dancing was more a part of the story line.
I have enjoyed this movie since I was a child and am glad to have it in my collection.  It's so enjoyable and exhuberant.
Love the story and the costumes.  I love this movie because it is a wonderful love story with wonderful characters.
Perfect performances by the cast and beautiful music.  Romantic and great performances.  A treat for a Saturday afternoon with a big bowl of popcorn.
Gigi is a very good movie, good story, excellent music and acting.  It is one of the best musicals Hollywood has produced.
FYI. An American in Paris, Gigi and Quo Vadis (1951) were releasedin Germany and can be ordered from Amazon.de. PQ is excelent and BDare region free.
THIS WAS ANOTHER GOOD MOVIE BY JOHN WAYNE.  HE MAKES ALOT OF GOOD MOVIE. THE MOVIE WAS IN GOOD SHAPE WHEN I GOT IT. THANKS ALLEN
I have always loved to watch war movies especially with John Wayne star in them he is my favorite star among others
This is a very good family movie, even if it is an older movie. It has been added to my collection for watching again. Thanks, Bobby J.
If your a fan of PT Boats, its a great movie to give you an insight to the men who served on them.
very entertaining war movie; A plus movie; good acting; recommend this movie to anyone who enjoys watching world war 2 movies
This is an excellent addition to both your war movies and your John Wayne collection I highly recommend it as a must watch.
A very realistic movie and stays true to history. Two of the great actors in John Wayne and Robert Montgomery.
yes here is an other excellent story and we are still looking for more more so if monkeys have any that my husband does not have
One of the all time great Horror Movies. Still holds its own to this day.I was impressed,Excellent Picture & Sound for its age. Highly Recommended!
The horror classic Creep show is a terrifying movie that truly stands on its own in the horror movie genre.
I loved this as a child just as much as I do now, Delia, he wants his cake you know!
this movie is an old favorite in our family.  we enjoyed watching it and wanted to relive the experience.  it's a classic to us.
This movie was one that started the whole Crypt Keeper fad. You can't be a true horror fan and not own these movies. I was so excited to get my copy!
I've always loved this movie, it keeps you watching, its scary, gory and interesting all at once, its a must see in my eyes.
awesome movie. make sure you get it single. the one in the 4 works by stephen king is a double sided disc and you cant tell which is which.
I enjoyed the tale in this one on VHS. This one is for any fan of monsters movie or creep show.
I recieved my DVD Creepshow by Stephen King very fast and in GREAT condition. THANK YOU
Creepshow is kind of corny, but some people seem to enjoy it.  If you are a true creepshow fan, you will like this movie.  To each his own.
Loved these shows when I was a kid and still can sit down and watch them and enjoy every second of crazy fun horror they produce.
I could watch Vincent Price in House on Haunted Hill over and over.  This (the Legend Films version) is the best.  Extremely well done.
The remake was excellent. If you have not seen the remake, see it. It actually feels like your watching an old b&amp;w film! Masterful film making.
Saw it at the town movie theater as a young boy and never forgot the scare. Was glad to add this one to my collection.
Fast shipping, perfect condition! Was very happy from start to finish! We have watched this movie many times and so enjoy it! Lots of suspence!
I liked everything about this movie. I remember watching it as a young man. this colorized version is a lot better than the old black&white.
I JUST THINK VINCENT PRICE IS THE MAN OF MYSTERY. I WAS HAPPY TO SEE IT IN BOTH COLORIZED AND BLACK AND WHITE VERSION.
overall it was good to me, but then i am a big vincent price fan, so i know what to expect from his old movies.
Always a great movie, everyone should experience this movie.
Absolutely enjoyable now as it was in the beginning. Classic actors and fun scripting makes it a wonderful addition to our library.
I have watched Brigadoon many times. It is an uplifting film with great music and dancing. It is a classic theme of love triumphs over all else.
I love this movie!  This dvd is in excellant condition and very well done.A remarkable way to treat a dear old classic.
How can you not love Brigadoon.  It's a classic and one of my favorites.  Gene Kelly and Cyd Charisse are wonderful in this movie!!
I love Gene Kelly and the story is good.  The wedding march is absolutely amazing.  I watch that scene over and over again.
I bought this movie because I love Gene Kelly and this is one of the movies I loved him in.
I ordered this for someone else and she enjoyed watching it again. She said she had seen it years ago and decided she would like to buy it.chitownflo
family member enjoyed this movie. work well. could watch it over and over. have lent to other people. would recommend this movie to anyone
This is one of my favorites. I got to see Gene Kelly in a live performance and was hooked on his dancing
This has been a favorite of mine for several years and they very seldom run it on TV.  This is just a real feel good movie.
If you enjoy musicals you should enjoy Brigadoon. Music is wonderful and Leslie Caron is very easy on the eyes. Men could fall in love immediately.
I had never seen this movie before untill I purchased it. I am very glad to own this film. I think many others would enjoy this DVD.
Loved the story with it's timeless appeal.  Such great actors and actresses from the age of musicals.  Great addition to my musicals collection.
Love this movie, love all Gene Kelly movies. Had a copy taped off a movie channel, our own copy is much better,
This is a MUST have for family movie collection!  I love the story, the dancing, singing and story line are timeless and classic.
Love to watch musicals.  Singing and dancing is great in this movie Great to watch when then is nothing on tv.
Only love can pull Gene Kelly through it all. The music and dancing is so wonderful while he finds his way to his true love.
Great Actors, Great Fantasy story.To bad its not that easy to escape evil.But I'll keep lookin for paradise anyway,.....cause, I know its out there.
This is a very nice movie.  The music is memorable.  We have watched it often.  Wish they didn't require a minimum number of words ;-)
This is one of my favorite musicals.  It has a nice twist in the end.  The singing and dancing throughout is fabulous.
For anyone who loves musicals and Gene Kelly this is a great flick - not one of his most well known but certainly a great offering.
I just loved this movie! I can't say enough about it! I have seen it many times and still can watch it many more times....it never gets old.
great story, great stars, beautiful music, interesting dancing, marvelous sets. what more could you ask for?  it's a musical that will last.
He does a great job. All his pictures were good. He dances well and the story line is exciting.Good buy.
Brigadoon was the first play I ever saw in my life.  I have seen it many times in live theater and never tire of it.  The movie version is wonderful.
I am  replacing the copy I already own on VHS. I have loved this movie since I was a teenager.
I love to watch  Jean Kelly dance! I also liked the story. I liked the place where it happened .
I got the video in a timely manner, I appreciate that.  It is one of my favorites.
I love it....its a musical love story. Both Gene and Cyd Charisse were great. Great dancers ! Nothing more to say.
Brigadoon has always been my favorite musical and my favorite movie of all time.  I enjoy watching it every so often.
What a beautiful love story.  It is just what I was looking for and I enjoyed it immensely as it fulfills my movie watching needs.
An all-time classic!!! I remember seeing this movie as a child, and it is still as wonderful as it was back then. A good family musical film.
Loved the singing, dancing, and of course, the music. Cyd C., Gene Kelly, and Van Johnson were perfect together. Highly recommended.
Love the old movies. I think some  of the younger movie makers forget that most people watch movies to escape and to relax. Thanks.
I have always loved this movie and now I have it on DVD.  Its wonderful and watch it every March.
Good contrast between Van Johnson's cynicism and Gene Barry's optimism.  Glad the village reappeared in time for Gene to win the girl.  Happy film.
this is a great movie to have and share with your family.  The purchase went smoothly
Great DVD.  Good quality.  Packaged well and shipped promptly. Good customer service.
The restoration is excellent; they have saved a classic musical.  I loved it!
If you grew up in the 50's to late 60's this movie will take you right back to those good ol' days...  Great acting with a bit of drama and humor...
A real classic movie all the actors are now the best in the bussiness this movie came out when they were young.
Shakespeare's Taming of the Shrew set to music!  Highly recommend!  Iconic performances, great music and dance.  Wonderful feel good movie!
This musical is timeless with great acting and wonderful singing.  Cole Porter music ranks right up there with Rodgers and Hammerstein.
What a fantastic plot (The Taming of the Shrew), music, words, romance, actors and production!  One of my all-time favorites.
Kiss Me Kate was one of the best musicals made by MGM.  Great stars and wonderful music by Cole Porter. Picture and sound was excellent.
If you're into old musicals, particularly comedies, this is the movie for you. It's just good, old-fashioned fun!
Howard Keel and Kathryn Grayson are certainly a well-matched pair. Both have beautiful voices and wills to match! Ann Miller dances up a storm!
I very highly recommend this musical.  It's a realtreat!  I'd give it more stars if I could.
Excellent movie and also comes with extra features and documentaries and a beautiful booklet  excellent Blu-ray  a must for all fans
This is a great movie, and I've loved it for a long time. It was great to finally get it on DVD, and the DVD is in great shape.
I loved watching this great musical again, having watched it when it first aired in a theater.The music and cast are great!
I cannot believe I waited this long to see this movie.  This is Judy Garland at her best.  Everyone should see this movie.
When I saw that this was available, I really wanted it.  I just thought this movie was really good and is one of my favorites.
Love this musical with Judy Garland! If you are new to watching older movies this is a great one to start with. One of my favs.
Exactly what I expected.  Great songs, acting, photography.  The story has a feel good about it throughout. Easy to watch many times.
This has to be one of the best movies ever made.All the great songs, and a young beautiful Judy Garland.It really does stand the test of time.
A GREAT MOVIE MADE EVEN BETTER WITH TECHNOLOGY. LOOKS AND SOUNDS GREAT. NICE EXTRAS ALSO. THERE WILL NEVER BE ANOTHER JUDY. BUY THIS.
I'm a big fan of the old musicals and this is one of my favorites. I recommend it for anyone who hasn't seen it. I love it.
I love Judy Garland and it was amazing to be able to own this movie and add it to my collection :)
A must see every holiday season. This movie makes me feel good as i listen to songs and watch the characters.
great 40's musical--Judy Garland at her prettiest with her penultimate rendition of "Have Yourself a Merry Little Christmas"
I always love Judy Garland movies she is great and her singin  is out of this world. I also loved margaret o'brian in it  she was darling
Oldie but goodie, how do you not love Judy Garland?! Especially at Christmas.  You'll be singing along without realizing it. :)
We love older musicals in our home.  We are always waiting for the next MGM musical and so glad this has been done in blu ray.
My favorite movie. I have seen the movie at least 20 times, but enjoy it everytime. Judy Garland's voice is irreplaceable.
Meet me in St Louis is a classic. Minelli photographed Judy beautifully and the story andcharacters are great. Wonderful feel good movie.
This is one of my favorite old movies and decided I wanted my own copy. Judy Garland in Meet me in st, louis
Love Judy Garland.  Neighbors come over to see the movie with me and enjoy it as much as I do.
I have looked high and low for this movie and was so happy when I found it! It's a great classic movie to watch.
Being from the St. Louis area we love it of course and such quick service.  My sister is really enjoying this film.
Truly  one of the all time greats (if not the greatest)  in musicals.  Absolutely flawless in every way.Don't miss it
great family movie...If you love musicals you'll love this movie...Judy Garland is great..the music and story line is great.A Must see movie..
This is a great classic movie.. for the young and old alike.. the blue ray was good some areas it was not perfect.. but acceptable
This is one of my all time favorite movies - I have it on VHS but it am so glad to FINALLY have it on DVD!
Nobody is better than Judy Garland!!
Everything this young lady touched turned to gold!  Except her marriages . . . but that would be a whole different kind of movie!
I HAVE HAD ALL THESE MOVIES ON VHS FOR MANY YEARS AND WANTED A CLEARER PICTURE SO I WENT DVE IT IS MUCH BETTER. ALLEN
I love musicals and On The Town doesn't disappoint.It's vintage with no special effects but fun and colorful.It's a good family movie.
I am a real Gene Kelly fan, and his two partners in this movie make it one of the very best.
I may be weird but I love owning the old classics I used to watch with my mom. This is just one of them
I had never seen this movie but really loved it when my husband and I viewed it together. A great classic for the whole family.
This is a Christmas Gift to my Husband. Happy to have found the DVD on AMAZON.COM. Thank you for offering it! genewalsh01@aol.com
I love musicals and with this show you couldn't ask for better actors, music, and dance numbers.  Thumbs up on this classic.
Lots of good music, good acting, fun story, good sight seeing of New York City, and a great cast working well together.
This is a charming little film. Too bad Vera-Ellen didn't rise to the heights she deserved--what an incredible dancer she was.
On the town was so much fun to watch and I loved the musium secean and I can't wait to watch it again
2 of my best actors together enjoy it and love it recommend it  would like to have it in DVD and in color
This is a very enjoyable and laughable movie starring two great actors. Cagney and Davis. The entire family can enjoy it.
Enjoyed another Oldie.  Just don't make movies anymore.We are glad we have a well round collection of oldTV series and movies....
Cagney is always good in anything he does. Lot's of action in this one with great stunt work. Loved it.
Tough, gritty, slick only Cagney could pull it off.  Good story line on a man helping out his unsuspecting friend.
This was a birthday gift.  I had never seen it.  Excellent movie.  My husband was very pleased with the gift
Love footlight parade! 5 stars for this movie. It is very fun to watch.  You never get bored watching it.
I love anything with James Cagney.  He was a master in playing characters whether good guy or villain.  An exciting suspenseful film.
classic Cagney gangster move with him as the good guy for a change.lots of action.good cast.you can't go wrong.go for it.
I am a big fan of the James Cagney movies, this one being one of my favorites. I would have no problem in passing this on to my friends.
Loved the close, content gave you food for thought.  Abuse is abuse no matter when it happens' watch for fun
Doris day true story of tanager getting her famous in the 1920' s.  I liked the music.  Not that good of romance.
Doris Day was never in better voice.  She also showed that her range as an actress was well developed and wide.  Cagney does tend to overact, though.
Love Me Or Leave Me , it's a very good film , I like it too much.
It is such fun to be able to order from Amazon and build up my collection of older movies. I think this is one of the best!
Great Doris Day and Cagney movie. Don't hesitate to buy it. The colors and sounds are fantastic. Of course the acting is superb.
Where have all the good movies gone? This DVD captures some of the best stars of yesteryear in their best performances.
I never had so much enjoyment with any other movie. I loved reliving the experience of seeing my favorite entertainers.
This is a terrific piece of Broadway Theatre memorabilia!  Definitely buy it. The numbers are terrific!!  John T. D'Alessandro  Ph.D Theater
I don't often watch cartoons but Bugs is more than a cartoon. A brilliant creation that never gets old.
Saw a few looney shorts and found them all on this DVD.  Got for my niece and nephew for Christmas and had to make a copy right away for me.
I always loved the interaction of Bugs and Yosemite Sam. These cartoons are best ever made and terribly funny. This one will not disappoint.
It was so nice to bring a classic to my own daughter. I loved this movie as a kid and she now has the chance to find the same joy I did.THANK YOU!
These cartoons have great music and comedy! They are well worth itwith so much laughter and great sounds, too.
Bought for my great niece  and nephew, they loved it. Much easier  to understand than what they show on TV.
I love Vin Diesel and love this short clipped video of his is outstanding!!! I feel it connects to people on a very human level!
i like the matrix it is a good filmthe actors  a great the computer fx are great
Loved it!  Great action, plot, and even Reeves is pretty good.  If you like action movies, don't miss this!
If you haven't watched the Matrix, I highly recommend it. It's fast paced, action packed, and will really make you think.
I've always thought this was a great movie, even Keanu Reeves does a great job. It's a great movie and very well made.
I've never written a one-line review before, but here goes:  The Matrix is the best movie EVER.
THE BEST MOVIE EVER I WOULD GIVE IT 5 STARS IT'S THE BEST MOVIE
This is the movie that any owner of a dvd system must have. It is alos a good dvd to take shoping for that new home theator!
For a late 90s sci-fi action movie Keanu Reeves gets away with being a star character. The Matrix was so innovative and kick-ass for its time.
One of the best science fictions to have been released ever. Good script, good execution, good acting. Everything is good about the movie.
This is a great movie. I think by now everyone has seen it, if you haven't, check it out. I've since replaced this DVD with a bluray.
The Matrix is an awesome movie. If I ever need a good sci-fi action it is there with open arms.
A wee bit dated now, but still a great story (too bad the sequels were so bad) worth the price. One of those movies I can still watch once a year.
A great movie, a lot of extras and is a digibook, that I love, with pictures and info.That's it.
A great achievement in story, concept, and special effects. An all time favorite not to be confused with its lesser sequels.
Incredible - Saw this in the theater - great special effects, great story, great great great.... :)
From the start to the end,must of seen this movie so many times that I lost count....the sequels that follows too was  awesome
i loved this movie. it has done so much for movies these days. it was awesome and so was the dvd.
trying to re order DVDs stolen during a breakin in texas  happy to find this oneI moved to Arkansas to a safer place
Always a great movie wonderful story line, great graphics for the time and sick fight scenes. not for children some graphic scenes.
...for any collection.  I rank this one up there as &quot;one to become a classic.&quot;
This movie remains a classic with its innovative filming to its imaginative storyline. A great cast of actors who were willing to try something new.
Its a rare movie that you can watch time and again without being bored. Besides if it wasn't that great, why would it be parodied so often.
Fantastic Movie with a clever plot. The special effects are excellent and the acting is also fantastic.
Excellent Movie to watch unreal special Fx Very imaginative plot. This is has to be the movie of 1999. great allrounder
One of the best sci-fi action films ever made.  I was hoping the sequels would be up to the same par, but no.  This is the original classic.
The structure of the movie is perfect.  With its hidden Christian plugs it makes one realize the perfection the film holds.
A classic and in Blu-ray. I had this in the original version and enjoy the updated HD. Can't beat the bass guitar in the background.
The definitive view of the future, this is the best sci-fi movie to be made in decades.  This and Blade Runner and top of the heap in my book!
What a concept! I love the special effects! And it is also capitalizes on the theory of mind over matter.
Dawn good movie best I've seen in year
Excellent movie.The sequels have even better special effects, however their stories and plot  suck.
this blu ray was very well put together. if you give a damn about special features this is a blu ray for you
How to you rate perfection... you can't! Too Good!
Don't feel like writing anything. It's great! I'm hooked! Man, aren't the star ratings enough? Nor two three four five. Great sci fi.
It's the Matrix original, does anything else seriously need to be said. If you like tech and are a action buff then get the movie!
One of my favorites. Had to have it on blu-ray for the upgraded sound. DTS HD Master blows Dolby True HD out of the water.
This movie is pretty cool.. there are a lot of action scenes.  The plot is interesting.  This movie was enjoyable.
The Matrix is a modern cautionary fairytale, with a rich cast of characters and visual images.  Cool piece of cinema!
This movie is a classic, and the blu-ray makes it even better to watch all over again. Go ahead, take the red pill
Easter Parade is one of those classic musicals that stays in your head for days.."in your easter bonnet, with all"...a must have!
Classic movie. Great movie to add to any DVD collection of classic movies.
I love musicals and when I bought this one I already knew I liked it. Love the songs and dances.
I have always loved this movie with Judy Garland but it is even better in Blu-ray.The scenes are so clear .
I mean, Fred, Judy, Ann, Peter -- what more needs to be said? this is probably one of my most favorite movies, I never get tired of it. 5 stars.
Big Judy Garland fan. It is one of her best films. Even the family and neighbors love to watch it with me
A must have for Judy Garland and Fred Astaire fans.  The hobo song was my favorite.  The DVD arrived in great condition and promptly.
Words are not able to fully describe what your eyes will see.Can never, ever, be remade even with an unlimited budget.Fred is Priceless.
areally great movie of all times. watch it every easter. enjoy watching judy garland movies. she is a great actress
A great film!  I highly recommend.  The singing and dancing is wonderful!  I'd give it ten stars if I could.
Loved the music in this movie and the dancing was superb.  Disappointed it wasn't full screen, however, the colors were great.
Nothing better than Fred and Judy, but Fred and Ginger.  And she isn't here.  Another classic film from a classic studio!
Wonderful DVD.  Given as a gift.  Packaged well and shipped promptly.
Julius Caesar is an excellent film that I thoroughly enjoy.  Thanks for having it available to order.  I am very grateful.
I got this product in great time....not for me but haven't heard from the person who asked me to get it for them, so assuming all is well.
This movie Julius Caesar is one of those old movie that you either like or dislike. But I like it, & wanted to have it in my collection.
the day I got the dvd I watch it thank you very much I hope to buy some dvd soon or later
I love Robert Taylor and in this movie he outdid himself.  It is enjoyable and unforgetable.I recommend people to buy it
I received the dvd on time and in excellent shape.I had not seen this move in decades, and it is one of the greats.grace2uDon R. Fauquier
A great DVD transfer was done on this one. This is one of the all time Biblical Epics that Hollywood ever released.
If you are a Christian or not this is a movie that the whole family will enjoy.  Strongly recommende. HD makes this old movie look new.
I liked the restoration and biblical message. Christians today should see how hard it was back in the early church compared to today
My goodness!!!  This is one of the best of all time.  What fabulous acting.  This is a period of movie making when people could really act.
This is one of the greatest movies of all time. Filmed in Rome, it is full of terrific acting, music, sets, and direction.
The story and the photography were just stunning!! I would recommend it to everyone!  The scale of it is so grand.  Awesome!!
Very pleased with the various languages and subtitles this movie offers. Amazing how people in the 50's managed to put these kind of films together.
This is a story of a soldier of spanish descent who was brought into the Roman aena during Nero's reign.  The story is acted very well and exciting.
add it to your movie collection - it is long but very very very well done.... you can't miss on this one
this is a good old movie from the good old days hope you like it ..this is one for the holidays an sundays.
This movie would be popular in any age and any era. It will be popular well into the future. I thoroughly recommend it!!
This is one of the best Christian movies of all times and it is simply ageless. The storyline is very relevant even in this present day and age.
Fantastic movie! Watched it years and years ago and never forgot it. By all means get it. You won't regret it.
Item received as advertised and on time. This should be a must for all ancient Roman movie collectors. Great story.
This is not only a classic, but one of the most entertaining Tony Randall movies ever made. A young Barbara Eden adds to a great story and cast.
I saw this when it first came out on TV many years ago and it blew me away.  Then I read the book it was based on and that was even better.
The movie is as good as I remember it to be.  The shipment came quickly and was in perfect condition.
This film combines the action of a WWII Commando raid film with the intrigue of plot twists and deception only seen in spy thrillers. Very exciting.
Always good to see Richard Burton star in a movie. It s one of those classic movies, you could watch, over, and over and over.
As good as I remembered with a young Clint Eastwood and Richard Burton in his prime plus a fun plot
GREAT MOVIE.  Even though its an old movie, it still holds up.  And the  twists and turns -great!  The commentary etc are fascinatinggg.
My 18 year old son watched it with me and was most impressed with the quality of the picture, sound a special effects.
Great action adventure Burton and Eastwood at there Best good story with a fast pace no dull bits,loads of shoot them up,blow them up ,good stuff.
Bought this for my husband who loves all the World War movies.  Great action and scenery.  Would buy again and watch over.
I like world war two movies and other stuff so if anyone like world war two movies buy this movie
The Action and suspense is unparalleled in the flick - and the DVD quality was so good it made it more enjoyable to watch.
One of the best war movies ever made! Once you watch it you'll watch it again to better understand it, they just don't make movies like this anymore!
ANOTHER OF THE FEW WHER EASTWOOD EXCELLS AND IS QUITE BUT DEADLY ... GRAET PLOT STORY LINE AND MYSTERY ENDING WORTH THE 2 AND A HALF HOURS.
This was purchased as a replacement since I'd practically worn out my DVD copy. My old copy would freeze up and ruin my watching experience
This is an excellent film - a classic.  It is a must watch and seeing scenes from places we have been makes it all better too.
The dvd was exactly as advertised. Fast shipment. I will buy from this seller again
A very well-made and exciting war movie with good script, acting, and actions. Fine score by Ron Goodwin. The 2.35:1 picture is good quality.
This is a great movie. Richard Burton, Clint Eastwood. Great old movie for action adventure. Classis Eastwood movie oldie great!
This was one of my favourite war films, I was so glad I found it. Terrific.
One of my all time favorite War movies, been trying to find this one on dvd for a while. The price was great and the quality was great also.
One of my all time favorites. The cinematography is a breathtaking backdrop to this clasic WWII story
Another great war movie with great actors, action and a good plot.  Really great location for the filming.  I would recommend the movie.
Already had on VHS but wanted to add to DVD library of exciting WW II movies.Loved Clint Eastwoood and Richard Burton.
Absolutely one of my favorite WWll Movies. In fact, I purchased the DVD after I watched it. Great Great Great
Like the video very well, have enjoyed buying products from Amazon over the years. Plus I like collecting these old movies.
Yeah, I sprang forth some bucks just so I could rent this movie and watch WED for the FOURTH time.  That's right, I just love this movie.
A great make believe movie about world war two.Great acting by the stars.Well written and produce.You will not be disappointed.
if ever their was a  great  ww2  flick,  where eagles dare has to be in the top 5,  non stop action and suspense from beginning to end.
One of the Best movies of all time.  Have watched it numerous times and enjoy it every time.  Highly recommend it to anyone.
Movie was in great shape and one we've wanted to own for a while now.  The price was right and the quality as advertised.
This was a great movie as it had some excting action and a lot of surprises.  Sometimes you wondered who the good guys were.  Loved it.
I haven't the time watch it yet.  I enjoyed the movie when it first came on tv.  So I should this one.
excellent film for it's time. brings back many memories of the late sixties when i sat through it downtown Chicago theater 3 times with my friends.
This is one of my favorite military movies.
Can you dig it!  Gotta love the action in this one.  Better than the first one!!!
This movie has always been one of my favorites.  Alex Karras is as good as he was in Blazing Saddles
I enjoyed this movie. Victor Victoria, very much. It was a very funny and interesting movie. I will enjoy watching it over and over again
This is a classic that's been around for quite a long time. It's timeless and very enjoyable. Julie Andrews is great, never sounded better.
This is a hilarious film. I loved it! Julie Andrews performance is excellent. It's better than Mary Poppins if you ask me
Andrews, Preston, Garner and Rhys-Davies....four of my favorite stars!  Awesome story line....singing and dancing too!  A definite must have movie!
This was wonderful when it first came out and still is.  It's classic comedy and stands the test of time beautifully.
Keeps you entertained every step of the way! Film is wonderful it keeps everyone young forever along with keeping you young!
I think is one of the best movies ever, showing a different site of the controvertial life stile. it was superb.
You have Julie Andrews, James Garner, Alex Karis all in one funny movie with great music, how can this be anything but fun for the whole family.
Funny, very, very funny spoof of gay Paris during the prohibition era in America.  This one makes you laugh...a lot.
this is so funny & i can now watch it on dvd instead of the vhs that I had before.
THIS IS A SUPER MOVIE.  IT'S FUNNY, MUSICAL AND DOWN RIGHT HILARIOUS AT TIMES.  THE STORY IS GREAT AND THE CAST IS STUPENDOUS.
Have not seen for a while. But, it is a great movie. Suggest you all see it.I really thin you will love it.
Still funny and entertaining after many viewings.
Is my mother's favort movie of all time. Every time she his here she watchs it and still gets good laughs.
Purchased as a gift for a family member who loves it.
A must see.  Adult comedy.  Julie Andrews was wonderful in this movie. Was exactly as represented by vendor and I would purchase from them again.
I once said I'd never write another review, but I've always loved this movie. Tastefully, humorously and well done movie
great movie enjoyed great picture hadnt seen in long time like Julie Andrews was happy to find it and was a free one to prim
TOO BAD WE DON'T SEE ANYMORE MUSICAL COMEDY LIKE THIS ONE... JULIE ANDREWS IS JUST PERFECT &amp; HER VOICE .....WOW... MUST SEE MOVIE
It arrived on time and I enjoyed it from the very first minute forward.  Very glad that I decided to purchase.
This is another one of my wife collection, we enjoy watching good musicals and not having to leave home to do so!
This was purchased as a gift for my daughter.  She's never seen it but loved the synopsis.  I'm sure she'll enjoy it.
After all these years, it still amuses, even though one knows what's coming.  A delight with Garner and Andrews together in a comedy.
I love this romantic comedy and the music is terrific! One of my favorites! Julie Andrews and James Garner make a great pair!
My wife has been looking for this on dvd for a long time. It's a fun movie just don't know why hard to find on dvd.
A classic movie with Humphrey Bogart and an under rated Ida Lupino. Always fun to watch and share with friends.
Picked it up for a relative and they loved it.
This is an excellent set with a lot of information on Bogy, well worth the purchase price.
Probably one of the best movies that relates to human nature that has become more predominant today in corporate activities.
Treasure of the Sierra Madres. The main characters are as outstanding as I remembered but I had forgotten how good Alfonso Bedoya was!
Some of the best and timeless gangster films that other movies and tv shows pull clips from all the time.
We enjoyed this.  It was a great evening of entertainment.  Great acting.  Good to see Bogey and Bacall back again.
came before promised and a great set of movies that has all the old great ones. a must have. l
James Cagney is at his Gangster best, in this first set of 4. This is a must have to own.
a good movie to watch and have fun and enjoy your self  and have good pictures and watch the actor
If you want the classic Gangster films,that are the Genesis ofthe Godfather,and Goodfellows and the Sopranos this is the setfor you!
One of my favorite old time movies.Always fun to watch. It is a movie that justsucks you right in. Better than any remake ever doneon this classic.
Simple yet full of meaning, much better than any remake done yet.  Love the cast, love the simple use of non computer age special effects
Its the greatest, like you saw it the first time. It hasn't changed, maybe it has change a bit.LOOK OUT PAST, HERE COMES THE BEST!!
Great effects for the 1960's !  Better than the movies they make now.  Color is brilliant.  I found nothing lacking in the movie.
Great Movie and Good Quality Video. if you are looking for a timeless well and Film making at it's best.then this is the movie for you..
I love this old Time Machine.It is definitly one of the classics.It would be kind of exciting to do.
what can I say, time travel, ellio and morlocks!  it is more for the sci-fi nut, but, very Enjoyable for anyone I would think!
It has always been a classic.  Had it on VHS for years and wore it out with family and friends.
this is a great movie classic.  good suspence and even the graphics are great for the time period.  this is movie that you could watch over and over
Excellent movie. I couldn't wait to watch it. It brought back sweet memories of my younger days. My daughter is a fan as well.
My husband likes the remake but also likes the original. Made in a different era, it is more romantic and less violent than current films.
A Great Classic that is loved by many people. I try to watch this movie often. It is a classic to own.
You can watch this film over and over again an still find it entertaining as well as thought provoking! Brilliant!
This has always been one of my very favorite classics. I too am obsessed with time and time travel, so I love it.
this should have been on prime or 1.00, yes it is easier to just watch on the tv but you are still paying interest on credit card
This is a good fantasy movie. Rod Taylor is terrific in his role as is Yvette Mimeux. If you want action and adventure, this is the movie for you.
It was the correct version of a favorite movie, a replacement for the old VHS that had worn out. He watches it several times each year.
Remake of the original classic is a classic in itself.  Great fantasy movie... great acting by all.  A must own movie!
The Time Machine is a true classic film that is an adventure in time, past present and future. I highly recommend it!
Beautiful conversion of a clean film to DVD, nicely presented, well organized, lots of interesting background information.
The DVD is excellent.  DVD was received in excellent condition and before expected delivery date.
My all time favorite movie about a man and his pre-occupation with time.I love the feeling this movie gives you of travel into the future.
A classic movie.  A wonderful movie, yes it may be 40 years old but still very entertaining.  For the SciFi enthusiast this is well worth it.
Oh boy what a classic. I really like this one too. Worth watching. Great special effects in this one. I like Rod Taylor
I loved it better than the newer remake which used Light house lens's rather than crystals as in the original.
I've got quite a collection of classic movies and this one is right up there as some of the best.
Fantastic loved this movie way ahead of its time, you will love it.  Highly recommend to all - will tell friends about it
Excellent movie, a honest look at the first strike on the Japanese homeland after Pearl Harbor.  The casting was top notch and great look at history.
IT's in black and white but very good movie
This is one of my favorite WWII movies ever made.The acting is tops,the dialogue was at times corny.The film itself was and will always be enjoyable.
This film highlights the superb acting skills of several well known actors as well as a very good story line.
Therevwas such patriotism during WorldvWar 2. Btoo bad our country isn't like that now.  Good storyline and good acting.  I recommend it
If you like watching some entertaining history, and feel proud to be an American this is the movie for you.  This to me is a classic WWII movie.
thirty seconds over Tokyo has great old time big name stars in it.not much airplane action though.has a love story touch to it.
A good cast of players and a solid script for this war ear docudrama.  Relates some of the details of the Doolittle raid without too much distortion.
This is a classic World War II movie that continues where the real classic movie Air Force leaves off. This is a must have for real collectors.
Ecxellent Movie - Based upon true WWII events - Thanks
SOME GOOD WAR HISTORY
Into planes and like the Military and war? This one is also a great one to add to ones collection if you haven't already.
great classic war movie. Cannot understand why our 2 governments have lost their memories about what occured back then and cannot get along now.
Great war movie.  Like Spencer Tracy  a lot .  He was a great actor.. The war picture is one of the best.
These kinds of movies are a thing of the past. I wish they would make more of them. Feel good.
This is a gift for my husband who loves classic war movies.  It's a fantastic addition for lovers of war films.
Every American should know the story.Impossible became reality.Highlights decades long struggle between Japan and China.One of my favorites.
Another movie for my husband, another great actor, well produced and a great price. We both thank you very much
A old movie but still great.May be because it comes from True Story.You know what they say.Oldies are still goodies.Peter Stubbs
If you like Spencer Tracy you will not be disappointed in watching this movie which is entertaining and worse keeping
A great film. a portrayal giving us a true insight into an important event in war aviation. A valued addition to my air film collection.
I liked the way they used the end of this movie bombing Tokoyo in the beginning of Midway.  Spencer Tracy and Van Johnson are really great actors.
Van Johnson, does it get any better, WWII and Van Johnson at his finest. The story is true the details hollywoodish, but the movie is great to watch.
Movie is a definite classic.  High quality acting by known celebrities doing what they do best.  Definite winner by any standard.
Book was great the old style action and the strict following the book is great. A good all over classic movie.
She had this movie on vhs so it was time to switch to dvd she was very  happy to get it.
I bought this for her as a surprise, She loves the girls in Full House, And she loved it, Thank you,
Cat's Eye is one of the best Stephen King movies.It's short stories that will flip you out.And it's the first movie Drew Barrymore was in.
My daughter grew up liking this movie, thought id purchase it, so she could add it to her stash of movies.. thanks for having!
Classic film. Pleased to finally get a widescreen dvd version of. Love Stephen King! One of the best works in my opinion.
I saw this film when I was 13, and it scare my so much. The three stories in this film are so brilliant. The DVD delivery was in perfect time.
This is a great movie, I think it was made after the war.Errol Flyn as alwsays, he was superb.
Errol Flynn does an excellent job acting as an officer caught behind enemy lines and suffering major set backs.  This movie deserved an OSCAR.
bought as a gift it is an old war picture worth watching Errol Flynn is classic in the movie of course
high definition quality for a black and white, top notch case and vhs tape would not hesitate to order more
the best movie i watch in along time
the packaging was great.  the movie itself was good, but the book is much better!  I still give it a five stars though:)
Kevin Costner is most realistic in this movie; as he is in most of his other movies. His movies are my favorites
Awesome movie..highly recommend!  Grab a tissue but enjoy.  Great acting in every way.  I'd watch it again and again. Enjoy.
Always a great watch.  Now I know that I will be sad, and I try to prepare.  Still cry every time.  Really touching.
I read this book and I loved it, so I really wanted to see the movie.  I love Nicholas Sparks.
Best movie ever seen wow.. that was a great novel. . It has everything that in areal life story u could imagen. Or want jijiji
This is a great love story. I read the book and watched the movieI love both. I watch this movie all the time , and I cry. Lol. I just love it.
A great Story,  just a sad ending,  But with any other ending, it would have been just another common love storyl
It's good to sit back and relax while watching a good movie like this one.  Anything written by Nicholas Sparks is good.
This is a great movie. Read the book, loved it.Disc in great shape and received it very timely.
I really enjoyed this movie and would recommend it highly.  Great acting and loved the local where the movie was set.
This is a powerful movie that definitely keeps you going to the end!  Be sure to have a tissue handy!
This movie came to me in brand new condition.I remember this movie when it first came out and it is a great movie I am glad I own it.
The ultimate love story sets your imagination running in every direction. And ends like your heart cries out - NO.
Great film my wife and I enjoyed it together. Takes you through many emotions Costner was awesome in this movie.
What a wonderful love story. Kevin Costner was at his best as an actor and the director. Recommend this movie!
I was surprised by the ending, did not expect him to die in the end, very good love story. recommend it to friends.
This is by far one of my favorite movies.  This is definitely not for the weak of heart though, lots of disturbing imagery.
I honestly liked this movie! I remember it from when I was little and knew I had to get it on dvd :P
It might not be the Stellar Original(1959) but I enjoyed it nonetheless, I liked Chris Katan's Role in the movie too.
I REALLY LIKE THE MOVIE. IT`S WORK GREAT AND NOTHING WRONG WITH THE MOVIE THANKS FOR MAIL OUT TO ME
nice price! this a classic if you haven't seen the remake you should check it out :) it was in good shape when i got it.
Love this movie.  It is a true horror movie that does not contain a bunch of sex scenes.  It is truly a classic.
As far as scary movies go this is one of my favorites! Don't waste your time on the original - watch this one!
Great Movie. Perfect packaging. Package was exactly as described. Good price. Other dealers want to charge much more. Very entertaining.
My grandson loved the movie and has watched it several times.Will purchase more as they are available.
Absolutely the greatest movie.  I am 36 and that was by far the greatest movie I have ever seen!
Well done film full of twists and turns to keep thriller aficionados content.  Recommend highly any day of the week.
This movie is a classic, if you're of age I suggest that you watch it! You can't go wrong with Tom Cruise!
got to my house quickly and was in good condition. i also bought spun, requiem for a dream, vanilla sky, and train spotting.
Stanley Kubrick's final film is also one of his best. Eyes Wide Shut is a cinematic masterpiece and a beautiful, dark and strange one.
It just deserves this rating. Great cast, and directors, great sexual stuff, with just the right people. Nice and edgy where it needed to be.
The last movie from Mr. Kubrick. Who cares about special features and all that other crap. It's on blu Ray. Good buy!
beautiful clean transfer and great disc that shows the un-cut movie in its whole.especially enjoyed the extras.
Very sexy movie.  Thought provoking.  Great storyline.  I loved it.  Makes secret societies seem sexy in a dark kind of way.
This movie reminds me of growing up and being out running the streets like Dr. Bill...lol.Enjoy this movie every time I see it
very good movie
The movie was awesome...slow but keeps you on the edge of your seat...The piano music was still playing in my head when I went to bed though.
Very sexual and not for everyone...Some would not like the scenes.....But I like Tom Cruise and thie is &#34;Out of the Box&#34; for him
What an outstanding drama!  I had long heard that this movie is controversial, and this dvd really proved that to me.  Very nice product.
i love craig ferguson. Its the only reason i bought this DVD. I think of this DVD as a collectors item.
It is another movies set back in the old days it is real good one to get your hands on to.
Great film for older children, not your usual &#34;When I was a boy..&#34;  Shows how fragile life can be and how important families
Neve Campbell made this film worthwhile to me... She is absolutely inspiring in her role and the rest just falls into place! Entertaining!
Although its subtext was propaganda (it's interesting in the pro-Russian slant it has) it nevertheless is a good action film.
Always enjoy Bogart and Bacall together.
This is part of my classic movie collection that I enjoy watching and sharing with all my friends and family.
I love this movie! I watched it first on PBS, but it's one of the greatest ones with Bogie and Bacall in it!
I really like a lot about this movie simple good wonderful things about it i highly recommend have seen it 2x now
I love old movies. Bogie and Bacall only made 4 movies together and they are must haves if you like the classics.
This movies has always been one of my all time favorites.  It is a valuable addition to my library.  I love it!
Bacall is sooo smooth, as always!  Well done and suspenseful!  Fun to see San Francisco back in the day.  Highly recommend this one!...G&P
It's not quite the same as Bogie's other movies. It's got that nice Bogie-Bacall chemistry going but honestly is rather odd.
This is a film that I highly recommend.  It's a great story as well.  They don't make them like this anymore.
On time and as discribed.The seller's service was better than the movie.
this is a wonderful movie and the actors are great, but I do understand that leslie howard was a little to old to play this part
R and J is so dope. I'll bet Shakespeare would totes love to watch hoops with me if he was alive today. That would be sick.
This movie was a truely touching movie, I like the way it was set up. the actos/ actresses, and the screen play were great!
This movie is very good and especially heart warming for our family as my husband showed it to the children and loved their reaction to it.
one of the best war films ever made have seen it a dozen times and will watch it a dozen more
the men of world war ii in Bastogne.  it is a great story and film.  it is a great film about American troops.
It was one of the Real non-factual War movies that I have ever seen.The players were all intimate and serious!
I really enjoyed it! If you are a Bat-o-phile - you'll love it too! A really interesting take on the Batman saga.
I WASNT A BIG FAN OF BATMAN BEYOND, BUT I MUST SAY... THIS ONE SURPRISED ME. GREAT STORY GREAT SURPRISE GREAT ENDING. A MUST SEE FOR FANS.
fans of the series are going to like the motion picture.  it has good plot twist and the animations was done nicely
A nice edition to the franchise. This feature in itself is compelling enough just from the title. Fluid animation and GREAT STORY
I love this movie!  This is the uncut version, not the kiddie version that censors a specific scene in the movie.
good movie, didn't like how the joker died though. still excellent
Great movie,a must to see. Robert De Niro, played this part well. It's quite the difference from the gangster movies, he portrays
One of the funniest movies you'll ever see. Loved it the first time andcould'nt wait to see it again and this time put into my classic collection.
this is another of harold ramis' classics, to go with groundhog day and ghostbusters. it truly was funny to see a mobster cry.
This was a very good movie.  I had Analyze That for a long time and now I have bothof these movies.
This is one tape  you won't forget very soon. I say this because of seeing Robert De Niro in a comedy. He just shows he can really act in any part.
This movie is a scream from beginning to end. Easily one of the best comedies of all-time. De Niro established himself as a comedy genius.
Very funny movie. Great storyline, it flowed so smoothly. DeNiro and Crystal played their roles splendidly. I loved this movie.
This movie is hilarious, and a must-see for anyone who appreciates the gangster genre, or just enjoys comedic talent. Worth the time and money.
My husband has always loved this movie and I got it for him for Christmas! Now we can watch for family home movie night
This movie is in my Top Ten favorites of all time.Enough said.I know you are but what am I?
My childhood favourite on DVD! Didn't even know its directed by Tim Burton, not surprised as I love all of his movies!
I loved this movie as a kid, and I still found myself laughing and grinning from ear to ear with all of the silly antics Pee-Wee gets into.
I bought this because I saw it when it first came out. This movie was still hilarious. My elderly father saw it with me and was belly laughing.
Great movie, I enjoy it when I was a kid and still enjoy it as an adult, still want that bike.
Classic Movie ! ! Pure Comedy with Adventure Laughs! !Recommend to watch. Enjoyable for both Kids and Adults. A Must Watch Movie!!
This is a greaat comedy.  Wife and I like it very much.  We keep our copy stored in the basement of the Alamo.
Always a fun movie - been looking for it for a while. Love the Alamo and the pet shop scenes!
Great and funny movie! The scarey clown scene with the stolen bike might scare some young ones so be prepared.
A classic movie and I would recommend to anyone that hasn't seen it or doesn't know what it is or who Pee Wee was.
Fun movie for teens and up. Pee wee does some funny things that you would imagine doing. Get this because it's worth it
This movie is timeless. especially if your sense of humor has a few twists and turns, or you,re a kid....or both.
Loved finding this dvd. I had been looking for ages. The quality was very good.It was exactly what a friend wanted for christmas.thank you
Been a serious Astaire fan for decades, and this is a "must have" if you're into the classic musicals.  Luh-UV it!
Delightful musical for all ages. And the dancing was incredibly beautiful. The price was right as well. And that my friends says it all.
Among the best movie musicals ever. Fred Astaire and Cyd Charisse made an electric dance couple. Funny well made film. Highly recommended.
I had heard this old musical was very good.It certainly is! So glad I can get these classic moviesthru Amazon.
Product was not available and I was promptly notified so that I could make other plans for purchase.
Wonderful film;my favorite kind.  thank you--Joanne
The dancing by Fred Astaire and Cyd Charisse, and the show biz contributions by Nanette Fabray and Oscar Levant make this an excellent DVD.
Fred Astaire is one of the best all time classic dancers. You can see the influence he had on dancers to come. Great movie and plot.
One of the best musicals ever made. From the greatest studio there ever was. See it and you won't forget it.
I highly recommend this musical.  The dance numbers andsongs are wonderful.  It is very entertaining, I'dgive it more stars if I could.
fred astaire and ginger rogers dancing thats what I watch it for. love dancing and expecially freds besides a little bit of bio thrown in
DVD arrived promtly and is in great shape.  Fun movie, but about all those furs the ladies were wearing-ugh.
They dont show this movie enough for me on tv.  glad I have it for my very own.  thank you
Another Humphrey Bogart classic, and again with Lauren Bacall. A great movie that has been re-made and borrowed from a ton of times.
Just a fantastic movie. Great acting, great story, and wonderful scenery of days gone by. Bogie and Bacall had such wonderful chemistry.
Great pairing of two awesome stars Humphrey Bogart is awesome in his role. Along with Lauren Bacall they are the Fred & Ginger of the 40's
Only Bogie could deliver the goods to this degree. First rate cast and script put this Film Noir Classic at the top of the list.
One of the classics placed on a DVD for the Bogart ethnusiast.  Homerun on all counts in the world of Film Noir!
If you like older films and you love Humphrey Bogart, hold on to your hat and enjoy!  It keeps you intrigued!
Bogart and Bacall make for a scorching Film Noir mystery. Classic cinema Gold.
The actually fell in love in this movie.  The two versions of the ending was wonderful.  This was enjoyed by me..
I love this movie.  It has Bogart and Bacall together.  Like  Casablanca, one of the best and one I never get tired of.
Can&#8217;t beat Bogart and Bacall.  One of the great mysteries.  No one plays Phillip Marlowe as well as Humphrey Bogart.
Steeped in dramatic hyperbole, the script is great and these two greats make the most of it. IMHO, I think this tops Casablanca.
Humphrey Bogart and Lauren Bacall headline this fun and fabulous movie adaptation of Raymond Chdndler novel.  A classic - watch it!
This item arrived quickly and in good condition.  This is the best movie ever.
Bogart nails it in every scene. A wonderful movie that morons in Hollyweird could never reach again.
Great movie.  Great movie for kids always.  Was worth the price and the movie was received on time and in good packaging.
Another great classic to add to my DVD collection! Can't wait to watch it over and over with my son!
I always remember watching Space Jam as a kid, so I was excited to add it to our DVD collection at home. Great movie!
very funny movie to watchwas laughing the whole time while watching it.cant get enough of it. Love it
this is a good family movie. reasonably priced. my kids enjoy it.so much better on dvd versus the vhs  tapes.
My son couldn't get enough of this movie when he was little, so I knew I had be buy it for when I have grandkids.
This was one of my favorite as a kid, and still holds up as an adult! I love the integration of the NBA players.
What's not to love about this movie?! I mean really? If you're on the fence just be like mike and do it.
this movie is awesome i love this film. i really can't say much more than that. only that michael jordan rocks in this movie
Perfect movie for children or the 90s kid in your life.  The humor is innocent and the movie is just a fantastic reminder of why MJ is the best.
greatest movie  for any one who likes cartoons and basket ball.  funny and great actors in this movie. good product for the money
A fun video for any age tow atch. Having Michael Joprdan and Bugs Bunny plus his Looney Tunes group made this a fun picture.
This is a fantastic family show. My granddaughter just loves it. She watches it over and over. It is greatly entertaining. A delightful movie.
My youngest son loves this movie. We have had in VHS. Decided to get DVD so that way could take in anywhere at anytime. Glad we did.
YES! What can I say about Space Jam? I can remember watching this movie when it first came out in 1996 and is still the best.
Came super fast, made my girl happy for V-Day, what more can I man ask for?  I have, actually....never seen this movie...lol
One of the best movies of all time!!! Watched this as a kid and will continue watching this with my children for years to come!
Incredible movie! No hidden political agenda, just good, pure fun!  We need more of Daffy, Buggs and the gang!  I highly recommend this movie!
We had this movie on VHS but my child likes it so much that it is worth buying on DVD so we can have it for the years to come.
I loved this movie as a kid and it was so awesome to be able to give this to my little brother on DVD he loved it!!!
i first got it in 1997 when it was on VHS and i was glad to find it on DVD.
This is such a good movie! I remembered watching it as a kid, and when I saw the great price, I had to get it. I'm so happy I have it now!
This came out when my oldest was young. She loved it.I think anyone would enjoy this movie. Has just enough adult humor in it.
one of the best movies that the 90s spit out!! i stll remember watching this as a kid. great movie!!
It is a great movie for the family to set down and watch. I enjoy watching it with my grand kids. It ship fast and I would recommend it to everyone.
I liked this movie because it has some of the looney tunes characters along with some of the retired NBA players in it
3rd generation for grandson. Loves it, and for old school movie...glad he likes it. Good family entertainment. Recommend to purchase.
The movie arrived in great condition and perfect packaging.  I am buying all the Disney movies for Christmas.  My kids will be excited.
My four year old Grandson loves to dance to the music in this movie; we got it for him when he was two ... he's still dancing :)
Space Jam is a classic movie for sure! Lots of fun and who doesn't love looney tunes? I would recommend it to anyone!
My nephew had this and it was not working and that's why i replaced it for him with this one.  He loves this dvd and he enjoys the movie.  Thank you.
Space Jam [Blu-ray] is a good movie to have in your movie collection. If you grew up in the 90's...........you'll remember this movie.
This is one of the movie that the whole family and enjoy and love the sound track to. Just that good.
One for the family great to watch good story the kids with love the toons as well as michael jordon
Arrived in time and good shape. Played for the children. video and audio quality was great and as of course so was MJ
some people may think this movie is stupid but me  i find it funny. watch and see u will like it  2
Love it!! Old, but my young kids love it!! It is a great funny family movie to watch together!  BUY IT
how can you not like this film? michael jordan? bugs bunny? this is the 90s film that was fun for the whole family.
My son requested this on his video list and he enjoys this one tremendously.
One of my boys all time favorites.  I have it on VHS so had to get it on DVD so I can share it with my grandchildren some day.
Jamie Foxx really did his thing in this one. I didn't he had that in him. It prepared us for what was in store with him. Great Movie.
suggest for all. Very good to open the weekend with. Think you should find out for yourself.Enjoy it. Please.
One of my all time favorite NFL Movies.  Oliver Stone did a great job on this one!  I would recommend this movie to anyone.
Star studded cast to this football drama headed by the great Al Pacino. Shows the story of how football can be behind the lines. Excellent purchase.
An  action packed film lots of good fight scenes picture/sound 5 of 5 jet lee good actor kicks ass better then chuck norras
it was the best movie i seen i would say watch it to se for yourselfi would tell all to watch it
This is a good DVD. There are no cracks or scratches. Works just fine. And the movie ain't bad either.
The price was right and the service was prompt.  Thank you for a great business experience.
His character has a little mystery to him.  A little nice, a little dangerous, and the romance part works even without any sex scenes.
this is a great movie and will keep you watching. great story and great acting. very action packed.edge of your seat entertainment
The movie was excellent, and I've wanted the soundtrack for quite some time.  Glad that I found it.  The service was excellent!
Still a great movie after all these years. We like the way the plot is twisting and you don't know until almost the end what is going on.
we have been looking for this movie for a long time. will tell all my friends about you thank-you .
like the movie.this is a old but good movie to watch .i love the price too.i give it a 5
I love this movie has normal humor and my favorite dark humor. The actor just bring you in and make you cheer for bad guys!
This was a very good movie. Bruce Willis and all the other stars were very good. This was a very funny.
All the characters in this movie are so much fun!  Always up for a good comical mobster movie! Great fun.
This movie is so funny.  Bruce Willis and Matthew Perry are great in this movie.  I could watch it over and over again and not stop laughing.
Bruce Willis trying to relive his youth. The movie is very funny and worth seeing. I highly recommend the movie.
I've seen the film before, and the copy I received has exactly what I was looking for.  It was delivered in a timely manner, too.
great flick, clearly a template for many that came later, Michael Caine plays it superbly with understated intensity and the pace is relentless
Before digital editing and easy to create special effects came Tom Thumb.What a wonderful remembrance of easier times...or so it seemed at least.
Well done children's film.  Although it's a bit dated, Russ Tamblyn still shines in this children's favorite.
It woks just great I can not complain at all about my dvd I am a very happy with my purchasethank you
My parents and I love this movie. It makes us laugh, but my parents haven't seen it in years and I wanted to have a movie night with them and show it
I like Clint Eastwood and Sondra Locke together and coupled with the humor, this movie is great!  It is very entertaining.
Excellant movie of Clints earlier days. This is a definite keeper.  I will recommend this to all of my friends
I was in Reno when they filmed this and I love the movie.
Have this in VHS , and now in DVD, One of their better movies, but then most of them are good.
My husband and I watch this movie a lot. It is funny. I had never heard of this movie but I am glad I purchased it. I recommend it to anyone.
I own almost every movie by Clint Eastwood.  This shows a softer side to him.  I had to have it for my collection.  Fast shipment.
No issues with packaging or delivery. Product came early. Love this movie. Funny, funny funny. Clint is typical but Burt is great!
My husband likes this movie and it is a good show and I am glad to have it in our collection.  Thanks.
Clint Eastwood's sense of humor is priceless.  One wonders if he will get the girl in the end, but as usual he does!!
Hard movie to find, not on many store shelves. If you haven't seen it, get it. A very funny movie that adds to my Eastwood collection.
As always Eastwood is awesome in this movie.My husband has all but one of his movies and this is one actor I enjoy watching with him.
Clint Eastwood is one of my favorites this move got to love it there so much more i love to get
Clint Eastwood is my hero!  I cant think of anything he has done that is bad.  Always the tough guy
I was pleased to receive the dvd's so promptly.  Both are like new and the price was very reasonable.
Great movie, I have seen it many times before, but it is fun to watch.Enjoy the Period costumes and story.
CLINT EASTWOOD IS THE MAN. HE IS GOOD IN ANY TYPE OF MOVIES THAT HE DOES. THIS MOVIE IS JUST GREAT.
Its really nice to finally get the dvd I was missing from the dirty harry series. I have already watched it. Thanks Connie
Another great Clint Eastwood movie. Some violence, laughs and lots of action. Guns blazing, fast cars and in the end the good guys win.
Loved the first four movies, that I purchased in a 4 pack edition, so this seals the saga just perfect.
I enjoyed his westerns and his dirty harry movies this one being his last one he did in the series of those movies.
So of Clint Eastwood's best work is the Dirty Harry series. Fun for the &#34;whole family&#34; ;-)Fast, mean and very, very Dirty...
A great buy for DVD format.  Loaded with plenty of background on filming, story, and cast/crew.  A top-notch production for a great movie series.
Arrived on time and a great movie. If you like classic movies this is one for your collection a must have...
Classic Clint Eastwood film. You have to get the other one too. Any which way you can. Great combo movies.
loved the monkey, he overstaged Clint.  Just watching the monkey work is worth the price of the movie, enough said...
My favorite Eastwood movies are those he made when much younger.  Remember seeing this with my husband when it first came out.  Right turn Clyde!
love these movies by Eastwood.  What a bunch of talented actors and a great story . usually watch it several timesper year
Right turn ! and oreo's and cr*pN all over the place. No respect for their elders. Leaving and Old lady all Alone !
It's been a long time since I have seen this movie, but it is still as funny as the first time!
Great Kick your butt movie, and even better with &#34;Clyde&#34; funny moments and a hint of &#34;machismo&#34; Worth a watch for Eastwood fans.
GREAT MOVIE AS I REMEMBERED, CLINT EASTWOOD WAS HILLARIOUS AND SO WAS CLYDE.  PERFECT ON SCREEN COMIC DUO. THUMBS UP.
it was a great movie with a wonderful story line. kept me on the edge of my seat with the action and comedy packed film.
What a wonderful movie,I haven't see in about 20 years,I don't know why I never got it earlier,what a wonderful movie,and so much fun.
This movie is so funny I would recommend this movie to older children  not good for younger children. Due to fighting
i love it  a western movie like up to date western like/and show how beer was cheap in  bars/miss them days/
The Blu-Ray was in perfect shape, arrived as promised and was reasonably priced. Plus the motion picture comedy was very entertaining.
I have always been a Clint Eastwood fan, this is him in his prime of life & you can't beat Ruth Gordon, bless her heart!!
i have loved this movie ever since i was a kid. a true classic :0)
I always enjoy Clint Eastwood movies but this one is what I call just plain fun to watch & full of entertaiment that is what movies are all about.
I don't usually like movies with a lot of violence in them, but this one is great due to the amount of comedy in it.  A good movie for all ages.
Now this is the way I remember the movies. Fun, action, romance. Make my day Clint :) This I would recommend.
I've been trying for a long time to get all of Clint Eastwood movies that I can get my hands on. Thanks to Amazon now I can.
great flick, great acting. theme music by jarre was odd.clint should have oscar'ed for this flick.Toth from Raiders had a bit part
This is a suspense filled spy and adventure film with much intrigue.  I think it's one of Clint Eastwood's best.  Fast shipping.
I love Clint Eastwood movies, I always have. So, this was a treat. Get it, it's a classic. Not boring!
This movie has been around for a long time and it gets better and better every time I see it.Dirty Harry would even like it...
This has always been one of my favorite movies. I've owned it for years on VCR and wanted to upgrade to DVD format.
FireFox is a great classic Clint Eastwood action packed movie. The price was great too! A must add for Clint Eastwood fans.
Great movie...we enjoy any movie that Clint Eastwood is in!!!! Different role for him to play, action packed and suspensful!
Firefox is a very good movie. Clint Eastwood is a top notch actor an does not fail to entertain with this movie. Plenty of suspense.
Clint Eastwood is GREAT whether in front of the camera or behind it I would recomend this movie it's a great additional to any collection!
I really like this movie but I have liked Clint Eastwood since I was a kid watching his westerns.  all the way 10....
I chose this rating because the item met my expectations. I was very pleased. I recommend this item for Clint Eastwood fans.
Classic.  I love Clint Eastwood movies especially when he plays cop roles. This is another classic to add to your collection.
make his day or be a punkIt's Clint Eastwood and he is pretty terrific as a copgo ahead
I've always been a Clint Eastwood fan, now I can add this classic movie to my collection of my movies
Clint Eastwood at his best. Plenty of action and most importantly Sondra Locke as a hooker. Great! Has all the regular Eastwood support actors.
Clint Eastwood at the top of his game.  The movie contains lots of plot twists and ends with a great love story.
I collected Eastwood's films. For me this is not his best, but I still enjoy this.I bought this for my collection.
This was one of Clint Eastwood's finest in the dirty Harry Series.  I would grade it 4 of 5 stars.
I love this film.  I saw it years ago and I am so pleased it is out on blue ray.
A great action pack movie.Plently of shoot em up.Well produce as well written  story.The stars and secondery actors played there parts well.
This movie has twists and turns and is action packed.  Our family can watch it over and over and always love it
We're working on completing my husband's Clint Eastwood collection.  This makes a great addition to that collection!  Glad to have found it!
I love this movie. If I didn't, I wouldn't have bought it. I would have rented it first. Anyway, the movie is great!
We love watching this movie at home. It never gets old and I can't wait to watch it over and over again. Such a great movie!
This is an AK-47.  It is the preferred weapon of your enemy. It makes a very distinctive sound when fired at you.
it is an excellent movie.  I really love Clint Eastwood in anything he does practically. it was very funny. thanks
I loved this movie from the start of watching it, I love Clint Eastwood and this movie was just awesome!
While this movie may not be an award winner, it's still great. I love Clint in this, &#34;Improvise, adapt, overcome.&#34;
This is one of my favorite all time movies of Clint Eastwood.  He's funny but serious and that is what makes this movie.
Very, very good movie!  Can watch it a hundred times and never get tired of it!
Husband was in Marines so bought for Christmas.  Happy I did even though older movie still great and good price
CLINT EASTWOOD IS AN AWESOME ACTOR AND PRODUCER, THIS IS ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES. I KNOW I HAVE WATCHED IT 20 TIMES.
I love this movie . It is a classic . The shipper had it to my house in plenty of time . It was as described . Great movie !
It may not have been a blockbuster, but it is a great little movie. I'm happy to have it in my movie collection, in the Clint Eastwood section...
Good old tough love for the enlisted personnel. Funny and poignantGreat on a rainy day indoors or any other type of weather.
This is probably one of the best Clint Eastwood movies I have seen. It's classic and so well done.
I like the fact that Eastwood did his own singing in this movie.Who would have known he could sing.
Kevin you are so freakin hot in this movie an play soooo coollll and you are cool to the kid great movie nobody knows about~~~~~
No, it's not a perfect world and we need to remember that whether we are living it or not, someone is.  Good movie forpreteens and up.
i liked this movie alot but it was sad at the end but kevin costner is great do not  recall ever seeing the little boy play in any thing
Costner like you have never seen him, gritty and a bad boy.drive with him in the tima machine and as he meets his end with a M-14.
Loved this movie. An great feel good movie. Kevin Costner always delivers an outstanding performance and does so in this. I loved it
Even though this is an older film, Costner shines in his role as a man on the run, hunted by Clint Eastwood and Laura Dern. Don't miss it.
We like Kevin Costner and this movie was one of the best. Very entertaining and we will watch it again in the future.
This was a different kind of movie for Keven Kostner a good one too  a a a a a a
At time a heart stopping film. Great actors, and a fun plot. Charlie and Clint act well together.
Clint Eastwood what is not to like. Charlie Sheen is a bonus.
another great movie from Clint and Charlie...it has it all and a very good movie love watching it all the time
Great movie, Great quality!  I will suggest this move to all my friends and family and my coworkers.  Buy this movie
Love this movie always good to watch and to add to my movie collection have alot and still want more and on the way to changinging all my vhs over
Lots of fun, I never get tired of it. Even if it's a little dated, fashon-wise, Clint's performance is timeless!
if you like clint then this movie is for youwatch it 3times good story lots of action2.99 24 hrs rental
It's got everything I love in a movie, great  story, great cast, and great excitement. I can watch it over and over and not get bored.
My personal opinion is that this is one of his best.  Full of action and suspense.  You'll not be dissapointed watching.
One of Clint Eastwood's early ones...very, very good.  SCARY!!!!! Great acting especially the young ones.  Recommend to anyone.
Clint Eastwood always appears in movies with a lot of excitement, mystery, and drama.  There is always a meaningful message.
I purchased many of Clint Eastwoods movies and this one ranks at the top!! Must see for the die hard Clint Eastwood fan!!
This is one of my brothers favorite movies. I had to get it for him. They don't make movies like they use to.
I hadn't seen this show since I was a younger and wanted to watch it to only find no one had it to rent! It's a funny show.
Good movie good acting love Mariel Hemingway if you love warewolf movies this is a good add to your collection thanks amazon.com.
This movie to me is funny and very good for kids, to me I watch it every chrismas making it traditonal to ma and hopefully to you too.
I know the song is hokey but you have to love any program where the main characters' last name is "Spankenheimer." It has a good message to it.
A joy to watch. Keel and Day are GREAT.  Great music, great voices and great entertainment.  I just LOVED IT.
I'm so happy this is available and on dvd! I love this movie! Every once in a while I hear the songs on the satellite music stations. Yeah!
I love the old musicals and Doris Day and Howard Keel are fun to watch in this one.  A really fun movie to watch.
If you're a Doris Day fan and love music, you'll love this. Guaranteed to make anyone laugh. Love Howard Keel. Great muscial
These are all Musicals which to me are always enjoyable and can be seen and re-seen overand over again!
A delightful, timeless musical that is pleasant to watch over and over and over again. Love it.  Musicals should come back, they are so uplifting.
If you like old movies, this is a classic. A little politically incorrect regarding Indians. Other than that, the writing is pretty entertaining.
I like the stars in this movie and I enjoy the singing and the romantic story.It is a lighthearted comedy and musical which I enjoy.
I BEEN LOOKING AT THIS MOVIE EVERY SINCE I WAS A LITTLE GIRL I LOVE IT THEN AND STILL TO THIS DAY. EVERY ONE NEED TO SEE THIS MOVIE.
Another good Doris Day movie. She makes a good Calamity Jane. Good music and good story line. Fun to watch.
Calamity Jane.  Love the old westerns like this.  Very intertaining and would recommend it to friends.  Would buy another if it were to get damaged.
Have loved this movie since I was a kid, and enjoy watching it every fewyears....nice on a rainy afternoon with a bowl full of popcorn!!
Doris Day and Howard Keel are excellent singers, and some of the music in this film is still popular today.
Item arrived as expected with NO scratches, tears, problems, or hassles. Great story. LOVE Doris Day in everything. Great transaction. Thank you.
What a flash of old Hollywood. The &#34;Indian Scenes and songs&#34; are offensive. Still Day and Keel are great. Loved Howard Keel.
This is one of the classics.  I had seen this movie a long time ago and when I saw it on Amazon, I bought it.  We really enjoyed watching this movie.
its one of the war movies i really like and the pt 109 would be my 2nd choice to this movie
the movie speaks for it self, it is a great plot, charaters, actors , oddball my fav, what is taking you so long to oder this but now!
I've always liked this Movie with it's well known list of Actors that play Key Parts in the Movie..Great Movie !
Just a great, fun movie. Never tire of watching. Easy to watch and of course it has Clint Eastwood! Sutherland is a kick.
Great cast, a whimsical story line with some serious moments and overall very entertaining. Easy and fun to watch. Wonderful cinematography.
Ok, I put it in the title, do I need to say more ? Well I guess I do because the review requier's six more word's !!!!!!!!!!!
Really  Kelly's Heroes a Great Movie to have . Clint Eastwood  and more are in this goof ball comedy about bank that has gold in it.
Ever since I saw it in college I have loved to see this movie.  I cannot tell you why, but it hits a note with me,
Kelly'heroes is one of the funniest war movies around. It is a must see movie for war movie buffs.  fcoldshower1I bought this movie at amazon.com.
I think I have seen this picture at least 10 times and still enjoy it. One of Eastwoods best and the rest of the cast are exceptional.
This is a great movie to watch. Great actors, great plot. Would highly recommend. The best part is the deal deal.
This has been one of my absolute favorite movies for more years than I can count! I especially love "Burning Bridges".
I have watched this movie a million times and love it each time I watch it. A true classic to enjoy
A good ole fashioned war film with a great mix of laughter, shooting, and crime against the guy's, it's a guy's feel good movie.With classic Clint.LT
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  It has humor and tragedy.  A nice emotional roller coaster ride.
the army movie we all wish had happened. I would go for the gold everytime. is is great Southerland too.
Watched a few times over the years. Always good for a laugh or two. So if it is a fun flick tune in.
This movie is a great classic for all ages. As far as viewing it looked and sounded good. A must watch at least once or twice a year.
The dry humor, the sad wit, the dear actors gone on, like Telly Savalas,  but most of all Donald Sutherland's Oddball!
This is a really action-packed film with wonderful stars!  It is very entertaining and I would recommends its purchase to others.
What is not to love about this movie?  You have an all-star cast with some of the best acting you could possibly have in a movie.
"Cat on a Hot Tin Roof" is one of Elizabeth Taylor's best films.  I bought the DVD edition to replace the VCR edition.  Great movie!!
Cat on a Hot Tin Roof, is one of my all time favorite classics.  Williams reflects on old southern ways and traditions.
All star cast, wonderful plot story. What else can I say? This is a must see movie for classic movie lovers.
I am very happy that this movie was availabe as a DVD and it came in perfect condition. I could not beat the price or the service.
I really enjoyed this movie full of action and very entertining, i love it!! i would recommand this to classic movie lovers every where!!!
ONe of the best movies I've ever seen and beautifully acted by Elizabeth Taylor, Paul Newman and Burt Ives. Classic, Classic, Classic.
Saw this when I was younger and loved it. John Travolta was the man back then. Great movie and soundtrack !!!
A  real classic and improved greatly by being in Blu Ray.I watch it about once every ten years and it holds up well.
What can I say?  John Travolta and the BeeGees.  A classic and it will have you up and dancing, or just dancing in your seat - it's that good.
I love all dance movies and this is a great movie John always plays in great movies love his moves.
I received the DVD way before its due date and it was in pristine condition! Thanks so much!Gabrielle BrodieElkins Park, PA
Love this film.  Nothing like classic disco,music and JohnnTravolta.  If you grew up in the 70's, it is even better.
It took a grand total of one day for me to receive this title! Awesome!!!
its worth  haveing in your collection.enjoy the the toons from the pass.id listen to the songs as a kid.
The DVD I purchased was a new item, not used.  I was very well pleased with the price, delivery time and quality of the movie.
This is a classic film filled with great disco favorites. And it looks and sounds fantastic on Blu-Ray! Definitely get this if you love disco music.
I hadn't watched this in at least 10 years, but enjoyed it as much as the other 4-5 times.  Such a classic, and a great story.
ta .a.t ..ta t.. ta...all the music... dont touch my hair.. lol.. an awesome movie! buy and you wont regret it!
Awesome!  classic the homeland of all modern dance music, disco! The world that was the 70s. Back in time on the ... dancefloor!
still watch it.Love John.T. in all his movies. the good ole days.good to know they are still around.will keep it around.
This movie instantly transports me back to the land of late 70's early 80's when disco was all the rage.  I still remember learning my first hustle!
No better representive movie of the disco time periodThe characters, music, teenage strife, it has it allLove itPatc
Great Movie for popcorn and a movie nights.... Really a step back in time - This is an absolute classic
Saturday Night Fever is an outstanding movie to begin with, but in Blu-Ray it is even better! The picture quality & color are superb.
That's right. I was working for the Litelab corp. and designed this dance floor. Since then I worked in over 550 nightclubs nationwide.
travoltas first movie I am sure he had great moves dancing music sountrack was good 4 the short lived disco era that was the scene than
this is a classic movie & it 1 my fav's  its a great movie & it came ahead of schedule & n good condition
I never get tired to watch this movie. The music, the dancing, bring great memories from the past. Needed to my collection.
This was a great movie for a dancing movie it showed great action in that way of its dancing scenes with Travota dancing in it
How could you not love this disco icon, Travolta at his finest. In this film he does it all ala Urban Cowboy..
its a defining classic.  No review is really necessary because the movie is a late 70's disco classic. You'll enjoy it.
I have seen this movie before it kind of gives you the willies but the actinf from the actors was awesome.
A great horror and occult film, and one of Roman Polanski's greatest films.
GREAT MOVIE - SHOWS THE OTHER SIDE OF LIFE AND WHAT PEOPLE WILL DO FOR MONEY - GREAT ACTING BY ACTORS.
This is a great creepy movie without blood and gore.  The movie keeps you in suspense and the acting is excellent.
This is such a great, classic horror movie. It scared the crap out of me when I first saw. It just leaves you with an eerie feeling.
This film is truly and totally a masterpiece.  Great acting on everybody's part.A sad and awesome film.Thank you
This classical and perfectly made Roman Polanski film is ageless! It is a campy must have for any paranormal enthusiast!
I saw this movie as a kid and it scared me so much that I found a new love of horror films. I had to have it for my own personal collection.
Simply put: If you enjoy a well acted scary movie, then you "must" add this one to your movie collection !
One of my favorite horror films, this one had my skin crawling. Beautifully real and subtly terrifying. Watch it and love it.
Not only acting and directing this movie was great, but the story was very captivating as well. It haunted me for a week.
Mia Farrow did an excellent job on the acting on her part as she does on peyton place.  I recommend anybody to see this movie
A classic movie, still spooky after all these years.  You can see the difference between good and evil through-out this film.
You need to watch it several times to fully appreciate the story line and all the scenes that make this 5 star movie the work of art it is!
Sheer brilliance for all features in this film, but Henry Fonda is a tour-de-force in his role as hired killer Frank!
master director sergio leone delivers yet another beautifully crafted western where the American railroads and revenge are the themes of importance.
This movie portrayed what greed will lead a man to do. It also portrayed how good will eventually overcome evil.
I won't spend time reviewing this film or its extras... I don't have to... This double disc set is, quite frankly, what DVDs were created for.
Once..West is an amazingly stylish, groovy, funny, outrageous, dramatic and interesting film.  It is a must see and own.
What I Can Say,well,This MASTERPIECE Should be added in your Collection,Go get this 2 Disc Set Special Edition :P
These old Western Movies are so good, they just don't make them like this anymore.  I would recommend this to everyone.
Good old fashioned western.  Great actors and lots of action.  I would watch it again and recommend it to my friends.
Bronson get them back . A  Very good movie to have . If like any of Charles Bronson movies you might like this one .
Another of my top ten. I watch it at least twice every year. Can't get enough of Bronson and Fonda.
The clarity of the image and sound make this an excellent buy even leaving out the documentary etc on disc two.  A rich cinema experience.
Those three minutes or so of Claudia Cardinale taking that bubble bath are reason enough to get this.
i saw this for the first time yesterday and i did not move until it was over! this is one of the best movies - period.
Good action in the west.  A good western story to watch.  This is a must see movie for the western folk.
One of my favorites, love to watch when I feel like it. Great cast and the extra of Henry Fonda as a bad guy.
This is not only a great western - it's a great movie.  The acting, the cinematography, and the story are all top-notch.  Highly recommended!!!
old time western starring Henry Fonda, Great movie
Playing this on my Toshiba HD XA2 is just like watching this in High Definition.
Great western movie! The acting is great. The director is great. Buy this movie and get lost in the wild wild west.
A wonderful view of the foundation upon which later Westerns became ClassicsI would recommend this film to any and all Western oficionados.
This was a great movie. A real classic western. I loved Charles Bronson in it.  He was just great! I recommend it.
If you like the good old western that have a kind of realism than watch this one. You will love it.
Like this Movie really good,and I give it 5 Stars and I ordered it because the place selling it,it was just like they said,it was
Absolutely flawless transaction and an even more flawless film.A must for any serious film collector.
This is absolutely one of john Wayne's best films!! I recommend it to any John Wayne fan or any one who ever heard of the unbeatable John Wayne!!
There is nothing like John Wayne especially when you ad Henry Fonda and Kirk Douglas.  That was the Golden Age.
A great John Wayne navy movie.  Could have done without the subplot concerning the little navy nurse, but just fast forward thru them with the DVD.
I like old war movies with John Wayne they are one of my many favorite movies to watch I would recommend it to others
Love John Wayne movies, and this is one of my favorties; gets you personally involved with characters while telling its story.
I would really love to see a fully restored Director's cut on Blu-Ray of this great War film. Has anyone heard anything??
John Wayne at his peak, and a cast of people that went on to become famous in theire own right.
So many stories and yet they all fit in perfectly, I was glued to the screen !One part wasn't needed and is awkward but overall excellent Characters
When I started looking for DVD's to replace my old VHS tapes I was so happy to see two of my favorite John Wayne movies together.
Another great John Wayne movie.  Lots of action.  Lots of stars.  A great attempt to keep reality in play and of course the good guys win.
very good movie
like I said b4 in my other reviews.  I have a wide variety of john wayne movies. this man died too early. what a legend
Yes, this is an old, black and white movie.  John Wayne, Kirk Douglas, a young Robert Mitchum, Carroll O'Connor, and more.If you like acting . . . .
This is a great John Wayne movie and a little history too. Has great co stars in it also when it was made
Show show the upper brass have no clue what goes on in the pits, where the real work is done.
Very well made and as always a great classic. Great stars portraying their parts. History might been looked into more closely.
This is a very dramatic and stirring movie, with a great cast.  It is pretty cutting edge for it's time.
A who's who, &#34;A&#34; list of actors and actresses in1965 when this movie was made by a premier director, Otto Preminger.  All these years
All star wonderful and talented cast, great acting, believable story line,. How can you go wrong with Patricia Neal and John Wayne!
This is one that I can watch two or three times a year.  A good movie, Enjoy the action.  But then I'm a John Wayne fan.
I loved it. O'Neal and Wayne are great together. I would recommend this as one of the great romance movies of the period.
I haven't seen this movie in a long time, and I can see the and appreciate the fine acting by many old favorites.
I bought this for a friend and he LOVED it he was wanting this movie for some time and couldnt find it locally. War and action.
This is a really great black and white movie,  definitely one of the ages. really good actors, good plot and great story line .
This has to be one of my favorite John Wayne Movies.  A must have for your collection.
IT WAS A VERY GOOD MOVIE..  I JUST DID NOT LIKE WHEM THE GIRL DIED  AND THE BOY LOOSING HIS GIRLFRIEND..
If you like war shows, This is one to watch and I love  John Wayne. One of his best movies.
I have seen this movie many times and still enjoy it.  It has drama, romance and action.  I especially like the fact that the hero was a real person.
Great war movie best if your a JOHN WAYNE fan like me.Wonderful cast The picture quality was perfect with 5.1 sound which was a surprise.
Love these old movies of John Wayne and past heroes, It allows you to relive the good ole days in time.
Love this movie. A lot of big names stars and very interesting and accurate. Recommend to all. That's all Folks
What more needs to be said. Well, it's not a western, but it's the Duke. You gotta watch it, and its good.
Lots of action based on actual events, and with a hint of love in wartime.  Just a fantastic movie and an all time classic.
Great old word war II movie with John Sayne already showing his famous walk.  All parts played well. Great production values.
This is my second choice for a John Wayne movie after &#34;Sands of Iwo Jima&#34;.  Besides, Jill Haworth is just captivating. :-)
A must watch for any John Wayne fan.  One of my all time favorites that I watch whenever it is on TV.
I've watched this movies over and over through the years.  I like the story, the actors, and the plot.  A John Wayne movies is always great.
I would watch this every week , it's that good. They don't make movies like this any more.  All you get is blood and guts or sex.
This is one of my favorite John Wayne movies.  Yes, some of the plot elements are a little silly but I love WWII naval movies.
If you like John Wayne movies, these are two that I watch over and over.  Outstanding supporting casts in each.
well its john wayne and its one of his great movies to have and watch it when you can so get a copy
Kirk Douglas and John Wayne star in this movie about WW2 and fight the enemy with brains as well as brawn.A "must see" movie.
Its is one of the finest war movies ever made, the powerful stories of these individuals almost over shadow the war
The story of the suicide is a bit much, but the story of Pearl was well done.  John Wayne's character fine.  Patricia Neal excellent.
John Wayne has done several war movies in the Army, Navy and Marines. I like his westerns better. But these make him an even better actor.
This is a great movie duo and certainly an asset to my vast collection. Arrived faster than a speeding bullit too!
Movies of The War Era May Be Over Dramatized, But We All Like Heroes ..... The Duke is The Best At It !
If you're a John Wayne fan, you will love this movie. Also WWII buffs should like it as well. Great story & acting. Check it out.
A little grainy but well worth the $5.00 and change. Have enjoyed this John Wayne movie many times and now it is part of my collection!
What's not to love about John Wayne??  This is a great movie to watch. It has a lot of history in it. A really good action film.
I love this particular John Wayne Movie. Personally I think it is an &#34;ageless&#34; movie! I give it *****! Watch it.
This is a classic and I loved watching it again, as in most of his movies there is drama, comedy, romance, etc. fun cast good story!!
what a wonderful movie, i just cant get enough of john wayne and enjoy watching his movies. great packageing and was to me quickly.
This movie is the classic battle of justice against injustice.  I was so engrossed in this movie the first time I saw it I just had to own it.
Saw this movie years ago and liked it so I decided to see if I could find it on Amazon.  I am a John Wayne fan and it's greatto have this movie.
John Wayne, what can you say? And it is helping me complete my John Wayne llibrary of all his movies!How can you go wrong.
This is one of John Wayne's classic movies! Great acting and great cast of actors! A must see for John Wayne Fans!
John Wayne and Dean Martin together after Rio Bravo- Great old stars with good entertainment... they way Hollywood used to make films.
I love this movie, this a real good western movie. If love western you will make this one of your farovrites.
Great classic John Wayne movie. A little dated like older movies. Some classic John Wayne lines and shoot outs. Great movie!
If you are a John Wayne fan you will love this.If you aren't you will probably still love it.
This is a great Western movie and has all of the thing that make a western great. From shoot outs to a real villain,  I could watch it many times.
John Wayne; Dean Martin!  Really good movie!
I enjoy watching John wayne Movies
If you like John Wayne and Dean Martin you get them both in the same package, if you don't like them then you won't watch it anyway.
One of the best Wayne films.  Also didn't hurt that Dean Martin was in it too.I have quite a collection of Wayne films
Probably Mel Gibson's best movie, from before he became a humorous nutjob.A very good movie in it's own right, well worth watching.NOT comedy.
Ever wonder why the Aussies have a cookie named ANZAC, here is the epic tale of it, through the eyes of two runners.
Very cool, often forgotten about, Mel Gibson film. Very worth having. The story is also a painful, forgotten one. Don't miss it.
I had this as a vhs years ago and it is the only Gibson film I wiil own it has been worth the wait
You get to see a bit of Australia, Egypt & Turkey. The acting was pretty good... Go to Wikipedia after the movie for more history.
This is a well told and well acted story centered on real historical, but tragic events. Be careful about who you put in charge of your army.
More like a buddy movie than a war movie, although WWI is prevalent throughout, good acting back when Mel Gibson was still Australian lol.
We have so many movies with James Stewart in the lead, this has been very good value as with all the previous.
One of the best John Wayne movies, and Stewart is miscast, but still does a fine job.
My husband loves this movie so it was a great gift. Jimmy Stewart and The Duke is great entertainment. They don't make movies like this anymore.
This is a must see movie.  Allstar cast and wonderful story line.  I'm going to get the book.  Would recommend as a learning tool for teens.
John Wayne and Jimmy Stewart together in one of the best westerns ever made.  What more could you ask for?
A very good copy of the movie. One of the better black and white movies out there. Both Wayne and Stewart seem a little old for Vera Miles.
The Duke, Lee Marvin, Jimmy Stewart.  Man they don't make 'em like that anymore.  Too bad, it definitely stands the test of time.
Fine John Ford western, if you are a fan of Westerns. Good performances by Jimmy Stewart, John Wayne, and Lee Marvin.
What can I say, another classic by John Wayne and Jimmy Stuart. I am enjoying a classic one again with two legends.
My husband wanted this movie a long time. Great movie. My husband has watched the movie over and over. This was a great pick.
The DVD arrived on time and in very good condition.  It was viewed and found in very good condition also.  Would buy from this dealer again.
Great great movie.  5 stars for the cast and the movie itself.  Great song also by Gene Pitney.  Just great all around
Classic Stars, great Action and a great lesson to boot. This one's a winner for any Western fan.
Great cast. Good story. A film which will endure through time. Love Andy Devine, John Wayne and Jimmy Stewart. Don't hesitate to watch.
I love this movie and the Blu-ray edition is very good.  This is a good buy.  And I'm glad to be able to get it.
We love John Wayne movies and these were all in very good condition.  Very pleased. The Man Who Shot Liberty Valance is a very good movie.
This is a stunning John Ford western. I have watched it again and again. I think I will continue to watch it again and again.
One of my son's and my favorite John Wayne movies.
Great stars. Great character actors. Good guys are good, bad guys are bad, and a great story. This is a Timeless classic.
This is a great movie, one of John Wayne's best. I would recommend it to anyone who is a John Wayne fan, you will definitely enjoy it.
I love to watch this movie. I can watch it over and over. John Wayne is at his best in it.
Even though this movie does not follow the book as closely as I would like, it is an excellent story.
One of John Wayne's best movies.  If you only see one of his movies, this is the one I would see.
This is the original John Wayne classic.  I like it better than the re-make and I think you will too.
What is there to say.  The old John Wayne, Academy Award Style.  And the story line isn't bad either.  Hail, the Duke.
Irreverence, impertinence and flat out fun. Kim Darby, Glen Campbell and of course John Wayne provide a fun ensemble to work this story through.
This is one of John Wayne's best movies. The girl that hires him is terrific and it's definitely a must see for John Wayne fans.
Best John Wayne movie ever made.  This timeless classic never grows too old to watch!  The Duke is at his best in this movie!
always been a  big john wayne  fan  and I think this  is one of his best  movie so I want to thank you.
This is a classic movie.  A must see.  The colors on the blu-ray are shar and vivid.  I do not remember the color looking so good.
the duke has always been my favorite actor.my collection of his movies is almost completethere was no other like john wayne
a great movie. wayne was an excellent lawman. wish they didnt remake this one since it was a flop. cool movie.
I love this movie,and I am not a big John Wayne fan. Tons of great characters,dialogue,scenery. One of my favorites!
This is the best True Grit movie. John Wayne is at his top form. Kim Darby is the spark for this classic.
This has to be one of the top ten movies I have seen in my lifetime.  A must see American classic.
After watching this as a child I watched the newer version and I was not impressed so I'm back with the one and only The Duke
Always loved John Wayne, this movie is one of many of my favorites.  Also love The Quiet Man, cannot get enough.
totally  super... pic!!!/ sound
The Duke really did an outstanding job in this movie. I know they remade this movie but only one man could play Rooster Cogburn. Great movie.
It's one of John Wayne's better movie and there is little else to add.  If you love John Wayne - young or old - you'll love this movie
The quality is fantastic and it is fun to see these movies digitally remastered. I am a huge John Wayne fan and am stoked to have this!
John Wayne won his only academy award for his portrayal of Rooster Cogburn in True Grit.  Fill your hands you S.O.B.
One of the best, if not the best westerns of all time,  picture and sound quality are superb and Alan Ladd was born to play this part
Jack Palance is fantastic!  He is so bad, the dog won't stay in the same room with him.  Of course it is hokey, but so what?
Shane is one of the best movies ever made. Alan Ladd is unforgetable in the lead role.  This is a movie, you will watch many times.
This is one of the all time great westerns and this is a wonderful transfer. A must have addition to any classic film collection.
One of the best Westerns ever made enough said.Alan Ladd as a drifter/ gunfighter Shane is at his greatest role.
Buy &quot;High Noon&quot; as well.  Both are great, see them for your self.  Read some reviews as well, I have never read a bad one of either.
I remember seeing this about 1952 in a theatre. I was 25 years old at the time and living in Oregon. Well worth the rental.
One of the best if not the best western ever made. I have watched this movie over and over. Should be required viewing for all Americans.
Great cast, is something to watch for me on a rainy day.  If you love westerns this one of the classic's.
This movie is a classic we all love.  The DVD was great, clear picture, good sound.  It's great for the entire family!
Shane is a great classic Alan Ladd was very good in this movie, I saw this movie a dozen times,and i watch it each time from beginning to end..
You just can't beat the old classics and this is one of them!  I would recommend it to anyone who would like to spend time watching a classic
In my opinion one of the best three western movies ever. Shane, the Searchers, High Noon, The best gunfight  ever.
Shane is a classic. What more is there to say? If you haven't seen Jack Palance walk down Elisha Cooke, you don't know movies.
My husband always liked this movie. He was not disappointed with the DVD and plays it often. He is very pleased with the purchase.
this was a great purchase and we were very pleased with the quality of the purchase..thank you very much for following up with this review..
Some of the acting is hokey, but still a good story and over all good movie... if you like westerns.
An absolute classic! What more can I say!You have to look to the past to find some of the best movies ever made.
Great movie. This is a classic.
If you are an Alan Ladd fan - you will love this movie.  It's a good western with an all-star cast.  A must in your movie library.
The Blu Ray transfer is absolutely perfect!!  The stunning locations and the great Western story is one of my favorites.
I encourage anyone and everyone to watch this classic as it is one of the standards by which others are judged.
I love this movie. This is the restoration it needed. It looks and sounds like new. Great commentary. Grab some popcorn and enjoy! A+++
shane is a classic this got to be the best western ever made alan ladd is great in this classic western it really looks wonderful in bluray.
An iconic move that works on so many different levels.  Can't imagine anyone over the age of forty not having seen this movie
Wonderful movie was glad I could find this movie on DVD. Excellent quality DVD it's made to last for years.
Thomas Magnum said that this movie had everything, comedy -drama ... it was his favorite movie.That's good enough for me ! HAHAHAHAHAHAHA
Excellent story, some comedy, good suspense. Otto Premingers' performance is priceless. I would recommend this film for anyones' dvd collection.
The plot is good and kept me watching every second of the movie. Its a psychological drama and it doesn't get much better then this.
This is a great movie. If you haven't seen it, then you need to. It is a classic masterpiece that should be in any film collectors library.
A great movie despite it's age. Not to be missed! Movie making at it's best. Gripping from start to finish. A &#34;must see.&#34;
Really good cast. This is replacing a VHS tape. Good acting in a good setting. Ray Holden is good as usual.
William Holden was never better than in this POW story set in Germany.  Great direction and actors tell an involving story.
Stalag 17 is a great performance and gives us an important perspective on why WWII was necessary.
I have seen the movie in the past and the picture quality has improved greatly since I first saw the movie on Laser disc.
great classic highly recommend this movie very entertaining,movie enthralls you with the experience of being in german enemy camp during ww2.
Good quality.  A must for Holden fans.  Seemed to be a true story of WW2 Prisoner of War camps.  (Some fun moments.)
A well-made movie!  Enjoy watching it over and over!Quality acting by Wm. Holden and other actors involved!Good family watching!nrh5
Full of surprises, great cast, true to life and nice clean picture, none of today language or nudity.  I love the old classics!Patricia Q
This is a great classic . Part comedy , part drama . Very good extras and a good , clean DVD
Enjoyed watching this old classic.
Suspenseful recounting of the activities in a POW camp, punctuated by humor and supported by great acting from the entire cast.
William Holden is excellent.  Blu-ray transfer clear and sharp.  Good World War II  movie, tossed with a few under currants of humor .
Great job in the restoring process. I always liked this movie. This story based on the truth. Wish it was in color.
JUST LOVE WAR MOVIES....AND ESPECIALLY OF WWII VERSIONS OF THE WAR ....HAVE BEEN WATCHING THIS MOVIE ON AND OFF NOW FOR TWO WEEKS....
a great film.
One of the best movies that John Wayne ever did. Considering that he was going through cancer himself. Good movie for all to watch.
Johns best ,right behind the Quite man! Modern movies are nothing but smoke and mirrorsand absolutely no acting required!
The dukes last picture I believe. Its great to see him back with Jimmy Stewart. The download was excellent quality!
The whole family enjoyed watching John Wayne's final movie.  We all knew what was coming, but enjoyed the story .
really enjoyed this, one of the last movies that John Wayne made that includes another icon, Lauren Bacall. I will enjoy time and again.
This is a great classic movie from John Wayne. I am still a fanof his other movies. So Buy this film because you will love it!
The Shootist is a exelent movie and his last.  I was very happy to get it for my collection.Sidener
I have several of john wayne's movies and i like them all very much I wish I could get them all
I have always liked john wayne, and I loved this movie a lot, this is probably my favorite film by him, what a great actor.
This is one of my favorite movies.  I was happy to find it on Amazon, since it is very rarely shown on TV anymore.
Great movie with fantastic shots of flying.  No blood or guts, just a good movie about the Strategic Air Command.
You get to see all the top aircraft of the time. Hollywoodism is kept to a minimum. The sound is good for today's audiences.
My husband and I both enjoy this movie.  We have the VHS, but are worried it will degrade over time.  It is a keeper.
This is a real classic.  One that you will want to see more than one time.  This probably my 3rd or 4th time to see.
Enjoy this Blu-ray.  Superb service.
A classic western that wears well over the years.  Great casting makes this film very entertaining and a must-see for any western movie lover
It is one of the best westerns movies that I have seen. It is based on history but is not very accurate. But it is still a good movie
Two great actors in a classic film.  If your're into the classic westerns,it's worth the price. What else can be said.
Masterly choreographed gunfights - great portrayal of a world that exists in the imagination of storytellers only - the American 'Wild West Myth'
It's about time they release some of the old westerns, Great acting and movie ... I hope they release more of the old classics
I love old classic western movies. Especially when they make it from a real life event such as this one, simply great.
One of my Favorite westerns. Picture quality is excellent !  A must own western !  Highly Recommended !! One of the Best Blu ray releases this year !
Another John Wayne movie for my collection.  I have always enjoyed Robert Mitchum.  The two actors make a good pair.
One of my favorite John Wayne movies. It is basically the same plot as Rio Bravo, but very enjoyable. I can and will watch again.
Have ALWAYS loved this movie and it was so nice to have it on Instant Watch and be able to just watch it when I want to.
My best John Wayne movie ever.  This was a Birthday Gift to my son who asled for for it and he enjoyed it too.
good john wayne movie will allways love a john wayne movie better then the movies we get now love them
This was a really great pairing of two of his best movies. Love both movies and was very happy to get such a good deal on them.
John Wayne and Dean Martin are superb in this classic western.  It is and excellent movie and one you will want to add to yourmovie collection.
Very good, classic John Wayne western.  Robert Mitcum and James Caan are also great in this movie.  Highly recommend it for those who love westerns.
Good clean western, great co-stars and of course John Wayne.  Little comedy and , of course action.  Just a great feel good movie.  Justice wins out.
Awesome movie.  Love this movie I have seen it ten times and I still love it.  Details American character and bravery.
A must for any true John Wayne fan, almost a remake of Rio Bravo, with different characters. A Great buy.
John Wayne once again provides excellent entertainment and quality performance.  this is a great example of his greatness.  Always the best
John Wayne and Robert Mitcham two of the biggest personalities ever put together on film... and it totally works. word
This is one of my favorite John Wayne movies.  I never tire of watching a good John Wayne movie.  Loved watching it on my iPad.
How can u not love John , all his movies are so good , see this one very good , happy with it.
My entire family loves this classic movie - this is a movie that everyone can watch over and over.
Just what I needed to finish up my collection of classic westerns. Now for a day off and a John Wayne marathon. Thank you.
This is one of my all time favorite westerns. Good anytime viewing. Robert Michum is absolutely wonderful in his role.
John Wayne is bigger than life -- and he never upstages his coactors.  Storyline good enough to keep you interested.
the duke has always been everyones favorite. how can u not like the duke. that would b very un-American. I have several of his movies.
Received both used movies and have watched both without any problems. They arer both great movies to watch if you are a John Wayne fan.
Bought for my husband for Christmas. One of his all time favorite movies. He could not have been happier with it
The Duke at his finest. And lets not forget Robert Michem. This is one of the classics that everyone should see.
A better time when people understood eachother more. And,a comedy in the right places. A good story for any John Wayne fan.
As with almost all John Wayne films, this a great western. Robert Mitchum is also very goo. in this movie
Hatari is a hard movie to find! Especially one of good quality, also I love El Dorado, and so did my dad when he opened his gift!
It took me a long time searching for this video. Now that I've found it and received it I am happy as a lark. It was worth the search.
The movie stirs feelings of the past was excited and. I enjoyed youthfulness as recall from my current age of seventyfive.
It was great to see this classic in HD.  I recommend all John Wayne movies and this is no exception and youcamtbeat the cast.
I am a lover of good westerns.  John Wayne was great in El Dorado.  I am a fan of all of his western movies.
Another John Watne winning western. Great cast! Great action Great costumes great dialogue great scenery love live live lived it
I really love John Wayne westerns and this is one of his better ones.  The storyline is just different enough to be interesting.
this one has action and a few good laughs in it to keep the eyes on what's  next  and it's a good one for the weekend fights.
John Wayne, what can you say? And it is helping me complete my John Wayne llibrary of all his movies!Once again good supporting actors.
We have watched this and compared it to Rio Lobo so many times that we pretty much know the dialog. We are Duke fans to the max.
It's a classic of John Wayne's movies. I have watched it for years and still like to turn it on.
I love both John Wayne and Robert Mitchum.  I've seen this movie several times on TV, so I decided that I had to make this purchase.
A comical and serious movie.  Robert Mitchum and John Wayne together were really good.
Really good movie so is Rio Bravo.  Saw 1st time @ drive-in as a kidClassic John Wayne flick.  Thought he was best in the 60's
This is a fun &#34;shoot-em up&#34; movie. Great cast with many big name actors and actresses. Good story line and the good guys win!
it's my main stay for a show.  I love John Wayne
Although Eldorado and Rio Bravo are escentially the same movie with a few changes, you gotta love it. Its a rainy afternoon feel good western.
Item was a Christmas gift and ideal for any John Wayne or Cowboy movie fan. Highly recommended and Great experience.
This is one of my favorite John Wayne movies, his take no crap attitude and suave personality shines in this good ol western.
Classic western with two legends plus future stars, at the time. Highly recommend! Good story line, classic John Wayne western theme, a must see.
We watch this movie over and over through the years so had get a new copy for my husband as he loves John Wayne movies..Well worth it money .
One of my favorite John Wayne movies. Blu-ray is really good with no issues. Only wonder why they waited so long for release.
A typical John Wayne movie! Great cast and storyline. Lots of action, great actin, well placed roles and interesting dialog.
I have said it once already but i just love John Wayne.  Some of the people he did movies with were some of the best parts of his films.
We are loving it we watch several time a week, and never get tired of watching it, we will never get tired of watching John Wayne Movies.
A great movie with a great cast.  I always love to watch it. One of the best John Wayne Westerns.
Can't go wrong with El Dorado. Classic John Wayne western. Watch it over and over again. They don't make them like this anymore, unfortunately.
Fantastic John Wayne movie classic. Even though this is a remake it is great to watch again it deserves a ten
This is a fun movie. It is my favorite Western.  The humor..the HAT!  The everything.  Who wrote that script? -Thank you :)
This was in great shape. This is one of my favorite movies, so was glad to get it at a good price.....^i^
I love John Wayne movies ...period!  Would highly recommend all of them to everyone.  Can't beat 'em........especially the Western movies.
El Dorado is a movie I saw sometime ago. It had a lot of major stars in it. Its another good old time movie that I would tell anyone to watch.
I bought this movie for myself because I just loved John Wayne and there are certain movies that I had to have and this was one one them.
I LIKE THIS JOHN WAYNE MOVIE FIRST BECAUSE I AM A BIG JOHN WAYNE FAN .AND I REALY LIKE THE CHARACTER MISSISSIPPI PLAYED JAMES CAAN
Great cast . It delivers. Good John Wayne vehicle.Lots of colorful, memorable supporting characters. Successful remake or recycling of Rio Bravo.
What more can I say about this awesome movie. A must have for the western collection.WALMART IS SELLING IT FOR $7.50 AS OF JULY 2011.
Nothing much to say other than I really like this movie. Grew up on John Wayne and love most of his films.
Good movie.  I like William Holden, and he does a good job in this film.  Grace Kelly before she left Hollywood.
Purchased for my husband as he loves the old war movies.  He had seen this on TV several years ago and wanted it so he could watch it when he wanted.
This was a realy good film. Good actors did great with this story. It is a vary good story and I had forgotten one with a message.
Watching it tonight. Great movie and fast service getting it to me.
love this war movie because of the actors playing their parts plus LOVE WAR MOVIES ALSO...WOULD RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO OTHERS IN THE WORLD....
A classic movie the old style effects are great. It focuses your attention on the Korean war also known as the forgotten war.
Bronson at his best, pure and simple. It's good because he show emotion, fear and anger.  That's what make this movie more believable.
We are Charles Bronson fans! CB movies are about right & wrong, family, etc. Yep, believe are not. This is a good one to start out with.
I STIIL enjoy watching this movie and I've seen it many times. Bronson does a great job as a vigilante. It's a classic.
This a great movie and it completes the whole series of the deathwish series Charles did.
Standard Chuck Bronson shoot 'em up.  Better then the sequels.  Wouldn't bother with them, but this one is timeless.
A good movie with a great star, had a good story line, to bad a little more hollywood story than real life but a great first in a series.
Loved it! Being a Charles Bronson fan his Death Wish movies are the best! I know these movies were ahead of their days. awesome!
Liked it 20 years ago and like it now.  I lost my original(loaned it out one too many times). This is a replacement.
Very good movie and one of Heston's favorites.  Not a "traditional" western, but one of my favorites.  Well acted and entertaining.
Well done. Heston, like all wise actors, played his age in this one. Good characters and good acting all around. Lee Majors movie debut.
Wonderful  story of life in the old west.  Evil Bad Guy's attempt to take over other people's property is thwarted.
Seen this years ago and finally got around to owning it.Story line and acting by all participants are excellent, I think.
Good Acting but I do not like our movie heroes getting beat up on as many times as this character did ..... Thanks !!!
It is a movie about the first book of the War and Remembrance series written by Herman Wouk. He was a great wrier and I love Robert Mitchum!
DVDS arrived in great shape.  This is a classic mini-series based on a very good book.  The second part of the story is a separate product.
excellent telling of history. the way this is done you seem to learn more history than just reading a book. great cast.
Winds of War is the best war movie I have ever seen. I have watched it over and over again. I have recommended it to all of my family and friends.
A romanticized version of world events leading up to World War II.  Interesting from the historical point of view.  Good entertainment too...
Must viewing for war buffs and romantics.  Not for the faint of heart and those who have bad dreams.  Good story and movie of WWII.
This lush, no-expense spared series is a must for WWII buffs. I saw it when it was originally broadcast, and it ignited my interest in history.
Got this to add to my library. My husband loves the series, so basicly I bought it for him, but I do watch them also.
We replaced our quite-bulky VHS recordings with this slim volume.  So glad it was available in DVD.  Arrived promptly and in good condition.
great series.  i had seen it years ago and am glad to be able to see it again.  great stars.
My nephew was a Navy consultant for Winds of War. I loved it then and still love watching it today.
Had never seen this prequel to War and Remembrance before. Excellent series.  Would recommend to anyone interested in this period of history.
Everything I remembered, first time my wife has seen it, she loved it, she's a R. Mitchum fan, goes great in our collection.
This was excellant and I would recomend it to anyone. It came in record time and that made me even happier/
Another great mini series, every bit as good as war and rememberance. I also continue to play these dvds over and over again.
Excellent movie.  I was not disappointed.  Kudo's to Amazon for being so honest in dealing with me.
If you like the early day westerns then this movie should be added to your collection Starring the Ledgenary peformer Dean Martin and Robert Mitchaum
This is a great old movie that we watch over and over.  Has a lot of twists in the plot and enjoyable through the years.
Dean Martin playing his usual cool character. A fairly simple story. A good watch for a movie you don't see very often.
I love this old low budget movie, Word, word word word word word word word word word word word word--should not have to say so much
Love the old westerns and this is a good one with a good cast. I think people who like westerns will enjoy this
Great movies!  This set contains:  The Shootist, True Grit, El Dorado, and The Sons of Katie Elder.  Recommended for John Wayne and Western fans.
Definitely a flick that really shines with blu-ray.  I have both regular and blu-ray editions of this movie and the difference is amazing.
Excellent movie.  Great cast.  Great script.  Are there flaws?  Sure, but you overlook those for the enjoyment and entertainment of it all.
Sean Connery is a Russian submarine captain, what more do you really need to know to make you want to watch this awesome film?
Sean Connery and Alec Baldwin at their best in a cold war classic.If you have not seen this do so immediately. Fablous.
An excellent portrayal of intelligence and cunning by Sean Connery. The movie is both exciting and thought provoking, very entertaining.
James Bond movies are my cup of tea! I enjoy this kind of movie.  It has action, romance, and sometimes comedy.
Great movie!  I love it a lot.  I can't even count how many times I've watched it.  Alec Baldwin is a great Jack Ryan.
Excellent spy vs spy movie involving submarines. Technology has come so far in the last 10 to 15 years in the art of under sea warfare. great movie.
The story and the actors are great.  No wonder the Naval Institute Press had their first best seller and the movie is just as good.
This is a classic movie.  It looked great on my Kindle HD and the sound was great too!  I highly recommend this.
Great flick. VHS is ***lousy*** on our replacement TV & we are buying replacement DVDs for our favorites. This is one.
Wonderful movie! As usual Alec Baldwin  an Sean Coneary is Great! Very intense movie. A must see if your a fan of Submarines.
I watched this movie when it first came out. And I loved it!!!!!! I would recommend this movie to anyone I never moved it's just great!!!!!
Very good movie. Great storyline and acting. Well produced.This is the type of classic movie that always wins an audience.
This movie has held up over time - great actors, great effects and a great adaptation of a Tom Clancy novel - not an easy thing to do!  Well done!
A Russian sub captain wants to turn over a new sub to the Americans.  He has to get the crew to want to get off to accomplish his goal. Entertaining.
We purchased this for a gift.  The friends that we gave it to really enjoy Sean Connery so it was a good purchase for them.
As always Mr. Sean Connery is amazing. An allstar cast and well written roles makes this a really good movie.
ANY MOVIE THAT SEAN CONNERY PLAYS IS GOOD AFTER ALL HE IS JAMES BOND AHD HE JUST CAND DO A BAD ONE EVEN IF HE TRY
Even if you've seen this movie before when it was released you'll love the next time around. Connery is excellent as ever.
Good strong acting, and drama as with action. The suspense can be hair raising. One of many, of Sean's great moves.
This is one of sean connery best films. He is the one that brings thismovie togather. Real and inteance
Sean Connery is really great in this one. Was glad to add this one to my personal collection. I'm a big fan of these military dramas.
connery & baldwin are at their best, acting and in looks! how much better can you get! good plot and the eye candy can't be beat! judge for yourself!
This movie is definantly a classic  and I  highly recommend it to everyone that I know and who I work with
Never get tired of seeing it.  Love the performances and the storyline.  Sean Connery at his most sexy look.  LOL
I would recomend this movie to any one who asked me about it. Very realistic in every way glad I ordered it.
this is one of the best movies.  great stars, lots of action.  fast moving.  if you're a Sean Connery fan, you will like this movie.
The Hunt for Red October is a classic - Buy it! Great story and Super acting!  That's all!!
Excellent movie which depicts the COLD WAR. CONNERY AND BALDWIN have a remarkable performance.  I would recommend the film to those who enjoy drama.
The viewer of this movie will be spellbound from the first scene to the last.  Sean Connery excells in this tense thriller.  A must see!
great movie, lots of action , good acting, what more do you want ? :-)
What can I say.. The Hunt for Red October [Blu-ray]  is great movie that just got better with Blu-ray, was a welcome upgrade from my DVD version!
Sean Connery as an Old Guy.  Cool.  What's his name who played Jack Ryan looks like he's right out of middle school.  Even cooler.
I was updating my &#34;collection&#34; from VHS to DVD and because this is one of our faves I bought it!
An outstanding story, one in fact that I watch over and over, every few months, as I do with with so many of my favorites.
Another Great Movie by a great cast of actors were very good.  Better than the book! Yet another to watch many times.
One of my favorite movies. I love Sean Connery in this movie. Great price and good deal. A must see.
I bought this to replace a VHS version.  One of the bestof Sean Connery's work and Alec Baldwin was at ihs best.Looks great on my hi-def TV.
This is a good movie to watch if you are into navy and submarines.  Go Navy. Arrival time was good.
Like the suspense and how it all comes together in the end.  Watch it as often as I get a chance.  My wife even likes it's story line.
One of the best cold war movies ever made... and a fantastic adaptation of one of Clancy's better works. Just awesome.
If you like action and a really good flim to watch this is it! great flim. a classic movie to see.
This is my favorite Jack Ryan movie. Alec Baldwin is so good in this movie and you can't beat Sean Connery!
Great movie.  Upgrading my movie collection to Blu-ray.  Big differance from dvd.  Picture quality as well as sound as amazing.
One of the best movies ever. There are almost no problems with this movie. Five Stars and Two Thumbs Up.
Excellent WWII movie.  A bit lengthy but interesting enough so you do not notice it much.
Excellent! It's too bad Hollywood waited until Clancy passed away to put another of his works on the big screen.
I  have been a Harrison Ford fan for many years. This is another classic Jack Ryan CIA movie. Great Action!
Lots of action in this movie.  I didn't like all the killing but I still liked the movie.  I recommend the movie.
Even though I keep up on Clancy's novels I still enjoythe movie as much as the book. This may be an &#34;oldie&#34;but its still a &#34;goodie&#34;
LOVED THIS MOVIE ACTION KEPT MY ATTENTION. THE MOVIE HAD A STORY LINE THAT WAS EASY TO KEEP UP WITH.
Harrison Ford is one of my favorite actors and he does not disappoint in Patriot Games. I would highly recommend this movie to anyone.
THIS WAS AFTER THE HUNT FOR THE RED OCTOBERBUT DIFFERENT JACKHARRISON FORD IS A VERY POWERFUL ACTOR AND ALSO IN THE NEXT ONE
my hubby and I watched all Tom Clancy movies in a row. Fun to watch especially if you've read the novels.
Hang onto your hat - Indiana Jones in the government!!  Well, not the same character, but the same adventure and super acting of Harrison Ford!
Harrison Ford in yet another good movie, just as good as Air Force One, did this movie justice, would recommend to anyone who like Harrison Ford.
This movie is definantly a classic  and I  highly recommend it to everyone I know and who I work with  really
I enjoyed his other movies. this one is a great one to get if you like harrison Ford. his other ones are good too.
Harrison Ford is the perfect Jack Ryan as he goes out to protect his family from IRA teorrist
Good plot, lots of action, Love Harrison Ford in this thriller of a movie. Could rewatch many times.  Always on the edge of your seat.
Superb action and suspense.  Your body English during action scenes will make it hard to keep your seat! Harrison Ford at his best.
I love the Jack Ryan movies. They are loaded with action and suspense and good acting. I love Harrison Ford.
Good Movie...depicts the faults that lie in our intelligence community...and, how they can be sorely lacking.  Ford is kick butt.
Long time Harrison Ford fan. Enjoyed watching this for the millionth time. Of course, amazon really needs to work on its connectivity issues.
Another movie that will be classic, with a host of great actors, who are timeless in whatever role they play.
Tom Clancy novels made into movies are anticipated to be excellent and thus far have been enjoyable and this one meets all expectations.
My wife loves this movie, shipped fast and quality of the film was awesome. I would recommend this to anyone who likes old movies!
It was an excellent movie with great acting. I would highly recomend it to any one who enjoys action/drama movies.
everything you could ask for in a techno thriller. great in all aspects. made this part of my permanent selections. Harrison ford at his best.
A Definite Must See!Exciting, and entertaining continuing saga of Jack Ryan with an unexpected ending. The sequel to Patriot Games.
Tom Clancy writes an excellent story, while Harrison Ford is the overall best actor to ever play the role of Jack Ryan.
Of course, I love Harrison Ford, but I really love Jack Ryan, and his patriotism and basic goodness. Exciting movie.
Enthralling.  Differently worth while.  Exciting evening at home.  May do this again.  On edge through the entire movie, kept me questing.
They don't make them like this anymore.  Hollywood has forgot what good movies are all about.  This movie has it all.
Highly recommend this movies, great acting and exciting twists and turns with unanticipated ending.  On the order of a James Bond movie.
ITS ANOTHER JACK RYAN MOVIETHE FIRST JACK WAS ALEC BALDWIN BUT HARRISON FORD MADE FOR THIS ROLE I THINK ITS BETTER
I HAVE THIS FILM AND PATRIOT GAMES ON VHS AND I WANT TO KEEP THE TWO FILMS,WHICH IS WHY I BOUGHT THE FILMS ON DVD
A classic and a must see for action adventure fans. Very political as well - a winner. The new Reboot is good as well
One of the best of the Clancy adaptations.  Second only to Red October.  Great cast,  Well written and directed.  Good film.
This is the kind of movie I enjoy with Harrison Ford!  Very dynamic, lots of action!  One of the best movies I have seen!
A very good movie, always have liked Harrison Ford as an actor and the story is great. Truly a Tom Clancy inspired masterpiece.
Blu-Ray in great shape.  Fast delivery. What more would a buyer want? Will do business again with seller.
I really think the entire Jack Ryan series are very good but Harrison Ford is the best of them. I wish they would make a few more.
very good movie just like all his books you will never be let down.Every fre years I watch it again and alwys enjoy.
As with any Harrison Ford movie this is another well done, have to watch every minute to catch all of the action story. I Recommend.
A good watch...keeps you at the edge of your seat.  Couldn't stop watching.If you like a fast-moving story, this is it.
Good guys, bad guys, good guys win.  Action with violence but not so over the top violence that makes one ill.  A good rainy day film.
I love this movie and could watch it a million times. Harrison Ford and Willem Dafoe turn in great performances.
I enjoyed his work on star war, Indiana Jones, and blade runner. this one of his best. this is for any fan of his.
The best of the John Ryan movies. Thrills chills and James Earl Jones. Oh, and Harrison Ford wasn't too bad.
Love this movie - as always Harrison is amazing and the suspense keeps you on the edge of your seat!
is the best Jack Ryan. This movie keeps you going and doesn't stop until you reach the credit lines.
In the past his farther lost his fight, But this fighter goes after and clams the next fight to clear his farther name.
I would recommend this dvd to people who love Harrison ford it is a witty movie and people over eighteen years would love it
This is a terrific piece of fiction based on Pablo Escobar of the Cali, Columbia drug cartel and maintains your interest through out the entire movie
Have been looking to purchase at the right price for a and awhile.  Excellent film with a great cast.  Harrison Ford is marvelous.
Harrison Ford is my all time favorite actor. I enjoy all his movies. This is an action packed movie. Never a dull moment.
One of Tom Clancy's best stories brought to life brilliantly by an all star cast. Watch it, watch it again, and see if you don't agree.
A Must See -- Displaying the Milder Side of Politics.Who knew, people died because of bad decisions, while others get richer.
If you like Harrison Ford you need to watch this movie,,, it was excellent lots of action great believable story
This is one of Tom Clancy's best stories. I is edge of your seat exciting and full of drama.  You will not be sorry you watched.
I have always loved this film, I am a BIG Harrison Ford fan this is one of his best. He is a brilliant physical actor as well as emotionally engaged!
I loved it! Even though it is a long movie, it goes by fast. The fight scenes are spectacular, they leave you wanting more. Mel is awesome....
The bluray quality is awesome. If you love this movie, you need to get the bluray version. It is worth it.
This movie is a classic - there is so much passion about love and history foretold in an exceptional way.
my dad has been looking for this movie for a long time and he just loved it for his aniversary
Great quality, arrived before the time it was said to be and i just love this movie. Great choice and no regrets
This is the first time I have ever seen it - believe it or not!  It was a good movie.
Great movie, exelent box, good quality. If you love the movie you must check it out. Mel Gibson and a xelent performance!
I had this on VHS, so when I found it on Amazon at a very good price, I bought it. Great movie!
One of the best action movies of all time along with Raiders- Ark Mel was great in the film .A plus for the film.
Great movie which was based on true historical events. This just might be Mel Gibson's greatest cinematic  achievement, with him in the lead role.
This is a FIVE STAR movie all the way. The best written, directed and cast movie of the decade of the 90"s.
It's one and still one of his best films - Not for kids but a great film and will always watch it every so often
My favorite movie! Stands right up there with Kirk Dougals in Sparticus and Charelton Heston in Ben Hur to name a few!
Well acted, great story.  Amazing how brutal we humans are back in the Middle Ages. It will make you appreciate living today.
The movie was great!  Even though Mel is a little out of his mind at times, he can still make a good movie.
If I could show 2 thumbs up I would but then again Mel Gibson does good work as well as acting.
It's great film. Was best picture of the year. Evrything about the film is excellent. History, excitement, action and war!
A must see movie, it shines on bluray, the picture and sound are amazing for a 18 years old movie!!The steelbook is beatiful.
Talk about hard times from tyranny and suppression from their ruling English neighbors.This is a great story of one man and a cause, Freedom.
I loved the way the Highlanders acted in this movie. Happy to receive it in such good shape. Just a Great Mel Gibson movie!
Great fictional account of William Wallace! A little bit of comedy, some fighting and a great tale. Nothing else needed to make a good movie!
I love this movie.  One of the best with mel Gibson! No dry eye left when watching this.  Such bravery and courage are seldom seen today!
I liked this movie so much, I wish I would have purchased it instead of renting it.  I would watch it again.
I bought this for my son in law, who had never seen it.  NO one should go through life without seeing this, one of the best movies ever made!
My boys and I really enjoyed the movie. Nothing like having family time, sitting around watching a good movie. We have watched it more than once.
Arrived damaged free.This is one of my favorites and I'm glad it's out on Bluray.  I have no complaints.
Mel Gibson at his best before he started getting into trouble with the booze and women a third of his age.
This is a timeless film that is a must be in your library to watch again and again.  The acting, adventure and history is all amazing.
True Courage and True Righteous Rage very well expressed! A real man is nice to see ... and it is so rare.
I've seen it before - well worth a second watch. Mel Gibson in one of his better performances. Good buy!
This Movie sends me to a different time and Place every time I watch it. The Story is so engrossing! The Love story is Timeless!
This movie flat out deserved to win best picture.  It's one of those films that is epic and you can never get sick of...
Arrived in the condition I had hoped it would. One of my favorite movies. Glad to have the DVD version of it now.
Another movie that I watched when I was younger happy to purchase a great copy and at a great price
This is one wild and fast paced movie and is packed with action and the beauty of Africa!The cast and storyline are exceptional:-)
DVD received in new condition; no scratches; received in due time. Thank you!
Because I am a lover of animals (whether domesticated or wild).  This was such a heartwarming film in so many ways.
dvd came as expected seller was very honest it WAS in excellent condition appreciate honesty would buy from again..many thanks
This movie came in on time just as described and it's a great movie. You all did a great job thank you so much
This is a gift for my daughter.  She just loves it.  It's not my type of movie so most likely will never watch it
WHY ARE THERE NO GERMAN SUBMARINE GAMES FORXBOX LIKE THE ONE I USE TO HAVE FOR MY OLD 486 (???).
This is one of the best movies of all time. It pulls at all of your emotions. Laugh, cry, and fall in love with this one.
This is a great movie for the history books! I enjoyed the book and the movie is good. I would recommend this book over the movie.
MEL GIBSONS Best movie ever made, I used his wedding vows from the movie when I got married. I wish I had seen it on the big screen.
A excellent tale of how Scottland won their independence from England. On a Scale of 1 to 10 I give it a 10! A very outstand movie.
Obviously you like the movie or you wouldn't be looking for it.  The blue ray version is excellent too!  'Nuff said.
the movie is real good i love is one of my fav it look real good on bluray I real want to see a remakeof it with russell crowe  that would be awesome
THIS IS AN EXCITING AND SUSPENSFUL MOVIE. THE VIOLENCE IS VERY REALISTIC. YOU WILL FEEL LIKE YOU ENTERED A TIME MACHINE.
Received this item on time from Amazon. Always great experience dealing with Amazon. Enjoyed this movie from Mel Gibson. One of his better movies.
This movie is great. As we all know, It's about Willaim Wallace battling the English for the Scot's freedom. A must se film.
This is an excellent movie. Five oscars speak for it. No need to say anything else that is not known.
This is probably my favorite movie of all times.  I have a copy but wanted to get one to give as a gift.  Great price - great movie!
This is great for anyone who is in love with this great movie, the DVD quality is great and no having to change tapes mid way.
about Braveheart, you see this movie and it speaks for it self and it's AWESOME. Nice work Mel.
I don't have a vast collection of DVD's as I seldom watch a movie more than once. But this is a great movie. A favorite.
This movie purchase was for my husband.Great movie at a good price.He was very happy and has viewed it several times.
Simply...I give you the best movie of all time... (War, romance, epic, drama, patriotism, etc.)
A Great Movie..Lots of lines in there to live your life by..Give it a try..Youll like it.  Got to Like That Princess!  Hot!
TRULY FANTASTIC BLU-RAY - THEY NEED TO PUT OUT MORE IN THE SAPPHIRE SERIES, THEY LOOK & SOUND AWESOME.
One of Edward Nortons best!! I knew he would be a star after I seen this movie and I think it was his first movie.  Awesome performance!
like Gere a lot - he was very good in roleending was very surprisinggood twist - did not anticipate the ending
An extremely emotionally riveting movie that kept you on the edge of you seat until the very end.  A very good translation of the book by Diehl.
Another movie to add to my collection of DVDs.  I have always enjoyed this movie and building up me collection for when I reture.
this dvd arrived much earlier than the scheduled due date...the packaging was great and the dvd was also in great shape...
Edward Norton is an amazing actor! He sure got me! Outstanding performance! He should of won an Oscar!
One of my favorite films. I would like to explain the movie a bit but I don't want to ruin a single second of this great film for anyone.
Another great movie for my 84 year old Aunt who is a Richard Gere groupie!
I enjoy mainly true stories, but this movie is excellent and as many movies I have watched over the years, the ending really surprised me.
The acting in this movie is awesome, so well done. It will keep you spell bound. Watch and enjoy, you will want to watch it more than once.
I watched this movie when it first came out and it came to me in great condition.I am very glad that I own it.
Excellent movie..you'll see. And if you liked this..you'd like &quot;Shattered&quot; with Tom Berringer.
Awesome movie and well acted!  A very suspenseful, movie....a must see for suspense and relaxation. Richard Gere is great in this movie!
I love this movie. Always have always will. Ed Norton---- what can I say he is just the best. He should have gotten top billing to Gere
I had this movie before but when I had to move a lot of my movies got lost.  Great movie with a surprise ending.  Great movie.
great flick.  Ed norton is awesome
Huge fan of this movie! Who doesnt want this movie! It is great! totally recommend you buy it and watch
This movies is one of my husbands favorites to watch over and over even though you know what is going to happen he still watches it.
This is a marvelous classic. We cried all over again. Some things you never get tired of.Run Forest run.
Tom Hanks = amazing.  If you've have never seen Forrest Gump, you're missing out on an amazing movie!  SO GOOD!
What a wonderful movie! it is one of my favorite movie... must buy it on my collection! Great movie! &#34;run forrest! Run!.&#34; Lol
anything Tom Hanks is amazing. this movie is funny and touching serious and just down right awesome. Sally Field is always great
I love this movie and I watch it at least once a month. Not only does Tom Hanks play a great Forrest, but he also plays a caring lover.
A Wonderful Movie To Own!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Forrest Gump Makes Your Heart Sing. We Need More Men Like Forrest Gump, What A Beautiful World This Would Be!
A true classic. Everyone should have a copy of this one.Borrows a lot from Woody's Zelig but it is a real Odessy.Tom Hanks shines.
This is one of the best movies, I've ever seen.  It's about time it's on DVD.
a classic movie. has humor, warmth, and lots of love. a simple man who looks at life through simple eyes
Anyone who doesn't LOVE this movie should go live on Mars.  Tom Hanks is great.  GO BUY this movie.  We have watched it several times.
It's really sad but definitely a must-see. It's a classic and you won't forget it.
This is the best of Tom's works so far.  Well, I am wrong.  This is one of his best works so far.  Mr. Hanks had grown in to a real actor.
Definitely in the top 100 of movies of all times. A must see. Works with all age groups.Besides great acting it had some unique production elements.
great movie lived through all of the eras. Good sound great picture quality. One of many Tom Hanks best performances.
can't believe I waited so long to review this one.  I loved adding this to my collection!!  Tom Hanks is wonderful!!
One of Tom Hanks best movies overall!  I am so glad that I was able to find the Two Disc Special Collectors Edition to add to my movie library.
This Tom Hanks - Forrest Gump DVD is a great addition to our Tom Hanks movies, wonderful movie. Like it a lot.
This movie is a definate classic. It's about I mentally slow man and his extradinary way throughout life. Truely uplifting!
Tom Hanks is brilliant in this movie. this has to be one of his best performances ever. i love this movie and so will you.  recommend it for everyone
One of my favorites movies from Tom Hanks, if not his best.  Even though the movie is long it keeps you entertained.
love this movie..it is soo simple and easy to watch without getting bored..plus i have a collection of tom hanks and had to have this
Never get tired of watching this movie. Tom Hanks is an awesome actor. It amazing how he acquired his wealth throughout the movie.
&#34;Forest Gump&#34; is one of the all time great movies. The VHS version is sadly outdated now, but it is available on DVD!
And people are probably leaning towards the stupid side if they don't have &quot;Forrest Gump&quot; in their collection.
I watch this one at least twice a year. One of Tom Hanks best roles and the movie is full of laughs.
Tom Hanks is just the right person to play Forrest Gump, Forrest receives the credit for creating a lot of our modern society
We have this movie on VHS from years ago but I had to get it on DVD! Such an awesome movie!
This is my all time favorite movie.  Made me fall in love with Savannah, GA
Love this movie, its nice and heart warming and great cast that came together great for the film. Love it!
Great movie, even the second time around.  Very moving story, with great actors and actresses. Gives you a different light on life on so many levels,
This movie will never get old. Another one of Tom Hanks best performances, because he is believable. This is a great story of ones life.
I love this movie. As a social studies teacher, iForrest Gump is a walk through history using a lovable fictional character.
This is just a classic story. I love Forrest Gump! Not only that, the soundtrack is phenomenal. A really Great movie!!
I haven't seen this movie in years and had forgotten how good it was. I really enjoyed getting to watch it again!
A look at the "baby boomers" generation performed by the new Jimmy Stewart; Tom Hanks.
This is one of many that my husband collects because he says that they are classics. This is a Amazon Verified Purchase.
It is always good to watch this movie and get inspired and laugh.  We had student from spain that requested it
tom  hanks does a great job in this movie in great shape and love the movie i know in time it will be a classic
I heard from friends that this movie was great and it won 6 academy awards in 1994. this one is for any tom hanks fan.
This is a wonderful movie that anyone can enjoy. I loved the way actual news reels were interwoven into the story.
Love Tom Hanks!  Loved the movie!  Visit a Bubba Gump bar/restaurant if you have a chance, so you can remember this classic film.  Thanks!
This is Tom Hank's best performance ever!A movie I never get tired of watching.. a keeper.Warning: It will make you teary-eyed
from VHS to DVD. My family loves this movie and we were excited to find it in such awesome condition.
what can i say, i love ol forest and how he thinks. gave it to my mom she loves it too.
Very wonderful and moving story of young men during the war and the struggle with drugs back in the early days.
No matter how many times you watch it this movie is still great. Makes me laugh every time. One of the best
This is such a good movie.  Tom Hanks is superb!  #1 gotta have movie!
I love the story and even if it's long I don't mind re watching it. I sort of consider it a family movie, but only for the older kids.
Very nice blue ray to an iconic film. Filled with spectacular special features which gives an in depth look to the creation of the movie.
Forrest Gump is a classic movie that will be enjoyed by generations to come. It is one of the most quoted movies ever.
We absolutely love this movie!  We have watched it so many times since we received it (on time I might add), Especially our daughter.
So glad this DVD was made available to watch over and over.  It made a perfect gift when I needed it.
This is a must have DVD.  I had it on VHS and I new I needed it on DVD.  Great movie.
Amazing movie! Funny, sad, suspenseful....Forrest Gump might be my favorite movie of all time. Tom Hanks definitely deserved his Oscar!
Forrest Gump rules i love this movie. Its the greatset and is my faviorte movie by farbuy the dvd today
One of the greatest movies of the last 50 years,rich in meaning for the &#34;silent generation- me at 79,boomers,milennials ad nauseum!
I forgot how wonderful this film was until we watched it as a family again. Tom Hanks is great, and so is Sally Field
I saw this movie when it came out. The story was good. It's about a man life. I remember there were those who like it and those who did not like it.
I know Pulp Fiction is brilliant, but Forrest Gump deserve the oscar.I can watch this movie everyday, anyday.
What can I say? This movie is simply amazing, and Tom Hanks is definitely the best actor of the century.
What can one say.  Everything Tom Hanks touches turns to gold.  Excellent and I enjoy watching it over and over and over again.
Great Movie .Movie was in great condition.This is one of My husbands favorite movies.Always pleased with all my purchases.Never had any problems
its a very good movie my daughter watches it 3-4 times a month,tom hankswas very good in this movie
Never ever get tired of watching this classic.  Tom Hanks is great.  Highly recommend it to anyone and everyone.  Great viewing.
Who does not love Forrest Gump? Tom Hanks does another excellent job in this timeless classic. Family friendly and fun!
I cant say much about this because well...its FOREST GUMP! its a classic for a reason so just get it already!
Forrest Gump is a great story teller.  It not only tells the story of one man's adventure.  But the entire story of growing up American.
If you like Tom Hanks then you will love this movie.  A must see for any movie fan.
This is an excellent movie.  Tom Hanks does an excellent acting performance.  Gary Sinese is also a great representative for military members.
A great American story with masterful acting and a hard edge at times.  I loved the role of Lt. Dan!
One of the best movies ever made.  Love the soundtrack and Tom Hanks is terrific (so is rest of the cast).
This was a very goood movie it had a very descent review to it and it was very educational for the taking...
This is one of the best movies ever made. People will be watching it for years. I've seen it about 7 times and I will watch it again.
A great movie and a great watch.  Tom Hanks does an amazing job portraying a mentally challenged man with a lifetime of events that he has faced.
This is a must see for everyone! Timeless movie. Tom Hanks brings to life a character that showed the best of humanity.
It's one of the best movies I have ever seen.  Superb acting, unusual story, humor: doesn't get much better than this.
This a great movie to watch.  Tom Hanks was great and so was Salley Field.  Would recommend it to all my friends.
This was " Forrest Gump "...I do remember the movie !Very talanted , very funny , very smart , very unpredictable !
A movie for everyone. We all feel a little dumb. This movie shows what just trying can accomplish. Very entertaining with lots of insights.
Tom Hanks as a lovable simpleton who tells us about his life and adventures with humor love and grace a must see classic film
Can't believe I didn't already have this movie, as it is one of the best of all time.  One of the few great movies in the last 20 years.
If you can only watch one movie in your life, this would be it.  This will be a film that a 100 years from now will be still a classic.
i love this movie it get heart and soul .
This is a classic movie and it is Tom Hanks. He in unbelievable in this movie. There is no way to hate this movie.
still enjoy this movie. it's one of those that need's to be in your collection if you like kurk russell
this movie is epic and awesome, great for me, the case and the disc in optimal conditions the only detail no manual or propaganda...
This movie is # two of the series! Its a must to have if you like the snake! Everybody should go out and get this movie for your collection!
John Carpenter & Kurt Russell make a great team again!  Loved ESCAPE FROM NEW YORK, and wonder why everyone in both films keep underestimating SNAKE!
Great co.5 Star service would deal with u always loved the movie fast service also that is y I deal with u. Kerry
this is a really fun movie to watch, great cast of characters. you will enjoy it very much. i have watch it so many times
Even though Escape from New York is still better, L.A. is a close second. Bruce Cambell a great camio actor.
This movie is gripping and Kurt Russel does an excellent job playing his roll.  If you have not seen this one, you should get it.
This is a great movie, very action packed, and suspenceful. It is a must see, and I would absolutely recommend it to others.
A lot of action,and Kurt Russell was amazing.One you will love,if you like action movies,like I do
Another Kurt Russell hit!!! Kurt Russell is a great actor, he can do just about any kind of  movie from Comedy to Suspense!
This is one of the greatest action movies of all time. just leave it at that.
Everything in this movie works perfectly. The pace, the setting, the acting, the cast. One of my favorites from Kurt Russell.
Great acting and thrilling story from the beginning to the end.  It is a movie you will enjoy watching again and again.
It was interesting to see the difference between the book and the movie. Some changes but mostly it was the same.
excellent movie glad i watched this first then watched along comes a spider very good movies will recommend others to watch
One of the very best crime dramas I have ever seen. Every character was fully developed, intricate plotline, absolutely enthralling.
I love to be entertained by a great story and mystery.  Alex Cross is a good character and one that inspires me. The story has a great ending.
Great movie; a lot of scary moments.  Had no idea who was the bad guy until the end.  Would definitely recommend.
Follows the book in most respects. Morgan Freeman and Ashley Judd are terrific. Definitely recommend, even if you have read the book.
I love the  horror and the twists and turns in this one.  A fun movie night with my sweet fellow.
Showed up just as described the outside was beautiful...looked like new..and the disk played great...I couldn't ask for better customer service!
I remember seeing this movie in the theaters when it first came out. I just had to own it. I love the movie. It has 2 of my favorite actors in it!
Morgan Freeman and Ashlee Judd are awsome in this movie its an awsome movie and i would recommend it to anyone
I love James Patterson and yet had not seen the movie. And I love Morgan Freeman (who doesnt?!)The movie was suspenseful and exciting!
This movie is a classic. I love this type of movie. Detective Thriller. Get it and you won't be disappointed.
This movie had me on the edge of my seat the whole time. Great ending. Kept me guessing until the very end.
love the suspense.  It's wonderful to see who the abductor/killer is.  Ashely Judd does wonderful in this.
This is a great movie. A thriller from beginning to end. If you haven't seen this yet, you need to rent it!
Great Great mivie in the Alex Cross series played by Morgan Freeman.  Freeman did an outstanding job in this role!
love this movie, have seen it many times and still love it.  great acting, great suspense and a freaky ending.
I saw this when it first came out back in 1997 and decided to watch it again.  Great purchase and a great way to get it which is on my Roku!
This is a a great movie for anyone who likes movies like these.  I watch it every once in a while.  Thank You!
This is an older movie and I had seen it before, but I liked it so well I watched it again, and it's as good the second time around.
this is a good movie to watch, I bought the dvd and watched it on amazon prime. Dvd works perfect and picture quality was great on prime.
This was a gift did not check out the condition,got it quickly keep up the good work.
I've seen this movie many times and pretty much only buy DVD's for those movies that I would watch over and over....and this is one of them!
Great sorry line and great ending Morgan Freeman pays alex cross very well. Always enjoyed this movie any more made?
Another movie I have had in my movie collection that I  and a great addition to our movies.upgraded to Blu Ray.  It  too has added extras
Streamed HD Grease.  Great picture quality and sound.  I love streaming movies.  The movie itself doesn't require any rating.  Love it
Great movie to watch. Perfect for movie night. The whole family will enjoy setting down and watching this movie together.
I have always love grase and I like this one with more songs and dance to be it's better then the when it first came out.
Love it every time. A great movie.  Great music and the best cast. All the tunes are singable. Try it.
Love this DVD and the little jacket cover is cool. One of my favorite movies, and my kids even like to watch and sing along with the songs.
Bought it for my 17 year old grand daughter, who loves Grease, she loves it.
Classic for kids and adults.  Olivia Newton.John Travolta have on-screen charisma.  What else can I say?  Good over-all movie entertainment.
This is a classic movie that never gets old! The quality is great and the price makes it even better!
Christmas present for my daughter. She will love it. Looks great, speddy service and I am sure she will enjoy this a lot. Thank you.
It was fun watching this with my daughter for the first time. She realized where a number of cultural references that she grew up with came from.
Love this movie. I bought this to have an updated version of this movie. It Seems to be working fine.
I had an absolute perfect experience all around. great product, brings back a lot of memories!! THANK YOU VERY MUCH!
I love  Grease  Much,I have it on LASERDISC And On DVD too,IF You like Music Movies...this one will rock yer BRAIN :p
A great old movie, and always worth seeing again.  Wish they would make movies like this now.  It is fun to see again and again.
Really well done classic movie.  This was what shot a great cast of stars to the top.  If you love music you can't miss with this.
Yeah!  All those extra features are great...but, just get this for the frikkin T-Bird jacket!
Loved seeing this film again with my daughter and granddaughter (age 12) - in part to prep for a 50's dance at school.
classic movie. Had to buy it for my Grandaughter. She of course, loved it too. Great for all ages. A movie you like to watch more than once
I love the movie, always have. I just decided I needed to buy it on dvd. it was well worth it
Grease is right up there with Dirty Dancing both Classic movies from a time when life was good and simple. Love to watch it snuggled up on the couch.
We got the Pink Lady Jacket Cover Edition and LOVE IT!It looks awesome in HD!Still loving all the songs after 30 years!
i liked the movie i have whiched this movie ofr years and every time i see it i like that much more
love it love it love it after all these years ... well worth the time to watch over and over
Just a great,fun,upbeat movie. Still great, still funny, still worth watching again and again. If you haven't seen it, you should.
I grew up during these years and I love this movie.  Watch it you won't be sorry.  If you're older than 65 you'll love it.
Good movie makes me feel young again ( and john Travolta is hot).  I really do like this movie worth the watch.
This is a fun movie and the musical numbers are pretty cool. It's worth it. Stockard Channing's Rizzo is a standout.
Had this on VHS and wanted it on DVD. Great movie my whole family enjoys watching and singing along to.
Who doesn't love this movie. I have been singing these song for over 20 years. Who doesn't love John Travolta!!!!
Of course who doesn't like this movie. My kids enjoy singing along to it and it's great from start to end.
The original love story between two high school kids each from opposite ends of the spectrum.  John Travolta and Olivia Newton-John are great!
I can't get enought of this film, simply love the story, the music, and the comedy. And the DVD it's a great option to have.
One of my all time favorites! Just what I expected, I wasn't looking for fancy features I just wanted this film on DVD!
It's a timeless musical that's loved by all, and the extras take you to another level. The full screen made it more enjoyable for me to watch.
It took me back to my days in high school! I knew individuals like everyone in the film. Music and singing was worth the movie price.
Daughter wanted this movie for christmas, it's a great movie no matter how old you are, blast from the past
I love this movie and now have it on my kindle fire. It works great on the kindle fire and the picture and sound are perfect.
This movie never gets old. One of the best musicals and movies of all time. It is in great condition.
Oldie but goody!  So much fun to watch and the music never gets old. Makes you want to get up and dance.
Great dancing, great songs, and of course the incredibly handsome john travolta I can watch this over and over. classic
Great songs,nostalgia. Women's rights are set back a century but other than that fun and cool to see John Travolta this young!
Great movie they should make a 3rd one I think if you haven't see this movie where have you been it is so great.
I saw this as a child and loved it. Such a fun movie to watch I had to add it to my DVD collection. I highly recommend it.
ALWAYS WANTED THIS MOVIE SO WHEN I FOUND IT HERE I GRABBED IT UP...NEVER GO WRONG WITH THIS MOVIE..ONE OF MY FAVES
Greese - A great movie, Great Acting -- John Trovolta is a great addition to this Great movie and play.
This movie is just fun!  Every year we watch Grease and it never gets dull.  I'm now buying for my kids DVD library.
Great walk down memory lane. One can never see this movie often enough. What a trip to see how young the stars were!Loved it.
This has been my life long favorite movie and I never get tired of watching it.  Highly recommend it to everyone.
I had to see the film again. It will be a gift. But it is still fun and the music is great.
The Grease Blu-ray is great the picture and sound quality is awesome,  sounds like you are at a movie theater . I give it 5 *****.
I have followed Grease from the first and enjoyed it again and will continue to do so and again and again.
An oldie, but a goody! Love this movie and never tire of it. This came on time and the packaging was in perfect condition.
This movie is such a classic. Enjoyable from beginning to end, even though most of us could recite the dialogue along with the actors.
A classic that continues to entertain. Who would have guessed, right? a a a a a a a a a
This is one of the best musicals ever made. And now blu-ray with this improved image and sound... I can't express... It's just wonderful!
Loved the movie. I always enjoy watching it. I can never get tired of watching the movie.
I love this movie. It came out when I was inthe8 th grade and I still enjoy watching it. You won't be dissappointed
I bought this classic for my 14 year old daughter as it's one of her favorite movies.  It's so much fun to sing along with!
who would love this classic movie... seeing my idol Olivia and John... a childhood memory that refuse to go away.. love it
His this movie on VHS. Had to get rid of VHS player. Wanted a copy on DVD. A very fun movie.
This movie is worth a 5 stars it is better then the second movie
This picture in blu-ray looks so stunning and almost too realistic.  I really enjoyed watching this again and am glad I have it on blu-ray.
Something that goes back and gives a definitive look at the past.  Fabulous music, exciting dancing and great plot.  What else can you ask for?
My mother's favorite movie has rubbed off on me. Get a group of boys and girls, split them up and sing Summer Nights...lol
My 17 year old daughter loves this movie, so when I found this edition at such an awesome price I just had to buy it for her for Christmas!
This is a classic. I had it on VHS and didn't have a VHS player anymore. I don't watch the movie much but still wanted a copy of it on DVD
I've had this movie in VHS format. I finally decided to buy it in DVD to enjoy it with my teenage daughter. We love this movie!
Go greasers, cool cars. Back to the more innocent days of fun, the drive-in's, roller skating waitresses, cherry cokes! miss it all.
I enjoyed the movie on regular DVD and it is so much better on Blue Ray.Sound is much better.Glad I added this to my collection
whats not to love? grease is a classic! Olivia and John have such great chemistry together. I love singing to it while watching it.
I watched this growing up and loved it. I was glad to see my teen children loving it as well. The quality was great.
Loved this movie in the 70s and fun to watch with my Family now as a musical that still holds up.
Who doesn't love them?  I could watch this over & over; good movie, lots of fun.  Especially at the end when Sandy changes up her look.
I remember watching this in like 5th grade in the theater multiple times - now my 4th grade daughter just loves it too!
This is one of my all-time favorite movies, and I felt it was time to replace my old vhs version with a dvd.
I am not a musical type guy, but this one has been a favorite since it came out. Watch this one for some good family fun
love this movie, it was exactly what i wanted. came in great condition and could not ask for any more!
We like this movie - the music mostly, but it is also fun to see the leading actors when they were younger.
The whole thing is a hoot. From the beginning to the end lots of funny, touching scenes but no boring scenes.
I have always loved this movie. It takes me back to the time I was in High School. That was many ears ago.
Another favorite movie that I will be able to watch when I want to even without internet access. Also have Grease 2 and watch it as well.
This movie is a good time.  So many great stars (Stockard Channing).  But John Travolta is great - the charisma and talent.
my wife is still singing all those classic songs from this movie. Says she's watched more than 100 times. Awesome
I've always liked this movie and I think Olivia Newton-John is great. The team up with John Travolta really works.
It's a classic movie of boys meets girl and the cool boy denies his feelings to his male friends to stay cool and pretend to be a ladies-man.
This was a very sad movie I with Jack had lived at the end the movie looks and sounds good with lots of special features
Amazing film. Extraordinary from all other movies. All the actors had perfect performances. Great story. I will never forget this film!!
I seen all of titanic movie but my fav is this once with Leonardo DiCaprio the one that play Rose will bring out her role in the movie.
Have watched three times and still finding new things to see.  3D is the best.  Still have 30 more views to beat the original.
Love Love Love Love this movie. always will! I watch this when I'm feeling down and lonely. Got it used and was in good condition.
Got a completely new DVD of Titanic at an amazing price! I don't think I could've found a better deal anywhere else! It's awesome!
I got this for my wife she loves this movie and to get it in 3D now she can love it more and enjoy it with her mom and sister.
TITANIC (Special Collector's Edition)Should be Added in your Collection..A very very very very great Movie For All times :P
If u love James camron and titanic then this is the perfect collection for u. It have very cool stuff
Would watch this movie a 1000 times ! so romantic. With the 3D it gives the movie a whole new touch and i like it!
This may be a love story but it has so many great elements about the Titanic. Will watch again and again
If you are a collector you must have it!!! A great edition of a great film. James Cameron's Titanic!!! Buy it!!!
THIS MOVIE IS COOL AND FUN AND COOL OFFICERS IN THIS MOVIE
Every one knows this is such a great movie. A++
this movie is great. people who don't think so need to shut up and shut up. (it's not my favorite movie EVER though)
This movie deserves 5 stars because it is the greatest movie known to man kind. It bring tears of joy and pain all at once! It is amazing!
Titanic is a classic hit. The movie ran fine with great resolution. Thanks! I would highly recommend this move to those Titanic enthusiasts.
This movie tied with the 1959 classic Ben-Hur with 11 Oscars but this picture did NOT have a single actor won one of these.
this movie is a masterpiece.extremely great acting,cast and titanic ship that took three years and a few months to make,just for this movie
Its good....even on Blu Ray. It's been a while since I've seen it and it's really great on Blu Ray. This was made for High Def.
both  version on dvd and on  blueray are excellent,theirs transfer and quality are the best.i love it looks so nice,,thank you
its play good and the right color and plays well so i like the product very muchand i also like the movie
Classic Movie tha was a must be for the famly library. Great actors and the bewitching plot line keep you engrossed in the movie.
Great movie! & in 3D even better I got a blue ray 3D set & a 52 inch plasma. The sharpness of it all is just fantastic, & it just looks so real.
Titanic is a great movie.  Good plot, and great movie!Now that's entertainment!
Everyone knows the movie was great.Now we can say that they returned to it and did an excellent job bringing it to life again in 3D.
Incredible  in 3D format...interesting events.I will recommend it to my friends, actually did I invite them to watch it and they love it
What is there left to say about Titanic. It is a brilliant film. Leonardo Dicaprio and Kate Winslet are magic together. Loved the movie.
got this to round out the modern movie collection of love stories for our library of movies we liked when first out - looks great in blu ray
My ten year old is nuts about the Titanic so this was a great choice and he really enjoyed it.
Loved it again and again because my original DVD somehow grew legs.  The colors and music are just classic to enjoy.
Could not play it because the DVD you sent was only for Canada and USA so bought it locally.a lot nor expensive.but it was worth it
What's not to like about this flick? Great cast, riveting story, and based on history. I rent it again and again.
It was great to watch this movie in 3D, so much more enjoyable.  I loved it and recommend it to everyone.
This is one of my favorite movies of all time - just a classic! I love it! Leo and Kate are amazing!
Bluray is the best way to watch at home. A classic as good as Gone With the Wind-- when there's nothing on Tv- it's a &#34;go to&#34;. I love it.
I got so tired of watching it because I could not stop watching it. As soon as the euphoria from the 90s wears off, ahma watch it again!
yes i love this product. i will buy again if time and money permit. looking forward to a purchase again when.
Rented this to watch with my teenagers for the first time. Its a classic and holds up very well. The kids loved it.
I recieved this right on time so I did not have to go to the store and buy. Have not watched it yet but could be tonight.
My daughters are true romantics and we about wore out our videotape so decided to upgrade to a DVD. Now it's getting even more mileage!
I saw the original in the theatre and haven't seen this since. This was great to see in 3D! Great sound, cool effects. Fine buy.
I'm still suffering a little hypothermia from this movie.  It looks so good in 3D that I was a little surprised I don't have wet feet!
Great movie, great acting..photography second to none.A must see!!
I love this movie and I had to find a place where it was sold at. This is by far the best Titanic movie. If you like the Titanic buy this movie.
This is a very good buy.  It storyline keeps you entranced and would recommend highly
Its the freaking Titanic! Whats not to love?!  I'm pretty sure I have seen this move at least 20 times and it never gets old!
grand daughter wanted to see the original and this was great. She loved it. She hates love stories and loved this one
The picture is perfect in this great film. Everyone should see Titanic in blue ray it is fantastic. A must see film for everybody.
This IS MY FAVORITE MOVIE OF ALL TIME. I have my bedroom decorated in Titanic I HIGHLY recommend the seller and the product. I LOVE IT!
great movie, husband hates when ever he hears the music, because he know what I am watching, comes in and is like , ugh!
My grandaughter wanted this for Christmas and I was happy to get it for her. It never fails to please .
I CHOSE THIS ITEM, BECAUSE I LOVE THE MOVIE, I WOULD RECOMMEND THIS ITEM TO EVERYONE OF ALL AGES, ITEM PACKED GREAT.
best movie ever made. the best romantic film ever. It makes you cry everytime you watch it. you gain different perspectives each time you watch it.
The mother of all movies now in 3d wow. It has a great 3d effect. I felt like watching it for the first time.
We wanted to get a good movie that was 3D and this one did not disappoint.  It was pretty unbelievable.  Loved it and would recommend.
I GOT THIS IN3D AND I HAVE TO SAY IT WAS LIKE I WAS ON THE SHIP WOW. IF YOU HAVE A 3DTV BUY THIS NOW !!!
this is a great to learn about the past and watch ever you want to watch and you have some fun watching it
Titanic DVD was sent in super time and it was great. Thank you very much :)
This is an awesome movie. It is one of my favorite movies of all times. I can watch it over and over again.
I can watch it again and again.  Titanic still holds fascination with people today, movie brings the whole thing to life, with a nice story too.
One of the classical great films brought to life in yur very living room. You can believe and almost feel it happening.
I had this movie in my collection but in VHS.  Had to replace it with Blu-Ray and loved watching again.  So well done.
Great movie full of action and romance.A great combination.Lots of extras on the dvd's.Highly recommended!
Got this for a present for my grandmother after she enjoyed a trip to the Titanic museum.  She loved it.
Have always loved this movie! Could watch it over & over & have so many times it about has driven my husband crazy!
I don't have to tell anyone what a great movie this is.  it speakes for itself.  Very well acted and great job on special affects
Just got back from watching the 3D film in theaters. IT's been my favorite film for the past 15 years! I love it & I love Titanic!!!
I love Leonardo DiCaprio!  And he was simply spectacular in this classic!  I watch it often.  It's historic and provocative!!
Great quality and picture.  Made a great christmas gift with all the diffrent versions even though you really only need one.
Classic film.  We love it every time we watch it.  The sound track is wonderful on surround sound. The detail in the costuming and set are awesome.
i love titanic and i love even more that its on blu ray! this is a great movie! such a great love story / tragedy!
Same story but the screen quite different than the but which is not 3d, cool. If you like this movie I will recommend you to get it.
I love this movie. It's the only movie that I can watch over and over again. It couldn't be any better.
It's dicaprio and winslet. What else needs to be said. Those two can do anything. When there together its gold.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE AND THIS REPLACED A LOST COPY I HAD. I HAVE WATCHED IT SO MANY TIMES AND NEVER GET SICK OF IT.
Wonderful to give also as a gift, to upgrade to 3D. I was Blown out of the water with the Stunning Blue Ray and 3D filming. Well Done!
Titanic is one of the greatest movies ever made. Period. I liked how they incorporated a love story in with the sinking of the ship.
this is seriously one of the best movies of all time, the story line is excellent, James Cameron is awesome!
Of course I love the movie; I'm happy with this DVD version, and the price was right.
This was my 1st streaming movie on Amazon and it turn out to be a good one. We will try some more again.
The 3-D images were magnificant.  It was very clear and precise.  Great story.  Always good to watch and now even better in 3-D.
We all truly enjoyed this movie!  The picture quality was beautiful and I know I will watch it again!  3D effects were Awesome!
This has always been one of my favorite movies and I was so happy when I got it on the mail! The quality is great!
This is a movie everyone must own!  I thought it was fantastic. If you didn't like it than maybe movies aren't for you!
Absolutely Love this movie, had to get it! it came on time & in perfect condition. I'm glad with this purchase.
The 3D was excellent. Shame it is in 2 parts over 2 Discs.Picture quality was great. Nice to finally see it in 3D.Enjoyed watching it again.
I loved the movie the first time but fell in love with the movie again in 3D. Brilliant worth the money, paid 1/2 off retail.
verry good
Where is the alternate ending?  We all have our own preferences and I for one prefer the alternate ending available on former DVD releases.
It is amazing for this classic blockbuster movie to come in a nicely box...Worth for every single dollar u spent.
Really love the new additions. Great story and love story. Really makes you feel like you were on the Titanic living this moment in time
The world is about to end.  Mass panic.  Man sets aside his differences and works towards saving the world. (Like that would ever happen)
This is a nice film from really good special f/x, the acting great,a good addition to your collection.....Enjoy.
i found this movie great i watch it a few times and i throught it was very goodcharlene
I found the movie exciting, enjoyable and a action movie. Of course I liked the actor and actress. I would recommend the movie to see.
but it deserves a better DVD!More features Paramount..please!
wow such a good movie. on bluray the picture and sound is so much better than the original dvd. it was shipped quick and packaged well.thanks again
THE ACTORS DID A GREAT JOB IN THIS MOVIE! THIS MOVIE WILL BRINING TEARS 2 YUR EYES AN KEEP U INTERESTED!
excellent storyline along with some fine acting and score
New, exciting, this shows brings you home to what your feeling really are about home and family in todays society.
robert duvall and all other cast portrayed were great.. kinda scary that this could happen to our world. would definitely recommend this
This is Armagedon with a heart, human feelings play a larger role in this movie and the end result is pretty good.
Here we have a processor to Armageddon  but its another great  disaster  flick with a lot of really great special f/x we really like it.
The story is an excellent tale of Let Days. It's lack is that the good guys win in the end and, that is probibly not the way it would playout.
This is one great disaster movie! It is even better than 1998's Armageddon! I loved this movie! It told a solid story of love and survival!
I like Morgan Freeman and any end of the world movies a good date movie to snuggle with someone if you have prime.
I would recommend this product to anyone who teaches science through film.  It holds your interest and is somewhat authentic.
Good acting, special effects, and a sound scenario... for another way our world may end.  Very enjoyable and familiar actors!
I liked this movie. There was a lot of action in it. It makes you think though. What if this really happen? What would you do?
I know many movies try to top the previous disaster movie this one was great.  It showed the human spirit is willing to try and over come all
Arrived in the condition I had hoped it would. One of my all times favorite movies. Just needed to have my own DVD version of it.
This is another early Elvis movie that I enjoy watching.By seeing these old movies one can tell how his voice gets better.Great for Elvis fans.
this was a really great movieHE PLAYED HIS PART SO WELL.AND IT WAS VERY INTERESTING ALL THE WAY THROUGHI'M GLAD I HAVE IT
this movie is so fun tom and mark are good as the main guys in the movie
Another top movie with mark Paul gosselaar in it. This movie is just like Freshman's fall. So watch this.
This is a very funny movie.  If you like movies like Road Trip and Old School, you'll like this.
I liked, this movie a great college, film I laughed through this movie  you'll like, this it's worth the money enjoy...
I watched this movie and thought it was great.  This movie will take you back to another era and the Blu-ray picture is stunning.
Gift.  Purchased for a friend.  No idea at all.  She says it is a marvelous film and that I should watch it someday.
The all time best Movie ever. I have watched this movie so many times throughout my lifetime and was so happy to find available on Blu-Ray
This is perhaps one of my favorite movies. I am so glad that it is now on DVD.  Charlton Heston delivers once again!
An amazing story of Hope and Courage excellently portrayed by all the actors, especially Hugh Griffiths and of course Charlton Heston. Thanks Anne
for if it meets my expectations, I think original as you open the box, really beautiful, very complete, as a collector I love.Thanks to this
This has been a favorite of our family for many years.  Replaced the VHS with DVDs. Would recommend to families.
Loved it.  You won't be disappointed in any of it.  I love displaying the Ten Commandments on my table.  Really looks cool ;o)
This is a classic movie I just had to own. Now I can watch it without Commerical interuptions.Great buy for the price.
If you see this movie and read the bible you will get how it go and get the bible more better.
Very good transfer of this classic movie. Has all the intro music and intermission. Very nice presentation and some interesting extras.
This is a classic and a great epic movie which we enjoy watching every once in a while.  We highly recommend it.
my dad enjoyed getting this for Christmas, he's been watching the ten commandments since I can remember. Great dvd, shipped fast
My mother loves this movie, and I remember having to watch it with my brother EVERY easter. I was glad to find it on DVD for my mom.
this looks and sounds amazing on blu-ray and to be able to go to your favorite scene is just a sweet bonusthanks
A movie that transcends the ages. I remembered watching it a young boy, still captivates me now.
This was bought as a gift. This is the original movie released in theaters and then on TV. A true classic and epic.
This a fantastic movie after all these years. The upscale to HD was a work and adds to the epic scale of the movie.
Love biblical stories, this is one of my favorites. On rainy days I have a film festival of the movies in my collection.
This is Charlton Hestons 2nd. greatest movie ever made and I really loved Yul Brenner, two of the greatest stars of the big screen.
This is a great movie for all those who love the big screen epics from the 50's & 60's.  The blu-ray brings it back to life.
It came in great condition. It is a classic movie about a true event that the whole family can enjoy.
This is a classic movie and was expertly remastered.  It's really beautiful picture quality considering when the movie was filmed.
Got this for my mom, but it's on TV every Easter week.  Did a great job with this movie for it's time.
This is another one of those golden films that you want to pull out -- to view when special holidays roll around.  It works for me!
TOOK ME BACK  MY GRANDMA WOULD WATCH THE OLD EPIC MOVIES DURING EASTER/CHRISTMAS AND IT WAS A SENSE OF WARMTH THROUGHOUT THE HOUSE
ACTING AND PICTURE WERE EXCELLENT.  IT WAS A GRAND PRODUCTION WHICH WAS VERY WILL RECEIVED WHEN IT WAS FIRST RELEASED.
This is a great movie from beginning to end.  It is a classic and will be relevant in the future as well as it has been in the past.
A timeless movie.... Charlton Heston in another historical role and being magnificent at it.... Good Christian family movie.It is an.excellent movie.
This is a great DVD.  I remember seeing it in a theater years ago.  Very strong actors and actresses tell a wonderful story.
This movie is so helpfull to understand the life of Moses great movie I truthly recommended Great service God bless you!!!
GREAT box set - the picture looks stunning for a 1956 movie and the old silent film is an added bonus. DeMille knew how to make them.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE. It has a lot of scenes that were made up but it does get the mind to see the greatness of God.
A great classic available to watch on DVD
this is a really good dvd movie that I highly recommend that you watch if you have not watch it in a long time
This movie I watched years ago and it still rates a 10 to me, So mo9ving and so real to live also,  One of the best movies ever made
The colors in this DVD are incredible.  The costumes are stunning
How could you not appreciate all the stars in this film and the wonderful work they do in their art.
I purchased this for my 85 yr. old mother and she loves all the old movies. SHe has watched this and all the other oldies several times each!
I love Charleton Heston and this was replacing our older VHS copy.  We watch it every year at least once!
What an outstanding movie and what miracles they all witnessed! This is certainly one of my favorite movies and I highly recommend it!
Just getting things I saw as a child that I really loved. This Movie was one of them, it is just fantastic.
A classic.  Charlton Heston is good in anything he has done.  So much better that the popular movies of today.
I glad I was able to get a new copy of this.  It looks and plays great.
I love this film.  Thank you for such fast shipment.  Now I have this added to my wonderful memories.  Highly recommend.
this looked great and sounded great.  i can't help however but think of mel brooks playing Moses with 15 commandments and dropping 5 by mistake.
The story of Moses and the exodus from Egypt as told by old Hollywood.  Movie making just doesn't get better than this,
It's good to watch this classic at least every year. I'm glad to finally own a copy of my own.
Great movie an all time classic, Finally can watch this movie without all the commercials. Quality of the movie in Blu-ray makes it even better.
I have always loved this -- and is Great for a beginner. For it's day it has Great effects, and great emotions
i had been looking for this movie in many places, im glad i found it at the amazon site..this movie will live for ever
Excellent movie.  The HD quality is excellent.  I have watched this movie the most repeatedly of any movie in my lifetime.
on of the great ones very well done and a family picture need more of these
This is one of the best movies ever made. It gives a very good dramatic rendition of the Exodus story.
Had not see this in years. Better than ever, amazing and done without CG. Watch this movie! So let it be written, so let it be done.
I grew up with this film and it still brings back memories of Bible stories told well. And I love the special effects.
Charlton Heston's role as Moses is spectacular. Cecil B. DeMille pushed above and beyond with this masterpiece. Cant recommend it enough.
It is the message that is captivating along with the excellent acting.One can never tire of watching this excellent timeless movie!
I hadn't watched this movie in years, It was just as great as I remembered,
I love this movie, so glad it is now on Blue ray. I have seen it several times. Thank you
I love the classic Ten Commandments. I buy the classics rather than the newer movies because they are more fitting with the fKJV
One of the finist work ever made for life. Traditionally I make it for the easter holidays.and this movie is really amazing.
my grandson is 12 wanted it ,he really enjoys watching it a great movie for the whole family to enjoy.
Excellent movie, great cast and fabulous storyline. A star studded cast makes this a top 5 religious film in my collection.
I really enjoyed seeing it again. It has been years since I saw the movie in a theater. They just don't make movies like this any more.
This is one of my favorite movies of all times and on a good day I would definitely recommend it to anyone
Watch this classic every year and hate all the commercials that ruin the flow of this epic film. Finally decided to buy and own. Worth it!!
My all time favorite movie to watch at Xmas and Easter time. I love this movie and have ever since i was a kid and now i am almost 50.
I have loved this movie for decades.  The downloaded version on my amazon.com site does not disappoint.  Audio and picture are crystal clear.
I got this for my sister she loves Charlton Heston. I think she has watched 5 times What a wondeful actor
I love this movie and am so pleased to have it on a DVD so I can watch the thing, uninterrupted by tv commercials.
I love all the bible stories and can not wait to get the rest of the movies. it is a great movie for the family
All Christians should see this epic biblical story and surely they will enjoy to their fullest.  Enjoy to their fullest.
Love the introduction with Mr. Demille (sp?). This is a beautifully done movie worth watching again and again. So glad it was available for purchase.
It's the Ten Commandments!Very corny and over-acted, but great to watch time and time again.1950's type widescreen epic.
If you don't have a copy for your family, get one.  This is colorful, brilliant, moving.  An excellent gift for everyone.
I thoroughly enjoyed the movie.  Danny Kaye is great with the speed and pronunciation of his specialty pieces. Fun story line.
My husband introduced me to this movie and I've been hooked ever since.  My husband is in his fifties and my son is a teenager; we all love it!
Danny Kaye turns in a great performance as a court jester. He battles Basil Rathbone in a classic sword fight, that rivals Errol Flynnany time.
Great movie. Old, but one of my favorites! . . . . . . . . . . . .
We love this old movie. The chalice with the palace . . . is as good as the who's on first gag.
Danny Kaye, Danny Kaye, Danny Kaye!  All the actors were great but, Mr. Kaye was phenomenal.  Light-hearted, silly and lots of fun.
great Danny Kaye fun.  Sylvia Fine lyrics and Danny Kaye banter.  the vessel with the pessle has the brew that is true.  A good popcorn 5 star movie!
Great movie. Danny Kaye was outstanding. The best part in the movie is when he is playing a old man. Pure pleasure. Watch it.
This movie is great and has so many clever lines and situations. It's great that you can own it in digital format now.
Couldn't be more delighted with this movie. Arrived was timely and in great condition.  Still in great shape after being watched many times.
This is old time clean fun, the kind most people today can not find elsewhere.  I love Danny Kaye's humor.
I have seen this movie before and really like it,danny kaye is really good as the court jester.get it while you can
This is such a classic!! I've missed it since I gave up my VCR copy. Waiting to show it to my grandchildren.
Classic! Silly and Funny! It's great seeing these actors when they were so young. Good Family Entertainment and lots of laughs.
Great movie!!!  Wonderful family viewing!  we all laughed out loud!!  Wish they made them like this now!!!  We highly recommend it!
FAST SERVICE, EXCELENT CONDITION AND THE MOVIE IS ONE OF THE BEST DANNY KAYE DID ITS AN OLD MOVIE BUT ALL AGES COULD ENJOY THIS ONE.
A classical, and its so funny.  Its for the whole family, and even old folks like me enjoy it.A must.
This is Danny Kaye in his prime, and I really enjoyed this movie. Wonderful comedy, musical, action, nice very nice.
One of my favorite movies. Haven't got tired of watching it again and again. Especially useful when I need a good laugh.
LAUGHED AS A KID, NOW LAUGHING WITH MY KIDS, WE ALL LOVE IT. FILM QUALITY & COLOUR IS AMAZING
Ths is Danny Kaye at his best!  Great film with a great cast as well. I recommend this movie to all.
I have seen this film many times and highly recommendit.  Danny Kaye is great in it!
A SPLENDID EXAMPLE OF DANNY KAYE'S MULTI-FACETED TALENTS.  I THOUGHT THAT BOTH ANGELA LANSBURY & GLYNNIS JOHNS WERE ABSOLUTELY GORGEOUS!
I love this movie and it was free of scratches and major damage. Really happy with my decision on this purchase!!
I liked this movie because it was funny and it had a good storyline.You should buy this movie.
i love this movie its so cute!!!!!!! good quality in hd but not sd other than that its good very happy
Tommy and his friends get lost in the woods. So they are on a mission to find the wizard so they can go home.
How can you not love Indiana Jones? If you haven't seen it you must see Indiana Jones and the Raiders of the Lost Ark.
DVD was in great shape.  Gotta love the original version.  It set the bar for the sequels.  Typical Harrison Ford perfection.
Always great!
I watched this as a child and enjoy watching it with my child today. Good, Clean, and Fun!. You cant beat that.
C'mon, it's Indiana Jones!  Classic movie that never disappoints. This one wasn't my favorite one of the series, but still great.
Who does not like Indiana Jones?  The DVD featured extra options and was well worth it. If you like the series you would LOVE this!
My VHS tape finally wore out; this was the perfect replacement-and-upgrade to my Indiana Jones collection, at a great bargain.
Great '80's movie! Always a great Saturday night flick, great family movie!
Has as much excitement as when I first saw the movie. Photography is wonderful also. Plan to watch over and over.
Who doesn't know this is a great fun ride of a film?  I wanted it for my library. Enjoy this film.
This first movie of the Indiana Jones series is the best with young and vibrant actors in a well written and directed movie.
very interesting good storyi do rec omen it  to teensnot for smalll kidsrecomend itok i give it 5 stars
enjoyed this movie very much.it just a GOOD old fashion family movie that everyone can sit down and ENJOY.It has a little something for all ages
The First , and A Classic for any Movie , but especially for Indiana Jones
How can anyone who has lived through the 80s not enjoy this movie. A classic that our family turns to many times.
I can't believe I have students who have never seen this movie. It is the best example of Freytag's Pyramid in movie form.
I watched this movie with my 8 year old son and he loved it. He was scared and he loved every minute of it.
Always have enjoyed this series and wish they would produce some more chapters.  I would certainly watch and buy them!
It took a couple of veiwings to like this one,but now I do.The action is amazing and the story is easy to follow.Buy it,you won't be disappointed.
C'mon, it's Indiana Jones!  Classic movie that never disappoints. I liked this one better than the Lost Ark.  Just my preference.
What's not to love - a classic adventure with Indy who keeps getting his character-ridden, beautiful face beat up everywhere he goes!
I love Indiana Jones and my video one crapped out on me so I had to upgrade to the DVD. Arrived quick
Great action classic.
The Temple of Doom lives up to the first Indy movie.Lots of action and comic relief.Pure fun and entertainment.Indy 1,Bad guys 0.
This is one of the best in the series.  You know that this is far fetched, but it is fun to watch.
I think this was the best movie of all the Indianas. Great movie ,great buy.
Sean may be too old for 007, but his acting is tops in this oneDidn't care for number fourThis one is best of the series
this is my favorite indiana jones movie.Buy it and you'll agree.The ease with which I found this dvd was amazing.
Why read a review on this movie...its the greatest adventure of all time.  just watch it and enjoy
We  have all of the I.J.'s on DVD;s wanted to up grade to CD's. Thanks for great mailing Enjoyed watching
Great flick, possibly better than the first.  LC gives some back story, some new adventures, some character development and Henry Sr.
One of my fathers favorites - he can watch this over and over. Connery & Ford work so well as father & son.
I love Indy.  I have all four movies. They are great.  Too bad he has to get old like the rest of us.
Love these movies. Well you know I have too. I mean I bought them . And I have seen the movies dozens of times.
This Blu Ray disc adds color, definition and clarity to an already eye-catching film. As for content, this is the best of Indiana Jones series.
I love Indiana Jones and my video one crapped out on me so I had to upgrade to the DVD
Still one of the best action movies of all time, I think its better than Raiders, but you be the judge
This movie is a classic, a must own,it puts Ford in the top ten actors,of all time.
Two classic heroes slugging it out with the &#34;bad guys&#34; , chasing after the holy grail and wooing the same woman!! Don't miss this!!!!
I had to order this movie after visiting Petra in Jordan.  Who doesn't love Indiana Jones and the chance to see &#34;The Treasury&#34; at Petra??
Great transaction. Loved this movie, The storyof Knights still living and protecting the chalice of Christ at the last supper was great.
My dad loves Indiana Jones but only had them on VHS. This was a great way to update him and still give him something he'd love.
They did well.  It sits in my DVD cabiet, next to all the Indiana Jones DVDs, including Young Indy's films.  YeeeHaw!
If you loved the Indie movies..and who doesn't?  You'll want this set.I'm thrilled to have it in my DVD collection.
I own this WideScreen Edition 4 disc one of my Favorite movies :)
If you don't have them separately, then this is the set for you.  I tossed the bonus material, don't have time to listen to drivel.
Wonderful archaeology adventure! Harrison Ford was a great actor and Karen Allen was a great actress! More movies ought to be made like this! Encore!
The IJ series is awesome this allows you to see all three on dvd with tons of extra footage, anyone who likes the IJ movies should buy this.
Excellent quality. I recommend buying DVDs from Amazon. You can't go wrong. I love their fast shipping.
Exciting, funny, great viewing for all ages.  Can't miss adventure film - part fantasy, part real.  One of Harrison Ford's best roles.
Your in for the wildest ride with these four DVDs. Four is a bonus DVD.And the Box set are Full review, it is the best movies that you can get.
So glad I could replace my VCR tapes with DVD's and get the entire set.  Watched all of them through - marathon Indy!!!
This series looks fantastic and is money well spent when using my PS3 to upconvert this to my TV.  Couldn't be happier.
Gave as a gift and they enjoyed it. My husband and daughter love this series
As a kid, I loved all the movies of Indiana Jones. Now, I can have them all in one box in wide-screen and nice picture quality.
Harrison Ford done a lot of courageous acting in these DVD movies.  They were very exciting for the young and old.
Great set for anyone who enjoys Indiana Jones series. A great price also. So go ahead and get it now
Subject says it all.  You can't beat the price and the shipping was free too!  I love Indiana Jones!
DVD's received in excellent (new) condition; no scratches; received in due time. Thank you!
My favorits are the first and specially the third part. Indiana Jones is great adventure at its best.
Bang! Pow! Crack! Punch! Whip!  Your all my bitches now bow down before me the great Harrison Ford as Indiana Jones has spoken!!!
Well, it just doesn't get any better than this.  I can't wait for the new one this summer!
! SO much fun.  Just watch it over and over again and still entertained and laughing and screaming .
...It's the greatest adventure film ever made - period....
THE ONLY REASON I WOULD EVER REPLACE THIS COLLECTION WOULD BE TO BUY ONE WITH THE LAST CRUSADE INCLUDED!!!  TIMELESS ENTERTAINMENT!!!
It's so nice to see movies that are not wide screen. Good to add to great movie collections
Good adventure, humor, and yet I can show my grandchildren the show.
I enjoy watching the Indiana Jones movies, and the dvd's make that even better.  VHS was ok in it's day, but upgrading was worth it to me.
I can't remember Enjoying A DVD movie as Much as I  enjoyed thisBuy It And you will see why as well..........
Even though old, these were some of the greatest movies made.  Can't wait for the next chapter.  Loved watching everyone of them over.
Love Indiana Jones and love that this comes in a box to protect and keep them all in one place
I bought this collection after I saw Indiana 4, it was great deal for fun movies
Great action movie or alittle Sci-Fi in it.If you like Harrison Ford movies then you won,t be disappointed with this one.
best in wide screen.  got to love the classics, and why would you buy in blu ray? just to have another Lucas remake?
Product in excellent condition! I bought this as a gift for my boyfriend. It is an awesome DVD collector set! Who doesn't love Indie?!
Great Box set, doesn't have the last crappy movie as a part of it. Arrived in less than a week, much faster then expected.
this is Harrison ford at his second best the first being starwars, empire strikes back, and return of the jedi.
Arrived in the condition I had hoped it would. Indiana Jones is definitely one of my favorites. Had to obtain the DVD format version.
This a excellent one to get it has everything a well made production if havnt seen buy it don't miss it's on amazon prime too
very in depth on star trek  fanatics...and how much the star trek cast love them and how they look forward to each convention
This picture shows to what length a daughter will go to have her father's love.
John Travolta is such a GREAT actor and I enjoy many of his movies!!!!General's Daughter being 1 of my favorite I will be watching a lot....
Love the suspense and has great characters.  This movie was one of John's best movies and left me in suspense until the end.
John Travolta does some outstanding acting in this movie.  It's a great movie with a great supporting cast.  Get for your video DVD library.
thank-you for the promptness in receiving of this movie.had it before-lost it in a move.one of my favorites w/John Travolta.
This was purchased as a gift for my daughter.  It is one of he favorite movies.  She will love having it in her library
Excellent movie... This is a replacement fo one that was lost... I've seen it many times and wanted it for my DVD collection of favorites
Filled with suspense, this is a great movie with at least two great actors.  Also has a good plot.  You won't want to hit pause even once.
I would recommend this movie to everyone.  It is one of my favorites.  I could watch this movie over and over.
This is one of the best movies by Tommy Lee and Ashley, excellent acting and suspense make this a great movie, the scenery does not hurt either.
I adore Ashly Judd and she plays a great roll.  This movie is full of action and has a great ending.
I always love a movie with Tommy Lee Jones, and this one had the added benefit of a stricking women; Ashley Judd.
This was a very good movie and the acting was great...I love both of them in this..glad I bought it.
Truely a great movie for all women, some have even been through this experience themselves. Never give up in the power of womanhood
Tommy Lee Jones is good in any film. The story line of this film makes it a model for vigilanties
Oldie but still goodie I really enjoy many times during the year. Both leads are so great near have all they each have done.
I would have liked it better in blue ray but all in all good movie. Well worth watching. At a good price
Ashley Judd is a phenominal actress.  She out does herself in each role.  This is well worth the watch and Tommy Lee Jones is a bonus.
Lots of twists and turns and just when you think you have it figured out, another twist shows up. Great movie!
Very good story and done well.  Tommy Lee in top form and Ashley Judd in fine form also.
I saw this on TV and had to leave before the ending, so I ordered this one and I've enjoyed it!
My hubby loves this movie and it arrived incredibly fast even during the busy holiday time! Thanks for providing great products at great prices.
I enjoyed the movie very much. It had a good plot and it kept me engaged. I would highly recommend this movie.
Saw this movie years ago in the cinema.  Great flick.  Enjoyed it again on Amazon Prime. Recommend it highly. Great cast!
This is third time I have watched this movie,  I absolutely like the premise.  LEE
Good movie and purchase.  Replaced a VHS Liked the additional features on this.  Will look for more DVDS like this.
I really liked this movie.Ashley Judd was great in the movie.A must see for anyone.A movie I will watch again.
Awesome Suspenseful Crime Drama Thriller and it kept me glued to my seat and Tomy Lee Jones and Ashley Judd are awesome in this movie.
Ashley Judd is awesome in this movte,Tommy Lee Jones is as always awesome Must see movie and added to my favorite classicmovie collection !n
This is another movie i must buy. I love it and enjoy it every time i watch it. i could never get tired of it.
There is really nothing not to like about Double Jeopardy.  It is very entertaining, was packaged well too and arrived in good shape.  Thank you!
This movie was great. What a brilliant plot. And I loved how Libby chased nick down with her mind. It was great*****!
I bought this to replace the VHS copy we own. We watch very little TV but enjoy our collection of tried and true favorites.
great thriller ashely judd is a great actress love the movie and great clear dvd lovely movie two famous actors
I enjoyed the acting in this movie, but what I thought really made the movie is the story line.  Very interesting ... worth watching again.
great suspenseful movie loved the plot and characters.  shipping time could have been quicker
Just to see Ashley Judd together with Tommy Lee Jones is well worth the viewing. Ending is terrific and a little unexpected.
Amazing story line keeps you wondering wts going to happen next! for sure recommend it. It will make a good movie night!
Like the strong female character.  It's a fun chase throughout the movie, with a good finish. Good performances by the actors.
A good movie....I have actually watched it twice.  Would recommend to anyone looking for a movie with a different twist.
This movie reminds me what happens when the wrong person gets convicted I would recommend this. That's why I support ine Innocent Project
This movie was made along time ago, however its still was a great movie and I really enjoy ed watching it again.
this was a excellent movie, the rating is just right for it. I have told a lot of friends about it
another good addition to my dvd collection of over 100 titles I will soon have to add more shelf space
not seen for a very long time. Remember it to be a great show. Wouldsuggest for every one to see.
Worth the money, Love his work. Worth watching time & time again. Happy with purchase. He can Gigolo me anytime.
This has been one of my all-time favorite movies for years now.  I have watched it over and over again. A+
Thanks for the fast delivery. I have been looking for this movie, but I never expected to find it on Amazon.com's website. Cool Bananas!!!
Great to see this 1980s classic in blu ray.  The movie, the fashion and music are iconic for that time period.
I bought this DVD, my VHS tape version was getting old. This one I viewed, had better picturequality than the VHS version.
Great! Would buy from this seller again, rec'd order in reasonable time.
One of the greatest episodes. The video and audio transfer were excellent.
This DVD helped to complete my collection and tie together the episodes and movies referring to the meetings of Kirk and Kahn.
Excellent movie. Also has a good sound track. Good movie for football lovers. My teenage son loves it. Great comedy and meaning full story.
Love this movie. No matter how old it is! They don't make teen movies like they used too!! One of my favorites for sure!
One of the best football movies out there. Really shows a true side to high scool football that alot of people don't know about
It was well worth the purchase. Was in perfect condition when i got it and so glad i can watch this DVD now.
Varsity Blues (Deluxe Edition) [Blu-ray]Very impressed by how well they improved the picture quality on the Blu Ray version.
this is a show the entire family has enjoyed for years and it is one we will come back in a few years and watch again...
This was a great and funny movie I really enjoy the characters and the theme to this movie great to watch with the whole family.
Good plot, good acting, good story line. Age old story of girl wants jock and in the end winds up with jock on her terms.
I laughed at this until I cried. However, its not for kids. Perhaps my humor is a bit lame, but the story has an endearing kind of charm.
My wife loves this movie, well we both do it's stupid-funny! Dumb humor and quirk moments had the family laughing constantly!
loved angela's ashes so much that I purchased &#34;tis&#34;- couldn't put either one down!  would definitely recommend both of these books.
This was a good story and well acted.  I think I could watch it again in a few years.True live America and Ireland back in the early 20s - 30s
Excellent book and movie.A sad movie, but we'll worth watching.From what I have read, the book and movie are historically accurate.
At first glance I thought this might be a boring movie -boy was I wrong!  I had to watch this movie a second time because it was just that good!
very happy with dvd. it's a very good movie, i would recommend any one to buy this title
I went, and saw this in theatres and it was very sad, but it was 2 hrs. 40 mins but it's good. You'll like, it!
This is one of my favorite books and the movie is pretty spot on. Very humbling and makes you grateful for the good things you have in life.
This movie is amazing! Truly makes you think &#34;my life hasn't been that bad&#34;.....Give it a chance; you won;t regret it.
This is a thoughtful and depressing movie.  It is extrememly well done as  documentation during a poverty time in Ireland's history
This movie is great and fun and I doubt it would happen in real life but it is hilarious! I recommend it.
I love anything with these two in it. The movie was cute and sweet and funny. exactly what i was hoping for and expecting.
Great movie, great cast. Not the first time I've watched this and I am considering purchasing it so I can watch it whenever the mood strikes me.
JULIA ROBERTS AND RICHARD GERE ARE THE BEST WHEN TEAMED TOGETHER IN MOVIES! WISH THERE WERE MORE THEN JUST 2!CUTE MOVIE.
This one was a great as I had hoped it would be. Julia Roberts and Gere  did wonderful acting jobs.This one will charm you.
I bought this movie as a gift for my friends mother who is a big fan of Julia Roberts. Great price for it!
So much fun to watch. How can you go wrong with this cast?  Gere and Roberts are perfect together again
This was a cute decent movie. I enjoyed it . Of course I love Richard Gere and also Julia Roberts......they don't come any better than these 2.
What's better than Julia Roberts and Richard Gere?? This is one of my favorite movies. This was a good buy too. Can't beat that!!
This movie was a ton of fun, hilarious and sentimental as well. A great chick flick that pairs up Roberts and Gere all over again!
This is a good movie. I like dgirly movies and not ashamed. You cry laugh and want to have that fairy tail.
Brought back together in this movie, Julia Roberts & Richard Gere are a wonderful duo!
WOW , THIS JUST SWEEPS ME AWAY AND MAKES ME FEEL LIKE A PRINCESS FINALLY FINDING HER PRINCE CHARMING AND STICKING TO IT
Julia always keeps you interested and for the most part fairly clean.  The two together made a good combination.  Yeah!
It's nice to break away from all the drama killing murder and super action movies and watch something nicely even paced it is enjoyable
I love Julia Roberts and Richard Gere and I don't know how I missed this movie. These two have chemistry.  Good, clean, fun movie.  Loved it.
I have seen this movie many times.  Loved watching it on my kindle.  If you want something light and cute this is the movie for you!
How could you go wrong purchasing a movie with these two outstanding actors? Fun movie with a fun story line.
The movie has a great plot.i love the fact that it brings up the point that you have to know who you are before you can be with someone else.
I wish Julia Roberts and Richard Gere made more movies together.  If you liked Pretty Woman, you'll love this movie.
she loves Julia.  I don't watch very girl movies and I call these, but she loves it and she has watched it 4 times already since she got it
Gere is not one of my favorite actors but he was really good in this movie.  Good movie, a tad corny, but all around fun for the family
What a perfect follow up to Julia Roberts & Richard Gere  "Pretty Woman"A Romantic comedy that makes you feel good!
I like the stars very much and I do like there movie's. This was very intertwining for me. I myself would watch it again.
love Richard Gere and Julia Roberts in this movie.  Don't know why it took me so long to get it
My wife forced me to watch this with her, and I was actually pleasantly surprised at how much I enjoyed the film.
The dvd came in great condition and plays well - this is such a sweet movie! I love all of Julia Roberts movies!
Very Good !  I do enjoy it very much.  That's all I have to say.  Thank you I don't have anymore to say
I have enjoyed this movie over and over again! I was thrilled to find it was available on my Kindle. I'm sure I will be watching it more than once.
The incredibly charismatic Fallen Angel proved once again the magnitude of his talent and godlike presence!
I LOVE THE LEGEND OF SLEEPY HOLLOW. LOVED THIS MOVIE AND THINK THAT THE ACTING COMBO DID AN AMAZING JOB..GOOD FAST SHIPPING
Funny, romantic, and a period story. Could you want more? Both leads at the top of thier game with a really good supporting cast.
Adding to the collection of my most favorite actor. Item in perfect condition and will be an all time favorite. Can't wait to see it again!
This is an instant classic. A must see for anyone who is into a gothic type of movie. I also recomend the book.
This was a great movie, I loved it the first time I saw it and it's an awesome addition to my home film library!!
We love this movie for Halloween Night. It is the cherry on top for movie night at our house on Halloween
I not only got this movie because I'm in love with Johnny depp but I absolutely love Tim burtons dark movie visions. ^_^
DEPP and Burton are a masterpiece made in heaven. Great Setting, story and plot. Its funny too.
THE MOVIE IS THE BEST, I ENJOY WATCHING THIS MOVIE SOMETIMES I WATCH AND ITS NOT HOLLOWEEN, I STILL ENJOY WATCHING.
By far one of my favorite scarey movies of all time. Great story, great visuals and the cast was excellent. LOVE this movie
This is another classic from Johnny Depp, well made and worth your time!  Most people should be aware of the premise of the story.
One of my fav movies so I thought it was time to own it. It came early and the DVD was new
Excellent movie, well done; it captures all of the mystique of Sleepy Hollow is and adult manner and stays close to the original story. w
I just love this adaptation and enjoy the portrayal of the characters very much.  Visually it is just fantastic and moody as well!
a real horror film that delights its viewers.gothic scenes are frightining,spring and verdure scenes are appealing.for scary movie buffs.
What a great movie. Would recommend it to anyone who loves suspense. It came early, at a very good price, and well packaged. Thanks very much.
This is one of my very first DVD purchases and favorites of TIm Burton. Its one of his most beautiful films photographed and Art Directed.
I can't do slasher films, I get too scared, but I love a good scary movie as much as the next girl :-)
The case was in good condition as claimed. The disc did not skip and there was no real scratches. It WAS in the condition it was said to be in.
This is by far not a scary movie but nice drama.  Its your typical dark Tim Burton and Johnny Depp movie.
A LITTLE WACKY BUT GREAT INTERPITATION OF THE ORIGINAL HEADLESS JORSE MAN BY EGAT ALLAN POE ADD IT TOO YOU COLLECTION
Johnny  Depp is great in this  film...But ,if  it  kept true to the  short  story.... Icabod crane would have been a teacherNOt a  police  Constiable
Just a classic film!!  As usual, Depp's performance is priceless and flawless...Great ensemble acting from the entire case.  Buy it!!  Enjoy it!!!
I loved this movie almost as much as Edward Scissorhands. It is a fantastic moody atmospheric horror movie. The story is fantastic.
I was very satisfied with this purchase, the dvd was in great condition. I have viewed it several times.  Thank you
Great way to tell the age old story of Sleepy Hollow.  This movie will immediately have you interested!  Great acting!
everyone should own this dvd and watch every Thanksgiving, as we have for years. Johnny Depp is marvelous and quirky
Dark, eerie and hauntingly beautiful. A true masterpiece. A style that can only be Burton, the art was beautiful.
I enjoyed this movie. As usual, this actor gives you your money's worth. Strongly recommend to all fans of J. Depp
I saw, this it was good and alittle scary it's not based, on a true story.....but I liked, this movie good.....
I likes it different from the story I grew up with. I grew up with the main character being a teacher not a detective.
Well put together movie. The mood and plot is right on. The score is hand in glove - it just fits! Tha actors not just JD did marvelously.
This movie is awesome, nice and dark the way it should be made.
I love this movie! It's perfectly done for the dark and dreary world of Sleepy Hollow and Johnny Depp did a great job.
I found this film extremely good.  Johnny Depp played a very good Icabod Crane.  The suspense was excellent.
Nothing beats a good old classic movei with some good acting and great one punch lines. Over all i am very happy with what i got
this is definately one of johnny depps best films even thought the blood looks kinda fake like nailpolish its still one of the best films ever
I am not a fan of scary movies, but this was just the right amount of suspense and thrill. I recommend watching it.
a good take on the story we grew up on. Not for small children. Worth the rent for all adults.
I love Sleepy Hollow.  It is a classic and this movie rendidtion is absolutely superb.  Johnny Depp is genius in this movie.
Slepy Hollow is an amusing twist on the old fable and of course tomany80's did its usual outstanding job.Thanks again tomany 80's
I LOVE this movie so much that I bought two without realizing it.  Since it was so cheap I ended up not returning it and just gave it away.
this is a great movie. one of johnnys best films out there for that period. I love all of his movies. bought this one for my wife though
This DVD goes along with my  literature class and the students really enjoy watching it around Halloween. WIll be used extensively.
Still a very good adventure thriller even after almost 20 years. Quality of film and sound much improved with Blu-Ray version.
mitch was mitch, cruise is cruise. this movie is pretty good, must have and must see. base on the book by John Grishan
Enjoyed this movie.  Tom Cruise did an outstanding job--plus he is very good looking.  All of the cast were good too.
Great, phenomenal movie.  Cover all aspect of what a movie has.. Drama, adventure, actio, and suspense.  Well done one of those you want to see over
if you've never seen it ------- it's pretty awesome. maybe a little dated, but great all the same. classic 90's thriller.
Excellent story,great pace to the film and love the ending. A lot of nice twists in the plot. IT all starts to innocent then expands nicely.
I love this movie with Tom Cruise.  I like the suspense, story, and cleverness of the plot.  All of the acting is great.
could not believe how good this movie was. the all star cast. the storyline was believable. will tell friends this movie. watch this movie
I repurchased this to review it again. Great movie, great story, great one to keep in the old library. thanks.
Cruise always delivers, and Gene Hackman is outstanding....I wonder about the violent reaction of the wife, though, just a little over the top.
Cruise and the cast do a terrific job. This film keeps you on your toes. You are the lookout for what's happening next
This is another great movie that I can watch over and over well worth the money to see the firm get theirs
Very intense and the chase scene was well done even without a lot of car crashes. LOL. You'll like it.
Excellent acting, a stellar cast and an exciting story. I could watch this movie every month, and never get bored with it!
really enjoyed it. lots of action, tons of twists, the bad guys arent so bad and the good guys aren't always good
It is suspenseful, with a beginning, a middle and an ending. Makes you feel that Wilford Brimley is not such a nice old guy.
an on the edge of your seat story...what's not to like?....enjoy the film and you'll want to really enjoy the book!
Cruise is fine, but overplays his role in his usual style.  As is often the case, the book is better.
A young Tom Cruise in one of his best roles.  Even though it is definitely a 90's flick it is still great today.
The Grisham book is a thrilling and chilling story!  Made me glad I am not a Harvard-educated lawyer.  The film accurately captures the story.
I'd forgotten how good the movie actually was.  It should be dated by now, but it actually holds up extremely well.
Great quality blu ray.  Loved the cast and story.  In spite of what some reviewers (critics) said this is a good movie.
Even though I'm not a Tom Cruise fan, it has a very good story line.  I enjoyed it very much.
apologize has been so long since have viewed I do not remember the movie. Am fairly certain was a fair us of time enjoy though
I felt Tom Cruise did an excellent job as did all the cast.  I had read the book first - the movie followed the book very closely.  I enoyed both.
great flick, can't believe I hadn't seen it entirely until now. Matt Damon is creepily excellent and Jude Law is great.
I bought a copy of this movie for my collection. The price was great & it arrived right on time. Smooth transaction. Thanks.
THIS MOVIE WELL IF YOU LIKE MATT DAMON AS I DO, YOU WILL REALLY LIKE THIS.IT'S NOT A NORMAL MOVIE FOR HIM BUT STILL GREAT.
Excellent movie. Will keep you on the edge of your seat up until the end. Superb acting.  A must have for a home video library.
Great acting and a fascinating story. An excellent cast does a great job in this one. I've seen this film about five times and always enjoy it.
suspence at its best
This is a great movie.  I had missed it when it first came out, but I am glad to have seen it.
Saw this movie years ago and so happy I own it now. It is a super movie with great performances.
love all 3 stars in this movie, damon does a GREAT job in the movie, had been searching for a while for this, at a reasonable price
Very exciting story line..I love Matt Damon in these kind of roles. There is a nice twist in this film
is a good movie to get to watch and watch when ever you want to and enjoy your self etc.
I saw, this in the theatre and I liked it though it's very weird from start, to end. Matt Damon playing Tom was good. I liked it, good but weird.
Loved this movie, received it with in a few days. Very happy will use this Co. again and will recommend to family and friends.
Pulls off a wonderful character in this film as he does in most all I've seen! Worth the money Or rent!
This was an enjoyable thriller, great movie. Loved the way it kept you so interested. Quite enjoyable and Matt Damon was terrific.
Love Matt Damon, the move plot was great never a dull moment.  It really helped that all the leading men were hot.
Great thriller.  Love Matt Damon here.  A good addition to your movie collection.  Hope they release this movie on blu ray.
The best movie about Romeo and Juliet ever made.
Love the olden day movies and dont get much better than romeo and juliet . Love the story line and actors.
The movie is great, love the actors and the scencery and the dvd is perfect.  get it.  Len and Olivia great chemistry.
It was a fantasy of words, of music, and acting.  No, it was not acting, it was life.  It was an outstanding film with everything included.
I saw this when it came out in the movies when I was in high school. It's still my favorite version. Its beautifully done.
I recommend this version of Romeo and Juliet.  It is well done and kept to the original work.  The actor and actresses were wonderful.
by far the best Romeo and Juliet version around. It can not be topped. I've seen them all and will go with this ever time.
I saw this as a teenager in a theater when it came out.  It is my all time favorite R&J production.  I love the theme song.
PLEASE remaster for "BLU RAY", PLEASE!!!  This is a classic definitive version.  Accessible to allaudiences!!! It's a must for a high def treatment!
This film would be great on Blu-ray. I hope I wont have to wait forever. Pretty please with sugar on top.
Great! I enjoyed this movie when I was much younger and enjoyed it again now. Pleasure doing business. Thanks!
i enjoyed this movie so much that i bought one more for friends and the quility is great .and will be oredering again in future.
What a classic. What more can I say? The movie looked great and was the classic Romeo and Juliet. Thanx Amazon.
Beautiful and timely movie in 1968 and still beautiful and timely! You can't go wrong with this...modern versions pale in comparison.
I purchase this video for my Shakespeare class and enjoyed it so much I kept it. Its a classic - you can't go wrong...
Watched this while a senior in high school. One of my all time favorites. Can't say enough things about customes and acting in this one. Get it.
GREAT, FOR MY SHAKESPEARE CLASS, IWILL ALSO ORDER HAMLETT AND MCBETH, ALREADY HAVE OTHER SHAKESPEARE BOOKS. YOU HAVE ALOT OF GREAT BOOKS FOR SCHOOL
this is a great movie old time classic original just like it should be I would recommend it to anyone
My class loved the movie and asked for a second viewing.  Superb!  sparked a lot of discussion.
I love this version so much better.  I saw this one in high school and loved it.  The other versions (1950s) doesn't compare.
Loved this movie. Good treatment of the political-religious ties and how the international dynamics can be influenced by the affiliations of one man.
Perfect! Perfect! Perfect! I love this movie and I could watch it everyday. This is sooo funny for a great price
I have always loved this movie. Its very silliness is why I enjoy it so much. I still quote random parts of it to this day.
Anyone how is a SNL fan knows and loves this movie. Just an awesome comedy from a golden era of movies. The second one in awesome too.
I grew up with watching this movie. Awesome movie and can't get enough of these two. One movie I can watch again and again.
I love this movie. It is so funny! Good movie to watch with the hubby on a low key night!
this movie is really a good classic comedy mike myers is great in this movie
Great Movies Mike Myers is truly a comic genius from his start on SNL to Austin Powers i recommend this as a great buy
this is a great movie. I consider it a classic in its time frame. may not be appropriate for kids
a classic comedy that can't get tired of, there are the type of movies that Hollywood should be making again
Another example of juvenile humor at it's finest. My son and daughter laughed out loud. Probably not appropriate for anyone younger than junior high.
Of course this movie ROCKS!! It's Wayne's World!! Party On!!! Amazon Prime brings this great movie to your living room crystal clear!
Just can't go wrong with Wayne's World!! It's perfect brain dead comedy that you can just enjoy and forget all your worries.
This movie is my all time favorite go to feel good movie. I love it. There is probably a cult following.
A beloved classic from childhood. I've been making the switch to blu-ray and was glad to find it. Party on!
I had to add this classic to my dvd collection for my children to enjoy as well as myself.  Thanks
These guys are just right for these characters. They really make stupid look real and at the same time lovable..
One of my all time favorites. If you don't like this movie, your ice cream flavor is pralines and di ck.
This a great film and it has a &quot;worthy&quot; sequel! Love it or not,SNL is at it's best!
I loved this movie when it first came out and it is still awesome today. Could watch daily. Blah blah
Cult classic.  Mike and Dana will make you laugh along with help from other notables.  It's a funny look at tv and music.
Amazing movie! So many great lines to repeat. A true classic movie! Plus you get to see Mike Meyers in his earlier work!
Wayne's World is one of those movies that you can watch over and over and it's still entertaining every time!
awesome movie as usual. ELVIS is forever a classic. Of all the movies he made this is one of his very best.
All the best scenery from Hawaii and many wonderful songs that have now become standards.  Hal Wallace outdid himself with this one.
Just returned from a trip to Hawaii and we ordered a few Elvis movies to check out the scenes back in 1961.  Music was good and movie fun.
This is one of my favorite movies from back when.  I would still watch it when I'm old and gray :)!
I love anything and everything Elvis Presley and so this was a great addition to my library.  Thank you very much!
Just a good Elvis movie, with one of his best songs in it.. Kid Gallahad is anther one with great songs..well they all have there merits.
If you like the young Elvis and you love Hawaiiyou should enjoy it, the quality of the DVD is excellent
I'm a fan of Elvis and owned lots of his materials this is certainly one of my favorite films he does
The King of Rock and Roll does some magnificent numbers, singing and dancing. And it also has a good story.
Elvis movies always light and airy with good music and silly relations.  Good scenery and lessons if you really pay attention.
Brand new,great quality always feel safe dealing with Amazon.For the BESTdeals in quality and service,you just can't beat Amazon.
Fun film!  We have been to Hawaii on three occasions long since the film was made and it's interesting to see how Hawaii has grown and changed.
Elvis,what else is there?Its worth it to get this classic.great price,fast delivery.Get this and add it to your collection.Worth it.
Between the beauty of the island, the hula girls and the songs this movie has to be seen. A special treat!
Per memories.  One of the first movies I ever saw.  Beautiful Hawaii.
This is an original  script and a Nick Cage did a great job. It was a little weird in parts but showed what EMT s go through on a daily basis.
Great dark comedy. Great characters. Other reviewers have already said it better than I could.
Great movie with flawless support cast. I loved the dream sequence where Cage is pulling people up, with that divine touch of light around him.
i really do enjoy this movie but now i am just writing our words that are required to finish this review
Not your average Nicholas Cage movie but a good one none the less.  If you are a Scorsese fan this one is a must!
one of Lessie Nealson's funner movies.  think of police academy but with one main man.  in the series OJ Simpson is in it.  this is real funny.
leslie nielson is hilarious there is jokes after jokes and his driving is funny (if you watch you know what i mean)
I have The Naked Gun ON LASERISCS With II And III..Both Are great Movies and deserves to be Add'd in yer Collection :P
What more can I say? Police Squad says it all. Makes me laugh from start to finish. I know it isn't much now, but classic comedy in its time.
Great price, great service, arriving as scheduled. The movie remains a side-splitting comedy that can be enjoyed over and over.
what can you say, slap stick, get a joke out of every moment, good acting and its very funny. Plus you have the murder OJ, cant go wrong
these are very funny Classics never tire of watching them ,, Nielsen fits the part so well,, so funny a must see
Loved it.  Very funny, fully of silly sketches, classic Naked Gun film.  Leslie Nielsen is deadpan funny.  Highly recommended, an enjoyable film.
This movie is funny from the beginning till the end. It makes me laugh each time. This is a must see movie by every body!!!!
This, to me, is a funny DVD. I think that the humor in it is great! I would recommend it to anyone!
This movie was hysterical! My husband and I have watched it several times! Leslie Nielsen is so funny in this movie!! We loved it!
GREAT ENDING! Good story line, not a big fan of madonna, but she did good with this movie.  5 stars!
I liked, this movie it was very interesting, Madonna did good in this movie you'll like this movie worth, watching.
I Loved it, even if the movie was bad, madonna being in it makes up for an excellent movie to watch.
Great collection of all time classic movies.  It is nice to see the gang all there and be able to share the joy of these Peanuts with my kids
I am now 42 years old and I watch these every yearfor Halloween, Thanksgiving, and Christmas. I love the Blu Ray they look very nice.
It was good to be able to purchase all the Peanut's holiday DVD's in one collection to save money and have a complete collection.
Peanuts Holiday Collection is a classic! I love the peanuts while I was growing up and still love them now.
This includes all of the old time favorites I grew up with and my children enjoyed watching them with me.
What could be wrong with Peanuts. My Grandson's wanted to rematch....even after the holidays! They are certainly classics for sure.
This a great holiday movie to  where I enjoy it all  the time I like the Charlie Brown Thanksgiving the best of all and they are funny.
I got this for my Daughter for Christmas, she  is in her early 20's and she watch's it all the time, she loves it.
Got these so my grandson and I could watch them together--memories for me and new cartoons for him to enjoy.
You cannot go wrong with this collection.  Charlie Brown is the greatest.  Very high quality product.  Highly recommended.  DAME HILDA
I bought this a couple days before x-mas & got a better price. My family loves these.
Peanuts Holiday Collection had VHS copy. Glad to get DVD. I can always depend on Amazon to get the movies I want.
The product is perfect, shrink-wrapped in the box and with individual DVD sleeves.  Never again will I miss a holiday special of my childhood heroes!
The product is exactly as specified. No missing items. The globe is not what we thought however is quite cute.
Wonderful....wonderful.  I love this holiday collection.  We watch it every year.  I would order this as a gift for friends with kids.
I think these are classic stories and have always enjoyed them since they first came out. These stories never seem to get old
Bought this for my grandchildren.  Wanted them to have and enjoy the classic Peanuts!  i hope they enoy them for a long time.
What's not to like about having the Peanuts gang to watch over the holidays! The added holiday stick-ons were a nice bonus.
Just love me some Charlie Brown and had to add this DVD to my collection! This is the best of CB!
Fast shipping,  love all the Charlie Brown holiday specials are in one group package!! Makes it nice for the holiday mood you are in :-)
Wonderful Old classic
A definite Must-have for the Holidays! I grew up watching these, and now my son can enjoy them too... but on facy blu-rays rather than VHS!
Love having these holiday classics all in one nice set. Peanuts are nostalgic for everyone, I think. A very nice collection for Fall and Winter.
Our son loves these, great for the holidays and my wife and I love seeing the classics we grew up on.  Nice to have them packaged together.
love how all three movies are good on dvd, they bring back such good and fonding memories. Especially with Snoopy.
These are classic holiday cartoons that I watched as a child, and I love watching them with my children.  It brings back so many great memories.
This is a great collection of charlie brown and friends, it has been a hit and watched often and should give many years of watching fun.
I got this collection for a gift for my husband, who is a Charlie Brown fan.  He really enjoys them.
my 6 year old granddaughter loves the peanuts.  it is so nice to share them and to see them through the eyes of a child again.
I grew up with these on holidays and love them.  I still enjoy the magic of Charles Schultz and recommend the product for everyone!
My wife always talks about these shows during the holidays, it was the perfect gift for her.  Pick it up
Maybe they are old and some say outdated, but my grandchildren are totally enthralled with these movies.  Way to go, the Peanuts Gang still lives!
Who doesn't like Peanuts?  This was a great gift that will be watched and loved for many years to come.
I bought this for the classic shorts that I grew up with, It is amazing to see how far we have come in filming.
This is a great movie collection to have around. Our family enjoys watching the Peanuts for every Holiday. Great family fun
How could anyone young or old not enjoy Charlie Brown..would recommend for a gift or just yourself.
Another household favorite restored and bright as ever.  The Blu Ray edition of these Peanuts classics is well worth the price.
my grandson loves the peanut gang so i seen this blu-ray disk had to have it glad it i got it he loves it .
Won't be watching this until the Holdiays but Peanuts are always great! Expect the DVD / Blu-Ray will be as good as always.
These movies are so cute and bring back a lot of wonderful memories with my family when I was a child. Now I enjoy them with my children.
My kids watched this when they were small and they always enjoyed the shows.  It  brings back a lot of good memories.
Will always Love the peanuts Gang.
like the classic holiday movies that i remember watching as a kid and had to have them to share with my hubby, who didn't have this tradition
Great movie on all aspects from casting to acting. Laura Linney is a spectacular actress give her anything and she will deliver!
I really liked this movie. Great acting and the story line was believable. I found it very entertaining and I cared about the characters.
What a surprise!  Never expected this film to be so great.  Acting was superb! Have tissues ready though.  Ending has quite an effect.
This movie is well-acted with a down to earth believable storyline.  A brief glimpse into the lives of a brother and sister.  The house is cool, too.
This is a very good DVD of the battle of Midway.  We hadother copies but not as informative as this one.  We reallyenjoy it.
my husband loves this dvd. great gift for anyone who likes war movies or documentaries.
This was an especially good movie about the Titanic, one of my favorite topics.  I am glad to have added this to my collection.
Talk about finding a needle in a haystack!  Like a real-life detective story.  This documentary is like being there during a historic moment.
My son really enjoys all of the variety of this movie.
October hurry up and come! Now this is how you put out a special edition. So far the best one I've seen done right is The Back to the Future Trilogy.
It was the same movie I have watched a million time, just in HD! Family Classic! It is the Wizard of Oz.
I just wanted to thank MGM for remastering this classic.  The color and sound on this remastered DVD is fantastic.
This movie scared many of us as children yet became a classic movie with young people anyway.  Love Judy Garland's performance in this movie.
GREAT Classic Movie... Hard to find
this has three versions of the film the 1930's movie the 1910's version and the dreamer of oz.  also comes with a bunch of features.
A wonderful collection of the greatest childrens (and adults too) story ever . we loved all the little extras that came with this set too.
An impressive musical that has managed to survive time because of its cast, songs, singing,and dancing.  A wonderful story for children and adults.
I needed a DVD copy of this movie because it is was my favorite from childhood.  Great!
It was another inclimate day in New England.  What to do?  Watch a classic!  So I did!  I've been singing the songs all day!
I bought a copy of The Wizard of Oz for my daughters and they loved it. I wanted to make sure they see the classic shows to.
This has so much and I love everything! My favorite has to be the flash drive that looks like the witch's legs and ruby slippers.
It's a wonderful video for children and adults, too.I watch it whenever I get to see it on the TV.
Will always watch this classic.  Great for the whole family.  Love this movie.  Follow the Yellow Brick Road!  Love Blu-ray!
A masterpiece. An even better masterpiece on blu ray. Could watch it 100 times and never get tired of it.
Who cannot love this movie? I enjoyed watching it in 3D, although the 3D was just okay. The colors, though, were vibrant.
A STORY THAT NEVER GROWS OLD!!  AND IT IS WRITTEN FOR ALL OF US WHO NEVER GROW OLD EITHER.  I LOVED EVERY MINUTE OF IT!
Who doesn't love this movie?  Great for all children and most adults :-)Is it worth a little extra for Blu-Ray?  Probably.
I grew up watching this every Easter or whatever holiday it was they would show it on network TV. My 4 year old girls love it too!
Never looses its appeal. My grandchildren were fascinated with the film. They both said after the film had ended, AGAIN NANA!
Granddaughter loved this item.. arrived on time and in great shape.. wanted to see the original made movie.  thanks for this item
love the wizard of oz! its a must if you like musicals! ima huge sucker for musicals so this is def. one of my all time favs!
First who does not love the Wizard of Oz. I am a huge Judy Garland fan. Everyone has to own this movie in there collection.
The Wizard of Oz is my most favorite childhood movie, would watch it repeatedly.  Picture quality is great! Would recommend to everyone!
3D brought this original movie to life. I really enjoyed it with our no hassle L.G.passive HDTV & passive glasses.
Great price for a classic movie. This was one of my favorite movies growing up, and now I can enjoy it with my kids.
When I ordered this for my kids, we couldn't believe how clear the movie was.  We had never seen it that clear.  Awesome for a classic!
I watched this movie as a kid, and have to have it.  They don't make movies like this anymore.  Highly recommend buying this.
I picked up the two disc set from Target, This is the way ALL movies should bere-masterd when they hit blu-ray. AWESOME picture and sound.
This movie is an all time favorite. What can I say? It is iconic in American history. I love Judy Garland, I love the songs, I love the story.
What Friday night family fun!  Pleasure to introduce this musical masterpiece to yet another generation. Easily held interest of 6yo who loves music.
This movie is a family classic but done in BluRay just makes it more colorful and crisp!  A must see!
My daughter loves what she calls Dorothy Gail. We keep this DVD in the car. I love enjoying it with her as much as I loved it as a kid. Beautiful!
The classic film!  The Wizard of Oz is wonderful.  Judy Garland's breakthrough performance.  Beautiful.
Great viewing of this classic movie.  Never tire of it! Keep it up.  When I have a chance.  I'll get more DVDs.
this is such a timeless classic, I love it. comes with lots of bonus features too. The picture looks great!!! Thank you!
You have to have this classic in your collection. Nothing else that needs  to be said :-)
Wizard of Oz is a golden treat that has only come around once in a lifetime. It is a pleasure to own one of the most iconic movies of all time.
You know this one, so not much to say except needed for any collection- you wont be sorry!! happy Holidays
a classic that has beautiful color and a nostalgia for the familiar. I was please to see this redigitalized into a clear copy.
Movie arrived as described and quickly.  The DVD version comes w/ a supplemental disc.  Movie, box, etc was as described and arrived quickly.
I love this movie! Best movie that ever was made, in my opinion. No one can watch this and not love it. Great for any age people.
This is truly a classic that will live on for ages to come. this movie is awesome. it's a must see
Bought this for my girlfriend a while back and it stands the test of time. Loaded with features and any fan would appreciate owning this.
Always love this movie as a child it was priced low and now we all can watch and pass along for the next generations to enjoy, it's a classic!!
Not only a classic, but here well presented with a fine restoration and interesting extras.  Oz never looked so good.
The Video, sound and 3D are very good on this release.. Even if you have seen it a dozen times, it is worth a new look..
It stands up to what HD dvd's should.  It has bright color and clarity.  Everything that's promised is true.  I'm 100% thrilled with this set.
great classic movie , the blue-ray dvd is better than i thought it would be , rec. it earlier than stated.
I highly recommend this blu-ray version be added to your collection.  The amount of extras is greatly overwhelming and the transfer looks amazing!
love the transitition from black and white to color..very entertaining.  love the music,  takes me back to the first time I saw the movie.
will never get sick of this.  My daughter loves this movie and I can see why.  Has something in it for all ages.
This was purchased by my wife as a gift and is a beautiful collectors item of a movie and story that is still popular and has been since 1939
The movie looks great, the extra features are fantastic, the packaging is awesome, and if you love or even just like Oz, you should own this set!
Great quality packaging. Visually stunning. Love the movie and the extras! Bought one for a gift as well. Would recommend.
A true Family Movie for all ages. A Classic in every way. A must own for your Video Collection.
ABsolutely love this movie from my childhood!  I used to watch it on CBS every October with my Great Grandma!
WE ARE ALL ENJOYING WATCHING THIS CLASSIC, IT IS A MOVIE FOR THE WHOLE FAMILY EVEN THE DOGS!  GREAT MOVIE
always loved this movie no matter how many times I have watched it - it doesn't get any better than this
Great family movie!!! I had not watched it since I was a kid and my kids and I watched it and we all loved it.
it was magic for me when it suddenly went to color - this was a must for my collection....still excellent
THIS IS MY VERY FAVORITE MOVIE OF ALL TIME!  I HAVE ALWAYS WANTED TO OWN  IT. GREAT BUY! VERY HAPPY!
It was great from the start to the end . I wish they made movies Like that now. BUT they do not.
I think this was a great purchase, I like the price, I would recommend this product to everyone who likes this.
Wow!! Love the Wizard of OZ and very please that I did get the 75th Anniversary Edition ( Blu-Ray ) and will watch it tonight and 100 % please.
I can't wait to watch this classic movie with our daughter.  It is a nice addition to our movie library.
Great gift very amazing set comes with everything in the picture and if your a fan it's a must have
Had to have this classic on Blue Ray, I own it on DVD.  Arrived on time, condition was perfect, very happy!
Back in the &#34;day&#34;, this movie came on once a year and it was like the Christmas shows...you looked forward all year for it to come on.
Not my first OZ DVD but I just had to have another. The quality keeps on improving, and my last one disappeared.
One of the movies that taught me that females can be the hero and sometimes the males in the film aren't the saviors, but the help.
what can be said about a classic movie?  loved it as a child and still love it as an adult.
I recommend this one!!!  A great one! Wonderful! Packed full! just great! Intensely entertaining! A great one! Wonderful! I would recommend this one!
Watched this on pay preview with my great granddaughter. She loved it and I bought it and had it mailed to her. She was thrilled.
Just had to purchase this dvd for my collection. It is such a great classic. I will be watching it soon.
A Christmas gift for my daughter. I like to buy Christmas stuff early. She is going to love this, on her Christmas list for Santa.
I purchased The Wizard of Oz for my nine year old son who never saw it ... needless to say, he loved it!
I also wathed this movie when I was a kid. And my kids now also love watching this movie it is still a classic up til now.
You cant go wrong with a classic. I bought this for my granddaughter and she's watched it repeatedly since she received it.
How could anyone not like this move.  It has been watched for many years.  The music has been played by many musicians.
Good film and good copy of the DVD/  Wanted my grandchildren to enjoy the original story.  They enjoy the movies that have good moral content.
I saw this movie many times as a child and it was time for my kids to see it.A classic for any generation.
Come on, it's the Wizard of Oz.  It's a classic for a reason.  My 3 year old is in love with this movie.
I got this for a friend when his tape was eaten by his old VHS recorder. This makes a great gift and is still something that children will love.
A favorite from my childhood and just as good as I remember it!  Fun to pair with The Great and Powerful Oz for an Oz movie night!
If you have never seen this in 3D you are really missing something amazing .I could never have imagined this in 3D outstanding !
This is one of my wife's favorite movies, and will be a Christmas present this year.I hope she likes it !
Great Blue Ray, extremely vivid from the Original.  Highly recommend the Blue Ray version, OZ is so defined that makes all the difference.
This is one of my favorite movies.  I was so happy to find it on dvd and for such a great deal!
If you like The Wizard of Oz even a tiny bit, then this is the version of the DVD you want to get.  It's got enough bonus features to choke a horse.
My roommate had never seen this before. So we streamed it and it was as wonderful as I remembered it. The streaming quality was excellent
The wizard of Oz is a classic. You may have seen the newest one but the original is full of singing songs. Great time watching it.
The best wholesome family movie I have watched.  Our family loves this film.  No matter the age this film is for you!
Don't particularly like the movie, but girlfriend does, so added it to the collection. It's not that its bad, but you know what I mean
Hey it goes with Dark Side doesn't it? It's GOTTA be good.
Family favorite.. they don't make 'em like they used to!  Always a great 'go to' movie.  Everybody should own it!
When I was a kid, this movie was like a ride to the moon, a glimpse of heaven. Thank you.
I grew up watching this movie and it is a true classic.  No movie collection is complete without it.  I can't believe it is 70 years old!
the the movie lol have watched it three times already. nine year old loved it at stayed for the WHOLE movie.
I loved this movie as a child and would watch it whenever it was on TV. Its so creative and unique I had to add it to my DVD collection.
Blu ray just made a GREAT movie better.
This just makes me happy.  I'm not an expert of definition and all but the colors seemed brighter and crisper and I loved having the blu ray!
Who doesn't love The Wizard of Oz? I have probably seen it dozens of times and still, once a year, look forward to watching it again. It's a classic!
I gave this copy away as a gift to a sick friend of mine, and it really cheered him up. 5 stars.
This is my favorite movie of all time & to own it on Blue Ray is a special treat.  the color and picture are a lot better!!
one of the all time favorite american classic movies. downloaded it straight to my kindle so i could watch it anytime.
One of the best classic movies of all time! Have been watching this movie since I was a child and has always been one of my favorites!
The movie was wonderful.  I would wait every year in the spring for this movie to be shown.  Wow!  I can now watch it any time.
Every house needs this classic movie. My 3 year old loves it. It's a great buy for the quality. No complaints here.
This is a star studded classic.  I have been to an appearance of one of the Munchkins in Meadowbrook Mall in Bridgeport, West Virginia.
One of the best classic movies ever.  This ones going into my DVD collection for my grandkids and great grandkids.
No matter what age you are, this is the best movie ever!!!!  Quality product and bonus disk is really cool!!!!!
Nothing brings you back to your childhood like watching this movie.  I introduced this to my 5 year old daughter, and she loved it too.
who doesn't love this movie?  absolutely a favorite of mine, seems timeless to me, and will pass this down to generations...
It was great fun to re-visit a childhood favorite.  I'm glad to have The Wizard of Oz to share with my grandchildren.
We bought this because our kids had never seen the whole movie.  It is a great movie.  My oldest wishes the whole movie was in color.
While wait for this classic to come around again on TV when you cna watch whenever you want, this is one movie that never gets old even though it is.
One the Old classics of all time. The kids enjoy watching this over and over. It never gets old! You'll love it, and your little dog too!
This is one of my favorite movies of all time. I've watched this 100 times or more and it's always like I've watched it for the 1st time. Love it!
This is the perfect gift for someone who loves the Wizard of OZ! The quality is amazing and the picture looked great on a HDTV.
We love it as a family. The set is great and extras were cool. This was a gift to my wife and she loves it.
I bought this as gift for my grandchildren who never saw the movie  Glad to have found the 75th Anniversary Edition here.
Awesome classic movie - I wouldn't bother with the HD in the future though.  The original print doesn't take advantage of the HD format well.
I can watch this all day with my grandchildren, and have the same excitment of when I was a kid. You have to have this in your collection.
Who could not love the Wizard of Oz. Its story fits so many lives of people today and their yearnings.
Got this 70th anniversary edition of the Wizard of Oz because the whole family loves this movie and watch it regularly.
I had an old vhs tape that wouldn't play anymore so I purchased this for a reasonable price.  The quality was good and it was delivered fast.
It is a truly classic! Great movie, wonderful movie! I will definitely recommend to everyone who has not seen it before
Now I can see this every night and every I can. Judy is a great actress with an outstanding voice
the children love it!!  The extra were really wonderful, to see the old clips of the Movie and to see the old Black and white Play
I had this movie on dvd until someone stole it from my dvd library. It's a timeless classic that everyone should own!
gift for my granddaughters.  they love the movie and have not stopped watching it.  a wonderful old movie...love it still.
My grandaughter loves this movie, went to Amazon for the best price and availabilty. As always they had what I wanted.
I got this for my grandsons when they were visiting and they were glued just as I was so many years ago!!!
everything that comes with this package is just wonderful. The wife and I are both Wizard of Oz fans and enjoy this collection very much.
Since little girl, i love this movie.. im glad it was/still available, so i can see it again, again, again!!!! you will never get bored...
It's a classic!  I can't help but sing along with the songs... If I only had a brain, We're off to see the wizard...
What can I say? Just great movie. They don't make them like this anymore. Too bad!
A hundred years from now, this movie will still be as entertaining as it is today and back in 1939.
What could be bad?  She's Judy Garland in The Wizard of OZ and I'll fight any one who disagrees....A great journey when movies shined.
had to have a copy for the grandchildren to have at their own home as well as mine.  everything was perfect and arrived as scheduled.
It was first introduced when I was a child, I liked it so much then and I want my great grand kids to enjoy it now
Great Classic Movie. Can never be duplicated and the story is timeless
Great movie and loved it in 3D. As a kid loved it, but now, WOW the 3D was really Great!!
The Wizard of Oz was a great classic movie to watch. It was great to have on my kindle when I needed something to see.
I love this movie and always have.The extras in this were amazing!  Learned some things I didn't know!Kids and I really enjoyed this set.
Love it love it. great movie to watch with persons of all ages love the song and the joy you fell while watching and after a must see movie!
My wife loves this. Added to her classic collection. The way the have improved the quality to BLU RAY wow!
This is a classic movie, it a fan pleaser for all ages, you can watch over and over and you wont get tired of seeing it.
A classic, soo good I bought several and kept one sealed for properity or kids if I ever am permitted to have any.
What can I say? It's the Wizard of OZ! I  love all the extras that come with it. Timeless
Full enhancement of color, picture, brightness. Makes it easy to go over this 3D version of a Classic of all times.
I watched this movie on TV as a little girl and bought this to start the tradition with my kids.  Can't say enough about a classic movie like this.
This was a gift for a friend of mine that loved the Wizard of Oz.  What a fantastic film, it's the original, and the best of them all.
I've had this movie for many years in VHS. I wanted it in DVD to enjoy it with my family.
My grandchildren love this movie as much as I did at their ages (and still do ). It's so much fun watching it with them.
A must-have for anyone and everyone. Always a great viewing. I always enjoy seeing this film. 1939, but still one of my top movies.
The Movie is an all time classic and the reproduction is good.  Not in wide screen but 3.4 format which is good.
I've wanted to own this for years.  Spent many wonderful years watching it on TV when I was a kid.
It is a classic!  I have it on Beta, VHS and DVD.  I will also get it on whatever comes next :-)
I got this to replace one that was lost. It's a family favorite and just like to watch it from time to time.
This has always been my all-time favorite movie since I was a small child.  I never tire of watching it over and over!
Know tell me who doesn't love this movie  I now have it anytime I want  at my fingertips on my kindle or my laptop
It's an American Classic. Not for small children due to the witch and her flying monkeys but still a great family movie
I LOVE THIS
It arrived on time and works well.  I love shopping with Amazon.  Things are always as they appear and the prices are always reasonable.
Love the movie and the sound is great, have not seen the movie for a long time and now I have it
We have thoroughly enjoyed the trip down memory lane with our children and grandchildren watching this classic and wonderful flick!!!
Love this movie always have always will was a great show when I was young and still enjoy it now
Just saw it in 3D!!!!  It will be like seeing it for the first time.  Unbelievable!!!!! You will feel that you're in the movie, too!
My grandson had to write a essay about a old classic movie.  We both sat and watch it. Then we discussed the moral part of the movie.
This movie is a classic that I am happy to be able to pass on to my kids.  It's imaginative, fun, and a little bit scary!
Outstanding film for its era.  Technical quality nearly perfect.  Great story for the young at heart which still appeals to today's family audiences.
You must own this movie for future generations to enjoy, now that it is remastered it is even better than before.
Love this movie, and watching at home on our big screen smart TV with our two grand daughtersmade it even better.
Ordered this classic for my 5 yr old daughter! we received it ahead of schedule and she watched it 3 times in a row!!!!
Love the restored quality and all the extras. The story is cute and so are the actors. Good old fashioned Hollywood and we adore it!!!
This movie is a great classic that is good for children to watch. Someday, I hope Hollywood remakes this movie without the music.
I think that The Wizard of Oz was Judy Garland's best movie.  I watched it as a kid and still enjoy it.
A favorite classic of ours,our grown children and our ten Grandchildren.Sincerely Raymond and Michele Chico
What I love about this film is something that makes us smile again.If you're looking for the classic films, that one is the best choice.
For fans of Wizard of Oz, this is a good purchase.  Rewatch the classic over and over again at your leisure and the features are nice too.
Great price for a Classic movie. Purchased it as a Christmas present for a family member. It was less than five dollars shipped to my door.
i love this movie its a classic i could watch this ever day now i own it il be able to watch it when i went
It was worth the wait for Wizard t arrive on Bluray.  This is the way Oz should be viewed.I can't imagine a better version than the bluray.
Everyone has seen this movie before ... but in 3d it's like watching it for the first time amazing depth. .. don't know how they did it  but wow
I'm a HUGE lifelong fan of "The Wizard of Oz" and wanted a copy of "Dreamer of OZ" for years now. I was so excited to find this all-in-one!!
This is the movie my grand daughter loves to watch instead of those upto date junk movies.  We love to watch it too.
Purchased it to introduce this historic movie to my 6 year old and she enjoyed it.  Got it for a good price also.
i love the movie and it came on time i have loved this movie since i was 5years old and i still do love it till this day
love it grew up watching this on every thanks giving alone with the wooden soldiers great classic great Christmas gift
Why would anyone need to read a review of this most watched film classic? Because this is the Ultimate DVD collectible set to date ... that's why!
I will admit im not a huge wizzard of oz fan, however my father is and he just went on and on about what a great dvd this was.
LOVE The Wizard of Oz? Just one of those classics you watch over and over and over and over again.
This is a classic film that can be enjoyed by all ages. The music combined with the visuals are eye candy. I can never see this film too many times.
Purchased as a gift for my son and 3 year old grandson.  No problems, excellent quality recording (so my son reported), delivered when promised.
Excellent movie, I would recommend that everyone should own a copy!Great story good for years to come...price less so get your copy!!
memories for all the generations to enjoy and share with their future generation to come.  One of the great movies of all times for the entire family
What a great movie!!  You already have everything you need and have had it all along..classic
have to give it full rating because it was the start of an era. making black and white into color was a brilliant move.
The perennial favorite is now available anytime you want to see The Wizard! A movie for all generations, it truly is!
I really love the Wizard Of Oz and was very satisfied with this gift set. I would recommend this to any fan of the wizard of oz.
My wife is a huge fan of this movie when it came out on Blu-ray I had to get it for her
ONE OF THE BEST MOVIES  EVER  MADE !!!  RECOMEND  FOR ANYONE  &  EVERYONE !!!!!!!!!!!  U  WONT  BE  SORRRRY  AT  ALL  !!!!
One of my all time favorite movies. It was ahead of its time as far as films made during that era.
One of the greatest American films ever made. True film-making. The actors were all in at the height of their careers.
I BOUGHT THIS FOR A FRIEND WHO IS IN HER 80'S AND NEVER HAS SEEN IT...SHE DIDN'T LIKE IT...BUT i SURE DID...AND I'M 61...STILL ENJOY IT TODAY..
So worth the money to get this DVD to add to my every growing Oz Collection I have enjoyed watching it over and over
What more can I say.  This is a classic!  I cant wait until my daughters are old enough to enjoy this!!
This is one of the classic old movies. We have enjoyed watching it and would recommend it to anyone else.
How can anyone not like Judy Garland in this great movie? She is totally incredible and well worth the money spent for this dvd.
I love this movie so much!! I've been watching movie since i was five and my grandmother showed it to me.
This film is one of the best 007 movies of all time. The videogame for the Nintendo 64 is so great.
To me, calling a movie made in 95' is strange to call a classic, but this one is a classic.  Any Bond fan who hasn't seen this one is missing out.
Item was shipped and received in an expediant manner.  Packaged in near perfect condition as promised. No complaints.  5 STARS.
You can keep all the rest of the Bonds (including the latest!). Pierce Brosnan was and is the best of the group.
one of my favorite Bond films and one of the best with Pierce Brosnan.  These movies never get old - I love them.
this was the first bond i saw when i was 8 years old at the movies. this one is a good one to get if you like pierce brosnan as bond.
i enjoy watching the james bond movies and am an avid movie collecter plus helps pass tin the winter when nothing is on.
Goldeneye is one awesome thrill ride! Pierce Brosnan`s best outing as James Bond 007. It`s just wonderful, buy it now and you won`t be disappionted.
Pierce Brosnan makes a great James Bond and Goldeneye is great fun. It is well worth the purchase price and then some.
Isabella is the best of all the &#34;Bond girls&#34;. Hopefully we will see her again. I her own quite way she more than held her own.
Love the James Bond movies!  Pierce Brosnan does a fabulous job and Sean Bean ROCKS!
Excellent BluRay reformatting. Will be able to watch time and again.  Thoroughly enjoyed every minute of this Pierce Brosnan version of 007.
put your pants on america! this is the best modern bond film yet!!!!!!!!!!! No other actor since has touched this GOLDENEYEness bitches!
Love the OO7 films and this one does not disappoint.  If you like Bond you will probably like this film.
Any fan of James Bond will love this movie. I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. I always liked Pierce as James. This is one of the great bond movies.
Very good show. I am a collector of different movie and TV series. This movie is very good and helps me to bring my collection up to date.
Goldeneye is a great Bond film and is a must buy just like most other 007  films. Buy it wou will not regret it.
My favorite 007s areThe spy who loves me ~ cool carThe living daylight ~ cool carAnd Goldeneye ~ cool Tank lol.
I have watched this Movie many times and never seem to get tired of it.It is happy and has some really good acting in it.
When Robin Williams is the third funniest person in a movie...it is a damn funny movie. It is worth a try for anyone who likes a laugh.
one of my favorite movies of all time!!! couldn't wait for it to come in the mail. there were no scratches or nicks so it plays great!!!
Great.  Loved the movie, love the dvd.  wonderful colour and picture and sound.  5 stars.  fab, terrific and all the rest.
I never get tired of watching this delightful, funny movie. It never get old.  It's always entertaining.  I just love it!
love this movie, it arrived quickly, packaged well, would buy from this seller again. not a kid movie.
This movie is a must own for any comedy buff.  Nathan Lane is genius!  It is truly one of my favorites.
I LOVE this video.  Every actor is great and the characters are a real hoot!
This movie is hysterical from beginning to end. The cast is exemplary and I never laughed so much in my life. A must see for everyone
This is a MUST SEE classic... Robin Williams and Nathan Lane at their flawless, endearingly hilarious, best... Mike Nichols direction was awesome.
Loved all of the characters and laughed till I cried.  Worth having in my library when I need a good laugh.
Nathan Lane was incredible. The whole cast and story is funny. Directed, edited and written fantastic. A classic comedy worth seeing.
I love this film. Always have. The Robin Williams and Nathan Lane dynamic is just great with impeccable timing. Gene Hackman always cracks me up
Always a great movie to watch on a cold snow day while you are baby sitting your house this winter
Robin Williams at his finest.  I loved this movie and have watched it 2-3 times already over the last 5 years.
This movie was made many years ago. We have watch it several times. Political correctness would make it much different today.
I have this movie on VHS, and have worn it out (yes I still use a VCR) I had to replace it and I'm very grateful.
Robin Williams was the best choice for this movie.  He is so talented and act as anyone.  The cast did a marvelous job and we love this movie.
Gene Hackman in drag!Is that funny or what?Williams is hilarious in this film and Nathan Lane is perfect!I busted a gut watching this!
One of my favorite movies!!!!  Itmade  laugh frpm beginning to end.  Robin Williams is a genius. The whole cat in fact was amazing
This movie is very un-conventional, but the duet of Robin Williams and Nathan Lane makes it one of, if not my favorite movie.  It's hilarious!
I loved the scenes where he is trying to teach Nathan Lane to be a man...walking, talking and handshakes.  Just too hilarious!
This movie is just so funny. I loved it!  I love most of Robins movies. this move came to me in good shape and I would buy again from this seller.
Verry funny movie. I watch it many times. I recommend this movie to everyone I know Movie night movie yep
One of our top movies, language a bit rough, but the music, dance and story are outstanding.
I watch this over and over and never stop laughing.  It's a GREAT movie and all the stars are wonderful performers.
Love to watch the Birdcage.  It is funny, and we especially like 'Particulars' he really makes the movie fun and entertaining.
The Birdcage is my favorite movie of all time. Robin Williams is at his best along with the rest of the cast. I bought the movie.
I saw this movie when it came out and have tried to catch it when it was on TV.  So glad to have my own copy.  I still laugh at it.
plays the straight man in this film adaptation of the Broadway play. I could watch it at least once a month. Excellent.
This movie has always been a favorite of mine. Nathan Lane and Robin Williams really out do themselves in this comedy!
This is one of the funniest, best movies ever made.  I must have watched it four or five times over the years and it never gets old.
Having Robin Williams as the "straight man" for Nathan Lane was perfect.  I would love to see a sequel of this movie
My all-time favorite comedy.  It makes my day when I watch this show.  Robin Williams, Nathan Lane, and Hank Azaria are a HOOT!
No matter how many times I have seen this movie it always makes me laugh ! The acting is excellent - just a realy fun watch.
I have seen this movie a number of times. Always a hit with a great cast of actors and actresses.
It's not often we experience great writing, directing and acting in one entire film. Well done and we can always use more laughter.
All the actors were wonderful.  The movie is funny, touching and a great feel-good movie.  If you have not seen it, I highly recommend it.
I have always been a fa of Robin Williams, but this movie takes the cake. He is amazing in it and it it is too funny.
What more to say... it is a fantastic movie with a fantastic cast. It is a great date night movie!
I got tired of renting this so finally purchased my own copy! Highly recommend adding this to your DVD collection!
Oldie but a goodie.  Robin William & Nathan Lane are hysterical!  Whenever I need a good laugh, I revert back to this one.
I saw the play and wanted to see the movie.  I thought the movie was better than the play.  Great actors and very funny.  The story is wonderful.
the dvd arrived in good shape and on time. it is a good price. a very funny movie.would recommend to you if you enjoy a good laugh
I love this movie! I remember seeing it in the movie theaters when it came out. The cast is hilarious and so is the plot.
This movie is a hoot.  Love it!
ah i remember when i saw this at the midway theater on queens blvd back in the 80's great movie but i was hoping for more extras
Poltergeist!!!!!  This falls under my list of favorites for spooky movies.  Script well written, great actors, and really good special effects.
Good stuff. Well made horror film from Steven Spielberg! Buy it, watch it, then, check your closets!Be prepared to cover your eyes!
the first one is my #1 favorite! the second one is ok, and please don't bother watching the 3rd one, oh my that one sucks..but this is the best one..
Always comes up in the top ten ghost movies ever made....no wonder!! The top of the list of ghost movies to watch each Halloween.
I have two original copies VHS and DVD as well as what I have in my favorites in Prime. Love it and watch it a few times a year.
This is one of my all time favorite movies! It is so good and the soundtrack is great! Just watch it.
I love this movie it's one of my favorites, I highly recommend it to anyone who loves horror movies too
Who needs CGI when you have film makers that create a classic like Poltergeist.  One of those rare films that will never get old.
This movies was one of the all time greats, as far as an &#34;oldie.&#34;  It is scary, yet not gory, and intriguing.  I loved this movie!!
The movie came just in time to wrap for a present for my daughter. She was very surprised and pleased!
I have this on VHS as well. An absolute classic in my book. I'm a fan of Spielberg. I don't think there is a movie of his that I haven't liked.
This movie is amazing, and it still shocks me even today.Its a must own if you like ghost stories.  Love it
TOO BAD THE LITTLE GIRL PASSED AWAY IN THE LATE 80'S BUT STILL GOOD MOVIE I HAVE ALL THREE OF THE MOVIES
I really like the movie. If your looking for a message, it has one. Birth control. But seriously it's a classic movie.
Love this movie. Never grows old. Awesome effects. Good storyline.Always a favorite . Scary movies are awesome at halloween time
Great Movie, have loved this movie since I was a Little kid. Got the movie fast an in perfect condition.
This is a great movie and has always been one of my favorites.  The acting is a bit corny, but the special effects and story line are great.
I like this movie. I think they did a pretty good job for back in those day's. This is a movie that I believe everyone should give it a chance.
This movie is freaky! I love the Poltergeist series! You want to scream and cheer at the same time! I would give it 20 stars if I could!
This is truly one of those new classics form the '80s. The movie moves well and is best seen unedited. Love the scene with the tree!
Who doesn't know and love Rocky?  It is one of my favorite movies.  Enjoyable and great to watch for all.
Good picture. How can you make Rocky bad?  Probably should have waited for the box set, but good movie.
This was an Amazing movie!!  Not just about boxing, good romance also. I wouldn't mind watching this movie again sometime.
My choice for best Rocky film would be Rocky II. But you can't have II without Rocky I. All classics
This was a great movie to kick off Sylvester Stallone's career. No one else could ever be Rocky like him.
Great movie. Deniro is the greatest actor ever. He and Pesci are made to co-star with each other.
Robert deniro is just a born acter , if u ask me he litterlly gets into his rolls. I loved it and I'm not even into boxing.
Great acting, great characters, and a great story on a troubled man. I will watch it again with great pleasure. Deniro is awesome as usual.
I love this movie. Robert De Niro is spectaculer. This is the best Boxing movie of all time.
Robert De Niro, again at his best, no one could have played the part of this true story the way he did.
I could watch this film over and over. Great cast and so brilliantly shot.DeNiro and Pesci are at their very best
I saw this movie when it first came out years ago and loved it.  I had it on VHS for years and decided to purchased if on DVD.
I LIKE THIS MOVIE THIS MOVIE SHOWS TOM HANKS MORE DRAMATIC SIDE AND I LIKE HIS WORK.
I  GOT  MY  MOVIE  TODAY  LOVE  THIS  MOVIEAND  MY  MOM  LOVES  TOM  CRUISE  MOVIESAND  IN  EXCELLENT  SHAPE  THANKS
can't go wrong with dustin hoffman.  He did an excellent job on this character.  Gotta love him in this movie.
Great film.  Dustin Hoffman is the star.  Tom Cruise plays his usual self, not impressive.  But it all comes together in the end.
Tom Cruise, Dustin Hoffman.. Enough Said! This one is a classic and so good! It's such a touching story with lots of does of humor throughout.
this movie will make you cry and make you laugh. Tom Cruise and Dustan Hoffman are the ones that make this movie so good.
A great job of collaboration!! Two brothers trying to find each and to find out where their lives will take them.
This is a great movie, and great acting by Hoffman and Cruise.  I don't like Tom Cruise too much, but he did a great job in this movie.
Hoffman is clearly one of America's greatest actors!  And I LOVE &#34;Jeopardy&#34; just as much as he did in this film.
You'll laugh and cry watching this movie.  Dustin Hoffman is superb!  There is a brief nude sceen so not appropriate for kids.
bought this as a replacement for our dvd library at a hotel. personally never seen it but it arrived quick and in great condition. no problems
dustin Hoffman got the credit.  I think Tom Cruise was fantastic.  Both were great in this movie.  I have seen it a number of times.
A classic. Great character development in Charlie Babbit. Excellent portrayal of autism in Raymond Babbit. Tom Cruise is at his best here.
Great acting by both guys. But Hoffman's surpasses Cruise. The movie story is simple yet attractive. Overall a great movie thanks to the two actors!!
I still bawl!  Again Mr. Cruise has always been my guy.  Wonderful movie Oscar winner, well deserved award winning film
tom cruise is at his best and sexiest in this film, dustin hoffman deserved the oscer for this movie they do not make great movies like this any more
i cried so hard at the end. i just loved this movie. Dustin Hoffman rules.
Hoffman and Cruise do an excellent job in this movie classic.I highly recommend this movie, you won't be dissapointed.
I have aways loved this movie and I can watch it time and time again. Heart warming. Great acting that will bring out alot of emotions.
This is the best movie I have ever seen.  I deffinetly recommed it
If you have never watched this movie, it is one that shall move you emotionally. One that is destined to be an all time classic.
A "must have" classic. Excellent movie with exceptional acting, well cast, moving plot; watch it over and over and enjoy.
Rainman arrived as scheduled and I popped it into the dvd player right away.  Hadn't seen the movie for quite some time and I really enjoyed it.
I LOVE RAIN MAN ALWAYS ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES
Classic Hoffman and Cruise.  This movie brings out the best in both actors.  It is a must have for any lover of film
Tom Cruise should have won an Oscar for his little brother character to the autistic older brother Dustin Hoffman.
Story of a selfish man comes to know and love is autistic brother who at first only meant money to him.
Dude, this movie rocks! Awesome acting, totally cool. It has meaning too, you know like it matters a lot and stuff.
Who cares who's in it. What matters is the fact that this movie was well written and acted. Dustin Hoffman outdid himself on this one.
classic movie that a person never really gets tired of watching and  it is a movie that is interesting to show to the younger generation
I enjoyed ordering items that can and will be a blessing to others  I am for sure that every person will enjoy a small gift of appreication.
its a great movie and a fantastic performance by Dustin and even Tom isnt too bad in this one.  watch it again,
Gangster. John Travolta is a badass again, cool story and definitely a must see. If you like slick movies, this is one of em
Seen it in the past when it first came out, and this time again. Will make you laugh. It will be a classic film.
Didn't know this was a VHS. I should have read the description better. It was a fast shipment.
Really good cast.  Great story.  Almost any movie based on an Eelmo Lenard book has got to be good.  The movie is full of humor.
Very funny in a very cool way. I love John Travalto,  Dennis Farina and gene Hackman. I guess I love the acting of the whole cast!
The laughs that we get from this movie are off the scale and I'm so grateful that I can watch it over and over again.Way to go!
This movie is so much fun to watch that I could not wait to watch it again. All of the actors give a truely entertaining performance.
GREAT MOVIE, SO GLAD I OWN IT AND HAVE IT IN MY COLLECTION!
The movie came out in  '69, when I entered the Army, so I never saw it before now.My wife and I really enjoyed it!  It is a CLASSIC!
Nice film very enjoyable and 2 great actors of all time .Decent quality on this blu ray with some grain.Stil acceptable .
Saw this when it came out years ago, and it was just as good the second time, great acting on both parts.
What a classic!!  Good sound and picture, and if you want to see Jon and Dustin starting out, get this dvd!!!
A good movie to watch. Excellant acting and a very strong story that you would enjoy till the last minute.
An oldie but goodie. This movie is intriguing and teaches lessons about life. Voight & Hoffman are fantastic in their roles
I've seen it on television a few times years ago until 2007. I felt the need to order it because it is very wholesome and sad.
One of the best movies that came out of hollywood.  The BluRay version makes it that much better.  The video and sound are excellent.
Everything was wonderful, as usual. I haven't seen anything with Liam  in it that wasn't great! another job well done
Still one of the great moral tales of all time.  Tim Roth is the all-time best bad guy in movies.
I've watched this movie probably 8 times and will watch it 8 more times.  It is an excellent movie and keeps you interested from beginning to end.
I already loved this movie but didn't own it in any format so when I saw the Blu-ray I bought it. I am happy with my purchase.
This was an excellent portrayal of the Scottish Highlanders and their struggle under British Rule.Liam Neeson and Jessica Lange were fantastic!
This movie was great in its historical recounting of the era. The countryside shots are beautiful. The plot was one that kept my attention.
Saw this movie years ago, once, it stayed in my memory as a really good movie. Now I have added it to my movie collection.
Its a very good movie. The type of movie that stays interesting for the entire show. Good acting, very good.
This is a great movie, I highly recommend it.  Tim Roth an Liam Neeson both do a fantastic job.  The movie feels very real.  I never get tired of it.
One of my most favorite movies--love Liam Neeson in just about anything he does but this is an outstanding movie.
This is a truly great movie in all its aspects - I doubt I have seen better among the hundreds of movies I have viewed.
This movie was inspiring. I love it whe justice is served in such a powerful way. I would recommend this to anyone..
Fantastic film where hero conquers the villain. An all star cast who brought the characters to life. I highly recommend this movie.
The movie keeps in tune to the historical era of Rob Roy.  It shows the cast system as well as telling good story.
The cinematography, acting, storyline - EVERYTHING is pitch perfect.  One for the ages.
I really enjoyed watching this movie. I would recommend this movie for the whole family. A action pack movie, with a happy ending.
This movie is a classic for the whole family!  My daughter loves it, and always wants to watch it!  They just don't make movies like this anymore!
This is a very sweet store about a boy and his horse but also the the loss of parents and how to live on.
This is a classic movie that  we always wanted to get in DVD.  Thanks to Amazon we found it at a great price!
Watched this when I was a kid and bought it for my daughter as she is getting into the Black Beauty and Black Stallion stage.  She just loves it!
I always enjoy watching this movie and the second one of the movie. I can never get enough of watching horses.
Classic great story of survival and a boy and his horse.  Hart warming story about love and loss and finding your way in the world.
Arrived on time. Nice to share my favorite childhood movies with my kids.
I have watched this movie before and it is excellent. It has all of the things that aregood about horses.
I love horses and thought the story was very good. The picture and sound were of good quality and made the story easy to enjoy..
I love this story. It can't be beat. Try it. You'll love it too. I'm just sure of it. Just do it!
This is a great movie to watch and enjoy yourself and have some fun etc.
Love the movie, and am giving it as a gift to someone who I am sure will also love it. I also appreciated the quick service.
The kids loved this movie, they don't get tired of watching it.  Beautiful story of a great horse and the boy acting in the movie was incredible.
I love horses! If you love horses, you will truely love this movie, no matter what your age. Great acting, great storyline, great looking horses!
This is one of the best movies where the horse is the star. Great for all ages.
This movie needs to be in every collection. The sinking can be a little rough for kids, but it all ends up well.
Ergo, bought for the granddaughter and cried again watching it just like I did when I saw it for the first time when I was her age.
enjoyed every moment would definately recommend to anyone who enjoys suspensful movies, I will watch it again for sure. enjoy
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie...the actors were superb....the plot kept me guessing! It's a great story and I recommend it.
This is well worth the watch.  It is the kind of movie that will keep your attention as well as make you a little bit angry.
This movie always kept me guessing on that was next.  I was somewhat confused on certain details, but they later cleared up.
This comedy is great.I forgotten everything when watched movie. I'm collecting comedies and this is going to take place in my shelf.
I love Pink Panther movies, PeterSellers is great and this movie is for all family members. I highly recomend this.
The entire Pink Panther series with Peter Sellers is worth owning, or at least watching in the order in which the films were made!
peter sellers ,  love all his movies ,  always a flamboyant cast of actors also.  his movies are the best.
This is absolutely my favorite Pink Panther movie.  You'll laugh so hard, your sides will hurt.
My Father loves this movie and I found it on Amazon.com for a GREAT Price!!! This was a gift and it arrived in a timely fashion.
Blake Edwards and Peter Sellers in fine form. Comedy was never bettered in subsequent Panthers. Claudia Cardinale shows surprising gift for comedy.
The entire Pink Panther Series is well worth owning, or at least watching in the order in which they were made.
This is a classic comedy and it has Claudia Cardinale! Oh man what a woman! The comedy is crazy but Claudia is magnificent! Yum, yum, yum!
For those who like Peter Sellers and David Neven and the pink panther serries, for the price that they want for this, I think is a very good buy.
A timely classic comedy!  Watch Seller's as he begins the development of his Inspector Clouseau character to become one of the all time funiest.
I have seen most of the other ones.  I really liked this one.  If you are in to the Pink Panther movies, this is a must have.
A must for any Pink Panther collector. I believe this is the 1st movie to introduce the famously hilarious Inspector C.
The entire Pink Panther Series is well worth owning, or at least viewing in the order in which the films were made!
GREAT MOVIE,IF YOU LIKE THE PINK PANTHER FILMS? CLOUSEAU BEING HIS USUAL CLUMSY AND HYSTERICAL SELF.
I loved watching this old movie again. It still made me laugh out loud even though it has some &#34;corny&#34; parts. : )
My Grandkids love watching the Pink Panther Movies.(The Old Ones)  I have 4 of them now.  We enjoy them so much.
First time I saw this it made me want them to invent VHS to DVD to Blueray because I have owned it in all formats, funny!
Not as good as the ones that followed, but still good. He got better with age.
All of the Pink Panther films are &#34;must&#34; viewing (preferably in the order in which they were made. Sellers is unbelievably amazing in all!
Why didn't this make the top hundred best films ever made list? Any film that flogs a dead Frenchman is alright by me.
a great story of a old boxer fighting ten boxers to help out a friend, Lou's acting was fantastic
One of the best movies I have ever seen.  Gossett is fabulous.
Patrick Swayze. Grity and tough, this one was overlooked by thecritics but I know you will love it as I do.
Patrick Swayze movies are always well worth it, in my opinion. Can't go wrong. Highly recommended to anyone who likes movies...
I RECIEVED THE DVD VERY GOOD CONDITION. THE PACKAGE ARRIEVED FAST.IAM A PATRICK SWAYZE FAN AND WE BOTH SHARE THE SAME BIRTHDAY AUG.18.FROMDANIELE
A classic guys movies that has parts for gals as well. Not for "deep thinkers" but excellent brain candy for sheer enjoyment.
Good action movie. Patrick Swayze plays his roll perfectly. The music sound track is also very good. A movie worth watching.
So glad to have this in my collection,my favorite Patrick Swayze movie,its fun to watch he will be truly missed.
I love Patrick and need this movie for my collection. He will be missed by many. He was a great actor and a great man.
I love this movie I love Patrick Swayze. I can't believe he's gone.  He was so talented in this and his other films. How could I NOT buy this.
I love this movie so muchpatrick swayze is super perfectin this movie.I hopein the new deluxe editionis in 5.1 surround sound
Patrick Swayze at his best - we love him in all his movies, but this is one of our favorites.
Great Movie by Patrick Swaze great film.All His films/movies are great ! ! !
Patrick Swayze is why I watch this movie. Husband likes the fights against wrong. Movie has it all, Sex, Violence and it wrapped up in a love story.
Plenty of action here. I've liked all Patrick Swayze movies I've seen in the past. This one is no exception.
good movie for all of my family. enjoyed the story line and the actors that played in the movie. would recommend for families with older children.
We've seen this movie about 20 times over the years and it never gets old. Great action scenes!
I loved this movie the first time I watched it. Couldn't buy it then, wanted to add it to my collection and did.
Movie has some nudity. Violence is rampant. But is an interesting storyline. With Sam Elliott and Patrick Swazee a good flick.
This movie RULES! Low on logic, high on adrenilin, this movie delivers the goods. Sam Shepard remains undeposed as is The Coolest Guy on the Planet.
This one of my favorite Patrick Swayze movies and of course I cannot forget Sam Elliot. Alot of action but loved the ending.
If you like Patrick Swayze you'll love Road House.  One of his best.  Sam Elliot also stars in this as well!
We love this movie!  Anytime we are channel surfing and come across it, we have to watch it!  It's one of the good ones!
I enjoy watching each of these actors.  Patrick Swayze proves he can be more than a dancer.  Great job in this and hisother movies.
I love this movie. It is one of my favorites with Patrick Swayze. The extras offered on the blu-ray version are nice and the quality is excellent.
I'm a big Patrick Swayze fan and this was him at his best! I love the way he stands up for those being &#34;trampled on&#34;
Team Dalton! This movie is an American classic that everyone NEEDS to watch. You'll thank me later. Now go enjoy it.
good movie where good eventually triumphs over the forces of evil.I love a happy ending..Not a chick flick, but does contain a love story within..
Saw this movie when I was a teenager and never tire of it. The music is it is awesome and timeless.
This 1981 WW2 Spy thriller with Donald Sutherland is simply amazing. Sutherland is at the top of his game in this film.
Donald Sutherland is terrific in this WWII Drama.  Keeps you on the edge of your seat and the ending will surprise you.
I needed the DVD for a film club presentation. The service was quick (2 days), the price was good, and the quality of the DVD was good.
Just finished reading the book when I found this available.  Fairly close to the book and Sutherland is a favorite of mine anyway.
I had read the book and also seen the film before. Was very happy with the purchase.  Good quality too.
Yul Brynner is relentless as the western gunshooter robot gone out of control.  Great sci-fi type movie for all ages.
DVD came on time and was perfect. The movie was good and Yul was creepy- even considering how old the movie was.
Saw this drive in back in the day. This is really a great sci-fi action movie --- love it and watch it all the time.
This is another classic sci-fi flic that I needed in my library.It is a "fun" adventure with robots.
is it possible to make robots like this? are they already being used for who knows what.  It's something to think about
really nothing to say about this movie..everybody's knows it...yul is the best for this role.i didn't want to say magnificent,of course.
i love this movie ! i saw it as a kid and still love it today! yul puts arnold to shame ! the termenators got nothing on this robot !
I have recieved early. This was my birthday gift to myself. I always wanted to buy Blue Ray old films. This is one of my favorite of Yul Brynner.
Great movie. It make you wonder about technology being too perfect and selfconscious. Overall: EXCELLENT.
I liked very much this films when I saw it many years ago and I realize now that it remains as good as I remembered.
I enjoyed seeing it again took me back to my childhood. Yul Brynner was awesome in this one. ok ok
got this because we were talking about old movies..such a classic. great condition and arrived quickly I couldn't be happier with this purchase
This is a great movie, picture is clear and sound perfect, wish they had released it on blu ray but this is good.
I think it is a classic and I love the movie. It is one I can watch maybe once a year, and the price was good.
This is one of the better movies.(science fiction)I have seen it several times and enjoyed each time.
this is a fantastic movie and yul bryner is great as the out of control robot/cyborg. brings back old memories of watching it as a kid.
first robot sci fi film.its different on a screen as big as a swimming pool.this is one film I wont forget.
One of the better sci-fi movies to come out of the 70's. Yul Brynner was superb. Amust-have for your collection.
This is a classic movie. I remember it as a young person and wanted to see if it could withstand the test of time. It certainly did that.
Great fun movie and Sean Connery, what could be better.  Donald Sutherland is great also.  Great product and service. Love it.
One of the many DVD's I am proud to own ... never gets old. Leslie-Anne Down makes this Adventure/ comedy one of the greatest. Worth every penny.
I enjoy sean connery movie that he has done over the years. this one is a great one to get.
It's about a dog and a boy and a man and right and wrong. And there are real humans doing the acting.  How  much  better can you get?
My son-in-law recommended this movie and I have watched it over and over again.  Every time I view it the quality and action remain fresh.
Love looking at his great bod and handsom looks.
I love this movie. very little extra on the disc but picture and sound were 9 out of 10  I would buy it before you cant anymore
It's a good movie eventhough it's not Jean Claude Van Dams best movie what ever that one is. The story line is not bad and it's not a bore.
Howard Keel and Kathryn Grayson have great on screen chemistry and are amazing singers. Show Boat is a classic movie.
This is an oldie but a goodie! I purchased this as a movie with great music for the seniors at my mother's Nursing Home to enjoy!
Would recommend to everyone. a family type movie  --  no R scenes.  Singing and dancing are excellent.  Will watch many more times.
Show boat is an excellent old time musical  to relax and watch, and with songs you want sing along with.
This would be five stars if the only part was Kathryn Grayson and Howard Keel singing Only Make Believe. Fantastic!
We thoroughly enjoyed watching this, again, after so many years. The last time we saw it, was a stage production. Perfect perfomances.
JUST A WONDERFUL MUSICAL. BRINGS BACK SO MANY MEMORIES.JUST THRILLED TO HAVE THIS TO VIEW WHENEVER I FEEL LIKE IT.
I just love Musicals I enjoyed all of the singersThis truly is another golden oldie and will never be forgotten
If you love the old musicals then this in my opinion is the best. It has all the elements and the songs are great.
Have loved this movie since the first time I saw it many years ago.  It is so wonderful to now have it in my collection!
I bought this copy so I could have one on DVD. I have always loved this movie. It is a classic.
Another great musical and I love the setting, the music and the dance.  Another &#34;oldie but goody&#34; to add to my library.
So happy to finally have this in my own dvd library!  One of my very favorite movies.  No frills DVD with feature film.
The music is super and so is the plot.  I would highly recommend this to those who are movie buffs
I received the video in a timely fashion, that I appreciate.....this is one of myall time favorite movies.
It is a great movie.I watch it a couple of times a yearI recommend it to musical lovers.
The music is beautiful and the story is soulful, sad, bittersweet and lovely.  A classic for sure and for a long time to come.
Wonderful restoration and the music is wonderful; a classic musical--a must have in a video library!  I loved it!
Wonderful classic with so many great scenes.  Considered by many to be the best of the Hepburn and Tracy films.
Classic Tracy & Hepburn...PLUS it includes Judy Holliday and Jean Hagen! The Prosecutor/Defender storyline is outstanding. My favorite T&H film.
Adam's Rib is a classic movie starring Spencer Tracey and Katherine Hepburn -- the dynamic duo of classic romantic comedy.
Wonderful classic. I enjoy watching this movie again and again. Nothing is better than Hepburn and Tracy!
It's  Mel Gibson's and Sigourney Weaver's best movie and Linda Hunt blows them away with a truly Oscar winning performance.
This film has a unique and intriguing story, great actors, beautiful photography and an excellent director.What more can you ask for?
don't know if i love it but it was certainly a good film with outstanding performances-cast & crew. a movie that i would watch again.
One of my favorite Mel Gibson movies. This is one of the ones he really stretched his acting skills on.
I enjoyed the film. The dancing and singing in it. The movie itself was very good. I like Elvis and the songs he sings in the movie.
Dvd cover is great. Nice picture of Elvis and Ann Margaret. Packaging is good. Fast shipping. Gift for my Mom for Christmas. Extremely good price.
This was a gift and was really enjoyed .It had Elvis at his best and if you are a fan you will love this !!!!
My brother loves old movies,you just got to love Elvis to watch this,& he says it's great, & it also plays good too.
you will want to own this no kidding. this a no1 to all the fans of elvis presley  you won't regret it you will be up on cloud nine
What more can I say ELVIS. Nice story very good music, Buy it enjoy it just like me. Always been a fan.
Well, He's the King!  This is one of his best and Ann Margaret is great!
we like the elvis movies because they are clean with clean language, no nudity and just all around fun with the drinking and filthy language
DVD came as described. It is a gift for a Dear Friend who loves Elvis as I do. Have to say I wish it were mine :)Thank you for it.
Ann Margaret and the king obviously clicked in this movie.. The music and dance was great and Elvis was really good in this movie.
This is one of my favorite Elvis movies, Ann Margret was his equal and they acted, danced and sang well together.
The picture quality is off the charts. Sound is above average. This is a must have for any high def collection.
This movie really pops in Blue-ray and looks great. A must buy for Elvis fans.
The King at his very best. If you're an Elvis fan, or know someone who is, this is a must-own classic movie.
here is another great elvis movie lots of race cars in this one very good songs in it i really like the song viva las vegas the bluray is excellent.
A classic movie, much better on DVD than VHS.  A great addition to any Elvis fan's library!
caught this late night on tv and loved it not for everyone will love it but those who like animorphic animals and the TMNT theme will like i think
I loved this movie as a kid, and now I can share it with my own family. We all love the kung fu influence on the action and story telling.
My father introduced this movie to my daughter when she was little and they both love it.  When I was found it, I had to purchase it.
If you are looking for a really sweet Christmas movie to watch with the family, then buy this movie. I watch it every Christmas :)
great value, great movie, all the nostalgia a grown farm girl could want in her Christmas movie collection. Get it you will enjoy it
A delightful story of faith in the traditions and miracles of Christmas that defy ecplanation.  Glad to have thia and the sequel on DVD.
love this movie for Christmas, I watch it at least once a year,good movie for the whole family, very good
Get the tissues out. Still a great movie for all ages. A family classic for our family. Nice &#34;new&#34; movie for the Grandchildren.
I am  converting my VHS collection to DVD.  This movie is great. I love it.  It is a Christmastime must see at our house every year.
Another Christmas classic.  Down to earth and touching performances by Sam Elliott and ensamble.  We watch it every year.
This is a great family classic Holiday movie. I love it, and would recomend it to anyone.
I just watches this movie cuz I was recording it for mom. I ended up really liking it. So I got it for myself too!
just love the movie.  Actors bring this to life and keep adults and children engrossedin the story line. Wish it was in Blu-Ray
this movie is so cute.  been replacing old vhs tapes and when i pulled out the Christmas movies I definitely wanted to get this heartwarming story
Got this movie for grandaughters and myself to watch together. I love Sam Elliott, my favotite actor.Amazom is a  great place to order movies from
THIS IS A WONDERFUL MOVIE. I TOOK MY KIDS TO THE MOVIES TO SEE THIS ONE. IT IS REALLY A KEEPER.
I would recommend you to everyone to go thru you:) I only had 1 problem but you were real quick in resolving it!! Cudos!!
This movie stars Sam Elliott in a charming tale from the Christmas season. It will make you believe in the possibilities of the magic of the season.
Just funny stuff. Magic of Christmas with no agenda.  My grand children watch it every year.  We recommend it with hot chocolate and ice cream
This was to replace a vhs that just does not want to work any more. I was pleased with the service and would order from you again.
This movie arrived on time and well before Christmas. It was a Christmas gift for my daughter and arrived in plenty of time. She enjoyed it!
one of the best xmas movies.. great service and price
This is a classic Christmas movie and sadly is no longer shown on TV at Christmas anymore.Excellent film that both families and children will love.
It wouldn't be Christmas without this movie!  An annual must-see at our our house.  It's a Great Cast and Great Story Line.
Still one of the best Christmas movies made.  This year our grand daughter gets Prancer and she will be thrilled for sure!
While this may be a lower budget movie, it still is fun.The acting is good, but just a little rough I guess.I still like it.
My whole family loves this holiday movie.  We watch it every year.  It is a very heartwarming story,  the characters are wonderfully real.
Here's another Christmas movie that I just love.  It's such a great story and I watched it continuously over the holiday season.
This rating is worth 5 stars ... It was a moving story and so real a good lesson too and I would definitely recommend it
Great movie for ALL ages!  I have seen this movies several times and always wondered why I didn't own a copy?  Now I do!!
Heartfelt Christmas stories dont get much better than this; though, it is getting a little outdated, not quite as timeless as 'Its a Wonderful Life'.
Good and funny clean movie. It is good for the whole family and kids. You should try this movie yourself. Good Christmas Movie
classic movie that every time you watch it you feel good and helps put you in the Christmas spirit always
This is a wonderful movie and I would recommend it to everyone! I was very pleased with my purchase and would buy again!
I have loved this movie since I was a little girl! It is a tradition to watch it every holiday season and I am so glad I found this on DVD!
It was a great movie for the holidays, and a very appropriate story for children of all ages and for adults, as well,
I have always loved this movie - Sam Elliot is one of my favorite actors, but my family hates it.  A gift for myself this christmas
Saw this holiday movie a long time ago and loved it.  I'm very happy it's part of my movie collection.
We love this charming Christmas story that we're sure is a classic by now.  Very satisfied with this DVD and it's excellent for all the family.
Very enjoyable period film.  The cinematography was delightful, and I loved the story.  Well worth the viewing.  I highly recommend this film.
Excellent performances by the cast and one of my favourite movies. Some actors are notab le by their youth. Great.
A great cast makes this classic love story the perfect movie for a Sunday afternoon.You'll need two buckets of popcorn because it's a long one!
This is a terrific version of Hardy's novel.  I can't fault anything about it.  The acting, the filming, all of it is perfect.
This is an exceptional film.  Julie Cristie is perfection!!Why is this film not on DVD?
This is a wonderful DVD. The story is very interesting and compelling. And it is filmed in such beautiful areas. It a great film.
the HD DVD brings high definition clarity to this classic old movie.  Marlon Brando and the voyage of the Bounty still an exciting trip
I have seen this movie many times. I also have it in VHS. Blue ray version is excellent. Very happy. Great collectible item at a great price.
Husband has this one so memorized that we both can quote lines from it with ease. Better than the one with Clark Gable.
If you are a Billy Crystal fan, you will love this movie.  I think it is one of his best.
An Oscar worthy performance by Billy Crystal in his best work since Soap.
Hi  Bryan  Rodriguez  Here  i  love  classic  horror  movies  just  like  the  child's  play  and  it  scary to  thanks  again
i got this for a friend at work's daughter she loved it child's play fan and quite affordable great for any horror fan thumbs up
I bought this movie for my Son he's a big horror fan and he love the child'd Play series. He need this one to complete his collection
this product was everything that i hoped it would be so thank you for the swift and easy transaction. the product got to me in a reasonable fashion.
SO NOW  THIS IS THE DVD  WE WAIT FOR A LONG TIME  GOOD SOUND  16 : 9SO  THIS IS THE BEST CHUCKY  NO COMMENT
child's play is a comedy horror,it's quite short but extreamly good,it's a film everybody should have on video{espeacily mad people}
Love this movies series in general. If you love horror/scarey movies then this is a great movie series. I recommend.
This movie is fantastic! It has great actors. The movie will have you on the edge of your seat. It's an awesome horror movie.
How can you go wrong? This is where it all started. I remember seeing this movie when I was a kid. Great movie I highly recommend.
Thank you so much for this DVD it will always be a classic to me and my fends, Thank you again!
It nice to be able to share with your kids where horror real started as a kid in the world
I was happy to see this title again. You don't see what the ending will be, so it keeps you on the edge of you seat.
I really enjoyed this movie, great acting,  Mary Steenburgen, Roddy McDowallKeeps you in suspense, if you like Thrillers, great pick.
A different kind of vampires, with an excellent music score, by the late five Oscar Winner Henry Mancini
This film is not for everybody but it is a very scary vampire movie that is a drive in classic.
I love this movie it is one of the best Syfy  movies ever made.It is awesome.
This little gem was taken from &#34;Space Vampires&#34;, which I enjoyed in High School. A fun movie but not to the same depth as the book.
yes i did recive both movies and i am haPPY WITH THEM GREAT QUALITY THANK YOU ONLY THING IT DOSE NOT SHOW ON MY LIST THATS WEIRED
This is a classic horror tale that has aged well. The '80's styles are dated, but for those of us who lived through them, they are fun to see!
This is Lance in his prime. What a great under rated actor he is. This s*** scared the hell out of me when it first came out. Enjoy.
It is a movie I was looking for and was not disappointing. Really made me had a great time. Should see it!
bring on some more Pumpkinhead!!!  Great fright film!
This is one of the few horror movies that I like.. Has some sad parts but all in all it is a good movie.. Hope you like it too..
Great story,plot, Cast of characters, Very Scary, Lance Henriksen is great. Simple yet Great movie.
this is an oldie but goodie it delivers only recommend adults to see this one  any way thank you for my DVD it arrive on time and as described
I purchased the movie for my Husband, he really enjoy's the movie.
First in the series! Ah, what a movie! Lance Henriksen at his best. Halloween has nothing on this series. Great buy!!
this moie is a great exsample of the start of the updating movie stars to above b standards..good action and not a bunch of cheesy acting
This is easily one of my top two Marilyn Monroe movies, up there with How to Marry a Millionaire. So, so funny and well done. Love it!
Movie is as good as I remembered, DVD came in excellent shape, I watched it with no problems, thanks again.
i love this classic movie!tony curtis..jack lemmon and marliyn monroe are great in it!i recommend this to friends and fanily..
felt a stirring in my loins during several MM scenes.  Now, I know why.  Great fun, HOT, entertaining.  See it!
Bought this after Tony Curtis passed away.  I had none of his movies, so wanted to have one of the best.  Can't go wrong with this selection.
I pity the poor soul who has not ever seen this movie!!  It's LOL funny!  Everyone is perfectly cast.  Some great lines.
This is the best comedy every produced.  Everything is great.  This one will never be forgotten.
A classic movie. great stars and everyone seemed to be having a good time. I especially liked the interviews from Tony Curtis. HIghly recommended.
Great older movie, you will love it if you like Marilyn Monroe.Fun movie for all to see. Great popcorn night with the family.
There are no words to describe how fun this film is. Monroe, Lemon and Curtis are all wonderful. If you love old movies, this one's a must see.
Just Like any movie with Marilyn in it!!!I was too young - She a Candle in the Wind!! There!
Billy Wilder was a true artist, and this is his best movie, I believe.  Tony Curtis, Jack Lemmon, and Marily Monroe have never been better.
Item came before it was suppose to which made me very happy and it's exactly what I bought. Item has made me very happy.
I bought the DVD to watch Jack Lemmon because I love his acting. He did not disappoint me in this one.
I can only say that this film is just about perfect. Marilyn is percectly on the mark as a comic actress. She is funny, touching and wonderful.
MM is so hot!  Worth watching again and again as years go by.  Great cast and story.
This is an old classic that transcends time because it is as good back in the day as it is now! Loved seeing Marilyn, Jack and Tony in their finest!
a classic
There is nothing to say.  WATCH this movie.  There is NO way you will not laugh and love it.  Do it.  NOW.
This is a classic. A fun, fast-moving comedy. Curtis, Lemmon, and Monroe are terrfic. You can't miss with this one. See it!
Always fun--great to share with young relatives who've never seen it.Voted Best Comedy of the 20th Century by The American Film institute.
The five stars, Monroe, Curtis, Lemmon, Raft and Joe E. Brown really added to this most funny movie, And my wife and I really enjoyed the movie.
Nothing is better than Monroe, Curtis, and Lemmon. A must see classic!
Good classic movie. Funny. What these two do to be near and try to get a woman!!! How funny! A must see.
This is a flawlessly scripted, superbly performed and endlessly witty comedy that deserves its place among the all-time favorite greats.
Greer Garson and Robert Donat are exceptional in this movie. Greer always is wonderful. Good story and very good acting.
I received the video in a timely fashion and in excellent condition, great quality too.  :)
This is one of my favorite movies and I found it a wonderful as when I first viewed it many years ago. Would recommend it to all lovers of movies.
This along with &quot;Boys town&quot; is the best film of the 1930's. It's a great story about a teachers life. I highly recomend.
Tear jerker but well done. I've seen it many times and wanted it in my DVD collection. Buy it for yours.
Just saw this for the first time this weekend. A truly wonderful film, bittersweet and heartfelt. Top notch.
One of his better old movies.I 'v watched it a few times.would recommend it to fans, good to see familiar older stars too
This is my favorite Betty Davis movie and I like to look at it again and again. Its a classic
Love Bette Davis & have seen her films hundreds of times & this is my favorite one! Hard to choose as there are many I like.
Bette Davis is so great in this film, a great story with so much emotion and love, one of my favorites
I LOVE THIS MOVIES BETTY DAVIS IS GREAT IN THIS MOVIES BUY IT AND SEE FOR YOUR SELF. YOU WANT GO WRONG.
This story is timeless...the best thing I have ever seen Bette Davis in to be sure...the ending is on my absolute favorite list.
it is a classic and very good
Very entertaining film.  It has a good picture and good sound. The actors are so good and is a great movie
soglad when bette davis makes such a change.  wonderful love story. thank you for having it for me at such a good price.
I love this movie since i first saw it. It makes you think. I love old movies. What can i say!
SOME MOVIES MADE MANY YEARS AGO ARE CLASSICS.  THIS IS ONE OF THEM.  SIMPLICITY OF STORY AND ACTING IS SUPERB.
How could you not love this movie and the condition was great what more can a consumer ask thank you so much.
This is one of Bette Davis' greatest movies. An excellent story adaption, direction and actioing by most of the cast.
one of Bette's best
A classic romantic comedy,  if you haven't seen this movie - it is a must.
this is like a classic movie, I loved everypart of it. And you can watch it over and over again and not get tired of it like some other movies.
This movie is a classic.  I bought the Blu-ray version to update my collection.  A must have for any movie fan.
The dialog is clever; the characters are regular people in amusing situations.  There is no need for innuendo for a script to be funny.
one of my all time favorites, a must see for all females of any age. A classic with good lessons.
Such a gem this movie is - love Billy Crystal and Meg Ryan together - Rob Reiner had it together on this one!
I have aqlways liked this movie. I thinkall women would like to think that we can be real friends with men before we find love.
If you know the movie, you realize this is the only rating it could be given. I was glad to be able to add the Blu-Ray version to my collection.
a very truly boring movie that likely entertained in the 70's but will cause a swift reason to nap to come on!GREAT SELLER...but-the movie stank!
I adore this film. Meg Ryan and Billy Crystal are just charming together. This is a definite addition to my favorites list.
I bought this Blu-Ray copy as a replacement for my old VHS tape and regular DVD copy. Blu-Ray really enhanced the viewing quality!
Excellent repartee and lots of memorable one-liners.  I never would have thought of Billy Crystal as a leading man, but he makes it work.
This is one of my all time favorite movies!  Great purchase and I am very excited to be able to watch the movie when I want!!
A romantic movie that one one dies in at the end. Very funny diner scene, one of the best parts of the movie.
I saw this movie many years ago and I bought it for my 16 year old daughter. She will enjoy this movie.
This movie was adorable and the cast played their parts acurately. The storyline was cute and funny The characters had great banter
I love this movie, it is a good movie for romantics. I would recommend this movie to people who love romantic comedies.
I love this movie I watch it a lot and I never get tired of it, it's funny, romantic, and can be watched over and over
I saw this movie when it first came out, so very, very funny! Billy Crystal and Meg Ryan are superb in it.
This is an oldie but a goodie!  Billy Crystal and Meg Ryan are amazing in this movie.  Great romantic movie to enjoy with a loved one.
One of Billy Crystal's and Meg Ryan's best movie ever made together.
This is such a good classic. They just don't write 'em like this anymore. A young Meg Ryan and Billy Crystal were terrific in this film...
We all truly enjoyed this movie!  The picture quality was beautiful and I know I will watch it again!  Awesome! Our favorite romantic comedy!
One of those movies you will watch over and over. A great love story of two best friends through the years.
Movie came early and played well, no problems at all, was a good movie to watch for some good entertainment
I was very happy with the purchase. It's nice to find an older movie, but still brand new with the plastic still on it!
Meg Ryan and Billy Crystal at their best.  Timeless.  What do you mean I have to write 11 more words.
This my second favorite romantic movie after the notebook.Can friends become lovers?? I loved this movie and just loved the ending.
One of the most Original Romantic Comedies.  Makes you Laugh and  forget your problems for a couple of hours. This is a must see!!!!
this movie is way to funny from beginning to end with no serious moment to the next just pure laughter!
This movie, and City Slickers 2, are probably my favorite Biily Crystal movies.  Jack Palance also gives an outstanding performance in both movies.
Up-graded from a regular DVD. I particularly love the opening scene. Billy Crystal is great as usual. One of my favorite actors
You cant go wrong its funny, touching,  and adventure. good ole just fun, its a 90's classic. Jack Palance is great
I also enjoyed this movie very much and wanted to order it for My Collection of movies.All the stars in this movie were very good.
What a great movie. Everyone in the cast was exceptional in their part. Just had to add it to my collection.
What can I say. I real classic, even enjoyed by my young children. Extremely entertaining.
FUNNY FUNNY FUNNY..these 3 mesh so well together as BF's, and the one liners....Helooooow. Norman is so cute and yes he's a calf.
Billy Crystal is a hoot.  Have always loved this movie and enjoyed watching again in Blu Ray.  A great light hearted movie.
Good to watch for fun. Lots of humor. About being in the country and finding it a very different life with bllue skies and openness for freedom.
It is funny, and real, and they worked so ease. They did a great job. We love to see this movie again and again!
This is a great movie. If you want to laugh this will do it. If you get this one be sure to get City Slickers 2 and you'll have double the fun.
Clearly Palance's best work since Gunsmoke. Favorite scene is where Curly gets drunk and suffers a fatal heart attack while attempting to ride a cow.
I've loved this movie for years!  Great cast, very funny script, filmed in beautiful locations in the south west, very entertaining.
Enjoy this film.  Not just a shallow comedy but a deeply emotional cinematic experience.  The extras are very very good.
As always, a great entertaining movie that is good for all. Enjoyed then, enjoyed it now. Delivered its message with humor
A great 'sleeper' movie from Nicholson and Brando.Characters are well developed and the Plot moves quickly.One of my favorites &#34;westerns'
It is refreshing to go and watch some good western movies after all the future and space junk. Good movie filmed in a good location.
This old western movie features Jack, Randy Quaid, and Marlon Brando. I have watched this movie 20 times or more and will watch it again...
Brando is not the Brando you think not acts the way of a morsel of Brando .  Believe me the movies that follow still push towards greatness.
This is a very well acted and written western, it just shows things the way they were! I love it!!
Cowboys, love affair, moral play, top tier actors and a brilliant script. This is a classic with Marlon Brando as a quirky bad guy.
this was awsome you dont get to much better of a movie, i suggest everyone see this movie! at least twice.
in viewing this movie I liked it so much I bought thereturn of a man called horse, recommend
Absoutly the best Peter Fonda is a very good actor.And in this movie he is great all the way.Glad to have it on dvd and in my collection.
this movie takes you on an adventure from the very beginning! a definite must-have for any Brooke Shields fans! now if only they'd released Tilt...
I ENJOYED THIS UNUSUAL MODERN WESTERN WHICH PETER FONDA AND COMPANY PROVIDE PLENTY OF LAUGHS. MAY NOT BE EVERYONE'S CUP OF TEA THOUGH.
Still one of the funniest movies I think I've ever seen.  Do yourself a favor and rent it and see if you like it.
A crazy movie I watched as a child with my family, and a great one to ad to my collection.
besides the fact that the movie was funny, it came in on time, sealed, and in condition. dvd din't skip, jump, or paused. Good product to summarize.
One of Zero Mostel's greatest comic performances. A classic comedy that you will love to see over and over again.
a riot with all the mid century comedians and great music
Bobby Morse is great, the music is marvelous. It's a wonderful show for those who like this janre. A real good film.
This dvd was like new and played very well.  I will buy more "gently used" dvd's in the future
This if silly but funny, a great movie to laugh along with; I have seen this a hundred times. Try it.amazon.com/author/subversion
This is not The Sound of Music, but it does have some catchy tunes, a great story line and it's entertaining.
classic musical still fun after all these years.  those musical days are gone but its fun to relive and watch the pros in action.
Good characters....very enjoyable movie.  This is the way they used to make movies in Hollywood....and still should!
The DVD is in excellent condition and i received it on the planned delivery date. This is one of my favorite musicals.
Excellent score, not a boring for a  moment... I love the barn raising section.  I will be watching this one again.
Marvelous musical with superb dancing and vocal talents of Howard Keel and Jane Powell. This would be an excellent Blu-Ray !
I bought it as a gift for a family member. They loved it very much and is very happy to put it with their movies.
never saw it before when a friend suggested we watch. I love musicals and this was no exception. I LOVED IT!!
I love this movie. Always have. If you are a fan of old Hollywood productions, you will love it too.
Love the story line and dance numbers in this musical. Characters are easy to love and pull in the human side of &#34;goin' courtin'&#34;
This movie is so much fun. The costumes, the colors, the singing, the dancing - it's glorious fun from beginning to end.
Seven Brides has long been a favorite of our family.  Great music and talent.  Definitely a must watch if you like the old musicals!
A favorite movie of my husband that he wanted for his collection.  He was very happy to get this movie.
This movie is one of the best I have ever seen, with dancing, singing, and an excellent plot, interesting twists and awesome conclusion.
Love this story, and it is great to own on DVD.  My daughter will watch it with me.
I have always loved this movie, and Howard Keel is the best. It's nice to be able to watch it anytime.
Great songs. A fun movie. Family oriented. It's not as well known as some other musicals, but its worth adding to the list of classic musicals.
Hadn't seen this film for about 20 years.  It's the only musical movie that I like.  It's just such great fun.
ALMOST MY FAVOURITE MUSICAL EVER.SO THRILLED TO HAVE THIS ONE IN MY LIBRARY.
I love musicals and this one was cute! There is also a lot of dancing that my daughter thought was cute.
Love this classic, introduced my 5 and 8 year old to it.  They LOVED it.  Fantastic family movie that keeps the musical classic alive
I love this movie! I used to watch it as a kid and it's every bit as good as I remembered.
I always loved the way they would sign & dance in the  movie. MY mom and I would sit and watch it all the time.
I love this movie.  I watch it again and again.  Even my kids now like it and watch it with me.  Now that it's in HD, it's even better.
7 Brides for 7 Brothers is full of songs and fun.  Good for the whole family to watch.  Sit back and enjoy!
I love musicals and this one is no exception it is an awesome touch up . They did a great job it is worth every cent.
watched this show when i was a young girl, watched it with my granddaughter and she loved it too. family entertainment
I love the old musicals and this was one of the best, I am glad I have it in my collection to watch anytime I want. Wonderful.
Very disappointed they didn't have it available on DVD. I wanted to send it back, but decided to keep it. I will not buy a VHS movie again.
It's funny, sweet, sad, and yet a fun way to learn about 1850s Oregon territory. Great family movie. It is a musical.
I've loved this movie since I was a kid. (Still under 40.) Such a cute musical! Worth your time to watch!
love love love this movie and so happy to have it in DVD.  I love to watch this over and over.
I am so glad to have this movie again.  We watched it years ago and loved it!
love the music and energy!  Julie Newmar is great in this, and Howard Keel is fantastic!  This is a great American classic!
Just needed to update my library with real musicals.God Bless America!God Bless America!God Bless America!God Bless America!
Great movie!!  well worth twatching.  Saw it on AMC and wanted it for my personal DVD library.  It's great for a lazy Sunday afternoon  viewing.
Seven Brides for Seven Brothers is one of the best musicals out there.  It's a true classic and can be watched over and over again.
Great voices, good music, great dancing, respectful of the scriptures, safe for the little ones, and hilarious.
Good and clean humor and fun for all ages.  My kids were in their high school musical of 7 Brides...so they enjoyed the movie!
This film has been a favorite since I was a child -- had to introduce my niece to it - she loved it as much as we do!
What a fun movie and the music and dance is wonderful.  I wish the days of musicals could make a come back.
Used to watch this and other musicals as a child and loved them, it's really great to be able to watch them with my kids now!
A musical which still has not been given the credit it deserves  -  it has music, songs and dancing to match the best of them.
Great music, great dancing.  The more I watch it, the more I appreciate about it.  I highly recommend it for all ages.
I always thought this movie was fun and I was right. Lots of fun. Howard Keel and Jane Powell complement each other very well and the music is great!
Always makes me smile, the music and the talented dancing, along with the wonderful ..it all works out in the end ..ending.
Every one in our house loves this story. Our 19 yr-old son has always loved this movie. The ending of course is predictable but getting there is fun.
I really appreciate getting my order so fast, I really enjoy old time musicals,this is one of my favorites
This is a family favorite.  Everyone of every age loves it.  You should see my 4 year old niece Molly sing, "Bless your beautiful hide" HILARIOUS!
my future son in law loved this musical.  I have to purchase this for myself too.  Can't wait to get this one for myself
I grew up watching this movie with my family and I love it. It is an absolute classic. I love it!
Not only does this have two great singers, it has some fantastic choreography as well.  Excellent supporting cast, and a delightful movie.
This is a really fun movie. It's so fun and entertaining with wonderful music and dancing.
Came fast, new copy, no problems at all to speak of. This is a classic that no home should go without.
Even though I am not a big fan of musicals, I love this movie! I wish they still made wonderful movies like this.
I would highly recommend this and other dvds. So far, I haven't found one that I didn't like or was not satisfied with.Susan P. Keefe
It is just as good the 5th time as it was the 1st. I love movies that are well scripted and entertaining.
one for the classic movie lover in the house.  makes you want to break out in song
I've seen this show well over 20 times & I still love it. I bought the movie so I had it to watch whenever I wanted.
love it  my husband and I really loved this movie and finally got it on dvd  perfect gift for us
I love this it was a gift to my mom she cried this is a great movie emotional classic love it
This was a great musical. It just goes to show you, that you will do just about anything to get what you want.
Everyone must love this musical. All of the players do a superb job of acting and the choreography is A-1.Natalie Wood was one super actress!
This is one of the greatest movies ever made in the U.S. It has a love story. A study in the dynamics between two cultures. Not good but GREAT music.
Great Tape - A real classic. Will be around for a long time. This is a real collector's item. A must buy!
Great DVD, quick shipping thanks so much
This DVD is of the highest quality.Watching the Sharks vs. the Jets singing, dancing was fantastic.Purchase it with full confidence and enjoy.
Even if you are not a fan of Musicals this is a must own movie. The dance numbers are all well done.
Loved the singing, choreography, and music.I would recommend this to anyone who loves the old musicals.West Side Story is fantastic.
Great musical!  Love the songs, the dancing...all of it!!  The story is a good one and a must see for young and old alike!
There is none greater than Natalie Wood and Rita Moreno in the amazing movie.  The music is unforgettable and truly classic.
A great remake of a good movie.  It draws you in just as good now as when it was first released.
I have always missed this movie in a bigger, clearer version.  This is an amazing transfer to blu ray.  Loved it.
This is a great redone movie and a story you can watch over and over, mainly because of the songs.
Oldie but goodie at a great price!
everything's perfect, the packaging and also the quality of the disc...you won't be disappointed...you have to buy this set for real..
i love this movie and i love all the choreography in it. if you are a dancer you could definately learn a lot of great moves from this movie.
great movie showing how 2 cultures try to get along and somehow it always fails. Would recommend this to the generation of today.
It's another lost classic to these generations. Ever been to NY? Brooklyn? This was the 50s. Classy. Make the teens watch it. :)
cry every time i view it.  an all time classic the music the dancing and of course the sad ending.
Can't be much of a surprise to anyone reading about WSS.  Great musical!  My daughter loves it too.  She dances around the living room to it.
But...for the price and what you get...it's a great movie to add to your collection. This price won't stay this cheap for long. Get it now.
Great movie very life lesson like Romeo And Juliet! hahaha... Anyway it could be a Great Valentine's day gift! =)
This a great classic movie and musical.It was great acting,great dancing and great music&#62;it has a unique vibe and feel of it own;it is raw energy
What can ou say about a classic film whose premise is older than Shakespere and as modern as our racial conflicts today?  Awesome!
The dancing alone makes this movie one to treasure.  It was a triumph when it was released and remains so to this day.
While there is no book like the one that came w the DVD box set, the picture quality is superb. I expect to keep the DVD set for a fuller experience.
West Side Story is one of the most wonderful Musicals of all time.  Watch it for the music with the volume turned up..
If you know the movie, enough said.
West Side Story is one of the classical american musicals. Updated Romeo and Juliet in New York City, set to music.
Damn, this is a great movie. Its small flaws are overwhelmed by the powerful score and cinematography and the intense, breathtaking choreography.
This movie is so great! I love musicals and I could'nt stop singing  the songs all day long! Fantastic Movie and Musical!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Timeless classic movie. 2 of the songs are frequently re-done by various artists
We love musicals and this classic was a great addition to our collection. My husband and I enjoyed watching it.
I just watched the new blu ray and overall it's wonderful. No problems as has been reported. Buy it and enjoy.
I love this movie and always has.  It's a classic movie like the Wizard of Oz.  Thank  you and Happy Holidays.
Good quality reproduction of a classic film....a pleasure to watch.  I'm glad to see these older titles remastered in a new tehnology.
It was a good musical and it made fun of the gangs in new York in a musical way. I liked it
I've been looking for this set for a long time. I love this movie. Good price, love the extras included
West Side Story has never looked better!
really a good movie Natalie Wood is outstanding actress so very sad she died so young like to have her do more acting
We watched it with a friend from Spain who fell in love with the music and the show.  Who can not appreciate the skill of Leonard Bernstein!
This is great.  To watch this movie in HD is a new experience.  I highly recommend purchasing the HD version.
West Side Story is one of the best Romeo and Juliet remakes ever&#8212;with great music by Leonard Bernstein. What more could you want?
Watched it the first time when I was a little girl and it never gets old. The music and choreography are amazing - great movie!!
A DVD that replaces a VHS tape that I have.  It is a wonderful movie wih Gene Kelly singing and dancing.  Great movie.
One of the best soundtracks also!  Doesn't get any better than the old, clean movies!  Fun for all! (the teen & 20's love it also!)
Always a pleasure to see Kelly on film at his best.  Leslie Caron, in her first film, made it very clear it wasn't going to be her last.
This was a really great purchase. Have always enjoyed Gene Kelly. He makes everything look so easy. Paris is a great setting for artist
THE SOUND IS GREAT AND THE HD PICTURE LENDS ITSELF TO THE GENIUS OF GENE KELLY .HE DID HIS OWN CHOREOGRAPHY
Silly story, but who cares with Gene Kelly and Leslie Caron in it?  Great dancing from both of them. Music is as good as it gets.
I love the dance numbers. Specially the ballet number. A classic it's one of my favorite musicals. Gene Kelly and Leslie Caron at their best.
I love this movie.  It is a classic with wonderful musical numbers and songs and Gene Kelly dancing.  A definite feel good show.
Dance scenes absolutley the best - both Kelly & Carron superb athletes - don't miss this. Did they make another film?
Good songs. Great dances. Nice story.  Lots of laughs.  All around enjoyable to watch.  Kelly & Crone are outstanding with a good supporting cast.
My daughter requested this as a gift. I got it for her and she was vey much thrilled. Thank you
Perfect for the value...A classic I wanted to use pedagogically...Good movie with nice scenery and good music...Soundtrack by Gershwin!!!
it made it here in great shape.  i gave it this rating it has a wonderful cast a great movie. i i is great movie to watch.
because I loved it, it had such style and the cast well you will never see one like that again  fabulous
I love the music in this movie.  Great cast.  Well acted.  A must for any serious movie buff.  Try it!  You'll like it!
I have longed enjoyed this movie.  So, this past Christmas, I shared my joy with my honorary Mother-in-Law!!!!  Shae loved it!!!
This is just a fun movie for everyone gets their guy and gal.....with music and comedy in the mix....with very likable characters.
You can not beat a movie with Armstrong. Kelly, Crosby, and Sinatra. The music is outstanding. Grace Kelly is stunning
It's a good story and good music and a good cast - all around enjoyable.  Better than The Philadelphia Story. .
This is one of my all-time favorite movies!  You must see it if you haven't already!  It's the musical version of &#34;The Philadelphia Story&#34;.
If you are into old classic movies, classic actors, and cute stories you'll LOVE this movie.  Lots of laughs, great actors, darling story.
Replacing VHS copy - it was wonderful to watch this again.  Grace Kelly and Sinatra are wonderful.  Satchmo and the band give it Zing.
I highly recommend this film.  Grace Kelly, Bing Crosby,and Frank Sinatra are wonderful in it!  I'd give it morestars if I could.
Wonderful old movie ... Why do they not make them like this anymore ... We really enjoyed watching this again
This is my all time favorite movie and I am so happy I ordered it. The condition was perfect! Thanks!
If you like oldies and quality actors, this movie is a good watch.  Story isn't quite believable but fun anyway.
We both love the songs and stars in this movie.  We had this on VHS and wanted it on DVD too.
Crosby, Kelly and Sinatra are great. From a time where humor and class still existed. Part of the Classic collection.
This is a fantastic movie.  The setting is exotic and the story is nice.  Phoebe Cates is incredible here.
Really this is quite a good movie,  The director does a great job of keeping yourattention, and provides some humor at times.
This movie has no real plot but the dancing and the old Myrtle beach scenes are great! buy it now.
4 girls on a last weekend get away, boys,drinken,love,partys a funny movie for the time.You will watch it again and again.
Great.  The movie was great, received it very fast and I am very happy with my purchase.  I will use again in the future.
A great movie that I grew up watching with my mom and that I loved sharing with my own daughter.
Don't take the Movie seriously. Just sit back and chuckle. Kristie is so funny. The Movie had me laughing out loud.
Once I saw this film I never forgot it. You won't forget either. The twists are natural, funny and entertaining.
Red Dawn will always be a classic! Of course, this movie is considered politically incorrect----which makes it even more of a classic-ha.
I saw this 20 years ago. I thought I was buying the 2012 version, but got this one. But I saw it again and liked it as good as many years ago.
Great movie for escape watching. Not as polished as the later version but the movies followed a different story line with more cold weather etc.
No reviews are needed for this movie. I mean, Come on!!!!! It's Red Dawn. The name should speak for itself. Oh yeah...WOLVERIIINNNNEEESSSS!!!!
Please purchase this movie this awesome also. It's awful what happens in this . Got to get it to find out what happens.
Makes me want to kill a commie for mommy!  A very entertaining movie.  The remake is a stupid movie, but this one is very good.
Was excited when received in mail last week. New Red Dawn is a great movie, but can't beat this one and love Patrick S!
Special Edition DVD coming out on 7-17-07. Loved this movie when it came out in '84 when I was a kid, and still enjoy my yearly viewing of it.
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. It gave me something to think about. I recommend it.patrick swayze andcharlie sheen were really good.
I HAD SENT THIS MOVIE TO MY BROTHER IN LOS ANGELES COUNTY AND HE LIKED IT VERY MUCH. HE SAID HE WAS INTO ACTION MOVIES A LOT.
Politics aside I love this movie and the dvd is very well done. Picture is good, audio is good what else more do you need.
Loved this movie!This is a movie i can watch over and over again, I miss Patrick Swayzie, he was an amazing actor.
Excellent!!! Better than new one!! All American should really watch this movie it important. When things get this bad this movie give US hope!!!
I had seen this before and liked it.  Who would have thought that at this age some of parts are true?
I had been looking for a copy of this movie for a long time & I finally found it here on Amazon. I love this film.
This movie is worth watching multiple times.  Maybe it is just the era I grew up in but it resonates with me
Thank you my dad loved it he is so happy that he finally has his copy of the movie and he doesn't have to find it anymore
a well done, entertaining, and kinds scary from the plausible aspect.  really enjoyed this movie and would high recommend it. not so much for kids
One of my most favorite action and political movies. All the characters were well done. A must see movie, get is now in Blu-ray.
While this wasn't the greatest movie in the world I remember it from my teenage years and thoroughly enjoyed it.
One of the most entertaining and greatest movies made!! Patrick Swazes all time best, there wasn't a bad actor in this!!
this is a graet movie thanks but i do not like filing out revows it is a wast of my time
love it saw it a long time ago and love the action great movie can't wait for the new one
I still lov the origional, bu this remake was really done well and deserves to be up with the best of them.
Very good movie. I also like the remake but the original tops it. This is a definite must see. .
This is an example of what can happen...Preppers will find this interesting as prepping was key from the beginning of this movie.
ONE OF THE BEST MOVIES OF ALL TIME SURE WOULD OF BEEN NICE IF OLD CAST WAS IN NEW FILM TOO
Although somewhat dated for the tastes of today's students, the film and Gregory Peck are a believable backdrop for discussions about the war.
THIS IS A EXCELLENT DVD OF THEKOREAN CONFLICT  FIVE STARS PLUS ONE OF THE BEST FOR ME I WOULD SUGGEST OTHERS TO BUY THIS DVD.
This is a great movie true historical war drama . One of Peck's lesser known, but nevertheless high quality acting, both lead and supporting cast .
It did look like real Army guys in Korea and the Captain and his friend to get many guys to kill North Korea.
don't like Gregory  peck as an actor, but the movies is one of the better ones of the Korean conflict, and pretty much reflect what the war was about
Read the book when I was in the 7th Grade and have loved this movie for many years.  Having it on DVD is great!
this is one of robert mitchums best movie why wasnt it in widescreen may be it will be next but it is still a great movie.
This is the kind of movie for which 5 stars do not seem to be enough. Watch it and be prepared to fall in love with life all over again...
Jason Robards is great as the unsettled writer who isn't respected.  The boy getting to choose his own name is priceless.
I saw this in the summer of '66, and still think it is one of the best movies ever.  So there.
Not only funny - this movie can teach you the art of comedy!  Classic and indispensable to the theater artist and student of comedy.
Great story and many dramatic twists and turns.  Have watched the movie several times.  A space adventure as the climax. Recommend to others.
The space parts were corny, but take those out and you've got a great James Bond flick.
mailed in great time. and great packageing. got it to add to our 007 collection. played great. was in new packageing.
One of all time favorites and never get tired of the dialogue between the actors. Not sure if Ian Fleming expected this but it adds
The dvd came in the box brand new. It plays very well. James Bond movies are my favorite. This is a great movie.
Bond, James Bond, you never get tired of watching these films, I will get my money's worth out of this DVD.
Short and sweet,classic 007 on crystal clear Blu Ray! If you have a Blu Ray player and a Bond fan,this is well worth getting!
And this is the best Roger Moore bond movie ever. The Jaws character is my favorite villain of all bomd villians
This was a gift for a family member. They really enjoyed it very much. Thank you so much for this.
i enjoy collecting movies and watching them during my past time during the winter when im at home by myself
this is one of my favorite movies.  Nicolas plays an alcoholic well and elizabeth shue is very attractive.  great movie
Oscar winning performance by one of my favorite actors Mr. Nicolas Cage!  He turned drinking into an art form in this movie.
this has been around for a while and i enjoy seeing it again.  both stars do a heck of a job acting.
Good plot (which saves the movie), acting is good, and photography so, so, but is entertaining. Cage's work is really superior.
Watched this movie for the first time on TV with commercials.Bought it, watched it straight through and enjoyed it even more, and still do.
This is a classic movie &#34;your momma name you Bumpy&#34;. Wow if you never seen this and like gangster movies this is a great one.
I love this movie. And I love the fashions in this movie. The story line was excellent and you will not be bored during this movie at all.
this movie is excellent, bumpy is the man! one of the best movies of Lawrence Fishburnes career, highly recommend to everyone
There is only one way to truly appreciate this movie.  View it over and over again.  Excellent cast and story.
The kind of movie that you love or hate, but that's true of most of David Lynch's work. I always find it interesting, even if I don't always like it.
THIS A MOVE THAT JUST GETS BETTER  WITH AGE  RIGHT UP THERE WIT H LOST HIGHWAY AND  BOXING  HELENA TO NAME SOME GEAT MOVIES
This movie blows my mind everytime I see it.  This Blu-ray is an astonishing piece of work. Can't wait for more Lynch Blu-Rays!
This one is for those Tom Hanks/Meg Ryan fans. Comparable to 'Shakespeare in Love.'
this movie is a classic mind bender! if you like david lynch's other stuff, like lost highway or wild at heart, you will like this. oh, mommy! ;)
looked for an improvement in image quality got it.  Price was right and it came when promised I am doing this because i read other reviews
What's not to love!  It was funny and poignant and it was Peter O'Toole!  It's one of his classic movies!
Otoole at his best, others as well. a wonderful warm and funny performance by everyone. Glad he did this one.
A must for any collector. I own it in Beta and VHS. Had to get the DVD. Hysterically funny. Can't say enough about it.
This IS funny but the language early on would make the movie much better if it was bleeped out!!!  Well done other then that.
Bought this for DH. A interesting plot and story line. If you like movies like the fugitive  I think you would like this move.
If you like thrillers this movie is great.  It seems a little dated now but the acting and characters are rich and the plot is interesting.
Don't bother with the Denzel version - this is the one!  You will really enjoy this one, and bits of it still ring true today!
The remake has nothing on the original(this one),Really good movie, the only good sinatra flick I have seen. A real thriller.
The acting was good, the script was very close to the book and the story was excellent.  I feel it is a true classic.
taut as hell. suspense fans will love this
This is a classic movie, and an excellent DVD copy.I especially enjoyed the special features interviews.Thanks for a great product.
This was bought as a gift.  The person had a lot of fun with this item.  Good cheesy fun will be had by all.
Like all great SF films, it gives a powerful message, this one about the importance of the individual, all while entertaining the socks off of you.
It has great sound and visual quality. It came in a very timely fashion. I have been enjoying it ever since it came in the mail
I never saw this movie. Heard of it but never saw it. It was pretty good.I like all of the lead actors and that made it good for me.
It's good to finally good to own this movie on DVD , seeing Will Smith in his earlier acting days.
This movie is very well done.  Great acting.  Compelling and draws you into the story.
With Smith, Channing, and Sutherland how could it be bad?Great story line, if you have never seen it you are missing out on great entertainment!
Brando stand for best,and this one was not an exeption.
One of the first best films to help America crawl out of a semi-permissive society.
Steve McQueen one of his best
The Great Escape is one hell of a movie, and look at all the great actors that were in it. That says it all
Awesome movie, I liked the story since I was a kid when I saw it with my dad. Funny and interesting!
Quality and sound is good. Obviously this movie is a classic and can be watched over and over and you're still on the edge of your seat.
The story is great and so are the characters--the most amazing part is it is true!!!  You got to love America and the Allied forces after this movie.
Just an excellent capture of a historic moment in history. Maybe only a few made it but the brave effort will not be forgotten because of this film.
The characters, plot, cinematography, and acting are all top notch.  Everything comes together make the perfect film.  Highly recommend it.
The Great Escape is one of the best movies ever made.  With Steve McQueen, that makes it top rated.  I can watch this show ever month.  Saddle
Classic movie with incredible actors. Well edited, directed and just all around great. A must for a great family nite.
If your a fan of the late great Steve McQueen or just vintage war movies then you have got one of the best out there!
A FAVORITE MOVIE OF MINE FOR YEARS AND I GOT THIS DVD FOR MY HUSBAND FOR FATHER'S DAY. IT IS ONE OF HIS FAVORITES ALSO.
Oldie but a goodie.  Fine stars align to make this a great movie. Steve does some great stunts here and there.
Movies like this one never get old. This is one of Steve McQueens best. I love old movies and amazon has always had everything I have searched for.
another awesome McQueen  movie to bad he died young from cancer also check out Bullitt great movie too.great car chase
ITS THE ORIGINAL ESCAPE WITH SOME OF THE BEST CASTING AND PUT A HIGH POWER ACTORS TOGETHER PLUS McQUEEN YOU CANT GO WRONG
Steve McQueen has always been one of my favorite actors.  The cast is amazing, if you love American POW stories, this is one of the all time greats.
It was a great movie when I was a kid and I still think it is a great movie today.
Love Steve McQueen he is great and still wish the king of cool was still around.  Good entertaining movie.  James Garner is good as well!
Saw this with my parents at the drive in when I was a kid. Right up there with the best of the WWII movies, IMHO.
Another priceless WWII movie.  The story of the men trying to escape is exciting.  The motorcycle stunt by Steve McQueen is classic.
Great movie with a lot of stars and a lot of drama and action.  The cast is really superb and the story great.
This movie is great.  I had been looking for this in other places and couldn't find it.  Thank you. It's Steve McQueen
this was a gift for someone and the just raved about the acting, the location, a great movie about history
I have always loved this ww2 classic and its even better on Blu-ray, could not past it up Love it
What can I say Steev McQueen all the way, no question on of the all time great movies of all time, I recomend it .
What else can I say about a classic?  McQueen's motorcycle jump is the unforgettable part for me.
Easily one of the best movies of all time.Incredible true story of WW2 prisonersof war attempting to escape from aspecial German internment camp.
Received in Excellent order so thank you very much for a brilliant film.  The best film I have seen in years and made my day.
classic, busy, a must see for the Grand kids and the wife, this is a good film of bravery and the cutting of Red tapeLT
Steve McQueen...do i have to say anything more? It is a very fun movie. Will keep you entertained for sure
Fantastic movie. Wish theymade movies like this today.  High School student should watch this and realize what their ancesters went through.
this movie is a classic that pretty much covers it. Great as a gift for anyone whose a fan of escape movies.
a movie for WWII that has the prisioners point of view and well made too. The real cooler king said he did not ride the motorcycle as in this film
The transfer on this disc is excellent. It's a major improvement over the DVD. If you like or love this movie buy it.
Full of great actors.  Steve mcQueen the Cooler King - a true classic you'll want to watch over and over
The cast is awesome and the humor is crucial as well.  This is one of my favorite movies .thanks .
Awesome movie never gets tiring. Great for the family. It's a shame that towards the end of the movie Steve did not jump the fence w/ barbed wire.
A story based on the truth, a great Movie worth watching over and over. Many great stars did an excellent job, very entertaining.
Love this movie!  Purchased it for my dad who loves all Steve McQueen classic movies.  Good quality and great price.
very neat to see this classic again well done acting  and the dvd makes it very enjoyable steve mcqueen is at his finest here
Excellent restoration, fun plot, good balance of humor and drama with beautifully organized script and visuals.  Just a lot of fun and entertainment.
Great cast, great acting, and a fast moving adventurous World War two story. You can't go wrong with Steve McQueen movies.
I purchased The GREAT Escape because my Dad saw it years ago and wanted to see it again.  He really enjoyed it!
This is a great classic movie. A true story. It is their story. Sad but true. A must see classic movie.
I have always loved this movie and watch it at least once a year. I wanted a Blu-ray copy and boy does it deliver! Great service too!
This is a great blu ray and looks very nice. Arrived undamaged and excited to watch it. Fast shipping and is at a reasonable price.Classic!
Another classic!Wishing someone would snatch the irritating Sunday morning solicitors from our place...but what can ya do.
A wonderful classic science fiction film. My family enjoyed it very much. An old movie that's great to watch today.
This is a wonderful movie and have seen it since it came out and still love it till now. aww
This is a classic movie that still gives me a &#34;creepy&#34; feeling every time I see it. And the ending is great. A must see for Sci Fi buffs.
No movie collection should be without this. The Blu-Ray version looks better than it has before due to the remastering.
I will probably never watch this film - but I had to have it for my collection. My son LOVES Donald Sutherland !
As good as the original, but slightly different. We love Jeff Goldblum and Donald Sutherland.
Just plain a really terrific movie filled with tension and excitement! Should have gotten four or five Oscars! Watch it a second time within a week!
great action movie - traveling along the rail lines during a harsh wintery weather almost but not quite dodging another train.
This DVD is great ! I like it because it is made in bad weather . It shows what one man can do if he is motivated
been looking for movies my kids watched when they were young and found it. We all love this show, thanks
This new copy of this movie is wonderfull all the family enjoy this old movie like the first time thanks
Great line from a great movie.  This movie transcends generations and even today's kids appreciate the good quality of an all around good movie.
This was a favorite when our kids were small and now their kids are loving it. Matthews movies are smart and brilliant- thanks to John Hughes (RIP)
This is one of the great old hacker movies that convinced me to get interested in computers and spurred my interest in computer security.
very good  especial for it time when computers where very new
Good movie.My wife and I have enjoyed this movie very much.Jim
&#34;Would you like to play a game&#34; famouse quote from this movie and the picture and audio are better than the dvd.
If your a Matthew Broderick fan this is a must have. I loved this movie when it first came out and had it on VHS. I was so happy to find it on DVD.
I'll always need to watch this every so often. Great movie if you grew up in the 80's. The music used it the movie is textbook 80's.
I have this title on DVD and just wanted it on blu ray great movie love it. Watch it all the time
this is a good movie and have fun and enjoy your self and watch when ever you want to watch
Even though the home computers in this are older the story still holds up.  It is comic as well. If you haven't seen this you are in for a treat.
A great 80's movie.This movie is definitely a classic.A good movie for anyone who has not yet seen it.
I saw it when it was first released. I loved it then and still do. I just had to watch it one more time.
War Games is a great classic film that just pulls you in and makes you want to keep watching. Great picture quality and an amazing film.
Really great Cold war movie sometimes wonder if computers are becoming tio in human. We shouldn't take the human factor out of the equation.
BEING ONE OF THE ORIGINAL WIZ KIDS, FROM BACK IN 50'S I KNOW MORE ABOUT THIS FILM THE AVERGE PERSON AND IT IS MORE SCAREY THEN YOU THINK!!!!
This movie is a classic in its genre, and a classic in its historical time-frame. Pure fun, pure fantasy.
I have already given my review of this Blu-Ray movie, which i gave it five out of five and i am delighted with my purchase.
This movie has become a cult classic - great movie I give it *5* stars...A fun movie to watch over and over again.
CD arrived as promised.  This movie takes you back, with all the 'high tech' references, but it still holds together after 25 years.
This was an excellent flick for Mathew Brodewick's first action flick and it showed some great good action and adventure that is why i liked it
One of the best westerns ever albeit quite bloody and violent at the end. One of my all time favorites.
A classic Burt Western.  If you enjoy westerns this one that you don't want to miss.  A must see classic.
The performance and script is outstanding, all parts working together; makes for a movie you can watch over and over with equal enjoyment.
Burt Lancaster great actor and he has played so many roles over the years and Mama loves the movie great.
bought this for my husband and he really does enjoy looking at the show my husband loves cow boy shows
I always enjoy Chuck Norris movies
The only thing wrong with this DVD is that it is not in widescreen. Otherwise this is as close as you can get to a perfect action movie.
It's a feel good patriotic movie and that's enough for me to love it.
My all time favorite movie.  I watched it on the 4th of July holiday.  I think I have memorized it!
This DVD is available in widescreen format in Region 2 via Amazon.co.Uk. Quality is good.
I love this movie Eddie and the Cruisers is one of my favorite movies. The story is told so good and the music rocks.
Great price and prompt service, the music is wonderful, really glad to have this DVD in my collection, I have the CD but wanted the DVD
This is one of my all time favourite movies. Great music and Michael pare at his best.  Buy this movie you won't regret it.
It's a great movie and the music rocks.Eddie and the Cruisers is a cult classic.I would recommend this movie to anyone.
The love story in this one is so memorable that I bought it to update from VHS to DVD and enjoy it all over again.
Even though this only came out on video, it is a great movie, and worth putting in your collection. It is my mother's favorite.
i loved this movie. it's very true to life and it has an great story. always a plus.
This movie is one of the best movies I've ever seen. If you want to see an incredible true-to-life movie, see this one.
I always loved jody foster in just about every movie I have ever seen her in. This one I had never seen at the movies but was also very good.
ONE OF JODIE FOSTERS BEST MOVIES  AGREAT COMING OF AGE MOVIES EVER  JODIE IS GREAT IN THIS ONE  A MUST SEE
I really like this movie and it makes me relive my child hood , it couldn't get any better thanks
Interesting plot with a fine cast of actors. I love early California movies that try to show what a great place it used tpo be to live.
This is one of the best movies in his league.If u like LA Confidential (great movie&iexcl;) u'll love MFalls.
Best line in the movie-"The Bedbug took my thumb"Frank Sinatra singing "Summerwind" at the conclusion sums up how great this film is. Don't miss it!
Luved the movie from the moment I saw it. Mickey Rourke and Kim Bassinger are excellent together. This movie is a gem.
I first saw this movie in 1989 and liked it.  I could not believe how different it was from the novel.  Both versions of the story are good.
Sexy fun must see film it's amazing and great item to own great fast delivery highly recommend I'm happy to get it
Great! Just what I needed for a gift!  Yes it was....if you want intense...here it is!  Yes Intense!  Love it!
Very sensual and surprising. The chemistry between Kim Basinger and Mickey Rourke seems so real and outstanding.Don't pass this one up!
its an old movie but a goodie.  When the world oodled over kim basinger and micky rourke looked a little better.
I remember when I first saw this movie. WOW! The movie was on cable the other day and I knew I had to have a copy to watch when ever I wanted.
Another movie for any man's movie collection, right there with Godfather, Scareface and other good gangster movies.
What can I say?  This is a timeless classic!  The story, the songs, I could watch it again and again.
This is a classic movie and good cd the sound of the music is original and is ok for the price,
I give it a five and will all ways recommend  it to anyone. The oldies but goodies are all ways greate
There is no review that could put into words how Topal brings this slice of Jewish history to life.  Don't miss it.
I purchased Fidler on the Roof from Amazon.  If you enjoy good music with a great story, you will enjoy this DVD. I am glad that I purchased it.
Music is so good and I love the story about the daughters 8 more words required but I have nothing more to say
Unreal, beautiful, musical, great.  This is a choice movie about the choosen people.
Music, problems for a family and community, and changing times in the world make up the plot of this very enjoyable story.
WONDERUL MUSICAL. A CLASSIC BROADWAY SHOW.
Just as I remembered from the video version from when I was a kid.  No interruptions during the viewing so was very pleased.
I'm so glad this is on instant video!  My favorite musical of all time....and now I can watch it virtually anywhere!
Great classic musical of Jewish life back in the day and how the head of a particular family deals with trials, daughters and God.
This is my all time favorite musical. I love this movie version. I saw it on Broadway years ago. I even love ever song.
I came h ome from work put on my PJ and put in this DVD it is a great way to excape the pressures of life.
An absolutely wonderful movie. Great music and songs. A very sad yet happy story. Topol was brilliant as the patriarch of this lovely family
Ever since I had a part in "Fiddler on the Roof", while in college, it has been my favorite musical.  It is really a great production.
A great classic movie we love to watch. Seen it many times and will definitely watch again. One of my favorites.
Classic movie for fans of musicals.  One of my favorites.  Acting and singing  are top notch.
This version is very true to the Broadway production, which I saw, and even better for the scope of its scenery.
This DVD is replacing my old video tape version of this wonderful movie.  The DVD is much better picture quality and clearer sound.
This one movie has sooo much history, so much of so many stories rolled into one movie, and I love the music, too.
so glad to find this movie on dvd.  I loved watching it as a teenager and no can enjoy it again.
This was a gift for a friend who likes the film - the price makes it easy to give as a gift - and easy to get.
This movie is a classic.  The music is beautiful. The acting is excellent. The picture and sound were also great.
Excellent - I just watched this last week again.  And had the same pleasure and enjoyment.  Topol  is fantastic and a great singer.
Really a great version of the musical. Topol brings such life to the character. Enjoy it every time I watch it.
Well acted and sung. I saw it years ago in Los Angeles when it first came out and many in the audience were affected by it.
A wonderful movie for everyone. Great music, great story of the need to change with the times and let your children grow as they will.
This is such a good movie and the blu-ray is even better.  The quality is excellent and I was glad to replace my dvd copy.
My family enjoys watching this movie and singing along.  Cute movie.  It's a sad ending for those who are sensitive, but not bad.
A classic digitally restored. Who doesn't love Topol? Best of all...you don't have to be a "wealthy man" to enjoy it!
this movie is so nice i have seen it many many times and i still watch it when ever i get to it so i jyst lke it its good for me
Great musical.  Entertaining and a pleasure to watch.  It is  a classic.  You will be singing the songs long after you watch the movie.
This ia a Great Move and  My wife and I really enjoyed it. Would recommend to anyone who is interested in History.
bought this for my daughter.  a friend of hers did this as a play, so we wanted to watch the actual movie. SO wonderful!
Love the movie the first time I watch it I love it ever since . Some drama, funny and songs. Songs are good.
This is definitely a Family classic.  One of the Best films that you can share with the family and friends.
Again, like the music and the acting. Very good story. I do not have anything bad to say about this movie.
Awesome movie and excellent quality.  Great for children and the whole family.  This movie is a classic that the entire family can enjoy.
but you don't have to be rich to own this video.  very entertaining, have watched it many times.  the music is great.  i recommend it.
I could watch this movie over and over.  It is a classic!  Music is exceptional and so enjoyable.  Great for the whole family.
Simply one of the best film adaptations of a musical ever made.  It's a wonderful movie and the songs are so fun to sing along with.
Great old time movie for my mom with lots of great music that she recognizes.  This was an Excellent sound track - inspirational songs to anyone.
One of my all time favorite movies.  Saw it as a kid and fell in love with the music ,story and family. Definitely a must see.
This movie is such a classic.  Everyone should have a copy.  It was an excellent movie.  I saw it this Summer in an outdoor theatre and it was great!
This is one of the best musicals ever made. It has a great story line also. I can hear my dad whistling to the tunes!
this is a classic..i love the music and the movie.  topel is the best actor for the role. his voice is amazing.i've watched this many times
One of my top five favorite musicals, one I watch many times a year, that's why I purchased it since my VHS rendition bit the dust.
I enjoyed revisiting this Classic Movie of FIDDLER ON THE ROOF.  I wanted it for my collection.Smooth transaction with the Seller.  A+++
One of the greats.
I love this movie! This is my 3rd copy...just had to get the Blu-ray version! I love the historical background in this movie.
VERY FUNNY MOVIE. HIGHLY ENTERTAINING. AND GOOD DVD SETRECOMMENDEDOh and if anyone has any questions for me please feel free to ask
Wonderful/tough story with music that stands the test of time. Nice seeing in HD on a large screen TV with stereo.
Fiddler on the Roof ************** greatHell comes to frog town ************ greatJohn Wayne - Ultimate Collection 25 Movies ********** sucks
Perhaps my favorite musical.
I own it and my whole family loves it, so does my 10 y/o!  I love how they made Tevye loud and obnoxious, yet soft and lovable.  Great film!
Lots of great music. Good advise. Great family video. It's important to watch videos as a family once in a while.
This is one of the most outstanding musicals of all time.  This movie version is the best and Topol does it like no other
I've always loved this movie.  I love the music and the message the movie makes.  I'm glad they decided to put it into blu-ray.
This production is certainly a gem. Whether you just like musicals, or interested in history, or enjoy a fine acting work - all in one!
Watched this with my 8 year old granddaughter. A nice way to introduce her to some history. The nightmare scene needs to be watched with an adult.
I did not see Fiddler on a Roof until a few years ago.  It is a great movie and I am happy to own it.
A great movie to see again and again.  There is a moral to the story and story to follow and fall in love with the characters.
Loved all the songs. Acting was terrific! This is a classic must see musical for the entire family. Strongly recommend.
What can I say? It is a classic and I absolutely love every minute song actor all of it. A classic - One I could not do without and had to have!
This is the story of a people spanning a long period of time emotionally and brilliantly put on screen. Teaches a great lesson.
I haven't watched the movie yet, but it was a great price for a blu-ray copy of a classic movie.
Is still be the one of best music movie at all time for all generations.
i didnt even like musicals until i watched this movie. the songs will get stuck in your head. its a great story.
This musical is a classic. All the performers have beautiful voices and the acting skills to make the characters believable and fun to listen to.
This one of the best musicals I've ever seen, highly recommended .i had the chance to watch the play with Topol and it was fantastic as well .
It was educational for the kids and entertaining for the adults.  We thoroughly enjoyed it and would highly recommend it for families.
A must see for new generations so oblivious to classic movie screen art. Excellent acting and memorable songs. Highly recommended.
Like The sound of Music, this is a must have classic for anyone.  It will put a smile even on Uncle Schrooge's face.
A great classic, time proven over and over.
this movie is great. i grew up watching it and the acting, music and haha food is just GREAT. love it
This movie will inspire you to see La Boheme. It did me. And I loved it. Excellent film.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE....Cher is wonderful, a typical Italian family full of fun and laughter, you have to own this one
Moonstruck is one of my favorite moves.  Great story and a perfect cast.  It goes without saying, a great director.
I think this is one of the best movies and Cher and Nick were outstanding in it as were all the actors
GREAT  movie with great actors and actresses. Wonderful movie for the holiday season. One of my favorite go-to movies. Classic
This is a classic movie and great lines for quoting. There are a lot of laughs and a great message!
My husband is Italian and he loved this love story.. And he Don't watch them often. The whole Family Story is Funny & Romantic..
I am a Romantic at heart, love a good love story.  Been a Cher fan since day one and she was on TV.
Classic film!!!If you haven't seen it...its worth it.(filler words 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10)
I got the movie in great shape and in great time! I'd recommend it to anyone - it's funny, sweet and a great romance.
My old DVD somehow grew legs and couldn't find it, then saw it on Blu-Ray on Amazon and bought it right away.  I can't make my sawz with out it.
Its an old classic and a favourite too.  Great movie like many one I have ordered from Amazon, have not been disappointed.
Have loved this little movie since I first saw it -  Introduced me to Nicholas Cage who is, without a doubt, weird and you can see it in this movie.
The story was interesting and well developed. The dialogue and acting were great. All around awesome movie. I would recommend this to all my friends.
iClassic funny ! A  good movie  Cher is great of coarse , Nick Cage and alot of other great actors are in this must see
I'm italian...this is what I go through with my family and this is highly accurate. Watch it. It's Cher, pasta, and Nicholas Cage...you will love it.
I have really enjoyed watching this movie.  i have been a fan of cher's for along time.  i will watch it over and over again
This is a wonderful New York Italian ethnic love story.  I like it just as it is.
One of my personal favorites. A little quirky without being over the edge. Interesting characters. No car chases. Fun to watch.
THE MOVIE IS IN PEFECT CONDITION AND IS A GREAT STORY! ITS THE TYPE OF MOVIE THAT YOU JUST WANT TO WATCH ONCE & AWHILE!
The acting is great and this movie still holds up.  Prety schmaltzy but a goos love story. The Cage fake hand is a bit much!
A very good movie, a totally different but expect to see cher's personality come out in this!!!!!
One of the best romantic comedies ever made.  I don't buy DVDs unless it is a movie I will watchseveral times.
Very entertaining movie. My daughter recommended it, glad she did!! Funny, witty and a great love story too! Would watch it again!!
A very good yet different comedy romance. Cher and Nickolas Cage are a great team in this movie!
One of my all-time top 10 movies.  Whether you are Italian or not, you will love the story, by-lines, and the characters. Cher is fantastic.  So true
Just enjoyed seeing this again. An old classic. Fun, interesting, and entertaining. Cher looks great as always. Awesome cast.Good movie.
I bought this movie for my girlfirend and watched it with her years ago and still love it. This movie is worth the purchase.
Cher is awesome the story line is great..Omg I can watch this every Sunday afternoon while in the sewing room .....Nick Cage did a great job too.....
Cher what a great talent.  I love her in anything. The movie has a great cast you will enjoy watching.
A wonderful romance ! One of Cher's best ! I can see it over and over---- Nicholas Cage is great also.
One of my all time favorite movies.  I have watched it so many times because i just love it.  Wonderful
Every time I look at this movie I feel like drinking wine and going to the opera.  Viva la famiglia.
This Cher movie was even better our 2nd time around than it had been when we first watched it. It is a real joy.
this DVD is a good show.  it is good to see DVDs still widely availible.  DVD is able to have true stereo, and, or sourround sound.
I am a Clint Eastwood fan, and really love all his Westerns that he made. This movie is one of his greatest!
Another great Clint Easwood western. There's really not much I can say. It's just a great movie that all western movie fans need to have.
Another Eastwood classic.A great movie for adults not children.I like westerns and i like Eastwood and i like this movie.
Typical spaghetti movie, but I loved it. Clint was his typical gun slinger with his ability to outshoot everyone else. Entertaining movie.
Rxcellent purchase with ease and rapid shipping!  The dvd was in great shape and a real additionto my collection.  THANKS!
Clint Eastwood,This is another classic western that follows up the previous "A Fist Full Of Dollars"This is another great classic brought to blu ray.
Great classic western. Keeps you thinking. Clint eastwood is great. If you like westerns of old this is a must see.
More of that good knockdown shoot 'em up Italian drama with our man Clint. FOD and this one really show off Blu-ray.
Great movie at a great price. If you like classic westerns this movie is for you. Has some of the great western movie stars of all time
I bought it as a gift. They loved it. It is a must have for any movie collection. It is great.
Its a great film on history of the west.  Many top stars in it.  I recomemmend it highly a good classic film.
I saw this movie every day of the week for a couple weeks when it first came out.  What a masterpiece!  This Cinerama Blu ray DVD is essential.
this movie has a lot of actors in it and it will go good in my collection of excellent family movies to watch.
Debbie Reynolds is at her second best in this Epic. Only better as the Unsinkable Molly Brown! Always entertains me each time I watch this.
I bought this movie to add to our collection of what we consider classics.  This movie has enough adventure to make it seem plausible for reality.
great epic film with all star cast and great musical sound track for a memorable film in one of the first wide screen formats.
epic movie.major stars I grew up with.great entertainment.
I really enjoy my DVD of How the West Was Won. Have looked at it four times already. Super entertaining!!!
would recommend to others, especially if you are into these types of movies. we will watch this movie over and over again.
Arrived on time and in great condition.  I am very happy and satisfied with this purchase.  This is one of my favorite movies..
This movie was a great addition to our oldest son's collection of Jimmy Stewart westerns, and he has enjoyed watching it.
If you love the movie, you'll love the package! One small thing....the poster offer that was in the package is no longer available.
I love movies that combine history with a good story, and this is a great example. Plus the musical score is fantastic!
Great cast, great story!Every actor is a star and the performance shows it! Beautifully filmed right down to the locations chosen.
This is a great movie portraying the western expansion.  The all-star cast is just amazing.  I highly recommend this one.
What a stunning picture for a movie made so many years ago! They don't make them like this any more!  Where's Lawrence of Arabia?
This is a very good epic western. It's not the best filmin the western genre, but it is decent. Also try:The Alamo
This is a super-good movie in my opinion.  My husband also likes it really well.  Anyone who likes westerns will enjoy this movie.
I loved this movie as a kid and getting to add it to my Blu-ray collection as an adult makes me happy.
My family has always enjoyed this movie and it was great to get it to be able to share it with our grandkids!!!
I saw this as a teenager and love knowing that I'll have it in my home collection.  A classic movie.
My family had so much fun watching it again,I wonder why don't they make movies like Chitty Chitty Bang Bang anymore?
I bought this for my husband as a Christmas Gift. And he loved it so much, it brought back a lot of child hood memories for him!
Great performances by child actors, enhanced by the suspense of a budding romance. Some of the music is upbeat, some is hauntingly beautiful.
This movie is a family friendly classic !  I recommend it to all ages as a fun movie night choice.
This is a fun, family film with lots of fun singing and laughter. It's a must see and highly recommended.
I love Ian Fleming and I love Dick Van Dyke! And I add that I love Neuschwanhof and it's Mad King Ludwig owner. Funny, zany and off the wall!
Found out my daughter loves this movie so since we did not have it had to order from Amazon.  She loves watching it.
I've always loved this movie, so I had to get Chitty Chitty Bang Bang on Blu-Ray!!  This is a &#34;must have&#34; in any movie collection
The picture is improvfed over the DVD but I wish they would have cleaned up some of the low light scenes, they are still muddy.
Nothing much about this all time classic. Nicely remastered in Blu-Ray and worth the ten bucks price I paid on this site deal.
Loved the movie as a child, still a cherished favorite. Have introduced to my children and now my own granddaughter!!!
A great family movie, something you do not see much of anymore that has no violence not to mention starring the great Dick Van Dyke!
This is a classic movie that our whole family loves and enjoys!  I would recommend it to anyone!  Dick Van Dyke is a very talented man!
This movie is a good family movie.  It's fun and exciting to watch.  Great actors in it love the songs.Dorothy Anderson N. Dak.
Love this movie. Had never seen this as a child... Now love it as an adult. Movie is long but the story line keeps your attention
This is one of those musicals you either love or hate.  We happen to love it and it is so much better in blu ray.
This is a great family movie and my son loves it.  He watches it everyday and has learned all the songs. Great Family Movie
This was fun for everyone, ages 3-11 (and parents too!) Good memories, fun music that we kept singing for weeks afterwards.
This is a fun movie.  Disney doesn't let you down with the fun and songs and colors and great cast.  My granddaughter loves it.
This is a great family movie and one of the classics of our childhood.  I good film to share with the kids, and a fun time for all.
this is a great family movie just for every body to sit down & watch it's so funny, you'l love it.
This is a classic!  Great family fun!  Enjoyable for all ages from Grandma right down to the toddlers!  Lots of action and laughs!
all my kids have loved this one.  Truly a classic not to be missed for families with young children.  Glad to have it in our collection
Great movie for peeps of all ages! Funny but with a lesson for everyone to learn. Quick mailing! Love it!
I love this movie watched it when I was a kid and now my kids love it.  Got it really fast.
Funny classic movie from my childhood...my daughters enjoyed it too...much like bedknobs & broomstix! Buy & enjoy with your kids & popcorn!
Chitty Chitty Bang Bang is a classic and on this BD it looks better than ever. I really liked it.
Five stars for the dvd playing flawlessly and for the fun little story and musical. It was a pleasure to watch with the kids.
outstanding.  I bought it for my grandchildren and the enjoyed it enormasly.  The service and price were excellant
I love Dick Van Dyke.  He is my favorite Disney leading man! My daughter loves the songs.  So everybody is happy!
Great for kids and entertaining for adults.  I love the music, the dancing and the story.  I will watch this movie forever; a classic!
My children love to watch this movie. The songs are great. The story is sweet. My 4 and 7 year old love to watch it over and over again.
This is one of the classics. I drive my grown kids crazy with buying children's movies, but my son did admit this one was one of his favorites.
This is a really good movie, and it worth the money that you pay for it and it really is good.
It's been a long time since I saw this movie. There was part I didn't remember. A lot I remember. It's a good movie for children and adults
If you enjoy Dick Van Dyke movies you will like this one. It is still a great movie and one you can watch with your kids.
I love this movie! It is great!. the colors are very vivid and has great music! good sound!
Dick Van Dyke Julie Andrews how much more does a person have to say Superb wonderful...Seeing it again was a delight for me as well.
Who would not like to watch this? We enjoy the movie as a family and find it enchanting to watch.
Get this for your grand kids. You've forgotten it's charm, but is a very fun movie to share with kids.
Fantastic.Everyone should have this excellent movie in their 'all time classics' collection.If you don't have it, you must get it.
I have always enjoyed Dick Van Dyke and Chitty Chitty Bang Bang was one of the greatest movies that he made.
I really enjoy this classic movie. People of all ages can get together to watch it, and even sing along with it. Highly recommended!
Chitty Chitty Bang Bang is another classic movie. I like all the special effects. I think Dick Van Dyke is a good actor and plays the part well.
If I have to tell you about this movie, then you do need to buy it. It is a classic... AND it has Julie Andrews, oh yeah, and Dick Van Dyke
I got the DVD to replace my wore out VHS tape. I watched it as a kid. I watched it with my kids. Now, I'm ready to watch it with my grandkid. Fun!
Bought this for my 3 year old grandson. How can one go wrong getting this! He loves it, just like everyone does. Watches it over and over.
The quality of the streaming was nice and the sound was clear. I used to watch this as a kid and it was a joy to watch it again in such good quality.
Excellent movie. Great Blu Ray restoration. Fun for the whole family. Definitely worth watching and adding to your Blu Ray collection.
I got this DVD for a friends granddaughter and she loves it. It arrived ahead of schedule and I would buy another anytime.
The grandson just loves this movie! He will go around the house singing the song to me and it brings back fun times for me.
Another great movie. Laughed and laughed so hard. I really enjoyed it and will watch it many more times over and over.
I remember this movie from my childhood, and shared it on VHS with my children.  I now have it preserved on DVD for my grandchildren.
This is my favorite of all the movies previously made of this story.  Outstanding actors  make it wonderful.I have watched this movie many times.
love Jeremy Irons in this show so handsome I think, that is just my opinion  funny and serious and it could be true who knows
This movie is touching, funny, not dull at all, plenty of action and if you watch it carefully it is a lesson to be learned. I recommend it
This was full of intrigue and suspense. DiCarprio can fill so many different roles even if he looks like a young kid.
Leonardo DiCaprio did a great job in this one! I love how it ended...just the way I wanted it to end! Will watch it again.
I would say Man in the iron mask is the best version of the classic three musketeers. Jeremy Irons and John Malkovich are brilliant.
Forgot it was about the twin princes, and the 3 musketeers.  Enjoyed it as much as the first time we saw it.
Had seen this on TV with all the commericals and wanted one without all commericals.  It is truly a great video.
A classic! I loved it the first time I saw it and I loved it more the second! Great actors and great story!
Enjoyed the flick. If you like swashbuckler type flicks this will be right up your alley. Money well spent...oh wait it was free...still good!
LOVED THIS MOVIE BOUGHT IT AND WATCHES IT EVERY CHANCE I GET.  MUST OWN THIS MOVIE GREAT PERFORMANCE AND ACTORS
I like this movie because I like the people in it. They all did a great job and I watched it several times and had to buy it.
Bought for my brother, he loves it.  It is a good film and a handling of the three musketeers.  It's very good.
DVD was in excellent quality and condition upon arrival. DVD arrived in a timely fashion.
I had to get rid of my VHS player and wanted a copy on DVD. It is a very good movie.
One of leonardo best movies.Without a doubt. Got here onTime well packed. Well worth owning forA great price.
Great rendition of a wonderful story, our family enjoyed this very much. Compare it to other movie versions and this will be the one you buy!
Great movie I love it . Leonardo is one of my favor actor. You will not waste your money if you buy this.Pat Minton(Louisville Ky.)
I like anything Musketeer.  Great acting and a great story.  It is one of the classics when it comes to the the King Arthur Knights era.
I had it on VHS so I absolutely had to get it on DVD cause I love Leonardo Dicaprio and of course I always loved this move....
I think this is one of the very best movies Leonardo has been in.  The fact that he played dual roles was fantastic!
Excellent actors - excellent story. Beautifully done. We need more movies like this! Costumes, scenery, all top notch, carefully research & executed.
bought this for my aging father who just loves these movies - very interesting movie - we play it all the time.
who doesn't love the three musketeers!?a classic story with classic characters.one of the best musketeers movie I've seen!
I am not sure. Of historical facts but interesting movie. Some light moments of comedy and story of forbidden love.
This DVD arrived in good condition, and I have had no problems with it! It did not have a case but the movie itself plays just fine!.
This is another Robert Mitchum at his finest. One you should not miss if you are a fan of his.
Lots of action, real life brothers portraying Western Outlaws. They did a good job with this movie and location was realistic.
wow ,why but a dvd transferred to Blu-ray ??? not restored, not remastered, transfer looks soft , same as dvd quality, why??????
This might be the only film that all of the Carradine brothers were in.  Spectacular scenery, great graphics. Definitely a film to watch.
This was a very good western with great stars . I really enjoyed seeing this and would tell my friends.
Great movie, lots of action in the Old West steeing. Impressive cast and great action.
The brothers Carradine, Keach etc.  really made this a neat kind of family type western, and the acting was very good.
this is a good movie to get so you can have some fun and maybe learn some things of past
One of my favorite westerns. Seeing 4 families of great actors; Carradine, Keach, Quaid and Guest, made for a great plot and story.
I love the fact I can rewatch this movie anytime on amazon and that its more friendly ready than netflix
This is another, of many before story about Jesse and Frank James ...The movie is well put together and I believe you will enjoy as much as I did...
This is a solid action packed western. Also try: &quot;Lawman&quot;,&quot;The Wild Bunch&quot;, and &quot;Chato's Land&quot;.
One of the best new westerns ive seen come out in a long time.Ten times better than the remake of True Grit.
This movie shows just how little we know about human spirituality, the will to survive, and the capabilities of the human brain.
This CD brought back a classic movie toour movie viewing pleasure nights!The acting is superb, good work Anthony Hopkins!
Movie has a great cast and is excellent to watch...recommend this film for all movie buffs who like Anthony Hopkins
I really like this movie, I read the book a long time ago and was very happy to finally get to see the movie
Another lip smakin' good Leatherface movie that makes me hungry with each viewing! Leatherface does us Country folk proud. God Bless America!
They did a nice job re-mastering the picture and sound for this one 10 out of 10  I would buy it before you cant anymore
For once the sequel is just as good as the first movie. this is a very good film though not as scary as the first but still good
At first I hated this movie but it eventually grew on me. Gory, bloody, nasty, but dark humor. Chop-Top is a great character!
wow. i'm a horror fan. i loved this movie because of chop top. chop top rules.
SO  I HAD THE ANCIENT DVD  BUT  NOW  IT IS PERFECT  16/9  GOOD SOUND  GOOD PICTURE  I LOVE TO WATCH THIS MOVIE  AGAIN AND AGAIN
A great gore fest with lots of fun and action please do yourself a favor and grab this, DO NOT HESITATE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Theme song to 'Titanic' would've fit this movie better.
The black humor in this one is a scream! I know it's got a bad rep for not being "art" like the first but it is wickedly funny and fun.
Top notch movie, great story, very interesting plot and a lot of bad-assery.
Check this movie out, good story and good action...kept me on the edge of my seat for a while! hard to find
a truly weird and disturbing story from Clive Barker master of horrorthe imagery in this movie will haunt you
I'm a clive barker fan and I think this is one of if not the absolute best clive barker movie
I loved it - great dancing and singing - great story line - ....and 'Tits and Ass' has been playing over and over in my mind!
great movie is great and fun to watch and you learn some thing to etc
Can't wait to see this movie again!!  More musicals should be maded into movies!!  Great music!  Great dancing!  Loved it!
this movie makes me feel like I am actually sitting in the audience--the music, costumes and acting are perfect..Thank You
Good movie, lots of memories and was great to see again.  Would make a great gift for anyone out there who enjoys musicals.
Very good movie!! It's hard to find also. If you like movies based on true events, I believe this is one you would enjoy.
Seriously one of the best things I have ever seen. Not to mention it is one of the most important moments in US punk rock history.
&#34;Sid & Nancy &#34; was the first movie that I recall seeing the brilliant actor Gary Oldman.  He remains among my top three actors in history!
Its better than Goldeneye.  The action scenes are tighter, beautiful women are there.  I really enojoyed it.
my grandson loved this bond becasue of all the gadgets!!!  He is really into any movies that has lots of action and gadgets and this has both.
Same as a veiw to a kill , i had to buy this dvd to complete my collection, the action scenes were outstanding !!
This is the best James Bond movie out of all 20 "official" Bond movies.
I am however, a bond fan but the movie is great. Fast phased, action movie. I had watched it many time before  and still can watch it.
pierce brosnan  played a good part as 007. would like to see him played more than Daniel graig. but this is a good movie
Keep your wits about you. Surprises are around every turn. Keep your wetsuit handy, you will need it. Just sit back and enjoy!
I have waited forever to purchase this movie in BLU RAY.....what is the hang up?? Any and every BOND movie is available but this one????????
One of the best Bond's. Good timely service. Complete satisfaction. Will do more deals like this (hopefully). Yes, yes, yes.
this is yet another great bond movie, and its worth adding to your collection. a must have for pierce fans
I enjoy the pierce brosnan as bond. this one i grew up with and still love these movies and enjoy getting them.
One of Pierce Brosnan's best Bond movies.  The clarity of DVD (I am replacing VHS copies) and widescreen is great.
i love watching the james bond movies during the winter when i cant get outside and go anywheres and it passes the time.
I think Pierce Brosnan is a great Bond. Tomorrow Never Dies is a solid effort by the Bond film makers. Buy this DVD.
Love all Bond series.This one is awesome.Played perfectly.Brosman is superb and love the extras about him during the filming.
This one has it all, from the opening sequence to the cool car, this is Pierce at his best as bond.
Another great bond movie pierce Brosnon movie I like him as bond cool as ice and again the girls this is a good plot line too
I am so happy i found this when I did. I have it on dvd but since I found it on blu ray I will give the dvd to my mom.
The product was exactly what I was looking for and came just as described. It was a gift for a 007 fan. They loved it.
Action, adventures, Love scenes and more are all wrapped up in this james bond movie and more.  Great dvd for the price
Great movie. It is a mind-bender. I like the camera work. It should be the first movie you see in the James Bond collection.
Probably the best translation of a Steven King novel into a movie. You can't miss this one.
This film is one of the most freakiest Stephen King movies ever.Id also recomend &quot;It&quot; and &quot;The Shining.
Watched this for the seventh time, what a great movie.  Didn't know John Travolta was in it all this time.
Really good movie -- the opening scene, was a classic..... the new version of this movie will be just as awesome
Great movie! The mastery of digital processing has really enhanced this flick. I would highly recommend this movie to anyone for their collection!
this is the best stephen king movie ive ever seen.if you like his books and movies see this.it is a classic
Carrie is always an excellent choice - especially for Halloween! I love sissy spacek and her crazy mom. They play their roles perfectly. Excellent!
this film is really good!!!!!!!!!!!! even tho its old its such a good film!!!!!!!!! it is worth buying! &amp; dont worry it ent that scary LOL!
I don't care how many times they try to make this movie over it will always be Sissy Spacek's movie.  She was great in the film.
Just great! This film hits all the right horror notes without being sickening. Hitchcock would be proud of this one.
The best time of the year to watch this movie is the day before or on Halloween!! You could turn all of your lights off and get spooked!!!!
i love horror movies and this has to be one of my all time favorites. a great film by all standards.
great horror movie. loved sisssy spacek and piper laurie as mother and daughter. steven king has done it again. recommend for all horor movie fans.
Got this on Blu ray so of course i love it even more so now. Will always be a a classic movie in my eyes.
awesome king story not too much nudity nor violence. makes you really feel sorry for carrie. the books better but alas cant have everything.
Loved this movie, again the remake was pointless why make another when the first one was the best sissy did her job in this movie
Received in Excellent condition and on time, an Excellent film to watch (for some people) from start to finish a 5 out of 5 mega
You can never go wrong with a classic - love the film and just wanted to see it again before cathing the remake coming out this year. AWESOME movie!
What's not to love? If you don't know, then you gotta watch. A sweet girl, a crazy mother, and a gift. With a side of pig's blood
Carrie is a Great Classic movie. I re enjoyed it in blu ray. Its a must for any movie collector.
Remakes rarely as good as original.Especially true here.Hard to further develop the theme of this one.Forget the others.
Still one of my favorite movies.  The Blu-ray looks better than the old DVD.  In this time of CGI everything, the movie still holds up.
This movie still creeped me out after all of these years.  Nice to see it again; one of my favorites.
This is one of my favorite movies. and definatly one of my favorite horror movies. Add it to your collection
great movie great dvd great while ago i bought this still in good shape im just placing the comments now about it
I've had this movie, for years on VHS, but I needed it on dvd. So glad you had it. Fast delivery, too! Kudos!!!
This movie may be a lil weird to some but I love this movie and I think it was worth the money and would recommend it to everybody
Sissy Spacek is great in this movie. You can feel her pain. Her mother is a nut. And the kids hate her. Bad idea. She gets even. With all of them.
this movie carrie is an excellent movie this is a 5 star movie sissy spacek is excellent in it the bluray is awsome.
i love it its old but it is good a a a a a a a a a +++ =
great movie and I like these undersea movies. and plan to buy more just like it. hope you have them.
What a fantastic movie. It makes the Quake fan proud. The ship walls were really neat. Nice acting I think.
I really liked this when i was a kid and even today still think it is a good show. :}
And Jenny Agutter gets naked, she was so hot!
Logan is a civil servant and finds a beautiful girl to follow and help throughout the movie now if only he could get out of the baux
Just as I remember. I got Logan's Run today. I put it in my dvr right always enjoyed this movies. It's so entertaining to watch.
Even though it's not a big budget movie with expensive sets, the story is good, the actors are really good and it's very enjoyable to watch.
A good science fiction story.A look into what might be the real future. Space travel was just science fiction not to long ago, & what do we have now
I figure that's what they will be doing to people my age in the future, bumping us off. Great movie, hope it never comes to pass though.
One of the best Movies out there on a futuristic Utopian society.  Lots of twists and turns.  Who's side is Logan on?
Futuristic blast from the past.  Young Michael York, Jennie Agutter and Roscoe Lee Browne were great & just as I remember them.
Had this on video tape so decided to get this. great clarity and a sleeper of a movie for its day
Great Story and Great Ending... Before Star Wars but it is a fun adventure of a movie with some meaning to it
Great movie....kind of old which makes some parts kind of funny but, all in all, great !
Shades of prophecy yet to arrive. The eerie happenings displayed in this futuristic world could be just around the corner...
I have watched this movie many times and always love it.  I wish they would release the series on blu-ray
I bought this movie because I really enjoyed it years ago.  Still enjoyed the movie.
I came across it when I was perusing Prime movies and came across a oldie but gold-ie. Science Fiction rules.
One of the best scifi fliks, plenty of great actors....good searies followed up from this film
Love this movie :)  ...and the city of domes.  Adore Farrah Fawcett :) Enjoyed the commentary, as well.  Thank you! -Mark Gonzaga
GREAT MOVIE FOR ITS TIME. WOULD LIKE TO SEE A REMAKE!  I BOUGHT I SEVERAL YEARS AGO WHEN I FIRST WAS RELEASED
This is what Science Fiction is supposed to be, Thought Provoking.Excellent imagery. Superb plot. Well developed. Wonderful ending.
Better than I remembered. Great story and great effects are only enhanced by the HD. This will become one of my favorites.
It is great watching for the whole family. it really shows what and how a mindless community can be like though.
A little shmultzy but makes some very nice points about religion, government, etc. 7 more words required? OK. OK. I'll type more words.
I remember this movie as a kid, loved watching it on New Year's Eve at home on the ROKU 2 XS on the amazon prime channel
I like the room with all the females. The architecture reminds me of Ciurlonis. Fantasy to sleep to. It turns me on.
One of the beat Cult Classic movies ever made. Everyone needs this one in their collection. Receiving it through Amazon was a seamless operation.
Really enjoyed the movie,  It was a great price and you took no time at all in getting it to me.  Think you very much.
Natasha does it again only better and Michael brings his fine tough guy personae home well.  Fun and entertaining film!
If you like thrilling Sci Fi this film will surely please you.  Nastasha Henstridge is a knockout as well.  The whole series is good.
Great DVD. Fast shipping and good cost!
Anyone that likes war stories and history etc. will love this.  It is very good.  I have enjoyed more than once.
Very nicely transferred movie. Seems to me to have a few restored scenes as well, or at least scenes I do not remember ever seeing before.
It is a great movie...if you know the story or read the book.  I enjoyed it but it is easy to get confused.  Great cast, good job  RECOMMENDED
Received the shipment from the US in just over a week.  Very fast delivery service
Excellent movie just as described. I enjoyed every minute of the movie. . It was as experienced n the movie theater
I like war movies this i find interesting it really tells you the truth of what happened in the battle.
this is one of the best WWII movies ever made. and a true story too boot. every star in the world is in it.
EXCELLENT MOVIE.  GREAT CINEMATOGRAPHY.  GREAT STORYLINE.  TRUE STORY.  A MUST HAVE!  I ENJOYED IT VERY MUCH.  WORLD WAR 2 EPIC.
We enjoyed this movie.  It was a very entertaining.  The only problem was with the streaming video.  It failed several times during the movie.
Keep this one in my lineup of great classics - enjoy the action, the actors, the scenery, the director's vision of this war period.
One of the best War movies ever made. Lots of Stars that make the story believable. It has a bang for your buck.
One of my sons favorites. He has all the All Dogs Go DVDs and is in Heaven.  Your kids will probably love it too.
Since this movie is not available on VHS any more, it would be nice to see it comes out on DVD.
This is a great movie. I really hope that this is one that is released on DVD in the future.
Thank God this film has been saved as a historical reference for African-Americans in film.  It is a treasure, a gem and a legacy.
Cabin in the Sky is a movie after my heart. It's full of talent in acting, singing, dancing, and humor. Ethel Waters is fabulous.
Great story and wonderful songs, music and dancing. Quite funny, but also thought provoking. Duke Ellington and Louis Armstrong are smashing!
This is a classic. The music was great and the acting was corny enough to be funny. I loved it.
Errol Flynn is perfect as the romantic figure Don Juan.  This is a must see film with adventure and romance.  It's colorful and one of Flynn's best.
Errol Flynn is my favorite - he made great guy movies - even though he was older in Don Juan it works for me - love it
I am especially pleased that this edition has the bio of Lana Turner on it as a bonus. That is my bonus.
Poor quality with instant video download.Purchased the DVD. looks fabulous! A wonderful movie with terrific acting now in my collection.
what more can i say - Jezebel is one of my all time favorites and Bette Davis is just beautiful and magnificent
I am not a fan of Bette Davis or Henry Fonda but this movie is terrific. I decided to purchase it after I DVR'd it from TCM.
Good movie with good quality for the price.  Glad I held off for a good deal before investing more money.
The color is much better than I expected.  It is a keeper.
love jezebel. loved henry fonda and bette davis at the olympus ball.  thank you love stories of the old south.
i ordered this great movie and it came quickly.  it was just as described and i would recommend this seller to anyone.
This is another great movie with Joan Crawford.  Thought the entire cast did a fantastic job and a great story.  Arrived in great shape.
Joan Crawford at her best.  Great acting, very good story, well done production.  Great vintage movie which was filmed and directed very well.
She is downtrodden and hammy in this overly dramatic movie.  What can I say...I loved every minute of it.
It was a most interesting plot and well acted.  Quite a surprise ending.  Subtitles made it possible to follow the dialogue.
The Film Nor's of Film Noirs!  So many great one liners.  I've seen it 50 times!  Veda is so campy - she's the only one still alive - Anne Blythe!
NOW I JUST LOVE ALL OF JOAN CRAWFORD MOVIES. BUT SHE DOES A GREAT JOB IN THIS ONE.BUT ALL YOU NEED TO DO IS BUY IT AND SEE FOR YOURSELF
I loved it!  They don't make movies like they use too. My dream is to succeed too in my business I have online.
Joan Crawford, what more needs to be said? This is a classic movie for a reason. It stands the test of time.
This part is perfect for her, she is so convincing, it's a very good movie & I'm glad I purchased it.
This is Joan Crawford at her best in a thoroughly entertaining film. Also, the DVD comes with a great retrospective of her career.
One of Joan Crawford's best movies.  I was so glad that it finally came to DVD.
This is a great film, I love Joan Crawford in it. Classic. This movie is definitely worth the watch, so watch it!
This was a great film, fast delivery. This movie was sad at first then it showed a mothers love big time.  I love Joan Crawford !!!
This is a great old classic.  I've seen it many times and enjoy it every time I watch it.  I'm glad to have it in my film library.
Has been one of my favorites since I first saw it as a young girl Veda's age!  Always recommend it to friends!
Joan Crawford in her Oscar winning performance as a mother who is willing to do anything to please her spoiled brat of a daughter
This film stands the test of time.It is a masterpiece.Buy this film new.  It will forever be in your collection.
Being a lover of old films & stars I collect them on DVD when the price is right to add to my collection.
Masterpiece is the word for Ninotchka, genius the word for Ernst Lubitsch. Easily the best film Greta Garbo ever made.
Not too much to add about an incredible classic with a stellar cast. I don't tire from watching this and spreading the word.
It is so well acted and directed presenting a deadly serious heroine who is changed to laughter and love by love.
This is an awesome movie. Melvyn Douglas is heavenly to watch and &#34;Ninotchka&#34; is priceless. Greta Garbo is at her best.
I've performed some of this music in my lifetime (I'm a singer), and it never gets old.  This is a classic!
...and those that think they are. Fame is a collection of short stories centered around a real New York City school.
I just loved the original *Fame* and hated the remake of this movie...  Remakes  arenever any good.  This movie has become a cult classic!
Very good acting and writing. The music is OK kinda corny ,but overall Great Movie.
If you enjoy movies from another time and another place, you'll get lost in this one.  Well written and acted movie with a good ending.
I love it! Get it! It's sad, romantic and uplifting! Robin Wright is terrific! And morgan freeman is his usual wonderful.
Great movie - even my teenage daughter liked it once she sat down to watch it.  It pulls at your heartstrings .
Sequel to The Last Picture Show is tops in it's own worth with pretty much same cast as the Last Picture Show, every bit as good.
I have always loved this movie,  the follow up story of "The Last Picture Show"  I was happy to see I could purchase it on DVD.......  Gary
Great...!This film isn't just another robot/teen/slasher film.It's way more.Watch it and find out what i mean.Also, KI great work in this film.
This is a gift for my daughter.  We've had the movie for several years but in VHS and just updating our library.  She will love having it in dvd.
Big family with big issues both good and bad. Story of great interest and a long list of characters. Must be placed on must see movie list.
Clocking in around 5 hours, this 4 part swedish television release is one of the finest tv epics ever.  Must see.
An excellent story brought to vivid life on the screen.  I've watched it again and again.  So very good.
The man and consumate actor.  I loved the technicolor, the plot.  Just a wonderfully crafted movie.  Steve McQueen and Faye 'A' actors.
I wish I was Thomas Crown.  Rich bored and exciting.  As long as the world keeps turning he can keep ticking
You often see many remakes, but the fail to meet the standards of the Original.  This is the Original and is highly recommended.
ONE OF STEVES BEST MOVIES HE WAS MAGNIFICENT TOO BAD HE DIED SO ERLY HE WAS SOME POWERFULAND GOOD
An incredible movie from the 60's that still holds up today.  Makes me want to take up Chess again.
Can't do better than Steve McQueen!
It has been a long time good movie.  I have enjoyed this movie as a young women and now I still enjoy it once in a while...
Well packaged, great acting, DVD was perfect...several family members have already watched it. Count me in as a very satisfied customer. Kent Oram
This is my favorite version of the story and needed to replace my HS copy.  I love the story and the local Boston scenes. Quite a wild romance.
Such a beautifully restored classic. The story, the plot, the surprising ending (let us not forget the amor) is wonderful. I recommend it.
Love Steve McQueen anyway, but this movie was a departure from his previous screen image.  He totally pulled off the affluent, polished tycoon type.
Steve McQueen is so suave and smart, you can't help but fall in love with him.  But, Faye Dunaway is smarter, almost.
This is another great Steve McQueen movie that will have you sitting on the edge of your seat with great action.
I am very happy with my copy of The Thomas Crown Affair. Steve McQueen is one of my all time favorite actors and he doesn't disappoint in this one!
This is a great movie. It has suspense, drama, good storyline, good cast. This was the first Thomas Crown Affair. The remake was with Pierce Brosnin.
The box, tape, and service were excellent. The price was great, I just love these older movies. Steve is one of my favorites.
OLD MOVIE, BUT VERY INTERESTING.  THESE ARE MOVIES THAT CAN'T BE REPLACED WITH THE MOVIES OF TODAY.  VERY GOOD AND HE IS REALLY ENJOYING IT.
I'll make it short & sweet...This film is simply one of the best I've ever seen--and I've seen plenty. Don't hesitate for a minute.
This movie was made long before Hollywood turned into Hollywerid. Burt Lancaster and the supporting actors and actoresses at their finest.
I have watched this movie time and again, and it never fails to keep my attention. Just a Great War movie.
One of the best Burt Lancaster films with top european support cast and extreme historical use of French rail system.
Burt Lancaster was a excellent actor. This movie is one of the many that you can enjoy see it. Especially if you are a fun of Burt Lancaster.
This is movie is rated the best train movie by a book that rated the best 100 train movies.  This is why I ordered it.
Classic film, good action, great story. Even if you don't like war films try it.
For a black and white it was one of the best movies of WW II.
This is arguably Burt Lancaster's finest film. Gripping story of the French underground...great suspense and great filming.Don't miss this one.
That movie stuck in my mind for decades.It has a magic ingredient that nails you on your seat.I love it!
Than's for a Great cope of the Movie, I alway like to see It in full screen, not in LETTER BOX. Ho like to squint. THANK'S
Glen Ford and Ron Howard together as father and son. Great movie
I love this movie.  It's been years since I saw it.  Glad I ran across it for a reasonable price.  Will enjoy watching it.
In the typical barbarian blood & guts fashion "Red Sonja" is a movie well worth purchasing and adding to your collection.
Great movie, with great soundtrack, would of liked to of heard it remastered though.  Hot chick, Arnie, whats not to like?!
Loved this movie when i was growing up and i just had to own it and amazon had it for a great deal.
This movie was a Classic when first released! I like Arnold better in this than in Conan or Terminator. I am so glad it was available to buy!!!
This is a little old school, but love this movie even though it is old fashioned. ;)  Everyone should watch it.
I do Love this Movie , is great with Arnold , and everybody else.
I loved watching this movie I watched it with my daughter and grandson Arnold Schwarzenegger is my favorite actor I always enjoy his movies
The movie in general is super. Arnold at his best. The rest of the cast is a bit wooden but that is to be expected.
Bob and Doug in non stop action.If you love SCTV you will find this to be a must.Wish we could have more SCTV stuff.
very cheesy, low budget comedy!  i think it mat be best utilized with your own beer party, i thought it was funny
Enjoyed watching this one again - had not seen it since it came out way back when.  Would love to see these two reunite...
This movie is excellent.  I don't really need to say more than that.
I have been waiting to get this for awhile,some of the best from a SCTV bit. I love Max VonSydow as the bad guy.
Great movie, I've always thought this movie was funny it's one you can watch once a year and still get a kick out of it.
Haven't seen this in decades and it's still weird and hilarious.  Canadaphiles and fans of 80's movies should not miss it.
An all time low in hosery!  Unlike 4 month old milk, this movie gets better with age. And no puke breath!
I have yet to try to bring a beer bottle back to the manufacturer with a mouse in the bottle to get a refund. But I'm gonna try one day.
This was a great Sci-Fi for the time period and I just recently grabbed it in Blu-ray for my collection.
The world has a huge, untapped resource that could end world hunger forever....just don't worry about where it comes from.
This is a good movie, this and The Omega Man I think go hand n' hand.  Loved the story line in this one.
This movie holds up really well for as old as it is.  It is always it is fun to watch old SciFi movies set in the future.
I remember this movie from the old days.  Loved the ending but I won't spoil it for you.  Watch this movie!  Recommend for kids over 13.
good old movie. fast shipping
great all the way the actors give a astounding performance this movie is a classic for the 70's buy it
Great movie, but it doesn't work on my computer.  I guess you need some type of media player addapter to play Blu-ray.
It's people... Soylent Green is people!  One of the best movies ever.  I even have the T-Shirt.  It's people. Dammit.
A very old, well done movie.  Purchased as a gift for someone who, we are sure, loved it.  He will watch it over and over again.
One can only hope that the world with all of it's problems, that this won't happen to us as a nation.
WITH SUCH AN OUTSTANDING CAST, IT MUST BE SEEN. IS IT SCI-FI OR AN OMEN?
Charlton Heston is at his best in this all time classic. The file is full of suspense and the colors and setting are spectacular.
I remember this movie when it came out.  It's Edward G Robinson's last move before he died.  Great movie.
The movie was great! The picture and sound quality was exceptional. There was no damage to the disc. No scratches or marks to be found.
I really enjoyed re-watching this old movie.  I saw it many years ago but not on Blu-ray, so this time watching was even better!
Was surprised that it was available on DVD....My husband is an old movies buff and enjoys the yesteryear movie stars.
if you don't know about this movie don't waste your time. &lt;lol>Heston at his best!
This movie is a classic for sure!! The first time i saw it, kinda freaked me out! Now years later i can see its actually a reality!! Scarey!!
This was/is one of my all time favorites. It is so believable and done very well, even though it was from the 60's.
This is another Charlton Heston classic, I loved it. I watched it years ago and enjoyed watching it again. Great ending
Thought the movie and Charlton Heston were terrific. I always view this movie as things possible to come in the near future...
Great movie with the late great Charlton Heston. Blu ray did a good job remaking this old movie. It looks good.
Love me some scifi and Charleton Heston! Soylent Green is people!!! Scary how the future might end up like this.
I had seen it in the movie theater in the 70's, So good to see it again and Charlton Heston and Edgar G. Robertson.  Wonderful.  Truly enjoyed.
it was really neat to see it again Charleston always does a good job in all the movies he's been in
this is a classic movie I love, I am glad I bought it. I have added it to my collection and look forward to watching it again
This movie is about soy food. I watched ten minutes and then I tossed it out. Not the best movie ever. It is very boring as a matter of fact.
My high school students love this movie! They watched it after reading the book and all agreed that they rather watch the movie, then read the book!
This is a great movie! However, I can't show it to my students because of the rating. Wish I could.
This is my favorite comedy of all time.
Completely enjoyed the film. Great adaptation with great talent. Plenty of fantastic street scenes of NYC in the mid-70's as well.
I love this classic. No one is better than George Burns and Walter Matthau!
Wonderful, better than any western movie including Red River and all the rest.  Errol Flynn and cast so great.I have watched many times
High Quality DVD - With Flynn and D' Haviliand and a quality as good as in the theater - you will enjoy this one again and again.
I love Errol Flynn movies and this was just another wonderful addition to my collection. Working on creating a full catalog of his films.
one of the best westerns,you will see,the ending is cool.good story line and good action. i recommend owning this one.
[I always loved this movie which Glenn Ford acted in ]  The package arrive in time  and well protected I very happy with the dvd.  Thank you.
This was a good western with Glenn Ford as the fastest Gun Alive.  My wife and I enjoy Good Westerns of this type.
Love westerns love a good story love drama gun fights a ending that you would not predict it's all there classic !!!
b&w movie. good plot, good end. good characters. good script. if you are an avid western freak, get this. you won't be sorry.
VERY GOOD MOVIE AND ACTORS,THE IMAGE IS BETTER THAN I 1VE EXPECTED,DESPITE IT WAS CLASSIFIED AS SPAGHETI WESTERN;MORRICONE AS HIS BEST!
This is a great western movie. It's one of my favorites. A definite must-have for fans of western movies!
like the move even if it is an old one.  Eastwood  always stays cool in all of his movies this is a different kind of acting that we enjoy
Classic Western, first of the spaghetti Western trilogy followed by For a Few Dollars More and The Good, The Bad and The Ugly.
This is a great movie and I enjoyed it even mor now than I did the year it came out when I watched it the first time.
I enjoyed his western. I was glad to get this 2 disc set of that movie. It is a must have if you like Clint or westerns.
Spaghetti westerns... an acquired taste that always wets the palette for more. They just didn't make enough of 'em to suit me.
This was a gift to one of my relatives. The item arrived quickly & my relative really liked the movie
amazing movie. amazingly done for how low budget it is, i just wish i would have bought the blu ray trilogy pack instead of just the single
In my all-time top ten.  Put it up there with Wages of Fear, Treasure of the Sierra Madre, and They Drive by Night.  Just fantastic.  What an ending.
liked this movie can remember most of it good story line very good actors liked it a lot as my wife liked ok too
A must have for any gangster genre or James Cagney fan! DVD has great supplementary material and Looney Tunes cartoon.
This movie deserves 5 stars and so I had to vote.  Great adventure, message, and appropriate for children.  The action and story is awesome.
This was a gift for my son for ChristmasWow was this a great movie for myson who wanted it for his collectionThank you Amazon
This is a great movie!  I know it's been around a while, but when I couldn't find my copy I decided to buy another one.  Can't beat the price!
a great movie over all kinda drags though. but if they dont do a remake its cool. wish they would.
I haven't seen this movie for so long and when I saw the DVD I had to have it. Great actting. Great actors.
If you like scary movies you will love this one, you can't go wrong with Stephen king stories.I recommend you purchase this one.
Watchef this movie as a kid and it scared the hell out of me....this movie is awesome, i recommend this one, much.
One of George's best films to date. Much better than Bruiser.
Crazy movie!! Very smart little monkey, wouldn't recommend for children, very action packed.
These movies were ahead of their time i enjoyed them when i was young and have still enjoyed as got older.
Its another Movie from my childhood collection ist a good mystery/horro flick when i was young i did not want to be alone in a room with mirror
I got a hold of this movie and it had a ton of special features and the movie Phantasm itself is great to.Go out buy this and enjoy!!!!!
I like this movie. I just need to buy the rest of the collection. It will be awhile before I can though.
ESPECIALLY THOSE DWARFS AT THE CEMETERY ! LOVE THE TALL MAN !, GREAT FILM TO WATCH ON A SATURDAY NIGHT WITH SOME POPCORN ! GET IT I RECOMMEN IT !
THIS MOVIE IS THE BEST I WISH THEY WOULD MAKE MORE PHANTASM MOVIES CAUSE THEY ARE EXCELLENT.
great great movie.  The atmosphere... The enigma that is The tall man... The musical score.... It cant get any better.  Watch the movie
Anyone who gives this DVD lower than 5 star rating does NOT know good horror films. It is a classic
This edition of Phantasm is better than the more recent release in my opinion. Love the film, love the extra content
this is a classic from my child hood. was scary back in the day for most of us. perfect condition and shipping was fast.
An interesting movie about crime back in the sixties and the actors in the movie do very well with the script.
I enjoy old genre films and this was one of the best as was Sterling Hayden.  I recommend it to those who like this kind of film
What can I say? It's a Kubrick film, if you haven't seen it yet, go and buy the Blu-ray, you will love it.
Stanley Kubrick directs Kirk Douglas, Ralph Meeker and Adolph Menjou in perhaps the strongest anti-war film ever made.
You can't find a better anti-war film than this.  Excellent, and heart breaking.  If you haven't seen it, you must.
Concise, potent, visceral  - this is filmmaking at it's best.  The term is tossed around entirely too much, but this is truly a classic.
best black and white movie; best anti-war movie...ever!
Great classic
A great actor and a great director combine forces to create an amazing movie. Check it out if you're a Stanley fan or have an interest in WWI.
this is one of my favorites. gives a good adult view of ancient rome. similar to the shows rome , spartacus.
Another classic musical - I was a teenager in the 60's, so this is all about my generation, and really good.
This is how the musical should be.  It is well acted, very musical, well filmed, and full of good thoughts.  And the music is so memorable.
Great movie & it continues to play  here are more words to satisfy the stupid word count requirement word word word
this one only works on the computer due to its region 2 or other. Still a great movie.
This show is full of the best music from the free love days. Great songs and skits, filming is classic and It's hands down best muscial ever.
Love all the submarine movies - not a bad one in the group!  Now have the entire collection!  Great quality too!
It is the movie my husband was looking for and finally found.  Thanks for having these oldies!! He is very happy.
Awesome movie with Burt and Clark, an almost Mutiny on the Bounty atmosphere to it, but I didnt care, great supporting cast also
Very good movie. Tense suspense filled adventure with a very convincing performance by the cast. Technically very realistic too.
Very good classic WWII  movie.  Excellent!!!  Burt Lancaster and Clark Gable wonderful in their roles.  A must see.
This movie deserves five stars because, Burt Lancaster and Clark Gable are great actors.  The submarine pictures are breathtaking. Thank you.
One of my favorite war movies of all time.  It was sent to me promptly and in excellent condition.
I tryed to read the book! The DVD was a lot easier.Two old time actors in action.
Great movie I remember from being a little boy in the 60's.  DVD was well produced and I will enjoy it for years to come.
Great movie  This movie showed the ability of officers to lead and to be able to take orders when they did not always agree on the course of action.
A classic story aboard a submarine in the Pacific and the brave Captain and crew and their fight to outsmart the Japanese navy.  A must see
Good old time classic movie.  Love it and the prices on Amazon are even better.  Great watch.  I am pleased
This is an excellent account of the Black Sox Scandal and what happened on and off the field with the players.
A great movie for Baseball Fans of all ages! I watch it over and over
Classic movie. Great history. Used as examples of what not to do with my 12 year old. Loved John Cusack in this one.
This was an EXCELLENT movie!  My husband and I both enjoyed it very much.  It's definately a "keeper"!
Woody Harrelson movies are always well worth it, in my opinion. Can't go wrong. Highly recommended to anyone who likes movies...
This is a hilarious movie and one of the Farelley brother's funniest to date! Woody Harrelson and Bill Murray will have you laughing your a@# off!!!!
this movie is so funny i am happy it is still available it is a great comedy an older movie but still a very good movie
I've been searching for this DVD for years!  I am so happy I finally found it and it was a great price and delivered on time.  Thank you!
Who would have thought? Watch the movie and then see the potential skills in the early roles the lead actors have.
All the players are outstanding in this drama about what really matters in a family.  Masterfully directed and compelling.Highly recommended.
This is one of my favorite movies.  Action packed and full of surprises all the way through.  This movie is Fun, Fun, Fun!
I have always loved this movie!!! Great story and adventure. I wish that they would have made a Remo II.
One of my favorite movies from my youth!  Highly recommended! Loosely follows the Destroyer book series. Chiun and Remo are great together.
This was a great movie that should have had a follow-up or sequel. Ward was great in here...can we have this on dvd for purchase soon?
Joel Grey did a fantastic job in this films. It's one of my favorite moivies. would recommend it to anyone.'
got it quick and in perfect shape even the case was just like newno drop outs in the video even
This guy is one of the best heros. Trained in shinangue and I don't know how to spell it but anyway it is a must see.
This is the only movie from the destroyer book series. A gumg ho go america film thats fun for all
Great movie tone of action funny 5 stars
FRED WILLIAMSON AT HIS BEST, THIS IS A MUST HAVE TO ADD TO YOU COLLECTION. ONE OF MY ALL TIME FAVORTIES OF ALL THE FILMS HE DID.
as i mentioned before Fred Williamson is one of my favorite actors of all time. i just about own all of the movies he has ever been in
LOVE PAM GIER. SEXY A NO NONSENSE KICKASS CHICK AND SHE CAN SHOOT A MEAN GUN TOO. I dig these classics and plan start my collections of the 70's .
the iconic pam grier held a standard that all african american females could follow. She had class and charima with elegance.
HOT SIZZLING Not for the squeamish!!! This is WOMAN'S POWER. Coffy is also excellent. Boy! the 70's were a mixed up time.
foxy brown is awesome film and action packed not to mention pam grier whoops guess i did lol anyway please pic this up you will not be dissapointed
the sequel to black ceasar i watch this movie after i watch black ceasar fantastic acting by fred williamson
A great addition to the Blaxploition collection.  It is fun to watch them back to back in an all day marthon.
i enjoyed this movie; it should be viewed by seventeen year olds and older. it has funny moments and drama. be entertained.ese
This DVD arrived new and packaged, exactly what I hoped to get.  The movie itself is a best seller, a required viewing for serious movie buffs.
Acting is good. Lots of good actors in this. Can keep your attention no problem. Worth owning. Glad I bought it.
The movie has power and grace. It also makes a statement about the death penalty.Sean Penn and Susan Sarandon are excellent in this film.
Very good movie.  Great acting & plot.  Very touching.  I am very glad I own this movie.  I will watch it very often.
Great moving.  Though provoking and memorable.  made me think of the death penalty in a way I never had before.
A &#34;one of a kind&#34; movie that's hard to describe.  Is it a drama or a dark comedy?  Anyway, it's really good.
Great film! I love the plot and it was sad it was about real events but the acting was great!
The Coen Brothers are great story tellers. And they've brought that same genius to the tv show.
This movie is just as good now as when it was released.  Worth a second look, and I don't say that often.
I don't know why I love this strange movie, but I can watch it many times and not be bored; great acting.
This quirky dark comedy had us interested the whole time. It was a strange story, but truth is stranger than fiction, right?
Great movie that inspired a great TV show of the same name.
Coen Bros. FARGO is simply perfect! Funny, horrific, dramatic and very entertaining! Frances McDormand is PERFECT in her role! Bravo!
As the subject says, this was a great film and while I am sad to see nothing new was done to it, am glad we got something
I loved this movie and would recommend it to everyone.  The story (true), photography, and acting are superb.  Great film!
This story never fails to get everyone talkin' like dis here, 'ay? Good plot, well chosen cast and funny, funny, funny!
It is full of fowl language, but dialogue, story, and depth of characters are flawless. I love this movie, and watch on a somewhat regular basis.
The Coen brothers do it again. They have a way of showing the worst of humanity in such a matter-of-fact and funny way, Love the accents.
I remember watching Fargo some years back, and then I saw it on kindle videos and just had to rent it. Just as good as I remember. Oh yea!
A master piece.It's witty plot ,it's fantastic script and wierd characters make of this a sensational movie.A very interesting black humor film.
Macy feels happyBuscemi feels (wood) chipperMcDormand feels sick
I love this movie and really glad to get it on Blu-Ray. The transfer is great and it sounds wonderful.
Great movie, great acting, mysterious at times and yet very funny. Cohen Bros. got MN down. Cast is fantastic. Highly recommend.
I always liked the film Fargo.And this Blu-Ray is the definitive version to own.Great special features.Great A/V quality.The best period
A great picture.  Depicts people as characters, not as beauty queens or super stars.  No dead scenes with a lot of action.
Just another fun, classic movie not available on Netflix!! The video and audio quality were great, and the movie was easy to access.
I'm from MN so the accents are great!  The acting is superb and the dialog couldn't be better.&#34;Go Bears!&#34;
It arrived as expected and the price was good and the DVD was as expected.  Good Movie and recommend it.
i think this is a great movie!it may not be for everyone, but everyone should see it at least once just to find out, it may surprise you!
Fargo is a classic as far as I am concerned. The actors are superb and have studied characters from the area. This movie was very well done!
Great movie!  Superb acting!  Some comic relief in spite of the films nature.  Francis McDorman's role is over the top!
caustic humor well liked here  isn't requiring twenty more words is foolish it's a quick review not a critique, really?
ONE OF THE CLASSICS!!! SEEN IT MORE THAN ONCE...LOVE TO WATCH IT WHEN ITS COLD OUT....GREAT  ACTORS...GREAT STORY LINE....
A remarkable story, yet disturbing and sad.  Frances McDormand shines as usual, but the supporting cast is just as noteworthy.  A definite must-see!
This is my fav Coen Bros. movie!!!
A funny thriller,incredible charactersand unique setting.
I had watched this movie on HBO and liked it good story plot and good actors. Starts out slow but quickly turns into good drama
Just never saw it when it was timely. Decided to watch it since they have a tv series now.. Good movie, oh yah, lovin' Marge Gunderson, you betcha.
I have seen this movie a few times. Car chase scenes are some of the best. Just all around good movie to sit back and watch.
This is an excellent action film there is action from beginning to end. This is just a very well done movie in all aspects.
Can't go wrong for blu-ray under $8. Picture is clean and sharp. Storyline and acting are worth it. Have dvd version so didn't care about any extras.
My husband loves this movie. He kept renting it and I desided to buy this copy for him. Great movie!Classic movie. Great condition!
Not a chance you'll fall asleep watching this one. I loved everything about the action and the story. Five stars.
Great movie. De Niro is incredible in this movie. One of the best car chases ever in this movie. Loaded with action and a great plot
Surprise ending---------- sort of historically accurate about double agents and the life of intrigue they give their lives to ......nuff said!
I've always like this movie and on blu-ray it just gets better.  Clear sound, great picture and great for surround sound.
You'll love it. You must get it and watch it. You will not regret it I promise you. Just do it.
Gritty, tough, and real.  Actors were superb.  Action was intense.  All in all a great ride.Very highly recommended. See this one!
Hollywood needs to make more of these types of movies  Quality acting excellent story line fast paced ans real dialog ...
And that statement is a stretch. Here is another movie that I had on VHS that just needed Dolby Digital and cleanDVD reproduction.
A roller coaster ride. Simply exhilarating. This has everything one would expect from a European suspense movie, but it's American.
A good watch, believable with enough twists and turns to keep it interesting.  Well acted and is one I watch every couple years.
Robert DeNiro is known for playing bad guys and this movie is no exception.  It is a excellent action/adventure movie well worth watching.
Nice action, some intelect. Great sound (try a rocket launcher at convoy attacking scene :). Perfect driving scenes.
This was a terrific movie. The last 30 minutes of the movie was about the most suspenseful of any movie I have ever seen and still remains that way.
The first one of the trilogy of Hannibal Lecter. Anthony Hopkins at his very best. A fantastic movie, don't miss any of the three.
I couldn't find this movie to rent anywhere so I decided to buy it.  So glad to have it in my collection.  Great price for a great movie.
Great classic film; this one's going to be a Christmas gift for my daughter-in-law (I already have this Blu Ray).
This is certainly one of my favorite scary movies. It has great acting and a great story. Highly recommended for any horror movie fan.
This is a classic film. I'm glad that I was able to find it for Blu Ray. Must have film.
Nothing compares to the Hannibal series. My wife had never seen this movie so we watched it and she loved it even though its like 20 years old.
I like Anthony Hopkins and this part was made for him,I have the whole collection.Hannibal Rising (Full Screen Edition)
This is Anthony Hopkins as his scary best.  I would not recommend viewing this alone or in a darkened room.
Excellent acting, plot, sequence and ending. A must see. This is one of those rare movies which keeps a logical sequence of events until the end.
No movie collection can be without the Silence of the Lambs. Anthony Hopkins and Jodie Foster at their best! &#34;Hello Clarice!&#34;
I am not a big &#34;horror&#34; fan but this is one worth having and watching.  It makes you think while watching it without being graphically gorey!
Good movie, a lot of suspense and a good cast of characters that execute their roles well.  Too bad Harris turned into a sell-out with Hannibal.
Drop everything and rent or buy this. It's simply one of the absolute best movies you can watch. Absolutely brilliant!
this is still the best of the Hannibal movies.  Jodi Foster is the only really good Clarisse.  Always a good scare.
This psychological thriller will blow your mind the first time you see it. Why aren't you watching this movie WHEN YOU COULD BE WATCHING THIS MOVIE?
had this in vcr and wanted it in dvd and it is much clearer and I am enjoying it alot
My son and I saw this movie for the first time and it is amazing even more than 20 years later.
This set included a full disc of the background of the filming. Two great Actors bring the whole story to a bold fear factor...I am very greatful.
i 100$ loved this movie i could watch it over and over again and never get tired of it!!!
Love Jodie Foster, great actress. Just wanted to update from VHS to DVD for my movie library. Good prices on Amazon.Com
This is a great movie!  Jodie Foster shows great acting skills.
Excellent edition of DVD.I've never seen this filmso clearly until now.Excelent quality. Besides it hasan extra dvd full of features.
ILL JUST SAY THIS THE MOVIE IS JUST AS GOOD AS HANNIBAL IS I LOVE BOTH MOVIES
Quite simply, this is one of the elite suspense films ever made - right up there with Hitchcock's best.
One of those pictures that proves it's worth by remaining an engaging production even under scrutiny of repeated viewings. A fine wine of a film.
The Silence of the Lambs is one of the best scary movies ever made.
With excellent directing, writing, and acting...Jodie Foster plays a great role and should have won the academy award.
Both the fava beans and the chianti shipped fast, and I will definitely order again.
Really difficult -- not for the faint at heart, but a classic for those that can watch it.  It's creepy
Absolutely Stunning. Love it!
I enjoy this movie every time I watch it.  Very interesting characters and it is very well acted.  Keeps you on the edge of your seat.
Cult classic.
Jodi Foster plays a very convincing role as an FBI student/agent. Spookie and scary with some gore but well worth a watch!
I am a fan of all the Hannibal movies.  Love them all.  I would recommend it to anyone who like thrillers.
That movie of course will be good, funny if not taken seriously.The effect are funny but well done for that year, 1975.
I love Roberto Benigni. He is one of the funniest man alive. As a Pink Panther he carries the Peter Seller torch very well.
I loved it. However, I wish it would have been available in a Blu-ray version so the color and clarity would have been better.
Norm MacDonald was funny and great in this movie.
Norm MacDonald  really shines in this one. Movie is a different plot and fun to watch, thank you and enjoy
Very funny , something the hold family can watch , I have watch it a bunch of times  thank you
this has always been one of my favorite movies. i love it always have. i would recommrned it to any one who likes good clean comedies
I thought the  three actors did a ex lent job of catching the bad guys.The story was very entertaining.
One of favorites, side splitting for me
This movie totally cracks me up. Steve Martin is super funny, and Michael Cane is as well. I could watch it everyday.
Both Steve Martin and Michael Cain are great actors. But Glenne Headly as Janet Colgate is better.
Very enjoyable right to the very end.  Funny, clever, and they don't make them like this any more!  Well worth watching.
So funny, so good.  You can't go wrong with Steve Martin & Michael Caine.  My favorite character is Ruprect.
I've always been a fan of both actors but this movie is a great showcase of their comedic abilities as con men trying to outwit each other.
Entertaining and well worth the price. Who knew the Oscar of the muppets could direct such a funny movie. You will laugh at this one
This is definitely one of Steve Martin's best movies, and come to think of it one of Michael Caine's too, they're both hilarious in here.
this is one of our family's favorite movies .  We feel that it is a movie classic.  It has twist and turns and a surprise ending
Back when movies could be funny without being &#34;obviously vulgar&#34;.  This one is wort it just for the retard scene
A aged but always wonderful experience, Steve Martin at his best, Michael Cane at his best. I'm still laughing thinking about it.
This is such a great film and I must admit the whole cast was great, Yup even Cher!
A great coming of age movie. A little quirky. Great acting. Loved seeing this again. It's one of my favorites. Recommend.
Great movie.  I'm glad I own it so I can watch it over and over.
i really like this movie because i can see where the mom and the teenager is coming from in this movie. it's cute, sweet, and you should see it :0]
I am more of a Cher music fan that the actress fan. I love this movie though. I bought it used, but arrived in working condition and on time.
What can I say that could describe one of the coolest comedies of all time!!! Love this movie!
Lots of action thats has on this movie Navy Seals (Two-Disc Blu-ray/DVD Combo in Blu-rayVery good! Good movie of charlee sheen!
Navy Seals, not Oscar worthy but a good flick.Lot's O action and Michael Biehn rocks.
One my old time favorite. Full of action and drama. A must see for those who love military based movies.
Don't know how classics are certified classics, but this is one film that will be enjoyed by all future generations.
The Best Spaggetty Westrn, outthere. Great work of the Italian producer, and famous music by Italian composer. Great service to deliver it.
I love This Extended Version Collector's Set Thats why I bought 2 Copies heh,yeah You Should get it too,'tis a MASTERPIECE :)
WOW. I have watched it so many times its embarassing. Its good and ugly and bad. The atmospher is good and the music is haunting.
The best music in a movie besides Jaws.  Halfway through and you check the clock, but you cannot get yourself to turn it off.
THIS IS ONE OF CLINT EASTWOODS BEST. IM VERY GLAD THAT I ORDERED IT. LOVE CLINT EASTWOOD
came well before the delivery date. haven't watched it yet, so i can't comment on quality of product. the dvd was plain silver.
Another Clint Eastwood movie from days gone by.This is a great spaghetti movie and with great actors.Good stay at home movie to watch.
My husband has loved this movie for years. He will watch it over and over, learning new things and remembering those facts already learned.
Got the blu-ray in just over a week.  Thanks to Amazon, again for a job well done.  One of my favourite Clint East movies of all-time
Clint Eastwood is a classic cowboy strong silent and deadly with a weapon. If you've never seen this you are definitely  missing out on a classic.
Blondie and TucoLook for the gold, learn to trust,Run from Angel Eyes
Good movie enjoyed it lots of action, Clint Eastwood played his part very well. Interesting movie.. It has a good story line.
I absolutely love this movie. It shows in full HD 1080P and the movie is stunning.
Audio  and  video  of  top  quality.  Not  as  good  as  the  Blu-ray  but  wouldn't  expect it  to  be.  Very  good  second.
I would highly recommend this edition to any Eastwood fan!  One of the centerpieces to my collection!  Very reasonably priced.
Completely satisified with the product. Has extra scenes not in the version from years ago. Enjoyed the movie very much!!!
Do you like westerns, Clint Eastwood, and violence?  No...then don't buy this movie.  This movie is for real men! Yah!
A classic! Buy it!
Truly a classic movie. All the better in Blu-ray and the director's comments and extra minutes make it all the more enjoyable.
Come on this movie is a classic great movie clint Eastwood Tuco Blondi it's awesome I loved it in 67 it's better in blu ray
A Must See Classic
I love this movie and have probably wore out the DVD.  All the characters are great in it and it is a very good action movie.
It's a classic movie with an iconic figure and always worth watching every so often. That said his other two before this one, I love more.
I bought this as a Christmas gift for my husband and he has loved every minute of it! They did a great job remastering the video for blu ray!
Spagetti Westerns - my husband was so excited to receive this gift for Christmas.  This is one of his favorites.  We have no complaints!!
Some of Clint's early westerns. I would have liked them more if they hadbeen available in Blu Ray but for that you have to buy them separately.
These are the 3 best westerns still to this day. The cuts to HD make this old movie look great of its age. Everyone should see these all once.
I like old westerns and I got these in just a few days time, Very well worth what i paid. :o)
It's a great trilogy to have in one small case and the picture and audio quality is wow looked like it was filmed last year based on quality.
My favorite line in all the movies. When its time to shoot, shoot, Don't talk! I watched it last night, boy the pizza was delicious.
this is clint eastwood at his best the man with no name trilogy the bluray is excellent and all 3 movies are restored this is a great dvd set.
Very strong and very positive.  Good, powerful impression.
I love this movie. I first saw it several years ago so when I saw it here I bought it.
Great film!  The best I have ever seen!
This is another of those marvelous French movies with a great cast and a quirky plot that convince me they make the best movies around.
yea i thaught this film woz much betta than the first 1! if u liked carrie u will like this betta! this one has more of a story 2 it than carrie.
Carrie 2:The Rage is awesome.Good special efects and great stars.
This was, a sequel to the 1976 movie, Carrie I liked it but different well  it's good, enjoy this, movie!
i like this movie very much like the first carrie but had its own take on it it definitely was a thrilling movie i enjoyed it very much :)
love the movie is a good thriller movie and part love story I love it and how she got even
i liked this dvd very much; touching and honest. that never gets old. great for the young and old. thank you
Great story line, wished it was on DVD (not your fault), just a very old story. Great to have. Thanks for the sales. A++++++++++++ seller
She will love it.  This was purchased as a gift for my daughter and since she picked it out I'm sure she'll love it.
I love this movie because it reveals how the fierceness of fighting in war increases as the win-lose decision for an entire war approaches.
The 1960's was a very good decade for world war 2 movies, and this is no exception. I highly ecommend it.
This is without doubt the best movie I have ever seen, and I have seen them all. I would rate this as better than Gone With The Wind. JT
I've probably seen this movie at least 20 times. It's my husbands favorite. You just automatically want to cheer them on.
This is the best all time sports movie ever!! It teaches kids that even though you might be the underdog that you should never give up!!!
I have seen this movie multiple times.  It is one of those stories true success!You don't have to be a sports enthusiasts to enjoy it.
I love this movie and recommend everyone watch it at least once! Blu Ray version is even better, with HD colors and sound!
Great movie to show youth, showing how community is important in success.  Need more of these role models in our lives
bought this as a gift for my son to add to his dvd collection.  he loves the movie and yes he was a football player and now is a football coach.
Needed the collector's edition of the greatest basketball film all time and one of the greatest movies ever made that everyone needs to see.
I think this is one of the best movies of all time.I was extremely happy when it was released for Blu-ray.
One of Hackman's and Hooper's very best films and an underdog story at its finest. Takes me away every time I watch it.
I have seen this movie many, many times and I still cheer when Jimmy hits that last shot and the little school of Hickory wins the state title.
I have seen this movie several times and enjoy it more each time. Indiana basketball is the greatest, and all stories about it are always exciting.
Gene Hackman&amp;crew give a great performance through out this film.it is more than a Basketball film it is about Triumph on the court&amp;in Life.
if you like small towns, if you like heros and especially, who doesn't like Gene Hackman.  A classic, me thinks.
Look it was awesome that's all you need to know xxxx xxxx xxx xxx xxx xxx xxx xxx x x
This was a great movie and one that we can all learn from.  Like the good old days as portrayed in this story.
A seldom seen gem.  This is exactly what I was looking for and this item is something that fulfills my needs for what I want.
This movie is the greatest heart warming piece of Americana I have ever seen!I highly recommend this movie for the family!
I loved the movie and in Blu-Ray is even more intense.  Great extras mirrored with an awesome picture!Very nice!
Best sports movie ever. Themes are classic and remain timely. Excellent acting, well scripted, endures for all generations. Must have.
Fine acting and fine script. Showed it to my 6th grade son, who was about to play in a basketball tournament, and he was totally inspired by it.
great classic movie
i enjoy meteor it was very good quality movie & will mostly liked purchased more of this kind of movie in the further. thank you celia
...was METEOR, if you like this kind of movies, don`t think about it, just purchase it.
I love this movie,all the stars in it and it kept you on your seat waiting to see what was going to happen next.
i like to wach the show on the weekendsi think the dvd is fun filed action
we have the new version of this movie, we decided to get the first one, very interesting, and different from the new one
I was absolutely thrilled to receive this movie.  This version of the Taking of Pelham is so much better than the remake.
MATTHAU IS FABULOUS BOTH FUNNY AND SERIOUS SHAW(GONE TOO SOON) IS A GREAT VILLAIN GREAT SPECIAL EFFECTS MUCH BETTER THAN TRAVOLTA/WASHINGTON SEQUEL
One of the great thrillers.  And what a CAST!  The MTA, to this day, will not send a train out at 1:23.
We wanted the first one because we have the second one recently.  We like have two movies with old actors and today's actors to see the different.
What can I say?  I love this original better than the Denzel Washington one.
A good in keep this tape in a great shape, I will injoy it for year to come, AGAIN  THANK'S
Saw this movie when I was a small child.  It is still good after all these years.
It was wonderful. I loved the movie as a teenager and still love the Music and the story.Thank You
this is my favorite danny kaye movie a treat for all, cmae fast and in good condition
This is one of the oldies but goodies. I enjoyed this movie as a child and I still enjoy it today with my kids.
One of Danny Kaye's best musical for children!  Wonderful songs that I 've introduced to my granddaughter, especially Thumbelina as a lullaby.
this just warms my heart and makes me want to be there to lisson to his stories
Great work from Danny Kaye as usual.  Calms the nerves and very relaxing movie to see!  A favorite musical in my collection!
I loved this film when I was a kid and it still pleased me after all these years. Thank you for making it available for purchase. Great price too!
This timeless classic is one of our family favorites!!!!  I'm SO glad to have it in a DVD and I can't wait to share it with our grandchildren!!!
I never got the movie though, but I do love this movie and have seen it before on movies on line.
it was a amazing movie that i remember as a child.. Many fond memories laughing and enjoy the songs.. I recommend it to everyone.
One of Danny's best roles, he fits in so smoothly! You can almost see him as the person, he's just magical!
This movie is a great example of real life lessons and how to cope with the good and bad. If you enjoy Danny Kaye, you will enjoy this.
this is a great classic movie for the whole family.danny kaye is a greatactor and singer. i enjoy his movies
This movie is a delight for all ages!  Danny Kaye is terrific in this part.  He is sweet, compassionate, and charming.
Denmark's great storyteller.This is not the story of his life, but a fairy tale about the great spinner of fairy tales.&#34;
I LOVE THIS MOVIE! The hilarity, the bonding of friendship through adversity..AND AbdA. A MUST see..it'll surely become a favorite of yours too.
I love this movie.  It is really great.  Well acted, beautiful costumes, fantastic music and a good story.  Viva Priscilla!  And now it's a musical.
An oldie but absolutely fabulous.  This movie is a lot of fun and totally original for it's time and surprisingly it stands up 10  years later!
Is truly a classic. I found it as funny and touching as the first time I watched it.  It's appeal is timeless.
While quite funny, this movie touches the heart. Terrence Stamp delivers an Oscar worthy performance. Ensemble cast is delightful as well.
The music is fab, the outfits are over the top and story line is wonderful.  I wish I was there with them.  Looks like they had a wonderful adventure
I haven't seen this movie since it originally came out.  Well, seeing it today was like falling in love with the movie all over again.
Loved this movie!  It is filled with love, life, and adventure
I love this movie and can watch it over and over again if you are a person that is GLBT it is a must have for your collection - I LOVE IT!!
Loved it! I saw the Broadway show and I just had to see what it was based on and I am glad I did.
This entertaining movie shows what kind of crap that gays have to go through.  It's touching, poignant and entertaining.I loved it!
This movie truly has heart. It is a great comedy with characters you just fall in love with. Hilariously funny, I love it.
What can I say, but this is a fantastic movie.  Right up there with its partner movie....To Wong Foo, Thanks For Everything Julie Newmar.
This is a great story about acceptance. We should all watch it maybe the world would be a better place to live in
a hilarious movie about a group of drag queens. Don't get turned off about the subject matter and just sit back and enjoy a really good movie.
I normally don't but movie videos, but this is one sleeper I didn't want to do without!  Love the story.
This quirky little known movie will have you smiling throughout. It's one of those movies that youcan pull out and watch again and again.
This is a great unsung movie. Really fine work by everyone. It's an uplifting film and I would recommend it.
great acting all around. i love this movie. it is very strange story but keeps you thinking at all times. pick it up.
This is an awesome movie. It has a lot to say about people and change. In a very good way.
This is a little gem of a movie with an unusual story line and a more unusual setting.  The music is haunting and memorable.
Great feel good movie!!!!!
I've seen "Bagdad Cafe" several times. I like it so much that I decided I "need" to have my own copy. Its an offbeat movie. One of my favorites.
My Frienmd Really Likes This Movie .... It Came Factory Sealed .... She Was Very Happy With It When She Watched It
If you like this kind of movie genre, this movie is good.  I especially like that it was made in the early 70's and those movies are spooky.
Surprisingly good filmAs usual Shout did a excellent job.Thanks Shout.The story is classic.A real Diamond  in the rough.
What can I say I am a big fan of Vincent Price. He was a master of horror. Two good examples of my man Vincent working his craft.
My Father was thrilled so well worth the money!! All he had to say was I don't have this one, and I had to buy it for him
a great set of movies that are for the people that like the actors and that kind of movies etc.
Such a classic movie so glad I found it on your site such a funny movie to watch who would of thought females can become bees
This is a classic! I owned it on video and had to have it on DVD, it is freakin hilarious!
When I first saw this movie I laughed so hard and got hooked on Rodney Dangerfield. It was nice to be reaquainted
I love watching Rodney! he is one of the great comedians of anyone's time!! This movie is way too funny, classic Rodney
This is a must see Classic, Dangerfield is so damn funny, and I love the other flicks he has made also
Watch this and try not to laugh. Total fun in every aspect of the movie. Rodney Daingerfield was a  complete comedian.
Funny, funny, funny!!!Rodney Dangerfield at his best, and music by Oingo Boingo, ... what more could a comedy need?
A very funny and diverse kind of movie. It is faced paced and touches a lot of subject matter throughout. Nicely casted and a really enjoyable watch.
hilarious movie.  Love it.  Must watch for anyone that wants a good laugh.  Rodney Dangerfield makes this movie a classic.
This is a great comedy.  Rodney Dangerfield is at his very best.  I think it's hard to find a good comedy.  I'd highly recommend watching this movie.
this movie arrived in a good time frame. One of my husbands favorites so no complaints.
I loved this movie have bought it before and I think it is in good condition and is a good film too.
Saw the movie a long time ago, and wanted my own copy.  I enjoy all WW11 movies, hate to see them fade away.
I SAW THIS MOVIE WHEN IT FIRSTCAME OUT AND WANTED TO GET A DVD TO SEE AGAIN. GOOD CAST AND PLOT, KEEPS UPS THE SUSPENSE TO THE END
A must have for Harrison Ford lovers.  A great story line with action, comedy and suspense.  WWII fans must have this in their collection!
I LOVE THIS REALLY GREAT WAR MOVIE,, KELLYS HEROS, A BRIDGE OVER THE RIVER KWAI, AND THIS MOVIE CAN MAKE FOR A GREAT DAY OF MOVIE WATCHING
Things kept moving along. and was very exciting.  Harrison Ford is a superb actor and really made thing seem true to life.
What a great war movie!  I just love this movie....perhaps my favorite war movie of all times (although I can do without a brief nude scene).
Compelling movie to watch.  A very good and interesting movie.  I liked it a lot and would recommend it to others
EXCELLENT MOVIE - 5 STAR.EVERYBODY MUST SEE ITI ENJOYD VERY MUCH FROM THE MOVIEHIGHLY RECOMMENDABLEROBERT SHOW AND HARRISON FORD
This is an action packed war movie.  My dad watched it a lot when I was growing up.  I like it too.
a nother great movie to watch in blueray a very good movie great color the picture is sharp and clear this is the follow up to the guns of navarone
I should just copy my review for all the movies.I only order movies I like, and these are all excelent movies that help me kill time in the winter.
GREAT PRICE GREAT MOVIE IT'S ALWAYS GOOD TO HAVE THE GOOD OLD MOVIES TO FALL BACK ON AND SHOW YOUR CHILDREN.
This is a old classic movie from the 1960's, one of Disney beach movies and this show has a different twist to it.
I really enjoyed this version.  Shakespeare told by great story tellers and actors.  How can you miss with Ian McKellen!
Sir Ian McKellan hits it out of the park in his adaptation of R III. His is an Oscar worthy performance, as is that of the supporting cast.
This is my favorite movie, totally underrated, and underseen. If you like pierce brosnan, this is one of his best outings.
it was in great shape and I enjoyed it completly, came in the time expected, I had no problems at all
It's a Gary Cooper film, I shouldn't have to say more. It's a silver screen classic and a must see film.
My wife found this to be a great movie when I played it.  Barbara Stanwyck is great and the supporting cast are not half bad either.
This movie features Barbara Stanwyck's legs and a Gene Krupa drum sequence with match sticks.
I thoroughly enjoyed this thriller. Everything that a good movie should have. I would recommend to anyone that enjoys good old fashioned movies..
The clothes that Ruth Chatterton's wears are very stunning.  Great story.  And good copy on VHS.  Cast are all great.
THE VERY BEST!
A classic in every sense of the word and part of the Criterion Collection says it all. A must see for all vintage movie lovers.
Honor, Duty and Loyalty...These virtues never go out of style and they are inculcated in this movie with great effect.
I cannot think of a more hilarious performance. The quintessential romantic comedy that does not stoop to the antics that pass as such today.
A Christmas movie beyond the ordinary. A period piece done by a classic cast and a great view for a snowy night
This is my favorite movie for years and years. I was happy to see it available in this format THANKS!
The conversatons between this ultimate dysfunctional family is beyond compare. The best movie ever made (in my humble opinion) Worth every second!
Simply one of the best movies ever made. In my top five all time favorites.Hepburn and O'Toole  at their prime.
Kate Hepburn and Peter O'Toole at their best. My favorite movie of all time!  I highly recommend it. Buy it now.
Peter O'Toole and Katherine Hepburn.....it just doesn't get any better.  They are wonderful apart, amazing together.  A favorite for all time.
It still is one of my wife's and my favorite movies. We both love Katherine Hepburn and still like Peter O'toole.
This is one of my all-time favorite movies. The acting and the chemistry were superb between Katherine Hepburn and Peter O'Toole.
didn't have a copy of this so I purchased at Amazon it played well very happy with purchase love it
This is one program I really don't care how historically accurate it is - Katharine Hepburn and Peter O'Toole are such a joy to watch.
Loved it when I originally saw it and ditto this timeWhat a great cast and more so now that all are gone
in my opinion this is joe pesci at his best.  he's just a guy trying to get his job done when life throws him a curve ball.
It was funny and kept me guessing. The movie had an inventive plot line to it that I would not have thought up in a million years.
We  have invited friends over several times to watch this movie and they laugh all the way though. Well worth the price  I recommend it
love this flick it was so good! Angelina jolie is the best and MmMMmm is she as hot as always LA LA loved this movie &#60;3 ;)
saw it for the best actress ever. I can see her and johnnys chemistry , no wonder why they married. i love this movie its all about fun
I am a big fan of Angie the catwoman. Nice movie! Reminds me of the Lawnmower Man. Highly Recommended! Cool!
If you like Johnny Miller then you have to have Hackers. It is a great movie with good acting and lots of funny moments.
This is a must get with Angalina Jolee in her first staring role. fun excitement and a fast ride! Must own.
This movie is from my high school years. I love it. If you like Angelina Jolie you will love her in this little known movie.
The colors are appealing. The romance was really good. I like the computer stuff. A rare movie. Way to do it.
cute movie. i always loved it. very funny with all the elvis's running around. great story, sweet love story from both sides.
I always like to watch Nicholas Cage. Nice to see Bruno Mars performing as Elvis impersonator when Bruno was a young boy
The actors had great karisma.I've watched it sevedral times.I recommended it to all of my friends and have bought several more as gifts.5 stars PLUS!
Very good movie, great ending
great movie, great performances especially baldwin and kidman. really good movie. makes you really think about doctors, ethics etc. i loved it.
This video was in fantastic condition it came very quickly, so I am more than satisfied with the entire process.
We really enjoy this movie, it is good for the whole family. Good clean family entertainment for movie night .
A clean, fun film families can watch over and over for the great performances, witty dialog and hilarious circumstances.
MICHAEL KEATON AT HIS BEST.  THIS MOVIE WILL MAKE YOU LAUGH UNTIL YOU CRY.  I STILL LOVE TO WATCH IT EVEN TODAY.  THIS IS A CLASSIC.
Still as funny as it was when it first came out!!!  Nice clean comedy, especially with all the horrible choices that are out there now.
This has always been one of my favorite movies and I never get tired of it. Makes me laugh every time and has some classic lines.
Most man feel less when they see that women take the control over and most man quit but in most part is so fun and funny too. I like it
This title will be a good addition to my video library. Entertaining and funny. Recommend this to all, it is a family movie.
It is funny!  Reminded me of my ex-husband and how neat it would be if he had to do this!  HAHAHAHA
Great movie, fun , heartfelt. It's an 80's classic. I highly recommend this film to everyone. Go watch it now!
One of Michael Keaton's understated movies!  Love this! A great family movie! A must watch if you haven't seen it!
This is a great Movie - My husband and I use the quote - &#34;220/221 what ever it takes&#34; all the time!!
SHE-DEVIL is a great Movie,I have it on LASER DISC And Gonna get it ON DVD Too :)
plays perfectly fine. i watch it all the time. i hope to buy movies from you in the future. thanks
THIS HAS GOOD COMEDY, AND HAS FUNNY SCENES IN IT THAT MAKE ME LAUGH, AND THE WAY SHE GETS BACK AT HER HUSBAND IS SURPRISINGLY FUNNY!
It is a very funny movie about real life and what happens with cheaters. The actors were very real and true to their roles.
Great movie!  I absolutely LOVE Roseanne and the fact that it is a revenge movie.  What could be better?
A very fun movie. So kampy and clever, but nothing over the top.  A movie you can easily watch over and over again...
this was great, even if not a fan today, meryn streep made this movie. great condition, worth having. a huge 10
this movie is so funny. a wife takes revenge on her husban and his lover in ways that are hilarious.
This was engaging, entertaining and at rare times, funny. Meryl Streep was amazing. Not really a family film, but not filthy either.
A Must Have for any Bowie Fan, Plus a pretty good musical with a Sade cameo as a jazz singer.
You have to love Eddie Cantor. And the Technicolor Production number was great. I saw this years ago. If you knew Susy!
This film is funny, passionate, and exciting. Richard Gere can surely make a person 'Breathless] at times. The story is interesting.
This is a different Richard Gere, but really enjoyed this side of his acting. Would recommend this movie to any Gere fan.
Brando & Sinatra are a great combo!! Classic performances with a great storyline and catchy tunes! This product was in practically new condition!
This DVD replaces a VHS Tape of Guys and Dolls.  In either format it is a wonderful movie.  Marlon Brando is great in this movie.
I was thrilled to be there-- and have never forgotten the experience.  I was anxious to see if it translated to the screen.  It almost does.
Classic musical! Frank Sinatra plays a great roll in this musical and it is a great musical for all ages!
I bought this movie DVD for a lady friend of mine.  This is one of her favorite movies!  She just loved the DVD!
Love the DVD great movie brought for my daughter who is starting to like classic movies especially musical she enjoy them
I like musicals and, while I am stymied as to why Brando was cast as a singing lead, it is a great movie!
Great Movie, Great Music and Great Dancing, along with Great Stars!!!!!!!  It'll make you laugh and start singing along with the movie.
One of the most fun musicals of all with a superb cast. The image quality is excellent, and it's in glorious Technicolor!  :)
My son was just cast in this play and I feel he made it because he was able to see the movie, thanks for the nice transaction
One of the truly greats in musicals. The sets looked too stagey in its transfer to screen but that didn't matter. What  a cast of suburb  artists.
I rented this with my girlfriend and it was a wonderful time. Great couple movie. I would highly recommend it.
Never better, not even in 35 mm. on cinema screen. DTS-HD sound probably also improves the original magnetic stereo that sounded in theaters.
The songs are great.  Frank Sinatra did a fine job. Vivian Blaine was an adorable character. Two characters were later in the Godfather.  Guess who?.
I have heard of this movie for years but have never seen it.  I hope I'll enjoy it.  I usually like most musicals.
Loved it, my favorites include when the heroine gets tipsy, and Rocking the Boat number, sure it's corny, but I love corny
Guys and Dolls is a favorite for high school and college productions.  Casting is perfect for each of the characters and their voices are beautiful.
Blu-ray copy is great.  I own the dvd copy as well.  If you love this movie, I would recommend up-grading to blu-ray.
Got it for my girl's Dad and he loves watching it. Well worth the small price I paid. Great value!
Great music,capture the spirit of the era.Great shots of the old Arthur Ave. if you remember the old Bronx,you'll love it.
you will like this one on Blu-ray a good retrospective up an down this is a 5 out of 5 for me
This movie is truly inspirational it shows people that you can do anything even if your a nobody and you really try.
One of my husband's old time favorites.  I was so pleased to find it on Amazon, purchased as a gift for his Birthday.
I am a huge fan of Kevin Costner and this is another excellent movie.  I am very happy with this purchase.
One of Kevin Costner's best efforts with a real twist at the end.  It will probably knock your socks off!!Paul Baragona  Raleigh, NC  USA
this is the kind of story you remember and reach for on those rerun nights over and over again... soooo many thanks, bill
Bought as a gift for a friend.  I had seen it and it was a great movie - one of the few times you don't know the ending.  What a surprise.
I think this is a very sexy movie and that it is all it really wants to be, so for its kind it definetly deserves a good rating.
A good but frightening movie.Arrived in good condition and in a timely manner.
Well, to be quite honest, this is the greatest NC-17 rated movie I have ever seen.  For the $$$, buy it, it is worth owning.
wanted to see what the movie was about instead of renting and it was a nice movie to watch and enjoy
Liked the realism of film, sound effects were above average on blu-ray. Plot was very good thoroughly enjoyed movie from beginning to end..
...because I could never muster up enough nerve to buy this movie from a retail store.
Showgirls makes for a delightfully entertaining evening. Elizabeth Berkley is spectacularly beautiful in her birthday suit!
I love this movie!! shipped fast. Nothing more I can say really besides this movie was really good. Nice buy.
A very good movie I enjoyed it alot every time I watch it and that has been more than four time so far
There IS a reason why a movie makes it to Cult Classic Status.All I can advise is to not just to view it but to actually listen to the story.
I had this movie on VHS but finally broke down and got it on DVD.  I've seen it so many times and really enjoy the story line.
silly funny - the grandkids and grandpa all enjoy it
A classic from Mel Brooks, complete with spoofs from multiple other films, a Mel Brooks cameo, and superb acting and jokes
This is a movie that is a favorite for my daughter and my grandson.  This is a way for them to share and connect.
Spaceballs is such a funny movie.  I love Star Wars, and that's the best reason I know to watch Spaceballs.  God bless Mel Brooks!
A basic knowledge of pop culture is helpful to fully appreciate the humor in this movie. It is classic satire and timeless for my generation.
Love the movie!  The clarity was great from my Roku.  Always a laugh and nothing left to waste.  Two thumbs up.
Classic. Comedy. Slapstick. Funny. Dark Helmet! Barf! Dot Matrix! Prince Valium! Colonel Sandurz! King Roland! Princess Vespa!  Captain Lone Starr!
Classic movie!  Our 10 year old loves it and watches it constantly.  (He's also a huge star wars fan)  It's still fun to watch and aged well.
This movie was really funny. I really enjoyed it. I need to watch funny movies often to help take the edge of every day life.
Mel Brooks's "SPACEBALLS" is one of the funniest movies ever! From my childhood until forever this movie is a classic!
This movie is awesome.  Brings back old memories.  Mel Brooks will forever be my favorite movie maker.  He is the man
Mel Brooks is a genius when it comes to spoofing a movie. and by all far this one is the best.
Usual zany slapstick comedy throughout the movie.  Great parody to Star Wars.  timeless classic comedy that you don't see produced anymore,
SpaceballsOne of the all time great comedies, Mel Brooks is one of the greatest talents that I never get tired of his work.
One of my favorite Mel Brooks films.  Spaceballs makes me laugh out loud every time I see it.  May the Schwartz be with you.
I love this movie, and was excited to find it on Blu-Ray with such great quality.  I really love the HD transition!
I picked up this Mel Brooks classic to add to my DVD collection.It was a great price and arrived on time.
After all these years still one of the best comedies. If you like to watch a spoof of a great movie with a twist, you're gonna love this one.
I loved this movie as a kid and owned it on vhs and dvd. now I have it on blu-ray and it is still awesome.
i love mel brooks movies and this one takes the cake. the onlybetter is robin hood men in tights. this is hilarious.
You are missing out on one of the most funny movies ever if you haven't seen this.  Sci Fi lover or not, you need this movie.
Not really for kids but the ribald humor of Mel Brooks is unsurpassed. Like Blazing Saddles this an outstanding romp on the genre.
Fun for adults who never grew up!  Lost count of how many times I've seen it!  John Candy is loveable and funny.
If you haven't honestly seen this yet buy the movie now call in sick to work and get some popcorn!
I absolutely love this movie. And being in HD just makes it all the more enjoyable. Good video and audio.
Even if this is an older movie, it still is full of clever lines and witty sayings to please any audience
I enjoyed his movies he made and this one is a great one to get if you are a fan.
What is there to say about this movie? It's just sheer genius and now that its upscaled to Bluray it will survive yet another few generations!
Clear picture and runs in 1080p which is not listed on the cover! I'm using the Sony BP-360 player (which also runs better than the 350 series).
fast delivery and great addition to my DVD collection. I like older movies and they are nice to watch on cold or rainy days
Funny enough movie for a young teenage crowd.  Some silly dumb puns and jokes on Star Wars.  Overall quite enjoyable and still amused us parents.
The transfer of the audio video were both very well done.Nice special features package.Very happy with it indeed.
This is easily in my top 10 films.You can't go wrong with this movie, it's a freaking Mel's Brooks film, C'MOOOON MAN!
One of Mel Brooks' best!  EVERYONE should see this movie.
THIS WAS MY` GRAND-DAUGHTER`S ALL TIME  FAVORITE  MOVIE, SO ON HER` 31st BIRTHDAY I ORDERED IT FOR HER. SHE WAS DELIGHTED !
I gave Spaceballs  a 5 star rating cause it's a funny movie that pokes fun of star wars if you like funny movies then this is 4 you
its a mel brooks movie what els is there to say.  very funny movie  u want a good laugh watch this
Look, if you're a Mel Brooks fan, this is a must have.  It's hilarious, and good for a fun family movie.
Mel Brooks is a comedy genius. This is a comic spoof on Star Wars and other space movies. It does not take away from Star Wars. It is super funny.
I love Mel Brooks and all of his movies are brilliant! I have the Collection that I purchased thru Amazon and  will watch them over and over!
One the classic comedies by Mel Brooks and also a classic for all comedy enthusiasts. A must have for my comedy DVD collection.
This is a fantastically hilarious movie by Mel brooks! You have have to see this if you haven't yet. Thank you!!!
Excellent!  Excellent!  Excellent!  Excellent!  Typical Mel Brooks.  Hilarious!  He makes incredibly funny movies. This is another in a long line.
Spaceballs is one of the funniest movies I ever seen. The 1st time I seen it I laughed for 3 days straight. Classic
I don't know if this is Mel's best work, but it's very funny and certainly a comedy classic.  It's hard to go wrong with a Mel Brooks movie.
I am a car enthusiast and the roar of the engines and the general movie all in itself is a must have!
Robert Mitchum in a very good moonshine classic .
I remembered it from when it was first shown in the 1950's and it's fantastic to now own it. A great deal.
A fantastic car chase movie where the little man beats big government just to survive
this movie was made in the 50s it was a reallygood old movie i really enjoyed it. thank you amazon.
i love the movie very i show my mom she want buy her one i did
THE GREATEST MUSICAL AND THE GREATEST NOVEL EVER WRITTEN! VIVA CERVANTES Y DON QUIJOTE!!!!!!!GET THIS DVD!!!!!!!!!
Be careful of those windmills, they might turn out to be Dragons as the Character Peter O'Toole plays demonstrates in Man of La Mancha
MY WIFE HAS BEEN LOOKING FOR THIS FOR A WHILE AND IT MADE HER HAPPY.  THE QUALITY, CONSIDERING THE YEAR IT WAS MADE, IS EXCELLENT
A classic. We have seen the movie before, the stage presentation, and are happy to have the DVD so we can watch it again.
One of my favorite plays, musicals and of course movies.  Peter O'Tool is great and Sophia - gives a good accounting of her character too.
The movie version of the stage play of the Man from La Mancha.  It was good when it first appeared, nostalgia.
Smoking pot, casually?  Now isn't that a slap in the face of Richard Nixon.
This movie is fantastic, but I have not seen the DVD yet.  I recently came across a wholesaler with this in-stock and bought 10 copies.
I liked this movie a lot it shows the dirty side of war and how these young men gave up soo much for our nation
The 1.85:1 transfer is presented in excellent stark detail retaining all the color palette of the original film.Another must for Oliver Stone fans.
Platoon is a classic that I have only watched once years ago. This title now cheap to buy, and cant wait to watch it in blu ray.
An old classic that is still great. It kinda brings back a few old memories of being in SouthEast Asia during bad times
ha war war war!!! wahts more great acting good story platoon was and is a great movie to watch!!!
Im mad I bought this great dvd! It's by far the best edition out, I want to see all this on blu-ray as well.
Ahh, Platoon, it took me back to 1990 something when I saw it with my Father and it was good then and it was good now.
THIS IS A GREAT DVD OF THE VIETNAM WAR A LOT OF ACTION THRILLING IT IS REALLY OE THE BEST FIVE STARS PLUS.
Shows you how scary Vietnam really was. Great narrating, story, and unbelievable acts of war.Thanks to all the real Vietnam veterans!!!
Possibly the greatest war film ever made, and most definetly the best film of the 1980's.  Stone does a great job directing this classic.
bought for my husband and he really like it . i like buying movies this way they are not expensive and you save momey
Excellent classic Vietnam Conflict Movie. Good to have my own DVD copy of this movie. 5 stars. It's good to have my own copy of this movie.
No words needed. This movie has the actors and the story if you like east movies this is simply the best!!
we watched it and lived it and this is very much like it. all the drama and BS included so watch this.
I enjoy this movie like a comedy ,that scene where their getting high still makes me smile,william dafoe rocked here and in spiderman
the top of the line actors put the viewer in the actual combat of the war in viet nam.  superior camera work.  worth your while to watch it.......
realalistic a great movie that covers the trails of our men that fought for our country and gave there lives
I own this already and am now sending it as gifts. The movie arrived promptly and in perfect condition.
even though this movie is dated i did enjoy it , have it in my faves so i can watch it again in the future .
the fact that the movie is based on the truth is riveting. james woods hit home what really went going on in el Salvador -man's inhumanity to man.
Really good movie.  James Woods deserved his Oscar nod.
I love this movie. It is a real adventure. I would recommend it to everyone. I want to see more movies like this
Excellent western with fantastic music score. Good picture, acting. Shows the ignorance of people during the western period.
Gave this as a gift to a friend.  This happens to be my husband's favorite movie & know friend will like it too.
I never get tired of watching this classic western. Burl Ives played a big part in making this movie what it is.
I can watch this forever and enjoy this every time.
Another one of my favorites and a favorite actor.  Good story line and show how people will fight over just about anything.
I have seen this movie many times before and decided on a purchase. This a great movie to have and to watch again.
This a great movie !!  I have it in my collection, and play it again and again.  It never gets old !!
Glad I came across this title while in Amazon. Story line is realistic and not burdened with today's Hollwood el garbage.
This is a great movie.
I love this movie!  My dad watched it a lot, and I grew to love it too.  One of my favorite westerns.
One of my favorite westerns.  An array of favorite stars.  The story is excellent and believable.  Great scenery and music.
What a great movie! Im sure we will watch it again next year too. Great wide open landscape shots too.
Great story, solid performances by Greg Peck, Jean Simmons, and espec Burl Ives. Charlton Heston at his best. Better even than GIANT.
I have always loved this movie and the quality of this DVD is great. Very enjoyable.
Fast shipping Movie was one I wanted to purchasean I saw it at a good price thought it was a good time to order it.
When I purchased this, I thought it was region 1.  Have to accommodate it on my computer to see it - but was worth it - really liked it.
Haven's seen this is years then thought of it one day and decided to buy it.  They don't get much better than this.
Looked for this item for years, it is still on of the top ten comedy movies from that time period, still just as funny as the first time I saw it
Great movie ...rates in my top 20 funny movies of all time. If you've not seen this one ..you've missed a great one.
enjoyed the entire movie . it had comedy,lildrama,ture to life story.it had a good cast and they made it real.
i saw this movie liked it and had to own it. It's different like to she more like this out there for us
This movie has been an all time favorite as the main characters have a great chemistry. It takes you back to the times of true love discovery.
This was a great movie to watch. It was so real and life like. The love part of movie was great to watch.
This is definitely my favorite lesbian movie, maybe the best ever, along with Lianna.
this is very nice country love movieit is a must see film for you to see for your self and decide if you like it for your self
This is one of the best lesbian movies of the time. It never grows old.
Helen Shaver gives a masterful performance as a woman torn by desire and tradition. It is relevant even now when viewpoints have changed.
great cast  and some well known. great music.flimed on the west coast so scenic.lil drama, comedy and true to life ..
Very well written!!! Shows the difficulties of coming out even today.The only bad thing is that there was a few scratched on the DVD.
And no matter how many times you watch it, it is still very well done, well acted, and a good and honest story line too.  What's not to love?
The story line was great and I have a soft spot for happy ending the characters are very talented actors
I watched it when it first came out and thought I would watch it again.  This is a good movie.
This is a great movie - a funny, witty, love story with a happy ending.
A favorite of mine. Saw this years ago and really wanted the movie. Can watch this over and over. Great acting by all.
Jeffrey is funny man who just scared and took everything to another level at least until another guy came his way to explain that it aint bad!
One of my favorite Burt Lancaster films. If you disrespect Bob Valdez, he will be coming to create havoc. Terrific movie.
My husband loves a good western and says this is one of the best. Just enough shooting  and good story line.
This is some off beat Western that needs blu ray! Picture and sound ok! Great Cast and story! If you love Burt..you will love it!
I bought this DVD because I believe it is one of Burt Lancaster's best efforts.
I bought this one for my husband and he loves it we both like burt lancaster and this one is a good one of his.
You will enjoy him in this one.  He has several classics, this is one of them.  You will enjoy it.
Great Lancaster vehicle. Somewhat politically correctfor the 70's but still an action packed western with goodmotives. I think you will enjoy it.
This Is a great movie.  Burt Lancaster is tyriffic in it.  Very, very, very worth adding to your western movie library !
Really enjoy the old flicks - but this was not Lancaster's best - he shines brightly in many other films.
Burt Lancaster is outstanding in this role with a great supporting cast ... tells a believable story in a western setting.
This has to be one of the top 10 best moives we have seen ! What a plot too . Thanks for asking about it .
the father, the chef.If you appreciate watching a great chef in action, you will love this part.The whole movie was very well done.
Great movie - unexpected  Was a night where I couldn't fine anything I wanted to watch.Chose this and was so happy I did
One of my top 10 favorite films.Bruno Ganz, Peter Falk...Wum Wenders directing.What's not to like. To quote Icona Pop, &#34;I loave it.&#34;
An angel incarnates for love. Looses his wings, armor and becomes mortal. Its even better than it sounds. See it for yourself.
Classic sci fi is the best, the movies of this era come off a little corny but when you have grown up watching them you cant help but be hooked!
It's a great classic.cheesey,colorful,corny and yet ...classy.a must-see.
As a classic sci-fi fan this movies a must buy. Great story line with a great cast. Buy it you will love it.
Fast service and the movie plays great with no problems thanks alot looking forward to future business with you folks!
I strongly recomend this film, Price performance was excellent, so was the story and plot. Tells exactly how the holy church is, good for nothing.
Vincent Price is wonderful in this movie. A must have for anyone who enjoys Vincent Price.
Got what i wanted, when i wanted it, and in the shape i wanted it in. Thank you very much.
Very good movie with vincent price! Quite adult for the 1960s. He does some of his best acting in this film.
this is a great fantastic movie about a creapy cemetary, great actor is richard boone, well worth watching. a big thumbs up.
I Love Annette Funicello's acting, She is great! She is a wonderful Lady! She has a dynamic personality and she is beautiful!
This is a classic.  You have to add this to your collection if you don't own already.  Not many films that capture this era.
we loved this one too, a must have break dancing 80's style love it thx we watch all the time
I always liked these 3 older movies.  The collection gives you Breakin' 1 and 2 and also Beat Street.  The price of the set was a winner.
real good movie. if you were born in the 80s or enjoy break-dancing or pop lockin this is how it all started. I wish part 1 was on here too for free
I went to the movie and seen this I like beat street that why I bought it thank you so much
Kick back with These & enjoy em oldschool style!  Hopefully showing the new generations. Kids & grandkids Who started it all!! Enjoy!
Ya gotta love it, funny flick.  Bill and Ted beat death and win the girls.  Hell will never be the same since they were there.
A great continuation of every ones favorite morons.  Not as good as the first,  but a great laugh. Excellent! !
Part of Amazon Prime TV offerings.  OK but dated as its and old movie.  Would like to see more action adventure videos like this one
It's our &#34;go to&#34; movie when there's nothing worth watching on TV.  No matter how many times we've seen it, it never gets old.
They must save the Presdent. Lee van Cleef is head of police on NY. Snake isn't thrilled about going in after the Presdent.
Watched it many times on T.V. and decided to add it to my movie collection. Picture quality and sound effects are great too on Blu-ray.
Great movie! Classic Kurt Russel flick about a futuristic New York Being a prison, a must see if you love the classic 80 flicks!
Love Kurt Russell in anything.  Have seen more than once, enjoy everytime.  Great show, very campy, always good.  Kurt rocks.
...but I bought this DVD anyway!  What a great movie!
This is a really really good movie to watch. Sure to keep you interested from beginning to end.A Great movie
I really love this movie, much better than its sequel, Escape from LA, classic dystopian future comedy with Kurt Russell!
Good flick, haven't seen it in years.  Good to be able to see it again.  Nice clean clear copy. Good quality.
LOL, I saw this movie back in the 1980's.  It is definitely worth seeing.  You will enjoy the movie and wonder, What were they thinking back then!?!
This is one of my favorite Kurt Russell movies.  Make it a must see and enjoy on a rainy day.
Was the first movie I saw Kurt Russell in and liked it along with Issac Hayes music and the ending was classic.
Not only was this movie accurate, but today it's even WORSE! Level UP 5D time, THINK ABOUT IT!?! SNAKE LIVES!MOPOPmonsterpop69@yahoo.com
love kurt russel and snake pliskin is so hot and cool at the same time. Ten times better than Rambo!
Great movie and lots of action. One of the great movies in the 2 part movie series. If you love John Carpenter movies this is a must have.
they dont make em like this anymore...good from start to finish! watching on prime was good...try it you'll like it
always like this movie,Kurt Russell is one great actor he is awsome planing Snake.i reccomend this movie to any Kurt fan.
This is a great movie to see cause it gives you a look see into what you might have in store if it ever happens.
You can never get enough of &#34;Snake&#34;, a great movie all around.  In other words, another oldie but Goldie to watch time and time again!
if you like kurt russel then you'll love this flick, the second one really wasn't as original but oh well still a good time.
Hi  Bryan Rodriguez  Here  just  to  let  you  know  what  a  great  movie  this  is  and  i  can  not  wait  to  see  the  remake  of  this.
Even though I dont have a 4k tv yet, this plays great on my new 3D TV and home cinema system.
Hey, its ROBO Cop what else can you say, ED-209, the Jarvic Heart, and all the blood sex and violence that made it great.
Wow, this movie still holds up great. Truly a classic in its category. Heroes and bad guys were equally powerful. Loved everything about it
Great picture and sound for this classic, with some very nice Extra Features. Get it now! Its for you Fool!
When this film was first released it blew everybody away.  The follow films were dia, but this is by far the classic of the pack.  A must!
It had been years since viewing this movie last. What a great story...well worth the low price for a blue-ray to watch it again.
It's terrible that it took so many editions to finally get here, but it is what it is...highly recommended for your collection!
Ahhhh, what a kick butt great movie. Lots of great lines. Shot in Detroit. Pretty cool. Awesome old school movie that's still fun to watch today.
Robocop is by far the greatest sci-fi movie ever made and this DVD just adds to the robocop Hype!!!
This is an improvement over the other Blu-Ray edition, not a HUGE improvement but still better. I really like this movie!
This was a movie that my husband rented. He loves old school movies and he really enjoyed it. Thank  you.
Not much needs to be said other than this movie is a true classic and a must see for anyone.
awesome movie. I always love action movies and this one is no exception. this is no sweet deal on amazon. i got mine at walmart for 5 dollars.
I saw this movie many years ago and loved Peter Weller in his role as a robot.  He was great from beginning to end.  It's a keeper.
Just got this new blu-ray and it looks and sounds excellent.  And, most importantly?  The film itself is still just so much fun to watch.
After i bought this DVD the other day, i was outstanded and amazed by all the quality features and bonuses. yet it remains a brilliant classic.
I watched this once back in 1987, I believe, and its just as fun now as it was then.  Nicely packaged product too.
Great Movie and for the time, excellent special effects.A story line you can actually follow, unusual for this type of movie.
Super movie.. Watch again after watching the 2014 reboot. The original is still the best. Video looks good to me
Very entertaining.
Wow what a great movie. I love men in steel. Everything is hot about this movie. I used to think about this person as a younger.
Great sci-fi movie, what really sucks about this movie is how a teenage boy thats like 15 yrs old becomes a villans and he dies.
Robocop is back in this sequel to the first smash hit. This is such a great movie it's a must see
Robo 1 was wonderful.  Robo 2 was just right but Robo 3, oy.  Two was just right.  I hope the new one has its own flair.
Very few sequels equal the original but this one was just as entertaining.  Highly recommended for any who enjoyed Robocop.
This movie is so terrible that its amazing.  I was on a robocop marathon .. watched all of them.. and the making of.
great old time TV. THIS SERIES WAS GREAT, when looking at whats on TV now,It makes great sence to get this series on DVD's.
Robocop 3 is awesome. i don't understand why so many people don't like it. i think it's a good movie. it's a must see for robocop fans
I love this movie ,ITunes does not have it, only to rent, so I went to the people that don't let me down and I am very pleased. thanks Amazon.
What can I say, Madge is and will always be a icon no matter what others think about her. Loved this movie.
If you are a lover of old movies, this one is a hit.  I will recommend to others to see it.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE.  I LOVE MADONNA. THIS MOVIE BRINGS BACK MY TEEN YEARS.  I RECOMEND THIS MOVIE TO ANYONE WHO LOVES MADONNA!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I wanted this movie, I have watched it before!  I loved this movie with Madonna in it.  Some of her movies I do love!
Not really a fan of Madonna in her other movies, but this one is really good.  Love the young Adian Quinn.
no problem, good movie.
A cool thriller with both Brians before there were CGI effects like there are today.  Cool movie from the 80s
Have all of these movies very good. These were back when you could see a good movie with out all the violence and sex.
F/X 2 - The Deadly Art of Illusion Arrived on time and video was just as described. A good buy
Love the actors and the plot for this and FX.  Needed to get a DVD.  We enjoy the movies so much.
A great sequel to the classic original the two Brians are a great team in this one.  Before there was CGI
I have always enjoyed watching F/X 1 & 2. I like the actors and the special effects.
CHUCK NORRIS IS ONE OF MY FAVORITE ACTION ACTORS.,I HAVE ALOT OF HIS MOVIES.THANKS FOR HAVING THEM AVAILABLE,KEEP UP THE GOOD WORK.
this is one of the underrated Eastwood gems out there. gritty and fun to watch, and Mr. Bridges and Mr. Kennedy are fantastic.
My father in law loves old movies and he loved this one too. It is a great oldie for those who enjoy old movies
Purchased this for my son. He was so happy to get it and has watched it many times. Both of these fine actors are family favorites
Very good movie
Great movie from the 1970s. Tough to find on DVD, but worth the search. Eastwood and Bridges make a great buddy team.
Can't even nit-pick this film. It was made in the days before studio execs whined that every film just has to have a BS happy ending.
This film just turned forty years old. My dad & I watched it just to see what has changed since it was made here in our neck of the woods.
excellent movie, great cast.
vivian one of my favorite actress and I try to see all of her movies that are available some are hard to find. I really liked her in this one
This is the best Caesar and Cleopatra movie ever made. It beats the Liz Taylor and Richard Burton movie hands down.
One of my favorites from that era. Great performances all around. Gritty, tough and Bogie. What more could you want?
I RECIEVED THIS DVD LAST WEEK, AND COULD NOT WAIT TO WATCH ITTHE QUALITY AND SOUND ARE EXCELLENT,
Bette Davis,  what more can be said, a true classic, nasty, devious, cunning, she does it all with Davis style.
Bette Davis is my all time favorite actress. This is one of my favorite movies of her. The whole work is excellent.
I love this movie and wanted my sister to see it.  Bette Davis is greed personified -- esp relevant in these times of &#34;The 1%&#34;
I WILL ALWAYS BE A BETTY DAVIS FAN, SHE MAKES BEING A TYRANT VERY INTERESTING TO WATCH
the music is awesome, ellington and armstrong.......the script is awesome....the acting is awesome....
THIS IS A CLASSIC ACION MOVIE TO STARS SLOW AND THE ACION BUILDS UP AS THE SHOW CONTINUES.WATCH AND ENJOY IT ON A WEEKEND.
I loved it at the movies; I am happy that I was able to purchase it and have it close at hand to play again and again!
A classic of early special effects with a great story,great acting and entertainment fit for the whole family.
A feel good gem made back before CG. What a great Arabian Night movie!!  The DVD was great and the delivery was right on time.
The original version is a classic. The quality of the movie and the great story line is a must have for real movie lovers and collectors.
Great Rozsa music. Always on my top 100 list. Any Korda movie is a work of art. A MUST have.
Finally the 1939 version it is out on DVD I wish they put it on Blu-ray it's a great cast  and a good tearjerker
A true classic of course. Never tire of this one either. Have seen it 4-5 times. Wish it was out on DVD.
Read some of the other great reviews The CD is of great quality, not like the " Scarlet Pimpernel" done 2 years prior
Bought this for my mother-in-law.  THis is her favorite movie of all times so made a  great gift. Highly recommend!
Wonderful movie to watch over and over again!  Arrived quickly and in the best condition too!  Love it alot!
It has been my favorit since childhood.
Proof that there can be a beautiful, emotional, really strong love story without any sex or nudity. Plus, it has closed captions.
This is an all time classic movie and a particular favourite that we really enjoy watching so very much.  Awesome.
This DVD had wonderful color and sound and very enjoyable, but sad.  Very good actors and actresses, a great story!!
came way before the time it said it was going to come, was happy, would definetly recommend this movie to everyone, great movie.
The DVD was excellent.  The video crisp and audio superb.  An excellent job of mastering this fine movie.
I love the old movies, especially the performance from stage to film by L.O, who actually didn't want to play this part. But he was awesome!
Great packaging and dvd in super shape and as it is remastered is excellent quality.  Don't hesitate on this one.
I love this movie and have for years.  i watch it everytime I can it runs on TV.  Glad to have in my library.
It worked on my DVD player and this is my favorite movie of all time. So happy that this worked.
ONE OF MY VERY FAVOITE FILMS WITH MERLE OBERO, LAWERENCE OLIVIER AND DAVID NIVEN. IT IS A CLASSIC. AND NO ONE SHOULD MISS IT,
Have always adored this movie. Laurence Olivier is so striking, handsome and mysterious. He is so passionate in his acting
This is the perfect movie for people who love old romantic movies.An absolute classic.
Life is so hard. This movie helps me in my belief about life, love. death. Excellent classic
An excellent collection, containing many of Woody's early works.  Down side: does not contain Take The Money and Run.
What can I say, I love all of these films!That's why I bought the collection!
Howard Cosell in some of his finest work in a cameo.  A hilarious farce and a unique send up of the US government at a time it was badly needed.
Great value for the price with some really good movies. Would have been nice if it was a chronologically accurate set  but still good.
I was happy with this collection of Woody's films. I also purchased vol. 2. You either love Woody or you don't. I do. It was a nice reminiscing.
This is so bad, it's good.Allen humor is like few others...he has a unique way to make people laugh.
Woody Allens' funniest ! From cerebral humor to slapstick , a very funny dude! With Howard Cosell, and the supporting cast are a bunch of wackies !!
Funny Film.  Sure there are dated moments,.  Not everything works.  I love this film and always will.  It will make you happy.
I love Woody Allen's early movies.  This is hilarious from beginning to end.  Howard Cosell's cameo is marvelous and I love the rebel's song.
IF YOU LIKE TO WATCH CRAZY PEOPLE WHO MAKE YOU LAUGH AND BRIGHTEN YOUR DAY WATCH THIS MOVIE. OF COURSE,WOODY HAS ALWAYS BEEN MY FAVORITE.
DVD arrived quickly, factory sealed and in good condition. It was fun to watch again!
For a boomer like me, what could be better than an early Woody Allen comedy?  Bananas, Take the Money and Run, Everything..Sex: all classics.
instant video was good, came in clear, only had to restart once after i rewinded something and the video was extremely funny.
Woody Allen Classic.  I love it but would only recommend to Woody Allen die-hard fans.  DVD came in good time and in good condition.
An early Woody Allen film, my favorite and his as well. Even if you are not familiar with Russian literature, you will crack up. Not to be missed.
it is so hilarious it i hard to put into words. It is a shame that personally that he did not feel the need to honor his higher self.
A great classic, black and white.  Great cast of characters.  Buy it for your Woody Allen collection; you won't be sorry!!
The sound.It's a DVD for heaven's sake.NO English Subtitles?What the Hell?Otherwise, beautiful.
I think Blue Jasmine is one of the best films about New York...filmed in San Francisco.  But Manhattan is so great.  Wonderful performances from all.
A really decent movie well deserving its reputation. Comes as a real shock after the deeply disappointing Match Point.
Exactly what you expect from Woody Allen.I enjoyed the old Manhattan scene, very cool.The dialogue is typical Woody, Read my review.
This is my absolute favorite Woody Allen film.  I am very happy to have added it to my DVD library.
My favorite Woody Allen movie
The interaction of people and theit personalities. Their doubts, insecurities and how crazy they are made enjoyable.viewing this Woody Allen movie.
One of Woody's best. A love song to Manhattan. Good acting, good script, great photography.Worth seeing more than once!
A WOODY ALLEN MASTERPIECE IN BLACK AND WHITE .  AND FULL OF GEORGE AND IRA GERSHWIN MUSIC AND MANHATTAN TOO BOOT.
We love Woody Allen movies....ergo, we enjoyed this one....but if you are not a fan of WA...you will not get it!
This is at the top range of the many excellent movies directed by Woody Allen. It is always special when he is also an actor in the movie.
Sleeper is to rocks your face off good, as 2 Fast 2 Furious is to hungry badger in my pants bad.
Sleeper is a great period movie. Sight gags, one liners, sarcasm, iconoclasm.  Woody at his best. My kids loved it!
One of Woody's only forays into Sci Fi.  Great WA comedy from back in his younger years.  Hope you enjoy it.
One of the funniest of Woody's movies, I always like his work in the 1970's and early eighties.  Diane and he play off each other very well. Enjoy!
The Music,The Special Effects,The architecture,all ahead of their time. A priceless buy. Better than Annie Hall in my opinion. many would disagree.
Saw this the first time and bought died laughing. Bought it for a nephew who likes old movies and comedies really...
Another Woody Allen movie that I love.  I really would like to find an orgasmatron of my own.  I might never leave it.
For social commentary movies, this is a classic. Was this Sienfeld before Seinfeld? Self absorbed people being self absorbed...
sleeper was good came quickly in the mail, was in great condition and the film was good too so i give this movie a good rating.
Hey, you know the story, brilliant Woody Allen AS PER USUAL.
An unrecongised classic. Delicate, shot in black and white, highly intricate and complex script, and soft humour throughout. A marvel.
5 Stars at least.  He saves the best for last.  "From this he makes a living?"  I rest my case.
LOVE THIS MOVIE, SHOWS WHAT IT WAS LIKE IN THE 1940'SAND HOW PEOPLE MADE IT THRU HARD TIMES...ONLY ONAMAZON!!!
One of the best classic movies to own!!
I love this movie.  Highly recommend this movie to everyone.  One of the greatest movies ever.
of course it IS the greatest of all American movies, but charging $44 for a broken down DVD not even blu ray is not quite a bargain.
I enjoyed watching this old movie about the lives of three soldiers home from the war. They don't make movies like it anymore.
Have seen it many times over the years---never gets old or stale always shed a tear and smile. Great movie!!!
This is my favorite film - Of course, I have maybe 25 favorites - but this isthe one that I can watch anytime, in any mood.
Classic Movie.  A Must see movie. WWII veterans return home to fine a difference in their lives. Touching and emotional.  Great actors ,good movie.
This from an era gone by. Great cinematic quality a story that has meaning today. It is truly one of the best.
This is a #1-- A++++ classic movie. I watch it as often as I can and share it with friends and when I have company over to visit.
A pivotal reflection of America as it came to power in the &#34;American Century&#34; directed by the greatest &#34;sound director&#34; in Hollywood.
This is a story that lets you know what it was like in the post war years with a great heart warming story.
my favorite movie of all time...have watched it over and over.  dvd in good shape, arrived promptly, reasonably priced.  well worth watching.
This is one of my husband and my favorite movies. We can watch it quite often and still love it!
Great review (of course - this is one of my all time favorite movies).  Super different story lines of veterans returning home, back to work, etc.
Great movie - my mom introduced this one to me a long time ago. Was waiting for the price to come down.  Thanks!
I think that this movie should be seen by everyone. The acting is fantastic and the storyline was so relivant to the postwar years.
This has to be one of my top 10 movies of all time. Great story and well thought out and acted characters. Cant say enough about this movie.
Outstanding movie. There is no need to say more other than the movie studios of today don't know how to make a classic anymore.
Outstanding movie of an era that the US will never see again and never feel again, and that is a great shame.
This is a hilarious movie. Rodney Dangerfield and Joe Pesci are a great comedy team. Taylor Negron is a hoot as son-in-lawJulio.
I enjoy this movie especially when on cloud space 9! LolIt's from the 80's and brings back many memories.
I enjoy all of his movies and this is a great one to get if you like him and his movies.
I loved this movie - growing up in early 80s Rodney Dangerfield was so funny. Love seeing a young Joe Pesci.
This is a classic English film.  Excellent acting, powerful performance, and great cinemotagraphy.
One of, if not the, best movies of Shakespeare ever presented.  A most professional undertaking, from start to finish. Thank you.
Branagh's Henry is a triumph. I found it to be more real and inspiring than Olivier's.
The best Shakespeare on film, ever. And a great film of any ilk. Don't miss it.
loved it and very happy we had purchased this sorry for not  sending out your review way before now hope it will still count for you
Candy man is a very good horror flick that no matter how many times you look at it it still frightens you.
This movie is scary and had me scared to look in the mirror and repeat the name.  Not only this one but the other parts are also good.
Gotta love Tony Todd and his creepy voice he is the perfect scary movie actor to give you chills, even if he's not bad looking.
really like the candy man movies they are really on point plus always beleive in supporting a hometown actor like tony todd
WHAT CAN I SAY ABOUT THE FOG  ONLY THAT JAMIE LEE CURTIS IS MY FAVORITE  SHE WAS GREAT IN HALLOWEEN1&2 AND THAT ILIKE MOVIES MSY.FOG BANKS
I has a lot of happings that make you jump. was very impressed with the blu ray picture was very sharp.
Just as I expected.  I enjoyed watching the original version as much as the newer version.  It was very nostalgic..
Such a classic. And it still holds out,  the remake of this was horrible, stick to the original movie for this one.
Love the movie and great service keep up the great work. Thanks watched it last night very good. Love the art workJohnny
Perfectly restored. Anyone would be happy to have this on there collectors or DVD shelf. Look out for the fog.
Love it! Watch it several times a year. Remake not near as good. A top 10 horror movie in my opinion.
The Fog widescreen special Edition was very good. you also get some special extrs. The remake was very bad. Don't see the remake.
I remember being disappointed it was not as good as holloween but now on blu I give it 5 stars, great transfer and up there with they live .
This is a really good movie, there is a new remake, but this original one i think it's way better.
It is my opinion that no classic horror fans collection is complete without this earthy ghosts tale.
great transfer  with many extras  sum are new for this edition.  if you love this film  buy it now .
This movie is one of those that you know will never win an Oscar, but you love to watch it anyway. It is like brand new, and the price was right.
adult entertainment at its best# can you imagine nowadays a scene like that with the full moon and the hard flesh??
Great movie and a very good transfer to blu ray, more of the same down the line please for fans
I love this! it looks better now. Than, when it first came out. I would reccomend buying it. do it.
I added it to my halloween collection. Something for the grandkids to see. Also for halloween. Thank You Mrs Gray
This is a terrific werewolf movie! It is worth buying because of all the extra features on the disc. Werewolves unite!
Good and scary!  A great one! Wonderful! Packed full! just great! Intensely entertaining! A great one! Wonderful! I would recommend this one!
It was a great movie that was a head of its time. It can be disturbing for some but it is a good horror movie.
I this is a very good psychological thriller.  I have not seen the remake but from what I have heard it is a lot different.
the orignal  restored thanks to the remake which is also good this is a classic must have for anyone who collects the grindhouse type films
Misery is a classic. Absolutely love this movie. Recieved this really quickly in the mail, very happy and satisfied customer.
this movie will keep you on the edge of your seat.It has a great story line and makes you wonder.
I love the book and the movie!  I am so happy I made this purchase1  Great cast that give a great performance!  :)
Excellent movie, I consider this one of the classics. Kathy Bates was so believable in her acting as was James Caan, two great actors.
This movie made me want to stalk Kathy Bates- she is excellent as Annie Wilkes.  A true to book telling of the classic Stephen King novel.
Such a good movie. One of my favorites. Looks amazing on bluray. The quality and sound are perfect. Highly recommend
I think this is my favourite movie from the master Stephen King, and the Kathy Bates performance is superb. Excellent Movie !
This is a classic scary movie that everyone should see at least once. It played like it was brand new and arrived before it's estimated arrival date.
I enjoyed the movie. To anyone wanting to order a movie, I would highly recommend it. I will be ordering again soon.
Loved this movie. It was well directed, acted, and written. Love Stephen King novels and the book was great. Watch
What can I say but this was a great DVD, what can I say Stephen King is just great, So glad we have this.
I saw, Misery a year ago and it was good. Then read, parts of the book interesting Kathy Bates did a good job. It's worth watching...
What can I say? WOW! This movie was GOOD! Loved it! This movie was filled with twist and shocking moments. One of the BEST THRILLERS EVER!!!!
This is a very good looking Blu-Ray along with being a very good movie. A good addition to your collection.
The DVD speaks for itself. This is one to add to my collection  Thanks for having it available .The Bud
I mean, what can I say. I'm sure this will go down in history as a classic. Great movie! Simply wonderful!
Very good movie i enjoyed all these movies when i was young and still enjoy even though i am older now.
hay amizon i like the forth fantasm then i did the third i thout it had alittle more action in it
Childhood classic horror movie and I had to share a piece of my childhood with my kids. I wanted them to see what scared me when I was they're age.
Any Phantasm movie is a classic film. If you like horror movies I highly suggest these series of movies.
This is the final chapter of the phantasm saga but this time it has an ending in the movie I hope you like it.
I still find this movie much creepier than many of the newer horror movies.  A classic, well worth watching.
This is a classic SciFi movie. It is a must have for anyone's collection. The film is not up to today's photography but it is still good.
Blowing heads and crazy performances from the always crazy Michael Ironside. What more do you nead in a Cronenberg horror flick? Instant classic!
This is a very good video, I love the film that was inspired by a true story. It held my interest and captured my attention.
Taken literally or metaphorically, this is a beautiful, moving and inspirational film with many lessons on life.
A great movie that will keep your attention. Fantastic story and scenery. Made in 1985 and still fighting to save the rain forest.
This movie was such a classic when I was growing up.  It was a good depiction of the amazon natives slowly losing their land and culture!
Kalifornia is one of my top 20 favorite all-time films, even though the X-files guy is weak as ususal.... everyone else is excellent.
Great movie. The entire cast is superb and Brad Pitt is truely convincing as the killer.
this is a fun movie to watch. it's one you can watch over and over. happy to add this to my collection!
I thought this movie would be corny, but it was actually really good quality for the year it was made.
I remeber me and my family going to see this movie and loving it and being wowed  by the movie.
I remember this movie from a long, long time a ago. I am glad I was able to find it through Amazon.
Please rerelease this great movie on DVD at a more affordable price so that humble people such as myself can afford it. Thanks!!!!!!!!!!!!!
If your kid likes Care Bears he/she will love this movie.  It's the original from the 80s with Mickey Rooney.  The Care Bears do teach good lessons.
Another oldie-but-goodie! My son is 4 and loves this show. All kids are different but he's also very easy to please
If you like care bears this is a great movie. It has a great introduction to the care bear cousins as well.
I have always loved this movie as a kid so bought it for my daughter n she loves it.came in great condition. Thanks.
this is one of a kind for the unique collector. worth watching to see what it is about.  never on tv anymore
A golden classic, transfer is good, quality is good!!I would recommend this to a friend, or enemy.Good ol' Jan in the Pan..lol
It's basically a 70's rip off of the 1950's sci fi classic "First Man Into Space".  Check that one out too!
This movie is a throwback. It's one of those it's so bad it's good movie. I mean all you have to do is look at the cover and see if it's for you.
GREAT MIDNIGHT MOVIE.. DEF WORTH GETTING FOR ONE OF THOSE BORING SAT NIGHTS WITH FRIENDS...
This movie is so funny and weird , not a lot of blood but just entertaining . The DVD is loaded with fun filled interviews and making of effects.
Don't let the title fool you. This is a great film. It's a fun film. You won't be disapointed.
this is great movie so weird and scary with some comedy it a keeper and  is really  really weird . its got to be  the best klown movie ever
This movie is a classic and I loved the cover of this so I had to buy it. It is very clear and works just like a bluray should.
got this for my husband, he had been wanting this movie. So happy we have it now. yes, it may be a corny movie but oh well.
this is a nice good fun film and look,s fab on bluray a good buy for a fun a night in front of the tv.
One of the best B movies ever made! Was so excited to see this movie come it on blu ray. No brainer. A must have.
I love these old sci-fi movies they are just fun with little gore.  There is always a little romance.  Even the special effects make it enjoyable.
I haven't seen this movie since i was little.  It brought back memories of my childhood.  Thanks Amazon.  I will defenitely order from you again.
Loved this sci-fi movie as there wasn't a dull moment at all. Very unusual and great acting. Loved it and wanted to buy it for a while.
1979, I was 9 yrs. old. The way this Blu-ray sounds FANTASTIC! The DTS quality sound is AMAZING! The picture is GREAT too!
I love these types of movies. Suspense, thriller, horror all rolled up into one feature. It was just plain awesome.
just like it says it is a horror good to watch with all lights out and surround sound
i chose this rating cause i love the movie and like horror show.  I like that came on time and yes i would recommend it
I bought this DVD for my wife & she really likes it.  Frankie & Annette at their best!
I love these old Beach Blanket movies, when morals where high. Great 60's flick. Good, clean fun, no dirty plots.
these is also a great movie, my whole family likes the beach party movies
Yes, it's kind of corny and kind of dumb, but don't let that bother you.  Just sit back and enjoy it. It is a fun movie.
i love this movie good movie for anyone who loves these kind of movies great beach scenes in it too
Same as the Beach Blanket Bingo / How to Stuff a Wild Bikini - They just don't make movies like these anymore
Got what i wanted, when i wanted it, and in the shape i wanted it in. thank you very much.
Another great Norris movie, not as good as the first. Though it is still a great movie and has some great action.
I had always love many gangster movies especially this.  Really enjoyed the movie and the book related to John Dillinger.
Wow this is a really great movie a must every for everyone. I really enjoyed this movie much better then I through it would be
This movie is a cult classic.  If you you like brutal fight oriented animation this is the movie that set the bar.
What a tastefully done movie.. Judd Law rocked out this performance! very well done and so RETRO! U GO BOY!
Just got it today. Great experience came in good condition. Love this movie. I cried like always. Very happy thank you
An amazing movie.  It is one of Gong Li and Zhang Yimou's greatest collaboration.  You must see it.
One of the best movies ever made. The humanity portrayed in this movie was touching and deep.  thank you for selling this movie.
IT IS A GOOD MOVIE ,YOU HAVE TO SEE.I WISH YOU LIKE IT
I dare anyone to find something to not like about this drama.  I-N-C-R-E-D-I-B-L-E !!!  100 out of 100 stars !
A very good movie.  I personally enjoyed it better than &quot;Raise The Red Lantern&quot;, and &quot;Scent of Green Papaya&quot;.
At the Detroit Institute of Arts.  I never forgot it.  Was always surprised Richard Gere was in it.  Brings what happened closer.
We saw this many years ago and enjoyed it once again. The submit button is not visible so you are expecting me to write more?
One of the more bizarre movies I've seen lately.  I loved it.  Give it a go.And come on; there's hardly any nudity.  Gimme a break.
I bought this offbeat movie because one it stars one of my favorite actors Lothaire Bluteau.  Very interesting and true story.
Anthony hall is great in this movie. Playing a all star champ at football. And goes pro for college football. A must watch film.
Truly enjoyed this movie! It was an excellent portrayal of one man's persistent belief in looking at the facts thoroughly.
Even better than the original. Awesome entertainment! Jack Lemon leads an all-star cast and they knock it out of the park with their performances.
This is a good movie about team dynamics.  Bullying is a subtle theme in this movie as well.  Good for teens as well as adults.
Great movie, great story, hard to think that only 12-actors in the same room can make for an interesting movie, but they pulled it off in this one.
Outstanding perfomances by all actors, especially Lemon and Scott. May be better than original.Don't miss it and go back and watch the original.
Rarely are remakes as good, or perhaps even better than the original.  This version of 12 Angry man is one of the few.
Saw this when it first came out!..It still one of the best that Sidney Poiter ever did!..And Richard Widmark was terrific along with Linda Darnel.
Every fan should have this or one of the other version in their library of movies.  Great fun, just like at the theater
The Star Wars Trilogy is a great addition to any DVD collection.
We have the Star Wars Trilogy and the Star Wars Prequil Trilogy and love them all.  We highly recommend them to all.
I loved Star Wars as a child. Now my kids are into it. I love watching it again! Yeah Star Wars
when it  saw it in the 70s fell in love with it. still have it on vhs tapes now I got it on cd and the movie is still great.
I have STARWARS Trilogy The LASERDISC Special Edition Remastered Boxset,And I bought the WS DVD Boxset too,One of my Favorite Movies :)
Just switched to the Blu Ray version From VHS.  Excellent Movie all around for the family. We enjoy it very much.
This was purchased for a Christmas gift.  The grandchildren just love theset and watch it over and over.
we enjoy all the movies as &#34;Star Wars Week&#34; we wtch themin succession, what a rush. Thanks for the opportunity to but such things
Star wars trilogy redone bluray sound an picture  tops what else cam i say if you are a fan you need these films
I love Star Wars and have it on other media.  This is good for the bedroom, trips, and the Living room since I only have Blue Ray in the Living room.
I was super excited when I heard they were finally coming to bluray. Too bad their not the original editions.
One word classic Star Wars can never be beating and alwYs something good to make me reminisce about the past
This is a great Star Wars boxed set!  We loved every minute of it. Star Wars is AWESOME!!!! High quality video.
I am not a big fan of Star Wars, but my husband is.  He was so glad to get the entire set of the Star Wars on DVD. He thinks they are awsome.
These movies are classic and a wonderful buy. So glad to have a great set of movies like these in my collection. Great buy.
He loves it and the price better than department stores!
Oh well, Star Wars again. You have to have it if you're a Star Wars fan. It's fundamental to have the complete saga
Can never get enough of this. Just wish it was in 3 D. I love the original 3. Cannot believe it has been so long
I have purchased several previously viewed VHS tapes in the past and this was the best of the lot.  All ran like brand new just made tpes.
These movies are awesome, and the HD quality makes them even more enjoyable.  You notice things you might never have without the added quality.
this just has to be in your collection its a classic my favorite trilogy and it may never be knocked from that spot
This LOOKS FANTASTIC on my Sony Bravia 40" 1080p LCD HDTV.  I use my PS3 to upconvert and I just couldn't be more pleased.
Blueray format is a must if you're looking to buy these films. Amazing quality, great packaging, and obviously epic movies.
This is a classic movie trilogy.  Quality is good.
This was where the love of writing sci fi came into being for me.  I just love that good vs. evil theme even in the future.  Great stuff.
I enjoyed watching all three classic films, and the prequals.This is hours of great entertainment for everyone.Get it!
These are good, fun movies. The DVD versions are a blast.  Get a life, you pathetic complainers.
I love the original trilogy of Star Wars. It is far better than episodes 1, 2, and 3. And far more memorable. These will be around forever.
Good movie, lots of action and adventure, some suspense and humor with a dash of special effects thrown in.  Good casting.
What can I say except love love love.  The story, the extras.  And Star Wars nut it's a must have.  Perfect as a gift idea.
When do added features effect a film's quality? NEVER! Get over it! 5 Stars please move on, get over it you freaks.
this is a classic, and everyone should own it. great fun to watch over and over. I highly recommend it.
ever since i got a blu ray player, i had to build my blu ray collection.  this is my favorite movie and had to get.
Of coarse this is Star Wars and in Blue Ray it's even better than before. Much more detail than I ever noticed.
A great classic! It could not be better! This is something you should have in your DVD collection! Excellent!
For anyone interested in sci-fi this is the series to own. Great scenery, action and story-line.
For fans, it's a movie that you must have. For those looking for a good science fiction film: It's amazing!
Well as a Star Wars Fan - that is of the original series (it is all what you know and grow up with) how could I not love this!
Only a few words, is the best of modern scifi cinema.
I received the Blue ray set in excellent condition.  The Colors are so vibrant, I love seeing the original movies on Blu-ray!Thank you.
These are the three 2-disc editions of the original trilogy put together in a box.  A nice buy for those who don't already own them, but little else.
Love the series and em so,happy to be able to watch the first three movies over and over.  Cherie is so cute.
This was a gift for our son, but the whole family LOVES Star Wars.  There couldn't be a better gift for Star Wars fans!
I received the item on time and in excellent condition.
GREAT Movie for a collector of Great movies and GREAT Acting. Something worth watching with others followed by a group discussion.
I think getting the box set is worth it.  We now have all 6 movies that we can watch when ever we wish.
The best sci-fi ever made. There is no other way of explaining it. THE BEST SCI-FI EVER MADE.
Bought as a gift for someone who has run their vch down and needed to upgrade. thanks for the great buy of a classic.
I have been a huge fan since 1977. I watch them over and over again
the best star wars trilogy is these right here. They are conveniantly packaged to take up less room. the films have great picture quality.
This set is an Awesome Deal !!  It was in good condition when I received it and my kids love it!
Great picture quality with the Blu-ray; and very versatile with DVD for use in regular DVD players! Combo package is a nice idea!
Not shelling out two Benjamins and more for this, no matter how much I loved it.  Put a more realistic price tag on this and then I will.
I would definitely recommend viewing this movie in Blue Ray - it is awesome! You won't regret this purchase in my opinion.
These DVDs were replacements of the videos I had.  Got a good deal on them.  I am a fan!  Right, Jar Jar Binks?
The quality of the Blu Ray is awesome and the movie it's self well its star wars it's epic all together.
To quote Yoda, &#34;Do or do not. There is no try.&#34; Either you watch this series, or you will end up like Alderaan.
it is star wars, need i say more? the dvd is awesome.  All 3 of the real star wars movies.
This is a box set of the three good movies before the prequels came along and ruined the franchise. Many new scenes and updated CGI.
Very good, The special effects were great and to have all in one episodes is a great idea. Not bad!
Always entertaining to watch!
BEST WAY TO WATCH STAR WARS BACK TO BACK ADVENTURE, HAVING ALL THREE MOVIES IN ONE CASE IS A GREAT IDEA.
These are my favourt films since I was a kid. I'll all ways enjoy Star Wars no matter what.
These are better than the DVD. The picture is better and so is the sound. I enjoyed watching these. If you like Star wars a must for any collection.
In my opinion, the Return Of The Jedi, where Darth Vader fights Luke Skywalker is the best one, but all 3 of them are pretty neat.
Enjoyed it very much.  Brings you to the end and gives you the understanding of the Jedi and the destiny for the empire.
I love the movies and these were 4 DVDs in one set, in good shape at a reasonable price! I did not care for the prequels Star Wars 1, 2 & 3.
I was one of the 1000 - one star reviews based on missleading information. I was wrong, I purchased these movies any way and they are awesome.
Although I was not alive when these movies originally came out I always enjoy watching them.  They are fantastic science-fiction movies.
Its nice to have the original trilogy in high definition and wide screen.  We have this on VHS tape.  Blu-Ray is soooo much nicer.
What the greatest movies ever don't diserve a dvd! What gives! Back to the Future is out, so when will this be out!
Had to have the classic Star Wars trilogy. Bought more for sentimental reasons than any other. Great classic movies. A must see.
this has all the makings of an ancient japanese tale of revenge, spirituality and good versus evil. a fine retelling of feudal japan's mythos.
i just love starwars, what can i say?  if you liek the series this is a great buy, if not, then don't buy it.  simple and plain.
great sunday movie and a good story .abot 3 girls looking for love in rome .brian
Loved this, the actors, the scenery, and the story line. Happy I ordered this DVD!!!. Buy it, you will enjoy it.
Enjoyed watching this old movie; now that I have it, will watch it more often.  Beautiful Italian scenery you'll really enjoy.
Excellent movie, excellent for its time and genre.  The disc came to me in good condition.  I recommend this one.
What can I say about this great movie.  It's great!!  Clifton Webb is excellent as well as Audrey Hepburn.  Clifton Webb fans will love it!!!
Wonderful love story. And so many stories within the story. The cast is great! I have always loved Louis Jourdan!
keep us in supply of the treasured old classic movies.  your prices are affordable that is why we keep coming back. jc
I love this era in movies, wonderful views of Rome. Love is in the air. Nice to see over and over agaiin
If you like old time romance movies - this is great.  Also super scenery of Rome.
Features a young Rosanno Brazzi who is one of my favorite actors. A must have for all of you romantics
This is a golden movie and set in Rome, I loved it so many years ago and love it even more now.
How can you not love this classic? Of course,  it is predictable, we know the story, yada, yada. But I love it every time I watch it.
A Wonderful Classic Movie. A movie I love to watch many times. I would definitely buy this movie again.
Very good copy for an old movie. ENJOYED IN THE MOVIES AND NOW THE DVD.GOOD ACTING.WILL RECOMMEND MTO MY FRIENDS
I love the popularity of this movie as far as the book is concerned and love all the actors as well glad it's in my movie collection :)
Good movie. Has everything in it . Love, wealth, fame, tears, sadness and something nobody should ever do.....Drugs !  A sad lesson to learn.Barbara
This is a classic movie great cast. Barbara Parkins, Patty Duke, Sharon Tate, And Barbra Streisand play excellent rolls in this movie.
Patty Duke was made for this movieAnd every one ease was great too.This is a wonderful movie just wonderful
Not a fan of show tunes, but the music from this classic movie is timeless.
i bought this movie for my daughter.  she read the book and loved and wanted to watch the move.  she was very pleased.
This is a must have for any classic movie buff.  It brought back a lot of memories of my early teen aged years.  I'm glad it's out on DVD.
dolls means pills btw i didnt know that before i need 7 more words ew. uhm i like grass. bye
This is a really good movie. I would recommend this to any adult, with any taste. Worth watch over and over again.
This shows what Hollywood can do to people who get famous. It is really sad. Shows that all the fame and money can't make you happy.
a look at the cutthroat world of entertainment and how people manage to cope with their successes and failures very intriguing
The whole family liked this movie.  It was suspensful and on the edge of your seat. Many good actors are in it.
Adults only here. But, this will leave you hanging on the edge of your seat. As usual, Hopkins in at his very best. The acting is supurb.
The Edge&#62;It was an excellent movie. I already loaned it to a friend. I'm still talking about it. Great cast of characters!
I just have to watch this movie once a year. Like Alaska video and the bear. Good cast and reasonable script.
Awesome movie. Sir Anthony Hopkins is an awesome actor. Very adventurous movie.
i just have to say this this is a very inspiring movie. i have always liked it from beginning to end
Best service and the movie is great.  I look forward to using these people again. They are on the ball.
I found The Edge a riviting, colorful, and delightfully frighting movie.  I would recommend it to brave viewers. The scenery is in a class by itself.
Great movie that everyone needs to see.  Also this company sent the movie fast without any problems thur Amazon.
This is a great movie. I loved it when I seen it at the movies and glad to have it in my movie collection.
This is one of the best movies that I have ever watched!  I have watched it many times and would highly recommend it!
If you like Action --- Wilderness Adventure...Great actors, its A must have for our collection.
We just bought an EDGE from FOED. But we love Alex and Anthony. They are great actors. They should make more movies together.
Nice to see Lecter in a somewhat different role but still very good Alaska bear and mountains.  Good film if you like the mountains.Forrest
Hopkins is great as usual and Baldwin is at his smarmy best. the scenery is spectacular and a good story to boot. Watch it, you will enjoy it.
This is a Very good movie. Great performances by Hopkins and Baldwin. Keeps you on the edge of your seat
One of the best movies! Ya can't beat an Anthony Hopkins movie. And Alec Baldwin is really good, too. Highly recommend.
This is the best movie I've seen in a long time!!! It's a seat on &#34;the edge&#34; of your seat movie ... No pun intended :)
One of my all time favorite movies.  I can watch this over and over again.  This is a must see.
I enjoy this interpretation of Miller's drama. My students enjoy this video and look forward to watching it. The ending is particularly moving.
This Arthur Miller play was kept very close to the original. The acting was great! Set was very unusual and true to the time period.
A movie that will keep you interested. One of those that you can watch a couple times and not be bored. Excellent acting from everyone.
The acting is incredible.  Varies slightly from the play, but overall solid.  Miller blessed it so it's close to right on the money.
An emotional, well acted and directed film, based in reality.  Oh, the horror of living during puritanical times, unless you're male puritan.
in this film adaptation of arthur millers classic tale the crucible comes to life and with a great cast the film is a classic
I loved this movie.  The plot is very believable...the acting is good....and the story is well told.  I loved it!
Full of intrigue & interesting character played by Julia Ormond. Gabriel Burne is an all-time favorite of mine. The movie follows the book so well.
Nice romantic comedy I had watched it before so it was kind of cool to watch it again ... Really enjoy it!
I love movies that have a happy ending, and this one is one of them. Love is better than power. Benny
Great chick flick!  The ending is always the important thing for me and well... I'm a romantic and it ended great.  I'd have others watch it.
I've seen this movie in the past. I like it. It light and cheery and a cute story. I would highly recommend it to anyone that loves a romance.
We like Jennifer and all of her movies.  Great price and movie, get one for yourself you will love it.
Always loved this movie, it is light hearted and funny. Just shows she really didn't know what she wanted till she lost it.
You will like this movie. When has she not been good. She loves what she does and it shows. Got to lover her.
Good Romantic Comedy.
Such a great movie classic!  Everyone should see it at least once.  Tommy Lee Jones is wonderful in this movie.
Very good movie.  Love Tommy Lee Jones and Anne Heche together.  Good quality, good price, great entertainment. Always get my DVD's from Amazon
What else can I say? It has Tommy Lee Jones in it, LA is on fire and I used to shop there.Get out the pop corn and enjoy.
I love Tommy Lee Jones.A great volcano movie,with tons of action.A deffinet keeper.
I love this movie. It is full of action and what if.What if this happened. What would we do, how would we react?
it's so funny to think about a volcano in cal,but hay you never know anything is possiable  in this day in age
tommy lee jones is awesome.. the picture has lots of action with a touch of romance. i'd recommend this to anyone to see or buy
I have seen this movie more than once.Everyone in my family likes this movie.It keeps you watching.
Fun and entertaining to watch. I love disaster movies, this one was really cool, enjoy it, I have this on DVD now, not VHS anymore.
I love this movie but lost it to a fire, and I had to get it again.  Its a really good movie!
i enjoyed this movie so much that i bought two more for friends and the quility is great .and will be oredering again in future.
LOVE, LOVE, LOVE this movie.  It arrived promptly, was in very good condition.  All you need is a comfy chair and a bowl of popcorn!
Thoroughly, enjoyed this Movie, of course I think Ms Close is a wonderful actress, most anything she does is so enjoyable, including this one!!
Wonderful movie, with a great cast. I liked Pauline Collins especially. She is a great actor, and has such a pretty smile, and her eyes sparkle.
This show was the x-files, supernatural, Breakout Kings mixed, great show, awesome deal, well worth it for a follower of the show.
Only reason I saw this film was for Michael Sutton. He plays the character named Steve.Very good movie!
This is a good movie.  I have always liked it.  I would recommend it to anyone who likes movies like this.
I bought this because of Liv Tyler and Jennifer Connelly, and ended up liking the movie more than I thought I would.
Fast shipping, good pricing and a great movie.  One will not be disappointed with this movie.  Watch it about every 4 months and always enjoy it.
Great casting and script Worth renting and then consider owning a copy!!. A period film from my youth Ah what memories!
Not sure why 20 more words are required....  don't remember receiving an email for this at any point.  But I have it, it works and I love the movie.
Now I have both the Speed movies. Couldn`t find it anywhere else but on Amazon.com. Really like Sandra Bullock. Yeah!
Great movie! A movie I remember seeing in the movie theaters! I like these actors very much and these types of stories are intriguing to me!
Older great movie! Delivered quickly and in great condition. The movie was a done well and Sandra Bullock did a great job.
The item arrived in great co anndition and lit arrved very quickly and it is a great movie and i loved the actors.
This is a masterpiece of semi film noir. Tha acting is superb, and you will be guessing and wondering throughout. A real treat!
This is a very funny movie an a great price for it to. if you like mel brooks you will like this movie.
Not a well known Mel Brooks movie, but funny as H###. Dom Delouise had me holding my sides. If you are a Mel Brooks fan this is a must!Doc
It was a gift for a friend and she loved it.  Mel Brooks movies age well and this one especially.
two words captures the genius, the liveliness, the artfulness of this zany show . watch and laugh and marvel at the talent included.
I just love this movie!  I can't stop watching it!  A great cast of actors with Montgomery Clift, Frank Sinatra, Burt Lancaster and Donna Reed.
A powerful story of the military on Oahu in the days leading up to the attack at Pearl Harbor. A stellar cast give great performances.
My husband loves movies about World War Two and he really enjoyed this one. Great actors and great acting. I would recommend this movie to anyone.
Classic movie & should be added to any classic DVD collection
I purchased this DVD for my mom because she loves her old movies.  She has really enjoyed watching it over and over again.
Enjoyable classic to watch in Black and White.  The Scenes of earlly Hawaii were great and the cast and storyline were award winning.
You can't get much better than this.  Burt Lancaster, Frank Sinatra, the war as a background.  Wonderful acting.  Great story line.
Burt Lancaster and Deborah Carr and Montgomery Clift and Frank Sinatra,must I say more. Great story all the way, One of the best films ever made.
A True American Classic. A variety of human emotions through the eyes of a Military installation. Love, jealousy and hatered etc.
I consider it a classic, and one that still is moving to watch. I enjoyed it years ago, and enjoyed seeing it again.
Excellent classic all the way through!!  Got to have in your DVD collection. Loved the war time period and the action in the movie.
Received quickly and in great shape really enjoyed it. Thanks againif we take the time to review then you shouldent tell us how many words to use!
This is one of those classics that never get old..And the blueray just looks so good, it's like watching it for the very first time..Bravo!
Timeless classic. I love the timeless feel and the actors and fact that Mr Cliffe is in this classic doesn't hurt.
What a classic, gave to grandson (23 ) for Christmas and he loved it.  I never miss the reruns on TV. viviencuneo
This is a fun flick for those who love Peter Falk. Slapstick comedy was never better this movie. It came in a timely  manner and packed very well.
I thought I could watch while I cookedI had to sit down I laughed so hardFalk is so funny!
Peter Falk is a great actor and I have more than a few of his movies. The movie is hilarious.
One of the funniest things I have ever seen!  My family has been quoting this movie for 25 years! Always a favorite.
The detective spoof to end all spoofs.  The entire cast works with tongues firmly planted in cheeks.  A must for old movie lovers.
It's a fun movie and has some great characters played by good actors.  It provides entertainment at a decent price.
A great cast and Peter Falk seems as relaxed in it as he does in just about all of his parts.
One of the most hilarious movies ever made -- Peter Falk is magnificent.
This Is One Of Those Movies That you have to see a second, third, and fourth time. funny and fun.
A beautiful film, with nice work by a great acting ensemble. Morgan Freeman breaks your heart and Denzel desserves every ounce of that Oscar!
Excellent story. Plenty of action. Very realistic special effects. Gives an excellent accurate account of how the war was fought.
This is one of my favorites. I'm glad it was selected for 4k viewing. Keep more 4k movies coming but be more selective on titles.
Great film on the American Civil War. Well acted (especially Matthew Broderick and Morgan Freeman), great story etc. Recomended
One of the best movies ever made.  Good enough to overcome Matthew Broderick as the main character even!
I saw this movie in my 8th grade history class just a couple of days ago and I loved it.  One of the most touching yet exciting movies you can see.
I have watched this movie many times and it never loses its testimony to the goodness and the evil in humanity.
The movie "Glory' is one of the best movies ever made.  It is exciting, uplifting, historically true and the acting is exceptional.
Great movie with a really good cast to help tell the story of the U.S. Army's first black regiment.
The item came on time and was just as described and worth the requiring for my good size history movie collection.
4K mastered Blu Ray did justice to this Civil War epic. The bravery of the men during this difficult time shined with the 4K treatment.
I purchased this DVD as gift for someone.  The DVD arrived quickly and was in excellent condition.  It has been viewed three times already
love it love it.  This movie is a true classic. One of my go to movies of all times.  Highly recommend purchasing it.
This is a great movie!  Incredible acting, an amazing cast, it's a classic! Worth your time, rent it/buy it today!
The film was exceptional. Great picture and sound quality. Movie was as good as I originally saw it in the movie house. Great performances too.
AFTER WATCHING THIS MOVIE I WANTED TO LEARN MORE ABOUT OUR COUNTRY'S HISTORY. THIS IS A VERY REALISTIC AND EMOTIONAL MOVIE. BUT, IT IS ACCURATE.
Beautiful movie.  Soul stirring.  Powerful.  Emotional.  I love this movie, and the music.  I am so happy I bought this movie.
One of the best movies of all time. A must see. Action, drama, and an emotionally touching hero story. You must put this on your must see list.
This movie is terrific, the battle scenes were wonderful, and i enjoy watching it a lot, totally satisfied i amm
Great cast. Great movie.
Great quality for a great movie.  You can't ask for any more than this.
i saw the movie on tv and i had to have it because it was so good. it didn't cost to much to gt it
I have always like this movie, and could watch it over and over. And excellent movie!! This is a great movie to add to you collection.
Gog wholesom family movie and would recommend viewing for the whole family. The rating should be GP, if not rated as such.
I have watched this movie numerous times! The scene where the 54th leads the initial charge on the fort always brings tears to my eyes.
The only gripe... no extras.  Still a five star review because the film is just so GOOD!
You cannot go wrong if you like action and justice served.  I fell for this movie the first time I saw it.
Been a Long time since I've seen this one, glad to have a copy!
Great movie with lots of great action. Rutger Hauer best movies. If you are looking for a movie to buy, you got the right one.
He was perfect for this part and then to have Sh Kosugi as the hired gun at the end......that's right!!!!
if you have not seen this film and are looking for a good time with some good comedy and great cast get this film!
Found this one night as a odd ball movie but turned out to be one of the funniest pictures I have seen.
Saw the last 40 minutes of this movie and i loved it.Rated R for some sexual content,brief nudity,and some strong violence.
up there with the whole nine yards. jealous wives , nice pizzaan husbands, and a hitman. who could do better.
What a bunch of crazies - the actors look like they are having a great time playing this and I thoroughly enjoyed the tale
I happened to see this movie in the middle of the night one night when I couldn't sleep and thought it was hilarious.  I'm glad I found it on Amazon
I know this movie is goofy but it makes me laugh.  Kevin Kline is one of my favorite actors and I think he's funny in this one.
It was great condition and got it on a timely fashion. I am so glad to find this movie. Thank You.
I rented this movie from a movie store!! I loved it so much that I needed to own it!!! I love molly ringwald!!!=+D
It played on my Laptop well.  I like the picture and sound quality.  I would recommend this product to anyone who likes this movie.
Huge Molly Ringwald fan!!!  So when I saw this movie, I had to have it!!!  Very pleased with this purchase!!!
It is a good movie to watch it puts a smile on my face every time I watch it .
A very good story of a teacher consumed in this profession. I can only wish that all of our teachers have a great interest in their students as well.
Loved it - enjoy Sidney's movies and it brought back a lot of good memories of my teenage years and will watch it many times, I'm sure.
i grave it to a friend and she told me that she really love it very much. tell other about it.
The DVD arrived in excellent condition and in a timely fashion.  I was very happy with the transaction.
A must have DVD for movie viewers and collectors. I purchased this movie for two family members and they were very happy to get this one.
This movie is classic and wonderfully acted. One of my favorite Sidney Poitier movies and Ruby Dee...need I say more.
The mistakes we make affect all those around us and in those mistakes we still have the one powerful gift to restore things. LOVE.
kinda like the grapes of wrath but with a happier ending. before everyone had air conditioning and a jaccuzi tub!
I especially love this movie for the performances of Claudia McNeil and Ruby Dee.
I heard about it on a news story and bought it since I had never seen it.  A stellar performance by entire cast.  A truly human drama.
A wonderful story and heartfelt acting.  Poiter is best in class when it comes to intense and character driven portrayals.
I show pieces of this one to compare to the modern version with Sean Combs.  How could I not show a version with Sydney Poitier in it.
No matter how many times I see this movie, I can always watch it again. This one is from back in the day when one had to have REAL talent to act.
This was a great movie about a great man.  Well acted, it might have been a bit long but still worth watching.
Excellent film with great performance, as always, by Kingsley. The dvd extras are very good and illuminating.  Highly recommend.
This is also an excellent movie,and when I saw it on blu-ray I,knew that I wanted it,and enjoyed it more.
Ben Kingsley brought Gandhi back to life in this wonderful production and brought back memories of his tragic end. A stunning movie.
Great movie and even better in Blu-ray.  Would recommend to anyone.  One of those movies that you watch over and over.
A classic movie about a peaceful and beautiful man. This is a must-see for its historical significance. My wife was amazed by his kindness.
Sir Ben Kingsley is a very versatile actor and it's no wonder that he was awarded with an Oscar for his work.
Saw it in the theatre and enjoyed it again at home.  A classic not to be missed.  Great acting and photography.
Gandhi is a great classic. I have watched it several times and realized I needed it for my collections. Great quality and fair price.
One of the best movies I ever saw!  Great performances by all. An asset to anyone's film collection. Amazing story.
I never knew much of the history of Gandhi who I found to be by turn by brilliant and unorthodox. Clearly a man of passion who made a difference.
GANDHI is by far the most inspiring movie I have ever seen. It will move you and change your opinion of the world.
I would recomend this to anyone who enjoys a good adventure story about Medieval England .Good story line ,well cast.
Decent show.  It was a little slow in parts but overall u i found it to be interesting and good
The DVD arrived earlier than expected.  I was very satisfied with the quality, and enjoyed the movie very much.  Thanks!
I love this epic movie. great actors, scenery, and full of action. I watch it over and over. How can you not like it!
This movie is a rare find from television. I saw it once on tv and didnt see it again until I saw this dvd available.
Dustin Hoffman, Justine Henry, Merryl Street are great in this movie
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1979. Had to add it to my collection.
Very fast delivery.  Blu-ray in excellent shape.  Excellent seller.  Will do business again.
A lovely and sweet movie that can make you cry.  I would recommend it to anyone.
Kramer vs. Kramer, what a GRRR-8 story.  Love Dustin Hoffman and Meryl Streep.  Love seeing their emotions on both side of the divorce.
This movie won so many AA and it is well deserved. Good plot, excellent acting. How could you not like Hoffman in one of his best roles.
Saw it years ago when it first came out. Enjoyed it just as much recently. It did not seem dated at all. Cast was perfect. Loved it!
I had this on DVD but on Blu-ray it is exceptional. A great performance by all involved especially Dustin Hoffman.
Dr Strangelove without the humor. A dark Cold War Epic from the '60s' in the vein of 'The Enemy Below'.
Love this movie I would recommend this movie to anyone ....got it quickly and in great shape its everything I expected
A little over the top in some scenes but overall a great picture. Widmark and Poitier are great as adversaries
good movie now  ,,, then,,,,  still great movie!!!!  :)
The acting of the characters portrayed in the movie were top notch and the ending was a big surprise.  Wonderful.
don't miss this Movie,'tis a very great Movie,I have it on dvd,a well done work :)
How could anyone not love this movie?  A great Father/ son movie to watch together for a fun filled bonding experience.  .
Very good movie. One of my favorites...kind of like &#34;one flew over the CooCoo's nest&#34; soft of movie. Leaves you feeling good at the end. :)
You have to love Robin Williams in this. Jeff is great too. But Robin is the man! Get it now!
Here is another Williams performance that is wonderful.  Jeff Bridges does a great job also and the pair make a wonderful movie. Interesting plot.
I have St.Elmo's Fire ON LASERDISC And on DVD too,'tis a great Movie :)
This goes on my list of 80's greats such as The Goonies, The Lost Boys, The Breakfast Club, 16 Candles etc etc
This is a great DVD great picture and sound, just as described brand new will recommend to anyone. Great purchase
St. Elmo's FireIt was fun to watch this movie again.  Makes a great gift.  Low price.  Arrived quickly and just as described.
what can be said about a classic movie that you can watch over and over again and never get bored
Great Eighties movie!~ I wanted to share some classics 80's movies with my daughter. The brat pack is great in this movie!~
Old school but good school baby! This show is killer everybody in this movie is spot on! Everybody should have this dvd in your collection!
The buyer got this item to me ahead of time and as advertised.  I liked the movie and wanted to have the bar scene and the sax playing.
rob carries away the most in george town efforts  will he to buddy holly story next?  andrew is like the closset frien I got. thanks for being there!
St. Elmo's Fire captured the drama, humour and emotion of the 80's. The Brat pack was wonderful. A great way to capture the period.
After all these years I still love this movie! I adore the "Brat Pack" movies anyway.
besides Mclintock this is one of the funniest movie westerns ever i own Mclintock as well both actors in this movie were great
attention to detail he Sidney Poitier did his homework and really this cast puts on top of the acting A+
Seen this movie several times.  But a member of the household had never seen the show.  This movie is a classic.
What a good old fashion clean western. A classic. Must see movie. A five star classic with excellent actors. Worth the price
I love this movie also it lets you know racist people were back then and teaches you how to cope with those experiences.
This is an awesome movie. Its funny and keeps your interest. My DVD player refused to play it, but it worked great on the X-Box......
Fun, fun, fun story and Actors! Exactly what I was looking for! A very Positive purchase, well packaged and good price - would buy from, again!
Claudette and Clark really do make an awesome duo in this classic film. I absolutely adored it! Good to watch multiple times. =)
I saw this in a class I was taking on film and absolutely loved it! It's a cute movie for anyone who likes romantic comedies.
In modern times with the foul language and unbelievable plots this flick is fun to watch even thought you know the ending corny.
This is quite funny and very entertaining.  Clark Gable is at his best and Miss Colbert is awesome in the roll she plays.  Very enjoyable movie.
THE FILM IS STILL FRESH AND FUNNY EVEN AFTER ALL THESE YEARS. A DELIGHTFUL FILM FOR ALL!
2 of the classic actors enjoy it and love it recommend it  would like to have it in color .
An all time great flick!  Other movies have copied this iconic film. A movie must for a  Hollywood classic collection.
My sister and her husband requested this movie...thanx for delivering it in a timely manner...
The classics are classic for a reason...beef up your movie knowledge with this DVD.  Clark Gable in all his original glory.
Brand new CD for a very old story.  Perfect.  Price can't be beat and have enjoyed watching it several times.
My favored movie.  It happened one night could happen to everyone exactly the same way as the movie goes.  The movie said it for itself.
Replaced a VHS copy with the DVD for my collection of classic movies.  A real classic romantic comedy for all ages.
I have worn this movie out watching it .... will always consider it among my other classic movies .... Alan
it was a good one he is funny and the movie was a  good comedy action always love watching Robert Blake
This is a great story whether in book or video format.Whackado though he was...Capote hit a home run w/ this.
Great Copy and still watch it. Film looks as good as it did when it was released so many years ago.
Another &#34;must have&#34; for me that I previously had only in VHS.  Award-winning performances all around.  Robert Blake is outstanding.
Based on Truman Capote's masterpiece of a book by the same name.Bone chilling. Nightmare-inducing.
Received as ordered - was happy with this process and will continue to visit this site if my one concern is addressed
A very good movie and enjoyable to watch.  This is a refreshing movie andlove to watch the old movies due to subject matter and moral values.
very good purchase and I recieved it in a timely manner, great company. Excellant movie.
Have always loved this movie.  So many wonderful actors.  Really nice story with nice message.  Definitely recommend for old movie lovers!
I love it I cant wait to watch it It has a lot of truth about people looking down on others as lower etc.
One of my favorite movies.  Just fun movie with a good message.  I love how many actors there were that reunited again for Its A Wonderful Life.
Don't leave your inner chid behind when you grow up. Seems like the house of misfit toys has all the answers.
Sturdy, durable--like all Body Solid products (we also have their slant bench); helps me get the best support during free weight workouts.
Great cast, good story and great acting. Some of their lines were very funny and still relevant today. This one should be a must see.
Similar actors from Wonderful Life.  Jimmy Stewart is brilliant as usual.  Feel good movie.  Fun for the whole family. Well worth the watch
I have been watching Jean Arthur movies and think she is so cute.  Also, I love Jimmy Stewart movies too.
Light hearted yet in-depth comedic look at family and community life, and the rights to express ones' self. Highly recommended.
What a fine old movie. We enjoy this for its insight and life lesson. I recommend it to anyone who likes old movies...The actors are top notch.
Whether movie or play, I love &#34;You Can't Take It With You!&#34;  This is actually the first time I have seen this version, but it was perfect!
This is a timeless classic with an all star cast, directed by Frank Capra.If you like hokey feel good movies,this one tops the charts!
Amazing movie we watched a lot when I was a kid, still makes a great Christmas gift for people of all ages.
A good wholesome movie so glad I could add it to my library.  Families will love to watch this movie
Sir Richard Harris is overly loud, but probably historically accurate. Sir Alec Guinness owns the role of King Charles I. Best actor ever.
i  saw this many tears ago.  this was a good copy. i enjoyed it verty much.  thank yiou very much.
movie. Suggest all see it. I spent a long time trying to find this.You should get it to. You'll love it.
Excellent quality that arrived earlier than expected. Also it is one of Richard Harris' best performances.
I am a big Denzel fan ,i am starting to collect his movies,This is one of my favorites
I am a HUGE John Mellencamp fan.  This is a GREAT movie.  If you are a fan do not pass this one up.
If you own tender mercies you should have this movie.It is what I would call Americanna style of movies.Along the lin e of tender mercies.
jersey girl is a classic.  it is funny and cute and you can relate to it for someone trying to improve themselves
I really enjoyed this movie.  It is basically a tale about wanting to be someone else until you realize who you are is good enough already.
I love this movie. She wants to meet Mr Right. Shes from the Bronx and goes looking in the city except to find out....  big city is too.
Another must have movie . Funny and romantic . Great cast, great story . Got this on VHS but so glad I got it on DVD now .
Great romance movie.  Very heart warming .  I would recommed this movie for those who are really into romance movies.
Always love seeing Randolp Scott. I did not like the lady playing opposite him in this one. Maybe too proper
I really enjoyed this movie was most entertaining. The plot was great and Brian Keith was again one of my favorite actors.
I really like this movie. It's one of those movies you watch on a calm sunday morning and it has Jennifer Grey in it!
I could almost smell the ocean and feel the sun and wind on my face. I love this movie. It arrived in great condition and quickly as well.
As these 3 boys that had a heart throb for Monroe they prosu finding her as older men. And only one scores at geting a date. A must watch.
Hero is one of my favorite movies.  Dustin Hoffman can play any part and never disappoint! This movie is a total amazement is so many ways.  Perfect!
I liked the movie when it first came out and it is still a good one to watch. A timeless story with great actors.
I accidentally ordered a zone 2 or district 2 when I only watch zone 1.  The company was very helpful to resolve this problem for me.
East meets west with  a great cast.  Chow Yin-Fat is actually very good in this movie.  I highly recommend it.
A good plot - good acting and the good guys and gals win.  Who could ask for more.  You will be glad that you brought it.
This is one of my favorite movies of all time.  Sorvino is smokin' HOT.  Chow is great as an action star.  Good story, tells a moral.
This is a good older movie, glad to have it on DVD so we can watch it again.  Great prices on the movies.
This movie made me laugh so hard my sides hurt Iwould let the grand kids see this movie anytime they wanted
THIS IS THE BEST MOVIE!!! I love it so much!! Everyone should watch it! The acting is great, the lines are great, the movie is great!
I enjoyed watching it.
While I can't say I'm a huge fan of any of the major characters, in this movie they act superbly together. I highly recommend this film.
The quality and sound of this movie was great. I love the acting of Jack Nickerson...You can't handle the Truth....Thank you again.Christopher
This is one of my very favorite movies. The Acting is so well done. You wont be sorry I know that!
This movie puts a better spin on what is actually required for freedom - and that is courage, WITHOUT a gun in your hand.
Classic movie need I say more....well I must because this review says I must but all I can say is this is a great film a must buy!
This is a great movie.It has everything you need:Good actorsGood plotGood storyGo for it, you will love the movie!
Always a great story that would interest all ages--except for some salty language.  Interesting to see the internal workings of the military minds.
Blu-Ray In Excellent Shape.  Very Fast Delivery.  Will Do Business Again With This Seller.
Fantastic film.  Everybody in the cast did a stellar job. Love watching Jack Nicholson get a kick in his behind.
I learned alot about the Military and about legal issues. The movie is fiction, but it is good to explore the ideas presented to the viewers
Love this movie, so happy to get it on bluray!  Thanks for the opportunity.  Six more words required for this review lol.
Hey, I'm a Vet and so is my Husband. We love this movie. I think all the actors were great.
love this movie.Jack Nicholson rocks this film!!!a fabulous cast. this was a great film from the 80's. watch it
Excellent acting, suspenseful movie and good plot until the very end. Certain scenes will remain vivid in your mind for a long time.
This is a great movie and I really like it - It is for adults though. I was pleased with my purchase!
Great acting. The blu.ray is beautifully transferred. The movie is smartly made and Nicholson is brilliant.
A Great Tom Cruise Movie , and A Great find here.
I always watch this movie when its on. This I feel is one of the best that Tom Cruise has done. Jack Nicholson did a great job in this movie.
I am attracted to courtroom movies, and this one is a really good one.  Tom Cruise and Jack Nicholson are great.
My boyfriend quotes this movie all the time...and now i know why...its hysterical. One of those filled with good quotes and laughter all around..
Lots of great one liners in this comedy. Good one to curl up and watch on date night...way better than traveling pants! :-)
Really enjoyed this light hearted comedy. I would highly recommend this movies if you are looking for a little comedy!
Very good acting - full of action and surprises, especially the ending.  It was easy to become engrossed in with so much excitement!
This movie is clean wholesome fun, recommend it for everyone.  I have watched this movie more than one over the course of two years....
This movie had me laughing a lot. My boyfriend recommended it to me and we watch it together. Loved it, would recommend it to a friend! :)
this a fun movie even though it might sometimes be hard to watch out of being a vegatrain and seeing that butcher shop but i am a fan of mike myers
TOO FUNNY! GREAT ROMANTIC COMEDY, FUN TO WATCH ON DATE NIGHT!! I HAVE SEEN SEVERAL TIMES, AND ALWAYS GET A LAUGH!!
People should see this movie, it is so cute and funny. Before Austin Powers, Mike Myers was doing multiple characters in this movie. A must see.
This movie is a classic. Great comedy, great actors, just cheesy enough to be endearing. It definitely warrants multiple views. You won't regret it.
Need I say more? Classic MM comedy. There is just not enough of this kind of humor. Not filthy, a bit suggestive and just plain entertaining.
It is a good family movie for people of all ages.  Mike Myers is one of my favorites, very entertaining.
This is a very funny movie. I enjoy his poems most of all. This is a must see and have movie.
I have always loved this movie. Mike Myers is so funny in this. This is a classic at my house.
A very good Stallone movie with a lot of exciting parts, great mountain scenes and great story line....a good movie
This is a great movie, one I can enjoy more now that surround sound and large TV's are around. An oldie but a Goodie :)
I'm watching this movie right now and I had to pause it just so I could write this review this is a another great movie well back to the movie
I saw this movie on AMC and I love it!  I ordered the collectors edition, and it arrived in great condition!
love this movie.had it in VHS-my VCR doesnt work anymore.all I have is a DVD player now-getting favorite movies in DVD.THank-you
this was a intense movie from start to finish. Great action it is definitely a movie worth watching great movie.
Non stop action movie.  Definitely a must watch.  On High-definition, it is almost a roller coaster ride.  The scenery is amazing!!!
This was a gift. The recipient enjoyed this film, it is one of their favorites. Fast shipping and item was just as described
This was a great weekend movie when u have the frist and second one's towatch,funny and had a great time laughing.
If you bought Weekend at Bernie's I you need to buy this one too. Very funny! I recommend this movie.
I love it, and I like more than Weekend at Bernie's (I); it is very funny and hilarious I love the music also!!!!
this is a great movie and no damage to the movie nor the case I will keep buying from U
A sequel to Weekend At Bernie which is a different breed of comedy for us old school comedy fans.
This is a funny follow up to the first movie. Bernie is active in this. It is funny and typical of what you would expect from this cast!
I got this movie for my brother for Christmas and he is in love with that movie. I caught him watching it a few times.
I absolutely loved this movie and after seeing the first one knew this one would be just as funny.
I have this movie on dvd but wanted it for my ipad to take with me. Gotta love this movie. Nothing but a bunch of laughs.
This a funny movie where you just watch and enjoy the fun.  The family enjoys it over and over.  Just set back and enjoy
I remember seeing this in the theater. It brought back good memories to see it again. The movie came in a timely fashion and was packaged well.
This Movie Was A Pretty Good Sequel To Weekend At Bernie's.It Has Great Gags And Good Acting.I Much Enjoyed This Movie.
great sequel, funny funny funny, i dont get the one star reviews, if youre looking for a slapstick comedy then youll probably enjoy this.
Addition to collection of many others like this I own. I am now waiting for another one I ordered. thank you
We needed to motivate our son for FB/Hockey this movie did it, Now we just say you have to play like Rudy and he gets out there with a full heart!!!
I LOVE THE STORY OF ONE WHO NEVER GIVES UP.  THIS IS JUST THAT SORT OF STORY AND IT ENCOURAGES ALL OF US.
Great football movie about hard work and perseverance no matter how tall you are, good family movie, got as a gift, highly recommend.
This, was such a good Movie, I enjoy Sports, really enjoyed watching this one, Watch it, I am sure you to will enjoy it.
I good movie for all ages, a proof that perseverance and faith, by work hard and pray, nothing is impossible...
THIS IS BASED ON A TRUE STORY. WE ENJOYED THE MOVIE, YOU WILL HAVE DIFFERENT EMOTIONS THROUGH OUT THE MOVE.
One of the greatest movies of all time.  True underdog story.  If you need to be motivated this is a great movie to get you going.
A great movie about superation and the fight for your dreams no matter how impossible they could be seen. Dont miss it for anything.
Our whole family--ages 43, 13, and 11--enjoyed this one. Solid, family movie! Based on a true story and has an important life lesson for all.
This movie is so good and so necessary! We don't all have to be the same to be very special!
This is a great family movie about real life and how friends came together for Rudy. It teaches a lesson that we all need to learn and use.
I would recommend this movie to anyone. Rudy is one very determined individual and it pays off in the end.
Far from it.  But this movie causes me to get teary every time.  Corny yes.  But fun and wholesome and good hearted.
This is one of my husband's favorite movies. I was glad to find it on DVD as a gift for him.
Very inspirational movie. Have enjoyed watching it multiple times. One of the few movies that brings me to tears at the end, but not tears of sorrow.
Great movie very sad...bought Keaton is at his best and so is Nicole Kidman...I highly recommend!!!! very sad movie makes you cry
I cried every time I've seen this selection. Very heart warming and sad at the same time! Enjoy it, I surely did!
Good movie. Michael Keaton and Nicole Kidman did an excellent job. This movie is a real tear jerker , so be warned.
one of the best movies by keaton, sad but an amazing movie. you cant go wrong with michael and kidman together.
I enjoy a love story and anything to do with King Arthur.  This movie delighted my heart.  If you like it when good triumphs, you will enjoy it too.
This movie  keeps you captivated all the way through. Very enjoyable and we watch it over and over again and enjoy it each time.
I don't think that there is a more handsome and more dignified actor on this planet than Sir Sean.  I am happy to add this to my collection.
The movie was the first one I took my current girlfriend to. We both loved it. Great to have it on Blu-Ray.
Could hardly wait untill this one came.  We like the move and both actors.  The excitment is great and what a sad love story
this movie is worth seeing at least once if you like knights, forbitten romance, violence, sean, or richard hey what you waiting for
Product was in excellent condition and quality upon arrival. Product arrived in a timely fashion.
We liked how it showed you don't actually have to sleep with someone for it to feel like cheating to the one being betrayed!
love it; one of my favorite
this is about a little girl that gets witch powers.  after a while of her family treating her like crap she gets even.
This movie never gets old. It's the quintessential modern fairytale. Super fun for adults and children. Plus it's remastered so it looks very good.
I thought this movie was a great film. It can teach kids that reading is actually better than sitting in front of a tv  all the time.
This is a good movie for the whole family..kids included. :) There is lessons to be learned and cultivated.  :)
Very good acting by all.  It was different but had a lot of good lessons.  Just loved Matilda and Miss Honey.
The plot is highly entertaining, the little girl is darling...and a must see if you are a Danny Divito fan!
I love this movie great follow up to the book it is based on and it has touching funny and dark added into one big masterpeice
We just love Matilda, she is sweet and funny.  We have watched this movie more times than I can count.
Received the movie and it was in good condition for as old as it was. I bought it for my grandson but I enjoyed it as well.
love it cant wait to buy it again when will you guys buy more cool dvds and more awsome stuff
I want to read this book next with my son.  I has a great message, that kids can be powerful in their own right.
we really enjoy this movie.  My children watched it when they were younger and now that my daughter is a teenager she wanted to watch it.
Good family classic. Has a little bit of something for everyone. Has some good life lessons in it. My daughter loves this movie!
A nice little movie to relax with. Have seen it several time. Been a few years in between so was nice to watch it again.
great,funny,and a strong way to look at life. thank u for a nice time all went well  to start the new year
My daughter liked this movie when she was younger and now I watch it with my granddaughter! Its a favorite in my house.
Funny and classic DVD! Not a 5 star thriller or anything, but it's fun for kids to watch or the young at heart.
I bought this movie for my son who said he saw it once and loved it.  What a great price and the movie is a hit.
Cute movie for kids, goes to show how great the library can be, and dont let mean people push you around
A movie that my 5 year daughter really liked. This is a really good movie for little girls, who like wishing and laughing !
Watched this movie with my granddaughter, and we both got lots of laughs from it.  The pranks that she pulls on Danny Divito are a hoot......
Matilda is a great movie for kids and adults alike! Its a classic that will be remembered and watched over and over again!
I loved this and watch it often.  A movie that has good over evil and pretty over ugly.  It is a feel good movie
Not only does my daughter love this movie but I do too. Such a fun magical movie. I think its good for all ages.
My kids like this movie alot.  It is cute and funny.  It has good guys, bad guys and smart children.
movie was very good and had some funny events. I have watched it before and think it is worth watching a few times
My precocious seven-year-old's favorite movie. Inspired her to read even more.
This is a very cute movie. I have two boys and they both love it.  I think it's a good one!
Nothing is ever like the book but this movie did a good job putting faces to the charectors. Rohl Dahl was a amazing writer.
Al heartwarming story full of love and spirit Mara was perfect for this role  I would like to see more movies with this star
great movie the grand kids thought it was the funniest movie that they had ever seen love it too great
Danny DeVito and his wife Rhea made one great movie.It is currently on Broadway in NYC as a play too.
I love this one. And I will give it five.  she is the best.
LOVE THIS MOVIE. I BOUGHT ONE FOR MY GRANDDAUGHTER AND HAD TO BUY ANOTHERONE FOR MYSELF. MATILDAIS AN ADORABLE LITTLE GIRL.
This is a classic story from my childhood and the film, although changed for cinema, was very very good.  Enjoyed it a lot and so did the kids.
This movie is my great grandaughter's favorite movie of all time. She loved it so much, we wound up naming our new puppyMatilda. lol
Great Movie .Movie was in great condition.Could watch it over and over.Always pleased with all my purchases.Never had any problems
This was my favorite movie as a kid, and now it has become my daughter's favorite movie as well. Every DVD collection needs to have this movie in it
I know this is a kids movie. But I can't help loving it. I think it is cute and funny. A great movie to watch.
this is one of my granddaughters favorite movies! She is five years old and has watched this movie over and over again!
I was very pleased with the time frame and the condition of the movie. Thank you very much.
Matida is one of the best and enjoyable comedy's made. Acting and story line done very well, and kept me laughing for hours.
MY KID DOESN'T GET SICK OF THIS MOVIE. IT HAS VILLAINS, THE GOOD ONES, MAGIC, WHAT MORE CAN YOU ASK FOR?
It is a funny, albeit somewhat scary, film for younger children. It is better for older ones, though. I found it entertaining.
I love this movie, Antonio Banderas is wonderful in it. It has somewhat of a good story line but the action is great.
Violence, action, blood, hotness! Woohoo!! This movie is a lot of fun to watch. I love Steve Buscemi in it, too.
Can't wait to see this movie.Rated R for strong bloody violence,a strong sex sequence and language.Canada:R
great fun movie just another superbit to my collection just as good of a blu ray but fraction of the price and came real fast
Great movie love this one and always have. He is the greatest man that can act and love the show
He did a really good job on the original when considering his budget! Antonio is much better in this version and Salma Oh WOW
This movie a very entertaining, stylish, shoot-em-up. south-of the border film. Antonio Banderas and Salma Hayek were both made for this movie.
Good movie, good cast, but most of all the best part is Teri Hatcher naked throughout!
If you like Pacino's acting, you'll enjoy this movie.  His role is believable and he brings his persona to the screen.
Great Film! The true criminal justice at its finest. This is one of the best films that I had ever had to pleasure of viewing.
came on time and in  great condition. great movie about how corrupt our legal system is, a must have for any pacino fan
I did get to see this movie and boy did I really enjoy this movie. Al Pacino did a bang up job in the movie. I thought he did a superb job.
What can I say. I you like Al Pacino you'll love this movie. And, if you are an attorney you will especially love this movie.
Al Pacino at his best and that crazy judge was hilarious. This one is a classic and not to be missed.
I missed this when it originally came out.  I totally enjoyed it. This is Al Pacino at his very best.
Good quality Blu-ray Disc, better than the DVD version,I had. I recommend buying if you enjoy this movie and/or already have the DVD.
Great,great movie and I think one of Pacino's best-and we know how many great ones he's had. This one's a real bargain.
Pacino is the best. this is when hw is great actor.  however not the most realistic. if you like Pacino get it
this film is one of al pacino,s best work.up to tis film i never thought al pacino can be so funny!! this film prove i was wrong!!!
I love any movie with Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan in it. This disc is top notch and was delivered pronto. Thanks.
Suck as great enjoyable movie. Light and fun to watch. I missed it when it first came out. So glad to see it available on my Fire.
It's such kind of movie that you want to watch over and over again, love to watch it with my friends or while having quiet night.
Product was a great edition to my collection it arrived in a timely manner and in great shape. Glad I was able to get my dad's favorite movie.
this ia a very good movie i had it on vhs so i wanted to get it on dvd
I enjoy seeing this movie and have probably seen it over a dozen times. Having the ability to play it instantly from my laptop is just great!
I love this movie. It's so sweet. I recommend buying it. You won't be sorry. &#60;3 &#60;3 &#60;3 &#60;3 &#60;3
I just love love story.  I have the dvd and didn't know it came in cd so I had to have it.
Excellent movie with great acting.  Even the guys will like it, especially when the movie makes fun of movies like this one.
Wow!  Who doesn't like Hanks and Meg?  This is such a good story, - even a tear-jerker.  I won't give it away.You'll be really glad you saw it.
Enjoyed this show.  Both Tom Hanks and Melanie Griffith are good actors and do a terrific job in this one.  Good clean show!
Can't watch this movie too many time. If you are a romantic, this movie will make you want to go looking for that man like Sam.
This is one of my favorite &#34;new&#34; movies and the chemistry between Hanks and ryan is great.  I love the faith of the son, too.
I misplaced my copy of Sleepless in Seattle and I HAD to replace it.  I love the story, the simplicity, and the '...happy ever after.' ending.
DEFINETELLY A CLASSIC !!!A VERY FUNNY AND INSPIRING LOVE STORY FOR ANY HEART AND I RECOMMEND IT  TO ALL  AGES!
Sleepless in Seattle is a move that makes you laugh,  tearful, happy a movie you can watch over and over again :)
this made a great gift, it was just what I wanted.It will make a wonderful keepsake, for my friend.
I watch this film every year during the holidays since it covers both New Years and Christmas. Terrific love story and comedy.
Great movie of endearment and sentiment.  Have a supply of tissue as you enjoy to premiere actors at their best.
I will always love this movie. it has all the aspects of a modern but classical love story. The actors make a great ensemble.
I love this movie.  I have watched it many times.  I still laugh and cry each time I watch it.
it is a great romance, and you should definitely watch it..yes it's a chick flick and a tear jerker but who doesn't love meg ryan and tom hanks!!
love love love this classic , who could not love a love story like this ? its amazing one of my favorites
By now everyone should now how good this movie really is.  It holds you from start to finish wishing it would go on and on. I love it.
I don't order films unless I like them a lot, and this one. Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan together are &#34;magic&#34;, just like in You've Got Mail.
Such a sweet and sentimental story with good chemistry between the stars.  It is truly a girls' movie that I don't tire watching over and over again.
Tom and Meg together again! They really work well together. It IS a fairly typical love story, but the acting makes it work.
I love this movie! Yes I would tell others to watch it. It is just a light hearted love movie that I have watched over and over!!!
Will always be a favorite.  Meg Ryan and Tom Hanks were a good combination. This and &#34;You've Got Mail&#34; are both easy to watch over and over.
This is the perfect Friday night movie with your pjs, some popcorn or your favorite snack... get in a confortable position and dream about love ;)
Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan did an excellent job in this movie.  I would classify it as one of my favorites.
I really enjoyed the movie! I remember watching it with my grandmother when I was young! Now I own the movie so I can watch it at any time!
Ever have one of those movies that seem to &#34;always&#34; be on your TV ?This seems to be one of those. Enjoy :)
Meg Ryan and Tom Hanks are perfect for these roles.  Both are likable sympathetic characters, not overplayed.
Loved every minute of this film.  From the musical references, and words about old films - it just got better and better.
A charming tale of the son of a single father who takes on the task of finding his dad a new love.
Loved this movie! It really was a great remake. Love Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan, great team! My husband calls it a girly movie, but I don't think so!
You hardly even realize the two don't act together more than twice!  Wonderful, romantic, funny, simply a good movie for any kind of mood.
This is a classic film, full of romance and yet the 2 main characters are almost never together...great job!
Ryan and Hanks are so young in this film as compared to &#34;You've Got Mail.&#34;  It's a great video to watch around Valentines Day.
THIS MOVIE IS WELL WORTH WATCHING...IT IS ONE OF ONLY A FEW OF MY FAVORITES...MY GRANDDAUGHTERS LIKE TO WATCH THIS MOVIE WITH ME...
Life can be just like a movie if one is patient enough and believes in true love, even if love has been previously lost.
Watched this again and it is still good. Great love story with actors who have chemistry.  Wonderful script and direction.
Sleepless in SeattleThis movie (DVD) is wonderful.  I thank the producers and the actors for making it superb.
A tender, romantic movie. I watched this movie many years ago and loved it but I had forgotten just how good it was.
Loved this movie ~ have seen it many times but always enjoy watching it again ~ A collectors item for sure
Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan are superb actors and made this movie come alive for me. Laughed and Cried.Perfect Movie.
Love this move... Just had to buy it for myself. Great classic movie of a great stars in this movie. Enjoy
My Wife and I enjoy these Romantic kind of older movies and this one is a must for those little date night at home movies to have.
I've seen this ovie with and without my wife a dozen times and we both agree is is one of our favorite date movies.
Ahh Meg Ryan movies.  I wish she would make some more movies with Tom Hanks.  This one is a keeper.  Loved it.
This is and old friend.  You remember lines, songs, looks, romance.  All that love has to offer is in this film.
One of the greatest movies ever.I cry everytime I see it, over a dozen time and I'm a guy.
My daughter once again craving the old time movies....This one is classic and is watched over and over through the years.
Excellent quality no commercials lol..loved it added to my classics ,will watch time & time again  Tom hanks & Meg Ryan are fabulous together
I have watched so many times on tv, so I finally bought it for myself at really nice sale price.  Thank you Amazon.
This movie is timeless. Meg Ryan & Tom Hanks with a story you never get tired of. The boy who plays Jonah is precious!
I list this as my all time favorite movie. I am not sure why I can watch it over and over and not get bored. I must be a softy for romance.
A classic.  Anyone who ever sobbed through An Affair to Remember and believes love conquers all will love this film.
A funny, romantic classic. They don't get any better than this. A delight from start to finish, and the music is just wonderful!
Arrived in the condition I had hoped it would. Great movie. Tom Hanks and Meg Ryan are perfect in this movie.
Jerry Lewis at his best.  Co-star Charlie Calis was also on top of his game.  Just ordered the Geisha Boy to add to the collection
No Doubt Bridge on the River Kwai is one of my Favorite movies of all time And you too,you gotta OWN THIS Limited Edition :)
This movie shows how pride can lead a man to do the wrong thing at the wrong time and how others will blindly follow.
This movie is a classic! What those men went through was horrific, but they stuck together to accomplish their goal.
After all these years, still a great spectacle, great acting, and a gripping story about the folly and futility of war.
one of the all time great motion pictures, one of a kind......a classic in every way.
Here's a good old time war movie so buy your copy today william holden does a great job at acting in this movie
An excellent film, direction was the best I have ever witnessed and the music makes the film what it is.
The reproduction was very good. Sound was also. This is one of the classical films eve made. I recommend it.
My husband loves old war movies and this was one he did not have. He was very happy to receive this one for Christmas.
One of my all time favorite movies and I needed to upgrade from the tape to a DVD. Amazon service and pricing was as always the best!
The acting in this movie was great and a very good presentation of what did happen in building of the bridge.
Alec's performance was legendary.  Even his nod to a line he'd later use in his role as a old Jedi warrior.
This is superbly done, great war flick for even the people who don't often watch a war flick. On the all time 100 best film list for good reason.
The Bridge on the River Kwai was everything I hoped it would be.  Well packaged and good, fast, efficient service.
This movie is a staple in my viewing library. I recommend it for everyone to watch, young or old. They don't make them like this anymore!
This is what my husband wanted and he loves it. I thought it was a little pricey.
One of the all time classic movies of the time. Great cast. Great location. Great movie for all ages. Love it.
This is a classic and takes me back to when my parents took me to see it.  I love this movie and the story it tells.  Wish there were more like it!
this combo pack is excellant and value for moneythe quality is just superb and thats on both blu ray and dvd.a classichighly recommended
A classic about man's indomitable spirit under horrendous conditions. Alec Guiness is truly masterful as is William Holden.
I enjoyed this movie years ago and after ordering and watching it I remember the reason.  The movie brought out both sides of the conflict.
excellent reposition in Blue ray of this masterpiece besides seems look better with the time with profound message for the world of today
Movies do not get any better than this. A great story and great acting. Another must see for film fans.
Again, in brief;Good carton box; Clarity of tape with bright colors. Crystal-clear sound. Good enough.
One of the best films of all time. William Holden is in so many classic movies and this is one of the best.
We had forgotten how exciting and suspenseful it was.  Great story telling and marvelous acting all through.  Alec Guinness at his theatrical best.
Classic movie and glad it finally came on DVD
History buffs must see this great film. British. Now a classic. Story is great but not one of William Holden's better acting jobs. Must see.
Picture of the year against stiff competition from Peyton Place in '57. Love William Holden and Alec Guiness in this film.
I have to say that Connery really made his mark and separting himself from the James Bond series.  This is a good action crime thriller.
sean is great in this movie the robbery should have gone find but they messed up. this has always been a flick i like
Loved this movie as a teenager and still love this movie as an adult! Didn't think that I would find it but Amazon had it!
This was one of my favorite 80's movies as a teenager.  My niece watched it twice with me last week; she said twice was enough.
A family favorite movie and I was glad to find it on dvd. It is a welcome addition to our Musicals/Video Library.  Love the old lady and her spunk!
This is a movie I've watched several times.  It has it all....action, romance, deception, along with a great story line.
i just love this tape so must it is great i just love to watch it thank you so much
Excellent acting and a gripping story line will keep anybody with an interest in quasi-historical stories pretty well glued to the TV screen.
One of my favorite Brad Pitt movies. Great casting...great scenery....great story line. It will take you to another time and place.
Jim Harrison's book on DVD is well done and a very compelling story visually...I really thought it was well done!
An epic story about a family.  I don't know that it is the greatest movie ever, but every time I put it on I get sucked in and watch it through.
I can say enough about the beauty, cinematography, and great family saga on screen.  It's one of my favorite movies of all time.
This movie was the best of it's time and will always holds it's own. You could watch this one again, and again. It's got it all. Very intense!
Our family loves this story. We have watched it many times. We are happy to have our own copy to watch whenever we want.
give it a chance and watch it please i dont give good reviews but give it a chance ok please
This was a really great movie. I saw it on Netflix and had to add it to my collection of classic movies.
had to have this for my collection. classic movie, great story, must have brad pitt movie. great acting, love it
What can I say, just a really GREAT MOVIE & would tell anyone to watch it. Ok for teens too.
This is an old move, very long, Brad Pit did a wonderful, two sad scene but I liked the ending very much.
loved the country side-actors-story and all around a great movie and i know you'll like it to,  buy the movie, it is worth the money
I loved this movie when I saw it for the first time. I love the DVD just as much. Especially enjoyable are the bonus features like the commentary.
this is another great movie, it has Brad Pitt as one of the actors in it, that is why, I highly recommend it
I so enjoyed this movie about three college coeds, living together and all the adventures they experienced on the road to a higher education.
THIS IS A GREAT MOVIE. I WOULD TELL A FRIEND ABOUT THIS MOVIE. THE ACTORS ARE FANTASTIC. IT'S A MUST SEE MOVIE!
Beautiful packaging, great movie, one of my favorite Dracula movies, the case is awesome and a bit 3D, DVD's look like old coins!
ive  loved  movies  like  this  since  i  cant  remember  the  more  of  them  the  better  plese  keep  putting  more  out
My favorite version of Dracula - great cast, great acting - very well done.  Gary Oldman should have won an Oscar for his performance.
The Best version of Dracula.... comes with special features and the picture quality is great, get a great sound system and u got it all!!
recommended, great, the material, the movie, the actors, the soundtrack, one of the best movies of dracula, totally recommended for a movie collector
One of the best Dracula movies I have seen, it has every thing, a really great story line also a very good movie
What an original idea for a remake of a classic flik. I recommend viewing many times to catch all the different nuamces.
I hope they don't keep coming out with new formats very often or I would go broke replacing my favorites.
I love vampires, werewolves, and love romance films so this movie is very enchanting. Gary Oldman is a great actor.
Even though Hollywood strayed away from the book (a lot) I still LOVED the movie. I liked this version better then any other..
I bought this Blu-ray to replace my worn out dvd copy. This movie is one of my favorite films. It looks great on Blu-ray and I am very happy with it.
This is a must see if you like an occasional vampire movie. To me there is no others to compare to.
I enjoy watching bram strockers dracula its the most realistic dtacula movie I have to date yet and hopwfully it wont bw remade.
This is one of the best Dracula movies I have ever seen, although it has no rating, it should have been rated &#34;R&#34;.
Great movie, lots of suspense, good story line, and good acting on the part of everyone in the movie.  Anthony Hopkins is always excellent.
classic remake of one of the great novels...if you like vampires (not the sullen teenage soap opera vampire) you should like this.
I love this movie. If your a fan of vampires, You should watch this. There is a lot of action in it. :)
Spooky, super cast, and it does the original story good justice.  I ordered it through instant online movies and it came quick.
Barbra can act and sing like no other. She is still doing it to this day. What a classic movie
Love, love this movie and that voice!!!  He's not too back to look at either...everything about this movie is great
Barbra is at her best! The singing is great and the acting is superb hers and Omar Shariff and both look their best!
This movie is a masterpiece, and Streisand is brilliant
The Blu-Ray disc  is perfect it looks great. The restoration of the film is excellent enjoyed watching it. To bad it did'nt have with a digital book.
No one is better than Barbra!  In this DVD, all the memories of how marvelous she is rush back in.  A great DVD to travel down memory lane.
I love anything with Barbra Streisand, and this is truly one of her best.  No complaints.  The DVD is very enjoyable.
Hello Gorgeous Blu-Ray!  Who is the greatest Star, Barbara of course. When a  girl isn't pretty like the Miss Atlantic City.
Well done!! A great film even better on Blu ray!! Barbra is wonderful as she always is!!!!!! A classic film 4 all musical fans!!
No words can explain just how wonderful the movie is!! Music acting laughing and tears. All great!!!!  So true to Fanny Brice's life!  Marion Edawrds
came quick good condition,would order again, I had no prroblems.Its a great movie I loved every moment of Barbara shed is great
This was Barbra Streisand's best movie.  When it came out I went to this movie 5 times and when I was in the Navy I saw it on leave in Tokyo, Japan.
Loved it first time I saw it as a child, love it as an adult.  Streisand is so timeless no matter the year a movie is made.
This movie just proves what a once in a lifetime talent Barbra Streisand is!  It will be a long time before a talent that matches her is seen again.
I love that movie, it very beautiful and has lot of good songs. Actors play is excellent. Decorations is gorgeous!
I saw this movie over 10 years ago and I enjoyed it then and was happy to see I could buy it.
Funny LadyI love Barbra Streisand movies and it was great to add to my collection. I love it.Thanks,Dana
Streisand was great.  If you like musicals this is a foundation one to have.  Also, her character was funny, so there are some laughs.
I have always been a big fan of Barbra's. She  is the greatest singers of all time. She is the best actress and directors for a very long time.
Very hard to find a copy of this movie, glad I found it here. Will look here first from now on for older DVDs
I loved this movie, spooky high school witch craft, family problems.. and the whole story line was pretty good to watch.
This purchase was part of a Christmas gift to an older fella and he really enjoyed watching it.  Variety is the spice of life.
I enjoyed the movie the actress were good together, it was funny and entertaining. I would recommend seeing the movie if you like witchcraft.
Very good movie. Well acted and not &#34;silly&#34; like other's of it's genre. Great cast and dialogue. I enjoy it every time I watch it.
This is a great movie well put together. Liked the plot and the effects were pretty good for the time period made.
Great movie, great value
I loved this movie growing up and I still do.  It's fun and sexy and thrilling.  Also, baby Johnny Depp, aka Skeet Ulrich, is *swoon*.
i love this movie. it's an interesting portrayal of witches. you just have to see it to believe it.
I loved this movie when it first came out, and I still love it.  It's just a classic movie no matter how terrible some of the lines are =P
What can I say about this movie besides how AWESOME it was.  I loved everything about it.  Will be adding it to my movie library.
i loved this movie it is some what funny but it is a bit scary for children it was full of suspens and action starting at the middle of the movie.
It may be a little bit 'out there' but there are great effects for the time (or even today) and the story is pretty good, I have to say.
THIS MOVIE CREEPED ME OUT WITH THE SNAKES, BUT OTHER THAN THAT IT WAS A GOOD TEEN MOVIE.
the movie is in great condition, but the case is in horrible condition, cracked and not worth keeping the case but love the movie
I love everything about the 90's, most of the best music and movies were made in the 90's and this is on e of them
The movie stayed very close to the book and made the characters come alive for me. I would recommend this DVD.
I'm a big fan of both Emma Thompson & Hugh Grant. I've seen this movie on TV, many times, but had to add it to my DVD collection.
Enjoyed every minute, I have seen this movie before and would gladly watch it again and again. The characters are well played
As old eyes grow dim, and reading becomes difficult, how nice to recall the beauty of stories so dearly remembered.
This is probably one of my favorite movies, I watch it on days when its chilly and it just warms me up. great acting
Who doesn't love Sense And Sensibility?! I've seen just about every version of this movie that there is, and this remains my favorite!
Watched it over and over in October on Demand .(Comcast) I have recommended it to several relatives and friends. I Adore it.
From the first time that I saw it I have watched it time and time again. I have gained a fondness for English movies though I am African American.
An attractive and intelligent presentation of Jane Austen's interesting novel.  The acting is superb; the settings are lovely.
I love this Jane Austin movie I would recommend it to others it is a great love story it is great acting.
If you like romances, this is such a wonderful classic!  My family and I have enjoyed it over and over.
This movie touches my romantic heart.  It has a range of emotions and is for women. I am glad I added it to my collection.
The cast is perfect, you genuinely feel for the characters. Emma Thompson and Kate Winslet are amazing like usual.  Wonderful adaptation.
.I ENJOYED IT VERY MUCH AND WILL WATCH AGAIN. I LOVE THE VICTORIAN AGE VERY MUCH AND LOVE STORIES DONE DURING THIS AGE.
It is hard to find movies now without sex, violence and language. Every now and then you just like to be entertained nicely.
Jane Austin books and movies are the greatest.  I have them all.  Anyone who loves to read about that era should love them.
We have loved this movie ever since we first saw it.  Getting it on Blu-ray was a real treat.  Good buy!
This is one of my favorite versions of 'Sense & Sensibility'. It is humorous, lovely, and directed very well. I highly recommend it.
I love anything by Jane Austen.  This story is about sisters who are not wealthy and thus are hindered in marriage choices.
Love this movie!  Although sometimes romance takes a detour, this is a beautiful love story and a very enjoyable movie.
I love all of Jane Austin's work.  I have to wonder what she would write if she were alive today.
I love these types of old fashioned films.  This one deliver's just as expected.  Another chick flick to add to your collection!
I love this movie it has good values and honesty .I know if you bought it you would enjoy it.
The acting was great and I thought a very well done movie. Hugh Grant & Emma Thompson are lovable. I would watch again.
Emma Thompson wrote  a first-rate screenplay and the cinematography is wonderful.  Great cast to go along with a great classic.
Great story with fantastic scenery and great actors! I've watched it several times now.  Really depicts this period of time.
I have been watching this over, and over, again. I love all the characters in it. They did a great job acting in it.
It is great and the name Austine speaks for itself as a quality film and the bbc did a great job in producing a master piece.
Another Great adaptation of Jane Austen's work. The cast are quality actors. All the family can watch this dvd. Worth buying!!!
Love Sense and Sensability. It would be so nice if people were required to be courteous and well mannered as they are in this movie.
what a wonderful movie from the Jane Austin novel very romantic fun enjoyable full of emotion  happy with the dvd
As fine a movie as a movie could be.Beautifully Written, Directed and all the Actors certainly knew and commanded their roles.Kudos to all.
I just love all these Jane Austen videos. They pull the viewer into the past and make you feel like you are there.
This movie is a good movie to watch if you want to relax and feel good  that life situations can have happy endings.
One of the best book to screen adaptations I've watched. Great movie, very enjoyable, and truer to the actual plot than most
This movie is from a classic and is well done on screen.  For those who like romantic movies or stories in the old English era, this is for you!
Actors Emma Thompson,Kate Winslet & Hugh Grant play off each other brilliantly doing justice to this classic Jane Austin novel.
A favorite of mine and now I own it.  How wonderful to be able to view it at any time.  Yay!
Although I though Elinore looked too old for the part, she really reached the heart.  Great acting.  For a two hour rendition, this is the best.
Vanity Fair recently named this the best Jane Austen film adaptation. I agree 100%. This movie is practically on continual loop in my house.
It was worth the price, and the movie arrived in excellent condition. I'd definitely recommend to anyone who enjoys a good romance movie.
excelente compra no podr&iacute;a estar m&aacute;s feliz!!!/excellent purchase could not be happier!
An amazing film at an amazing price.  Product came in perfect shape except the plastic on the cover had been sliced (probably while opening the box).
I hadn't watched the movie in a while and decided I might as well purchase it. It was every bit as good as I remembered.
I bought this book to go into the library with the movie.  I love the story and enjoy the different characters.  Thanks.
This adaptation of Jane Austen's Sense & Sensibility was an exceptional one. With the starring cast who could hardly go wrong. Enjoy!!
Sense and Sensablity with Kate Winslet and Emma Thompson is wonderful and a must see. The costumes and scenery are greta I highly reommend it.
I bought this as a Christmas gift for my family. I am a big fan of the movie. All-star cast and a great film.
I love this version of the movie. Great acting on all parts.I really liked the bonus features of Ms. Emma Thompson's Golden Globe acceptance speech.
Classic, man, truelly is. the  story of a lonely cable guy who just wants a freind. If you like Jim Carrey, or Matthew Broderic, watch this!
I had just watched this movie for the first time ever.. Dear lord.. So funny! Great movie and even better to be a Blu ray film!
Jim Carrey rules. this movie is so funny it will make you laugh untile you cry. it's worth watching
Love this movie. Jim Carrey is hilarious. i rented this for me and my family and we all enjoyed it. I would recommend this movie.
This is one of my favorite movies.
You can NEVER go wrong with Jim Carrey!! Absolutely love this movie and it has never gotten old over the years! Hilarious movie that you must watch!
The movie is good...Carry steals the show but hey who doesnt like that???!!!!!Many call it stupid,but I like it!...
What else does anyone have to say; its a great movie, and it was a great price; why anyone would part with it I will never understand.
Always a great satire no matter how may time you see it.  A must for any collection or Kubrick enthusiast!!
It was so crazy and over the top that I just had to have it.  Definitely a farce, and it's a blast. Vintage comedy to the last.
1960's fear mongering over something that never happened...but delivered in a period funny people faced with funny situations.  I love it.
This is one of the funniest I have every seen. It possibly has a little stereotypical but funny. they don't make movies like that anymore
Not simply a &#34;cult classic,&#34; but a true classic in all senses and with a phenomenal cast!  ENJOY!!!  I WILL!
Excellent, clear print of the classic. You won't be sorry. Or you'll be less sorry than the characters. Yee ha!
Peter Sellers best Performance in my mind Sterling Hayden ,Slim Pickens George C Scott Priceless Insanity . A Must Have  DVD ! in your Library  !
A good movie, and one that makes you think a little.Just enjoy the movie, don't analyze it.Peter Sellers is great.
One of the very best.  Peter Sellers at his all time high.  Recommend this one for everyone.  Relevant now more than ever.
Watch Peter SellersPlay three roles beautifullyEven impressed Kub'
A classic black comedy full of unforgetable charactors. You'll want to watch this one over and over. It never gets old.
A classic for all ages, Peter Sellers is awesome in his Roles, the writing is witty and clever of all to enjoy
Nothing like an old movie on a cold winter night. Get some popcorn and be prepared for a good movie.
A classic movie at a very affordable price. Would purchase from this buyer again. ordered on Friday,and receieved it on Monday!
The humor in this film was marvelous! You won't see anything like this made anymore. Just wish it would have ended differently.
I enjoyed this movie a lot it has been very enjoyable to watch , had a good story , good plot , and kept my attention .
Great movie and very entertaining even  for my teenage kids who were amazed that the world really used to be like that
A farce / comedy with brilliant actors/acting.  The companion movie to this is "Failsafe".You must see both.
Simply Kubrick at his best! Directing, writing, the cast all showing how to make a good film!
its that simple.  this is a perfect film.  you have to watch it.  that is all.  what else can i say?
Grim humor with screamingly funny performances by George C. Scott, Slim Pickens, Sterling Hyden and Peter Sellars, Peter Sellars and Peter Sellars.
It is a classic in cinema. Huge actors. Satire at its best. Kubrik's masterpiece of dark comedy during a dark time in history.
I'm not a Cruise fan, but this is a great movie.I love Renee Zelwigger and the actor who plays her son. He steals the movie. Enjoy.
This is such a old movie but I enjoy the story line it is a great movie it never get old.
My 2nd favorite Cruise film of all time after Top Gun.  What a wonderful movie that really shows the acting range of Mr. Cruise
Jerry Maguire easily one of the best drama or romantic comedy that ever made. The Blu ray audio and video quality are superb. Highly recomended
Love this gal!!!Show me the money!!Why wouldn't you want to see this feel good movie!! its a great film.
REST IN PIECE SIR TONY SCOTT, DIRECTOR OF THE FAN. HOLLYWOOD HAS LOST A GENIUS FILMMAKER. SO PROUD TO BE A FAN AND OWN ALL OF HIS FILMS.
My movie buff friend really enjoyed it. Likes RObert DeNiro movies. SO thats what was the dr ordered. Than you
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. The lead and supporting actors were magnificent. And it made me proud to be an American!
Great Movie from back in the day. Courtney Love played a great part as Mrs. Larry Flint. Woody Harrelson was Superb!
One of the best by Pauly Shore. This is my favorite Pauly Shore movie next to Son-in-Law. He is one-of-a-kind.
Great Movie! This one is clearly underrated and hilarious as heck, you fans of Shore and comedy out there should buy this great experience.
Bought to replace a tape-to-DVD copy and it was well worth it to see it in LBX.  It's a simple story but hey, it's Jack Nicholson!
Yes, this is science fiction but one of the best I've seen. Nobody but Nicholson could have played the lead. Fun!!
I had not seen this when it first came out - and Jack Nickolson was absolutely great in the part.
This is quite a different Jack Nicholson movie!  I really enjoyed it.  I have always liked the 'wolfman' and this was a pretty good rendition.
I love Jack Nicholson.  I always take the opportunity to watch and own all of his movies.  This is a different type of romance movie.
OMG !!!! Jack N Michelle together  HOWWWWWL --- 2 of my favorite actors......best flik on werewolf ever made.
Had this in VHS and wanted to own the dvd version.  Great actors and actresses.  One of my favorite movies.
The movie arrived safely & I love watchen the movie it is very cool plus I enjoy it everytime I watch it
This is truly a great movie...it has laughter and it also has its sad moments...the actors were all great in the movie  its a must see.
My family loves to watch this one over and over. The soundtrack is wonderful and the story is compelling. Highly recommended for anyone!
Because it is a good movie to watch it.I would recommend anyone to watch it.The kids loved the movie.Thank u
how old is this movie? it is very good. i can barely watch it without shedding a tear. i always laugh. an great movie and an classic.
I remember watching this movie when it came out and loving it. It's still one of my favorite films. Funny, touching, and wonderful era.
This movie always makes me cry. The plot is interesting. Great for a lazy Friday night. It's pretty old school, so the quality won't be great
I really enjoy this movie. It is some what funny, cute, and fun to watch on those kick back days.
I had forgotten just how amazing and yet wonderful this film is.  We even discussed at our men's church group.
Original great story.  Bill Murray at his very best.  Very funny and with a moral lesson.  Never gets old or boring anytime i watch it.
I normally avoid anything to do with Bill Murray; however, he is very good in this movie. Andie MacDowell is exceptional.
It's one of my favorite movies.  Glad to have it in my library.  For me, this is a classic tale of redemption.
Good acting and a great lesson on what is important in life and about a person should focus on to be happy.
What a great movie - classic.  Always fun to watch and Bill Murray is absolutely phenomenal in this.  I have grown to really like this movie.
This movie is funny. It can lag on, but once you get hooked, it really does make you laugh
I love this movie and it is worth watching more than one. It is funny and comforting in some way. It a feel good movie that a classic
If you've never seen this movie before, why not? Bill Murray is at his best and this classic tale of redemption. A must see.
This is a TERRIFIC movie.  Get the &quot;Special Edition&quot; if you don't own it, otherwise be happy with the version you got.
Bill Murray is great, as the man whorelives groundhog day, over and over!Whoever wrote this movie, is a genius!
We have had this movie on dvd since it came out.  I love the improved visual with the blu ray.  One of Murray's best.
I really love this movie a lot big time.Rated PG for some thamatic elements and mild sensulatly.
an oldie but goodie if you like the "what if" scenario.  I like the old "What a Wonderful Life", "Mr. Destiny", etc. theme.
Ground Hog Day is a great movie and lots of of fun to watch. It is one of those movies that you can watch over and over again...
I have been wanting the DVD for ages to watch on Groundhog Day. It was in excellent condition for being used.
No need for a review here. First of all.....it's Bill Murray and second it's Bill Murray. Classic and hilarious movie!
One of Bill Murrays best. Great Harold Ramis direction. One for the collector's shelf
One of my favorites, ever.  Love Bill Murray, love Andie Mac Dowell.  This is highly entertaining and very well done.  Had to have a copy
I love this movie!  It is so much fun to watch and laugh at all Bill Murray's antics!  Fun to watch and walk down memory lane
One of the greatest movies ever made.  It's imaginative and shows what life would be like if it never changed.  Bill Murray is perfect.
This is my husband's favorite movie to watch on Groundhog day. I sometimes watch it with him, sometimes not. :)
Groundhog Day is one of the best films of all time and also the best movie of the 1990's. This film would be a good movie to watch on Groundhog Day.
Just a fun movie to watch. Murray is predictable. His character is fun. The movie's premise is very enjoyable. just a good older movie.
It's a fun movie to watch on February 2.  It has some funny spots, a nice love story -- what's not to like?
A wonderful job by Bill Murray in a movie without epic consequences and a deep message. And it has a six-foot electric alarm clock!
A very dear friend recommended this movie. After watching it I had to agree it was well worth the purchase price.
Hadn't seen this for many years but really enjoyed watching it again.  Just plain cute and good actors still many out there today.
Great performance and shows a great moment on Bill Murray's work. You can't go wrong
It was so perfect it's hard to believe that Bill Murray had his falling out with Harold Ramis after this one. One of my favs.
Bill Murray at his finest and funniest. A good seasonal family oriented comedy. We watch it every Groundhogs Day. :-)
A perfect feel-good movie with a wonderful message. I have seen it four times and it continues to delight and inspire.
This is a classic movie that is more profound than anyone might expect and charming to boot.
I have always been a Bill Murray fan, but this movie is one of my favorites.  He is so funny and makes me look forward to Groundhog Day each year.
I watch it 2 to 3 times on groundhog day.Just love the story.
I was glad that I bought it.  My kids 8 and 5 yrs old love it as well.  Now they want to take Karate lessons...
I bought this for my kids as I think this is a much better version then the &#34;New and Improved&#34;
I had watched :The Karate Kid&#34; as a movie on our TV and liked it...........by having my very own DVD, I can watch it whenever I want to.
This DVD has a lot of great extra features.  I am glad that I own it.
I don't know how many times I've seen this movie since its release in '84. It's definitely one of my favorites, and I love to watch over and over.
Just shared this w/my teen boys & they loved it.  Just as good as I remembered it.  Wax on, wax off . . .
is fun and approprate for the whole family. this movie you will be watching over again and again they just dont make them like this anymore.
This is a great movie.  It has a way of helping to restore the belief that there are still some goop people in this world.  Paco is hilarious.
I picked a 5 on the rating because this was a really enjoyable CD. I like all 3 of the star actors and can watch it again and again.
This is a cute clean movie. Fraser and Lake make a very nice couple. Good movie for the young or old.
This movie has some interesting twists to it.  The good guy wins the girl in the end.  The girl get a great family.
I have loved this movie since the first time I watched it, right after it came out. I shows us true happiness is reachable.
With so much confusion going on in our lives, this simple story is refreshing, cute and enjoyable! Loved Shirley MacLaine in this movie!
great movie fun one of the best comedys ive seen mistaken ideinty and none listens to them explain who they are love it!
I have watched this soooooo many times and love it more each time. It is a modern day Cinderella story.
This was really good.  I think Shirley MacLaine is a very talented and versatile actress.  I've liked her for years.
I will order from this company again. I rec'd my item rather quickly.No complaints from me. Very Very Happy with the service
I have a Asian collection, and this is great to add onto my others.I like any movie with Gong Li.
Very good
It is hartworming and a lovely film. The music is grate in it and this is a wonderfull film. this is a must see movie.
You just can't go wrong with a Russell Crowe movie.  If you mix good directing and camera work you get perfection.
Fans of Russell Crowe will love this movie.  Action with a touch of humor and a great ending.
Great action, great plot, and very thought provoking. I recommend this one to those who love action and suspense movies!
This is one for my collection.Great Sales,Great Service.Shopping from home never gets any better than this folks.Thanks Amazon
Who doesn't like Demi Moore taking clothes off to provide for her child.  Just no nibble-ts for the who-ha but take all the lint you want...lol
different kind of movie and you can see Demi Moore in a different limelight. If you like her movies you will probably like this one.
This is one of the worst scripted movies ever. But it is still very funny and Demi is so hot.
This un-edited version is completely better than the US version. Brings out the real story of striptease without being low class.
Great Movie, It has a Good actress in it. You get to see All of Her, Demi MooreSexy Looking Babe
this movie is made in 1992,i was 12,wasn't old enough to see it,now I've it in my collection,love it baby
Great movie for a great price. This movie makes me laugh so much! It was a great deal at this price!
This movie is really good I didn't think it was going to be all that but I was surprised Demi Moore and Burt Reynolds played very good roles.
I could not find this movie on DVD anywhere, I found it on Amazon!Good price, easy shopping!Love shopping thru Amazonand you can find lots of stuff.
WHAT CAN I SAY ABOUT DEMI MOORE. SHE IS EXCELLENT IN THIS MOVIE. WAS NOT TOO SURE ABOUT IT BUT GLAD I BOUGHT IT.
Always loved this movie. Thought the cast was terrific, especially Burt Reynolds and thought they did a great job of staying true to the book.
Good movie, cool atmosphere, great killer and lots of suspense.  Not the greatest ever but certainly worth a watch or two.
I love this movie and could'nt wait to purchase it on amazon instant video.The picture quality of this video is awesome!
GREAT MOVIE. WILL LIKE IF YOU LIKE SCREAM OR URBAN LEGEND. WOULD RECOMMEND FOR TEENAGERS AND OLDER! KEEPS YOU WANTING MORE.
Was just as I remebered. Engrossing story, same slasher type movies my kids love. They enjoyed seeing it for the first time
it's an great movie. It's one of my fave movies. it has a lot off spooky scares and some funny scenes
It was an excellent movie. Good acting and good plot. I will be watching it again. Marlon Brando is a great actor.
Outstanding movie in every respect.  Gritty story and portrayals.  Lee J Cobb steals the show in my opinion.  Brando is awesome, but he always is.
This is simply one of the five greatest motion pictures ever made, perhaps the best.
Marlon Brando, Karl Malden, L. J. Cobb, Rod Steiger, put them all together and you get an excellent film.  What more can be said?
Venetian Blinds on a car? Well, besides that part of the scene, it's a classic! If you haven't, this is Brando at is finest.
If you need evidence of his greatness, look no further than this crisp production of Brando at the top his his game. Great movie.
The best film of Brando's career. Great depiction of mob controlled longshore unions and the courage needed to overcome oppression.
Brando is one of my all time favorite actors. I have repeatedly watched his films. He's such a great actor
Great character acting at multiple levels make this a classic movie. Marlon Brando is at his best in this rough tale of union corruption.
This DVD came quickly and was packaged very nicely.  I love all the features on this DVD.  It made the classic even better
the scene in the back of the car is one of the most famous and quotable scenes in film history. this is a film not to be missed.
This video is excellent for everyone---it is a history of prejudice.  It arrived way ahead of schedule and in perfect condition--thank you
Very well done special, narrated by Lilly Tomlin. Eye opening look at how the gay issue has been handled in films & media, years ago, and now.
This is a great movie and it was a gift so I actually shipped it right to the person and they were thrilled.
This is definitely a family film. I gave it to my animal loving dad as a father's day gift and he loved it!
this one will tug at your heart and has such a great story line.everyone that has seen this movie loves it.
Bought it for my in-laws. They loved it and have watched it 5 times. Highly recommend this DVD. I will see it next!
MY HUSBAND AND I WATCHED THIS MOVIE AND IT HELD BOTH OF OUR INTEREST. IT WAS A LITTLE DIFFERENT THAN SOMELEFT US WITH A GOOD FEELING .
I was able to see the last part of this movie on TV and I wanted to see it entirely.  This is a great movie and very meaningful.
I found this item to be delightful.  It had an excellent cast who played their parts in a wholesome manner
Wish they made all movies like this one. A great family movie. The young girl is a wonderful actress. It goes to the heart.
HD version of Fly Away Home was worth the extra $5 over the cost of the SD version.  Beautiful scenes and story.  Thanks Amazon!
LOVED IT It was a real good movie I think they did a great job on this movesGood for the hole family
Would recommend this movie to anyone.  Actually bought two DVD's, one for a Christmas gift and the other for myself.
What a heart warming story that was well scripted.  It has wonderful human interest as well as our effort to preserve natures wonders.
I cannot get enough of this movie. The story and presentation was simply fantastic.
Chris Farley was so special I don't know if he even knew it. He was so cute in this movie. Seeing him try to be a ninja was just too hilarious.
my son loves this movie, watches it all the time,  thinks farly is hilarious.  good watch for the whole family.
Chris Farley as the great whit ninja with virtually no skill manages to save the day in this very funny comedy that i highly recommend seeing
This movie makes me laugh every time I watch it. I enjoy having it in my collection and would recommend it to anyone.
I love Jamie Foxx.  He is so funny and this movie is one of the best one he has made yet.
I love this movie! I have already watched it twice!! I would recommend it to anyone who loves a great &#34;chic flick&#34;
This is a good movie for a Christian's library.Good acting, good photography and direction.A great movie for families.
This was wonderful - I have watched it 3 times - 2 times with other people - it is too good to keep to yourself.
Excited about watching this movie. I hear it is a good video to watch and it is really easy to understand.
THE WHOLE BIBLE IN 30 MINUTES! what a great ministry tool for all ages,tells the true story without any weirdness!
This movie was very very good A must share film I really enjoy having this part of the bible come to life.
This is a very good movie that is biblically accurate.  Straight and to the point, if you are a Christian it is a must see.
Very interesting, very well done along the lines of a historical perspective. I enjoyed watching it with my family.
This is a great little movie.  Because of its short length, it would be ideal to show in a study, service, class, etc.
My favorite of favorites!  The early life of Gurjeff is not only uncommon, it is hungry and exploring and extremely evocative.
A magazine I like made a list of 50 good but little seen movies. I couldn't find it to rent so that's why I bought it.
Great dvd HD excellent sound excellent packaging excellent Learned a lot from the information giving in movie.
I got this DVD because I hurt my back and I have been looking for help at home. I do feel benefits the days I do my DVD
I purchased this tape years ago and it was an excellent resource for learning Yoga.  It's a great way to get started.
I love this video! It's a great way to start the day or end it, either one! Doesn't matter!
I like the exercises and it is a good extension to the first one. I plan on purchasing the third DVD in this series. thanks!
My dad was looking for this movie, Saved by the Light. I found this on this website and it is a good movie.
It came fast and it plays,I have had videos that do not play was pleased with that,love the video itself
Inspirational movie! Perfect for teenagers,and young adults! The movie helps you to understand that you can stand for what you believe.
I watched it and it as beautiful.  the kids at the church loved it and adults too I got my money worth in buying it
You could use this movie as a "Witnessing Tool" to lead someone to Christ!Ed Dennis (MrEd)
for all those who like horror with cannibalism and like a good story line then cannibal ferox is the one for you to watch
Awesome childrens Christmas movie.Definately, a classic.Right up there with Rudolph, Frosty, etc.
I looked everywhere for this movie for my granddaughter whose name is the same, Thank you for making my day
Bought as a gift for a friend.  She was extremely excited to get it and it made her Christmas even better
this was a good movie to watch it sure was a cute movie to see  and that I liked it  very much
never ever get tired of watching this movie  soooooooooooooo good  puts you in a feel good mood every single time
I recommend this movie to any & all Born Again Believers..It is a great witnessing tool, in my opinion! God Bless..Ed Dennis (MrEd)
This movie was outstanding. The performances in this movie are very good. It is a film that will be discussed by everyone.
This is a great move and story. Good sound and video. I recomed this move. LIke the story, it is very good.
This was a good movie.  Much better than the Left Behind movie.  Although the Left Behind books are awsome!
Great intro to power yoga. Talks you through each pose and calming and centering.  Nice short practice when I cannot make it to the studio.
Now I passed it on to another child by donating it to Hope organization. Hope it finds a new good home & is enjoyed by another child.
THIS DVD is a 'MUST HAVE'...I assure you that it'll make your life a million times better when you can finally calm your screaming baby.
My son-in-law is a collector of everything GI Joe!  He was delighted to get this for Christmas and said it was great.
The best doc on the subject hands down.  If you have ANY interest in Bigfoot it's a must see!
I will never, ever support big oil and us auto manufacturers.  It would be like cutting our own throats.
This is an outstanding product, which would be a benefit to all English speaking people.
A very well produced chronicle of how the banking and money system is designed to benefit the ruling elite at the expense of all others.
You may watch this video for free on google video.Just google the title and there it is.....
I went through this study at church and loved it so much that I bought it to start as a study for our small group!
This is a shocking revelation of how genetic manipulation has changed farming practices detrimentally, and is contributing to major health issues.
I found this very fun, informative, short. It provided me with an easy segue to the topic with a family member who has it.
Awesome if you want to know more about the brony fan base and how it got started. Bronies for the win ^^
Same as above.  Will be used for a Bible Study in the future.  Good and interesting learn a lot thank you.
Really like books by this author. She has done the research and really opens up the women of the Bible
Arrived very quickly.  All of my kids at religious education loved it.  Happy with this purchase.
this was bought for a loved and they enjoyed watching it. with their family. good spiritual food for the mind
A great movie for the family. I really loved the animation in it. It was done so well and it gave a lot of positive messages. Thank You!
I got this as Christmas gift for 3 years old son. we didn't play it yet. he will love it!
I believe its all true but who cares?  Its too late now.  The press sold us a bill of goods on this guy and we bought it hook, line and stinker.
Everyone MUST see this movie. Get your family and friends in to watch with you. SO VERY IMPORTANT!! Every american should watch . GOD BLESS AMERICA.
DINESH!  GREAT JOB OF INFORMING OUT UNINFORMED GENERAL PUBLIC AND IN A FORMTHAT EDUCATES.  LOVE YOUR WORK KEEP IT UP.
this book should be read by all those who voted for Obama.  A bit of truthe is what you need.  We are looking more & more like hitler's Germany!
delivered in great condition and in tmely fashion.  should be required viewing for all high school and college students
This DVD is so informative...no wonder the Left hates it! It makes Obama's behaviors so much more understandable. Good job, D'Souza!
Follow the interviews and facts brought out by Mr. D&#34;Souza who is not facing prosecution, it will make you think for sure.
Great movie! When I saw this movie is really frightened me. It was like watching the destruction of our country, the one I grew up in. Very sad.
great dvd it is a must see.It was sent in a timely manor.It is a great value.would deal with you again.
Gave this as a gift. Much info and background.  The gift recipient is a huge political junkie. He would recommend.
Love the movie, hate the man.  After watching this you get a better understanding of why he wants to turn the USA into a third world nation.
Well researched, filled with facts, well done. It explains a lot. The release on DVD was a little late. It should have been released earlier on DVD.
D'Souza is brave in being ready to tell the real truth.  Are you ready for the future? Very well done.
Sorry no one is a saint.  The truth hurts.  The movie is pretty accurate and makes a lot of sense.
Found this report extremely helpful in understanding why some issues were handled the way they were.  The picture is much clearer now.
Interesting concept. Great to have in the library. Not sure of calling it a documentary or personal interpretation of the director's ideas.
Boy, this movie is an eye opener.  Sorry more people did not see it.  Can't believe that he got re-elected.  Great movie; must see.
This DVD is well done and shows the REAL Obama. It's too bad it wasn't available months earlier for voters to see before the election.
What are we doing to our country? Everyone should see this video to understand better what this man is doing to all of us.
It tells it like it is and scares me to death....I can't sleep knowing what we have in store the next four years...
Dinesh D'Souza did a great job on this movie.  It IS MOST CERTAINLY WHAT THE PREZ IS DOING TO THIS COUNTRY OF OURS.  A MUST SEE!!!
Yes, America, you don't know him. Wake up. His ideology will be the ruin of this nation. We are not Europe. We are freedom loving people.
Excellent documentary. Whether you are an Obama fan or not, this video gives a good background of the president and his family. Love it or hate it.
This was a pretty good video.  I like how they fleshed out Obama's geneology and what his Dad's life (and love life) was like.  Very interesting.
I bought several. Even thought the election is over, still an important documentary to see. Helps you understand actions taken & decisons made now.
Understanding the people in Obama's life makes perfect sense. It explains his socialist intent and lack of sound economic understanding.
A good insight of what Obama's real intentions are to make this a third world country.  Too many stupid people voted him back in.
A must see movie documentary that everyone should have seen prior to voting for a president. Insightfull and confirms my worst fears.
Gave insight to our President. Very thought provoking and somewhat scary. Where he is leading us is not what you think.
Some people have a hard time with facts. Not me. Great documentary, especially using Obama's own voice to divulge facts.
This should be required viewing before voting in November as it goes into Obama's past, his mentors as well as who he is.
I normally do not read these types of books, but I found this one very interesting.  I makes sense out of a subject that I do not understand.
Fast service. Great packaging love it a lot. We will be getting more of them as soon as they come our.
Good humor.  Fun to watch. Makes me laugh when the rest of my day was hell.  Crazy family reminds me a bit of my own.
I love this family and laugh during every episode. Glad I bought the seasons so I can watch them whenever I want.
Love the series, good for family viewing.
I Love these guys! It is great to see people stand up for Christianity on TV! Awesome and Funny show!
my husband got all duck dynasty items for his birthday - so we had to get this.  love this show and these are just great dvds.
Can't get enough of my Double D!  The whole family loves DD, and so these DVD's get watched over and over again.
This is a great season!  The first one was good, but this one is even funnier!!  Can't wait for season 3!!
It is a great show. I bought season 1 also. I love this tv show. I think it is hilarious.
already have season one and this is great addition to our collection!  great family values portrayed in this series.  keep making the show!
I enjoyed watching duck dynasty so much I had to have the dvd.  I bought season one and had to have season two of course...
NOTHING TO COMPLAIN ABOUT WHEN IT COMES TO DUCK DYNASTY LOVE IT ALWAYS GET GOOD DEALS WHENEVER I ORDER HERE
Love the series.  I would recommend this to any one.  Great to watch them in the comfort of your own home and at your convenience.
Hilarious show! Great for all families and kids and shows how respectful they are of their rights. Don't have to worry about any dumb crap in it
This show is humorous and yet portrays family values inbelievable fashion.  We have enjoyed all of the episodes in the season and theprevious season.
This is better than the first season and even funnier. There is more of Phil and Kay in there too.
This show is so funny I cant get enough of it.  My nephews think I'm a bit like Uncle Si its just I am female and 20 years younger.
THE BEARDS ARE FUNNY IN THIS ONE.... SY AND HIS FUNNY THINGS HE SAYS ARE GREAT AGAIN!!! AS USUAL JACE IS LOGICAL....IN HIS HUNTINGS.
Yes, it is hoky and staged. But it is so good clean family friendly fun with Christian ideals. We like it.
This show is too funny! If you haven't seen it, definitely get the seasons on DVD. It's worth it and it won't disappoint!
bought this for my wife. she loves this show. if  you have not watched it yet please do so.  it is funny original and family friendly.
This  is one of the best shows I have seen in a long time.  I have watched it several times.
Nice addition to my collection. I will get all volumes and start a huge duck dynasty collection, Buy it I highly recommend it.
I love it! This program has been a blessing in disguise. When I need a pick me up this is what I watch.
I love having the Duck Dynasty seasons and will enjoy being able to put these on to watch when there is nothing on tv.
My Son loves this series and we got them for his Birthday.  We love the humor and the nutsy wisdom.
duck dynasty happens to be the greatest reality show ever. i am growing my beard out so i can look like big willie. si is the best jack
Since I saw the first episode I have been hooked. I always make time to watch this show. I neither hunt or fish, doesn't matter, I love this show.
You wouldn't think that four hillbillys would be so funny but this show is just great, My in laws are just like them
needless to say these down home rednecks are a pleasure to add to my collection. I also bought season one when it came out.
The funniest and true to life show on tv. If only everyone was this down to earth . Give it a A+++++
This show is so funny.  Lacking the money and real hick ways, it reminds me of my family.  Love watching it a lot.
You can't go wrong when you purchase something the whole family can enjoy. I can sit & watch it everyday to enjoy my favorite reality show!
What else is there to say. I love these guys and the dvd set came as ordered. I highly recommend this tv series to everyone!
I first saw previews and thought it was stupid but finally watched it and fell in love with it absolutely funny as hell
Wonderful show with great values and principles. Love that their life is centered around God when so many things in this world are not anymore!!
Duck Dynasty is one of the best shows on tv and season 2 gets even better than the first one!  What a great price, too!
There really isn't a whole lot more I can say about this show. It's good,funny, clean humor and we absolutely love it. I highly recommend it!!
Again when you have Phil and uncle Si in a show its going to be funny and great at the same time. Hope this show never goes away its that dam good!
Great show!  I am so glad we bought this one.  We don't have cable so we watch the DVDs when they come out.  Cant wait for season 3
Great family entertainment!  I am not sure how much of it is not scripted but it is still entertaining and fun to watch!
We all love it, Jerry & Esther's work with Abraham is life changing if  you want it and are ready. Thank you.
We love it. Jerry and Esther's work with Abraham is life changing if you want it and and are ready. It has to be experienced!
I enjoy all of the Abraham Hicks Cd's and videos.  I love learning more about law of attraction, and the art of allowing.
I love Abraham-Hicks. Any ideas on how to improve with ease is worth listening to. I look forward to more DVDs and CDs in the future.
this is a really great movie...one of my favorites.  the advertisements make it look corny but it is far from it.  loved it.
I loved the movie 13 going on 30 it's just such an amazing movie I watch the movie more than 100 times.
both my wife and i enjoy this movie.very light hearted..not really a slap your knee comedy but a wholesome fun movie..
This is a very good rental or purchase. Entire family thought it was good. One of the better movies in 2004.
I really enjoyed this movie, it is cute, funny and left me with a smile on my face when it ended. I highly recommend this movie.
Ever since I saw this movie, I knew I'd buy it in Blu-ray.  It's a keeper.  Jennifer Garner and Mark Ruffalo make a great couple.
Sweet movie. THe characters make this movie such a hit. The ending is perfect!
Great movie, Jennifer Garner is awesome(as always). I highly recommend it.
This movie is the girl verison of the movie Big it was wonderful.
My kids are 10 and 15. There are some adult situations in the movie, but it is overall a sweet, fun movie with a great message.
This movie is one Jennifer Garner's best moviesAn awesome chick-flickGreat for a sleep-over.~Skurvy
An oldie but a goodie! This is just a feel good movie - have watched it several times and never grow tired of it. Enjoy the actors, acting and music!
Absolutely loved this movie!  Nicole Kidman is awesome in this role!  Highly recommend this movie!!
my daughter (who is 20 years old) loves this movie.  me, i don't like it at all.  she's happy with it.
What a wonderful movie. I just love the way it pays homage to the original TV series. I think Ill watch it again
This put a funny twist on the old classic bewitched. Love watching it and getting a good laugh with the family. Great movie for a Friday night.
My wife loves this movie - I got it for her for a Christmas gift - she has watched it over and over again -
Really funny movie happy i bought I haddent seen it for a long time and glad I have it now
jim carrey makes another hillarious comedy. this movie is awesome. i recommend it for eveyone
If you like Jim Carey, you'll like this movie.  The price was more than fair for 2 hours of laughter.  You can't go wrong buying this movie.
This is my fav. movie of 2005. This is full of comody and action. You have to see it twice in order to get some of the jokes.
I love this movie. The actors combination was great. Loved the plot and the hilarious Jim and Tea is wonderful.
I love this one...so funny! Jim Carrey and Tea Leoni are great together...I laugh every time I watch it...which has been a bunch of times!
This is such a funny movie!  I love Jim Carrey.  I got an awsome movie for an awsome price and it shipped quick!
Jim Carry is an office personel. His boss is a crook and all the employees out of work. Jim Carry attempts to rob stores. are so funny in this.
Bond, Steel, Flint, Man From Uncle, don't got nothing on Matt Helm. Awesome retro movies! Must have if you like this type of movies.
For those of us who like campy SPY spoofs and Dean Martin you can not beat this four of a kind.
These films are some of the most fun films ever!Dean is terrific as the super spy Matt Helm!The babes aren't bad either!
he is great as this Matt Helm and he is funny I Like the old movies and was happy to see you had this in stock...
DEAN AS YOU CAN SEE IN THE MOVIE HE HAD A BALL MAKING THESE MATT HELM PICTURES WITH ALL THE SEXY STARLETTS.
Loved this DVD!  Showed Dean at his wittiest... great parody of the super agent genre.
I felt the dvd's were good quality and they were exactly what I expected.  I love old movies and these will be added to my collection.
This is a great movie, well worth watching more than once.  I have also read the book and the movie stayed very close to the book.
I have been looking everywhere for this movie on Blu-ray. I love movies like this and I got it in two days.
I absolutely love this movie.  Great story and great acting.  The story and characters give insight into such an interesting culture and history.
Bought this for my wife. Good chick flick. She is very  happy with this movie. Would recommend this movie to anyone.
I loved it.  Not as good as the book but few movies are.  But still a nice movie.  I would recommend.
The overall story, as well as every minor story detail delivers a total package of entertainment and a historical view of Geisha.  Enthralling...
Learn alot about the ways of geishas very interesting and good story line too
How a young girl learns survival from being sold into slavery to some level of happiness with the one she loves!
The discs arrived quickly and were in excellent condition.  I had read the book several years ago and really enjoyed the movie.
this dvd is great for your collection of stargate atlantis. i love the series and i love being an owner of the complete series.
What can I say? It's awesome!  The show scratches the Syfi fan where we itch!  Lol great storyline...better than Stargate
If you like SciFi how else can you rate this.It is SciFi in it best - action and detective and everything else in between
This is a great show as long as Ben Browder stays off of it.  It is a great follow up series with Stargate SG-1.  A must have for any Sci-fi fan.
I really like this show. Great cast. I have watched all the seasons of this show. You should also, it is fun.
This can not always be said of a spin off, but, StarGate Atlantis is every bit as good as original SG1. Sets, actors, story lines all very good.
i glad this series is as good as it is. i got done with sg1 and had a big hole in my tv life and this series has been a joy to watch
Stargate Atlantis has always been my favorite of the 3 Stargate series and being able to see thecomplete series through Amazon is very cool.
Being a fan of SG-1, this is a nice follow up. Caracters well developed, well written stories, super special effects. It's fun to watch.
I became hooked on the original stargate and it morphed into watching Atlantis.  Just enough action with creative writing to keep me interested.
Great show. A successful spinoff of the stagate movie. If they do another one they should pick up where the shows left off and include Atlantis!
Loved the series.  So glad it is included in Amazon Prime.  Only wish other programs were included in Amazon Prime without a rental fee.
I was sad when they canceled this show it was one of the best.  I still don't understand why it was canceled.
A great blending of characters, action, adventure, believable creatures and quality plots.  Stargate all the way from beginning to end.
It has been a long time since I saw a good sci-fi show. Atlantis is really smart and entertaining right from the start.
Better than Stargate SG-1! Hard to beat that... Great story, great actors and great set. What more can I say
Took me some time to get used to the characters, especially after Stargate SG-1. But the show is pretty good.
This series has a Great plot, great action. It's Right up there with SG-1!I would recommend it to anyone.
My husband loves the Stargate series. It really marries, SciFi, history, and science. It is a great show!! Try it now
Stargate is a wonderful series, I didn't get to catch them on TV and am glad to be able to get to catch up.  1season down, many more to go!!!!!
Hopefully more people will put a review on this season. SG Atlantis is an amazing series and if you liked SG-1 then you will like this. Lots of fun.
I watched it when it first came out and now with HD available, even better.  I really enjoy the caractors.
Not a huge sci-fi buff, and didn't follow SG1 much. I don't watch this stuff often, but love this series.
My husband and sons have watched the whole series many times.  This is a great show.  I highly recommend. Rodney is great!
Great program, full of excitement. Will probably watch it over and over again. I like all of the Stargate series so far.
This is a spin off of SG 1 and is also very interesting and fun to watch. It has very good actors and is well rounded with excitment and humor.
I was get watching this show again. I saw it when it was on tv the first time. it is still a great program.
This cast is fantastic! They are as good as the originals (sg1) and i loved the originals! still do!  only wish they had run this another few years!
I just love the prospect of other worlds that have life.  Also love the Anderson's attitude through the entire show.
I never got to watch the first years of Stargate Atlantis, and I am so happy I can go back and watch it now, thanks Amazon Prime !
Wished it had gone more seasons. Great characters. This is the second time I'm watching the seasons. The wraith are scary.
i miss the show. u should sse the show. so buy it. i give it an att. cool cool cool
I love all the Dark Shadows And Ben did a superb job with this set,I wish they had made more.Must have.
Have the episodes in VHS and was so glad to be able to upgrade. Now I don't have to rewind or worry about playing them too much. Very Happy!
I REALLY LOVED THIS MOVIE VERY MUCH. I AM INTO HORROR MOVIES A LOT. I REALLY LIKE BEN CROSS AS A GREAT ACTOR.
love it  best remaked of a show wish it was longer on television  great cast and special effects for the show
This story is a true account of  aboy who recounts with his family a true knowledge of what heaven will be like when we leave this earth.
This is a very good story fpr the whole family. I think it helps unbelievers look at life in a new perspective. A+++++++
The was a purchase for my wife.  I have not read it, but hopefully I may read it later on.
I loved Seasons 1 & 2 of NCIS.  The chemistry between the characters and talent of the actors is clearly evident from the onset of this show.
I love both NCIS they both bring light to the show and how NCIS is different then other crime cop show that is out there today and in the past.
I love NCIS and I have been very pleased with the quality of video I have purchased and viewed from Amazon.
Its a great shows. later seasons are way better than first through 3rd. but before season 11, things changes a lot... but still good tho.
If you love NCIS this is a must have collection.  All of them are must have collections!
This is great to watch over and over,in fact is my favorite TV show.  I am a big fan if you are you will enjoy!
This is afun season - where it all began. It is a great dvbd series to seebhow each character developed.
Right now this is the best show on tv..better then any of the CSI or Law and Order show...The Cast work together so well it's amazing.
This series is really awesome and is going to make a great gift for the NCIS fanatic in our family.
I had not watched the beginning of the show, so I had to catch up.  The instant videos from Amazon are high quality and easy to watch.
Violence, humor and excellent personalities.  This is great TV entertainment with little if any crude language, nudity, etc.  My current favorite.
The quality of the product and packaging is there and I obviously love the series or I wouldn't have purchased it.
I love having it and will soon be wanting all the other seasons with the original cast. Great buy. Great show.
This series is great.  Kudos to the creator.  Getting the season's shows on DVD made them even more enjoyable ... no ads.
I never get tired of watching NCIS! My goal is to have them all one day. It's good clean fun with great characters.
One of my favorite seasons of all time.  If you like NCIS or shows similar to it, you will enjoy the first season.
This is a great movie. I always like NCIS.This is a great movie. I always like NCIS.This is a great movie. I always like NCIS.
I love NCIS!  It is great to have the shows to watch whenever I want!  I need to buy the other seasons to complete the set!
Bought it for my husband, and he loves it. The disks are new and play well so he can watch anytime.
any fan of the show would love this.....it's great seeing the chemistry between the characters evolve.  Mark Harmon is always good to look at.
An avid fan for years but never saw the complete series.  These are great! Can't wait to get season 3!
I purchased this for my Dad who's in a nursing home.  He always loved NCIS and was thrilled to get it.
I love this TV season Its relly good, all we need now is season 10 and 9 All in all its a relly good move
I never had the very first season and had purchased all the rest. I loved this series and was sorry to see it end
it great show i have watch every time it on love all they in the show it funny and great to watch
I am thoroughly enjoying rewatching this series from the beginning.  With the changes over the years, the original seems fresh and more fun.
ncis is a very good and very interesting show to watch we now have the whole collection of ncis and plan to keep buying as the new ones are release
this is a great show love the older episodes mark harmon is one of the best actors ever this is a must see show not a single scratch on any discs.
Of all the CSI-type shows out there, I like this one the best. There's drama and mystery, but there's also a lot of humor. Definitely worth it!
I would recommend this to anyone who likes the CSI series the characters are great and the storylines are really good
I highly advise getting all ten seasons. it's very well acted with all the characters fitting well together. Great viewing !
When NCIS first came on we didn't have a way to record it. We don't like commercials so we didn't watch it. Enjoyed the dvd  very much
i like to watch each season  when there is nothing on tv  it was shipped right to me no problems
I love it This started my love for NCIS and I have every season :)
I love this show, it has great characters, witty banter, and plots that keep you guessing as to what is going to happen next.
I wanted to watch the beginning of NCIS and it's not on my Comcast on demand list.  Sure was easy to check out from Amazon !
Purchased all of these for my Granddaughter's birthday.  She loved them.  Service from shipper was really great.This DVD was on NCIS.
I loved watching ncis reruns on tv that I decided to order all the seasons, I recently ordered season 9
I have not had time to watch it yet but I am a very big fan of the show so I am sure I will love it!
I am a late comer to NCIS, so I wanted to see the first episode, which was really, really good TV.
We've got the series - love, love Gibbs and his interactions with the rest of the cast.  It's one of our favorites.
My family and I love this show, it is our must watch on Tuesday nights!! Great actors and this first season was one of the bests!
Enjoyed the first season best.  Getting to know the characters.  This is a very appealing show.  We watch each season.
We just love NCIS. So we have started collecting the DVDs. We also purchased the season of JAG that the NCIS crew first appeared.
If I didn't like it I wouldn't be asking for season two. You know it must be a good show if people are willing to buy it and ask for more.
i didnt actually buy this for myself so i cant really judge it BUT the person for who i bought it LOVES it :)
I absolutely LOVE my DVD set of NCIS! Television just doesn't do it justice! Can't wait to order my next seasons!
I like it because it will be bad storms and nightimes and they like to be winning teams and losing teams.
Now you can have the collection that was on MTV. A must have for Aeon Flux fans.  May be hard to find now.
It was great to see these Aeon Flux shows again after all of this time. I very much enjoyed them a great 3 Disk package not too shabby.
But having every episode makes the whole thing better.  There should be a compendium somewhere too that explains the episodes.
i enjoyed all of them.looking at the screen u just wonder who comes up with these stories. cool i think
This show is wonderful! Dylan and Brenda are my favorites! I love Kelly Taylor too. Great family show! deals with everyday issues
I haven't watch these early seasons. Twenty four years have sure passed. Great memories of my high school days! Great show!
Great series about the struggles of teen age life and pear pressure and growing up  in the 90s with a lot of great freinds
I just wish the entire series was available to watch on Amazon (hint hint!).  Please add the rest of the series.
Picture quality is good even though it was filmed in the 90's. I really hope Amazon gets more seasons because I'm loving this show!
I bought this used and it works great! It doesn't skip and except for the case being a little torn, I love it!
I'm a charmed addict, so what can I say ?  I am a Prue fan so I love these shows.
Love the series, Charmed.  I wasn't sure I'd like it with a cousin added, but I found the series to be just as good.
Charmed is by far my favorite Television series. There is so much action packed into each one of these episodes. I just had to have the entire set!
refreshingly new and exciting viewpoint on an old favorite of witches and warlocks and demons.  Very enjoyable and I am happy with my order.
I watched and liked this TV series very much during the local TV broadcasting. However, I missed some TV chapters.
I absolutely love this series!  The only thing is that there aren't any extras on them as there weren't any done with this show.
This is an awesome show. To me t his is a classic. Some of the CW's best work. A must see with an all star cast. Loved it.
It was good to catch up and review the episodes I was unable to view before the series went off!
Loved this show and was looking to complete the set.  Great quality and easy to navigate to which episode I want to watch.  Great price.
It is a great season because the charmed ones are reconstitutedIt had wear on the box but not bad and got here very slowRecommend to all
love it, huge fan. I love how the characters are more family then just a team or coworkers. keep up the good work
If you enjoyed the original series then you will enjoy this set of DVDs as they play well. Would recommend this seller to others
Great deteticive work with forninics  and lab information to find the killer or killers.Interesting view of how this story line came about.
Gary Sinise and Melia Karakaredes play well off each other.  SHows the less beutifull sides of New York city.
This item was spectacular there was not a single scratch on any of the discs and it was just what i was expecting. LOVED IT
This is a great CSI police series placed in  NEW YORK .
I started watching the first season and now after watching the second I absolutely hook this show! great cast and great series.
once again one of my favorite shows; we so enjoy watching it. and the whole thing arrived in great shape.
i have watched it and enjoyed it  i plan on getting the rest of them  i need 3,4,5,6,seasonsthats all
awesome loved it great thanks cant wait to do more with it makes great gift idea for friends and family.
So much better than so many of the other shows on. It's exciting and yet the violence is OK for kids to see
As a last of the minute gift that was needed I could not be happier. The product was shipped ontime, packed great, and was the standard price. Thanks
I've been catching up on all the old South Park episodes and season 7 is a winner.A lot of good episodes here.Glad Kenny came back.
This item was purchased as a Christmas present for a good friend.  It arrived promptly, and he reports he is extremely pleased with it.
Great fun!  SouthPark is too fun to watch and great for college dorm-living get-togethers.
I would love to get this ! It has Pancake Head and Fat Butt or something like that. And I love the Crazy Cripples episode.
one of the best cartoons ever. well worth the money. mini commentaries are fun to listen to as well.
This show is so smart and funny. They always find ways to surprise me show after show, year after year. A must have for any fan of the series.
Very well done and with a lot of nice extras including a 2008 reunion of some of the extras in the party scene!
An icon from our past shows us how easy it is to be great.
Love this movie! First saw it as a teenager and have watched it many times since then. Great 60's movie. Love and romance.
Love this movie, love Audrey, love the soundtrack! Makes me feel good after watching it. A wonderful classic to enjoy many times.
I absolutely love this movie! It's such a great one to watch on a girls' night. It should be in everyone's collection!
I love the movie. It may not all be politically correct for today's viewing.  Clarity of picture on my Kindle was a plus, too.
Loved it when it came out and still love it...from the acting to the fashion to best of all AUDREY HEPBURN.
What's to say?  Audrey Hepburn is the most beautiful woman in the world IMHO.This is just a classic and everyone should watch it at least once!&#60;3
love watching this movie.. i always am.. i highly recommend it to everyone that loves Audrey.. it arrived early and undamaged
This is an all-time favorite of mine and a classic. I will watch it over and over. The quality of the reproduction was excellent.
Well done!! A great film even better on Blu ray!! Audrey is wonderful as she always is!!!!!! A classic film!!
One of the classics of the Hollywood industry. Entertaining and charming. Good story and EXTRAORDINARY upscale couture for Audrey. Wow.
See a lot of time. She is a wonderful actress. I love all Audrey Hepburn movies, is something different from others and she made that happens.
a great girls movie to watch no matter how old it is, always nice to watch in whatever mood im in.
She is so cute. She is also a talented actress. I wish I had personally known her. I recommend to romantic thriller fans.
In Blu-ray, yet! Wow! Now it is for certain that I will have to replace out &#34;My Fair Lady.&#34; Right?
This was suppose to be a gift for my mother in law but I am going to keep it. I just love it so much and don't have a copy.
This movies was my husband.  I wasn't  a fan, but he loved it.  The price was great,  The quality was good. :)  :)
great movie! i love this movie and am so pleased its on blu ray! its a great movie! i would recommend this to anyone who likes old movies
This movie is the best movie ofAudrey Hepburn's entire career.It is really funny and entertaining.
A true Classic, made in the days when there was no need for foul language or sex scenes, when movie makers knew how to make films that lasted.
this movie is great i swa the poster ad i wanted to check the movie out and i really like it
Love this movie. Its a classic for me. It combines humor, reconciliation, and funerals all in one. Would recommend to anyone. Thank you!
It's just one of those feel-good movies; that out of disaster and sorrow, happiness can be cultivated. Plus, it's well cast, I believe.
Cute story, well acted and emotionally charged. I would recommend this movie to anyone who enjoys a warm and touching romance.
A very heart warming story of family and new found love.
Really entertaining story and characters. This is probably my favorite Orlando Bloom film and Kirsten Dunst has not done a bad film to my knowledge.
A young successful man suddenly faces failure and loss, but meets a stranger who helps him look at life with new eyes and find some hope.
This movie is amazing. Great action and excellent features. It's one of the best movies of its kind that has ever been made.
There isn't much I can say here. The movie was great on the big screen and is great still on my 60&#34; TV.
Actually A Great Movie, for an old abstract MTV cartoon! This movie has surprising depth and I for one am ok with anything Charlize Theron does.
I am fan of Charlize Theron . She always good in her movies. I recommend to anyone who enjoy her movies.
Movies is awsome. Thank u . remember ed how great movie was . great selection.thank uwas wonderful. ... ...
Very good movie! Action packed! I loved it! It's good to have hot female action flicks out there! 5 stars!
She does a great job of acting in this one, her dedication to the physical requirements of this part is commendable and she nails the stunts.
this movie has gotten other bad reviews, I saw it anyway and was very glad I did. This movie is super scifi and it rocks. loved it!
This show is unbelieveable as well as smart and keeps you watching.Enough said.
Family life interaction can be fun and interesting, medium can be dark so no little ones. Love Joe the hubby..
My Wife and I Love Medium.We received the DVD set (1st season) very timely and all the discs were just fine.Great transaction, 5 stars.
I just love this whole series.  Great DVD to own!Roxann HillGecko Girl
I missed the first season of Medium, why, I don't know.  I want to thank Amazon for the opportunity to watch the programs that I missed.
This show is spellbinding. The characters are fascinating in their roles. The plots are intriguing. I can't stop watching these episodes.
I enjoyed watching it the first time on tv and still enjoy watching Jennifer and thinking of the possibles after life and how she helps them
It is a little slow at start. But it does get much better as the series goes on. I also love the way the story unfolds with the people of the town.
I have always loved this program. I had to miss a lot of the episodes while it was on so am happy to get to see them now.
I loved this show but never got to see it from the beginning. I will continue to watch the episodes until I seen them all.
It was a good series to watch, drama : Excitement : Sci FiNice to watch something with bad language. etc..
A great series if you love mystery and the supernatural.  Jennifer Love Hewitt is awesome in this.  I recommend it.
This show is SO GOOD. My whole family loves it. I can't wait to get it on DVD so we can watch the ones we missed.
love it got the whole season for my self now getting it for Christmas for my sister in law great
Ghost Whisperer was a great series, our whole family loved to sit down and watch all the ghost whisperer dvd's. Hated to see the series end.
such a part of real life for many and great to imagine for others.  love the characters and the show and plots
Although this is fantasy, the series is well written with deeply moving stories that are sure to melt  your heart.
Melinda Gordon I do like this serie because I do have the same gifth like Melinda my hole life and it hurts many times, I recommend it to you
This is a Very Good show I keep watching over and over This is a must get if you like ghost stuff Melinda tries and help them cross over.
Love this movie.  I have seen it many times and it just does not get old.  One of my favorites.
Very funny and entertaining movie. Great acting & lots of laughs. This is definitely one that will be watched over and over.
I love Matthew in any picture. I will be recomending u all to my friends.  Keep up yhe gd work.
My daughter recommended this and she was right on.  It is a happy, funny and romantic movie.  Go buy it!!
This movie was realistic of men with leaving the nest syndrome. Funny the first time I saw it and this time as well.
Really hits home, have two kids of my own, Nice to know I'm not alone
Very funny, cute plot, and chemistry between actors was great. Very enjoyable to watch. Worth the purchase for sure. Thanks.
Buy it and give it out, great movie, showing the urgency of the situation and laying the basis for hope.
This is the clearest explanation of Global Warming I have seen. The only fault I find is the (perhaps necessary) oversimplification of mechanisms.
Esta pelicula hay que verla, y hay que verla pronto para que nos enteremos de lo que estamos haciendo con nuestro planeta. Excelente Sr. Gore.
A must see for everyone, if we all pull our weight together,we might actually see a change happen. One of the best movie/docos I've seen.
This is a great gift for teenagers or anyone that needs to learn about this important issuw
I liked how the CD wasnt scratched and it was super clean. Very light and durable and packaging was recycled:)
An excellent movie/book that should convince even the doubters.  I really enjoyed it.
I bought this film to show to my film class.  It did not fail to satisfy: educational and entertaining.  Go Gore!
very good price, everybody should have this movie. very good price and it was send on time. very good movie
I recommend this DVD to everyone.  It is simply the truth and it is told very well.Roxann HillGecko girl
If you thought global warming was a maybe or something natural, you really should see this. I hope it changes your life.
A superb movie with much to absorb...stimulating and alarming at the same time...more meaningful now havinglived through Hurricane Sandy.
a movie that is a must watch loved it loved it hard to write a review with out telling anything about the movie but great to watch
MI3 is fantastic. great action, great adventure, and great acting make this the best of the series. a great movie, please buy.
This is a very good movie. My husband & I have enjoyed watching it in fact have watched it three times.
White water rapid action!
This was a great movie. A lot of action. Interesting. Good story. Very entertaining. Would highly recommend this flick. Awesome!
The best action flick I have ever seen. It never lets up.
A lot of action in this movie and suspense. Very entertaining and worth seeing you will enjoy it very much.
Was the only one I had not watched so I really wanted to see it. Glad I did! Excellent quality.
I love Tom Cruise and his movies.  He does his own stunts.  The action is fantastic.  Great movie.  Like Mission Impossible
The twist at the end is great, the whole flick was action-packed... Not able to see through (all) of the twists, kept you watching!!
I have seen and/or own the trilogy, always action packed, fast paced entertainment. Ethan Hunt against the world while defending it.
Tom Cruise is such a good actor. This is full of action and adventure and a great story line, too. It doesn't have disgusting language either.
This is superb movie.Loved every action packed moment.The plot held my interest for the entire length of the picture.Will rent MI-3, again.Thank you.
As before, the new Mission Impossibles with Tom Cruise are wonderful.  There is so much action and the entire cast is great.
one of tom crew's better movies cast and crew did and out standing job on this latest movie we need more of these kind of movies good and clean
I really enjoyed watching this movie and with my busy schedule I was able to watch it in sections with the resume button.
I've watched just about all of Tom Cruise mission impossible movies and as usual a lot of action. the movie was good.
tom cruise and his movies are so fantastic. lots of action pack scenes. love his movies. the older he gets, the better the movies.
Was very funny and in NEW condition as promised with very fast delivery,very good vendor,deserves 5 stars.
Definately one of my all time favorites. The comparisons and descriptions of humans and food is hilarious! Fun for all ages.
My son loves it and that is all that matters.  Great buy!  He watches it a LOT!
We loved it!  Great entertainment.  Can't wait for the DVD.
this is a great movie, the whole family loves it, but our son (4yo) is a little afraid of the bear.
LOVE IT!!!!!!!!  I am the grandmother but this is my copy.  My grands and great-grands love it but this is MY copy!!!
This movie is a totally perfect comedy. Its got talking animals, and hilarious hi-jinks. I love this movie, totally perfect for all ages.
Grand kids love this movie. It was in good condition. It was boxed well and got to me in good time.
this movie is so cute. the whole family loved it. you gotta see it.
my whole family loves this movie we have watched it so many times it was my dad's favorite he loved all the animals in the movie they are so cute
Great for the whole family. Amazing details on the animals.  No generic graphics here.
This is a very entertaining movie, fun for all to watch.  Very comical.
I saw it the day after it came out and I thought it was so funny! I am already planning on seeing it again.
Urban housing moving in on the fringes of the woodland critters forest and how the animals find themselves adjusting to a new way of life.
Grand babies love it.  Watched it two times the day it arrived.  A very cute and colorful movie for your little ones.
This DVD was asked for as a Christmas present for my adult daughter. We recently watched it as a family and really enjoyed it.
We have watched this movie numerous times, the whole family thoroughly enjoyed it.
I watch this with my four year old and we love it.
I really enjoyed watching this mainly the little bear he is soooo funny, and so is the rest along with the wildabeasts too funny..
We had it by VHS.. This is a very Fun & cute movie for kids. First time bought them by DVD & they love them too. DVD ia Good condition & Thanks guys!
Our kids just love this movie.  It's great fun to watch with them.  It's a keeper on the saturday night family night movie.
I saw this movie on TV the other day and just knew I had to have it. So stinking cute.
This is one of those movies kids can watch over and over. I don't mind, I think the plot is adorable and so are the characters. :)
Great children's movie. It definitely teaches lessons on being trustworthy and making your friends more important than yourself.
This is a really cute, funny film.  Makes fun of homeowner associations too so that is always good.
Love all these DVD series. Great for people of any age. The kids sure enjoy them and makes them feel happy! Cute characters in this movie
I love everything Bruce Willis does and this is no exception. And Steve Carel is just brilliant. Great movie, I recomend!
My children love it. Amazon had a great price and free shipping. What else can I say?
This is a cute movie with Bruce Willis.  I recommend it.  It is a fun movie for the entire family.
Bought this for myself and my husband. Funny movie, love Hammy. A must have for all families.
This movie really tells it all.  This was a great eye openier of the events of 9/11.
This movie was amazing!!! i loved it, it was sad, heartbreaking, well written all of the great thing you want in a movie!!!
I love the move. But it hurt alot to see it. I'm from NYC and lose some friends. But your CD was great and in good condition. Thank you
Nicolas Cage's performance in this movie is outstanding. this is truly an awesome film. this is a must see
Order was shipped next day and arrived in very good condition and viewed like new. I would order from this person again.
This movie was movie was moving about a real thing that happened Loved it would like to see more like it
this is a very good movie very emotional I love it I think it portrays the realy time when people had to band together
I have watched all of the Tudors, all 5 seasons, at least 5 times or more, never gets old, my favorite show ever!
Loved every episode as history unfolded. It does a great job of keeping it intriguing while accurate for the most part
This movie did justice to Henry's cruelty but a lot of the torture scenes were hard to watch. However, the acting was great. Lots of action...
Tudors was awesome so sorry to see Ann get the axe but she gotts to go. Love season s1 s2 so far done pretty well
Absolutely a wonderful series.  Got addicted to it and watched all seasons.  Occasionally watch some episodes again. I highly recommend
The Tudors season one to four makes a great gift for you or friends I enjoy the hold season from began to end not one moment of broded
Better than season one. Not all sex and violence. Actually delves into complex power struggle in Europe. Liked Thomas Moore portrayal.
After season 1, you couldn't wait for the next one to start.  All 3 seasons are wonderful and a must see.
This is a great series. It is on netflix now I would recommend watching it for free on netflix save some money!
yes.. i love this series.  cant wait for season 3 to get here and cant wait for the final 4th season to start.
This is one hilarious movie...I have a great time showing it to new people.  Thanks ever so much.  HAGD namaste
If you are into history this is one to watch. I have bought the whole series and worth the money. Nicely done.
Watching Tudors was like reading book that you just can not put down!I watched complete seasons 1-4 in less than a week, Tudors is that suptuous.
This is my favorite season so much history regarding Queen Anne. I just love this period! So if you like Queen Anne this is the one for you!
I love watching The Tudors because it is one of my favorite TV Shows. This TV Show about Henry VIII's court in England is full of drama.
This certainly was a violent time in history. Much better picture of King Henry. It kept me riveted and ready for the next season.
This is such a great series, I was sad to see it end. I can watch it over and over again. :)
Great price and arrived much quicker than I expected. Gave The Tudors as a gift and it was well received. Thank you!
I loved every moment of this show! Great performances, beautiful women, fun insight into the lives the great players of a past age.
Watched it when it was new and love watching it over and over.  The second season is really the beginning of the end!
Never one interested in shows about royalty, I am surprised on how much I am enjoying this show. I highly recommend this!
Amazing costumes. Based on history the series gives a glimpse into 16th century England.  I am enjoying it very much.
It was well written and appeared to show the history of Henry VIII and how people were treated during that part of history.
As fantastic as Season 1....the acting and actors are amazing and really bring the period to life.  Definitely should be experienced.
WOW !!!!!  HOT STUFF!!!!!  Good acting, good casting, good storyline......really good stuff.  Looking forward to season 2
Just as fabulous as the first season. Hope they do all the way through to end of Elizabeth II.
I love the 1500's so that is why I'm so into this show.
This show is do intriguing, I can't stop watching it. I am hooked.  I watch every free chance I get.
Great costumes, more detail into how it was in the life of King Henry and his wives.  All the political intrigues of what people did to have power.
Great show, great extras.  I can't wait until Season 3 comes out on DVD.
Totally hilarious, fast-paced, clever, sweet, ridiculous,it's got it all.  Get or rent the 2nd season and laugh out loud!  HAHA!!
I watched the first three seasons back to back, I enjoyed it so much. Dwight ispositively the best! So many funny moments what a blast
The Office, Season Two is WELL WORTH the price.  At least 20 episodes, each one funnier than the last!  Absolutely hilarious!
If you enjoy comedy and have not watched this show, do yourself a favor and watch it! You won't be disappointed.
Once again - great series, great actors, great comedy.  This series will live on long after they record the series finale.
Again - part of the series of The Office we bought for our grandson for Christmas.  He has really enjoyed watching them.  It was a great way to shop!
LOVE IT LOVE IT LOVE IT!!!!!  CAN'T EXPLAIN THE FUNNINESS OF IT ALL IN A FEW WORDS....BUY IT AND SEE.
COMES IN WITH DECENT TIME, PLAYS ON MY DVD PLAYER AND PS3 VERY WELL WITHOUT ANY PROBLEMS, IT WAS A GREAT PRODUCT! JUST AS DESCRIBED
this is the best show on tv hands down.  This box set is loaded with features and is a steal at $32.
i love the office. you cant go wrong with michael scott being himself. he is great to watch. i love it
Darn show is way TOO similar to REAL office life! It is GREAT! EVERY episode is WORTH the watch! LOOOOOOOVE it!
Very happy with this seller.  Fast service and the product came in great condition.
This is creativity at its best. The writers on this show are great! I really enjoy watching the actors on this show.
This is a very great series. I bought it for my daughter for Christmas, she has a collection. The movie was in perfect condition.
LOVEEEE ANY AND ALL THE OFFICE SEASONS!!! I just love this show and miss it terribly. What's not to enjoy about all these seasons!?
Who doesn't love the office. It is a hit at our house and a series we watch over and over alternating between this and friends.
How can anyone not love a show that irritates & makes you itchy.  It is almost intolerable to watch but funny.
Our daughter's favorite Barbie movie. They watch it over and over. We are glad we chose this one! Great buy!
Girls love it, and watch it often.  I even have watched it more than once, and not suffered!
I bought this for my granddaughter last Christmas (2011). She is still watching it this year. Can't really go wrong with barbie products.
My dauighter's only 2 1/2 but she goes nuts with this dvd! Worth the purchase!
I think this is one of the best Barbie movies. My little girl loves Barbie and she loves to dance when the princesses are dancing.
We love it. My daughter is 5 yrs old cannot get enough of Barbie's movies. I like them too. This one is a particular favorite.
Scoop the movie is so wity and funny and mysterious like like most of Woody Allen movies this is a great one
Good movie, arrived on time in good shape, reasonable price,  no problems, and I like being able to track the package.
All of her movies are the best!!And had a funny side to it as well!Woody Allen is at his best ....
This is a great movie I really love it and I really love Hugh Jackman he is a great actor.
Woody Allen is absolutely hilarious and witty in the movie. The story line is intriguing and keeps your attention. A must see.
Great Hugh Jackman movie . Different type for him . but very good . Birthday gift for daughter who loves Hugh
i loved everything about this film. It was a great story, the actors are amazing as always. Love to watch it over and over again.
Good movie. I'm not a movie critic but I know what I like. A very well acted movie. Moving and in many ways disturbing.
Subtle story, delicate direction, unbelievable scenary, make us see that love is the matter, whoever may be.Marcelo Lanat J&uacute;nior.
Ennis whispers "Jack I swear..." at the end. Should have taken best picture hands down.
I enjoyed this movie about to cowboys who become best freinds over time while ranching and sharing quality time until one of them passes away.
I loved it.It was great.A movie showing how strong love can be and how it can last forever.A must see.
This is a great love story if you can get over the gay part. the love and friendship is heart breaking. great movie
very good movie. this is a must have. it was a litte drawn out.
This is a very awesome movie, I watched it six times in the first week of having it.
THIS COWBOY LOVES THIS MOVIE MY ONLY WISH IS THAT THESE COWBOYS WOULD HAVE BUILT A CABIN UP AT BROKEBACK AND LIVED HAPPILY EVER AFTER.
WONDERFUL TRUE STORY OF A MAN AND GIRL WHO LOVED HORSES.  THEY TREATED HIM WHEN HE HAD A LEG INJURY AND BROUGHT HIM TO HEALTH
We love films that are based off of true stories.  How refreshing when typically you only hear and see the bad and not the good
If you love horses, you'll love this film. It grabs your heart and the acting is great. Buy it. You'll love it.
I loved this movie and all the actors. DVD came in excellent condition and even had lots of special features!
This is a very good movie and would recommend it for a family movie time.. This movie is not only for the kids the adults will like it also..
KIND OF LIKE ALL OTHER HORSE MOVIES THE FACT IS EVERY ONE LIKE HORSESSEA BISCUIT WAR HORSE AND OTHER ONES
This was one of the best movies I have seen recently. Highly recommended for all ages.
my god daughter fell in love with it. it makes you unerstand that dreams can come true with love and hope
Based on a true story, this is one of my all-time favorite narratives about rising above the seemingly impossible to achieve a dream.
Great family movie good for all ages. They could not have chosen a better cast and the ending was spectacular.
Excellent movie with a warm family movie with values. Wonderful action.
Dreamer was one of the best films i have ever seenits a great family moviea great casti really like it
Great movie family friendly too.Had a very good storyline.It was altogether a feel good type of movie.I Rate it 5 of 5 stars!!
This is a great movie. I love any movie about animals because I just love them. You'll enjoy it for sure.
I found this movie to be very heartwarming and fun to watch over and over.  All the actors are people I enjoy.
This is a great family movie and appropriate for all ages.  No bad language, great father daughter story, good acting.
This movie is such an inspiration to me, it is clean to watch with the family and who doesn't love Kurt Russell and Dakota Fanning.
Good story,  well worth watching.I sent it to my daughter so she coukd also ewatch it.ll.  ll.  ll.
This is a very upbeat movie for all ages. Great for young people because it has a wonderful story line.
This is a well done story and the actors are all good. Worth watching more than once. Really was good.
I love the characters and the way the evolve through the show's plot.The styory line is fascinating, a combination of genres sci-fi, drama & romance.
I enjoyed this show it was very addictive.  i would recommend it to anyone that is into space shows. i have no complaints
More than entertaining, this series and its characters provide the basis for true attachment.
The best show on TV period. Wish it was still on. The characters are really developed. It's a new and interesting reimagined version of the original.
We'll scripted with a good story line complimented with excellent actors and special effects. I was surprised and rewarded with the series
A must have for anyone who enjoys future sci-fi dramas!Well done and 100 times better than first series!AAAA+++
This was a great first season and a great first episode especially.  A solid foundation is laid for the remainder of the series.
I loved the picture and it looked clesrer than when I saw it on TV.
The show has excellent writers and for the science ficition crowd, it keeps your interest and the plots are great!
Ok Starbuck being a female, that threw me for a minute but she does play the part really well. They had to make Apallo and Baltar that sexy!
Life in space, well captured.  A little sexy now and then but definitely not as bad as TV today. Thanks for having the series available.
A brilliant series, can't wait for Season 2. The girls are hot and the writing is top notch.
Great show with great characters. Each show has been interesting and holds my attention. I can't wait to see the rest
well worth what I spent on it.  this set contains both the miniseries and the full first season of battlestar galactica in full surround sound.
I like science fiction.  This is yet another movie that I would recommend to any science fiction fans. It is outstanding to me.
The first time I saw this show I was blown away by it. I'm actually not a huge science fiction fan but this show really struck a chord for me.
Excellent series and expertly presented.  A highly entertaining one too, with lots of action and a moral of sorts presented also.
Very good! never watched the original series, but this one got my attention. Buy this and you will also get the mini series included.
love this show  good story good actors and i keep watching it to see what happens next! love  the show
I thought this would just be cheesy sci-fi. Not the case at all. It's dark. It's character based. It's great.
This is a classic movie it is a very good movie from Steven Spielberg looks and sounds much better lots of bonus features and of course bd live
This is the ultimate classic movie. The movie is for people of all ages. You will not ever forget it.
I can set down and watch ET and feel good with the grandkids. ET is a classic movie with some stars begining their career.
What can I say great movies of how children cope with their world around them. Great movie for the family.
Its ET! The movie is a classic and this was a great buy! Worked great and we enjoy watching it over and over
heh we grew Up watchin this Great Movie E.T ,I own this Ultimate Editionand 'tis one of my Favorite movies ever, you won't regret it too :)
Always enjoyable.
THIS MOVIE IS A VERY CUTE HEARTFELT WRITTEN STORY IT HAS LIGHT ACTION IN IT AND IT HAS ITS TEAR JERKING MOMENTS
Great movie when it first came out, and has aged very well. Saw it as a kid, now sharing it with my own kids!
Love watching this movie and now I have it for my own.  Drew Barrymore and the rest of the cast are wonderful.  The story is great.  I love.
We bought this movie to watch with out age appropriate grandchildren. They really enjoyed it and have watched it several times.
all time fav for my grand kids got to admit I could probable watch it once a yr for awhile
I loved this movie when I first saw it years ago, and I love it now.  My nephews and nieces were particularly enthralled with the Disney animation.
This is a classic. Speilberg hast to be the best filmmaker of all time. You could never get tired of this.
Great movie from the past very well remastered I loved it, Buy it you wont be sorry well worth the money.
ET rocks!  I have had to buy five copies over the years as they keep disappearing.  Maybe I need to create a Library like check out system.
ET is a pretty good movie.
I watched this movie when I was a child and was so excited to watch it again with my children.  They loved it too!
I buy this one because it is one of my favorite movie.. A piece of art who make you dream, and put you back in your childhood.
Purchased for the grandchidren who need to see this wonderful family - we try to have Friday Night Movie Night at Grandma's House.
Bought this movie for my granddaughter who has NEVER seen it!  Always loved it myself---an AAA+++++ movie!
This movie is so cute. I love E.T. It's one of my all time favorite movie. I reccomand it to everyone. There's nothing I disliked.
One of the very many magical films Steven Spielberg has done over his career. A classic in every sense of the word.
Great Sci-Fi story it is now a classic
I love this item since i am big on aliens ufo stuff the ship is a good size and made well and plays the theme song from E.T.
I bought this for my grandchildren.  A great movie even so many years later.  They loved it!! Ages 3 and 5.
Very glad to own such a classic on Blu-Ray, along with Jaws, and soon Indiana Jones. No 80's Blu-Ray collection would be complete without E.T.!
I love E.T.  Who doesn't??  Great extras.  Great movies.  Great family night movie.  Disc was new and in good condition.
I have never seen combo like this. Its everything packed in one, and I love it! Plus, its a classic film that almost everyone loves.Worth the buy.
Classic movie that will be a favorite of generations to come. Have both the VHS and DVD and glad it is on blue ray
Awesome movie for an awesome price! Not much to really describe if you look at the trailer. Definitely worth a buy though.
Was so nice to revisit this wonderful movie with my little boy. He saw it for the 1st time! Glad we got it again!
In their 30's, kids watched their copies at home with wives.  Loved the movie as a child and enjoyed it also almost 30 years later!!
What do you say about a classic?  My kids loved it!  Definite recommendation for anyone.  The behind the scenes extras are wonderful and interesting.
Nothing more needs to be said than its ET!  Still one of the best family movies made!  Years of enjoyment potential with every purchase!
This is one of my favorite movies. It leaves me feeling very nostalgic for my childhood and I would recommend it to anyone!
Wonderful old movie kids have probably heard you talk about. Now you can show them on DVD and relive your childhood memories as well.
Great, great, great movie!  Never gets old or forgotton!  Elliot and E.T. showed the true meaning of real friendship and love. A great family movie!
My grand daughter watched it for the first time and love it! She thought it was one of the best movies ever. (age 7)
Good as it gets for family entertainment!  Funny - good story - very engaging with a good mix of characters.
I cried when I first saw it and cried when I saw it again.  Love this DVD and so do my grand kids
Classic and wonderful piece of Sci Fi film.  Am glad to have it in mypersonal library of films and recommend to everyone.
I loved this when it first came out and now my 5 year old Grand daughter and I are enjoying it again!
E.T. was one of Steven Spielberg's greatest movies. IT has action, comedy, and face it,, it is just a funny movie.
I have seen ET many times and I never get bored with it. It's cute, funny, serious, and most of all it has a lesson to be learned.
This product literally came a day after I ordered it.  Although a used disk, it played like it was brand new.
What can I say? It's the great American classic. Kids love this movie, super cute and I would watch it again.
This is a fun movie! It will capture your imagination and make you cry happy tears.  It's quite an emotional adventure.
Timeless classic my adult kids still love it. Great family movie!
An oldie but goody with extra footage included.  I just enjoy the movie and the human interest story. Shared it with my grandchildren.
Movie was priced at a reasonable price.  It was fun to watch this movie that I had not seen in yrs.  Great flick even now.
This is one of my favorite movies.  Young and old.  I'm so glad they put it in Blu-ray.  This is one you can watch over and over
great movie for kids and adults alike. great story. great acting. don't know about the new version / remake but it's a good movie.
I HAVE ALWAYS LOVE THIS MOVIE. IT IS JUST AGREAT MOVIE TO JUST SIT DOWN AND RELAX, ENJOY, AND WATCH.
The Blu-Ray Edition was everything I wanted it to be. I loved all the extras that were included in the package.
Great movies will always be great and this is no exception. I just wished that it had bloopers included..It was worth seeing this movie in blu-ray.
Because it has achieved a cult classic!  I enjoyed watching this movieand think everyone should see it - the movie got rave reviews!
One of my all-time favorite movies and wonderful on Blu-ray. I noticed things I hadn't before with the quality of it now.
I had forgotten what a completely delightful and entertaining story this was, until watching it again.  Truly a classic on so many levels.
Thank you for making this movie available for me to buy. I purchased it for my grankids and the really liked it.
love this movie, it was exactly what i wanted, working on a childhood collection. came in great condition and could not ask for any more!
For those of us who grew up in the 80's this is of the Best ,Brings back A lot of Memories.
This a great dvd at a great price. It's is just what we were expecting and we can't wait to watch it.
One of the best family movies that I have seen in a long time.  Great for the whole family to watch
One of Spielberg's bests. Why are reviews for this movie even necessary? Moving, touching, beautiful. That's all I can say highly recommended.
I just love watching this movie. Specially watching it with kids. To see their faces in amaze and excitement.  Never get tired of it
Love this as a child and still love this as an adult.  Perfect movie to sit with the whole family.
i read about this in a Leonard Maltin book, it was pretty cool.  it was funny how tough this high school was :-O  well...  it was pretty good.
the best movie i've seen all year, and probably the best i'll see all year.
One of my top favorite and now I have it in my hot lil hands! Product came to my home faster than I thought it would.Thanks
have yet to see a bad joseph gordon-levitt movie, this is not a let down, i was impressed with all the actors and writing.
An extremely funny look at office relationships. You will see people you work with and recognize all their (and maybe your own) foibles.
not really much to say about this show, either you love it or hate it.  the 1st season is kind of dry, but in a very funny way.
You should always buy used DVDs! It's cheap and as long as they work who cares if its New or not. Played perfectly and I love the office!!!!!
I order this with season two both was sent on time and package was good.
This episode is really funny.  It pokes fun at racial stereotypes, and how they affect the work place.
I used to work with people like this.  I wish I'd had been as creative as Jim.  That prank with the Jello is classic!
The Office, Season One is terrific.  Don't be expecting a full on season though... the first season was only 6 episodes.  Very, very funny though!
Got this for my husband!  He loves it!  This is his favorite season and it has the bloopers and missing scenes.
I LOVE THIS SHOW. IM ADDING THIS TO MY SERIES COLLECTION AND LOVE THE FIRST SEASON. I WISH THERE WERE MORE EPISODES
One of the funniest tv series in a long time. This is a must watch!
i can not get enough of the office. it is so funny and they got the humor spot on. keep it up. props
My teenage son and I both love the office.  I purchased this for us to watch together.  It was priced a little below what I could buy it for locally.
Very affordable!My favorite movie in the case is Crooklyn!I always loved that movie!Spike Lee did his Thang
I started on the Spike Lee &#34;tip&#34;...Why not?  Some of the best movies in a while and, &#34;get up off of that thing&#34;
I always loved this series when it was on TV. So happy to find it, receive it, and watch it over and over.
bought this of northern exposure to go along with my other seasons loved this show when it was on the t.v.
Great for my collection and I love this series. Highly recommend this to anyone to add to their collection Love it
Bought as a present but have seen the series on TV and it was funny and loved watching all the episodes.
To me, this is one of the best written series of shows in the entire selection. Entertaining and thought provoking, each episode is agem.
My mom and i love the show and i got this one for her for mother coming next mouth and she will love it.
I was happy to add this to my Northern Exposure collection. Looking at Washington makes me want to go there.
This is the best series I've enjoyed. Want Fleishman back. The many charcaters made this special.
My husband and I enjoy watching this show and are getting the whole series so we can see the show in it's entirety.
I am a huge Northern exposure fan and I have been looking to get the entire season.  I am happy it was available to get it used.
She's a Northern Exposure fan.  She loved them.  All arrived quickly and in good condition...I even watched most of them and kinda got hooked.
Great show! We got all seasons and watched them straight through. If you have never watched the entire series, you are missing a truly great tv show!
what a wonderful quirky show. i thought it was one of the better series out there. i wanna live in nome alaska with these characters.
The quirkiness continues. Each episode is funnier than the last. Enjoy the chemistry between the actors.
A very deep underlying story that is tragic is revealed and may be an intention of healing, awareness, understanding, and forgiveness.
Movie was exactly what I purchased. Movie had its funny moments but also emotional moments. Very good movie and item came exactly on time.
Wonderful little movie.  Very funny at times and very charming and serious at other times.  A movie not to be missed.
It was a strange movie at first, but It went from strange to heart breaking to heart warming.  Sometimes we need closure.
Considering its not the fastest moving movie, but its not supposed to be, everything is illuminated is amazing. such a great movie.
Powell and Loy are brilliant in ALL of these movies!They seem to bounce off each other as if they are a Perfect match!!
This set of DVD's arrived quickly and were a great price.  We have enjoyed these films again and again.  Thanks for making them accessible to us.
This was a very satisfying purchase. I got it for my Dad for his birthday and he loved it! Great sale price as well.
a great series with great actors.i just wish they had made more thin man movies together.loved the a&e highlight disc that was included also
I bought this set for my sister and gave it to her for Christmas.  She loves the Thin Man movies and loved this set.
POWELL AND LOY ARE A MATCH MADE IN HOLLYWOOD HEAVEN.  JUST SHOWS HOW SUPERIOR THE 30'S WERE.  FUNNY, CHARMING, ..... BUY IT!
My husband and I watch this every holiday season. Then we re watch it on New Years Eve. It is wonderful, we love Nick and Nora they are too funny.
Had these in tape,  When VCR broke had to get them on DVD. William Powell and Merna Loy are great together
The movie collection is everything I thought it would be, I love it, Especially the biography dvd that came with it.
This was requested as a Christmas Gift, it came just as pictured, and was enjoyed. Thank you Amazon for selling it.
VERY GOOD--WE LOVE ASSTA
What a hoot - love these two (and Asta)!
This collections has hours and hours of truly wonderful films of The Thin Man.  A true gem to be watched over and over again.
If you love Nick and Nora, you will love this set!!  Buy it today!!
They just don't make films like this anymore. Drama, crime and a pinch of humor. What more could you ask for.
All classic-film lovers must own this wonderful set. Sparkling, sophisticated, witty. . . loads of fun!
thank you for having these movies.  I have wanted them for such a long time.  I appreciate your timeliness in getting them to me.
The Thin Man movies were funny and sophisticated when they came out and remain so.  It seems rare today to find such rich dialogue.
I enoy these old movies. Great for my collection. mjt
The Thin Man collection is a must for any classic movie fan!  Filled with mystery and comedy from the best Hollywood couple, ever!!
Great movies, great comedy, and recorded nicely.  Plays well and sounds fine.  The price was right, too.  Thank you for offering this set!
The Thin Man collection tops off my collection of the Great detectives and has guest appearances of Charlie Chan and other great actors of the time.
Great movies!  Watched them for years on TV, haven't had time to watch them yet on DVD, but it was a great price at Xmas, for a present for myself.
As good as I remembered from when I was young.  Good quality. Nice choice. Family friendly, Clean language.  Just love the series.
Such a fabulous collection. Now I have them all and the price was so resonable. This is truly a must buy.
thin man is a great mystery from the old days. I enjoy the films, timeless movies for us all to watch.
Powell and Loy portraying Nick and Nora Charles ---  only Tracy and Hephburn or Doris Day and Rock Hudson could measure up --- great set!
What a good product. I watch them it all the time.It shipped very fast and was at my door in no time.
Arrived quickly and in perfect condition.  My parents have already watched all the movies and loved them!!
Good overall view of married couple work ethics-work and marriage can be edgy and enjoyable for solving crime. They are loyal to each other.
I've watched many mysteries in my life, but they're are none like the thin man mysteries!! Buy them trust me!!!
If you like the thin man movies this is the way to get all of them at once. These are great movies. Nick, Nora & Asta all together.
I love this classic series.  It takes you back to a glamorous era.  Witty and totally fun.
Funny and riveting. William & Myrna were perfectly matched together. Cocktail parties were never the same after that. Must have.
I gave this as a gift to an avid Myrna Loy fan. I could not have done any better. I catch her watch one of these nearly every week.
I received this item 15 days after I ordered it. Since I live in Croatia, I think it's amazing! And I received it in PERFECT condition!! :D
One Tree HIll is the best series ever. The storeies are very relateable. Couldn't stop watching. It is very addicting.
Very thrilled with this purchase.  Excellent show.  Everything with payment and shipping went smoothly & arrived in perfect condition!
i now have all of the seasons on dvd definately worth the money if your a fan of the show i recommend getting them all on dvd
this is one of my fav show thank you for selling to me hope too buy from you real soon
one tree hill is a great tv show . i like all of the actors and the shows this is my first season and it wont be the last.
I have always loved this show. I enjoy having this in at home now to watch the show when I want.
awesome, each DVD is great, lots of good stories and the actors are so real.  all new DVD's and just wonderful
On the whole I enjoy British television , more than US productions. This one us very entertaining as well as pleasant , the actors are all very good.
Great series- funny, entertaining, sweet and one you can watch again and again! I love owning this series so I can watch it anytime I want!
I brought this for a friend of mine and she enjoys the series. She is a major As Time Goes By fan. If she likes it You might also like it also.
I love the series and I love the two main actors. They are fantastic and the storyline is very touching.
I have enjoyed this series on pbs! It is delightful,and very funny. There is no blood,,guts orpain involved;just gentle humor.
I love this series As time Goes By.  Judy Dench and the cast are great to watch. I felt that I wanted to know them as possible neighbors.
My wife loves everything English and this is one of her favorite shows that she watches on BBC.  Now she can watch them without commercials.
Got this on special and it was well worth it.  My wife and I have several British comedies and mysteries.  We just love it all.  Thanks Amazon.
I believe I have seen all of these episodes over and over and it is one of my favorite love stories.
My husband and I have always enjoyed the comedies. We always watch on Saturdays. This story reminds me of us. It has as much dialog as Gilmore Girls.
I thoroughly enjoyed this series!  This is one of my favorite shows--I love British humor! Thank you so very much!
as time goes by just gets better 'as time goes by'. I love this series and wish there had been more done.
i have wanted this movie for over two years now. i am really glad to be able to get it thanks
This is such an adorable Christmas movie. Good for the kids and adults. Tom Hanks does an awesome job playing several roles
I felt like a child again! Just remind me about my happiest moments in life! Great movie! It's a must!
I got this as a Christmas gift for my husband since he hasn't seen it and it works great. Doesn't skip and the case looks great!
I become a child every time I watch this movie.  This is perfect to add to our holiday movie collection.
I absolutely love this movie, ever since it premiered in theathers I have watched it every Christmas! This is a wonderful story of simply believing.
I love this movie and am very happy I can share it with my children. I don't have many kids movies so I am working on building my childrens library.
We liked it so much, I picked up a copy to give to my kids for Christmas! Sweet holiday Fun!
Great movie for both kids and adults both.  The animation was superand made me feel like i was apart of the actions.
this was a rel nice movie that I have ever seen I realy enjoy it a lot while he was on the train
I rented this movie for my 3 year old and she was captivated, as so was I.  It's a great christmas family movie.  I love the production!
I LIKE THE MOVIE TOM HANKS DID AWESOME PERFORMENCE GO SEE IT I CAN'T WAIT TO COME ON DVD OR PAY PAPER VIEW
My grandsons will sit and watch this movie over and over again. They never tire of it. That is why I gave it 5 stars.
Always trying to watch this movie.One I those movies that definitely get me in the Christmas mood. Love it
One of my favorite Christmas movies, Tom Hanks did an excellent job on this one.  Certainly will entertain the whole family
I was really surprised how much I liked this movie.  The realistic look of the characters was really a cool part.
I have this movie and had to give as a gift! Amazing story for all ages. A must have in your Christmas library.
I bought this for my husband and son. They watch it every year at Christmas-time. The video works great, I have no complaints!
This holiday masterpiece contains outstanding special effects throughout.  Sure to be a holiday classic that everyone will own.  We all love it.
I loved the movie. It was fun ,and my grand kids really loved it so much, I had to give it to them.Thank you
What can I say! It is a fantastic movie I enjoy watching with the Grand kids! Great family entertainment at Thanksgiving!
Bought this for my grandson who is 9 years old. He really enjoyed watching it. Tom Hanks fantastic as usual.
I love this movie, so I know my grandsons will too! I never read the book but I am going to!
I had seen previews of this movie but had never seen it.  I was very impressed!  Totally adorable movie and I will be watching it a lot more!
My kids just love this movie especially my ten year old. He wants to watch it all the time. Thanks again!
Who can argue when Tom Hanks takes the parts of the conductor, Santa & who else in this timeless classic for young & old?
I gave this one away for a gift for Christmas, it is a classic but a good movie I am sure my niece enjoyed it. .
Excellent movie for the whole family. Entertaining and well done.
Wonderful for all audiences. Don't miss it. I bought one just for myself so I can relax in peace. Danka
Our kids really enjoy this movie at Christmas, it has become a tradition with our family to watch it some time between Thanksgiving and Christmas.
i have allways loved this move ans now i have it on kindle so i can watch it anytime at all
this is a great Christmas story, we really like and now our Grandson is also enjoying it, it is a great story done very well
Great Holiday movie for the family would recommend to anyone.  Will make you believe in Christmas all over again enjoy :)
This is a good movie for children although I love watching it as well...I am happy with my purchase and think it is a good Holiday movie.
I love this film and bought a second to make sure I would have mine when I let people borrow mine :)
This is one of the best movies that are children like to watch during Christmas time. Tom Hanks doesn't excellent job as does the director.
This is a must see kids and parents, both will love this movie (unless your name is Scrooge).Money and time well spent. NUFF said.
Arrived really fast, and was packaged really nice. This is a wonderful family movie. No matter what age you are this is a movie you will enjoy.
This is one of my all time favorite Christmas movies, I recommend for everyone who believes in Christmas and what it represents.
A delightful adaption of the Chris Van Allsburg book of the same name.  Will melt even the most devout Scrooge.
This is one great movie.  We love it and watch it over and over.  We had no problems with shipment, packaging or arriving on time.  Thanks
i did watched it n i lv it it is really good 4 kids n ta kids lv itlv it
I saw it for the first time and enjoyed it very much and will do so every Christmas.It was very entertaing.
There is nothing better than this movie at Christmas time.  Saint Nicholas and the Bells should ring for all to hear.
Words can not explain how good this movie is! it shocked me. perfect christmas eve movie to watch with the family and loved ones! HIGHLY RECCOMEND!
i would recommed it and it arrive when said and arrive in good shape and on time and good shape
Awesome movie! Our family watches it every year around Christmas! My son also loves it!! The blu ray version is better!!
This is how this movie was created to show.  I had been disappointed in our dvd version but I like it now in blu ray.
I'd forgotten how good this movie was for teaching about loyalty and bravery.  My grandkids loved it!
This movie is so adorable and makes you believe you are a kid again and Santa does exist. I like the graphics.
This movie was so well made and is a favorite Holiday movie in our household during the Holidays. LOVE IT!
My kids LOVE Trains and we have the book.  They love it and watch it all year long.  The love when the train is on the ice.  Great animation.
Every kid and adult should see the movie and read the book.  It's great!  They are beautiful and real Christmas classic.
This was an excellent story.  I had never seen this film before.  I watched it two times and it will now be apart of my holiday movie list.
I have many favorites during the holidays, but the hoidays are just not complete, unless I watch this several times during the season.
Tom Hanks is brilliant as this movie shows. He brings any movie he stars in to life. Playing several characters all together is excellent.
Gave this to my favorite friend's grand daughter for Christmas.  It was an instant success and is a mainstay of every Christmas visit since then.
Heard about this from coworkers and they said it would be a good movie to purchase.  I have not watched it yet but will soon.  It came super fast.
I rate this movie 5-Stars. This movie is very entertaining and contains beautiful graphics. I recommend to friends and family.
Very special Christmas movie.  I watch it every Christmas season....................Makes the joy of Christmas in children come alive for all ages.
a must see in 3D this is amazing !!! a whole new experience to view this now ! love it .
It was very good. I loved it and everyone else in my family did too. It was so christmasy and cheerful. See it.
I love this movie and it looks even better on blu ray. This is a great addition to my collection.
My wife and I watch this movie every Christmas Eve. We never tire of it. We never just say &#34;hot&#34;, we say &#34;hot, hot, hot&#34;.
We had the full screen version, but really wanted the Blu-Ray version for such a good movie.  The kids love it.
THIS IS A REALLY GREAT MOVIE WITH LOTS OF THINGS TO SEE.  THIS MOVIES IS REALLY GREAT FOR CHILDREN.
The 3D in this bluray is awesome!  I've watched this movie in 3D probably 10 times already and I can't get enough of it!
Classic movie, on Christmas Eve, a doubting boy boards a magical train that's headed to the North Pole and Santa Claus's home. Great.
Good movie for Christmas time. It has become a family favorite in my house. We make sure to watch it the week of Christmas.
This is a one of a kind movie.  I new I would buy it the day I watched it.  Fantastic
We enjoy this movie a lot, it is now a part of our Christmas veiwing traditions. Anything that includes Tom Hanks is #1 in our book.
Again, one of my favorite Christmas music. If you're not feeling the Christmas Spirit, this is a great movie to help boost your mood! 5 stars!
An unbelievable and exceptionally well computer animated Christmas story that is destined to be a classic. Highly recommended.
I rented this movie to show my kids.  We used to own it, but I couldn't find it anywhere.  They loved it.
Fabalous movie to watch with younger kids. The graphics are so realistic it is amazing. Polar Express is a wonderful movie.
It's a classic. Every home should have a copy. My grandson loves it. I ordered one in 3d also but my husband and I couldn't see very well.
This is another movie to add to your list of holiday favorites!  I would highly recommend this up and coming family classic.
I purchased this DVD as a Christmas gift for my Granddaughter.  It is wonderful fun and a true delight.
They kids loved wearing the little paper 3D glasses.  The movie is so great, we also purchased an updated version!
The kids really love this movie. So do a lot of the adults. A holiday classic that we watch every year.
This movie shows all the magic of a magical season. Nothing else to say...this is CHRISTMAS perfection. Graphics are beautifully done.
The kids loved it! Wonderful gift for them.  They watch it all the time.  Love the movie...great pic for them
All the fun and mystery of Christmas and belief. The artwork is stunning and, in 5.1 sound, very compelling auditorily.
Just the best movie - full of fun and enjoyment.The acting is so good and fun to watch.Thank You.
This is such a fantastic movie.  It can be watched over and over.  Our favorite scene is where the waiters serve hot choc o late.
Love this movie had one before and got ruined my  3 year old grandson never moved through the whole movie it was very cute and peaceful:)
I had this movie once before, but it got lost. I had it DVR'd, but it got deleted. It was so worth the $9!
MY GRANDSON LOVES TRAINS AND LOVES THIS MOVIE.  HE LOVES WATCHING IT OVER AND OVER AGAIN.  A REAL CLASSIC.  WOULD HIGHLY RECOMMEND.
It's just a wonderful movie. It's great for all ages, all of my kids love it and they are 6, 3, & 1.
This has to be one of the best Christmas movies ever made.  My 3 & 5 year old grandsons love it and watch it year round.
This is one of the best 3d movies i have seen. My daughter and family love this movie a great addition to our collection.
I bought this for my daughter and we watch it every year. She loves it. Great story and animation.  Highly recommended.
Love this movie! Watch it every Christmas! Holiday Classic! I wish the train was real, I would so go on it!
I can watch this movie over and over again. The product arrived on time in excellent condition and I plan to enjoy this for years to come.
Extremely well done movie with the music and the voices used with the animation. Great plot worth going over every year and anytime in between.
POLAR EXPRESS will become one of the 20th Century's best holiday classics.  A true work of art.  Every family should own both the book and the DVD!
Great holiday movie for the entire family.  Entertaining and fun.  If you don't have this movie for your holiday collection, I highly recommend it.
This really touched my heart and reminded me of the joy I used to feel as a child around Christmas. Even the music in movie is extremely good.
This is one of my wife's favorite holiday season movies.  It's clean and well produced! The family values are good (charity and not being selfish).
My kids watch this movie weekly during the Holiday Season.  It is awesome and you need to see it if you haven't
We do love our Christmas movies and this is now another fave! A must see for those who love Christmas!
A great story and my son's favorite Christmas show.  He never tires of it and it seems to drive the spirit of the holidays home
This is a great classic movie. We watch it all year long not just at Christmas. My grandson loves anything to do with Trains.
wonderful dvd and a great classic to have on hand for the young and young at heart
I love this movie! Watch it every year. I am SO glad Chris van allsburg agreed to make this movie. I will watch this movie tommorow at school.
For you 3D fans this is a terrific movie. The depth of the 3D effects were incredible and the story is fantastic.
IMO, The Polar Express is simply THE BEST animated movie to date!!!  The detail is simply stunning!!  What more can I say.....
WE all need to believe some times. A simple message, but profound. Pop some popcorn, gather your family around, and enjoy.
Saw this in standard format, but in 3D it was absolutely great. Almost makes you feel that you are there
An enchanting tale for all ages.  Destined to be a Christmas classic.Special fun if you love trains, as our family does.
Loved the movie, effects, and Tom Hanks.  It really captures the true meaning of Christmas.  Recommend it to all.  Thanks, Robert.
I purchase Polar Express, to add to my Christmas movie collection and as usual found it at a great price on Amazon.
This movie is a very good movie,A  Train Ride To The North Pole To See Santa Claus, there are very happy kids.
GREAT MOVIE IN 3-D. BETTER IN 3-D THEN REGULAR FORMAT. KIDS ALWAYS LIKE THIS MOVIE. WATCH ANY TIME OF THE YEAR.
One of the favorite movies for Christmas, I love the story, kids are watch it all the time, my husband love 3D in this movie.
This movie even made it into my husbands heart. Tom Hanks is amazing in everything he does...even when he is animated.
This movie is a classic already and everyone with or without kids should have a copy to watch every Christmas season forever and ever.
Great Story!! The grandkids loved it. I love the HD! It also has 3D, but I don't have the right equipment to see it.
Great Christmas movie purchased for kids.  Excellent graphics.  Everyone enjoys watching it.  Tom Hanks is wonderful in this.  Great voice choice.
This movie touches my heart - a definite classic I can't wait to share with my kids. A must-see Christmas movie!
This is a great movie that is fun for all ages. I have a four year old and two year old and they both love it. Great animations and great story line!
Had to get this to keep for my Grandchildren to watch and for me to watch. Love Christmas movies and this is one of our favorites. So original.
Love this movie.  Watch it multiple times every year, and it is awesome!  Just upgraded to Blu-Ray, and wanted it for my collection.
Heart warming show good for the young and old in the family. My children loves it and watches it again and again. Good for keeps.
so glad i was able to finally get this movie at a reasonable price so i can play it for the grandkids at xmas time.
very good  movie & very enjoyable. I would order it for a gift for anyone that would want a copy of this movie.
This is one of my all time favorite movies with Tom Hanks, the graphics are awesome, and the DVD's are in great condition, thank you.
I loved the story, I loved Tom Hank doing multiple roles and it waas in great condition.
have to watch this every year i bought on amazon digital so was able to let my kids children watch miles away love you amazon prime
Can't wait for the holidays to put this movie in and BELIEVE again. Thank you for letting my kids still have the hope and BELIEVE in the dreams.
This is my son's favorite movie on earth.  A Christmas favorite for all of us.  So glad to have it as part of our collection.
This movie was bought to have at Christmas time.  When family gets together during the holidays, Everyone loves to watch this movie.
Polar Express is a wonderful magical movie.I purchased this DVD for my nephew's girlfriendfor Christmas and she loves it!
The 3D aspect of this film was better than expected, picture and audio quality great, and the movie itself was great too!
ONE OF THE BEST ANIMATION OF ALL TIME IT IS SO CHRISTMAS. AND IT'S REGION FREE. AUSTRALIA
The story and the movie graphics are enjoyable for both young and old.  This, in my opinion, is a true Holiday classic.
My son loves trains and watched this over and over. It's a great film and I would highly recommend it!
Every child needs to see this movie. My three year old is now obsessed with the Polar Express. Our family enjoys this movie.
A whole family must see and own because you'll watch it again and again, year after year and love it and enjoy it more and more every time.
Kids will love this movie for the story and adults will love the movie for the CIG.  Tom Hanks in it doesn't hurt either.
This is a wonderful Christmas movie for all the family.  It has a good moral to the story that children can understand.  A classic!
Eventhough the movie came out before 3D was popular, the 3D adds a lot to the film.  I recommend adding it to your 3D collection.
The 3D in the movie is a great touch and the family and I loved the story. Tom Hanks plays a great narrator in this good christmas movie.
&#34;The Loved One&#34; by Evelyn Waugh starringRobert MorseOdd & quirky but well worth a look. Liked it better than the book
Comedy doesn't get much darker than this.A brutal satire of the funeral-industrial complex, you'll never thin k of Forest Lawn the same way...
This movie is wonderfully twisted, dark, and so over the top ridiculous that you groan and laugh at the same time.
....of the funeral business. Jonnathan Winters is priceless!
This is a lost classic which should be revisited. It's entertaining, strange at times & just plain good. Have fun with this strange, complex movie.
3 movies for a low price was perfect. it was hard to find these and now I can finally give my mom a great mother's day gift!
Wonderful film for kids and adults.  The scenery is beautiful and the story is touching.  Make sure to have a hankie at the ready!
Wonderful triple Lassie DVDs. In great condition; sound and video perfect. Great gift for young ones who enjoy animal movies.
I have seen all of these movies at various times on various television stations and just love them.  It will be nice to have in my film library
One of Robert Mitchems better films. Good story line and good acting. If you like American films about our relations with Japan it s a great film.
Just when you think it can't get better, it does. One Tree Hill gets even better as each new series begins. You can't stop watching!
Wonderful price, shipping, everything!  I love One Tree Hill & I was so excited to see these in my mailbox so soon after making the payment!
A must have for the One Tree Hill lover and collector.  My daughter loves this show and wanted the whole collection.  Great for teen girls.
The DVD works perfectly,the delivery was fast and would happily do business with them again.
thank you i love this show i have all the seasons i wish they would make more my fav character ios lucas he is so hot lol thank you
Great series with lots of drama and wonderful actors! this set will keep you interested and coming back for more!
I love One Tree Hill and the third season is my favorite season! I loved it! Awesome show! Awesome season! ;)
Definitely one of the best seasons of this show!I couldn't stop watching & I got other people hooked on this show as well(:
love this series. keeps going strong. characters r great and u feel entranced with it. I love watching this show!!
love one tree hill. My girls are really getting into it and loving it also,  Really enjoying it.  Thank you.
If you have Season I and II, you need this one.  It is very good.
I loved watching it.  I was so disappointed when they took it off the air. Maybe antoher station would pick it up.
Good show love Chad Michael Murray, and the rest of the cast. Thanks to my daughter I got caught up in this series.
Wow, what a movie! I agree that it would have been neat to see the boy with his mom and dad past the concert. A sequel would have been good!
Love the music and the story line. Highly recommended for all people, men, women or children. The movie brings back some good memories for me.
watched this with friends awhile back and we were all touched by this lovely exquisite mystical film; can't wait to share it with others
I loved this movie and the soundtrack for it!! The DVD showed up when I expected, in perfect condition and was a great purchase.
This is a really good movie about a young boy who just wants to find his mom and dad and all the while his mom and dad are trying to find each other.
It was a very poignant story showing with a message to have faith and never give up . Very inspiring.
Love this movie. Really good and touching story. Wanted to own it. Music in it is great.
This was an excellent movie of love and perseverance I loved the story and the acting was great. I would rent it again.
I really love this movie.  It is one that I will watch over and over.  I hope that anybody who loves kids and music would buy this movie.
From the first time I saw this movie, I knew it was destined to be on my all time favorite list!
Perfect characters for this movie.  Loved the music and magic.  Will not tell you the story and spoil it for you.  A must see and keep.
Great movie,  One for most of the family to watch.  Great music and even greater story line.  I would highly recommend.
There is nothing I do not love about this movie. It has been in my top five for several years. It is a beautiful unique love story with so much more.
Very good movie. My wife really enjoyed it. A heartwarming story and some good music. You'll probably watch it more than once as she as done.
My granddaughter and I watched this movie and it was so great and touching. Great ending. It's a must see movie.
This is really a sensitive movie and a sad one with a boy that never give up on his belief nor his ability. I really love it.
This movie is such a &#34;feel good&#34; movie and all the actors did a great job. Loved to hear Jonathan Rhys Meyers singing.
Love this movie.  Makes me cry every single time I watch it!  I have seen it at least.......20 times.  Love it.
I've seen this movie twice before and enjoyed it just as much the third time. Music does unite us all.
Touching, fun, heartwarming story. Loved the movie. I rent movies from Amazon on a fairly frequent basis and I'm usually always pleased.
I was pleased with this product. It was in the condition I was told it would be in and I received it in a timely manner.Thank you,
I love this movie was such a sweet and loving story. The movie came in great condition and super fast.
I first saw this on TV and loved it and bought the DVD.  I don't mind watching a great movie several times.
Had to have it. All the actors are great, love the storyline, music, everything about the movie. I would tell everyone to get it.
I love every character in this movie. Is refreshing ,simple, and the music in it is  very good. Is a lovely movie.
i enjoyed this video so much that i got one for my sister for her birthday. she likes it very much.
i saw august rush yesterday i brought the dvd it was excellent a great story to it great acting and great cast
I and the family really enjoyed the movie. Very touching and good to find something not filled with foul words.
What's not love about a story of a talented young boy who was empowered by a Mom who believed in him.  Rev. Dr. Jim Rush
This is a great movie.  Bought it as a gift for a friend.  They will love it to. Thank you.
Great movie. This started my love for Jonathan Rhys Meyers. He is fantastic and So is this movie. Good times!
This is one of my family favorite DVD, It is so will played and it really touches your heart, Great price as well
I believe we are all connected. This movie is plausible fantasy. It's about love, too. And faith. And hope. Watch it if you want to feel good.
I Loved this movie, music has always touched my heart and the story line if a little far fetched is great!
Loved the movie.  Its one of my favorites!  will definately watch it again. I like older movies and I have my favorites and its one of them.
Great Movie.  I loved the whole thing.  I have seen it several times because the message is great.  I would recommend this movie.
Great movie , saw it along time ago and just had to have it as part of my collection. Would recommend
This is a really great movie, am so glad I have it. It's the kind ofmovie you could watch over and over again. It's very moving.
Wonderful music and a beautiful story line with lots of good sounds along the way.  A heart warming movie  that most would enjoy.
Bought this movie for a friend and they love it so much. Ordered form amazon.com and got so much in return.
I love this movie. Probably because I'm a pro musician. Its quite touching and I throuw it in every now and then to watch it. Good investment.
If you are a college football nutcase like myself; it is a must see movie. Thanks again for the sale and the service.
If you love Football and Notre Dame and stories of great coaches and their positive influence on young men, see this.
Always wanted film on my collection came as promised. The  quality was great. The movie does not go down in price so order it when you see it
You cannot miss with this. I catch it on TV way to seldome. I bought it and watch it often now, especially when I have a tough week.
This movie was just as I remembered it, great special effects, and a great adventure.
well not the best movie but hey its still Super Girl I just wish it had superman with her in it.
I am a huge fan of all Superman movies and television shows. This includes the Supergirl movie and television appearances.
Classic movie not much else to say. Saw this when I was younger, a little cheesy now but still a good movie.
Two great movies. one low price. Family friendly. Had to sell a previous copy to make ends meet. Was glad to find it again. I missed these movies.
Beautiful scenery in both movies. A charming and a delightful entertainment to be enjoyed by all ages. A great buy.
these to movies give the same kind of feel good entertainment. it's good to have them on the same dvd and for the price of one
These are two of my very favorite movies.I was pleased to have a DVD with both included.Have watched both - will watch many more times.
good tv movies for the family. a little princess and the secret garden, both cute movies, that's how u keep them busy
You should buy this product. Both movies are fantastic! You won't be disappointed. They are both classics. The actors are spectacular.
Great Movies! I introduced them to my nieces and they loved them :-) She is now reading the book because she liked the movie so much.
These are two great movies for the price of one. Your kids will love them.
This a two sided DVD disk, and was in great condition! I love these movies. Really took me back to my childhood! Great family films!
I love this movie as a child, and so I got it for my 9 yr old to show her to appreciate what she has in life, not everything is promised!
This series got me hooked from the beginning since I am a native of Los Angeles.  There was always something familiar about the locations.
One of the very best ever on TV. So well written and the cast is perfect. Each one fills a role and is so like able.
I always like &#34;Brenda  she is a smart tough women who kicks ass and takes names with southern smiles all around
I love this show! I watch the reruns @3 am everyday. I think it is one of the best shows that TNT has on the air.
My husband and I love this series. We enjoy watching them together. Was very sorry to see it end but understand why they did.
So glad to have this series on Amazon! I did not watch it while it was on TNT until reruns.I was hooked!
TV does not get any better. Great plots, excellent characters, superb acting, and the occasional sense of humor. You will be completely drawn in.
Great surprise when I saw one of the best TV shows ever made offered for viewing. Thank yew so much..
Another favorite to add to a growing collection of SEASON ONE TV series.  Brenda Lee Johnson is a unique character than cannot be forgotten
Wow! kyra Sedwick is amazing! She always gets her man! She keeps on until she gets the truth!I like her style!
The Closer is one of my favorite shows.  I like all of the characters and their families.  Best show ever! Now I can catch up on missed episodes.
I had only saw a few of the end episodes on tv and am happy Amazon has it streaming! I just started Season one and love the series!
I will recommend it to friends that can accept that it is kind of real, kind of theater-a good mix!
Brenda Lee is a great character. The writers really know how to give her a deep and very human back story, Fun to watch.
I loved this show and if you liked it too, then you most definitely need to buy these.  I can't wait till I get the complete series.
Totally awesome!  I love this show!  Cant wait to watch the rest of the shows.  Glad I have Amazon Prime!!
Good detective work and humor make the First Season stellar.  Serious issues and a form of diverse logic expand to make this series interesting.
Really enjoyed this show & all the episodes. Never got bored with any episode, & I like how each episode falls together.
I am so happy that you offer so many seasons of the Closer in Prime, I love the show. Thank you
I watched this from the very first episode and every year thereafter. Now I like watching it from the beginning.
The characters are what makes a good show. Lets face it, it has all been done. These characters work great together.
I like this TV show.  I hadn't seen some of the shows.  Enjoyed catching up.  I am now watching the show that took The Closers place on TNT station.
This was very entertaining. Lots of funny parts because the guys did not want to accept her as deputy chief.
This introduced complex characters with a well written script that included a lot of twists & turns without being overly violent.  A true delight.
Great acting, directing, and writing with this T.V. show. Never predictable and the characters are always develpoing. Good story lines.
very good story line and interesting, strong woman who is very intelligent.  I also like her staff:  all races included
I didn't watch it while it was prime time because I worked too much. Now I can enjoy what I missed. Often episodes with unexpected endings. Love it.
The Closer has been one of the best shows on TV.  I never missed an episode when it was on and now love watching it again from the beginning.
Show is a winner. Action, adventure, murder, mystery and  who did it. All under one roof and high class production.
Kyra Sedgwick is amazing in the Closer.  She is smart and funny.  I just keep on watching. Would recommend to anyone.
This is a great series. Kyra Sedwyck is wonderful in this show. Worth the money.
This was my first chance to view this interesting series.  Great story lines and acting.
I have become addicted to this series.  Interesting to see how each character's personality has grown.  Looking forward to the next season.
My mom loved the shows so got the DVD so she can. Watch when she wants.  She was really pleased to receive them.
I lile this show.  The video quality is great.  It's great that I can get all the seasons. like it
Great 'who done it' that weaves in multiple story lines which is executed by a talented cast.  Well worth watching but be careful it is addictive.
This is a great addition to any DVD collection. I would highly recommend this DVD for anyone who likes this TV series.
I didn't start watching it until it was into its 4th season.  But thanks to my Prime membership, I get to watch the shows I missed.
I enjoyed the show, so now i can watch it anytime. I received it in a timely manner and in excellent condition. I highly recommend it.
For me the season started slowly but as it grew and the characters emerged it captured me.  Totally enjoying this series!
I so miss the Closer, from the first to last show this was a great series. Cast, Writing, & Directing top notch across the board.
Great cast, interesting stories--really enjoy The Closer!  It is fabulous when a TV series makes you want to stay home so you don't miss a thing.
You must add this to your watch list.  I love you can watch all of the series at your leisure
Great acting and excellent story line. Love watching without commercials. Prime video keep the great shows coming and worth it all.
Great characters, great humor, great drama.I recommend it to anyone that enjoys the above mentioned attributes of the show.
I love this pilot and the entire series.  Sorry to see that it has gone off but at least we have these to watch and enjoy.
Great show! A good mix of humor, tragedy, and real emotions....hated that Kyra left the show but it ended well.
Each episode is unique and the woman who is the &#34;closer&#34;, Kyra Sedgewick, is a great actress. Highly recommend to all!
make such good detectives! This is a great show and I hope it lasts for a long time.
Miss Deputy Brenda Lee Johnson!  Great to see all the episodes on Amazon Prime!  These episodes are great and missed.
The Closer series are well written, well acted and so entertaining!  Kyra Sedgwick is a wonderful actress - love her character!  Highly Recommend!
Very well written Stories and a strong, believable cast. What more could you ask for in an hour long program.
Great show. Really enjoyed it. The lead cast does a really great job of holding your attention as a viewer.
I have enjoyed this series.  A good cast of characters fighting crime.  The first season establishes the characters and as the team comes together.
It's a clean, witty, comedy and good for the family.Kyra is a fiesty original and sneaks up on the enemy in a strange direction, how fun.
Great show I love all the actors on this show  wish there was more of them very sad it's not on yt any more
I love detective shows that let you think and solve a crime while the characters interact, Can't wait to watch the next seasons.
I will never get tired of this show and just love Brenda. I recommend this show to everyone. You will not be sorry.
My husband and I both like this program.  Never watched it when it  first came on reg. TV.  Like the whole cast.
This is a very good season for this show I think it's the best one,she is a closer.against all odds Brenda makes her case
I was glad to get this season and will be looking for the rest. Miss this show. I also liked Major Crimes.
I think the cast of this series is not only great, but is a good match to one another. I'm truly sorry that the series is now dead.
This is also a really really good TV show! I never used to watch and now I am addicted and watch almost every day!
I love Kyra Sedgewick. She is a great actress who shows her versatility in this character. So glad to find how refreshing she can be in this series.
it is gritty, witting and very entertaining. a love a woman being strong smart and in control.i strongly recc'dgle recc'd
Love this show so much I had to have all 7 seasons! Gives me drama and comedy and great characters!!
I hated to see the series end with Kyra.  I have watched Major Case and like it as well, but Brenda Johnson is very much missed
I love, love, love,  love the Closer and being able to watch it on my Kindle is great and convenient.
I enjoyed watching this season and plan to watch all the rest.  I enjoyed it on tv and even now.
Never say this TV program before I got my kindle fire for Christmas.  Love this program.  Great to watch when I travel by air.
One of my favorite shows which has since finished its final season and I want to collect seasons.  Will be ordering other seasons.
Enjoying this well performed series.  All the main actors are very good at their craft.  Of course, the writing on this series is exceptional.
I saw the movie years ago and loved the movie. I just wanted a copy for myself that I could look at when I wanted to see it again.
The movie "Breezy" was well written and William Holden was a great actor who always makes the movie seem very realistic.
what a series. wish i had it in bluray. i am watching it now. i can't get enough of it.
This was one of my favorite series and I am now able to rewatch it as many times as I wish to.
I actually bought this for my son. But I loved the series when it was on TV and plan on watching again.
This is such an incredible set. So many shows and backstage backstories.This is the kind of set a show like this deserves
The West Wing has proven to be even more enjoyable ten years later.Just as timely now as it was when it first appeared on our TVs.
I love this series!  It is purfect for those that are interest in politics and like funny bantor.  The whole set is expensive, but it is worth it.
I love the file cabinet style packaging.  So far, we've only watched the first DVD but found no problems with it.
Best investment i ever made! If you are a West Wing fan, pick up this collection. You will not be sorry!
One of the best shows ever.  Great to beExcellent able to have a marathon of this and see the changes as the administrations changed.
The product is as advertised. West Wing fans will have the ability to review all the episodes plus more extra items.
The DVDs come in handy folders that smack of Government work, and make it easy to organize and find the DVDs you want.
All I will say is this film looks and sounds brilliant on blu ray. A must for your collection.
An excellent and realistic film depicting many relevancies to our own lifestyle and the world we choose to believe in.
Truly a great movie!  I do not believe it did the best in reviews, but I highly recommend you checking it out at least once to judge for yourself!!
Thought it was well done considering it didn't have a huge, huge budget. Any fan of the comic books should love the movie.
It's fun having movies that you want to watch once a year on the same day.  This has become one of those classics.
very awesome movie to watchwas very interested throughout the whole time while watching it.cant get enough of it. Love it
Great movie! I have watched this multiple times! The story, acting and action are excellent! Wish I owed a copy.
I liked it.  Even my cousons who don't like a lot of the same movies as me liked it. It is a must see movie.
Very powerful show. Well directed great acting.  All politians should be required to watch this movie.
This movie is definitely in my top ten of all time. Too much awesomeness for words. FREEDOM FOREVER!
We both love the film after watching it. I would recommend this for someone looking for a great movie to watch.
this has been a favorite movie of mine for several years; Amazon had a great price and I bought it.
It has one flaw and that is that it does not give a good background of why the world is the way it is at this time. Otherwise a great film.
One of the best movies I've ever seen! It has fast become my favorite movie and the special features are aboslutely amazing!
Great movie I really enjoyed it. It arrived on time in great shape. I have no complaints. A must buy for action fans
This is a very good movie about a bold charismatic freedom fighter driven to exact revenge on those who disfigured him.  It is a very good movie.
Especially today, the frustration of many about the workings of the govt play out in this film. Great story well done.
Congratulations to the Director and actors on making a visually stunning and interesting film akin to 1984 by Huxley. Portman is stunning even bald.
its a great movie and a great gift. he loved it and I would recommend it. 4 stars all the way
V for Vendetta is how to do an adaption right no matter what Alan Moore might say, A must buy if you liked Watchmen in any format.
Terrific movie. Action. Man vs. The government. Not for young children- probably my not pre-teens. They won't get the content and there is violence.
Well, I bought this over a year ago and still haven't watched it.  lol  But it's a great movie.  Natalie Portman in high definition = win.
I will keep my review brief as everyone else shares their opinions of V and such...Bravo to the cast & crew of this fine film. A job well done.
Great movie. An absolute classic I can enjoy watching over and over again. I highly recommend this film. Definitely one of Hugo Weaving's finest.
Vendetta was very passionate, with various mysterious puzzelments and shocking twists. A very bold movie, I loved it.
What Can Be Better Than Buying A Great Movie For Less Price? I Really Love It! Would Recommend It To Everyone.
Really good movie. Blu-ray quality is the way to go for this flick. Buy it and get your popcorn ready!
I was always wanting to see this move. I heard guys at work talking about the underground part. I bought it, I of my favorites.
Love this movie. I found the price, quality and content to be exactly what I was looking for. Worth the price.
Very pleased with purchase and would highly recommend to anyone. As you can see I'm a movie buff and this this is a great movie.
I have never watched the movie. Bought it as a gift, so now he and I can watch it together! Arrived very timely and seems perfect.
It came in good condition and I've watched it several times already. I first saw this movie on tv years ago. it was just as good as I remembered.
i think that this is one of the best movies i seen in a long time
I really like this movie and both Hugo Weaving and Natalie Portman do a great in it. It has action, suspense and all the good stuff
V for vendetta is one of my favorite movies, I like this movie and enjoy watching it, no matter how many times.
truly is a great movie! i can watch it over and over again! you definitely can't beat this price either
A really, really good film! I wish that it hadn't taken me this long to see it! It has a unique plot and is superbly acted. I highly recommend it!!
You really need to see this movie. It was one of the best movies I have ever seen.That is all I will say.
I have seen this movie about 5 times and I love it......very very moving.It gives you something to think about.
Brilliantly done movie.  I just love this flick.  You need to use your brain for this one.  Thought provoking and entrancing.  Love it!
The classic anti-government film.  Shows the potential abuses inherent in statism.  And you have to love the Guy Fawkes masks.
Loved the Movie! Loved the message! great action, great adventure! This one is one of my all time favorites! Natalie Portman too!!!!
I was watching this film once every week and I can still remember part of the scenarios and quotes from it. Is really a master piece.
An awesome and haunting fantasy of the future. Excellent story, emotional musical score, and superb acting. I highly reoommend it.
My son (age 39) loves this movie and watches it several times a year. I did not see it myself, so it's difficult to give a proper review.
Great film. Impressive commentary. Stunning visuals.  Glimpse of the future, perhaps? Vivid slice of the present, without question.
One of my favorite movies, I also like the digital version I can log into Amazon and watch it anywhere.
awesome movie. If you look around its scary how accurate the movie, with the world as it is today. definetly give this movie a watch!
This movie is amazing. Very inspiring and worth your time to watch! Natalie Portman kills it. You will not be sorry you watched this.
Lots of great actors in this cast!  My ex-girlfriend had a thing for Zac Efron movies so I got this one for her.  This was a great movie!!!
Great story and a movie about Orson Welles.  Transition movie for a young talent, Zac Efron, he did a good job along with the ensemble cast.
I give this product five stars because it is one of my favorite movies.  I highly recommend this product for all to see.
I've rememdered this series on PBS and was fascinated on the history of the language and happy to view it again with better understand.
I'm 25 years old, and still enjoy watching this show and playing the video games. Even though I own the dvd, I also watch it on netflix
Pokemon is fun to watch for parent and child.  I found it funny and witty; and I have become a fan, too!
It's been great being able to watch this show again. I used to watch it all of the time when I was a kid.
this movie is so stupidly funny, its the only movie that i can watch over ten times, its just so funny and entertaining
Purchased this after seeing bits and pieces of the movie on tv.  My husband wanted to watch it also.  Good movie on how bullying affects kids.
The Benchwarmers, perfect DVD!  Thanks for selling the DVD, I will definitely use your site to buy more!  Sent good to the owner.
I LOVE THE REFERENCES OF STAR WARS, SALUDOS DESDE MEXICO, GREETINGS FROM MEXICO.Many tortillas and pi&ntilde;atas FOR ALL, YOU SEE
this is going to be one of them Classics's that you want to watch over and over again, good story line too
This movie was a great children movie.  It turned grown men into fathers and people who increased their responsibilities at home.
Excellent movie!  Funny as all get out.  Glad to have it in my collection.  The sharp picture is great!
My kids (ages 11 & 9) loved this movie as it has lots of goofy humor. If you liked Napolean Dynamite then this is recommended.
A movie that shows how people treat others that they see has nerds. Had a great story line where the underdogs come out in top
I bought this movie as a gift for a friend.  This movie is very funny.  I've only seen it once.
Let's see...Good inspiring story line...No profanity...No suggestive material....What else can I say but: Great!!
Bought this as a Christmas present and my friend loves it. He says that it doesn't skip and it works great overall!
Watch the training scene between Grant Taylor and the football team on youtube. Enough said.
I ENJOYED IT.. I DON'T LIKE THAT I HAVE TO TYPE A STORY JUST TO LEAVE A RATING/ THAT SUCKS
This movie is a very good movie for families to watch together. Faith based, good moral values taught.  One that everyone should watch
I love this show.  Series got better as the number of movies grew.  Love it. Great to share with family for sure.
Received quickly and in great condition.  We were so pleased we order more copies for family members.
Tired of not finding a movie the whole family can enjoy?  Well, look no further.  Great Movie, and Great message.  A+++++
This movie is great and edifying lots of hidden wisdom woven through out the movie. Very exciting and well done.
I love it... i rate it a 5.. i recommend people to buy it. It is a very awesome movie..
A wholesome, family-friendly movie that conservative families can watch without previewing before their children see it.
Another awesome faith based film . Goid morals.  Keeps your attention.  Makes you cry laugh and feel good about life
Win or lose, give all the glory to God. You can't beat that. The movie had a good story to tell as well. A great family movie.
Terrific movie about faith and how it changes everything in the right way when you give your life up to the Lord.
I highly recommend this movie.The message of NEVER LOSE HOPE is clear.WITH GOD NOTHING IS IMPOSSIBLE.GREAT FAMILY MOVIE.
This movie is very well done.  It will have you on your feet and off your seat.  It will have you reaching for a tissue.  Great movie.
Watched this movie on regular tv and wanted to buy it so I can watch again whenever I want. Definitely recommend it.
This is a great movie for the young and old. Acting is not bad, but the story line is something we ALL need to apply to our lives!
I love this movie. I think that the casting was spot on. Just adding to my collection of Christian movies.
Bought one for myself and my dad.  My dad loves it and my son loves it also.  Inspirational to them and myself.
This is a great addition to any DVD collection. I would highly recommend this DVD for anyone who likes this movie.
TouchingGreat story line and messages for all people.Must see for people in leadership positions.Make more like this
I usually don't like football movies, but someone had suggested it to me and I am glad they did. Kudoes
WOW! Thank you for such fast delivery! I love it! Plus, the movie is very, very inspirational and I recommend it to everyone. Joan
Great movie for anyone. Buy it. It shows the importance of faith in God, and giving all you life and heart to him.
Thank you for this film.  It is passionate and inspiring.  Nicely done by a group of mostly amateurs (see the extras)!
Great movie. This is one of the best movies we've ever seen. Very inspirational & encouraging. Beating all odds. Is great for the whole family.
This movie is amazing.  I watched it once and then decided to buy myself a copy of the movie.  Great for anyone!
THIS IS A VERY ENJOYABLE CHRISTIAN MOVIE THAT THE WHOLE FAMILY CAN ENJOY...I AM SO GLAD THAT I ADDED TO I AND MY HUSBAND'S MOVIE COLLECTION
This is a must see movie, it was put together really well has life lessens everyone can learn from. I would purchase it again.
movie about perseverance and trusting in more than self; no explicit scenes and language clean; definitely a family movie. thanks
Loved it!  A little sad at the beginning and happy at the end. This is a tear gerker and will have you glued. Praise the Lord! My husband loved it.
This a great movie for christians to watch, it was moving at the end based on David and Golith, i would surely recommend
helps up know and believe how to fight spiritually and rely on God's direction.  God is our main source over all creation
For anyone facing their own giants, this is a must see. It really inspires a person to look deeper at their life and its possibilities.
What an inspirational movie!  It truly shows what fervent prayer and dedication can do!
I liked this so much I purchased more to give to friends. You can't get a better price for a dvd about football
This is a family friendly movie where honoring God in all you do is highlighted. I enjoyed watching this with my daughter. We both loved it.
I really liked this movie. It inspired me, because it made me realize that nothing is impossible if you just believe.
The movie is quite moving and inspiring. It is a family movie filed with many truths that can be of help to any kid f any age.
This movie is very inspirational movie.This movie was very heart filled.If you like courageous and flywheel .You will like this movie also.
This is the best movie I have seen in years.  I don't know how I missed seeing it in the movies.  Can I give it more than 5 stars
I loved this movie.  These are the kinds of movies we need more of. Fresh & inspiring.
This is an Excellent movie! It is really inspirational! It shows that with God every thing is possible! Everyone should see this movie!!
Whether you like football or not this is a great movie.  We all have giants to face and struggle with faith.
this movie is a wonderful lesson in never giving up when thing's look bad cuz god dose not give upon you
This is a great inspirational movie. I would recommend it to anyone who needs a boost in their confidence or just needs a pick me up.
This is a great movie...brings us to tears every time we watch it.  I think Christians should watch this atleast once a month just to keep in check.
This is an outstanding movie that should be watched by everyone.  This movie has a really great story-line and is very motivational.
This is a fantastic movie. It shows what can happen when you work hard and allow God to come in.
My wife and I love this film, it encourages you to live for God a little more. I recommend it to all.
This series has great characters, great actors, great plolts, and amazing special effects.  Good guys always win and bad guys loose.
Season seven was great!! Back to normal somewhat with the characters and the great stories continue.  This season was a great one!
Very good but I got a bad batch on this one.  Had to send it back and will buy it again.  So sad.
the whole series is an excellent program, the actors are very good, seem to like what they are doing-I watch all the time
Loved the whole series and all the actors. Enjoyed the first time and enjoying it again
great show, every interesting episodes, great for the entire family.  exciting episodes,  won't be disappointed.  order now. excellent cast;;
I can not think of any more things to say about this show other than what i have all ready said
I love Stargate SG-1 and this Seasoned Box is wonderful to have in my library.  I think you would like it too.  Just gets better and better!~
had a fast delivery, new product as advertised. had a bad disc in one set and the return was handled fast and easy
It was the same old thing week after week. But I loved it. :)Besides, who didn't like Sam? Giggity. :)
This season had a lot of good action and season finale. Set of for Stargate Atlantis series. I recommend it.
i don't like to write this reveiw can't you just do the stars and stop this crap i don't know
I love all of the Stargate Series. I like the way the charactors interact with each other.  I love this show.
What anawesome season!  Michael Shanks returns full time as Daniel Jackson.  I think it is one of the best seasons of the series.
I have always love this show and was sad when it went off air. I always enjoyed the chemistry between the characters.
Love love the blend of science, history,  and scifi.  This is a wonderful show for anyone. What more to say?
This show just makes me happy.  I also love that its kid friendly in case my niece or nephew are over
This is a great series.  My husband and sons watch it over and over! I Highly recommend. Great buy and entertainment!
Awesome graphics and compelling story lines.  Our entire family has enjoyed this season, and it is now a valuable part of our collection.
Great to see that can get the entire season on dvd, great to go back and watch this series over again.
Ten years of joy!!!  I wish it would come back, I hate most of the junk that's on TV today!!!!
I Want an RPG FPS next gen game made out of this show!! Any show that has this many episodes can be bad, right?
We are huge Stargate fans and wish they would bring it back! This is a great way to start out watching the series and getting to know the characters!
this is a long and interesting series. if you like sci-fi, you will love this. they have magically solved the problem of travel to the stars.
Great show I really wish someone would pick up the series and re ignite the show. I loved everyone of them Atlantis and Universe. Awesome show
I enjoyed watching SG1 when it first came out.  Now rewatching it again I filled in missing episodes and also get to enjoy it without commercials.
Love this show. If you have never seen this show then you are missing out. I am so happy Amazon now has this show.
Stargate and all of the spin-offs are by far, one of the best SciFi franchises ever! Gotta you just have to watch it!
Excellent series. Got into this show tears ago but lost track of the story. Finally gonna catch up on one of my all-time favorite series.
With all that goes on in the world today it is fun to sit back and watch some great science fiction.
Best series on TV in decades. Cast is awesome. Richard Dean Anderson made this whole series am incredible adventure from day one.
Great show with interesting characters that the viewer identifies with as a team. Has good life lessons incorporated into the storyline.
WELL I AM A BIG STARGATE FAN. I LOVE THEM ALL NOT JUST THIS ONE. I WATCH THEM OVER AND OVER. I DON'T GET TIRED OF WATCHING.
It's a great show and had a heck of a run on tv.  Just like I remember and it's good to revisit, especailly since it was free on Amazon Prime!
Still the best of the best.Streaming quality is great and the episodes are still the best of the best.DAG
Love the imagination of the writers.  Love the acting of the main characters. Especially love Amanda Tapping she is a very special lady
Love this series, the actors are great, hard to find a good syfy space time travel show these days. Terrific
I really like the show, the actors do a great job. I look forward to watching the whole series! nice!
Stargate is always great, good acting and story lines.  Wish it was still on.  Sure do miss Richard Dean Anderson!
RDA is a great actor and the rest of the cast is quite good as well. they seem to mesh well as a team. shows are great
I love Star Trek however Stargate is a hit with me. The story lines seem to be more relevant. The characters are written very well and have depth.
How soon will you be accepting pre-orders for the second season?We took this set on vacation with us and both adults and children loved it.
I love this series.  I watched season 1 after watching seasons 4 through 10.  The early shows are as good as the later ones.  Better than StarTrek!
Stargate is a wonderful show and I enjoy watching all of the episodes.  I look forward to watching it every season.
Extremely well-written.  Some episodes are standalones, many follow the ongoing story arc of the war with Apophis and the Goa'uld.
Great TV series.  Perfect casting, good plot and story execution.  A nice window into another time with today's issues.  Time well spent.
I love Stargate and have watched the original movie & even bought the DVDs from the first 5 seasons.  Maybe some day I'll get the rest!
This will be my third time watching the series over. Just love the characters and stories. It's top notch television at it's best.
I love sci-fi programs and I think this is one of the best ones ever.It is the best thing since sliced bread.
This is one of the best Sci Fi sereies ever and should never have been cancelled. I hold that against the Sci Fi channel.
I love this TV series, and really like Richard Dean Anderson and Michael Shanks.  Thank God for Amanda Tapping - without her the show wouldn't run.
What can I say great show that keeps your attention and your humour very imaginative very entertaining for the whole family
Characters, writing, direction, and concept all exceed expectation. This is truly a great show. I would recommend it to anyone.
I paid for prime after Netflix stopped streaming this show. Obviously I love it. My 6 year old loves it too and knows all the characters by name.
i love this series...i am watching the entire series over again...instant video is great..i will watch more episodes as time goes on
Even after all these years it's still a great show!  It's even better not having to watch commercials with it.
Great characters: Jack and Teal'c in particular have great reserved expression that brings a lightness into Stargate's expeditions on other worlds.
Loved this series since the movie.  Still Love it and enjoy watching it again. Can't beat Alan Dean Anderson and the SG-1 team.
I would get this series again.  I forgot just how much I liked the series the first time I saw it.
I have seen most of these episodes but it is always a favorite and I enjoyed rewatching them. Thanks Amazon Prime
Did you miss the first episodes? Gotta watch them. It really sets up the rest of the series even if you saw the movie. Enjoy. ;)
This is such a great show. Give it an honest chance and I promise you won't regret it. Awesome show!
Stargate SG-1 has really great story lines and great special effects. The actors do a fantastic job. Love watching it.
Have been fans of Richard Dean Anderson since Mac Gyver.The entire cast plays well together.Love the action and good clean adventure.
I'm a fan of the series and watching episodes of Stargate are always a treat.  Love the actors and adventures they go on.
Very good series and Season 1 was good and got the story rolling and I think it is a very good sci-fi series
I love this series and will always give it five stars.  It has everything, action, aliens and great story plots.
After watching the Movie, i really do like it. In the first series, the world of stargate just got a lot bigger.
You gotta love the thinpak packaging and Stargate SG-1 not only provides the shows but the best bonus material of any series package I've ever seen.
This was one of my all time favorite scifi tv shows. Great crew of actors and great scripts. I'm so glad they are available on Prime Video.
This is one of nine seasons that are great entertainment for the whole family including children of all ages
Love the show! Especially the early seasons. The later seasons, plot lines getting old, but the 1st couple of seasons were great!
I watched this series when it first aired and love watching it again.  i have always been a science fiction believer.
I never got to watch the first years of Stargate SG1, and I am so happy I can go back and watch it now, thanks Amazon Prime !
Great dvd watch the first episodeand it was goodGreat Picture and SoundWould watch it againThanks for the complete series on Stargate SG- !
my son loves it and he will clean his room in order to be able to watch it. thank you
I love this show. Especially Jack, he is such a funny character. I miss the show, but Im glad I can watch it on Amazon anytime.
One of the best SciFi shows that was released. Season starts the journey, but you get many more with well written over-arcing plot lines.
STILL Awesome. I wish the could make a new series. I am watching the entire season again. Then moving on to Atlantis.
I really love Stargate. If you are a fan of scifi at all, you need to watch this show. I am very pleased with my purchase.
Great, fascinating stuff -- change that is logical, kind to the environment and makes sense does not come easily to an industry so dug in.
What an incredible story.  Everyone loves the car, so Detroit kills it!?  Makes you wonder why the car companies are having trouble today.
if i say wow twenty times. would that work.. me and my grandson loved thisw one for sure.  would love to see more of these.
It is extremely entertaining for young children (grades 1 to 3). The kids can easily follow the storyline. Graphics are superb.
This is an excellent way not only by reading the Bible it is protrayed in great style so see it.
Bruce Marchiano is fantastic. He portieres the most believable Jesus I have seen in a long time.  A Must See
The movie The Gospel According to Matthew  is very good. It tells Matthew's story on the life of Jesus. It is very well done.
I remember seeing this movie when I was a kid. I was in awe of it. l am very happy tp finally get it.  In blu-ray yet.  TOM
It is a sweet story and has a great cast.  Playing in northeastern Pennsylvania where I live, it has special meaning
this is an old classic and I enjoyed watching it, it is positive and up lifting so much better than what Hollywood puts out now a days.
A very good movie about the early days of the Christians getting the good news about Jesus Christ message.
This follows the Bible while adding a little &#34;Hollywood&#34; here and there, but it doesn't lose the true story. The actors are well-chosen.
Brilliant!  Magnificent performances, the kind you won't see anymore.  Sadly there is no interview with Peter O'Toole.  See it!
Richard Burton is, as always, an excellent actor and this movie is one of his best.  I'm sure I'll watch it more than once.
In my opinion this is one of the finest movies ever made.  Peter O'Toole and Richard Burton gave performances unmatched anywhere.
This GREAT epic based on historical facts is now available in Blu-ray format. Buy it ONLY from Amazon, com if you wish to save money.
This great classic has it all.  The casting was perfect and the story is quite mesmerizing.  I highly recommend it.
Richard Burton and Peter O'Toole?  In a movie about Thomas Beckett and King Henry?Quite good for a movie with no explosions or nudity.
This movie gave me great insight into Becket and his relationship with the king.  His courage and true, deep conversion is an example for all of us.
I WAS LOOKING FOR THIS GREAT FILM FOR YEARS!!!...WONDERFUL THAT IT WAS REALEASED IN BLU RAY!!!THANKS ALSO FOR THE EXTRAS...GREAT!!!
This is a superb film and rich acting by Burton and O'Toole. l never tire of watching this film.
A beautiful story of filial friendship, misunderstandings, and finding a deeper truth and love.  It is wonderful for Church groups and study groups.
this deals with english history, not always on target, but interesting.  I seem to like to like the older moviies.
Two Richard Burton interviews from two different eras, the flyer and advertising art from the film... great stuff.
This is a good one to watch, kept my interest the whole time.  was not what I had expected and am glad I did decide to watch
I watched this movie a long time ago when it first came out. Classic horror. I love this show still to this day.
I love this movie and can watch it over and over. It makes me laugh  even down to the fake bat.
GREAT HORROR MOVIE. THEY DON'T MAKE MOVIES LIKE THIS ANYMORE. KEEP THEM COMING.  KEEP UP THE GOOD WORK.LET SEE WHAT COMES UP NEXT.
great classic movie from back in the thirties, great movie to watch, in B&W, such a classic I suggest you watch it
I love the 40s and 50s film noir type movies.  Loretta Young is always a winner, and this one holds your attention.  Fun movie to watch!
You will feel this workout. i have not been doing it long. But, i can tell it will tighten and tone the body
This a great movie that really confirms the horrors from nazis. Very well performed, it is a movie that you ought to see.
a one of a kind classic.  I was facinated with the book and this movie catches the flavor of the book as well as film can follow a book.
One of my favorites since my teens. a forty year love-affair with a great movie!
scifi I loved this movie the wife thought it was weird but entertaining. this is absolutly a classic  great great
I had to add this movie to my Denzel collection!  I enjoyed the club scene with Wesley Snipes playing solo.  I never forgot the song she sang.
Denzel,Wesley, Spike Lee do i need to say more? Music speaks for it self but when you have fine brothers like those guys makes it More Better Blues
THIS IS A ALL TIME GREAT MOVIE! DENZEL IS A VERY GREAT ACTOR. A GOOD SPIKE LEE JOINT! VERY GOOD MOVIE MO' BETTER
Excellent example of the 40's noir films.  Alan Ladd plays a bad guy very convincingly and the atmosphere is dark and gloomy.
Alan Ladd's first big role pairing him with Veronica Lake. You can feel the tension between these two people. Good story line, Great file noir.
Why, oh why is this film not available on DVD? I should not have even had to ask this question....
Not Manny people have watched this film.its a 90tys classic in my opinion.non stop laughes great music.3brothers who can't agree on anything.lol
This movie's a keeper. I love the character of Jerome and his earnest desire to experience life while being part of a tight family.
This movie reminds me of the Woody Allen film, Radio days. Set at about the same time. They are both good movies. Enjoy.
Have seen this movie several times, and I never get tired of seeing it, it's one of those feel good movies, makes you laugh!!
Love it and fast service! Thank you!
Great movie!  Funny!
Oldie but goodie. If you've never seen this, I highly recommend it. It is hilarious and very lighthearted. Great family movie.
This is still one of the best movies ever made, and too bad it was only recognized for it after he died
I LOVE THIS MOVIE IM A BIG FAN OF THE HOLLYWOOD CLASSICS AND THIS IS JUST ANOTHER ONE OF THOSE MOVIES I LOVE THANKS ALOT.
Orson Well's admirers will be enjoyment with this movie,the best example of american film noir.The super collection for the movie lovers.
Mexican HestonBattles tubby Orson WellesAltman cops first shot
My wife spent much time painting in the area (Playa del Rey & Venice, CA)  Best B movie ever made.
This is my favorite Welles movie. Citizen Kane is boring despite all those who feel they must like it. This is the one
a great noir. thrilling, complex, original. maby perfect
I love this set,definitely worth the wait. If your a fan of classic cinema,or love Orson Welles. Get it. "You know he's pretty good."
Not as funny as up in smoke but still one of the funniest movies I have watched. 8/10 love this franchise
This is a very old movie, I going to say Bill for the age of the movie it is very very funny.
im a big cheech ang chong fan and love pretty much everything about them this is a great movie for anyone who is a fan or anyone who wants a laugh
irreverent and hilarious ---if you like monty python  this movie is a must- not many extras just movie and subtitles  but still graet fun
The ultimate in the Pythone movie collection great movie it is up there with the Holy Grail which is a classic by itself
If you like Monty Python you will love this movie.If you don't like Monty Python try it it anyway it will most likely make you change your mind.
Need I say More?OKMy dream has come true, I now own all of Monty Python on DVD.Excellent service, Excellent product.Thank You ever so much.
A classic of course, and was purchased because I am transferring over to blu-ray. Monty Python films speak for themselves.
What a great movie.  My son had never seen this movie and he loved it too.  Monty Python is the best!!
this is a great older movie.  about a family with a Bigfoot in there basement that becomes a part of there family.
We enjoyed this comedy version of the Bigfoot mystery.  Harry was as lovable as always.  Video was in good new shape
its another family move I liked that and my whole Family can enjoy fun and funny movie and toching  this a great movie to add to yor collection
Very cute movie.  One of the funniest scenes is when Harry sees the man helping his wife into the hot tub.
Still as fun as when it first came out a new generation yo enjoy it. It is a family classic for us.
This movie is a classic if you don't find this funny happy sad and all things in the middle there is something wrong with you
It's about time this movie is coming to DVD.  I threw away the movie when I recorded off TV.  I'm pre-ordering this movie right now.
Always a great family movie.  Great service.
I loved this movie when I was a kid and I watched it with my kids when I received it in the mail and they loved it!!!!!!!!!
A classic.  Great product.  A movie you can laugh at over and over again.  Bought this to add to my daughter's collection.
I just love this movie. It is such a classic and so funny. It makes the beast show that he has a heart.
Yet, another wonderful 'childhood memory' movie.  Great price!  Funny scenes.  Great family movie!  Was a new disc and in great condition.
In 2013, my 7 year old nephew asked for this for Christmas.  I bought it.  We watched it together.  Worth every penny and then some.
My kids, boys, 8 and 13, love this movie. It is enjoyable for the whole family. It is one you can watch over and over again.
A good fun movie for the family that shows no pet is too big to adopt.  This is just a fun movie with just the right amount of heart ache.
this movie did a great job of creating a realistic looking and adorable bigfoot, with a quirky but  believable family
This movie is so much fun. I really enjoyed the part where Harry is watching the monkey and Ronald Regan on T.V.
As a farm girl, I can understand wanting to keep Harry in the house. This was a fun story for the whole family.
Movie is great, got here fast and works perfectly. my son and I have watched it several times already. Thanks
This is one of my all time favorites and when I saw you had it on sale, I coldn't resist.
funny ,funny ,funny ,what more can you say great storyline, great cast ,one of my faves. you're in for a treat
Finally.!!!!!I bought this film.I always liked this film a lot/but always passed it up in the past.Good release all the way around.!!!!!!!!!
I am so glad this finally was released on bluray.  Better picture quality than DVD and sound as great as well.
I love this film. The big foot creation by Rick Baker is amazing! Nice story with a good message.
Always a Great Moviemake you think of something othere then the Fool you put in as president (obommer)
I grew up watching this movie all the time. This is a true family classic and is a must have for your collection!
Showed the movie to my 86 year old mom.  She thought it was cute.  Then we went to Wallingford, WA for pizza.
I love the movie.  You will just fall in love with Harry. You can't go wrong by buying this dvd.Susan P. Keefe
I bought this because the price was great and it is an old favorite at our house. Great family movie.
I enjoy this movie every time I see it and did this time also. My Dad is looking forward to watching it also.
This has been one of my daughter's favorite movies since she was a little girl and still enjoyed getting it for Christmas as a teenager.
Awesome movie! I just watched it and can say this is one of the best fantasy movies I have seen.
THIS IS A GREAT MOVIE THAT PUTS GOOD AGAINEST EVIL AND GOOD COMES OUT AS THE VICTOR OVER EVIL GREAT FOR ALL AGES
This old movie, is also a well watched movie, so glad we got it on DVD, because our VHS was dead, and its so much better like this love this movie
back before we rooted for the bad guys, Legend showed us how seductive evil could be!  Good versus evil at it's best!
yes this is a great movie to have its fictional story  but good tom cruse dose the roll proud another must have in ones collection
I've had this on VHS for years and finally decided it was time to buy it on d.v.d. Tim Curry plays one of my all time favorite devils.
Tim Curry! need I say more? He is like the best old school actor ever! I love this movie! great price
I love this movie.  Good fantasy story.  Entertaining for adults and children.  Some parts may be too intense for small children.
Was good on DVD but then sold the DVD to get the Blu-ray version. I haven't watched the Blu-ray version yet. I love Darkness's character.
Fast shipping. I bought this because it was my favorite movie as a kid and I wanted my daughter to see it.
bought this as a gift for my son, as this was one of his favorite movies growing up. So happy to find it on DVD!
Great movie and condition excellent ( no damage ) Thank you very much. We enjoyed the old movie very much.
the movie was great just like i remembe rwhen i was a kid but didnt like the fact that it was sent too me like a burned dvd
I have been looking for this movie and now I have it . its a awesome movie! I am so glad I got it on blue ray and for a great price too!
The Director's Cut wasn't as good as the shorter version but explained a little more.  The music video was awesome.
Great movie. I've liked it ever since I was little but it's still great. They need to make more movies like this.
Its my favorite just to watch, the movie if you want to know for yourself because, I don't believe in giving away the story...
Found a lot of people with good deals but went with the director's cut to hear the original musical score.
This was a gift for a family member. They loved it very much. Thank you for putting it on dvd.
The man was a GENIUS and I much prfer the director's cut version.
Got it so my niece could see a classic great movie, grandparents watched it also. Love this movie. Get this if you can.
A Great Deal for A Great Movie . Got it for A Great Price , in exact Condition as described in great time too at A Great price.
If you like fantasy movies and don't mind the 80's this is for you. Product exactly as expected no complaints.
Great Movie!!!  Love everything about it!  The actors, director...everything!!  A must see for all movie buffs who love a good story!!
I don't understand the negative reviews on transfer quality of this movie. This is a great movie and my DVD shows great.
If you love old movies, this is one of the best. A classic. They don't make them like this anymore
This movie has an exceptionally good plot - lots of twists and turns.  Also enjoyed seeing how Los Angeles looked in the late 1940s.
Great film noir.  The &#34;newer version included was interesting and not so great.  The original was best. buy it if you like comparisons
This item arrived really soon after ordering, and I love it. Thank you so much.
is a good item to get if you like all the movies a have fum and enjoy your self etc.
great film great price great deliver.  Do not like the number of words required to rate... Love the film thanks
Loved this movie. Huge Barbara Stanwyck fan.  Love Her comedic side in Christmas in Conneticut. Also love her cheesy side in Stella.
My wife's all-time favorite suspense film when I found it on DVD and gave to her she was really excited
The use of voice over is brilliant and the two stars have never been better.  Billy Wilder's was a master story teller.
Excellent classic movie with great acting from all the leads.Still chilling no matter how many times you have watched it.
The acting and the characters are the best. This story reveals how an honest, upstanding person deals with projecting his family and his beliefs.
I own Cape Fear with Robert Dinero and saw this advertised on THIS TV. I love both movies. Thanks Lorrie G.
Excellent picture and sound - a vast improvement on the DVD plus unlike the UK release, the US version has all the extras.  Highly recommended!
I LOVED watching this movie when I was growing up. My daughter insisted she watch this for her before bed movie for weeks. We all love it.
The Brave Little Toaster is a favorite in our house.  It's one we already owned in VHS, but need it in DVD.
Who can't sympathize with the brave little toaster?  Add thuis one to your collection, even if you don't have kids.
The DVD was in great condition despite this being an older movie. It plays well and has no damage. Arrival time was also nice.
Had this movie as a child and loved it. Bought it for my son and he loves it too. A great addition to a child's DVD collection.
My grandson watches this at his home often, so wanted to see what it was like.  A great movie.  thanks
Bought this as a Christmas present for the kids. They watched this over and over again so it must be a winner if you can keep the kids attention.
I remembered seeing this as a kid and got it for my 4 year old son who loved it as well. Over all it is a great clean kids movie!
cute movie.  kids of all ages will like watching this movie.  it reminds you of the the train engine that could.
a video that i remember watching when i was a kid and now my kids enjoy it. A good cartoon that shows no violence.
I loved this movie when I was 5-6 years old now my youngest is in love with it. Great movie without the propaganda that is in movies today
I love this movie. I watched it alot as a kid and I got it to share with my child.
My rating is a five because the description of the product was accurate and honest and it came as expected, on time.
I loved it as a kid, my kid loves it now. Classic movie that you and your kids would love. Disk and case arrived in excellent condition.
My kids and I love this group of adventurers!  It is such a heart-warming story that I had to purchase this to replace my VHS version!
What a wonderful story with so many good messages about loyalty, love and honor. We've loved this video for years. Great for kids and adults, alike.
This was one of my favorites and now it's one of my kids' favorite movies. Such a sweet story. Great deal too!
Just brings back so many memories, this movie is brilliant! Worked great, no problems with the DVD. Shipped on time
This is my favorite movie and my son seems to enjoy it also.  Great family movie and is enjoyable for all ages!
This is one of the best movies for children I have ever seen. My kids watched it so many times they wore the VHS tape out so I had to get the DVD.
My family loves this old cartoon.  We watched it several times when they were growing up and I am happy to have it on DVD so we can watch it again
Our Kids have all these movies by both VHS & DVDs... They like them alot & all good condition too. Thank you & have a nice day!!
wanted this movie for the great grand kids to watch, as did my children and grandchildren. All have enjoyed it
My daughter and I watched this show continually when she was small.  We LOVED IT.  Wish my toaster, radio, vacuum and light would have talked to me.
I love this movie!  The look of the movie is what should be expected for an older movie, just a little more vibrant.  No extras, just the movie.
The kids all love Little Toaster. Another classic cartoon that has been in our family for a couple of generations.
I love this movie too...  great for little ones... even grown ones!! Lol!  Love it! Share it with your family too!!
My 8 year old son loves this movie. If you haven't seen it I would recommend it. A hidden Disney Jem.
Kids will love this movie! I did too as I watched it with my son close to thirty years ago! It was one of his favorites!
I bought this as a child hood treat for my girlfriend to watch with our daughter as it was one of her favorite movies as a kid.
I really like this movie but would be careful with very young children. It is an old Disney but worthwhile. I was pleased with my purchase!
Not a movie you ever heard of before, but the little kids love it.  Nice DVD, wish there were more  in the series.
Lamp is still not so bright. Vacuum is still pretty grumpy. Toaster is still brave. Blankey is a bit of a pansy.
I love this movie so much, and I really hope that my brother will eventually get into it too. Definitely buy it.
Very creepy going back and watching it as an adult but it's a classic!
kids loved it was a bit scarier then I thought. del was very quick. they keep watching it all the time
Classic Quentin Tarantino!!  This movie is a must see and in my opinion it should be in every Tarantion's fans collection.
this movie is perfect. you will not find anything wrong with it no matter how hard you try. watch it, buy it.
More of the detail is visible in every frame. You can appreciate the film for many reasons. The photography is outstanding, and on display.
LOVED MOVIE GREAT STORY LOVE PEOPLE IN MOVIE A W E S O M E  A W ES O M E ITEM
Pulp Fiction is a movie that everyone in my generation has seen except for me, up until now.  I love John Travolta.
I love everything about it. The different yet related stories and actors. Yes, a great film indeedy!
This dark comedy/action disturbes while it entertains.  Great screenplay, great acting, and great directing.
I Can't explain how much do I love this Movie,especialy this Limited Edition Collector's Set, MR Quentin Tarantinois a legend :)
Great flick, great screenplay. What I want to know is where is the blu ray?
One of THE best films, IMO.
Classic, Quentin Tarantino at his best (worst) leaving no doubt that no good guys exist and the bad guys are all philosophers.
this is tarintino's best. i love how the end just falls into place.travolta,jackson,thurman,willis,and kietel give excellent preformances.
Hard to follow at times, but otherwise a good movie by Quinten Tarentno (check spelling of name) If you like John Travolta, you will like this movie
I think this was one of QT's best films.  I would have like more special features, but this is a must-own film.
This is a great item.  The quality of the paper is also very high class.  Therefore, I would truly recommend this product.  DAME HILDA
its an awesome movie its funny suspenseful and awesome it is not a kid movie its its fun to watch
I'm glad that this was released on Bluray. The visuals and audio are top notch. This will always be a classic movie.
wow it's such a perfect movie. great cast and script overall acting and dialog is awesome. his best work yet!
Great price for a instant classic !!! It was impossible to pass up on blu ray and at this amazing price !!!
an oldie but goodie. My husband always talking about this movie, so I got it for him for his birthday, he was quite pleased.
One of my top 5 movies of all time.  I was very happy with all of the extras available on the Blu-Ray edition.
I'm gonna make this review short and sweet... THIS IS THE GREATEST MOVIE I'VE EVER LAID MY EYES ON...
great movie. fast shipping and all that.
This movie is definitely in my top picks. I get laughs, trills, chills, and a gimp! This is one movie I can watch over and over again.
You have to love brand new items - Pulp Fiction. In my opinion this is a classic movie from the 90's but for an adult audience of course.
One of the best cult thriller i have ever seen. One of the best cast i have ever seen. One of the best director i have ever seen. A class A movie.
This movie has a great well written story, interesting characters, and is just fun to watch. This may be tarantinos best film.
Can't get much better, one of the best movies I've seen.  It has it all, action, humor, suspense, mystery, a novel approach to movies.
Could not ask for better one-liners, more over the top characters or fabulous characters.  Beautifully rendered and acted.  A must.
This movie is full of twists and turns. The plot is exciting and you never know where in the movie you are.
FORM THE MIND OF TARANTINO  AND HAS SOME OF TODAYS BEST ACTIORS ALL AROUND 5 STAR PLUS  WHAT MORE CAN YOU SAY
it is a movie of the realitys of crime and life. it is a break through on film makeing. it is a work of art. a must see if not buy.
I don't like Quentin Tarentino's characters. They're violent, they're nasty, they have no redeeming qualities - but golly, they're fun.
I have always enjoyed this tale which is real &#34;pulp fiction&#34;. Quentin Tarrentino is an excellent director AND actor! Thumbs all the way up!
If you hate recycled movies like I do you'll love this movie. Totally original.Great acting.Great actors.Why are you still here buy it now.
This movie is a great one!  I loved the acting they are soo real and believable.  This is a great movie and I highly recommend anyone watching it.
Classic Quentin Tarantino film. Just plain fun. Travolta,  Rames and Samuel L Jackson with Bruce Willis what is there not to like.
Love this movie!!! Bought this after having numerous friends talking about it and I have loved every minute of it!!
Just for the collection, I have seen it several times, never get tired. Iconic movie of our times. Just great
i have seen it b 4. but it is a good movie to watch again if u haven't seen it for a while. loved it first time around
Bought this as a gift and the receiver loved it!  Have bben asked to view but have not had the chance yet.
This is a great classic movie that is just so much fun to watch again.trying to find the bloopers that was missed by the editors of the movie.
One of my favorite Quentin Tarantino movies.  Great acting, I love Tarantino's style - this is a must see movie!
This is truly a classic! Travolta and Jackson nailed it. The wolf is the man. Bruce Willis was ok in it
How can you not enjoy this film? great memorable lines, good drama, music! Going in the classic pile at home.
an old movie that is still loved purchased it as a Christmas gift and was fun to give and have them receive
I love this movie. It's got a great plot, story, sound, and amazing acting from John Travolta. Get it. 5/5.
I've seen this movie so many times but never get tired of watching it. I would recommend this movie to anyone.
Classic Movie.  I LOVE this movie.  I can watch it a million time.  Thanks.  Great streaming quality, a little expensive.
This is a great movie classic and I only buy Amazon products.
what can I say about this movie that hasn't been said. this movie is awesome and the Blu-ray version is a must own for any movie fan
this is one of my all time favorite movies. If you don't quite 'get it', watch it again. An all star cast delivers for non stop action and suspense.
You either love or hate this movie! I appreciate the work that QT does and I'm just thrilled to own this. Came in wonderful condition!
if u love pulp fiction(who doesnt) get this version the picture and sound are amazing and u get so much bonus material i cant even begin buy today
I love this movie!All the actors are great in it.This is one movie I can see a dozen times and never be bored.
I got this for a huge Pulp Fiction fan for Christmas. She loved this gift. I am happy with my purchase.
This is one of My Husband favorite movies!!  Why I couldn't tell you other than the crude humor, and the actors that play in it.
Pulp Fiction is a great / somewhat funny movie to have in your collection. I liked this movie for a long time.
Amazing classic that never disappoints. With a dialogue that you want to quote every day. Not too dark and just the right amount of humor
Pulp Fiction is awesome of course - Tarantino at his best. So many great characters and wonderful lines - truly all star cast.
This is probably the best action film ever, Travolta's best acting. The menus are very interactive, which is something new thanks to bluray.
One of my old-time favorites! ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha ha yes
i have all of Quinton's movies.and now 3 dvd's of this one....a great movie and never get tired of it..
Great movie, easy to access and watch, with great audio and video quality!! Again, Netflix did not have it, which I'm sure is no surprise to anyone.
Best movie out there from Quetin Tarantino. Beware a bloody ride and lots of graphic images and language. Bravo for the Director
I enjoyed this film immensely.  I liked the character development. I really don't know what else to say.  You won't be disappointed.
great Minnesota based movie.  I liked the way they played the Minnesota accent.  perfect actors to play the parts. a+++
Quinton has made another great movie. I enjoyed it a lot. Well written and well acted. Great cast. Would highly reccomend
Review title says it all. It's a classic. Not for the family movie types. Typical Quinton Tarantino.... BUY IT !!!!
This a great 90s movie if you like to watch 90s movies. Some good acting and some good laughs.Movie kept my interest. lots of good screens.
I can watch this movie about once a year and enjoy it. I like the entire body of work from Quentin Farantino.
one of the all time best ever movies ever made .keeps you guessing .John Travolta gives one hell of a performance
This movie is raw, violent, and funny entertainment.  It's full of surprises.  The actors are well known and put in some great performances.
It's a Blu-Ray.  Picture quality is great.  The extras are very insightful.Quiton Terrintino is one of Americas greatest film makers.
There is very little left to say that hasn't already been said about a movie like this, but I have one word: GENIUS.
What can I say - it it's a game-changing movie - a modern classic that changed the way movies were written and made.  In short, a work of genius.
Never a dull moment! Easy to see why it is such a popular movie!! I can watch it over & over again!
This movie has alot of stars and has a great story. If you have not scene this movie you are missing something. Not for the kids.
seriously, if you don't like this movie it's weird. people will call you a weirdo and dump french fries on your, or not. whatever.
I like all the Tarentino movies. I thought this one was exceptional. Thanks Quinton. May I have another.  Keep em coming.
This is an excellent edition of one of the most innovative films of our age.
One of my favorite movies of all time. Its almost a half a dozen movies in one that all come together to make one big juicy pulp. Ha ha!
I was shocked how quick it came to me.Price was very cheap comparatively and was a great Quality. Very Pleased overall with all aspects of product.
Classic outstanding Jackie Chan moive with Jackie Chan is doing own great stunt and acting.  I just love Jackien Chan Police Story 1-3 series.
Super Cop Rules, Jackie Chan Rules, Blu- ray rules. Jackie Chan in Super Cop on Blu- ray ..... wait for it......is Incredible!
The movie was in great condition and the disc worked perfectly fine. Did not skip at all. I was happy with my purchase
Demi Moore kicks butt, great movie with a great story, fiance loved this movie, never seen it before, watched 20 times since.
Not really a big Demi Moore fan, but this is a good movie. Truly shows the struggles women had to face in the military.
This is a one of a kind movie.I love this movie.I never get tired of it.Wonderfully written and acted.
The premise is very good.  The plot is enjoyable.  Kudos to Demi. Viggo M is strong in this  movie I like it and am glad that I bought it
I watched this movie when it first came out.  Later, I bought it on vhs.  Now i was able to get it on dvd.  Thanks, I really appreciate it.
Great story and action.  Characters were well developed and gripping emotion. Even without hair Demi is very sexy and fun to watch.
I love this movie!! I have purchased 3 on vhs and plan to buy it on dvd.  Buy it, you will want to watch it over and over.
Great movie. If you're a Demi Moore fan then this film will not disappoint. Great story and wonderful acting as usual.
This movie makes the u.s. navy seals look like a buch of rapeist, and I had a real problem with that. This movie is very hard to watch.
I would recommand this movie to people I know. I rate this movie a 5 star it was an awesome movie.
Who could ask for more than Demi Moore.  The story line is great., almost unbelievable but war is Hell, right?
five stars. This movie shows the potential of the modern women. much times better than men. This one of the best characters of Demy moore
Thank you for your prompt service with my order. The item was received quickly and packed extremely well.
excellent movie, loved it,NOT a chick flick or a Women's lib movie,had a story to tell and told it well.
If you like science fiction and suspense then the movie Mimic is for you. It combines science with fiction at its best.
This a great kind of movie that justs lets you have fun! You almost root for the bugs! Buy this movie!
Nothing to add that hadn't been said. One of the best horror movies I've seen. Glad to see it coming out on blu ray. Wish it was in 3d.
A very good horror, thriller movie that will keep on th edge of your seat.
Good movie!  Exciting plot with great cast.  Fast action. Recommend for all to see who enjoy science fiction and constant suspense.
Love this movie its a regular when I do a movie line up with friends involving bugs. A must see and the history of NY's underground city. Love it.
This movie is freaky as hell. It's the reason I purchased the two sequels. I loved this one and the mimic scared the crap out of me.
Mimic is an excellent and well-made horror film.  It especially has a very fine and suspenseful musical score by Marco Beltrami.
The entire cast of this film does incredible work, but as usual, Jessica Lange makes it shine.  Her portrayal of Ginny is absolutely stellar.
this is one funny movie here you will have tears in your eye s from laughing so hard so get it
I like this movie because : It's funny, very good acting, good soundtrack, funny story. All together it is just a great movie, you should not miss.
One of the funniest movies ever. If it doesn't make you smile, you are made of wood. Characters are hillarious. Actors are great.
Great Movie and fast shipping!
I love this movie.. Tim Robbins and Martin Lawrence are an awesome duo! I wish they would have made more movies together.
this movie is PERFECT..from the beggining to the end..point blank period...anybody who rate this movie 1 or 2 star is stupid...and i mean it for real
The movie was great all the way through. The bonding between Robbins and Lawrince is strong. The ending was not great.
Funny movies pack!  When I want to laugh, I watch these movies. Laughter makes the heart happy! I enjoy it.
Love this movie it is hilarious. One of the best comedies ever. Always been one of my favorites when I needed lots of laughs.
Nothing to Lose  this is a old movie but I love it. it is so funny! I would recommended it
The best movie ever to watch when you've had a really bad day at work.  Very funny.  Have to get it and keep it.
I love comedy and all of the actors in this movie brought out humor throughout the entire movie.  I have watched it several times.
I Have watched this movie so many times and enjoy it every time I watch it. Tim Robbins and Martin Lawrence were perfect for the two main characters.
Always have loved this classic comedy. I had my boyfriend watch it for the first time and he was crackin' up.
.....I said please don't kill me freaky Jason!!!!Watch the movie, you'll get it. Funniest freaking thing I've seen in years.
I think this is one of my most favorite movies. I have this even downloaded on my tablet and phone so I can watch it anywhere.
This movie is FUNNY and EXCITING.  There are sooo many good parts to it.  I totally  enjoyed it, will watch it again.
Bought this for the hubby and he loves it. Cracks up every time he watches it. Would recommend for a good laugh.
I loved this movie. Martin Lawrence has always been one of my favorite comedians. Funny movie Great dvd
The Tron movie is a really good, The Tron Legacy is also a very good movie. I liked watching them both, a lot.
This is another of my favorite movies. This DVD copy is great. I like the way they did the menu on this. Another great movie!
great movie - but with the 2nd disc -not much to add, min deleted scenes and some tech stuff -not really worth it (if the cost were higher)
I often reminded myself when I first saw this a few years ago what year this was made. Bringing the grid to life was super interesting and cool.
One of the greatest movies of all time...Buy it!It just might save your life!
This is my favorite movie, but the dvd isn't amazing. I was a little dissapointed, but I still think it's a great buy.
I do recommend this to anyone who is a Tron fan.  I was so surprised at how clear and easy to see it is in blu ray.
I loved it. ra ra re kick em in the knee. ra ra ruts kick im in the other knee.
Unusual movie for it's time, but I enjoyed it very much.  Not exactly what I had expected, but good entertainment.
A classic Disney movie that is needed to complete Tron Legacy. If you have one you need the other. For its time this movie was well done.
Well, we can tell that this was an old movie, but a stellar one or it's time. It played well and we really enjoyed it.
Great movie, the technology at the time was mind blowing, the story was cool, but it was obviously a tech movie, and it filled the bill.
in its' day, a phenomenal experience. Just when digital computers and graphics were in their infancy, Disney redefines the movie goers experience..
I have a large collection of DVDs and Tron was one I was missing. I am going to enjoy it when I play it this weekend. It came undamaged and early.
I had to have the kids watch it so they would understand the new movie and new cartoons.  A little hokey given the new CGI but I still liked it.
as the DVD is only available through third party sellers.  Wait a bit and the prices will come down especially if no one buys.  Thanks!
Had outstanding sharpness. I love the Tron movies, but I have to wait until the wife is gone before I play them.
love, love this movie, glenn close is excellent at being the villian. cute, funny and heart warming.
My family enjoyed this movie which is a more modern version. It has basically the same story line but up to date.
My video finally wore out and I was so happy to find this at such a reasonable cost!  Problem solved!
I love any 101 Dalmations! This one scared me as a child (4-5)...as an adult I sure do love it!
when i got it in today i had never seen it this movie shows the best of disney and should be bought for the kid at heart
even if this is supposed to be for children adults can still enjoy it as it is very funny and lots of fun.
Got this for a child who was looking for it and couldn't find. I was glad that you had it and it works great.
When my daughter was young, she loved dogs movies. She loved this movie so much that she watched it 3x on same day the movie arrived.
My family I love watching 101 Dalmatians movie and would want other people out there to watch with family and friends.
This movie is so funny and quirky. Love the whole lone wolf hitman idea and him falling in love again with Minnie Driver.
A good original for Cusack, he only got better. This is almost as good as The Godfather series but with a little more comedy.
This is a great comedy. The understated humor is great, a hit man going to his high school reunion and telling what he does for a living!
What a wonderful dark sarcastic comedy. Can't beat Joan Cusack!  Minnie Driver is great a great ride. A real classic.
Love the movie a lot  and purchase went through smoothlyGot it right on time and packaging was very good too
I love this movie. I have it on dvd, but had to get it on blu-ray. All time favorite movie.
First, chick dig John Cusack.  Second, it is funny as hell.  One of Dan Akroyds best performances.  Great dark humor.
I loved this movie when it came out and I still love it.  A comedy with an irreverent look at love, the class reunion and murder was amazing.
Already saw this movie and had to have it for my John Cusack collection.  Movie and music in the movie are fantastic.
One of my favorite movies needed the dvd version, I still had a old vhs of this.  This is a excellent movie.
Good movie. Has a great cast and plot. This is an older movie but is great for watching. NEOSOUL.
I am proud of this movie and the story it told. This was a really good movie. It was exciting and  I was on he edge of my seat. ENJOYED IT!
This is a very good movie.  Really liked the storyline and characters. Glad I purchased it and added it to my collections of DVDs.
This item arrived way ahead of time and in great condition and it was new like it said and played purfect.  I appreciate this kind of fast service
If you are looking for a mvie to lift your spirit and that of your family this is a good choice.
Simply one of the ten greatest comedies ever made!  Where's the sequel???
Its very funny movie! we like it and tape plays good too. Thank you very much & have a nice day!!
This is one of the funniest, exciting movies that never gets old.  I find it to be great entertainment.  Kids loves this movies also.
If you like to watch Sylvester Stallone movies then this is a movie that you people should go and watch.
Cop land looks great on blu ray.This  film is very underrated.I was very pleased with the picture quality of this blu ray.
This movie was really good. I enjoyed it very much. I'm not much of a Stallone fan, but this one was okay.
This was for a friend. He never saw this movie and wanted to see it. He was very happy to receive the gift.
This is a great vampire movie if you watch it and think the begging is kind of slow just wait till it picks up. It is a great movie.
this is one good movie well made you won't go wrong bying this one you have to watch this one
Great movie on UMD.  I was very happy to add this to my collection of movies on UMD.
Had no idea this was going to take the turn it took. Q.T was disturbing  and Salma was breath taking. If you like fright flics this is for year.
I got my item. from dusk till dawn steelbook. It was in very good shape. The Packaging was good. I look forward to do more business.
This has been, still is, and will always be one of my favorite movies.  It's kind of like two movies in one, and two very awesome movies...
I loved every bit of this movie. Every actor, the plot, everything. especially the  foru main characters. I just love horror movies. June.
Gotta have this in your DVD collection . An oldie but goodie old school vampies, and men all love Selma Hyaks table dance !!!!
LOVED IT. IT WAS PERFECT SHAPE WHEN I RECIEVED IT. ALSO, IT DID NOT TAKE LONG TO GET IT.
This films rules 100%, George Clooney's best by a mile.Fun gory violence at it's best.
My brother had never seen it so we watched when he came for a visit...  Well done, sick, and gross, but classic...
This is action packed and very bloody.I would recommend this DVD.
One of the best Highlander movies But you really should see them in order. That way you get the whole story line
happy to have this to complete my collection.  love the movie and am happy to have purchased it here.  great
good movie thank you it was good I  had the first american werewolf and decided to buy this about now
I liked An American Werewolf in London, but this is a much more engaging movie. Lots of jokes and several places where you jump in thses film.
As I said it is the best in the Scream series and twice as good as the first and third. My favorite in the series. Enough said.
In This sequel to wes cravens smash hit ghostface returns to terrorise sidny. this movie is just as good as the first one. i love this movie
Scream 2, wow, my significant other loves movies like this, I must admit I did watch it and highly recommend Scream 2 if you like movies like this.
Movie Very Funny At Times Pretty Scary At Times!!!
A worthy sequel with another twist ending. Now SCREAM 3 is on the way, I'm hoping that, that one will be as entertaining if not more so.
Great to watch in the dark and over halloween is the best time to each this movies and with a friend
Very great movie and i got the movie when i was told i would get it so thanks to all
What do i have to say except far,far  better than the 1st.
This movie is a revenge movie. I enjoy the scream movies! I am a huge fan! I would for sure recommend this!
Now I have all 4 movies! I love scary movies. Especially the scream series! I grew up when they came out.
I love all of the scream movies. I own all of them and they bring back great memories of my high school days.
I purchased this movie as a gift.  But I've seen the movie several times and it's really a great film.
I got this for a present. he liked it and it came quick. That's pretty much it. Go get it.
One of the best movies ever. Had it in VHS, and have been streaming it, and still felt like I had to buy the BR version. Classic.
This is nearly Lovecraft all over again, when you think about it.. good line up of actors, great story line, and thrilling!
This movie is really good and is going to make a great gift for the Stallone movie buff in our family.
The original Judge Dredd was pretty cool.  When the &#34;new&#34; version came out, our family decided to buy the original since we enjoy it so much.
I bought this some time ago and is very happy with my purches. I would surly tell my friends to buy one.
Sandra Bullock is so damn pretty!! This movie is funny, but it was a buy for my kids and they love it! A must get for the kids!
I loved the action in the movie and I love Science Fiction also. Sylvester Stallone did a good job playing this character!
a great price for this movie, good quality widescreen, great lines spoken like, 'i knew you'd say that' and 'double whammy'
but its one of my favorites. love the guy, stallone.  and this helps me rebuild all my movies i had on vhs
This movie is so cliched and stiff that it almost makes it its on genre. I don't know why but it is one of my favorites.
Super hero scifi at its best. You won't be disapointed in ole Sly as the Judge. Funny Funny!A must see!!!
Sylvester stallone does a wonderful job in this movie. Well worth the watch.  Lots of action keeps you on your toes
i got the vhs and it was wonderful currently trying to convert it to dvd. an awesome movie. love it.
I first saw the newest move Dredd before I saw the old one so i decided to buy the old version and I really enjoyed it!
I bought it for my brother to watch, it was funny to him and very good to watch...GOOD AND FUNNY
I ordered this for my boyfriend for Christmas because he liked it and so now he can watch it whenever in blue ray so its nice
great movie.  would recommend it to anyone.  might not be for everyone, but you should at least see it first, before making that decision.
The world has all collapsed.  Stallone plays a rigid Cop, called a Judge.  I liked this movie and was impressed with the CG of the time.
One of my favorite movies played by Sylvester Stallone. I'm not a huge fan of him but this movie is great.
I saw this film years ago, I loved it, and I wanted to add it to my video collection! I have finished what I set out to do!
A true classic. I forgot what a great movie this was until viewing it again as an adult. Even our 16 year old found it entertaining.
Too, too funny but the music is so good it adds a sense of realism. The acting is so outrageous if keeps me riveted.
Great band movie, the slaps hot of music based movies...an all time classic - seven more words required so now I can submit
This is a great movie and one of the best mockumentrys ever made.  Loads of laughs and full of truth.
I have seen this movie several times and each time it is funnier. Watching this was such blast from the past!
If you like classic rock you will love this funny ass movie! It is one of the funniest rock movies I have ever seen baby!
and also the funniest. plus they sound better than most of the coq-rock bands of the '80s.
This is a must see. sooo good to see the background actors. rob captures the rockudrama that is realistic. Big Bottom
How great this movie is. I showed it to y fiancee who had never had the pleasure and we laughed for hours. Hello Cleveland!!!
This must have paved the way for the send-ups that followed.  A classic.  Always enjoyed Rob Reiner (or his dad)
THE definitivehumor mock-umentary,a strong cult classic!
Where to start with how great this movie is. The characters are so well written in their flaws that you can't help but continually laugh.
Here's 232 loving it also.  Laugh until you cry.
Without question, the ugliest and most beautiful film ever made. And I'm glad some people will find my five-star rating scary.
I Love this movie. Jeremy Irons gives a jaw dropping performance. One of Cronenberg's finest.  Great pace and tone.. deliciously creepy!
For a rare OOP criterion, I was glad to find flesh for frankenstein for such a good price, and see that it worked perfectly.
This movie is so funny and creepy. The main character does an Amazing job and he is very cute too.
Very good film,a low-budget triumph of the director and cast over big bloated hollywood thinking.
If you like psychological thrillers, this is the one to watch.  Very low key horror...the suspense builds with minimal fx.
Monty Python is very funny. Life of Brian is everything that you would expect from him. I rank this movie up with the Holy Grail.
I love Monty Python, I love irreverent humor and I am not a Christian.  But this movie does not spit on Christianity. Need I say more?
I really enjjoy the Life of Brian, as I like all of the Python series. It is humorous and full of laughs. Typical Python
Life of Brian is the funniest and most cohesive of all Monty Python movies. Brought to you by England's troupe of well-educated wabble-wowsers.[DW]
PLEASE MAKE SURE YOU WON'T SAY IT FOR THE FIRST TIME TO YOURSELF...WHEN YOU DIE. INTERESTING FILM WITH A BETTER FORMAT AND QUALITY.
at their best.  a Laugh out Loud movie.  Irreverent, yet pleasing.
I enjoy watched the show on tv when they reran it. this is a great one to get if you are a fan of montys.
There is a reason rotten tomatoes gives this movie 96% fresh certified it is Classic British humor and is a great movie to watch.
I always loved the film, but the blu ray version has some great bonus features and is very high quality.  Must-have for any Python fan.
monty python's life of brian is a cult classic.it is also the funniest movie that I have seen..
I love that they included the read thru of the script with some story boards to boot. What a transfer!
I will most likely never watch this film - but the hubby wanted it, so I ordered it anyway. He is so spoiled.
Great acting, story line, another outside of the box approach to one of the greatest figures of all time...Son of God?
Great movie!  One of my favorites,  terrific acting,  sets,  music by PeterGabriel.  This one is highly recommended.  (and at a great price!)
The funniest man that's ever lived. Highly recommended DVD, if you enjoy laughing, that is.
Goog funny movie with good old school regge music.good to movie to see if there's nothing on the tv you know.
Great classic movie - one of my faves. The whole family will love this one. Highly recommended for a lazy Sunday movie day.
This is such a fun Cary Grant, It is one of his best comedies.  This movie made me laugh from start to finish.
Cary Grant, Myrna Loy and Shirley Temple.... how can it get any better?!?! This film is wonderful and hilarious! A great family movie!
I loved this movie.  I bought it to add to my Cary Grant collection.  This is a cutsey movie.  It could have been longer.
Great Actors-Shirlet temple as a teenager. If you love Cary Grant you will love this movie. It's a great funny romantic DVD.
Wonderful move, love cary grant. Will recommend this site to all my friends and family. Great job Amazon. Thank you for your site.
The Bachelor and the Bobby Soxer is a great movie.  I was happy to see that is is on dvd. A great Grant movie
The tape came promptly, it was NEW and most importantly it was the SP Speed version. It played perfectly and couldn't be more pleased. I am greatful.
This movie is funny and shows the mixed up chemistry in families. Love how these old movies always have a feel good ending.
Cary Grant and Myrna Loy at their best.  They have a lot of chemistry together.  The scene inside the restaurant is priceless!
Loved it! Cary Grant does comedy well. I was glad to finally get the movie on DVD
Love all the marx brothers movies.  This is a favorite of mine and have loved watching it over and over again.
This was a gift for my youngest son.  He is a big Scooby and gang fan just like his mother is.  I turned all my children on to Scooby.
We love the Scooby Doo movies. This one is really adorable. My kids had it on vhs and loved it so much we finally replace it with dvd.
Love Scooby Doo and this one was always one of my favorites growing up. Surprisingly it was still great this time around.
It's the typical Scooby movie plot, but this time the zombies are real.  Great movie.
Scooby Doo is the bravest dog that ever lived. Going around the world to solve the mystery, and set things right.
this was a staple in my childhood. had to add it to my collection now. great movie and the first movie for scooby doo.
One of the more scary Scooby movies but still one of my 7 yr old's favorites. Has been watching it since he was 4.
love love love scooby doo. will never get sick of scooby doo ever so this tops my list for sure along with all other movies.
Love this movie. So happy I finally have it on DVD. For any BIG Scooby-Doo Fan out there. Great Gift.
I chose this because my grandkids just love Scooby Doo and they are anxious to see everything about Scooby when the next one comes out.
This movie has a great story line, and is one of my favorites from the Scooby Doo collection.  May not be recommended for younger children.
I'm a huge Scooby Doo fan. This one is one of my favorites. The characters were perfect and I loved the reveal of the bad guy.
excellent.  I am a scooby doo fanatic.  I love all scooby doo movies, etc.
Scooby doo is for all ages I am 31 and I still love it grew up with scooby find it very funny
She cannot get enough of the Scooby Doo videos and she loves this one.  It really helps on road trips.
Three year old can't stop watching it. She loves it. Watched it on our 2 hour trip over the weekend.
If you love Scooby Doo, you'll love this one. The plot twist is great. I watched Scooby growing up, my kids watched it and now my grandkids love it.
Huge fan came in great conditon still sealed, not damaged areas This is one of my favorites im very happy with it!
this is a classic. if you like scooby- doo you will love this movie. it is a must have in your collotion
Scooby Doo and the Boo Brothers is probably one of my Favorite Scooby Doo Movies. The brothers are so funny. My 3 year old loves it too.
I loved this movie as a kid and bought it as a Christmas gift for my brother.  It's a very funny Scooby-Doo classic, sure to get a lot of laughs.
We are big Scooby & gang fans.  All my children have watch them since they were little.  These were all Christmas gifts.
Wow I LOVE this movie. It is great and I look forward to watching it many times.
Noble House is a great movie, very engrossing and unusual plot. James Clavell was a wonderful writer and I love Pierce Brosnan!
VERY PLEASED WITH THE PRODUCT.  ALL WAS AS ADVERTISED.  WOULD BUY FROM THIS VENDOR AGAIN.
If you like Pierce and a good Clavell novel brought to film, this is a must have.  Pierce is in the perfect part for this drama, mystery combination.
I have been ordering a lot of shows that I saw on television, so nice to have them available to watch when I want to.
Five hours of continual entertainment and extra enjoyment watching the beautiful and talented Pierce Brosnan.  Definitely, a must see!
I was born in China and enjoyed this story. It brought back some memories of colonial rule of that period
Noble House met my expectations and i have enjoyed it. I would recommend it to anyone who enjoys mini series
Haven't seen anything of Pierce Brosnan's that I didn't like, but especially like this mini-series.  So glad I could finally get it on DVD.
Great classic movie funny as hell freezing over!!! Rent it NOW!!! It's a one of a kind pure delight to watch!!!
I loved the story line, actors and special effects. I would recommend this to all my friends. This is a great movie.
I liked it was a very good movie to me and my 7 year old granddaughter liked it to. Great
Sean Connery, cool story, lot's of action.  This movie should be in every family's collection.  Buy it today and enjoy it for a lifetime.
Thanx for the dvd.  I loved it when it came out in the movies; luv it now.  It was like I never left the theatre.  I luv time travel.  ;)
This new Blu-ray edition looks great on today's larger screen TVs.  Not the sharpest focus movie ever made but still very good.
Time Bandits is simply one of the most fun films I've ever seen.  It's very well-made, very funny, and has Sean Connery as a bonus!
Great Movie and classic of all times hah ha and it's vary funny to watch too.
This is a good family movie with some adult humor .full of adventure and laughs. John Cleese is wonderful as always
This is a must see for everyone. It may be old, but it's worth the time to watch it. Very funny movie, one of the classics.
I was surprised at the VIDEO & AUDIO quality increase over the DVD version. This is a CLASSIC. It should be in everyone's library!
Always loved this story and finally have it in my collection. I recommend it to everyone who enjoys a good laugh and adventure............
Another classic I remember watching when I was little. I understand a whole lot more that goes on in the movie...
Great movie for it's time, still fun to watch. The whole idea behind this movie was good, with the stealing of God's map and all, hahaha just great.
Seeing this one again reminds me what can be done with truly clever concepts that place a child in the middle of extraordinary circumstances.
The best midget movie ever made.  A fun romp through time, be sure to turn British Humor to On before watching.
Ernie was one of the comic minds that defined zany & funny.He stood tall in the company of many 40's thru 60's comicgiants.
I can't say enough about this video.  Much has already been said in these reviews.  I have one comment.  BRING ON THE DVD VERSION!!!!!!
If you like jungle movies, this is a good one with plenty of action. Would not recommend this for the younger viewers. Thanks, Bobby J.
This was a great movie. It made me sit down and think about what war does to everyone. The kids are the main ones who get hurt. It makes you cry.
My eyes were flowing like a river by the end of this beautiful movie and I would happily come back for more!
If you don't want to cry don't see this movie, it's a beautiful story of a brother and a sister during war
This is one of the most depressin [best] films I have ever seen. It is a story of love, honor, and death in a time of crisis for Japan. Watch it.
No one can watch this movie and fail to be moved.  Astonishing production values, and a can't let go of story.  A must have in your library.
This movie will make you cry if you have a heart.  It's a beautiful story.
This is a wonderful movie which brilliently illustrates how war victimizes the innocents, no matter how small or how young.
Love the show, it captures the heart and mind. The fast paced combat really got me on the edge of my seat.
truer bible account compared to other bible based movies. Shows the human side of godly men who put forth great effort to do the work of their Lord.
This is an insperrational film . It was done with great care for the Bible . It is a huge story of love. Thanks.
This movie helped me made them come to life and was also very inspirational.  The actors did a good job also.
This is the best of all the movies about the early days of the Christian church! Marvelous actors and accurate story line!
Anthony Hopkins performance is outstanding, they do their best to stick to the word of God. It's long but worth buying it.
This was a great movie too that was able to keep me interested during the entire run.  Thanks so much!
The DVD came early and was well packaged.  It was given as a Christmas gift. The recpients were THRILLED! Thanks.
No more than the best filmaking here, excellent cast, filmed entirely to hear all thats said and done, brings the New Testament to life.+
THIS VIDEO WAS DONE WITH EXPERTISE AND ACCURACY ACCORDING TO SCRIPTURE ITSELF...LOVE IT AND WOULD HIGHLY . RECOMMEND IT TO OTHERS!
I am very pleased with my purchase. It was sent very quickly and in great condition.  I will buy from this company again.
What an excellent DVD for enhancing the Catholic faith!
I loved this move!  Antony Hopkins is great and we all know it.  Yes he was young and the movie is an older movie, but it isstill great.
Good movie but it is wise to read about Paul in the Bible first.  It helps to follow and validate the story.
The Movie has taken some liberties, but over all the actors are great, & so is the story line. Good family movie to watch.
I love these Biblical dvd's. They tell you the story about the Bible character and help you understand their lives
Anthony Hopkins does a wonderful job portraying Paul. If you know your bible you will discover it is very accurate.  Lovers it.
We have watched this every year for quite sometime.  This movie is a classic along with It's a Wonderful Life for our family every Christmas season.
how can you go wrong with a martin sheen movie?  the story is a good one and even if the movie is old - its worth the time to watch it
The dvd was to replace a vhs copy we have. The dvd was good but just a little better quality than the vhs. Still a good replacement.
Arrived on time. Good movie, but I wouldn't watch it again. Drawn out and I lost interest in it quickly.
I loved the movie and would recommend it to everyone.  It is enjoyable and makes you think.  Very well done.
I watch this video every year along with my other seasonal favorites.  It reminds me about the true meaning of Christmas,
Great movie.  Fiction or non fiction does not matter.  It was the content that kept me watching till the end.  Great actors and acting.
I accidently bought 2 of these and gave one to my daughter. My grandson, who's 8, loves this movie as does my husband!!
Very good movie from years back that is still enjoyable today.  NO bad Language or suggestive and vulgar scenes.  Good family film.
this is an older movie but I still love it.it is very heartwarming and has a great story. would reccommend
Watched with the kids. Kinda thought they'd think it was too old. Guess what? They loved it as much as I did when I was a kid..
we enjoye thismovie and is great fo famiy and chidren as well.  A good get together type movie for all to watch
I have read the book and it was great, but this made me cry. A very wholesome movie that I recommend to anyone.
This is a classic that you and your family should see. It may make you cry, but is a good movie that will keep you watching.
I saw this movie years ago and couldn't understand the title then. It took me years to figure it out. Very, very good movie.
Watched this movie some 15 years ago and really enjoyed the movie. Love the book by Wilson Rawls.  Both the movie and book are must haves.
This is such a great classic family movie we enjoy watching it again with the grandkids and we all laugh and cry together such a great bonding movie.
I love the stories from the Bible and  learn so much.  I appreciate the opportunity to obtain these DVD's.  God bless you!
/we had this tape but over the years it got to scratchy. I had to order the DVD. My daughter loves it as well!
Absolutely captivating ! a one man play that keeps you on the edge of your seat !An obvious Passion for this story !
A great spiritual film on John's life. It is as if you are watching a stage play that is well done.
This is a one man play, great performace , how can anyone remember such a long play and Dean was wonderful.
This was not what we expected but it was still very good. It was actually a one man play but was very well done by Dean Jones.
nothing to say except for I love it and will be thankful for it! thank you so much for this product would recommend to to others
Good movie, worth my time.  I prefer these family based movies.  Nothing more to say,  satisfied with the purchase, good.
I fell in love with this movie. It is a terrific family movie. I am glad I own the movie. I would reccomend this movie to anyone.
If you like horse stories, you will love this one. It's a great story that the whole family will enjoy and you will watch again!
Inspirational,and heartfelt movie.This one is so good.I bought extras for gifts
This is a good family movie that shows what compassion and giving someone a chance to be a better person is all about.  It was enjoyable.
This is the type of family movie I enjoy.  It was interesting, clean, and taught some moral principles.  Provide more like it.
this was a great movie the whole family could watch. It told a story that everyone could relate to and it had a happy ending.
This was a very good heartwarming tale that is good for the whole family. I would highly recommend this movie.
This would be an excellent movie for anyone to view. A great movie for Christian principles on forgiveness and love.
Great family movie. Second Chances is the perfect title as there are 3 different parts of the movie to which it can apply.
This is a good movie for the family, I originally bought it for my grandkids but I found myself watching it as well.  Very good!
When we give up climb heights of proving something, and natural hunger for recognition from others, that is precisely, when God start build high.
I chose this rating for this movie; because it was great! Any young would enjoy this movie about a lesson in love; a girl and a horse....
It is a must for your library and is a great witnessing tool which I have already shared several times.
New that Billy Graham's movies would be good. This one was!!  Will buy more of them!!
This was a very good movie in very good taste. It was both entertaining and morally thoughtful.
This movie made me sad and then so joyful. This was a message from God to people.
This is a very good family move. Good story, good video and good sound. Keeps your attention. Good life lessions.
is an existential horror-movie. martin is outstanding. a domesticated teenager can turn to a supermankiller, when it's demanded.
Sometimes brutal in it's murders, it's an engrossing thriller. And some of the acting can be over the top, but it just adds to it's sinister feel.
This item was received. I am very satisfied with it. It plays very well. Thank you very much. Respectfully; Edward Shayne
I love HAMMER movies and I hope this is the beginning of many more of the classics!  Nice cards as a bonus too!  Really enjoyed this!
I bought this movie for a friend whose daughter and family live in Alice Australia! The movie is very long, like 7 hours of viewing!!!
Did enjoy the movie until the old VHS player decided to retire, I've checked to see if it was available on DVD...hurry! also, has better quality.
I wish it was on DVD, but it is a great movie, and the tape is in good condition.  I had it before, but the tape got tangled.
I saw this originally on PBS. Historically placed in another part of WWII that we don't usually hear about. What a love story.
excellent job of make over of good original black and white movie with even better actors with out making major changes to story. A must to see.
This product was returned due to it not being closed captioned.  The movie is great, I have seen it before, but I needed the CC.
A classic horror movie.I recommend this movie to all horror movie fans.A great movie to watch on Halloween night or anytime.
As a big fan of the older movies ,I love this movie. No computer  special effects, just good old fashioned ones
I love this movie, and I am so glad to have the dvd! Fans of the horror genre will enjoy this early 80's movie
Very pleased with it. Jamie Curtis has always been one of my favorite actresses. She is awesome in horror films.
Great service.  Purchased this for my daughter who loved this movie when it was first released. She was excited to get it
Not a normal film of the horror genre but a surprising and entertaining suspense story leading to a surprising ending.
This movie is interesting and scary, totally worth getting. There is even a twist at the end that you do not expect.
great historical informaton and wonderfully done film.
The Zatoichi movie series is a must have for any collector of great japanse story movies about the samari warrior.
Robots + snakes + desert + cave + bearded troglodyte + dune buggy + Baby Huey. What's not to like.
I like the movie and watch a long time ago and it was hard to find but it was a good price and movie plays well and would buy from again
I have always liked this movie, and would like to have the one that came after this.  Jeanne Link
The ultimate classic. Seen in in the theaters when it came out, and still love it now. Highly recommend it for all.
great movie  Jo Don baker is great in this movie. it shows that there is some good cops that really want  their town, state to be safe.
My children and I enjoyed the movie...Therefore it brought me to tears it's always good to know history...Mr. Baker done an amazing job...
OKAY IT'S NOT AS GOOD AS ORIGINAL AND PART II BUT IT'S A GOOD MOVIE! COMPARED TO THE CRAP THEY MAKE TODAY. I LOVED IT.
Tremendous fun - I wish they could publish two or three more titles like this.
Another great MST3000 video. A horrible movie made watchable with some great lines by Joel and the crew.
A great &#34;bad&#34; movie - well worth watching - so neat to study the movie on IMDB and other sources after viewing -
Every bit as good as 'The English Patient'
It was good.  The movie was clear and with no glitches and the box it was in had nothing wrong with it.
Received quickly and timely.  Excellent quality DVD.  Film very clear.  One of my favorite SciFi films from the 50s.  Great fun to watch.
Nostalgia, being born and raised in Chicago and remembering having seen part of the film being made, I loved it then as I do now.
...post cards... Enough Said!
I love many of the B creature movies and had not seen this in quite some time - glad to have it.
Another 50s sci-fi monster movie at its best. The woman who screams every 5 minutes and horrible special effects. I love these movies.
SATURDAY AFTERNOON SITTING ON THE COUCH IN MY PJS BLACK &WHITE TV AN HAVING FUN.
I grew up with him, I new him before he hit it big, its a good show if you like his music
Yes, the performance isn't polished.  It isn't supposed to be.  Still, this is a must have for any kind of Alice Cooper fan.
Good period piece, great acting, great cast and so on.  The Criterion production makes it especially good with all of the extras.
I can find no finer actresses  to listen to or look at than Sandrine  Bonnaire and Isabel Huppert. With both in the same film- Heaven!
well done as if watching a ballet (at times)  non famous actors performing famously.  the movie moves at a rapid clip and is definitely worth seeing.
A very interesting film. I enjoyed it. Sub titles were perfect. Better than the DVD. This director changed the way things werte done.
Cool, austere and haunting - this is the real deal - a genuine French masterpiece.
Must see. Here are Alain Delon working with director Jean Paul Melville in the movie that started the whole genre of assassins and driving.
This was another great Alain Delon movie.  Although it's not full of action, it's still very enjoyable to watch if you are a fan of his.
I had heard a lot about this film and now I own it. Delon at his best. A surprise film and Delon carried it off.
Very touching. A very well made movie. I would recommend all Deepa Mehta movies. The subject hit close to home. I laughed , I cried.
Truly disturbing, but Lara Belmont is the most beautiful girl I've ever seen.
Awesome movie! Give it 6 stars! If you appreciate this genre, this movie is a must have!
This Blu-ray DVD provides a wonderful trip to Hawaii, free from the concerns of "Homeland Security."
I discovered this movie on  cable ..I rented it a few times... I love it and now I'm buying it.Bon Jovie is a natural.
This movie had my 4 boys totally engrossed. It was a sweet story with the right amount of suspense and drama. A nice moral as well.
This is one of those wilderness movies with a storyline. Great movie and something I love watching over and over again.
It was so terrific on survival and the relationship he developed with the Indians. I hated to see the Indians leave near the end.
This is perfect for classroom use! Students applauded when the film was over which was unexpected. It helps to bring the novel to life!
This story shows the kindness of different peoples to each other, when no one is being threaten with evil or violence.
I have always wondered about the crossing of the Red Sea. This film brakes it down, and proves the exact path that Israel took in the wilderness.
What a great DVD makes you really think about the things that happen in the bible Area... IS well worth the buy...
If you want to learn more about God's history and the facts. This movie leads you there. I recommend it without reservation.
I love this DVD...for me it's just another proof of God's existence ....but in our world the lost will simply grunt at this as worthless information
I like the second season even better than the first, if that is possible. Very well done, with great attention to detail.
We had no idea there was a second set of M&P available.  We like it better than even the first set.  More delicious rivalry.
This series is so good! I saw it years ago on PBS Masterpiece Theater. It is such a fun story and very touching and funny. You will enjoy it.
Quality item from a quality merchant.  I recommend playing this tape in a VCR.
I love Brother Cadfael.  The mysteries always hold my interest completely.  I would recommend this to anyone who likes mysteries.
Very good English Comedy denoting a strange period of history of Ireland. Each season gets better & better.  Wish there were more than 3 seasons!
This is a good movie; it's sort of fast paced, with a good story line. It's funny, without being too terribly silly
this is an especially good one in the series, the "how" of the mystery is harder to guess than the "who".
As usual this mystery writer keeps you spell bound as you wonder 'who did it'?A very enjoyable and entertaining DVD.
Like always Poirot rocks!!!!!Very Nice, well done, the plot is wonderfull, the acting too.Go Poirot !!!
A wonderful Series!  A family story of  wealth and tragedy of an upper class English family during World War I.Well acted!
MADE ME WANT TO HAVE LIVED AS THEY DID BACK IN THOSE DAYS HOW WONDERFUL TO BE ABLE TO RELIVE IT OVER ALND OVER AGAIN
Loved this movie. Great acting. Great story. Loved it so much I bought the sequel. Loaned to all my friends to watch. They love it too
I am replacing my VHS of Poirot with DVDs.I love all of Poirot - haven't seen one of them that I did not like.
Continuing on with mysteries.  Really don't have to them in any order.  Recommend the whole series.
Enjoy watching it very much, one of my mom's favor characters she watches all the time and will never get tired of watching them.
A story for the serious-minded, it is beautifully acted (which is not surprising, given the cast). Perhaps Wendy Hillier's best work.
Love this very much...an English, movie very well made...acting was great, loved the story...I would recommend this to anyone who loves British films
I love historical movies and thiis one is great as far as costume clothing, and a plot. Great eye candy.
These stories are full of suspense, mystery, and love.  Great Escapism.
Some of the information in these videos is silly but overall, very helpful.  I would recommend for use in middle-high school classes.
This is a great DVD if your children like school house rocks.  The songs are great and they learn from it too.
I loved these when I was a kid, and now my children do as well.  Multiplication was easy for my son with the help of this dvd!
wow. i grew up on these and to see them again is just a guilty pleasure. they look and sound great.thanks again
My kids love it...just like I did when I was a kid! There are quite a few that I had never seen!
school house rock is a great dvd with lot of great songs from Grammar rock, science rock, money rock, multiplication rock, and america rock.
I grew up watching Schoolhouse rock on ABC. I also liked the catchy tunes and messages. I miss these days dearly.
It is always great to see these cartoons I grew up with on a regular basis! I am glad I bought it!
Excited to watch...haven't seen this movie in years!!  Ready to show my kids the cartoons we watched back in the day...and learned from them!  LOL
My autistic grandson received this for a Christmas gift -- it is a great learning tool and he loves it.
Bought for grandchildren,  hadn't seen since my kids were young.  quite happy with this purchase!  My grandchildren love it!  Recommend.
So happy this collection came out on DVD.  Fun songs.  Takes me back to my childhood.  I'm hoping my son enjoys it as much as I do.
I remember these songs and so do my kids.  And now my grandkids get to sing and dance to them.  Terrific. The whole family joins in to have fun.
If you have little kids or a big kid with a good memory you need to buy this DVD, I still remember things from the songs and lesson they teach here.
This is a classic and will have my daughter watch over and over.  No bad language or violence to worry about and educational to boot.
WE WERE VERY PLEASE TO EVEN FINE SCHOOL HOUSE ROCK.VERY MUCH PLEASED. THANK YOU.
Makes learning fun for kids. Once you learn these songs, you remember what they are teaching for life!
Still as great as I remember.  My 11 and 6 year old grandkids love it as much as their dad did!
Good for kids of school age and easy to learn and understand for their age group.  .. . . .
I like the songs. I saw these when I was in my 10 or 13yrs old. I like to see these cartoon on DVD.
My Children loved it when they were growing up.  Now I bought it for my grandchilren.  They love it too!
This was one of those purchases to bring back happy childhood memories and to share with younger generations.  I highly recommend this for all kids.
Great songs....  Great value.... School House Rocks!!!!!!
Danny Glover was excellent in this version of Raisin in the Sun.  This is my favorite version of it.
Love Veggie Tales video's. Great morel's and stories. Kids watch them over and over again. I even have the songs memorized.
Our 8 year old grandson really likes the Veggietales movies. So cute & inventive to teach Bible stories & life lessons.
This movie is cute and funny.  I have watched it over and over with my kids who love it.  From toddlers to teens it will draw them in.
bought it for a friend. works perfect and she loves it. would buy from you again. thank you very much.
I don't know what to add to my other Veggie Tales comments.  All that I've seen are uplifting, teach a moral, and build self worth.
We love veggie tales especially the older ones, they're great fun with great lessons! Everyone enjoys one of these! We have bunches.
Kids learn as they watch and they enjoy it.  A great learning tool, I am never disapointed with any of them.
The kids like to watch a video before bed if there's time. This is one of their favorites. Always funny for adults too.
You can't go wrong with Veggie Tales. Great stories and lessons with a bunch of catchy songs. My family enjoys them. :)
My children love Veggie tales. It has helped us teach them the bible. And even if you are not a Christian, the morality that is taught is excellent.
These fun characters bring stories of truth, love and standards to life.  Our children and now grandchild enjoy watching over & over again.
I am so happy to find DVDs such as this one to help complete my son's collection.  A good buy.
My grand daughter loves all of her Veggie Tales collection! They are her favorite things to watch! I like them,too.....lol
My kids love Veggie Tales and this one is no exception.  My 3 yr old goes around singing "God is bigger than the boogie man...".  Great movie!
This is a great short little movie.  Perfect to teach small children about overcoming fear.
This is a good Veggie Tales movie. God is bigger than the boogie man! He's bigger than Godzilla or the monsters on T.V.!
Great video with an awesome biblical message.  My kids have been growing up on Veggie Tales but they are good for adults too.
This one has a awesome story line to it, my daughter and I always end up singing and dancing to it. God Bless who ever invented the veggiestales
My kids will walk around singing the songs, which is better than alot of lyrics out there for kids. Fuuny
This DVD is very good and educational in a Christian view. I am glad I purchased it so my niece has good cartoon to watch when she comes to visit me.
My granddaughter loves Veggie tales and a great way to learn about bible & bible study much more exciting to child.
This is wonderful AND powerful to watch the Bible come to life this way.  You will laugh AND get ministered to.  Simple ideas brought to life.
Grandkids loved it!  We have many veggieTales videos and they are well used and well loved.  Good use of our money.
The music, analogy and characters are great.  It was very entertaining and encouraging.Wonderful family film - it is often watched.
This is a classic episode and I love it.  The silly song is absolutely hilarious.  The story is a good one too.  Kids and adults will love it.
Fun for the whole family and full of funny sayings and songs.  Kids love them. Silly, but not too silly
There is no better gift for a child than a tale that entertains and teaches. Every child should have this whole series.
My granddaughter loves the Veggie Tales. I don't want her just watching anything when she's spending time at Gam, Gam house.
Happiness for me is seeing the reaction on Christmas morning for a 2 1/2 and 4 year old to getting this gift.  They were as excited as could be.
My kids (4,12,13) love this movie.  It has a good message.  The characters are great, the songs catchy. It was a great buy.
who does not love barney.  lovable character, true to t.v. series.  vivid colors and joyful music. your kids will love it as much as you .
First, I must be honest & say that I do NOT like Barney. My son does like this DVD. He has learned alot of songs & certainly enjoys it.
we just recently bought this movie and like all of the barney shows and movies we weren't disappointed.  its all just good clean fun
What can I say! Barney is loved by all my children and my 6 year old enjoyed this DVD! Barney has kept the smiles on all my kids faces.
The DVD arrived promptly and in excellent condition. It shows a good lesson in how rumors can affect everything we touch.
Veggietales are the best for cute, moral lessons for &#34;kids&#34; of all ages!  My collection is almost complete!  A great investment.
Though it's a little odd to see Larry in such a bad roll to start with, it's still one of our favorites.
my kids love this show they watch this over and over so many times they can say it backwards and forwards
It's a funny story based on when King David wanted a girl and sent her betrothed off to probably die in war. Well done.
This has a lot of rhythm words, and music to go with it.  Very educational. Great for the 2 to 10 age group.
A very good, exceptional value of a rare  and hard to find  foreign movie with beautiful music starring Catherine Deneuve.
The lives of ordinary people given operatic treatment with a jazzy score, colorful sets, and lovely cinematography. A beautiful movie.
This is a must see!  Fantastic film!  Storyline, and musical scores are tops!  What more can be said?
One of my favorite movies that I can never catch on TV, so I was thrilled to be able to buy it.It's an oldie but goodie that I highly recommend.
outstanding film. great acting strong cast. it keeps you on the edge of your seat at all times not knowing what to expect.
Saw this movie in an art house as a high school senior around 1969-1970 and it became an instant favorite.
The killer has more action in the first minute than most action films have in the first hour. Don't miss this gem!
Jennifer was playing a helpless and neurotic woman--indicating no control of self and life.  She could have played a more important role.
Be ready for a very interesting movie. The actors played their rolls in the courtroom scene wonderfully. History, Brit style.
This movie was used as a class study in ethics, it brought out great discussion.  Funny thing, I was taken to this movie when it was in theatres.
This is an excellent film.  It is top of the line in everything there is about a movie.
Ran, is directed by the great Akira Kurosawa. This film is a pure masterpiece. PLEASE SEE MY OTHER REVIEWS.
You can never tire of Shakespeare, even when told in Japanese!  The sheer majesty of the film is incredible.  Bravo!
Just buy it already. No film collection is complete unless you have &#34;Ran.&#34; An epic. Colorful, beautiful scenes, did I say Epic?
This is the most beautiful film I have ever seen. I almost wept at the beauty of it. I fully fully fully demand you see it.
Easily my favorite samurai film of all time. It has everything you could want but it is an old movie, don't expect a slasher with tons of blood.
does anyone else think lady kaede is pretty ugly?
This is as good as horror films get.That's all.
This will be brief.  If you love 70's horror you will love this if you don't you probably won't enjoy very much.
This film gets better with every viewing. Has anyone figured out the game? Delphine Seyrig is always great. Best film ever from Alain Resnais.
The actors and costumes are excellent in this version of the classic tale, for me this is the best version ever done!
Remember this movie as a teenager and still love it today.  It seems like any other remake is just not quite as good.
I liked this movie much better than the second one although the actors are the same.  I should have bought both at once and saved some money.
A very ethnic comedy depicting the inner soul of the average Italian prople with humanity and humor.  Each time I watch it, I discover something new
Video and audio quality are great.Bonus features are great.Movie itself is up to individual opinion.  I loved it.
I won't review the film just the disc which I can say is immaculate. Criterion has shown extreme care with this Goddard film.
This film rather kept my intrest more than other movies from the seventies, this dvd was good quality and an intresting story line.
One of the best erotic films of the 20th Century.  Sylvia Kristel brings a charasmatic and energetic passion to the role.
exelent movie my favorite one, in every respect,good qualaty picture , sound, great entertaiment ,good actors,well done to the point of real
Amazing movie. Difficult to find as it is out of print. Great insight into depression and loss with early childhood population.
enjoyed the entire movie.comedy,lil drama,true to life.well done.it had a good cast and they made it real.nice scenery too.
This moving was great to watch...very believable being at a writers retreat.Although, I got this DVD used and it had a few scratches on it.
saw this I am sure it was a great movie. There is nothing more to be said about it.Good movie?
Always liked this movie.  It was hard to find and a bit expensive but I love David Bowie and the story and it brings back a lot of memories.
A good bio of the beat generation icons.  If you are not a Kerouac fan then you may be bored.
This is a wonderful movie with a Japanese "Clint Eastwood" coming to the rescue of a "fair maiden".  I have watched this movie many times.
Brilliant! Never thought to hear Toshiro Mifune speaking English - funny! Miss him and the great Kurosawa.
A Wonderful movie. Everything I remember it to be. I have enjoyed it from the first time I saw it VHS
Really thrilled to have found this great movie: the second best western ever!!! Second only to "The Magnificent Seven."  Thanks so much.
My dad and I used to watch this each time it came on TV oh so many years ago. I still enjoy the movie and am sharing it with the next generation...
This has to be the best version of the Horrer classic,without a doubt !One of my many favorite INDIE Films..
I love Godard. And this is a classic. Beautifully shot. Beautiful clothes. Great characters. And Paris in the 60's. Stunning.
great Dvd I love Al Green not a bad investment , I purchased it for the purpose of starting my collection of Al Green Classics
I love watching this movie. I am so glad I found this. i never get tired of watching such great stars in such a good movie.
I love this movie--one of my favorites.  Ingrid Bergman and Leslie Howard make such a wonderful couple. And the music is good too,
This was a movie I saw on TV many years ago. I am delighted to have it in my collection/
A good look and some of the film making back story.  How a great director could work or is used.  Romance and adventure.
A classic look at love and war. As good now as the day I first saw it in the theatre.
Ulysses us an excellent entertaining film that I thoroughly enjoy.  Thanks for having it available to buy,  I am very grateful.
It should be mandatory to watch this film.What an amazing climax scene at the end.Got see it, to know about it.
Saw this when I was a kid. Loved it then and still love it now!
A very good classic movie starring Kirk Douglas in the Greek mythology movies. A must see for everybody.
the old movies are still the best ones. Even when there are hard to find. love it so much. Had fun watching them.
I bought this for my 11 yeard old so he could enjoy good, clean movies with me.  He thoroughly enjoyed this disk.  Well worth watching.
This movie starring Kurt Douglas is a classic that you can watch over and over again as the years pass. It will remain a classic through time.
This is one of my husband's favorite movies starring Kirk Douglas.  He watched it immediately and said that it is still one of the best movies.
I've seen several &#34;imitations&#34;.This one is still on top; the others aren't close.At the end, the vengeful Kirk is just outstanding.
In brief,Excellent sealing, carton box in great condition, top-classaudio/bright colors and clear sound.
Ulysses in English. It is every bit as good as I remember when I saw it on the big Screen.
Exceptional and accurate rendering of Homer's epic "Odyssey". It was great to see it again after first seeing it in a theater decades ago.
I was captivated when I saw the film in Paris. Very intense and a real thriller during the German occupation.  Great role for Mme. Denueve
TRUFFAUT, DENEUVE &amp; DEPARDIEU AT THEIR BEST... BREATHTAKING STORY , PERFECT SET, PERFECT COSTUME, ONE OF THE BEST FRENCH MOVIE EVER...
this 2 dvd movie, has really good special affects and it is great to watch. thank you for this great movie.
You WILL see Sophia Loren in black stockings and a girdle.In my opinion, this is Sophia Loren second best movie (a boy on a dolphin is her best).
This was my favorite childhood movie. I watched it everyday. I was so happy to see that this version is available for my little ones to watch!!
This beautiful movie is my favourite cartoon! Beats today's Disney stuff hands down! Just LOVELY!
grand reminder of why such films have endured the ages.  Glad you've made this available to the present generation, thanks
This is timeless. I believe it should be in all family libraries. It will always be safe to show to all age groups.
Here is another outstandingly great family movie it would be great for a family night movie. its fun to watch
One of my top five favorite movies!  Fantastic script, superb acting.  Holds you attention with a lovely ending worth the wait.
Saw this movie 15 years ago and it is as well done a meaningful now.  My grand daughter will enjoy it too.
I never actually saw this film myself, because it was purchased to give to someone else.  My friend tells me he was delighted with it.
This is a very funny movie and very well acted by Jeremy Piven.  It is a comedy with some serious scenes, but never too dramatic.
Shows it you don't give up Love does come around to the one it is suppose to be an there is a Happy Ever After.
I loved this movie.  The performances were terrific. I would recommend it highly to anyone who wants to see a good film.
The bluray quality is excellent, better than I expected.It contains a bit more footage than the DVD version, and looks -much- better.
This is a great album!  I enjoy it evert time I watch it!  Some of my older friends do too!
Neil Diamond at his best, captured for my personal enjoyment.  I may have to buy more for my family and friends.
Excellent show in a smaller venue.Performance great and more personal than his big concerts.If you are a fan...you will love it.
Gloria and her Miami Sound Machine are glorious.  This is a phenomenal concert with highlight after highlight.  "Oye Mi Canto" and buy this DVD.
Gloria and the guys in top form, lots of great music and dancing, good sound and picture quality.
One of the best Jackson video's. I am so glad I bought this.All Jackson fans should own this one.
Michael Jackson is the best entertainer the world has ever known.  I am glad to own this collection of his talent on film.
My Son is a huge fan of Michael Jackson's so this was a gift and we were very pleased with the product and shipping.
A MUST have for any Michael Jackson fan for sure!! Loaded with greatness. If you haven't seen this one you need to.
I love all of the music videos that appear on the DVD, and I like the music. Good value for the money.
This is one of two DVDs that you can purchase and if you like MJ, you need to buy them both.
This video covers a very good sample of his dancing and it is a great experience. Watch it, love it, keep it!
Nice quality production, lots of music, satisfies the craving for listening to Stevie's music and seeing him perform.
Out of the 60+ concert videos, nothing else compairs. Close maybe, but this one is the BEST. The hope diamond of a concert & such a very rare find.
a truly amazing tribute to one of the great guitarist a fantastic line up of great artists great sound and video just wish it was longer
Don't waste your time reading more reviews. Get in your car and buy this right now. This one is worth it. What are you waiting for?
What can I say that hasn't already been said, easily the best MTV unplugged ive witnessed.
This is by far the best MTV Unplugged to ever be recorded, EVER. Its the closest thing to perfection I've ever seen. WHERES THE BLURAY?
This is another must own DVD for anyone who loves live music. This is surely one of my favorites that I own.
Very calming for patient's with dementia and also for the caregiver. Watching the conductor is as fascinating as watching the musicians play.
The concert is amazing and the director is just awesome, love listening to it when i'm driving and watching it at home.
This DVD is awesome and Mariah Carey gives 1oo % in this DVD video andthis why I think this DVD of her deserves 5 stars.
GREAT GROUP LOVE THEIR MUSIC I CAN SING IT ALMOST EXACTLY THE WAY THEY DO IT SO IT IS GOOD
I bought this as a present for Christmas and have not used it yet.  I have faith that the quality is good and I received it very timely.
This is a great Christmas video, it stands the time, and the adults love it too. I've watched it about ten times....
Look High & Low for this original version of the Sesame Street Christmas. This came out before political correctness ranamuck.
Brings back so many fond memories. A classic in Sesame Street before Elmo took over the neighborhood. Those were the days...
I love this dvd.  It has all the sesame street favorites and my daughter loves it.
This is the best Sesame Street DVD I've viewed yet. It has most of the older songs my daughter likes.
i bought this for a friends son for christmas and he loves it! educational and toddlers love it! cant go wrong
Its Beavis and Butthead.  This show defines the childhood of all 90's kids.  If you don't like it then you can just get the hell out.
I previously watched this show some time ago. I still have the DVD collection on my book shelf . This is mainly for fun
How can you beat Beavis and Butthead for a good dumb laugh! Happy to find it online. Lots of episodes to catch up on.
This DVD is cool I can't wait to buy the other seasons I have been wanting this for a long time
the great cornholio is the best beavis and butthead episode get if you can find it dillhole
I enjoy this show when I need a little mindless fun. This episode features some great early episodes of Beavis and Butt-Head.
The streetgighter movies are great, good stories and fight scenes. Stay away from the Series though..... it is very boring and repetitious.
Excellent DVD, interesting storyline, and great animation. Received in perfect condition, and quick and easy transaction.
Classic Anime featuring Characters from the Video Game. The intro between Ryu and Sagat was awesome.
I really dislike anime but this is an awesome movie. Great story plot they put together and the characters look awesome!
I bought this video to see all the bands from My generation. Especially the Moody Blues.  Great performances by many bands.,
Always loved John Denver.  This I think is one of his best concerts and the DVD is a great reminder of his talents.
A wonderful dvd with all of the songs from John Denver that you remember and a bunch that you don't.
We had this in VHS and just needed to put it in DVD.  Excellent show from John Denver, for everyone.
I love John Denver.  These were his signature songs for a worthwhile cause.  I have enjoyed watching and listening to these classic songs.
I love this album!  John Denver is one of my all time favorite singers.  He sings about stuff that is also important to me.
Excellent music DVD which is often hard to find.  Big on music; short on talking. Many of his most popular songs. Well done.
Great concert!  Great collection of songs!
This is a must have DVD!!! I think he sounds great! I have over 150 music DVD and I allway's love to listen to this music DVD!
Great work out video from Kathy Smith! Helped me shed some pounds without making me feel like I was going to pass out.
Kathy is my favorite instructor- she is enthusiastic, easy to follow, and the 2 minute circuits on this workout are just tough enough.
This is one of her best video tapes. She is the best. I highly recommend it.
this is a great horror movie for the true fans. One of the most origianl films to come out in a long time.
I love the 70's and 80's horror movies they are still the best thank goodness for an abundance of them.
This is a kind of sick movie but well done.  Chuck Connors is very good in it.  Keeps you guessing.
This is a hard to find movie. I love mark harmon in anything so I like this film. Intriguing storyline.
Excellent DVD sexy funny cute romantic teenage cuteness so go buy it now you will enjoy it so have a good night watching and fun
My mom and I watched this years ago and every time I watch this I love it! Its sexy, romantic, makes you think about love and life.
I had a tricky time finding this film on dvd so I was happy to find it here. Great price and a bitter sweet love story.
I actually owned this movie years ago.  I love the Indian culture and the film is romantic, sexy in a nice way and beautifully filmed.  Enjoyed it.
This movie is so hot! It has an actual story and it's a gorgeous period piece, but the real action is all the love scenes that are so sexy!
i enjoy this movie very much and enjoy the rich india culture and beauty in this movie. i can watch it again and again.
I could not  fine this movie on DVD any where else and I was happy that you sold this movie  on DVD. It a great movie to watch
if u seen this movie a long time ago you will probably see parts u don't remember. thanks good movie still
one of the best and scariest of the horror film genre that I've watched. If you're scared of dentists don't watch.
this is a really good movie lots of good acting here a really must see movie for all horror lovers out there
This movie was great... but very sick to watch! No wonder people are scared of going to see The Dentist.
This is another one of those movies that was a gift for my daughter.  I will never watch it therefore won't be able to give a product review.
action packed. Check out the sideburns. Everyone should give this B movie a look.  It is always good to see Russell in the early days of his carreer.
Love this movie! It is a classic and definitely a part of my great movies collection. I can watch this over and over again.
The service was prompt and the movie.....well I have only one word EXCELLENT, I can watch it over and over thank you
I love it the cast was excellent i would recommend this movie to family & friends what a great cast
I really enjoyed the movie Eve's Bayou and the story line. The movie was very entertaining and well acted by a great cast.
Eve's Bayou is one of my all time favorite movies.  The entire cast is excellent!  This is a must see.
I received my item on time and in advertised conditions, great doing business with you and will do again.Thank You !!!
this is one of my favorite movies to watch! It came pretty fast and in good conditon.  I'm pretty satisfied.
SAW NIT ON TV AND WANTED TO GET A COPY OF IT SO I COULD WATCH IT AGAIN WHEN I WANTED I LIKED IT SO MUCH. GREAT MOVIE. GREAT ACTORS
This is a damn fine film and book, keeps you interested the whole way through and gives you an unexpected finish :)
hadn't seen this movie in a long, while was happy i found it . i enjoyed it and will watch many more times.
ABSOLUTELY CUTE KIDS MOVIE THAT THE ENTIRE FAMILY CAN ENJOY.  FUNNY AND EXCITING.  TEACHES LIFE LESSONS WHILE PROVIDING ENJOYMENT.
This is a great movie for the whole family.Some funny parts to make you laugh.Just a nice movie to enjoy.
The movie was exciting with a lot of action, it held your interest. I would buy this movie again even though I already watched it.
It's not as good as Back To School or Caddy Shack, but it's funny, enjoyable, and well worth the price.
Rodney Dangerfield is so Funny in this movie. I'm glad that I have this on dvd. R.I.P. Rodney Dangerfield! Your movies will live on forever!
you will enjoy this movie; if anyone likes rodney dangerfield you will most certainly enjoy this movie. he will keep you in stiches ofbeing so funny.
This belongs in every collection. Stunning!
What is it like to be a Christian Missionary?  I think this film does a great job in portraying just that.  Well done...!
Deep and vived story of the way that knowledge of destiny should and can help us with our decisions to live fully.
This is a terrific movie! The quality of the video is excellent in my opinion and I would definetely recommend the video to anyone.
black robe is one of the best movies ive seen in a long time it has evert thing you want in a movie.
This suspensful horor classic is a must own for those who love scary movies. It will make a great addition to anybodys scary movie collection.
Anyone who ever worked for a horrible boss will appreciate the 9-5 dark humor revenge theme.Non-linear timeline won't work for some.Amusing film.
great movie with kevin spacey and crew in it.  i always enjoy kevin spacey in any movie as he is a great actor
Disturbingly real.  One of the best dark comedies of all time.
At the moment, Kevin Spacey is at the artistic top of his profession. This film exemplifies that observation. Go buy it.
This is a fun movie. That leprechaun sure is persistent, plus he is a good driver!
oh man, this is probably one of my favorite classic gore movies.  There is just blood everywhere. Good whacky story line, but it fits this film.
If your the type who enjoys gore, look no further this is a bloody good time.
the best gore film of all time. i wish jackson would still make movies like this
IT'S A MUST SEE FOR ANY HORROR FAN! GREAT HOLIDAY FUN! LOL
It was great.Not like anything I have ever seen.Just like everyone has been saying it has more blood and gore then any movie I have seen.Enjoy.I did.
I bought this one for my son and me. We watched it and love it. It is a great movie. I would recommend it for us older ones.
really happy with this product. a completely new blu ray for so cheap. i been looking for a good price and i found it.
This is a classic sci-fi movie from Stephen King.  It is even better than the book ! One of the best movies !
I love this film. If you like Harry potter, well this warlock make Voldemort look like Glenda the good witch of the north.
I loved this movie when it first came out. I haven't seen again since, so getting this and watching it again was a real treat.
Julian Sands is awesome in his role as the warlock. For an 80's horror flick its what you'd expect from a horror film.
julian sands is great in horror flicks i loved these movies when they came out so glad i could add them to our collection
DID NOT GET SECOND COPY PLEASE SEND ME THE DUPLICATE. I HAVE SOME ONE ELSE WHO IS A FAN JUST LIKE ME...
If you want state of the art special effects, this may not be enjoyable for you.  The solid plot and good acting worked well for me.
as a comedy romance i truly liked the comedy throughout this movie of course having brad rowe certainly helped what a spunk
It was so wonderful to go behind the scenes and watch these guys in action. Smart, funny, and very entertaining as well.
This is a Great Documentry about Bill Clintons run to become president of the United States.  A look into his campaign.
I was glad to find out that Doug Masters was not killed when he was shot down by the Russian's
I LOVE IT THANK YOU..100%
I love Vampires are this one is a very funny movie, it is just one of those slap your leg movies.
I understand this is a great movie.  I have not seen it, but plan to borrow it.  This was purchased for a friend.
This was my favorite movie till I saw Random Harvest.  This may be silly and sappy but I just love it.
The ending of this film was terrific. The story builds on improbability, through incredulousness, to an incredible ending. A terrific watch.
I saw this back in the late 80's early 90's.  I just had to get in on DVD.  There are a bunch of fav's playing supporting roles as well.
It's great. Note to self. Don't take your prom dateinto east la, get drugged by debo, and sell her to a pimp for 1500$.
Love this movie! Has a lot of flashes forward and flash backs and over all hilarious! Reeves and his co-star were brilliant!
but I like all movies that have Adam Sandler in it. So I guess I am a little bias. Watch it, at least once and decide for yourself.
i was very proud of this product and i want to say thank you so much. it was in good shape when i got it
I purchased this for my husband, he loves this movie, it's creepy but good, you'll enjoy it.
i tought that it was a very amazing movie and interesting once u got in 2 it. i thought the movie was brillant and it deserve 5stars
this movie is a classic stephen king..it is long though, originally relased as a mini-series..so make time to watch this..very good!
I really liked this movie, I think its a classic. I like it because its so creepy. Its a good movie to watch if you like scary stuff.
Good old ominous dark powers story, straight out of the tradition of twisted New England fiction. One of my favorite TV movies of the 80's.
Love Stephen King and this is a classic. Will watch again and again. One of the better horror movies out there.
Not really a Stephen king fan, but really enjoyed this movie and the story behind it, Watched it twice since receiving and was a great movie,
this is one of the best movies that stephen king did.  i just love reading his books and watching his movies.
Kings best movie by far!!!!!!! Amazing thriller horror movie. If u love 4 hour king miniseries then this is the best one no doubt!
Classic steven king excellent tale and great acting as well..one of the best stories great for a stormy family night.
if you like stephen king books and movies you will definitely enjoy this. Of course books have more detail than movies
I really like this movie. Had watched it on tv as a mini series. I wanted to get a copy so I could watchwhen I wanted.
Stephen King knows how to write a story and produced a good movie.  Suspenseful and unexpectation happenings.  A good thriller movie
I absolutely love this movie, it came on time & in perfect condition. I'm glad with this purchase.
It would be nice if this were available in Blu-ray but dvd will have to do.  I enjoy S. King movies!
it keeps you at the edge of your seat and my grandkids love the show its great moviewould buy it agin if something happen to it
I REALLY LIKED THIS MOVIE IT'S WORTH WATCHING WHEN YOU GET TIME GIVE IT A TRY. IT'S NO WASTE OF MONEY.
Very Good Movie....  Great Price....
I saw this on tv, loved it and got the DVD as a gift! Anyone who loves Mafia movies, this one is for you.
glad that I got this movie it really was a great film recommend to all that like mafia movies. Danny Aiello was great and Jason gedrick was superb
The best "Best of" SNL video they have ever made!Chris's tragic death only made his legend grow!Hilarious video, I recommend the DVD though!
JUST GREAT JUST WHAT THEY SAID IT WAS YOU GOT NEW AND THAT IS WHAT THEY SAID GOT IT IN A TIMLEY MANNER
a great movie supposed to be a third sequel to sometimes they comeback. but its a stand alone can be seen without seeing the other two movies.
It's a Stephen King adaptation.  How can you go wrong?  These are a little on the silly side, but that's the best part.
Funniest guy on Saturday Night Live. Loved these skits. Have watched them multiple times and it is still enjoyable. Pizza.
Nobody needs to say anything when it comes to this fellow... He is bloody funny and his work always entertains. A great purchase!
Exciting, action packed as only a shark attack movie could be. I would reommend this movie to anyone who enjoys shark movies.
I was surprised by how avant garde this movie was. I found it to be simply hilarious. I laughed out loud all through it.
This movie is great! No booklet info inside this DVD case (Trimark doesn't carry booklet info inside the case, anyways.)
This is one of the best comedies I have ever seen.
thanks to others it made jennifer lopez worth watching and even feeling for. jane fonda was a great menopausal mom!!!
You should see this movie i the best of all Leprecahns except thefirst.Its funny,scary,weird and sick.The lepercahns [women] are hot.
Another good one in the series. That little guy really brings out the LOL's and we're glad to have purchased this one as well.
i turned this on when it was on cinemax last year. i loved it unexpectadly. it was not horror it is utter comedic perforomances.
If you like to laugh, if you love impromptu, if you miss the old Saturday Night Live ... ya gotta get this!
If you love old Saturday night and Steve Martin this is a must have. It includes "King Tut" which is a real treasure. Oh, for the oldies but goodies.
Burt Reynolds and Liza Minelli Cop movie co starring Dionne Warwick & Robbie Benson and James Remar awesome movie, unlikely pairing but works well
burt is his usual self and liza realy makes the movie worth it with her open hearted way great d v d
this is an excellent made movie for the whole family to set down to a quiet time of peace and harmony to watch.
This, in my opinion, is the best rendition of the life of Jesus. I could easily correlate the scenes from parts in the Bible. Tastefully done.
I loved it from the first time I saw it on TV! The story in the Bible was handled beautifully!
It arrived on time and in good condition and is a great movie..I would buy again from this vender...
Jeremy Sisto did an excellent job with his performance.  I enjoyed this dvd very much.  thank you very much. p
I saw Jesus on TV and I wanted to have a copy of it on DVD. Jesus is a very good movie depicting the life of Jesus.
A different view of Jesus life than in the bible.  The dvd make him more human than God like to us.
This is the best Jesus movie ever. I love it because the Jesus actor is not a wimp. Great job.
This to me is a funny movie..great to watch on a rainy day and just relax...highly recommended to pick up...
I have seen a few versions of this movie and I think that this is the best of all. I thought it was very well made and compelling.
this an exilent movie angela lansbury dose a great job she goes back to a place and time where she was happyest must see for every one
This is so well acted and a very touching performance based on the subject matter.  Sissy Spacek is such a wonderful actress.
If you want to be moved or touch in a great way this movie is for you. It's as so much to offer and never stops. You will be pleased.
Sissy Spacek does an excellent portrayal in Place for Annie!
this is a great movie to the heart touching if you love heart touching movies then get this one ITS GREAT
This is an excellent filming of the Hardy novel with an outstanding cast and an excellent trailer. Timely arrival and in fine condition.
Catherine truly shines on ths movie.She has a natural talent for actingand she is truly beautiful to desire!
THIS MAY BE AN OLD DVD BUT WAS IN EXCELLENT CONDITION. THIS IS ONE OF MY ALL TIME FAVORITES TO WATCH. I CAN HARDLY WAIT TO SEE IT AGAIN.
An excellent, but sad movie - makes you realize what some kids have to go through when their home life is less than adequate.
IT WAS SAD AND GREAT! WE ARE VERY SOON GOING TO RENT AGAIN AND MAYBE BUY THIS MOVIE!
It must be me but this product came in much faster than said and in great shape
My husband and I loved it.  And Angela Lansbury is great!  Good story, lots of action and great songs in this one.
I love the move a lot and I'm glad that I have it and I love Christmas I'm trying to Collcet  Christmas move and thank you
This is a very moving story with excellent acting. It portrays the triumph of the human spirit.
The classic epic film adaptation  of  a  great story of  good vs. evil. A real nailbighter.
If you are into the whole King Arthur thing, then you will like this video.  Good cast and good special effects.  It's even better on a 50" plasma.
I really liked the type of fantasy of this game. They show you magic as something real. Loved
The DVD had more stuff on it than the [ VHS] which i have.Was evry enjoyable.
If you like knights, magic, merlin and medieval timesthis movie is for you!!!I loved it!!!Buy this movie you wont regret it!!!!
I liked the movie and just wanted this copy so I could watch ir on a rainy or snowy day.  I also like the actors.
This is a great movie, or at least I think so. I bought it because I realized it is no longer in production and I didn't want to let it get away.
This is a great movie. I love everything about it. The actors & actresses are all wonderful. Great story. Very magical!
This was a fantastic movie. I really enjoyed the special affects. Ill be watching this one again for sure.  .
Great DVD.  Given as a Christmas present.  Packaged well and shipped promptly.
Can't get enough of this fantasy!  I just lose myself when I sojourn into Camelot and its History (of should I say Legend).
This is a fantastic story in music.  Loved it so much I purchased two more to give as gifts.
An awesome different kind of movie that is definitely a classic. What a treasure to enjoy for the holiday season.
js a heart touching good for the whole family great movie.  nice to add to collection of movies.heart warming share and enjoy
A very good movie. Maureen O' Hara is the best as always! I recommend this movie highly! I would watch this movie over & over!
this is one of the most perfectly made westerns in all the years of movie making and is for any western buff
Picture looks fantastic on Blu-ray. The transfer is in widescreen. Every western movie lover should have this in their collection.
Love Robert Duvall in this film. I cried like a baby when.... well better not say or I'll give the movie away. It is awesome. a must watch.
What a great story...easy to follow well put together. I enjoyed it as much as I did when it was originally shown.
tre love in every sense our favorite movie of all time and all the spin offs from it are very good
Great Movie at a great price.  This is an epic story and Amazon got it to me without any loose or scratched discs.  Movies were in Perfect condition!
One of the best, and most powerful movies that I have ever seen.even though I am not necessarily a western buff
Love Robert Duvall.  Loved this story and the book as well as the movie.  Beautiful country.  Superb acting.  Buy it!
Can't go wrong for blu-ray under $8 (cooected from $11). Picture is clean and sharp, dvds were not. Storyline and acting are worth it.
this is a really good movie and i don't like westerns that much but i found this one entertaining. if you have not seen it then you should.
I PURCHASED THIS FOR MY HUSBAND FOR CHRISTMAS. HE LOVES OLD WESTERNS. HE HAD A GOOD TIME WATCHING THIS.  I RECOMMEND
This is one of my husband's all-time favorite shows.  I bought it to send it to him in Afghanistan.  He has enjoyed watching it.
Kenny and Robert.. What a well matched pair.. But then again,, they are great in any role.This one is a must for your collection.
He thinks this is a classic movie and watches regularly. For him it is pure entertainment and the actors are great.
I ENJOYED THE ITEM VERY MUCH, I RECOMEND THIS ITEM TO ANY COWBOY FAN.  I ENJOY BOTH ACTORS DUVALL AND JONES
Greatest western saga ever. Gus and Call are awesome.
This dvd is one of the best movies he has ever made. I'm so glad I was able to purchase it. A must have for his fans.
Is this not the Greatest Western ever made?? Is this not the Greatest cast ever put together? I watch it again and again and again.
i love lonesome dove movies, they are pretty decent, western type and good family viewingwould recommend for any family
One of the best movies ever produced. Robert Duvall's portrayal of western characters is as if he had actually been that person.
I've read the book and watched the movie several times. It never fails to move me. It is really the greatest western of all times.
None better - John Wayne has Never been in a movie of this caliber, glad he wasn't casted.  Best westen EVER!!
Own it!  what an outstanding series.  The first time I watched it, I was oblivious of anything around me.  A great western, great story. For EVERYONE
I could watch this movie over and over again.  I love the music and the movie.  Would recommend this for anyone.
Everybody loves Gus,I have watched over and over Love It,added to classic movie collection,must see classic movies and most watched
This is a great movie! I truly loved all of the actors in this movie. I would recommend this movie.
So nice to find a copy of this wonderful TV miniseries starring Robert Duvall and.Tommy Lee Jones as main characters.
A classic western.  Great scenery and all the actors were great.  A must have for any collector of classic westerns
This is one of those movies that you can enjoy watching over & over, such interesting characters and rich story line.
I loved the Lonesome Dove Movie when it first came out on TV. Every once in a while, I like to have a Lonesome Dove Marathon Weekend.
Now who can resist a good western?  I ask you.  this is a good one to be sure. Glad they made  it Glad I got it.
but still a great story.  Jon Voight does a good job acting, but Duvall and Tommy Lee Jones were a winning combination.
true love n every sense and naturally being a squel to lonsome dove it has to be watched with lonesome dove
We thoroughly enjoy this miniseries, and we love Robert Duvall.We look for anything he has been in to watch.  Love his characterAugustus McRae.
MY HUSBAND ADORES WESTERNS. I BOUGHT THIS FOR HIM FOR CHRISTMAS. HE LOVED IT.  I WOULD RECOMMEND TO ANYONE WHO LIKES WESTERNS.
Enjoyed this prequil of Lonesome Dove. I always love Val Kilmer and he played the sort of charater that he is know for
We have not viewed this item, yet. We watch Lonesome Dove and loved it. It came before it was due.
Return to Lonesome Dove is great. It's the perfect followup to Lonesome Dove. It should have been called Chapter Two instead of Comanche Moon.
you know this is one of the best western type movies, decent and with good story to it, would recommend
This is a great movie.  Thank you so much. Very well done we watched it two days in a row.Loretta
This is a great sequel to my Lonesome Dove collection. I love to watch the whole series in order and this one is a valued addition.
Love It continued story of Lonesome Dove,more of Woodroe and the journey back to bury Gus ,awesome movie must see !
Jon Voight does a really good job as Woodrow. The whole cast is good! We haven't finished it yet but so far so great!
I have a friend that love all the Lonesome Dove series.  So I decided to purchase this DVD for her Birthday.
We love this movie!!  It  has very good actors in it!! We Highly recommend this movie!!  It is really an awesome movie!!
Good story.  Bought it as a gift. My friend is very pleased with it and has watched it several times.
Return is my favorite Lonesome Dove next to the original. This is wonderful.
this movie is incredible, anyone that is a fan of westerns should see this movie as well as the first one because they are awesome!
I love the ones with these characters the best. This was a gift for my husband and he loves Westerns but these are his favorite.
I love this movie. There so many trials and tribulations for each of the characters. Plus it really has close captioning. Truly an western classic
i loved  Lonesome dove so i liked this also because its a beautiful serie with a good cast and good acting.
This was bought for my brother.  He loves old Westerns. This came on time and the DVD was in great shape.  The art work was in great shape.
Wife loves Lonesome Dove and Augustus is her Favorite character in the movie and to her He makes the movie.
Loved it, loved it, Loved It, loved It , Yes, Yes Yes, Yes, Yes,  sooo sooo good good so good
The  movie doesn't hold a candle to lonesome dove, but it's still a good story.  James Garner is an awesome actor.
The person I purchased it for loved the movie.  It was received prior to the projected date, so I was very pleased with the process
classic western with plenty of action! would recommend to anyone to watch. would have loved to see the good guy get the bad guy.
I loved thisthis movie. It had some very  unexpected turns,.  Anyone who enjoys western will consider this good stuff!
I was very pleasently surprised that it arrived so quickly.  I thoroughly enjoyed watching the movie, and will no doubt order more when I need them.
I love Larry McMurtry, and have read all the books in the Lonesome Dove series, and the movie was very special! James Garner's no slouch, either!
if your a james garner fan this one you will want to add to your collection it has a busy storyline with lots of action and supporting cast.
This one disk has finally became available at a decent price and completes the series of Lonesome Dove. Excellent series and great video.
Purchased for a friend as well as the others so they can see what they have been missing.  This is a great show.
A very well done sequel to &#34;Lonesome Dove.&#34; James Garner does a creditable job of portraying the role first played by Tommy Lee Jones.
Larry McMurtry's Streets of LaredoAnother Awesome Lonesome Dove addition DVD.  They all seem to be great!!
I like James Garner and i liked lonesome dove,so it is normal that i buyed this also.And i dont regret it
She plays the series at least once a week or more. Wife is a Real Western fan and loves the CD's.
I love this movie and it has to be one of the best call of the wilds ever. Thanks again
For the Western lover this is a must have collection for you. Great Stars Great acting.
Item arrived on time and in great shape. Everyone needs this collection for the Western Movies
This is one of the best Hallmark movies I have seen. Great story line and one I would recommend.  Bill K.
I bought this for my mother.  She loved the movie and it was worth it.  She loves Hallmark movies and this one is great!
Wonderful time travel love story!
This was an excellent movie, one which I greatly enjoyed watching.  I have no doubt that I shall be watching it again.
When his character in the past died, It broke my heart.  I felt joy again when he met his love Jennifer's look alike at the end.  What magic.
Love these type of movies with a twist and how they end up. Also Loved the setting of the movie
I absolutely loved this movie, Campbell Scott is great and so is Jennifer Jason Leigh.  They played their parts so convincingly.
This is a fantastic story that will long be remembered. Enough of a love story for those so inclined with a touch of mystery and magic.
A very unusual love story taking place between two different time lines.  It is a very romantic movie for those who like them that way.
This is one of my favorite Hallmark movies.  I highly recommend this to any one who loves a great love story.
This was an awesome movie. Very romantic.  I would recommend this to anyone who likes chick flick movies. It is a sit and relax kind. :)
I love this movie and I needed it on DVD.  Such a great Story and lots of entertainment.Will enjoy it for a long time.
Our entire family enjoyed The Echo of Thunder!
I originally saw this movie on the Hallmark channel and loved it.  I was delighted to find it on amazon (even though its only available on VHS).
This is a heart warming movie.  I especially liked the enthusiasm of the little girl, Opal, towards having a new big sister.
This movie is hard to come by. You will laugh and you will cry and you will be amazed . Great film. Best in a long time.
Great movie, great acting, great plot. Worth more than 5 stars.The "plot twists" are wonderful. You will not be bored.
This film shows a deserted child who finds a way to cope with his circumstances.  We had it on VHS and bought it on DVD because we loved it so much.
Second only to &#34;Anne of Greene Gables&#34; in my book, this movie was sad, funny, interesting and had a GREAT ending!  HIGHLY recommend.
Give`s Christmas a Different twist!  The whole family will love it, there is no nudity in the movie so it`s good
Hello!  Art Carney as Santa Clause!  I'm glad I was able to get it.  A little disappointed not in DVD though.
The Movie arrive in a timely manner and was well packaged. I really enjoyed the movie. I would have preferred to get it on dvd, but couldn't.
I saw the movie on the Hallmark Movie Channel and wanted to add it to my home collection. Please Hallmark, create a dvd of this wonderful story.
ACTING WAS GREAT, LOVED THE STORY, YOU WILL ENJOY THIS HALLMARK MOVIEi HAVE SEE THESE LADIES IN OTHER FILMS AND THEY WERE GOOD
A truly inspiring movie about life,friendship,and death.A wonderful movie.Watch it with your loved ones.Appreciate life.
This movie was surprisingly good.  I love stories about Indians, and the extra special feature was Graham Greene was in the movie.
Loved this movie. I would highly recommend it to anyone who loves to watch American Indian movies.......I have watched it two timws already......
was in great shape would order again
its a nice story of a indian that mingles with white men. he has many adventures. it didn't cost to much
My kids and I love this movie. Adam beach is one of our favorites besides Russel Means and Irene Benard great family movie.
Brent Shields and Durango are two favorites in my household collection of movies!
This is a great movie without the heavy Irish little people brogue, but good scenery a wonderful story and great characters.
This is a favorite holiday story of mine it's moving,delightful and has a happy ending great family movie with an angel 's help.
Hallmark Hall of Fame movies are great movies to watch and this one is a great way to start the Christmas holiday!
this is really good movie if you like love stories this real good one come check to out hope you like
This is a great movie and very good for family entertainment. This is a movie where Miracles do happen.. A very touching story.
this movie is great it showes what areal family would do for little family members ,fantistic,,,, love this movie ican watch it over and over
I fell in love with this story. Patty Duke as an angel, priceless! Love, drama, and Christmas hope. A must have for any Christmas collection.
I really liked this movie - the story line was excellent. it's very heart warming that is good and can be enjoyed by the whole family.
Gave this as  a gift to a friend and she loves it.  Shipped very quickly.  I know this will be a wonderful edition to her DVD collection
This movie is right up there with the best of the best.  It's a simple story with the mandatory Christmas happy ending.
I loved this movie it is very realistic there are alot of relatives that are raising children because of addiction its a very warming story
I RECORDED THIS FROM HALLMARK SOME TIME AGO AND IT WAS A GOOD CHRISTMAS MOIVE, ANDMY COPY WENT BAD ON ME. SO I DECIDED TO ORDER ANOTHER
In this movie it shows how WRONG The Department of Human Service's can be mean and cruel and don't really care what is best for the children.
love it the air great move another favorite, its in my collect and its one to watch over and over when ever i like too.
this is a very nice christmas movie for the whole family to watch i seen this movie on the hallmark chennel this year and i had to buy it.
This is my all time favourite Christmas movie.  I watch this movie every Christmas and thoroughly recommend it to everyone.
As an afro-american a dvd pertaining to my history is always a plus.  Well written and portrayed.
MASSA, OH MASSA IS EXACTLY WHAT WE ASK YA. SILLY AS IT SOUNDS THIS MOVIE GIVES THE IMPRESSION OF NO BLACK MALE OVE.
Lots of characters, and lots of storylines.  You'll never be bored with all that's going on, interesting F/X
This is one of those edge of the seat thrillers and so few people seem to know about it, it's our 2nd copy!
I already had a copy of this DVD. This was purchased as a Christmas gift for a family member.  It is very entertaining!
Great story, this 3 hour long movie takes you to mystical places in persia and china, great adventure with lots of action!
Excited to get this video - very happy with price and DVD.  First time I've watched this movie and I love it.
it is like owning four movies in one. They tie all the stories together so nicely it is really worth owning and it is geatly priced
There's something for everyone in this movie with its many different facits.  It simply was a fun movie to watch.
For a true horror fan like me I felt this to be a refreshing difference in comparison to all the other horror shows.  I liked it!
I think this movie was the best I've seen. Esspecialy when he freezes the girl in the bath tub. A buy for all movie fans.
OH MY GOD...UNCLE SAM I WANT YOU DEAD IS THE BEST MOVIE EVER!!! A MUST SEE! SCARY, SUSPENSFUL, AND VERY FUNNY! HOLLA
if enjoy Zorro movies , you should have this in your collection , you should have the cliffhangers also , rec on time ,
Any film associated with Zorro, I am a fan. But this spaghetti Zorro is different and exciting the Zorro soundtrack is excellent too. A must watch.
Simply put if you remember that classic ZORRO song. You are buying the right DVD! Alot of fun!
My wife read this story many times.  I'm glad I was able to get this for her.
As far as I am concerned this is the best video version of The Little Princess out there. It needs to be on DVD!
This verion only takes a few liberties with the story, otherwise was faithful. I don't think the Chistmas scenes were appropriete.
I love Jessica Tandy. I've had this on tape for years but that's becoming a thing of the past. Family friendly too.
I have been looking everywhere for this movie.  It was just as good as I remember.  It came very quickly and was carefully wrapped.
One fine informative and educational tool that makes a difficult subject interesting and easy to understand. Should be in every school in the nation.
FASCINATING, PLUS I ORDER FROM AMAZON FOR EVERYTHING I WANT THAT IS AVAILABLE.  YOU'RE GREAT!
A realistic look at teenage issues unlike the imbecilic trash with canned laughter so common on American TV.
Just a great continuation of the original story.  Again, adult themes so not for everyone.
The twists and turns you are taken through by the end of the flick you will be happy you took the time to watch.
Lots of fun and reality.  Olympia Dukakis as the central figure is always terrific!  The entire cast with Billy Campbell was superb.
just an all around great series. The Actors gave their all and could not have been better choices.  will be watching this many times.
well this ones kinda weird and keeps you wondering and guessing and at the end when you find out what happens and why its crazy
I first saw this one on PBS many years ago.  My wife didn't.  We really enjoy this one.
great ! This is not a movie, but a short sermon of how the devil works and how he will be destroyed
THIS IS A VERY CHARMING PRODUCTION WITH MANY GOOD MESSAGES FOR YOUNG AND OLD ALIKE.  I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE
Down the Rabbit Hole.This is fabulous material--watched several times on my own, and reviewed withlike minded friends too. Thank you.
I love this movie.  Every time I watch it I learn so many truths I missed the times before.  It is a movie thar keeps giving and giving.
Better and lots more content totally worth it! It'll change the way you think about life.
A great documentary and a mind-stretcher.Your brain will feel like its had a wonderful work-out after you see this movie.
This is a very thought provoking movie and well worth the price.
Great movie to watch over and over.  Great gift to give too as it opens your mind to new possibilities.
I think that this video set is priceless. It is full of stories that I believe to be true, but I was not taught about in school.
enjoying this workout.  it goes pretty slow paced, but as I am recovering from some surgery, it is just the right pace.  attention to details.
i saw this movie on ewtn and loved it!  sidney penny was well cast as bernadette.  this movie gives a more factual account of bernadette's life.
It is unfortunate that the French don't seem to equate their greatness with the devout in their country's past, like Bernadette.
This is one of the greatest stories ever told. Beautifully done. This is the movie that is shown at the Vatican every day. A must see!
THIS IS AWESOME AND DON'T LISTEN TO THE BAD OPINIONS WHO SAYS IT ISN&quot;T BECAUSE IT IS.AND SO ARE ALL THE OTHER FILLERS!!!!!!!
was happy to watch and have a lodoss war night watching original series then following with chronicles, makes a great stay in night
This is a great family movie. Very creatively done. Wonderful Story line. A must have for any Christmas collection!
Emmet Otter's Jug Band Christmas was a favorite of my sons. We had recoreded off the tv and had worn the tape out.
i've loved this story since it first came out and it's been a tradition in our family for years; anyone with small children will love this
GREAT MOVIE.  SO GLAD THAT I ORDERED IT,BECAUSE OF FOND MEMORIES FROM SEEING WHEN I WAS YOUNGER.  THANKS.  REALLY APPRECIATE IT
This movie may be old and you can see the stings in some season but it's just a good wholesome Christmas movie to watch with the whole family.
I have loved this movie since I was a child. So very glad to have found it on DVD. A great family movie.
So glad i found this, made my Christmas! I never see this on tv and my kids even remembered watching it too. Made us all very happy!
This is a regular watch for us each year. Instead of hunting down the annual copy I was able to FINALLY purchase it at a great Amazon rate.
Got this for my Grandson and he loves it. Great for younger kids year round ! He's probably watched it a 100 times.
I bought this because I needed a good version of &#34;Riverbottom Nightmare Band&#34;.  I loved this special when it was first aired......still do.
If you like those 1970s sci fi films this one is for you. It reminds me of being a kid again.
This unit was all I expected, and remembered it to be.  No question, a good "investment" of time and money.
great gene roddenberry movie and john saxon was just great in this movie and ted cassidy who played lurch in the adams family tv show of the sixties
This series is very, very good.  The instructor makes kung fu and qi gong principles accessible to the common person, like me.
Its a great movie as well as the graphics..story line is good as well. I Recommend this one for the family for sure.
My kids love Scooby Doo so this one was def a hit and the watched it several times. Plus it was actually one that we had never seen before.
These are later DVD's and they are still good.  My grandson and I enjoyed this a lot...watched it 26 times if there are any questions.
Scooby-Doo shows are fun and having them in DVD makes it easy for travel and they are shipped quickly, in great shape at a great price.
Another entertaining Scooby. Great for the entire family. Always a great way to go when you don't know what else to watch.
3 Year old loves this movie. She watches it all the time in her room before bed. Love it  love it....
This is one of the good Scooby - Doo movies that has been done. I would absolutely buy this movie again.
I really enjoyed watching my 5 year old grandson enjoy this movie. Movie was good to watch for adults who can remember child side.
These are tours around different locations in Europe, with good pictures and information.  All Rick Steve's tours are worth watching.
It beats me why they wont release Rick Steve's DVDs in Bluray as they are broadcast in high definition anyway.
GREAT PRODUCT AND THE PRESENTOR WAAS DELIGHTFUL. wE SHARED THIS VIDEO WITH FRIENDS AND THEY FELT THE SAME. THANK YOU.
I love this show. Its so "60ish". This season, and likely all future seasons, will only be available on line from Shout! Factory!
Grew up watching this series. I have always liked it a lot. It's a shame you have to wait so long in between series.
Received the DVD in excellent time, faster than usual.  Great movie for my Sonic the HedgeHog collection, glad to have it.
I look forward to seeing this DVD. I haven't had a chance to watch it yet though. Thanks again for the DVD.
I love the show, and wish they never cancel it.  It is a family show for the whole family to enjoy.  It is close to real life.
This series is really awesome and is going to make a great gift for the Ironside fanatic in our family.
Season Three is great.  The color is good, good scripts, maybe a little low on the volume but you just turn it up.  We have not been disappointed.
I had not forgotten about this gem from the past. What fun to watch! buy these if you enjoy good old TV!
bought this for my mother - she is enjoying completely & remineses about watching the TV show with my grandmother
at last 71 episodes of the goldbergs,what a great dvd,picture great,sound great..it's about time...thanks
This dvd brought back yesteryear for me that was closed to my heart,I loved it.
I must say it is as good as the other seasons. It seems to be out of order the episodes; otherwise a good buy.
I really likes this one because it was a good show and I miss it . I would recommend this to anyone
We like them.. They were funny group in those shows.. We watch them again sometimes, thanks & have a nice day..!!
Unbelievable how much of a workout these simple movements give you.  Thoroughly enjoyed it.  Especially good if you haven't worked in a while.
I am beginning to feel less pain in my knees. I am enjoying the workouts and I am happy that I bought it.
Fun movie that I remember the book from 30 years ago...my students enjoyed it and would recommend to any math teacher.
We received a collage video catalog and this was in there so we boought it here instead so we could get a better deal.
I really liked this workout video. I could see a change in my body after using it 3-4 days a week for 3-4weeks. As could my husband!
This turned out to be a great workout video with so much information about losing fat in just the right places....especially the stomach!
I really liked this walking DVD. It was fun. It had a couple of moments during the last set I got bored but all in all it really worked your body.
From the music to the costumes, to the phenomenal characters, this show is awesome! Every detail is so well done!
Absolutely love this show.  It is well written and no main character is safe from dying.  I think the writers are great and the twist are surprising.
I am not a big television watcher, not many interesting shows. This is an incredible show. I am waiting for season 4.
I love Sherlock Holmes and Downtown Abbey on the BBC.  It's just fun to watch.  I love fun historical shows.
I'm hooked on this series and the players and characters.  Like watching a historical soap opera, only better.  Hunger for more and more.
If you haven't started the series--do so!!  It is a timeless series, and as always Masterpiece Theater does it right!
Again, how can you not love anything with Dame Maggie Smith in it?  As the characters develop this series just gets better and better.
I enjoy watching this series so much, I hate that it only has 4 seasons!  I sincerely hope that there are more seasons coming!
I love Downton Abbey Season 3, but was very sad about the ending. Hope I like next season - I read about it and am looking forward to viewing it.
I am addicted to this show and plan on purchasing all of the DVD's as they come out.  Love this show.
The characters continue to develop as the story unfolds.  We say goodbye to some old friends and new characters are introduced.
This is just a preview of the season but it was worth it. I havent seen season three yet but im ready for it.
This series give you something to discuss with others who are also watching.  I love the dialogue and guessing what will happen next.
I can't wait to see Season 4 but it is $1.99 each. I will anxiously wait until I can stream free with my Prime membership
Love this show!!! The writing is amazing and the storyline so compelling! Love the BBC they have created some of t he best television on air.
My wife called me all excited because Amazon had season 3 online.  But after we downloaded the show we found out that it is just a teaser.
This was great. Can't wait for more. It's one of the best series I have seen to date. Keep them coming
I love Downton Abbey, its a MUST SEE, the storyline and scripting is spectacular. Everything about this show is great, except Thomas :)
This series just gets better and better. I love everyone of the characters. Can 't wait for the next season of shows.
As always this show rivets me.  It's got fabulous actors, great dialogue and I love the period authenticity of the entire series.
I love these episodes. The acting is superb. What a place to live!  I am looking forward to watching Season 4
This is a great series for adults of all ages. The story themes and plots are great and hold you captive.
What an ending for season 3.  I will not be a spoiler and reveal it.  You must watch every minute leading up to it.  I could see it coming.  Can you?
I so love all the characters but there's always a few that touches my heart and this character did that.  Now  I am so hurt by this.
Great acting, wonderful story lines. Fabulous locales. Top quality tv, which we are sorely lacking in America. Thank God for the BBC!
Amazing writing, amazing cast. A chance step back in time and to pop across the pond via my TV. This is great Television.
Best showbEVER .  I experience every emotion when watching this show.  You really get in to the koves of the characters!  Love it
Such a great tragic show.  One of the best on tv.  I hope that my remaining favorite characters will make it.
Love this season, love this show! BEST British Drama on modern day cable television today! Watched all 3 seasons within a few days! Love it!
Yeah, I have it and it continues the story at Downton Abbey that we have grown to love. Now I am lending it out to other lovers .
Have loved this series since it started.  Didn't particularly like all that happened this time but hope things will go differently in series 4 and 5.
I really loved it and was so grateful that I was able to see it before I got too far into season 4.
Downton Abbey is an amazing series. Love the realistic take on the era. You fall in love with all the characters
I absolutely became absorbed in the story and the characters.  Felt a little lost when I finished all the episodes. Recommend it highly!
It was a great way to refresh my memory before PBS broadcasts season four next month.  The HD picture and sound are both excellent.
This is a wonderful series.  Masterpiece Theater has mesmerized us again into a bygone era with, as alway, consistent quality entertainment.
I save each episode like a special dessert to savor.... No more than one a day... Unless I really need it!Well done.
what a cast and what a castle and its real, thats what makes it so much fun it actually happened real similiar at least
I'm catching up on this series so I can begin to watch it at it's regular time on Sunday nights.  Excellent series.
The attention to detail in this series is remarkable. I enjoyed each episode and am anticipating season 4 and beyond.
Looking forward to next season.  I love the  characters and story line, but hated the ending of this season's story.
Great story.  Can't wait for season 4.  I own all seasons and will get 4 later on.  characters make you feel like they are your friends.
One of the best series out there.Anxiously waiting for season 4 to begin.Maggie Smith is one of my favorite actresses
i love to wathc it.ialso love how every one act in it.i love big abd great home'han/s like they hade back t
How would I rate the preview? Excellent. Best preview I've seen all week. Boffo. Going to tell all my friends to watch it.
Is there anyone who isn't addicted to this show.  I hear there's another season in the works.  I hope it's true!
I love this series...PBS series are always very well done and and this one is no exception. Everyone needs to watch
The characters are terrific.  Story line keeps you always interested.  This is a piece of art that unfolds with every episode.
What can I say great great great!!! I truly like this series. It is done very well. Not disappointing. My sister told me I should give it a look.
The series is so great and season 3 kept me wishing season 4 was ready to purchase.  I can hardly wait for Jan. 2014 when I can purchase season 4.
Viewing was clear and sound quality goodGreat show very addictingEasy access from amazon video will watch other shows
This one of the most superb shows on television.  Everything about the show is near perfection. Looking forward to the next season.
Would highly recommend any of the Downton Abby series.  Watched most of these on TV but had missed part of this one.
Love, love this. Where have I been that I didn't start this before?? It is amazing. Glad I am viewing the UK version
No spoilers from me... but get ready for an intense season!!!As usual, you're gonna love it! Downton Abbey will not let you down!
Great series! I love the era it takes place in. The costumes are amazing and each actor is perfect for their parts.
Just can't stop watching this series. And the extra information on the DVD is great if you can't get enough of Downton.
I enjoy watching every episode with anticipation. I have not been disappointed in any of the episodes. The cast is fabulous!
Season 3 didnt disappoint for a fascinating story but I was heartbroken about the ending and could not wait ti see season .
Maggie Smith could not be more fantastic, and the other actors shine as well. Season three does not disappoint, though it tugs at the heart strings.
This series takes you inside the two &#34;families&#34; that live in Downton.  You feel like an observer of a real live everyday drama there.
Season 3 had some surprising story lines that you wouldn't expect!! I loved it and would watch it again and again.
This series is fabulous!
I am totally addicted to Downton Abbey. Well done show that never fails to entertain me. The  plot lines are good but they are not dreary.
This is such a great series.  It shows what life was like in the early 20th Century.. Love the story line..
Just love this series.  Have watched the complete series twice now.just can't wait for Season Four to come out.  Watch it!
The best yet; sad to see one of the main characters killed in a car accident any chance he will come out of this alive remains to be seen
I have always enjoyed Downton Abbey and season 3 stays right in line with the other seasons.  I will always be a big fan.
Love this show. It's total escape an hour at a time. Well defined characters and great writing make this a very entertaining show.
Best TV series ever!  Love the drama and 20's setting.  I find every character's storyline compelling.  Can't wait for season 4!
Good gracious ... what more do you need than a five-star rating?  It's great!  Is that not enough for you people?
This is one of the best shows that I have seen in a long time. I love it and only wish I could get it on my stations.
Such great acting and writing. I love the costumes, characters and setting.  It's the only tv show I watch. Cant wait for season 4!
The costumes, the sets, the story and acting are superb.  This is truly a captivating series and I highly recommend it.
I love downtown abbey so much. It always finds a way to surprise you and keep you off your seats. It is really hard not to stop watching haha
Watched all 3 seasons in about three weeks. This is a great show can't wait for season four.  A great drama.
I am an absolute fan of this show.  I am not watching season 4 which is also well worth it.
British soap opera, girlie show, I really enjoy the characters and the time period and setting! can't wait for season 4 to be available!
When will be getting the next season.  I really like that you carry this high quality program.  Awesome amazon prime
I watched the first 3 seasons in 2 weeks on my kindle.  I can't believe how good this show is.
The second season of Downton Abbey continues to heat up.. and the twists and turns this show take keeps me wanting more. I love this series!
I love this series. It is just wonderful. The characters are so real to all of us.  We get emotional over their ups and downs.
Love this.  I enjoy the time period, clothing and sets.  It has a sense of history.  Everyone is talking about season 3 on FB
This show is so addicting.  I hope it stays for many more seasons.  If you haven't watched from the beginning I recommend you start with season one.
This just made things harder.  I need the next episode now but have to wait until 2014.  It's not fair!
What a great series!  Highs and lows, mega-drama and Maggie Smith has the best lines!  I'm anticipating the next season!
The best writing and acting of the series. I binge-watched season 3- the best way to view these dramas IMHO
Great acting with good plot lines and character development. Haven't finished watching but Season Three has been much better than Season Two.
This series is so much fun, it transports you to another time with it's close attention to detail from costumes to furnishings
Thank you for the great service, it was in excellent shape. Great Show! I do want the Season 4 when it comes out.
Best show on TV.. Midwife is really good thought I liked Revenge best but no more! Cant wait for tonight after last weeks shocker!
I watched season 3 to prepare for season 4 on TV. I enjoy all the episodes. It is a great series.
I love how the good the actors are, the props and scenery are wonderful and the story line never seems to get old or boring.
After seeing the first episode at a local preview screening for the new season, it will definitely be worth owning . I recommend it to anyone.
This is some of the best that British TV has to offer. Great writing and acting. And season 4 is just as good.
I am eager for the next season.  I enjoy the characters, the sets and most of all the wonderful actors.
Really enjoying this wonderful ensemble cast-
BOTH HUBBY AND I LOVE THIS SHOW.  WE WANT MORE SEASONS!  HOPE THAT IS THE PLAN FOR THIS SERIES.  THANKS.
The best interaction with entirely different social standings, if they live in the Abby they are family, no matter where they come from.
Amazing stories of a family and it's amazing home. You won't be able to stop watching this drama! Wonderful dramatic performances.
Not happy with the ending but am anxiously awaiting season 4 to see what happens next. Great series. Am truly involved with the family
Downton Abbey is a great series! so great to have a season all on one DVD.Hope we have many more seasons
Captivating! The script, production and acting are superb.  I learned a great deal about the time period.  Can't wait until season 4 begins.
I do recomend DA, the story, the acting the production it is superv I love it! We need the next season (4) to be prime!!!
It was a very action packed season with both good (happy) points and bad (sad) points.  You wont want to miss it!
A real Masterpiece!  The castle, the clothes, the furniture, the plot, everything is first class.Good Good Good Good Good
Can't say enough great things about this show.  I love it.  Gets better every season.  Can't wait for next weeks' episode!
like I said about previous seasons, it keeps me entertained and story lines do not drag on, they are wrapped up nicely.
Addictive series.  Best if watched in sequence with Season 1 and 2, but can be watched on its own. Recommended.
Love all the series they are so good. Can't wait for the next to come out. Would recommended to anyone wanting to see true characters.
I am thoroughly enjoying this mini series.  I am not totally done with this season.. but so far so good.
The Season finale was devastating. How could this happen. How could this be allowed. Excellent writing this season, which really pulled you in.
I just cannot wait for the next season... It was an absolute favorite of mine. I highly recommend it to anyone looking for a good watch!
The only problem with this series is the long wait between the end of one season and the start of another. I LOVE this program!
I am looking forward to season 4.  This has been a great series as most British series are.  So much better than most of the stuff on TV today.
Great show! You get so attached to the characters. The acting is great and the plots are riveting. This is a show you'll have to see from Season 1!
The characters are intriguing and so well-played that we've begun to care what happens to them. Maggie Smith is amazing as the dowager countess!
This is one of the best series on regular Television I have ever seen; can't wait to start season 4.
New twists and turns with our fabulous characters, and an unforgettable cliff hanger season end that leaves you really wanting season 4 to start
Full of surprises, great acting and scripts.  I would recommend the series to everyone.  It contains comedy and tragedy, great scenery and costumes.
What can I say that others have not already said. The varied characters and plot twists make this English drama the sensation it has become.
Wonderful to see the past years one after another. It was wonderful and can not wait for the new season.
I can't stop watching. I'm Glad I have Prime so that I can watch over and over again. Peace out
I thought this show would be boring...boy was I wrong. I love love love it. I can't wait for the next episode.
Really enjoyed this. You are quickly caught up in the problems of each individual. Addictive. Can't wait to see the next season.
Acting is superb and content was fascinating as I followed the plot. I really enjoyed how it all came together.
Well written and acted, interesting storylines, very classy and everything else about this series is excellent. I love British programs!
We wanted to review the final episode before starting the new series Sunday evening.This series is some of the best that TV has to offer.
GREAT! GREAT! GREAT! GREAT! GREAT! This is one of my favorite series of all time. If you haven't watched this yet, HURRY UP!!!
Such a great period piece. Love it! This season gets a little more melodramatic than necessary, but that's just Downton.
This show is witty and delightful for history buffs and romantics. I loved it and can not wait for the next season.
Someone from work told us about this series and we got hooked. We love Downton Abbey and can hardly wait for Season 4.
great show recommend for everyone, I am watching season 4 now. its always good to see how the other half live
Very exciting and holds ones attention all the way through.  I would recommend this to any one who wants to be entertained.
Lots of tragedy but so is life...I am enjoying the life journey of this series...So much class  and well acted.
I'm going to love this new season. I so much enjoyed the other 2 and have watched them more than once.
The actors are so good. You just become involved in their lives and have to view more. Even the unscrupulous characters draw you in.
I really have enjoyed this series. I don't always have time for the television so watching this on my Kindle is great.
We love this series.  There are a lot of twists and turns in Season 3. Watched it with Amazon Prime.
The series continued with the lives of the Massey family and their servants.  A lot of sadness in season three, but still interesting.
its a great show if you not watching you need to be its set in the 20's so come and see
Great writing, well acted. Solid period piece about a time that isn't done often. Worth a watch if you haven't seen it yet.
the acting is superb and the scenery is beautiful. i love the storyand how  interesting it is without gratutios sex and violence
I just hope number four will be as good as the first three.  I look forward to watching number four!
This show is awesome, but beware the last show of the season. The last scene really made me so very mad! LOL
I've been told its like a soap opera but I hate soap operas. The acting is wonderful and it is a lovely period piece.
If you like pomp and circumstance,  you'll love the final episode of season 4.  It was great.  I highly recommend you watch.
Acting is excellent.  Feel as if you are looking in on real lives.  It is an intriguing period in English history.  It is hard to stop watching.
Season three was the best season so far. I can not wait for season 4. Must watch the whole series!!!
I Love Downton Abbey.  I like seeing how the Lords and Lady in their respective castle.  I also respect the workings for the &#34;working class&#34;
We are Downton Abbey fans. My family & I are looking forward to Season Four, January 2014 can't come too soon :-/
I really love this series.  I watched the whole three episodes in ten days, as I was housebound because of weather. absolutely wonderful clothes
An excellent TV series. Well written and acted. Combined human interest plots with reflection on changing historical background.Very well done.
The best season yet developed, with a cliff hanger at the end. Two key characters leave the series opening the door to new, fresh faces.
I am a new Downton Abbey convert.  I watched one season and was hooked.  This was a sad season but so well acted.  Watch it
It's a great series and season 3 does not disappoint.  The plots are wonderful and attention to details are magnificent.
Absolutely Love this TV Series. it's one you should watch from the beginning to the end. what a wonderful UK Show...
Excelent perfomances and story.  The characters are fully developed. It's a soap opera but done on a grand scale. Watch and get hooked.
I now know what all the talk of this series is about!!  Love every moment of the stories!  Highly recommend.
I like the show of season 3. sorry mattthew is gone. miss the show cannot wait for season 4.  love downton abbey.
Once again, just loved the story line.  The characters seem like old friends.  Couldn't wait for each episode.  Watch it!!!
Love Love Love Downton Abbey and happy I could purchase  this and add to my library.I will have it to watch in years to come.
I love this series and I can't wait for season 4.  The ending is shocking.  I can't wait to see what happens next.
I enjoyed this series very much and I am looking forward to the next Season. I hope it will be on Prime very soon.
I loved the series.  Good drama, lovely cinematography, interesting characters.  And I love a show that can make me laugh!
Amazon has the 3 seasons of Downton Abby!  All of the shows stream great no interruptions.  I love my Amazon Prime
I've only seen the first three episodes of Season 3 but it looks like it's going to be another winning season!
You will be hooked if you watch Season 1.  I can't wait to see future seasons and will be excited to see them on Prime instant video.
I love this show.  I can not wait toe see what happens in Season 4.  January can't get hear fast enough.
What else can I say... It's Downton Abbey!!  Best series ever!  Even though I watched every episode on PBS, I had to own the entire series.
Can't wait for the new season! Wasn't expecting it to be as good as it is. Easy to follow and great story line.
This is a fabulous series. I have really enjoyed it. The customers are amazing I have learned a lot in the process
I love the relationships in this series, both good and bad, very positive and hopeful about life. The historical setting makes it easy to relate to.
Can't wait for season 4! Lots of drama. Love the English accents, the characters, and the actors in this show.
I love this series of a show! I can not wait until the next season starts. Thanks for having available to watch
This series has to be one of the best to hit the American airwaves in a long time.  Filled with drama, there is never a dull episode.
It's a really good show and I guarantee you'll be hooked after viewing just two episodes!!  I'm currently viewing season 3 and it's excellent!
Fantastic look at the life of the aristocracy in England in the early 20th century.  Series highlights the wealthy and their staff.
I just love this show, it's so interesting to imagine life back then. i'm a defniite fan for it's lifetime!
This show just gets better and better!  It's relatively clean and the clothes and manners are so wonderful to watch!
Great story!  Incredible cast of actors and characters.  Absolutely love this series.  Waiting for season Four to come to Amazon.
Fast viewing - easy to follow - intriguing story lines and still always with a twist.  Love this show! Come on Season 4
Season 1 - Good!Season 2 - Great!Season 3 - Hold On too your seat!My wife says I have serious problems. I agree, I just like it!
Year three is heart wrenching but equally as good as seasons 1 and 2. I would suggest this to any serious Downton watcher!
I really enjoy this show and it continues to surprise me and I love the cast.  Can't wait to see what happens next season.
What can I say?  I love everything about this series.  The characters, the setting, the story lines....and how can you not love High Clere castle.
Went to a viewing of the season finale and I needed to view some of the old one's again.  I can't get enough.
The plot thickens in this season, and the season ends with a huge shock.  I'm looking forward to Season 4.
Yes, I am obsessed with Downton Abbey.  I can't wait for Season 4 (January 5, 2014.)  Best in TV history.
I loved this series. The plot is so good and the acting is superb. Can't wait to start season 4.
I watched all 3 seasons in one weekend.  Great show and I like being able to download all episodes for the 3 seasons all at once.
Fantastic entertaining season. The writers have surprises at every turn that you don't see coming. Can't wait for Season 4
I purchased Seasons 1&2 and started watching  them a few episodes at a time.  So happy I am able to stream season 3.
Except to say I am completely hooked!  I absolutely love Downton Abbey.  It is such a rich, wonderful series.  I want more.
Love that I can watch this show when I want for free on Prime. It's a great show and I highly recommend it!
I love love love this series. I am not sure if there is a new season yet but I hope there is. I cannot wait and I'm so excited.
With a fabulous cast and story lines, Downton Abbey continues to entertain and shed light on society in England after WW1.
Love all the actors in this show and the storyline is captivating.  Unlike other series, Downton Abbey keeps getting better with each new season.
I'm just an avid fan of Downton Abbey!! Actually, I love all PBS/BBC movies. I would love to see The Paradise also.
Thanks for the great dvd and the wonderful memories too! Now I can rewatch  when I want!!! Thanks for the memories
Very well done,my wife really enjoys them.they are all good and very well pro ducted.Wonderful job of being these to Netflic&#62;
I have been following Downton from the beginning.  Love the writing, direction, actors & Maggie Smith is such a wonderful actor!
Great story lines, acting, writing, directing, sets, and anything else you can think of. I enjoyed watching this very much. Well done!
The more seasons I watch the more hooked I get! Really happy that I started watching the series. Great casting.
I am Addicted! One of the best written televisionshows out there. It's smart, witty, and full of heart felt drama.
One of the best shows of all time!  I love all the characters...but hate Thomas, of course!  I highly recommend it.
This is a really wonderful TV series.  I love all the characters, the time period, and the interesting plot lines.
I really like this show.  The season was so good and look forward to the next one.  The story is great and has many twists and turns each episode.
Wonderful series.  With no breaks it feels like you are part of what is happening,  This deserves the highest awards for the TV industry.
We watched all three seasons and enjoyed the experience of being in another time and place with interesting (and complex) characters and intrigue.
This is an awesome show. A soap opera set in the WW1 era. I love the stories about the servants as well as the ladies and lords of the house.
One of my favorites shows ever! I really enjoyed the tv pass so that I could watch the whole season early.
Can't wait for season 4. I got my husband to watch Downton and he even liked it. We both are ready for next season.
Loved it, loved it.  The Actors are all perfect for their parts.  The Story is interesting and makes you want even more.
If I could I would give Downton Abbey 100 stars! O love this engaging series!! Thanks Masterpiece Theatre for another fantastic PBS series.  BRAVO!!
This was my first year of watching Downton Abby and I was so happy to get the season 3 at a good price
I have become addicted to this show and can hardly wait to see the next season.  The story line and cast are outstanding.
Still going good for the third season, this season has some sad times in it though and we are kinda left hanging wondering what is next.
Is a great program I really enjoyed love program from past century is beautiful.If u like show from England u will like this one
It was great to be able to catch up on the episodes I had not seen.  I enjoy this series very much.
Great show.  Always looked forward to the next chapter.Good story.  Great actors.  I do love English shows.Sorry that I a finished it.
ENJOY WATCHING AND CAN'T WAIT FOR THE NEW SEASON. IT IS BEAUTIFUL, WELL ACTED AND VERY MUCH A QUALITY DRAMA IN THE PBS/ENGLISH  TRADITION
Another great season with wonderful twists and turns in plot and character developments. Sad but interesting ending to the season.
My husband and I really love this show.  We would never miss it and have watched all of season 4 too.
I didn't want to like this show, but got hooked on the first episode. My favorites changed often through the season.
The BEST British show of the past 20 years. I must recommend it though there is a great deal of pathos and sorrow in the story.
I really enjoy series and movies with this theme. It's been awhile since something new has come out and I am enjoying this!
The acting and writing for Downton Abby is top notch as it has been since season 1. We cannot wait until season 4.
I love this show. It is so interesting. I love the time period that this cover. It is very interesting.
I loved season 3. This series just keeps getting better. I can't wait for Season 5.I watched Season 4 on TV.
this. show. WOWIE! I adore period shows and this is no exception.  Well done, BBC. The Brits have a special place in this Korean-American heart.
Great actors and good story.  There wsn't any profanety or sexual scenes and that was very refreshing.  Masterpiece did a great job.
i am a Downton Abbey addict. the acting and drama decor and lifestyle are so very interesting and authentic. just enough drama to believe!
LOVE the show, loved the first two seasons and this season 3 looks like it lives up to the other two seasons......
I enjoy the story, characters, costumes and locations.  I think women will enjoy it more than men, but I recommend it to all.
I won't tell you what happens, but it was not expected.  I enjoyed Scotland.  How will this great fictitious family survive?
Every episode is spectacular, and all they usually are is non stop talking. Best drama I've ever seen, besides NCIS.
Writing is superb.  Was a little upset when ...  No I won't say but now I am left in limbo waiting the new season.  Can't wait.
I am surprised at how much I like it. It helps me understand some old traditions in my home state of Virginia.
I love this TV series - it feels like a mini-series as the filming is extremely high quality and acting is superb.
it has surpased my exspectation and has given us many hours of enjoyment looking forward to the next season greatly
Downton Abbey is habit-forming!  Great for viewing on a color tablet.  Prime membership enables you to view quality videos free.
This whole series 'grabs' you and you feel as if you are right there while everything happens.  I will be glad when I can get the next Season.
I bought this set of DVD's as soon as it came it. Great TV series I highly recommend it.  I thoroughly enjoyed it!
Once again, I'm captivated by the story lines in the 3rd season of Downton Abbey. It just keeps getting better. Can wait to receive season 4.
It does not get any better than this series.  It does it all...acting, writing, costuming, school  meet.  A great  series  .
If you are interested in good drama's this series is for you.  It is never dull and always leaves you wanting to see the next one.
I enjoyed this season right up until the final moment of the final show...  then my heart broke.  Now waiting for season 3 is gut wrenching!
The acting is the best and the story line is involved just enough to keep you on your toes wanting to not miss a scene.
I am so caught up in this series. It has not disappointed me. I stay up late watching it on my kindle fire. I cannot get enough. Love love love it.
Loving this DVD! haven't had a chance to watch special features yet, but the show itself is enough. High recommend
We are still watching it. We enjoy the story line and the acting. The characters are well thought out and interesting
Omg I love this show!! It's slow to begin with but once you start watching it's amazing!!! It's a must watch!!!
One of the best period drama's ever. A must see. IfF you haven't seen it, get the DVD and watch it!
Great show.  Love the actors, plot and everything. It is a super show. please watch it, you will really love it.
Full of surprises and a wonderful group of nuanced characters and interesting plot twists and turns.  I look forward to season 4.
Really loved each episode. Can not wait to watch season four! I hope it will be as good as the previous ones.
Fantastic.  Took me a bit to figure out how the Prime works but once I did LOVED IT LOVED IT
Love, love, love this show, the characters are awesome. My only regret is that Matthew died and that Thomas is still there.
the show has a fantastic setting, intriguing storyline and amazing acting. I absolutely love the show and highly recommend it!
I love the characters, the costumes, the language, the wit....everything about this show is upper crust!  I can't wait to see Season 4!
The acting was superb.  The seres has done a great job depicting what was going on in World War II
Masterpiece Classic: Downton Abbey Season 3 has great stories just like Seasons 1 and 2 but this one probably won't make you happy at the end.
I have torn through Seasons 1-4 and now am back to Season 3 to watch it all again.  I love, love, love this series!
This series is way more interesting than many other shows on TV.  There's a little more intelligence here.  Even my son likes to watch it with me.
Continues the story that has captured the Colonies. I love it!  I downloaded it to my TiVo, and it is easy to watch whoever.
A wonderful series filled with wonderful sets, gorgeous costumes and spot-on acting. I was hooked from the first episode. So worth it!
I had to catch up with this series and have watched 1-3 to date.  It is a great series that keeps you glued throughout. Definitely recommend it
Each season just keeps getting better, and better.  I want them to go on forever.  The time period and the actors are just spectactular.
I gave this to  my daughter for a Christmas present and she really loved it!! She watches it on t.v. all the time and really enjoys the series!
I was so glad to find this on amazon since I really didn't want to buy the DVD.  It's a great show.
I love this show and have watched it from the beginning.  I'm so glad I signed up for Prime, love all the movies.
IT WAS A VERY GOOD SEASON..
A wonderful addition to any Downton Abbey fan.  Nice to look back to see what you really loved or missed the first time around.
what a series, though I felt it lacked some of the tightness of narrative of the first two seasons I still loved it
I enjoyed it tremendously.  I missed it when it was over. The acting was above board and the show was well dircted
This continues to have a great storyline. The dram pulls you in. That's a sign of great writing. The love story between the Bates never gets old.
I love this series!!  Besides it being well done: writing, acting and staged, it is truly clean. Thank you do much!  MORE, MORE, MORE...
Enjoyed this series on PBS and was able to catch the full series including extras.  Highly recommend adding this to a Collection!
Fell in love with this series over the recent holiday...binged three seasons to prepare for the current 4th season. Highly recommend.
I love this series and the wonderful acting, costumes and story lines that go with it! Great DVD! Keep them coming!
Thoroughly enjoy this highly intelligent show. Hope it continues for many more seasons. Characters are real and the acting is superb.
The continuing story of the lives of those in and around Downton.  New stories each season of delightfully exceptional quality.
Thoroughly enjoyed season three.  Looking very forward to the upcoming season four.  Hope this goes on for many more seasons.
This season targeted so many emotions and the characters reflect the spirit of the era in an immaculate way. Worth watching every second
Binge watching at its best!! [SPOILER ALERT] I did think the death of Mathew was rather soap opera-ish and excessive.
I can't get enough of this series. Great story lines. I was hooked after the second episode. Can't wait for the next episode.
Now I know what all my friends were talking about!  Love it!  And, so nice to see it on my Kindle Fire HDX, without commercials.
I loved this series.  My only dislike is the Mathew died.  I am particularly happy that Mr. Bates was found not guilty and released from prison.
We enjoy the series and can't wait to watch the next episode. Their way of life had to adapt and change to survive.
Bought this for the women in my family. Well, me too. Reminds me of Upstairs/Downstairs that we all watched some years ago.
Wonderful continuation of the established characters and story lines.  Beautifully acted.  A great ride and lots of fun to watch.
Am an avid fan of the scenery, the actors and the story. Have so far enjoyed every moment and hope the rest of the series is as good
It doesn't get any better than this, can't wait for the next season. This is what entertainment is all about. Great job!
One of the best programs on TV. Great story lines and flawless acting. Each character draws ones interest and empathy.
This is great family entertainment, as well as a history lesson.  Nine more words are required. Only four more.  Done
An awesome addition to our library. Cannot wait for season 4! Hope it goes to season 10!  Longlive the Brits
Great series!  Recommend it to everyone.  Holds your attention and can't wait for the new season to begin. Beautiful setting.
What a great series, loved every single episode, it is a nice change from all the same mundane TV shows.  Downton Abbey great show.
Wonderful period piece highlighting the world changes as well as the personal condition for both the aristocracy  and the every day man (and woman)
Really enjoy this story
Seems like all the characters have kindness in them after awhile, and thats good to see. This world needs more of that.
We have watched all the seasons, and can't wait for another.  Love this show!  We recommend it to all our friends.
You can really get hooked on this show.  This is a top notch soap opera, transporting you back in time and keeping you captive.
Truly the seasons just keep getting better and better.  Great story line with a wonderful cast. Really looking forward to the next season.
Started watching the show a couple of weeks ago on amazon  and all caught up now. The show is very good.
There is absolutely nothing better on TV at this moment....Downton keeps us guessing and always surprises...Patiently waiting for season four.....
Love, love, love the series!  We have to limit ourselves to one or two episodes a day!  It's hard not to just sit and watch the whole season at once!
Originality, writing, directing, acting! Great show, youll be hard pressed to find anything comparable in this classically approached genre. Cheers.
Exceptional quality show that is thought provoking, true to the time period it  represents as well as very entertaining for the entire family!
To me this show just keeps getting better and better. I ADORE the costumes in this season; very Art Deco!
It's is the best television series I have ever watched!  Can't wait for next season! Have told all my friends about it!
I enjoyed this series very much.  Its a must see for people whom like period pieces!  I can't wait for the 5th series to come out
This show just keeps getting better.  This season is full of twists and turns, enjoy the ride, but be prepared with tissues!
Downton Abbey Season 3 was great I also watched season one and 2Saw Season four on TV and can't wait to see it again on Amazon
Top Notch Entertainment at its best!
I enjoy the whole season from the plot to the clothing If you like period shows this is one to watch
So happy with this option of viewing Downtown Abbey instead of having to wait for a month and it's a great show!
totally obsessed love english mini series all together, i watched it on tv also and love it, cant get enough
It is obvious why this production has such a following.  Excellent writing and acting and can't wait until Season Four.
Love this show! Cannot get enough of it! It is a classy show and keeps you on the end of your seat!
The characters are intriguing and engaging. The writers make the ever-changing plot grab and hold your interest. I always want more!
Love the characters and story lines.  Also love the history intermingled in the story line.  Can't wait for Season 4!
Friends had told me about Downton Abbey but never had the chance to watch and now I can't get enough.
Continues the saga. Hated that Matthew had to die. Looking forward to more british series. Well done by julian fellowes.
A fabulous show in every way.  Once you start watching, you will be addicted.  Great acting, scenery and unexpected plot lines to captivate.
British upper crust at its best. Very well filmed and acted. I love this show and want to see more.
Downton Abbey is the best television series you could ask for.  It has drama, romance, suspense and life lessons.  Wish it could go on forever!
A really good show. It was a bit of a soap, but it was interesting without sex and violence for the most part.
Although the final episode was a complete shock, Downton Abbey never disappoints.  I love this program! So looking forward to season 4.
Prior to the PBS season four premiere of Downton Abbey, I again watched season three in a single weekend.  Am a total fan!
Great story, good acting, and it's non-fiction. I'm not British so that says something.  I hardly even watch the trash on live tv anymore.
I love all the seasons of this show so far.  It is very entertaining.  Highly recommended if you like drama.
This is a great series and I am looking forward to the next season. . Just rewatched all of the seasons in August 2013.
I love this series! It was brand new and I got it for even cheaper than I expected! And it came super fast!
This series continues to be enjoyable.  I like watching the series all at one time so I don't have to wait a week for the next episode.
Excellent show!!! Very well written and fast paced. Just wish there were more episodes!! I watched it twice and I got more out of it the second time!
The shows quality and sound can not be beat. Just like watching the show in its original time and place.
Downton Abby is worth watching more than once.  If you have made it through seasons 1 and 2 you already know this.
08/25/13 This is the third season about a very well-acted English Drama. You end up caring about all the characters and they never disappoint.
I purchased Season One and Two and never got around to season 3 but thanks to Amazon Prime I was able to catch up , can't wait for the next season
Love having the series to watch whenever I want to. Great series, great for girls night to catch up on missed episodes.
It's a frou frou soap opera. Each episode makes me anticipate the next one. It is compelling & delicious & fun.
i'm addicted to downton abbey so i was relieved & elated, like any good addict, to find season 3 on here. i love this show. it's solid.
What can I say, this show is unbelievable!! One of our absolute favorites! Can't wait for all of the future seasons!
Plenty of surprises and twist and turns that Are not expected. I loved it but it was definitely heart wrenching.
What a fabulous series.  Excellent in every way.  Can hardly wait for season 4 to become available.  This truly is must see tv.
I enjoy Downton Abbey mostly for the costumes, hair, setting, and scenery. The story line, I have to admit, draws me in and keeps me wanting more.
This series is why I watch television at all. It has style, dramatic tension, superb acting and terrific writing.I HIGHLY recommend Downton Abbey.
This season was better than the previous!  This show is fantastic, cannot believe it's not on regular tv!  Just too good for PBS.
It just doesn't get much better than this. Such a rich and beautiful look at a bygone era, way of life.
This series is outstanding!  I can not wait for season 4!!!  Why was season 3 not available on Huluplus?Tonya
So entertaining and I can hardly believe the ending.  Now I am trying to be patient as I wait for season four.
I love this series.  It is so beautifully filmed with,wonderful characters and always surprises.  I can't wait for Season 4.
Loved it! I was hooked on it ever since the 1st season. It's so good. Season 3 does not disappoint.
This is one of the best series I have ever watched.  This series is in the early 1920s and it is so enjoyable to see the period of time.
Excellent script, acting, directing, location...classic English drama.  I feel like I am peeking into a window watching their lives unfold.
I LOVE this show. It's clean but still has a lot of good twists and turns, great characters, and a really good storyline.
Unlike so many other series that last multiple seasons, this one remains fresh and interesting. The writer's well hasn't yet run dry.
I love Downton Abbey and already own Seasons 1 & 2. I wanted to own Season Three so I could catch up before Season Four begins.
OH - I forgot - excellent, historically correct references to then-current events, done subtly so as not to distract or preach.What else is there?
Personally, I think Downton Abbey is the best drama PBS has ever had. We watch it together as a family and just love it.
The storyline, the politics of the household, the subtle undermining and love, and forgiveness!I can't wait for Season #4~
I have been enjoying this series since the beginning...love it love it  love it.  Can't wait til it arrives, when will that be?
Anyone who doesn't get hooked on this program is missing a few brain cells. Everything is so very cleverly done!
Once you start watching Downton Abbey, you're hooked.  All the characters from upstairs to downstairs are excellently portrayed in this series.
love it love it love it, I get lost in the period, in the characters... i love the scenery and the story line
Best that I have seen in a long time. It was nice to watch straight through  without waiting for the next week.
Brutal. The modern world is putting the aristocracy through a grinder.
line up with many person i know, funn  wil watch more soon thxs amazon for u service  me as prime is fun to watch
I have read Marzulli's Nephilim series (which is amazing) and this is realinterviews about his detailed research (it's mind-boggling)!
Very good movie i have enjoyed all these movies they have a very good story line and action,and adventure all in these movies.
excellent movie. great for the whole family. hope there is another movie coming out!  highly recommend. All the narnia movies are great
ok I bought the trilogy for myself.. LOVES IT SO MUCH I BOUTGHT THE TRIOLIGY FOR MY PARENTS TOO! Thanks!
C.S. Lewis stories. My 5 year old loved the movie and it was a great way to teach him about temptations.
a classic that will live on as the books have.  a must watch movie.  Good for all ages and all times.
I just love the whole series.  The three main characters were great actors and the addition of Eustus was an opening for another in the series.
My grandchildren age 10 and 7 loved it..........They never left the TV asking for snacks or breaks and watched the entire movie in one showing.
They said that it is used but when I got it it look brand new. I love the DVD n movie.
I enjoyed watching this movie.  Great for the whole family. Have the two other ones.  I think the Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe is my favorite.
I'll have to admit I haven't read the books of this series, but the movies have been enjoyable including this one.
This was a good example of modern Disney works, this will be viewed by my grand children for years to come. It arrived n good condition.
As almost always, the movie is not quite as good as the novel, but still an excellent picture.  Perhaps they will do the entire series...
These films have all been done very well and the family can not wait for the next one to be released!
Wonderful movie for the kids.  They love them and get a lot of education from the series.  Need more like this!!
We have enjoyed the Narnia books and this movie follows through and along with the story.  Great animation and story.
This is my favorite of the Narnia series.  It gives a clearer view of the spiritual aspects that affect daily life.
I was very happy with the movie and the speedy service.  The movie came very quickly and the movie was good.
I got this as a "sigh...another boring night" movie to rent. Wow, loved it. Just wish it was a little longer. The effects were awesome. :)
great film in the series.  awesome story.  great for adults and a younger crowd.  the sea serpent is kinda creepy so maybe not for too young of kids
Excellent movie never to old to watch, I now have the whole series and loved watching them all, great family viewing.
This is an outstanding follow-up to two wonderful family movies. Truely a movie everyone will love to view over, and over again. J&C.
This is a great movie for all ages. Based on the books. I read the books as a kid and look forward to seeing the rest.
My family and I like this kind of movies of adventures and fantasy. I did not regret this purchase at all.
The 7 book series is phenomenal and the movies do an excellent job of following them.  I highly recommend both.
I loved these books as a kid,  I had the whole set.  Love that I can now mentally engulf my mind without having to visualize
gave this video to my niece as a gift.  she liked it. so i bought her the rest of the series.
Love this one This is the one that I have watched on televison and love it. got the other ones too
I don't know why this movie was not more highly regarded.  The plot is great.  The pictures are spectacular.  Go figure!
I would recommend this to everyone if you have watched the other two then you will enjoy this one as much
This movie was very awesome!!!! I saw it twice!!!! Awesome both times!!!! I would recommend that you buy this movie. I know you will love it.
I really enjoy these movies.  very entertaining and keeps your interest. acting was pretty good for the most part. would recommend
This is a great adventure movie just like the ones before it.  You will enjoy it time and time again.
THE MOVIE IS A GOOD LESSON. LOTS OF LAUGHS AND FUN. IF YOU LIKE ADVENTURE. THIS IS FOR YOU. A REAL GOOD MOVIE FOR THE WHOLE FAMILY.
A good movie for all, I bought this movie so I could watch it with my kids.  To my surprise it entertained me also.
This was purchased as a gift for my daughter and dist appears to be in perfect condition.  She is very pleased to have it.
I love this movie so much its so magical and takes you on such a journey ...I have all 3 of the Narnia movies I love them
Good performances and believable settings and costumes. AAA rating on this gem. Another unforgettable classic for the family. Good entertainment!
If you love the works of CS Lewis, you will love this movie.  So far, all three movies have been really well done.  I love seeing this over & over.
Great show.  I think this is the best show of the Narnia series.  Everyone is all grown up and very interesting.  Hopefully the movies continue.
thanks the whole family love this movie. thank you so much. will but more. i will tell my friends about it.
I hope to see more Chronicles of Narnia movies! It's an excellent watching movie. I recommend this movie to everyone!
I have so loved the whole Chronicles of Narnia since I was a teenager.  So glad to see they are doing such a good job of following the books well!
I have all of the Narnia DVD's, Thank you for having the last one that I needed. Now I'm all done, unless they would come up with another one!
I enjoy the fantasy of Narnia and this item in 3D was very effective.  The quality was worth the buy, even though I have it in DVD already.
If you like the Narnia series, you will like it.  My daughter who is 20, college  student loves it.  It was a gift for her.
Excellent adaptation of the book and a great third movie in the &#34;Chronicles Of Narnia&#34; series. A must to watch.
We definitely enjoyed the life story of Yoni N.  His desire to do &#34;more&#34; than required for his nation and family is inspiring.
Loved it-a good xmas family movies with a good old fashioned happy ending.. loved it and have watched it more than once.
Great film, beats expectations and beyond. Well acted and the dialog was great. Edward Hermann was perfect for the part.
Another good family movie with lessons to be learned!! What a give me world we live in. How happy the children were to receive just one gift.
Love the movie, love the actors.  The children were wonderful actors and this will be watched at our house every Christmas.
Such a good lesson to this movie! Well acted and a one to keep for generations. Hearts can be changed. Such a sweet girl.
I would watch it again. It played on my emotions like a good movie should. Therefor I would recommend it to others.
Not predictable at all.  Good story.  Good acting.  Recommended.  Great movie for anytime of year as Christmas is not heavily focused on.
I love Edward Herrmann movies and shows.  He is such a character.  This movie is no different.  A must see movie.
It was nice to sit down and watch a family movie. It was a good reminder of how spoiled we are when a simple orange is considered such a rare treat.
This show was a good movie. It's definately a kid's  or family movie. The show had a good storyline & made you feel along with the character.
I truly enjoyed this Christmas movie.  I am a collector of Christmas movies, so this has been added to my collection.
Loved this movie, it showed how one can give with out it costing a fortune. Would recommend this to everyone
I had gotten this movie for my husband for Christmas so we watched it together. It was an excellent movie and I highly recommend it!
If you don't read another book .. Make sure this is your last one. I enjoyed this book so much, I purchased it as gifts and bought it on DVD
Fantastic product and delivered right to my door.  FANTASTIC!
I shared this with my son and his family and we all loved it. It is going to be put in our church library for others to enjoy.
Highly recommend any of this set to a small group to use during a bible study or a group looking to understand a ministry porcess.
some great facts that most people don't know and an eye opener for lost people buy one and give it to someone you love that is lost.scott
i enjoyed this movie because it made me smile, it is not a deep kind of movie just fun, with a few points to be made
Was a good movie and enjoyed watching it.  The main characters mom was too funny in this storyline and laughed alot.
Great movie.  Highly recommend.  It is a feel good movie.  If you have ever dreamed about being with someone you will love this movie.
I loved this romatic movie. I really enjoyed this movie, and the crazy thoughts people have about life,  and about gay people.
This is a film about humanity and honesty. A very good film indeed.
Kung Fu, violence, romance, comedy, blood, and triad prisoners and more Kung Fu and violence. This movie is a Masterpiece!
Victor Is funny and I have to write more crap so have a nice day and have fun reading this
I enjoyed this dvd.  Gave me happy memories of all the old Victor Borge shows....I rewatch it now and again..
A great video. Proving humor comes from sharp wit and knowledge. Good for all ages and is ageless in it's entertainment value.
This movie by Roger Moore has it all. It isone of those movies you will stay with fromstart to finish. Great action by Royer Moore.
Always like Charles Bronson. This is a good movie, scenery is very good lots of action. If you are a Bronson fan you will like this.
i love this movie its one of bronson best
If you love Hugh Grant than this is a movie for you! It was beautiful and just like a romance book on screen should be. I loved it!
The seller was great. Everything was exactly as stated and then some. Would absolutely recommend using them.
Got this for my son as a gift, he loved it, he is now a Tim Hawkins fan like his mother.
I would definitely recommend this DVD.  It's laugh-out-loud funny.  Our whole family enjoyed it.  The DVD came in perfect condition and fast.
This DVD is hilarious. Good clean family fun. I watched it with my children and we laughed so hard our sides hurt. Definitely will be watched again.
Tim Hawkins needs more credit for his ability to make you laugh and it all be clean enough for the whole family to enjoy.
HILARIOUS - Awesome, fun, good, clean and worth every penny.  Great entertainment for whole family and friends without all the garbage!
Tim Hawkins is a younger version of Brad Stine, funny & clean, and something that the whole family can watch together.
Tim Hawkins is our favorite comedian.  He is safe to watch for the whole family and will definitely make you laugh out loud!!
Tim Hawkins is a hilarious Christian comedian.  His DVDs provide a great evening of entertainment that all ages can enjoy.
It's good for Christians to laugh at their own foibles and Tim does this with obvious affection.  But he really is no rockstar!
this guy is hysterical.  clean jokes.  whole family can watch.  I laughed and laughed till I couldn't laugh no more!
This DVD is clean and funny for the whole family. Wonderful to find a comedy video that the whole family can enjoy together.
I cannot recommend any comedian MORE than Tim Hawkins.  This guy is an absolute riot and will make you have to pee laughing.  Get all of his videos.
I like this movie a lot. Louis Gossett Jr is an outstanding actor and very real in his portrayal. Many thumbs up.
Ok this move was a great movie, I am so glad I have it in my Collection! As I could not imagine it without it!
been looking for every where for this movie and found it  thanks  so much for the enjoyment for my lil family
Not just a kids movie if you have imagination. In today's world we need it. Interesting movie for the whole family. Regards Stewart. 27-05-10
I listen to this over and over again to make sure I am grasping all things stated,anything from Abraham is amazing and worth you while.
Another great dvd worth every penny.I plan to buy them all. These dvds will change your life and awaken you to YOU.
This 2-DVD set is great, but why did they split this 2 hour program into two discs? It would have easily fit onto one.
Jonathan Cahn's books and videos are always interesting and what he writes can be compared to the Bible.  Shouldn't be long now....
These videos are great, and especially so for loved ones who won't read a book.  Everyone should get at least one, more for loved ones & friends.
Anyone who is concerned about the direction America is taking should see this film.  God won't allow us to continue on the path we are now on.
Brand new as stated and received very quickly.  This is an awesome revelation of what God is doing in these times we live in and as well as the past.
Draws a very clear image of where we are heading if we do not right this ship that is clearly off course...God is NOT mocked!
Worth learning about. Raises some interesting correlations of which I was not aware. Presented in a way that tweaks curiosity.
A real eye opener, kinda scary I hope our government gets their act together before it is too late. Recommend everyone see this
It is good and goes along with the book The Harbinger.  It is  very informative and should be taken seriously in today;s time.
A little overdone with repitition but the insights and revelations more than make up for it. This should be taught in every church in america!
This movie really gave the facts about the past and the future of this country and world.  I would recommend it.
A must see for anyone and everyone who is concerned about the future of America.  This is a well produced video.
I gave this as a gift and they were very much appreciative.  They said it was a very good video, so I guess they liked it.
My son took this to school to show his high school class just before they dismissed for the summer. Hopefully it will be remembered.
I read the book ages ago and always wanted to see the movie. This version, I believe, is the best one to view. I recomment it to all Tolstoy lovers.
If you like GVB, this video it's one of the best of them! Buy it without fear!
These guys are the best and I never tire of what they have to offer in Gospel music.  More would be even better.
I've loved the Gaither Vocal Band since they began singing together  and this album doesn't disappoint.  High quality music and highly recommended.
I particularly like this story, as it is the one where Mary goes bline.  This was a gift and very good.
this is and great movie a classic and to have it restored and on dvd is awesome good special featuers highly recommend
I enjoyed this movie very much.  I like anything that Harrison Ford is in and it's a cute story line.
Delightful romantic comedy that takes place in the tropics.  Great ending.
This is a must have movie if you like Harrison Ford-type romantic/comedy movies he is wonderful in it as well as Anne Heche.
This is a fun movie. Lots go laughs. Well known actors in roles you haven't seen them in before this.
Loved it!  I enjoy a good action flick, this one is funny and moves right along.  Before I knew it it was over a must have for any video library
I love that movie. I wish it have blu ray instead ing of the dvd. Its a good movie. You gotta to love it.
We enjoy Harrison Ford.  Especially paired with Anne Heche.  This Comedy moves at a moderate pace to keep you smiling.
a great adventure - comedic, light and easy enjoyment and who wouldn't enjoy an evening watching Harrison and Anne ?
Harrison Ford and Anne Heche at their best. Very good movie and clean entertainment, the whole family can enjoy. Love it
Great Acting! Great Story! Keeps you on the edge of your seat. T his one knocks ya off your feet.
Action, comedy, romance!  A very good movie!  I enjoyed it very much!I would reccomend it for anyone who wants a good, action movie!
This dvd is actually one of my favorite movies. Love story, comedy and drama.  I love it. A must have.
This movie makes it near the top of my most enjoyable and favorite DVDs. Great cast with a good blend of comedy and action.
Great movie.  Very funny.  I really don't know what else to say about it except that I highly recommend it if you're in the mood to laugh.
This movie in my opinion has a perfect balance of action and comedy, Harrison ford and anne heche are great together is this movie
A must have for Harrison Ford Fans. great flik, IslandAdventure story. Hot Babes
This film was awesome.  Some of my favorite actors did a fantastic job.  It was so Intense and daring.  Wonderful.
Harrison Ford is one of my favorite Actors and of course coupled with Anne Heche in this movie was ridiculously FUNNY!. It's a must have movie.
We have this on VCR but it started to drag so we went for the DVD,  Obviously we like the movie and the actors.
VERY funny story, nice location to film this movie. Great actors!! Will watch it again, like the Jerk and Dumb & Dumber.
Wife wife and I still love this flic. Lots of action, a good plot, great actors and a little bit of pazzazz.
Have this on video but wanted a DVD copy.  Great entertainment for years to come.  I could watch Harrison Ford all the time.
Great price for this movie.  Heche and Ford had great chemistry in this film.  Ford showed his comedic side in this movie.
Harrison Ford and Anne Heche made this a very fun movie to watch. I have watched it many times and never get tired of it.
Harrison Ford is one of my favorite actors.This movie is all you could hope for.Romance and humor,and a lot of surprises.
Worth the purchase price. It's a movie you can watch over and over again without getting board. It's especially good to watch when one is snowed in.
This movie is hilarious from beginning to end and mostly appropriate for all ages!! If you haven't seen it, get it!! You will NOT be disappointed!!
This is a classic treasure that is often unheard of by many video collectors. Don't let this gem escape you.
Excellent movie-really shows you what it would be like if you decided you didn't want to be a christian-a lot of people's lives would be changed.
OMG! I love love love this DVD series!!!! i WATCHED IT TWICE ON tv ALREADY AND i HAD TO BUY THE SET TO OWN!
GREAT STORY....THE ACTORS AND ACTRESSES WERE OUTSTANDING AND THE CROSS OVER WAS WELL DONE...LOVED IT AND HAVE ALREADY WATCHED IT 2X
am great fan of Colin Firth and it's one of his early moviesarrived quicklyThank you
A great video in great condition! The program is as entertaining today as when I saw it when I was young. I've already watched it multiple times.
A well acted retelling of the prequel events to the Trojan War.  Well worth the purchase.
The movie was one of my all time favorites !! Wished it was available on a simple dvd  but hey  Now I'm ready for the 23 century.
Saw this movie eons ago. It was great then and continues to be. First of mant Vietnam movies I have seen.
Bought as a present, can't say anything about the movie.  Hope the person that got it enjoyed it.  They had it it on their list.
Excellent movie of the training and later combat in the time period.Would recomend it to others and have done so.
if u read most of my reviews.....u will see that i hate alm everything.  buy this movie....you will be the richer for it
I love this story!! It is a good quality video and a really beautiful movie even though I cry at the end every time!!!
I got this movie for my daughter. She totally lived it. It is a great adaptation on Romeo and Juliet.
The DVD is so cool i love it! the coloring is really good, the stories were so cool! Thank you very much!
I enjoyed this cartoon very much. It was very entertaining. I am happy it is finally out on DVD. Thank you.
I am not sure how many times I have done this review several times. I do like my movie.it reminds me of my child hood. My sisters love it also.
If only there where more of feature films of Unico...sadly there are only 2 that I could find.....you owe it to yourself to watch these....
I remember this movie when I was younger and it is still cool to watch it now. It was nice they finally put it on DVD. Thank you.
Awesome that I was finally able to find this on DVD. Now I am sharing it with my nephew and so far he loves it.Thanks Amazon.
He loved this movie so I bought it for him as a gift. It's ok for me, but I didn't really like the story.
this movie is fascinating because it is a true story about betrayal drugs and 3 horrifying murders, the husband committed. very cold blooed murders
gi joe the movie is a great movie it is like transformers the movie  both movies are great so go  rent and enjoy both films
Great movie, remember it from when I was a kid! Still love it now, well done film! A must for any G.I. Joe fan!
It's G.I. Joe! Of course it's great! This movie brings back so many great childhood memories.Where are my G.I. Joe Seasons on DVD?!?!? :)
its a must buy if you like g.i. joe . you cant pass this up also for the price . dont miss out.
Somebody put a lot of work into making this story. I enjoyed watching it and I bet you will too.
great movie and if you are a fan it should be picked up. Great Price by Amazon.
NOSTALGIC! CLASSIC! ANYONE WHO GREW UP IN THE 80'S WATCHING G.I. JOE SHOULD OWN THIS CLASSIC ANIMATED MOVIE. GO JOE!!!
I grew up watching G.I. Joe in the 80's.  This brings back memories of my childhood.  A must have for G.I. Joe fans.
Perfect addition to the box set I got for my son.He loves the G.I. Joes shows and watches them often.
Story streight up, good vrs bad! Love watching this GI Joe movie, takes me back to my youth. I remeber wathcing GI Joe when I was sixs.
this movie was great it took action cartoon and set the bar high had some real high power movie stars doing the voices and very nice done
Was Great Just Loved To Have The Family See What I Grew Up On And Just Love The Fact That It Was Clean
It would be nice to see more classic cartoons on blu ray.This eatures the orgin of Cobra and Cobra Commander.
what a brilliant movie. very well researched, it felt authenic. the movie was very well written it is a gem of a movie.
This is one of those movies that keeps you guessing.the story line is great and the actors are awesome.love this movie
This is a remarkable film. No more words for a classic of all times. Great actors, great mystery film, great music.
great stars at the top of their form! so many older movies that have not been restored and made available. NEW is not all that is of value!
Excellent version of the book, I recommend it for people that like good literature in film version. Yes it is.
es un clasico............a todos en mi casa amantes del cine les gusto, inclusive a mis hijos...............no hay mas palabras
This is one of my all time favorite movies filled with intrigue, doubt and questions.  Everyone should see it at least once.
My husband asked for it as a stocking stuffer.  Great movie, but sad.  My husband enjoyed it a lot and is happy he addded it to his collection.
Great adaptation of a difficult but wonderful literary novel.  The main flaw is that it is a bit abrupt in some transitions.
This is one of my favorite comedies with a moral to the story, you get it from about 20 minutes in are captive at that moment.
I'm working on my Denzel Washington movie collection. I have quite a number of DVDs but not all yet.Great quality. Superb service!!!!
This is a funny wonderful film that can be viewed a thousand times and you never get tired of it!
Tired of the cop movies, try looking back , yesterdays movies are worthy of your attention, its amazing sometimes how good they are!
I have been looking for this film for a long time and now I have it. Delivery was fast, item was as described and in very good condition.Thank you.:)
Very good 80's movie.Makes you laugh and cringe all at the same time.Very great buy and I am very pleased with my purchase and the film.
I definitely enjoyed this movie. Julie Christie was marvelous in this movie. It dipicted the decadence of the times. Recomended for most people.
Received in Excellent condition and on time, an Excellent film to watch from start to finish a 5 out of 5 mega
watched this last night and enjoyed it much considered racy in its day but very tame by todays standards good
Great to see some classics are still avaliable on DVD.Product arrived before estimated time.Contact was kept at all times, terrfic customer service.
All 3 showed up in perfect order.  2 were given as gifts, both people are very pleased with DVD and did not report any problems with them.  Thanks!
This is a great thriller & one of my husband's favorites.
This is another old movie I haven't seen in years and I was happy to see it on DVD.  I hope it's as good as I remember.
they are into the older movies and this one was one of their favorite movies so I got it as a gift for them for Christmas.
I've allways been a fan of both horror and suspence. This movie gives both. But when you have great actors in the movie, it becomes even better.
Chris Plummer and James Mason..... wotta team...the storyline is fabulous and the locations shot were incredible!!! Mason is indeed &#34;Watson&#34;
Everything came on time. The ones I ordered it for just loves it! Always have good service thank you for what you do!
A very entertaining and well-made film with fine script and acting. This movie was basically remade as From Hell with Johnny Depp several years ago.
Do you want to see a great movie scary with great actors a classic about Jack the Ripper ! This is a scary well made movie !!!
Great movie... I absolutely love the old Sherlock Holmes movies - much more entertaining and more original than the newer versions.
This is an older movie.  It is very corny but funny. I had to have it when I saw it on DVD. Packaging was good.
This 1966 is the great B-Movie cult classic that I always heard about but never saw.  This is a must see.
After all the hoohhah about the Papacy, what a great movie to play with simplicity, holiness and a miracle.  It's a wonderful flick.
I wonder if Pope Frances has seen it.  He'd like it.  A very good movie and one that we remembered for years so ordered it again.  Not disappointed.
I love this movie and have been waiting for a very long time to find it on DVD.  I will be purchasing more for gifts to my friends and family.
I am so glad this movie is now available on cd.  I saw it many years ago. It has a great message.  I suggest you give it a try.
I love this movie because I felt this was about Pope John Paul II, He probably really did what tom Conti's character did.
I showed this movie to some friends about the time Pope Francis was elected.  It seemed appropriate as the humility of both men is very evident
This is a truly wonderful, feel good movie which is very easy to get caught up in with while watching it.
Tom Conti's best role - and an amazing story of a true cristian.The closest you will ever get to true love.Ole Dy.
This is a great movie, and I was happy to buy it at a great price  I would recommend this seller to anybody who is thinkong of buying from them.
This dramadie is wonderful.  Get beyond Conti's mugging and you have a great movie, especially at Lent and Easter time..
This is one of Tom Conti's best little movies.  I won't describe the plot or anything.  It is almost unavailable but deserves a wider audience.
The story  was great. i wanted to see this movie for a long time.I was not disappointed in the story and I will watch this again.
This is a great classic samurai movie. It is a must have.
This is a wonderful true story of a woman's courage and bravery for her children she smuggled out of her town.
This film was very good to watch I would watch it again it is a must buy for anyone it is a great film
Glitter and all, this movie is a classic. I watch it every time I need a 'pick me up'. And David's voice! *swoon*
My children & I have loved this movie for years...It also has all the songs written & performed by Mr. Bowie himself...excellent!
David Bowie and muppets....what more could you ask for? Very well done, DVD quality is fantastic. All in all A++++
GREAT MOVIEEVERY KIDS SHOULD WATCH THIS MOVIE.  IF YOU LIKE MUSIC OR IF YOU LIKE DAVID BOWIE YOU WILL DEFINITELY LIKE THIS MOVIE.
this has always made me laugh and now my son loves it too, and bluray makes it even better :-)
This movie turned into a cult classic and this edition is really great to have. Enjoyed watching this and seeing the extra things it comes with.
Great movie.  Superb characters. Great cast.  We watched with our kids on VHS and now their children are watching it.
This is the excellent making of show that is on the Labryinth DVD release no need to pay silly collectors price for it!
Classic. For some reason, teenage girls think Bowie is the cutest thing as the Goblin King. Maybe it's the leotards. Good movie, good music.
this is an  excellent and fantastic puppet filled film.  I enjoy it over and over and so does my family. thanks
Was so happy to see this in blue ray! My favorite of movies and it was like going back into childhood
I watched this one with my daughter when it first came out.  I'm watching it now with my granddaughter.  We absolutely love it!
We have had this movie in dvd for years.  It is quite the fairy tale and a great family film.
This was my little brother's favorite movie when we were growing up. It was just as good as I remember!
I remember watching this a lot as a little kid and I found it to be really enjoyable, with good music, good story and brilliant F/X and characters.
Great Fantasy film, and good for fans of David Bowie, or Jennifer Connelly, or Jim Henson's characters (non-muppet) and innovative art effects.
One of my favorite movies from my childhood. I am so glad I was able to share this with my kids and so excited when they loved it too.
This is a must have movie for the fantasy fan.  I have owned over 5 copies and have worn all of them out.  This is an amazing piece of fantasy.
Who doesn't love David Bowie?  And Jim Henson puppets?  This movie is my all time favorite.  I could watch it daily.  Great for kids or adults.
Another great move that should be included in any collection of classic movies. It is truly an original and will always be one.
This is what Harry potter's movies wanted to be but never made it. EXCELLENT, AWESOME, PERFECT...............
Fun movie to watch over and over again. And anything with David Bowie is a plus. Nice story behind it as well. And has fun songs as well,.
As the 1000th reviewer, I would just like to say there is nothing wrong with David Bowie's junk. Thank you.
I loved this as a kid, and still do as an adult.  I can not wait until my daughter is old enough to watch it too.
It just proves that everything old is new again.  I loved this movie when I first saw it way back when.  My kids love it now.
still an amazing film after all these years, one kiddy love that stays fantastic to watch even after growing up.
This was another gift but always a good classic movie to watch.. I like fantasy movies as well as action adventure so tis is a good movie 2 own.
This is fun for children of all ages. I enjoyed it and was glad to add it to my library of DVD's.
It got here really fast and was in great shape. I am very happy with this company and recommend them to everyone.
this in my opinion is one of the best movie to come out of the 80s. It was good then and still holds up today.
This movie is excellent. The story line is great and shows that sometimes you get what you wish for, so be very careful.
This is one of the movies that you have to see before you die. This is truly some of Henson's best work.
This is an old fantasy movie any age can watch.  David Bowie plays the goblin prince and his songs are great.
This is a movie I have purchased three times. I have decided to never leand it out again as everyone loves it so much it never gets returned.
This was a favorite movie of mine when I was younger & now my children enjoy it just as much.  A little corny but still a good movie.
I would love to see a sequel or a remake to this movie.  It's a classic and you should all be watching it right now.
I am way beyond muppethood and really enjoyed this one with David Bowie, Jennifer Connelly and lots of repulsive creatures.
I have always loved this Christmas spacial, I only wish they would put it out on DVD. This is a must for any Christmas collection!
My six year old son is very picky about cartoons, but he fell in love with this simply, entertaining cartoon immediately!  We loved it!
My husband loves this movie and was very surprised to receive it as a Christmas gift. We watched it twice that day. Really cute movie.
I remembered this from my childhood and had to buy it for my own children.  Kids like it just like I did.  Good "old" cartoon.
I remembered from some time in the distant past, my children enjoyed this movie, so wanted it for my grandchildren.
Great animated stuff...my great grand daughter is now a rudyard kipling fan ..she loves rikki best, and then the white seal
It has been a long time in viewing this classic!  So enjoyed the first time I saw on TV and now to be able to see as often as I wish.
fast shipping, exactly as described, how could I complain about getting exactly what I ordered for a fair price and great movie collection
I bought this for my husband for father's Day.  He used to watch it as a kid and now will be able to share with his grandchildren.
Love elizabeth taylor movies like this one and elephant walk and cleopatra,she was a beautiful woman and loved her eyes.
Just watched this the other day. For an older horror movie it definitely holds your attention. I like the suspense the older thrillers hold.
Night Watch is a wonderful thriller I was lucky enough to see in the theatre. Elizabeth Taylor is the whole show and she is very good. What a star !
This is a great mystery/suspense movie! It really holds your interest and what a twist of an ending!! This is one I could watch again and again!
This movie is a typical good cowboy movie of that era. You can't go wrong with Bill Boyd & Clark Gable.
This classic black and white film is startlingly ALIVE in the first, ever, color version.  This is a MUST SEE!Donald Frederick Curie
i have always wanted to see  this flim. its forgotten and can be hard to find.  thank you very much.
This is an appealing movie for Sinatra fans.  It is the only movie in which Sinatra was a &#34;very bad guy&#34;, and it is really worth watching.
Great, highly underrated movie. The Blu ray transfer was excellent. One of Sinatra's best roles-Sterling Hayden as well. Highly recommended.
A nearly lost gem of political drama in the wake of the collective reaction to the post World War II America.
Everything about the movie was great both the color version and the B&W. the packaging was great and shipping fantastic.
A very good movie who will keep you watching to the very last scene!  I watched the color version and enjoyed it very much!!
narrated by chaplin himself, a funny story about the gold rush. one of his best. got to have this one... trust me.
This is one of the funniest movies Charlie Chaplin ever made.  He was one of the best comedians and actors ever.
Nice to know I can get older movies on line. This one came in great condition with really good remastering quality.
I watched these movies when I was little and I'm so glad I found it so my daughter can enjoy it like I did when I was little.
It was truly an unrated movie that i really enjoued from the beginning to the end. I would recommend this movie to anyone to purchase this movie.
Yep, there's no one like Bo!  No one like John Derek, either!  He sure liked to re-invent his women!  A true classic!
Bo was incredible in this movie. She was a beautiful then and more so now. What was this movie about I don't know but she was fun to watch.
Had this originally on VHS and due to age was no longer usable. The DVD is great.  Made my day.
Saw it a long time ago and wanted to see it again.  Its an old 80's movie about drugs.  Good tv movie.
he loved it and he watches it in the car as we travel the 50 some miles form his house to mine and then back again
Well another awesome action packed season of the teenage mutant ninja turtles. All the classic episodes keep coming. So all you die hard fans buy up.
It is one of the coolest seasons to watch, so cool in fact it even made me hungry for pizza.
At the end, I cried with pride at being part of the human race.  Now I'm going to go memorize "Lift Every Voice and Sing."
This dvd is my favorite.  I love the storyline.  It is so romantic.
This movie keeps you wondering all the way thru, and has its happy & sad moments. Great movie, love Stacy Keach!
What a great movie on 3 dvd discs. Exellent acting by all the cast. It is 440 minutes long and is great to watch on those bad weather days.
This is a good series back in the day so to speak.  Worth taking the time to watch the series all the way through.
Characters by Judith Krantz are always well developed and this is no exception. The story spans 3 generations and is filmed in beautiful locations.
I wasn't sure if I would enjoy seeing Andy Griffith in an adversarial role, but he and Johnny Cash were exceptional!
I have always liked Johnny Cash but never realized how good an actor he could be. He was outstanding in this movie.
This is one of Orson Wells least known roles, however for my money, one of his best. This is long over due a release on DVD.
This is a great version of the Ballet Swan Lake.  I highly recommend it.  It's a great vidio for ballet lovers.
The video is new & in great condition so I'm satisfied that this movie was finally put onto DVD. Very satisfied with the product.
If you want a old movie to watch, this is good.  Tom Hanks so young and handsome.Good price also.
My favorite Tom Hanks movie.  Ms. Marsillach is a joy to watch.....too bad that she didn't become as huge a movie star as he did.
my husband really enjoyed this movie would recommend to anyone who loves this kind of movie also who still likes charlie sheen
I have watched this movie a few times.  I like the action within the movie and the love story behind it all.
This is a classic movie that I enjoy quite a lot! It's interesting to see Charlie Sheen at such a young age. I would recommend this movie to anyone!
saw this movie when it came out, always wanted the DVD but always put it off. watched it last night, perfect.
this almost lost cult favorate is timeless for a actor that is now considered lossing it, his movies are still top notch.
my kids like this movie and it was very good about coming back and getting revenge on people who do bad things to people
nice fun movie a real nice cool classic here,very well made, an nice car Racers to!!!! great job again!!! thank you!!!
I still want that Dodge interceptor nearly 30 years later.I'm amazed at the effects in the movie for the time period as well for a Lionsgate film.
Not that Charlie Sheen is a great actor. But this movie is a classic. Really enjoyed seeing this movie again.
Another great 80's car cult movie
I watched this movie when I was a kids several times and was excited to see it again. Good quality
Charlee Sheen at his best. I loved it. Even thow it had a bitter  sweet end.  Great movie.
This dvd made a great present.My father-in Law loves it.This is the dvd for anyone who likes James STWART.Yes i would buy more of his movies .
This is a good movie, especially if you like the music of Glenn Miller.  It's a bit slow but overall good.
I SAW THIS MOVIE A LONG TIME AGO AND ENJOY IT VERY MUCH, AND YES I WOULD RECOMMEND THIS MY FRIENDS
We love jazz music especially the older versions of it. terrific movie to add to collection. i would like to get them all.
I absolutly loved this movie, James Stewart and June Alyson really complemented each other, they did a fantastic job.
One of the best mixes of actors. This film brings life to a real hero. Suitable for everyone. I really loved watching this.
The DVD was very good and the story was excellent. This again is a part of our music history that has been saved on DVD.
This is a great movie and I loved it!  The acting was very good and the music was most enjoyable.  It is a great addition to my dvd  library.
What a winning combination - James Stewart and June Allyson.  A very moving story about a famous bandleader - timeless.
Delivered quickly.  Plays perfectly.  I enjoyed it very much as I knew I would.  Thank you! Again tho, I thought I had already reviewed this item.
i waited for the price to come down, and it did and I ordered the collection. I enjoy Jimmy Stewart.
Fans of the big band sound will love this one. Lots of music and Jimmy Stewart is awesome as Glenn Miller.
Who doesn't like Jimmy Stewart!!! Buy these and you will have hours of enjoyment! So, what are you waiting for!!! Get them NOWWWWWW!!!!
Glenn was a great man and a wonderful performer.  Jimmy does a fantastic job of becoming Glenn Miller.  Great Movie!
The DVD is clear and the sound is great.  The music brings back some fond memories.  Steve Allen is great in this film.
It is great fun to watch old movies.  Big band movies like Benny Goodman, Glenn Miller, etc. are good even if you aren't into "musicals".
Goodman is my favorite jazz musician.  I discovered him as a teen ager about 20 years after he became popular.  I have many of his records.
Good acting and great music . KUDOS to Gene Krupa's cameo spots.
This is a real good print of a well acted musical. It is a movie you will want to view a number of times. Thanks for the speedy delivery.
Bought this for a friend and he loved it. He had it on tape and had watched it many times, but his tape player went out. He was so grateful.
FROM HUMBLE BEGINNING, A "BOY" THAT NOBOBY WANT TO A FIGHTING MACHINE.  AUDIE MURPHY WAS ONE REASON THAT WE WON WWII.
This is my all time favorite movie, I love, love Audie Murphy and all his movies, I have read his life story and his amazing life.  Great Movie!
Great flic about a phenomenal man who just got the job done when the lesser men cowered in their foxholes.
Who better to play the role of our greatest soldier of our largest war.He under played his actual battlefield accomplishments.
This was bougt as a gift for someone who loves this movie. I watched it with her, and it is good. Quality is good and she was happy with it.
My father loves this movie and has been wanting it for quite some time, It's a wonderful movie, Thank you
I love this movie and had no problems with the dvd i bought. It is a classic war movie that my family has watched every year.
a very good movie about a military reject who became america's bravest and highly decorated soldier. wasn't too expensize to buy
a great war movie. a true life young underdog defies the odds and becomes a great decorated war veteran, you need this movie.
This is the story of A. Murphy t love it because it tells a story without Hollywood magnifiers and true spirit.
Movie worked, was one of my favorites, Still like playing it and seeing the action parts. Good one for a collection,.
Audie Murphy who can say any more about this great American WW11 hero. Did his own acting in this one. Audie wasa great actor.
It is a true story and the hero that lived that story starred in this film. Buy this DVD.  You will want to know what happened there in that time.
It was one Hell of a movie.  I recommend that everyone see it.  I hadn't seen it before and I liked Audie Murphy.
Love this move. I have been looking for this move on DVD for years. I am glad to have found it at Amazon.com thanks.
There were several spin offs from this movie but none were as good, waited quite a while to get it, glad they finally released it.
I like everything of it. It's perfect and i recommand it very much to all who is looking for old movies. Thank you
Great stars make a very good movie. The concept was very interesting and realistic for the time period. Thank you.
PRICE WAS GOOD FOR THE RARITY OF THE MOVIE.  ONE OF THE REAL GOOD ONES FROM THE 1960S.  PRODUCT CAME IN MINT CONDITION.  RECOMMENDED MOVIE TO BUY!!
I love the show and grew up watching it. It is great cop show and I strongly recommend it to cop show fans.
DRAGNET IS A TV CLASSIC STARING JACK WEBB WITH AN ALL STAR CAST BEFOR THEY WERE STARS THE PICTURE AND ARE EXCELLENT.
A great classic, and fun to watch after all these years. Scary in its day, but tame if not even funny by today's standards of horror.
Got a good deal on this movie picture a bit grainy but a must have love the case it comes in .Go get .
5 stars for this anniversary edition is great.The oldies are the best.So go out and get it now
Bela is the BEST at Dracula - he WILL scare you. This is one of the first about Dracula and one of the BEST.
Classic Dracula!!  Bela Lugosi is excellent as Count Dracula and is famous for this film.  It is true to the book
This movie made me wary of my Neck. Was expecting bite marks when I look in the mirror. Great classic.
I throughly enjoyed the film. It had great atmosphere, beautiful cinematography and a great cast. This is a must for any fan of old school horror.
THIS IS CLASSIC HORROR WITH OUT THE BLOOD AND GUTS , THIS IS WHAT STARTED THE HORROR GENRE , BELA LUGOSI IS THE ORIGINAL DRACULA.
Excellent movie.The box design and graphics are fantastic.If you want the movie, this is the way to get it.
You just cant make a better Frankenstein character. another great movie for you video library. Love these original horror flicks
A great classic beautifully restored. It was like watching it for the first time. give us more! ITS ALIVE ITS ALIVE
AGAIN, HAD VHS.  NEEDED DVD.  WATCHED BORIS KARLOFF ALOT IN THE 60'S IN HIS SPOOKY MOVIES.  HE USE TO HAVE A SERIES ON TV CALLED THRILLER!
What else is there to say here?  This is a classic picture.  Boris Karloff gave one of the best performances of his career here.
One of the best classic horror flicks ever made. Take a close look at the special effects and think about when they were made. Just great!
Love Boris kaloff a must have a great universal legacy series love all of the movies he is it. Cove case is very nice looking
Wonderful classic vintage movie! I love the original black & white movies & this is a great addition to my collection.
5 stars for the oldies are the best yes go out and buy it nowbefore  you can't get it
A Fantastic Classic for the Ages. Karlof at his best!!! A Must Have!!! If you are going to try and build a human then you have to be a madman!!!!
Another great Classic movie with an excellent cast and eerie surroundings. Must view when a storm is nearby more scary.
This is what horror is meant to be. No blood and gore, no bad launguage. I haven't seen this but I've heard it's truly a horror classic. Buy it!
If you are a MW fan you will like this compilation.  You won't be disappointed  Mae West at her best !!
If you have had a bad day this flick will make you forget your troubles.  Very funny and enjoyable.  We watch it quite often, Mae West is tremendous.
Got this as a gift for an old grump of 83 yrs -- he loves it - as for myself --the quality of the recording EXCELLENT need i say more?
Enjoyed it a lot, and I like the packaging of this set. I also bought vol 2. Good stuff and well made !
Classic Mae. Amazing how these gems from the 30's hit home with these bigger than life characters. Mae at her naughty best.
So nice to find this set. I've always been a fan because she took her own path when women didn't do it.
Great film, superb acting and a story that is timeless. I recommend this movie to anyone who want to better understand the workings of politics.
Great movie.  Better than the 'other' Scarface.  Amazing film, never slowed down.  Very highly recommended.
I love the old movies and this one doesn't disappoint. Good story,good acting and good A/V. What more could you want! Enjoy.
It was fun watching this movie and seeing all the simalarities with the Al Pacino Scarface. I loved it.
After watching the movie, I found the sound and picture quality to be exceptional. There was no freezing and no scratches on the disc. A great buy!!!
Having a nostalgic moment and thought this would be a good movie to watch when it's cold out and can't go anywhere
I can't believe I had never seen this movie till now. I grew up with most of the music portrayed in the movie. Truely enjoyable.
Out off all the movies back in that time this was a well directed movie and the best  music ever.
brought back my childhood memory....I'm so glad I got this..Peter Frampton and The Bee Gees are awesome....and so is the rest of the cast...
I have not seen this movie since whenever i can remember, this movie came out in 1978, very awesome movie.
WHAT FUN THIS IS! SEEING ALL THE GROUPS WE HAVE LOVED OVER THE YEARS,THE MUSIC IS WONDERFUL..IF YOU WANT GOOD, CAMPY FUN..THIS IS IT!
I remember this for when I was a child. Great movie and if you pay attention, they smoke joints like cigarettes!
Love the music. Frampton & the Bee Gees do a great job. Makes me smile each time I watch it. A piece of history.
This movie is still as good as I remember. It is so good to see George Burns.
great to have - the boys are at their best and it is a good rememberance piece
I've loved this movie since I first saw it in the theater. What a great suspenseful movie. Clint is the best!
this is a great movie it is about a crazy woman trys to kill Clint Eastwood you will find out why.
it was truely a classsic!!! I enjoy this every time I watch this!  once again , CLINT'S awesome work!  love the man!barbie h
My mother really enjoyed this movie.  Jessica Walter played crazy very well.  Very intense moments in this movie.  Highly recommend.
this it a good movie to watch to watch when ever you want to watch and enjoy watching the actors in it
The original Fatal Attraction!  Some of the scenes are a bit longer than they need to be but overall an amazing movie!  Always a favorite!
If you've never seen cult classic buy it! Did they ever pick the perfect psycho stalking weirdo for this movie!!! Great!
Play Misty For Me is a true classic!  ..scary as heck too!  Anyone watching this movie WILL REMEMBER IT FOR SURE!
fun 80's show.entertaing and fun show. action packed show with good cast. brought back good memories of watching it when i was young.
The movie looked great. There was no wear and no visual defects while the movie was showing. Thank you very much.
I saw this at the movies as a kid when it premiered. I was blown away by ( Wilma Diering and Princess Ardala ).
I started watching this with my Grandma when I was little and have wanted to buy it ever since.  Great, fun, and entertaining.  I love this movie.
I loved this movie as a young adult and bought it for my children and grandchildren.  A classic!
This is such a classic movie for anyone that likes Julie Andrews. She played a perfect role along with Mary Tyler Moore.
This is my favorite &#34;Feel Good&#34; movie of all time.  I do wish it was available in streaming video (hint).
It loved this movie from years ago and wanted to share with my daughter who loves oldies too.  If you've never seen it it's fun and silly.
Thoroughly Modern Millie is a very excellent musical. Very funny and well worth the money I paid for it
this movie is so cute, we really enjoyed it, lots of dancing in it, this is a funny, happy movie to watchover and over
My best friend and I used to watch this movie and quote all the funny lines. It is very funny and music is fun.
Thoroughly Modern Millie is a fun movie with great actresses.  I will probably be watching this again.  A very different type of movie.
I recently watched it again and recalled why I liked it then.  A clever must for any home video collection.
This is such a fun movie. Silly story, great cast.  Besides it's got Carol Channing and Beatrice Lillie. Need I say more ?
I remember this movie as a child so bought it and introduced m kids to it. It is fun and entertaining.
This has Julie Andrews in it. It is wonderful to watch since Julie Andrews is one of my favorites and is a wonderful singer.
I watched this with my granddaughters who are ages 11 and 6.  Both enjoyed it very much.  It is so nice to have a wholesome movie to watch together!
A fun movie, fabulous cast, great music.  I bought it because I want to be able to watch it any time, not dependent on TV airings.
As noted on previous reviews, the DVD arrived quickly and was in excellent condition.  So, yes, we sould buy from you again.
Saw this when i was younger, good old sci-fi movie, Lets you think about future and the plants on earth got die off.
This is a classic science fiction movie because it shows trends in our world that if they go on unchecked will lead to disaster.
I saw this when I was kid. Nice story and excellent use of FX. I appreciated the fact it was another CGI movie.
Blu ray or not this is a great all star cast and movie and even though I have seen it many many times, I still love it.
Can't believe they made such an old movie look so good. This has always been one of my favorite movies.
I ordered this DVD as a gift and the packaging was pristine. I know the DVD was perfect as well. Thanks
One of the best war movies ever made of WWII.  A good line up of stars and good story line.
Based on truth, with lots of suspense. Great actors, and more real insight into the war against Japan from both sides. Rewarding ending
very good war movie,shows you close to what happen there. i enjoyed it a lot . i recommand buying this one. great for collectors
Cool... Cool... Cool... Midway... awesome... they don't make them like this anymore... very cool... great cast... a different time... a better time
This is an excellent account of the time leading up to and including the battle of Midway. Thouhgt the actors were perfect in their roles.
ordered this for my dad, ive never seen it but he loves so as long as hes happy so am I. fast shipper
When Hollywood could still make a movie and actors could still play a roll without relying on technology to enhance the movie.  Great story.
Lots of real films fill out this marvelous movie on one of the most important battles in WWII.  It is a history lesson in itself.
A very well made film with great actions based on real historical events.  It is both a love story as well as an account of a real historical event.
A good follow up to anyone's WW2 collection.  Lots of action.  It helps clarify what was really going on at Midway.
Great movie and a great part of history Great Actors and a lot of them in this one  lots of action
good action and very good acting. Its a great wwll movie with good history telling and i like seeing what my father went through
Back when stars and a review of what was; Catch on to the past! A very good war  movie about what happened back then!
A good movie that blends in actual World War II footage with present day actors and scenes!!!!!  A very good movie!!!!
I saw ths in the theatre when I was a kid and I loved this movie. Great cast and edge-of-your-seat story. This ain 't no &#34;Pearl Harbor&#34;
Great actors protray  events prior to and involving the famous battle of Midway.  Good perspective for novice historIans to pursue
Excellent!  I would recomment this very much!  It is very good!  I am glad I got it!  Thank you! :)
Just as I remembered it when I first saw it years ago. Excellent movie and I wish I had the great sensurround like it had back then.
Midway has big names in it! Very good movie! They don't make movies like this anymore!!! To bad that's the case!
THE BEST  MOVIE  MOIVE TO SHOW ONE BATTLE OF THE WAR IT SHOW THE BATTLE FROM START TO THE FINISH
This is one of the best will watch it over again enjoy the old cast of actors They don't make them like that any more... SORRY to say..
Very good war movie.
no cgi in this this film will out sell an jim carrey movies out top hd pic Charlton Heston rules
my husband really liked this movie and wanted it in bluray. any man who likes war movies will really like it.
Great war flick. A classic that has great battle footage. The movie also shows the human side of the Japanese internment camps.
A Classic WWII movie!  One of the best made!! This movie is a must for your movie collection!  You will watch it over and over!!
With all the stars in this film; it makes it very believeable and also very entertaining.  It is a classic.
Great movie, price was right. This disc was shipped expeditiously and came from the West coast. One of my all time favorite movies.
This was a good action movie from the story from both sides of the war.  The Japanese and the Americans being hit and bombed.  Great ending.
I remember watching this one as a young adult and continue to enjoy movie. Henry Fonda and Charlton Heston make Midway an awesome movie.
great actors, lots of plot.  Well acted, great reality and set for the period.  Would recommend it any time to all ages.
This is one of the best war movies there is. The casting is magnificent, the action and script is strong and believable.
Content an action part based on real combat and planning for attacks by Japennese (and American plan of defence,  really worth watching.
Ordered this a time ago back for my now late mother who loved and raved what a great movie this was, watched it and had to say it is simply fab.
Have been wanting this movie for a long time.  We received it in good time and good shape.  Have watched it several times and passed it on to others.
My long gone dad and I saw this movie years ago and I've always had a soft spot for it.
this is a great civil war era movie that casts James Stewart as the star with a great supporting cast. wish they made more like this one
got this copy for one of my sons he loves all old movies and westerns hope he likes it as much as we do
I have always been a fan of Jimmy Stewart and also enjoyed the history behind the story
Awesome, classic movie. James Stewart does an awesome job in this, one of his later movies. They don't make movies like this anymore.
great movie i would put it up there with gone with the wind
This has always been one of my favorites. James Stewart at his best. I always wanted a copy of it,
The greatest Jimmy Stewart films. What more can one ask for on a DVD. It stands along side the Red Badge of Courage.
This movie is about a farmer in Virginia who does his best to avoid becoming part of the tragic war that is raging all around him, but - - - ,
This is a great video.  I was very happy with the service I received.
Great movie ... I cry every time I watch .... heart warming depiction of the civil war from a family perspective.... wholesome entertainment.
One of Jimmy Stewart's finest! Excellent family tale of the civil war and the damage done to a farming family. Highly recommended!
This has always been one of my all time favorites. Jimmy Stewart was one of the best in this genre of film.
Is there anyone out there who does not like James Stewart!!!!  If you are a history buff and enjoy Stewart at his best - buy this DVD!
One of my all time favorite Jimmy Stewart movies. It's great to be able to enjoy it on DVD.
This is a great movie. Good cast. Good Civil war story. This is not a comedy. I recommend this movie.
Made my oldest son extremely happy to receive and listen to his Shenandoah CD.  He is really into this  recording.
Just shows why I don't and won't ever live in California. Who needs this?
Always  loved this movie, one of the first I saw in the theater as a boy, VERY impressive effects, Irwan knew what he was doing!!!
Although a "disaster" movie, this one has GREAT acting, especially by my PERSONAL FAVORITES, Charleton Heston and Lorne Greene.
Product arrived fast and in perfect shape!  Loved this movie years ago and now again!  Would buy again from this store!
I love to watch any kind of disaster movies I really like this movie I would recommend this movie great
Mr. Charlton Heston went all out for this movie.  Great movie from a time when all movies were exciting to watch.
really love this movie the greatest movie that universal studios ever made must see again and againmust see again great movie
earthquake is one great movie with an all star cast all the actors in this movie are great if you like these kind of movies you will like this one.
Although not much action in this  movie, Crieghton keeps the suspense growing with many scenario's that could very well be applied to today.
Excellent film, and while &#34;dated&#34; in it's special effects, it's still a great movie - even by today's standards!! A timeless classic!
I've seen it years ago, still remembered some specific scenes, and it was just as thrilling. A well made movie from a book by a major writer.
This is a classic sci-fi movie. One of the best.  AAA+
Still a heart pounding tensely played out what-if sci-fi drama.  Have always enjoyed it, always will!
Wonderful story!  Great music and simply a fun movie! I wish they made movies like this again!  Nothing compares to the oldies!
My 92 year old father kept tearing up during this movie on Christmas Eve. By the way, I loved it too.
A classic for Christmas. Brings back lots of memories of how the church use to be not to mention how the enjoyment of watching Bing Crosby again!
When it comes to a great actor and singer, Bing Crosby was one of the best.  You will absolutely love this movie.
isn't it amazing how Bing Crosby could sing a song and bring everyone together to save the day!?! If only the world could be a classic movie...
Just because it is a feel good movie and a good one, which is what we need in the world today.
What more movies should be like today, funny, heartwarming and uplifting as well as entertaining. I have seen it at least 10 times.
A great movie.  Bing Crosby at his best.  To hear "Swingin' On A Star" again alone was worth the price of the DVD.
love classic films, thought the acting and story line was very much put together in a fantasitic way.
I have seen this movie many times and it is a great movie I love it. Am a fan of Bing Crosby.
Of course this is a classic and can be reviewed many times.  I am glad I have this DVD.  Jmh
I loved this movie.  Bing Crosby was always such a good actor as where all the actors in this good movie.  Family fun for all ages.
One of two movies that Bing stared in as a priest. This completes my collection and I am VERY happy!
I love this movie they don't make them like they made them in this time and Bing Crosby is great.
Also given as a gift.  This film may be a holiday favorite for most of us, including me.  Grab it at a good price.
If you don't have this get to purchasing it right now.  A great Christmas story to watch..  Shows love, patients, Lifts your Spirits
Great movie with a great story with a great cast with great songs and loved seeing the old movie in color.
This is a well scripted and acted movie that is moral and uplifting in spirit.  It makes most of todays movies look trashy.
LOVE, LOVE, LOVE THIS MOVIE!!!!!!!!!!!!  This is, in my opinion, Bing Crosby's BEST film.  I look forward to owning more of his movies.
Movie for my parents.  It is one they remember and they enjoy seeing Bing Crosby in one of his better roles.
I love the old movies!  Bing Crosby was wonderful in Going My Way.  I loved it from beginning to end!
Happy to find movies my dad has really gotten excited over. Great movie, we watched it together.
Going My Way is a wonderful story in a movie made the old fashioned way.  It shows the goodness of people and how they can help each other.
What can I say?  Bing Crosby at his best!
it was a good movie i think you made a mistake it shows i paid for 2 but got 1
Gregory Peck is at his best in  his portrayal of MacArthur.  I don't think any other actor could have done a better job in this movie.
Gregory Peck does a super acting job of one of our greatest general's. The special affects with a good script does justice to Hollywood.
I had a crush on Shirley MacLaine in college in the 70's.In "Sweet Charity" she is at her peak. Performance...You will like this DVD!
Simply a great action film with my favorite actress Goldie Hawn. Her acting is so wonderful and great. I enjoy all her movies.
Just watched the movie and it brought back memories when I first saw it many years ago. Goldie Hawn was great in this movie.
I have ALWAYS LOVED this movie, but it was so hard to find it, Goldie was EXCELLENT in this movie, so glad to finally purchase it.
I was actually living in Houston when this story occurred.  It really was a big deal and happened like the movie depicts.  Great movie.
this is a great movie.  We have looked for it for years and it is just a good as we remember.
All the reviews aside, this a good movie, and I enjoy it every time I watch it. I'd call it a sleeper.  Walter Mathheau is great as always.
I saw this movie many years ago and which I enjoyed very much. I decided to order it and keep it as a Walter Mathaw classic.
This is a great old classic film....Matthau is especially good in this one. Good action and story line!
I love it
A few days ago this movie was published in the UK in widescreen with very good picture quality. And it is region free!
If you are an Anthony Quinn fan then this is a must see. Great story and even greater acting. A must see.
Watched it with Greek girlfriend born in 1947. She enjoyed it too. The actors play well and the scenery is nice.
This is a great classic movie, and it never gets tiring to watch it over the years, especially with the beautiful scenery and fantastic music.
If you love good disaster movies like I do.  This is a must have to  complete the Airport saga series.
I really enjoy this movie. I remember it as a kid and it is still fun to watch. I am glad to have found it on DVD.
Classic Paul Newman comedy. A must see. Great supporting cast
Although I am a very big Paul Newman fan, this movie was so so for me. Just couldn't see him doing this. Great supporting cast.
I Bought the movie brand new.  A gift for my father, almost impossible to find anywhere else.  He loves the movie.
I have always loved this movie and I'm sure most people have never seen it or heard of it. It's just a fun movie with a great cast of characters.
Great sci-fi movie. IMO one of the best of the 50's. Good effects considering the time the movie came out.
Another great sci-fi project from the 50's. Pretty good special effects for it's era. A must for outer space fans.
This was one of my favorite movies from the 1950's the don't make like that anymore it was great to watch again.
Arrived on time and works fine.  No problems. What more can you ask for?  Great old-time SciFi flick from (at least) my childhood.
A BETTER THAN AVERAGE SCI-FI FILM....GOOD QUALITY AND EFFECTS FOR IT'S TIME.JUST THE RIGHT MIX OF TENSION,SCIENCE AND MENACE.DON'T MISS THIS ONE.
C'mon. It's fun, cheesy, yet pretty fun to watch. Just turn off the brain, stop thinking so much, and let 'er rip.
Another great re-mastering and transfer to DVD format of a benchmark sci-fi flick!  Every collector needs this DVD for their home theater.
Great Classic SciFi Movie at a great price. Arrived really quick too. In less than a week. Classic 1950s SciFi.
had this on recorded tape and the tape finally gave up, glad to see it on dvd, must buy for collectors.
I found the quality to be as they said prompt serve and delivery. Exectional Thank you.
This is classic SCIFI movie making at it's finest.  Great story. Dated but good effects.  A real classic.  If you like scifi, get it.  Recommended.
Very pleased with this transaction.  Price and service were top notch.  I'll be back.
This is a very entertaining science fiction movie.  Any old-time movie buffs that enjoy classic sci-fi movies will go for this one.
Excellent film. This film was once so hard to get, out of print. Amazon brought it back at a great price. This is a must for any sci-fi collection.
Movie itself was so so.  But I knew that when I bought it.The Blu Ray product itself is excellent.
My mother loves this movie, I myself have not seen it. It is one of her favorites or classics so I bought it for her.
This is a fantastic movie, who do we have to petition to get it on DVD???
you can hardly go wrong with a Paul Newman film. this is a great story in a beautiful setting (the Pacific north woods)
Love this movie.  The waitress in this movie is awesome.  Keeps you interested because you do not know what is going to happen next.
I would love to see this movie released in Blu-ray. I think it is one of the best movies of all time.
Good quality dvd my vhs died and I was glad to find it the first movie that really got Spielberg going a classic
Very pleased with the movie and the timely manner in which we received it Thank you
I admit this was kind of corny, but it was really good which I didn't expect. Who knew it would be so good?
Spielberg's &#34;Duel&#34; established him as a skilled film maker and opened up his career. Edge of your seat thriller. Enjoy
Amazing movie!!!!!!! A must see. Dennis weaver is great in it. And its spielbergs best movie:) classic suspense and wow just wow! Please watch.
Would love to see this on Blu-Ray and in widescreen if possible. Great thriller with nice twists and suspence.
this is a really great movie to watch, great cast of characters. you will enjoy it very much. i have watch it so many times
Steven's first full length television show. Shows his creativity and why he's still on top.
This is just as good as Jaws, usually a sequel falls short but this is another zinger.  Well done with the almost the same cast.
Send down more snicker flavored people like Steve. They are yummy and most desired...but we will take what you have if you don't have the snickers.
This was a gift for my daughter and she loved it. The first one was the best out of all the Jaws movies, but this was her second favorite.
THE FIRST TWO I THINK ITS BETTER THAN THES LIKT THE THREE AND FOUR MAY BE EVEN FIVEBUT EVERY SHARK STORY IS GOOD
ITS OUTSTANDING. I LOVE BEING IN THE WATER BUT NEVER DID ANY SAILING BEFORE. LOOKS LIKE FUN, BUT WATCH OUT!!!
I LOVE THIS MAN AND NO MATTER WHERE I SEE HIM HE REPRESENTS CHIEF BRODY ALWAYS AND FOREVER AND THIS IS A WAY OF RELIVING IT
this sequel i very good and i like that the actors from the first jaws stayed for the second movie
i am not by no means a jaws fan but my youngest son adored it so if it made him happy then i am happy it got here really fast!
I love movies this one is vary good and love good scare and thrills and this was my favorite moives of all time thank you for sending this to me
I have all the Jaws movies and I enjoy having a little marathon from time to time.  Really great price!
Jaws 2 is just as good as the 1st Jaws. Just as good a story, suspense and acting. A must if you own the 1st.
The best sequel to Jaws 1, the rest just did not make it with me and I don't intend on buying the DVDs.
This tape one runs no walk to hide perfect
Frank Langella can suck my blood any time.  He plays a villain you just want to make love with in all his films.
Not the newest version of the old favorite, but so far the best looking vampire. Not as gory as the newer versions and yet still a great movie.
langella is the ultimate dracula.  sorry chris lee!  great cast, beautiful photography.creepy and sexy at the same time.  watch it.
I am a fan from Frank he can BITE ME ANY TIME.. I really love this package it was exactly what I was looking for when I order it..
My wife's favorit Dracula.  Says Frank Langella is so HOT in this that he could bite her anyday.  She can watch this over and over.
had this on vhs, wanted to up date. arrived on time & in great condition.
Flip comment aside, Langella achieves just the right mix of cool evil and sweltering erotic in this excellent movie based on Bram Stoker's novel.
Of all the versions of this story - and I've seen most - this is the best snd most sensual of all.
Had seen it once on tv but flll in love with it and decided to order it and glad I did.
This is one of my favorite Robert Redford movies especially because it's one of only a few of his movies where he does not die at the end.
This has been one of my all time favorite films since its release. Had it on VHS, Delighted with DVD
Redford, Fonda Willie Nelson all fine performances, interaction amongst favorable, plot really decent, scenery great .Fun in a time of coinflict
This ones for the girls guys. robert redford does a passing job as a drunken rodeo cowboy, but once again jane fonda shows up to ruin a good movie
This has always been a favorite movie of mine and Redford is so good in it.  Jane Fonda plays a great part as well.
loed it this movie was so really cool had not seen it in a long time thank you very much
this is long before the show i believe for the age i thought that it was not bad.  thumbs up if you like original things.
This is a great movie for the whole family. No swearing or blood and guts. Just a clean family show.
I love it.  Because it shows how the story and series got started.  The action and the cast members are perfect.
THE ORIGINAL ( AND FAR SUPERIOR )SERIES! Makes the NEW series look just like  what it is - BAD!!!!! ( Not GOOD bad BUT just plain BAD!!!!!)
The classic that started it all if you are a fan ofMythology and the beginning of a legend.  You must have this in your collection.
this a great part of the old series and I really like it, some series are better with the old version and not the new....
When I found this at the price it was I couldn't believe it.  Had to have it.  Came quick in the box with the smile on the side.
one  of  my faveit show  when I was a  kids  and  I still love  it  I  wish  thhe  show  can  come  back  some  day with the old acter s
I watched the complete series, when it came out in the early 80's.  I think it's better, then the series, that eventually replaced it.
I have enjoyed this series for a very long time and am happy to say that this purchase helped me complete my collection
bought it for a gift, came in great timing. came in great condition. made for a great gift love to keep the classics around
One of my favorite movies, very well made and acted
I have always enjoyed this movie and I finally got it.  Alan Alda is very good in it. Thank You.
I have ordered many DVDs from MovieMars....they are always great to deal with. I will continue to do business with them as well as others.
Would recommend this to anyone. Ellen Burstyn is a wonderful actor. The dvd was made clearly and have watched it numerous times.
This is a true classic ... Alda and Burstyn are excellant.Nice to relive the happenings over the years as the characters develop ...
I first saw this movie years ago and fell in love with it. It is so true to life. Thanks
Thank you for making this film available to purchase. It is a classic and very well made and acted. 5 Stars
This one hs long been one of my favortie movies.  It has a great cast and an especially good story.
I never get tired of watching this movie when it shows up on tv.  I was thrilled to be able to add it to my collection.
IT WAS GREAT ALAN ALDA DOES A WONDERFUL JOB ACTING IN IT HE WAS FUNNY TOO.FROM A BIG ALAN ALDA FAN FOR 4 YEARS NOW KIRSTEN
the johnny mathis [sp?] tune is only one part of this hilarious movie. allan alda does comedy and drama in this film. a must for his fans.
I watch this as a teenager and now as an older adult I still enjoy it.  This movie has such a fun, sad story.
This had to be Alan Alda's best work next to M.A.S.H.  I only wish that will able to see the stage version of this movie one day.
My all time favorite movie.  Timeless.
This is a great movie that I wanted toadd to my collection.  It arrived in a timely manner and was as described.  Noproblem and no complaint.
Great movie. It's fun to watch it and then travel down to Nashville and visit the Lynn's ranch where some of the movie was filmed.
From the first time seen this movie I fell in love with it.  Sissy Spacek is amazing!  A definite must have to your dvd collection.
love the music ,and actors great story the best.......love sissy spacek in this movie big fan of sissy spacek and tommy lee jones the best
always been a big fan of this movie so I had to get it for my mom who is also a big fan, and she loves it.
I love this movie and would recommend buying it to any fan of Loretta Lynn, Sissy S, Tommy lee Jones or the country music fans.
I read the book and the movie is much like it.. very well done and very enjoyable.buy it , you will be glad you did..
Wonderful true story of Loretta's life...  Heartwarming and real.  i completely enjoyed the movie!  I would recommend this video to anyone.
I've wanted this movie for many years and was glad to find it on Amazon. For all those old-time country fans out there, this is a must see!
One of my favorite movies. Nice film to watch with the whole family.I LOVE THE SOUNTRACK.
Never hear or see her anymore - but she did a fabulous job in this movie.  I wish Hollywood would do more of these types of movies.
Sissy Spacek did an outstanding job doing her own singing. Beverly D'Angelo did a great Patsy Cline. Sissy's great acting made this movie work
Sissy Spacek did a great a  job. Tommie lee Jones was great as her Husband Drew. will watch it over an over again
Picture on this movie is fantastic. It was filmed yesterday and so was the sound file lots extras so buy
Excellent movie, so true to life and country music. Acting is great, they really put their hearts into it. Watch it !
Great Movie, great interviews, great music, actual story line, they just aren't making movies with all of these qualities anymore.
A very good movie about a wonderful singer.  Another movie that I can watch over and over and not get tired of it.
Amazing talent. Sissy spacek did her own singing in this movie about loretta Lynn.  loved this movie and i recommend it for the whole family
I love Sissy and Tommy Lee! I also love Loretta Lynn and her true life story is so inspiring, she has a natural born talent.
This movie is great, I'm glad it has been regitized which makes it better. Love Loretta Lynn, reminds me of home.
She portrays a perfect Loretta Lynn character.  And she sang all the songs herself.  So, she not a bad singer either.
I was happy with it
Just a nostalgic moment seem I have so many of those these days. Love to fill them with old movies
Olivia is my favorite to see in grace in HD is to die for.  She is one of my favorites growing up.
Less exciting than I remember, but entertaining if your in the right mood or with the right people.
This movie is a classic GEM On of my favorites from my youth...!!! Classic story line, GREAT ELO SONG with Olivia how can you go wrong...???
I thourghly enjoyed the music. Who would not like a movie with Gene Kelly. The story was a little hokey but is was still entertaining.
Yup, sometimes you just need to see flashy-trashy movies togive you a well desevred laugh. If you like this one, checkout Grease 2.
Great movie and I love the music and the clothes. It is a must to have. It will get you up and moveing. It is a feel good movie.
Bought this for my grandkids and they watch it all the time between this and the Dukes can't ask for much more
It's funny how one man can out smart a simple minded police officer. Truely a classic movie to laugh and enjoy with, with friends
This is a fast moving and funny movie.  It has some sentimental moments but it all fits together and  you love it.
I love Burt and Sally the movie keeps you going with all of the laughs and high jinks that they get into.
I ordered this through amazon video , more movies for my ipad mini. I enjoy Burt Reynolds movies. thanks amazon.
Actually better than the original, FUNNY and very captivating, GREAT work by Burt as always, and SUPER car chases.A Real Classic.ENJOY all. !!!Jan H.
Good movie brought back good memories from my past. movie arrived in good condition and on time. It is a must for all that grew up in the 70's
This was a good movie for the time. A little cheesy now but still a good moviein it own rights.
Still one of my favorite movies! The Blu-Ray is beautiful and really helps you see the color and opulence that was intended when the movie was made.
mail in great timing,mailed in great packaging,played great with no problem. have wanted this movie for years when I show it when i was a kid.
Favorite cult classic from the 80(s).  Has Max Von Sandow and Pierce Bronson and Ozzy Osbourne.  Sexy women too and action
Well, its been released, however the case is lacking, the England case is much better, howver its still the movie we all remember.
It was great to finally see the scope version like it was in theaters back when I saw it in 1980.
Its a 80s movie and its a very good movie. I have always liked Sam Jones. He is a great actor.
I loved this movie as a kid but had never bought it . when I saw that it was now being offered as a blu ray I had to have it.
I collect movies, some I get becasue I want them, others to fill n holes on my shelf. I remmebered this as being a lot better, oh well
Campy, silly, fun, glorious and the music of Queen, what's not to love!  Get your popcorn ready and settle in for a trip down memory lane.
remember watching this when the kids were small and my son wanted it for Christmas and was happy to purchase it for him.
It's available on Amazon Uk for about $13.00. This is the remastered version, don't pay through the nose to greedy sellers seek an alternative ;)
I still love this movie, is a fun movie and great music from the band Queen..the blue ray vert, has great pix and sound,fun to watch..
My wife wants to own all Princess Aura's outfits! I'm in favor of this behavior. Great set design. A fun movie.
I loved this movie when I was a kid. Watching it as an adult I can appreciate this cheesy, campy, totally fun movie on a new level.
Ordered it for my teenage  grandsons to watch as they had never been exposed to the type of movie.  Still fun to watch/
Colors and sound pop from the Blu-ray like I had never seen on television or the old VHS. Extremely impressed at how vibrant this film is.
Finally get my copy and those scalpers copies drop to nothingness. Awesome. Movie was well worth waiting for.
Saw this years ago, found it again and enjoyed it. Caine was wondeful, this type of film is very entertaining.
Great dvd, Thank you!
I love this film
love this movie pretty entertaining and for be a old movie the picture in blu ray looks amaizing. you will not regret it.
I have thoroughly enjoyed watching this movie, and would definantly recomend it to any and everyone. It is a fabulous movie no matter what your age.
great childhood memory and great for kids today.....only thing, it wasn't as funny as i remembered wen I was 10.
I Give this movie as a gift for my sister she love this movie and she enjoys it, fast shippment great buy with the price.
This movie just brings back fond childhood memories. Most (like my husband and son) don't find it very good but I still love it.
This Movie may be old But its still funny bacause You Can see the Products You Buy But in the old Boxes RETRO!
Excellent movie, exceptional work by Richard Prior. Music brings one back to Disco. The item is good to have. Great on-time service.
This movie defined an era, The actors and music take you back to a time when things were so much better and life was good.
A great classic of the 70's top stars of that time.  A top song even good today. All about a day at the car wash.
It was from the start to the finish. It almost felt like real life action that a person can face. I would recommend this to all my friends.
This is another great movie of the era. It was fun to watch and the tape was in very good condition.
watching this movie always gave me enjoyment of the 70's era. The different styles of cars big with alot of room.
too funny for words...  just loved the late 60's attire and language and music.  would recommend for a fun family movie.
Very Good movie take to yes days when hand car wash was very good and people took care of your Car by hand wash.
my friend asked if i could find this ovie on dvd. it is one of his favorite movies will recommend the movie and the buyer to others
I NEVER CEASE TO BE AMAZED AT THE FLEXIBILITY OF EASTWOOD'S ACTING. HE AND CHARLES BRONSON ARE TRULY GREAT ACTORS.
This is a great movie showing the late 1960's city culture in New York and the challenges of an Arizona Sheriff's Deputy trying to operate in it.
It's a great dipiction of &#34;Conquer and divide&#34;. We still fall for those tactics today. The cast did a great job!
Fast turnaround. Love this movie. One of Pryor's best. Harvey Keitel and Yaphet Kotto are excellent too!
This was a birthday gift for my husband.  He likes it. Thanks for offering it. Ellen Burstyn is a favorite actress.
I saw this in the theater when it came out and loved it. Thank you for bringing it out into the DVD format so that we can enjoy it again.
I loved  this movie.  I have seen a lot of Ellens' movies and I am interested in what happens when you die and come back.
Ellen has always been a great actress. I love everything about the movie. It's a down to earth story with a great ending.
great movie. great message
This is one of my favorites from long ago.  I owned it once.  I believe in healing and in near death experience.  Great old movie.
this movie is so good and i have watched it alot since gettign it  thank you so so so so much
hi i just loved this movie and any fan of natalie wood should get this one i did and i watch it a lotcharlene
This was a funny movie with George Segal and Natalie Wood. I really like these movies from the past. Thanks!
This is the start of the nergo league baseball, most of the players wereslaves. Billy Dee Williams, James Earl Jones, Richard Pryor among lots more.
Quick to ship. Movie has always been a Baseball Junkie's Favorite of all time. Recommended for all Richard Pryor Fans
One of my favorites of Peter Sellers. I will probably where out the tape and will have to buy another.
This is a must have movie for lovers of Sylvester Stallone.
I like this movie it's an interesting story line and got action as well as a little suspense. it's a good Friday evening or Saturday movie.
This is an older movie, but has thrills and action, which we like and the ending is quite surprising, which makes it better.  P Pratt
I saw this as a kid this movie brung back memories stallone was so young then and rutger hauer plays always the best bad guy a must to see!
sissy spacek is a good a actress this is one of my favorite movies it is really good plus its a move I can relate to
This is an old movie that I had saw years ago. I really like it. It does have some strong language in it but not alot.
One of the best films by Sissy Spacek and Eric Roberts, remarkable and well made right from the start, pure excellent!
I saw this movie in the theater in Banff years ago. I  was so very glad to have found this.
Bought for my husband for Christmas, becuase he always enjoyed this movie. He was happy to receive it.  Great find.
Jack was great in this movie.This is a early movie that Jack did in his career.Pleanty of action here. Cast members are great.
Glad I watched this film it is very good, but it makes me fear for good people living in the USA.  Research "SCHOOL OF THE AMERICAS"
Despite the lack of DVD extras, this film is 5 stars. The acting of Lemon and Spacek is great. I highly recommend it.
Based on a true story, this movie will make you more likely to never accept the &#34;official&#34; version of anything.
Sissy Spacek is one of my very favorite actors. She shines in this movie, along with Jack Lemmon.It's suspenseful and urgent.Good one.
I've waited a long long time for this to come out on DVD! I am please as punch. What an awesome movie!
A wonderful version of G&S's Pirates. Beautifully performed by all, but Kevin Kline is really dynamic as the Pirate King.
First, I love this play and this version is really good!Second, I grew up watching this so I had to buy when I saw it here online.
Of all the versions of this play I have seen, this is the best.  Both Kevin Kline, Rex Smith and George Rose make the movie.
Excellent disc especially since I love the movie. Love to share with my sons who love the movie as well.
As multi-talented as K.K. is, he outdoes himself again.  Add in Linda Ronstadt at her best and you can't get a better musical than this one.
Very well done.  Sort of have to turn away for some of &#34;Ruth's&#34; scenes.  Wish they had used somebody else, sorry.
A clever and fun musical.  George Rose is a wonderful, acrobatic dancer and Kevin Kline is adorable as the pirate.
Wonderful classic.
i fell in live with Kevin Kline in this movie..need I say more....I would love to be a &#34;pirate king&#34;
This might be old, but its still worth seeing- soooo funny in a new and different way. Definately should be a part of your collection!
A classic.  Funny, entertaining, worth watching.  What more can I say ?  A good evening's entertainment.  I really liked it.
I saw this movie years ago and always wanted to see it again. It is a great story. I would watch it again and again!!!
this was a gift to my sister who had been searching for it.  she loved it.
Timeless story that would frighten those who don't love a good scare! I have watched this many times over, and i love the storyline.
This movie is a classic horror story portrayed by great actors. Although I have seen it in the past, it's just as fresh now as it ever was.
My classic ghost story of all time!  Never tire of it and now I have two movie formats, VHS and DVD!
a brilliant and really scary movie one of the very best ghost movies ever made. scared the hell out of mommy and me.......prinny
It should be a classic.
The movie got here on time and in good shape. I think the movie is funny. I like all the song that are in the movie.
Love this movie always cry at the end but it is great to watch they act great together. Would recomend.
Great movie!!! My husband and I both enjoyed it and my husband wanted to get it to give to his dad for his birthday.
Just enough excitement to make it a cute.  I love to laugh a lot when I see a good movie.
This comedy with Burt Reynolds is so funny.  The movie had a good plot.  For classic movies this is a must for any library.
if you like movies with dolly parton or burt reynolds yowill like this one ad i got a good copy to
Dolly Parton is absolutely beautiful in this film as well as good in her role as a madam.  Burt Reynolds did a fine job and easy to look at!
I loved this movie when it first came out.  I find it just to be fun and good for a giggle.
This Has Been One Of My Favorite Movies Of All Time. Like It So Well I Bought It In DVD Also
This movie is not as bad as the title may seem. It is a good movie with comedy and romance....Highly recommended!
Loved this movie been wanting to get it for a long time Love Dolly Parton great acting in movie Super
I used to watch this with my Aunt when I was a child and I loved the movie.  I was excited to find it.
I saw this as a play and as a movie.  It is a funny, and yet sad story.  Dolly is such a hoot.
Great classical movie piece of whimsy depicting political double-dealing hypocrisy at the most entertaining level.  Burt and Dolly at their finest.
this is one of Burt Reynolds fianist movies. As usual he makes you laff from begining to the end of the movie. Great music also!
This is just a sit back, relax, and enjoy kind of movie.  The comedy is priceless and the singing and dancing are great to watch
I love this movie its very funny and love burt and dolly and dom deluise too. It was delivered very prompty and good quality.
Comedy, romance, drama and a little musical all in one, I'm so glad I bought this. great entertainment for mature audiences.
This is an oldie but a goodie!  It is funny and has a great ending.  Not for little kids!  We love this movie.
One of my husband's favorite movies!  So glad you had it since I couldn't find it anywhere else. It's a great musical
I REALLY ENJOY ANTHING THAT BURT REYNOLDS HAS DONE. HE IS UNDERESTIMATED FOR THE PERFORMANCES IN HIS MOVIES.  I THINK HE IS THE BEST
It was at a great price and just what I was looking for. Free shipping always helps to convince me on whether or not to order.
This movie is a classic!  The music is wonderful and entertaining, the acting is subperb!  I have loved this movie since it's release!
Part 2 is just like the first one Mr. Perkins is the MAN Great movie add to stack of one to get where is MR. NORMAN BATESSSS.
This came out 22 years after the original. It is a logical sequel as to how Norman comes back. It is worth viewing.
So happy that Amazon has Wish Lists, or I would never know what to get for my wonderful son-in-law. He was thrilled to get this for Christmas.
One of my favorite comedies ever! The SCTV guys are great!!!
Great movie and actors. If you like Wayne should have this one in your collection. One of the earlier movies.
I particularly wanted this book because the famous Canadian poet, Robert Service, was actually in this movie.  That was an extra treat.
I liked it and I am a big John Wayne fan. I had never seen this movie before and was delighted. If you are a John Wayne fan you will like it.
how I wish many movies they show today  would take a back seat to these horror classics. watched them as a young child.
Always had a place in my heart for the Universal Monsters! This is a great classic and never gets old!
you can't beat a classic to watch with the whole family. great addition for any movie collection. we enjoy all the universal monster movies.
The Wolf Man is required in any self-respecting horror fan's video library.
A full Moon eh? Always made me look @ myself to see if I was turning into the Wolfman. Super film.
the remake with Benicio Del Toro and Anthony Hopkins was pretty good but you just can't beat the classic! =D
Great classic Halloween DVD.Acting and story lines arent that great but has been around since my childhood. It was great to add to my DVD library
Love the Jaws movies, they are second best to the Jurassic Park  movies.  Wish they would continue making them.  Good movies.
I'm a big fan of all of the jaws movies. So I had to own all of them. Great deal great job
i like these shark movies allways iked them sence when was a kid  like different  fish in the water its intertaing to me
love that shark. YOU JUST CANT GET ENOUGH OF THAT SHARK. WONT SCARE ME THOUGH I LOVE BEING IN THE WATER
I love any type of shark movie so this is one of my favorites.  It drives my family crazy but I can watch it over and over again.
I LOVED IT AS A KID AND I AM HAPPY TO WON IT NOW AND BE ABLE TO SEE IT AS MUCH AS I WANT TO
I will not sit alone and watch this tape again, There is just no way form or person can make me It was wonderfull
For enthusiasts......Old time mystery and horror, not like today. Good stories, plots ...without all the needless gore and blood everywhere
Pia is adorable as a woman who becomes scorned then becomes and independant woman who can stand on her own two feet.
The music of Rick Springfield set to a decent storyline. Rick definitely makes this movie worthwhile in addition to a myriad of his hits.
A must have for any rick fan. The plot may not be very deep but if you love rick you have to have this!
This movie brings back so many memories from the teenage years. Rick Springfield is and will always be great. A great 80's movie.
Looked for this for a long time!  Glad I finally found it!  It's a fun movie to watch!!  Thanks!  :)
This movie is a classic. I love the visial effects that it has Stephen King really went out on this one,
I love this movie, as child, I wish I had her powers, but thank god I didn't!!!! (ha-ha) This movie was wonderful!!!!
What a classic with little Barrymore. It's a great story line a little dated but a good flick none-the-less. I would recommend to anyone.
i loved the movie. its word for word the same as the book. so if you read the book you have seen the movie
great movie! very funny! and who can forget the woes and troubles you go thru over your first love? good girl night movie!
I am a Molly Ringwald fan (not sure if that is how you spell her name). She was great as always.
This is a long time favorite! When I found it, I had to have it. Oh, the horror of the teenage years!
I've given all the 80's teen flicks high ratings because I'm nostalgic and, well, they are great. Another addition to our collection.
As I had said with Pretty in Pink, these two movies were the best in the 80's. Loved growing up with them.
This is one of my absolute favorite movies! And now I can watch it whenever I want! Wahoo!!  So happy :)
I loved this movie when it first came out and now my daughters love it as well.  I'm so glad I decided to buy it.  Nice for my collection.
Yet another great John Hughes movie with the best teen cast of the 80's.Putting it on BLU-RAY was an awesome move.
I saw this movie as a teen i loved it bought for my teen and she loves this movie it was delivered quickly and plays perfect
This movie is fantastic. Long Duck Dong stole the show. His movements, facial expressions and lines are priceless! Buy it for your collection!
Breakfast Club/Sixteen CandlesGreat 80's movies. some of the best John Hughes had to offer. Highly recommended.
Old school but good school! This movie is cool as hell! Love molly ringwald! Everyone should own this dvd movie!
If you were an 80's or 90's teenager, this is a must see...John Hughes was the king when it came to producing great teen romantic comedies. :)
my daughter loves this movie....she is 43 years of age and has been watching this for yearsw.....even me I'm hooked
This is timeless. Every teen in the 80's can pass this down to their kids. They could never remake this classic, and I hope they never try.
Sixteen Candles (Universal 100th Anniversary Blu-ray/DVD Combo + Digital copy get this movie one of the best movies ever get this movie
Daughter had this on her list--was excited to get it as we couldn't find it as cheap is what you have
No more yankie my wankie, the Donger need food!  This movie is funny, loved it when it came out, still love it
An essential teen comedy. Funny, romantic, silly, and charming. The slapstick is never forced. A chick flick that can be enjoyed by anybody.
I love these 80 Brat Pack movies and this one is no exception.  Such a great story and wonderful cast!
Like I said, John Hughes!  He is great.  All of his movies are worth watching over and over again.  He was a genious.
Great movie...must see. Saw this when first came out a long time ago. Watched it with the kids and everyone liked it.
absolutly perfect it got here in a great time period and works perfectly! ive been lookin for this everywere! thanks!
I just received this and have not even had a chance to watch it. I love this movie and am glad to add it to my collection.
This is one of the best movies of Molly Ringwald and would be considered a chick flick that you can watch over and over and never get tired of it.
This product was in excellent shape and arrived on time. If you are a 80's movie collectorthis is one to add in with you collection.
I liked the movie. I received the movie on time. The movie remind me of the 80's. It was Great.great
like new, played good, nice to see a movie , me and the kids watched, good action, and acting for its time
This a 80 s action movie and the CD is like new I enjoy with my family this movie and hace fun.
I have the VHS of this, now that I'm converting my collection this one was a definite keeper.  DVD arrived quickly & in good shape.
This is a classic...fun movie for kids and adults alike!I'm glad to have 'THE LAST STARFIGHTER' in my DVD collection.
I loved this movie as a kid. As soon as I saw it was on Blu ray I had to get it. Took me back to the 80's when I first saw it.
Loved this movie when it came out and love it even more that it is now on bluray. LOVE IT
I know, I know, it's old.... but this is a classic movie. Was great in the 80's and is still a favorite!!!
would recommend to New Zealanders as plays here.  Still good after all this time - love that blu ray too.
Burt  Lancaster appearance just adds that much moreto this sci fi family picture.  This is considered top 100 rentals & worth it.
It is geared more for kids but I still loved the movie.  I did see it when it first came out and I jumped at the chance to purchase it.
This is one of my favorite classic movie and now I have it on blu ray thanks and at a great price
Remember this one from when I was young and am glad to share it with my kids.  Good story.
The graphics were state of the art at the time. They are more than dated by todays standards but still a good story and fun to watch.
Great family movie, one of the old classics,good to see it back on the shelves, good bit of &#34;clean&#34; science fiction
Good movie the timing it arrived was good and it played great. Please tell everyone thank u for the good time and we really did have a good time
Very well scripted movie with much action and adventure included with the ending to the movie as one that is great where the planets were saved.
just as i remember. great movie and have no problems with the movie transfer to blue ray. looks great. took me back
Movie is/was before it's time, I love sci-fi movies, especially when they go out in space. had this on VHS, needed to get on DVD
A great Blu-Ray release of this old movie.
When I first saw this movie, it was bigger than star wars in my mind.  It has always been one of my top three movies.
I really like this movie.  I know it is a young man's wish fulfillment fantasy but it is still just so much fun.
The Last Starfighter was one of my boys' favorites when they were growing up. It's great for the whole family -a classic!
I know it is for the younger crowd but hard to not like the story and acting no matter what age you are.
Fantastic film. I still remember watching this on vhs when i was little. to finally have it on blu-ray is fantastic..
A great family movie.  It will keep your attention.  It has some comedy just at the right times to keep it intresting.
This is a great movie.One of the best of its kind for an 80's movie.I highly recommend it for everyone.
fantastic. just as i remember it. great quality of the transfer. great sound. i am very happy.
I love the movie and have watched several times since I got it. I have recommended to some of my friends.
Had this movie before and alway liked it.  I wanted a new copy and ordered it on DVD.  I like the space the DVD saves.
This movie was a treasure in the theatres in the 1980&#8217;s and finally on Blu-ray it really stands out and looks great.
This is a movie from my childhood and I now have it on DVD. I love it. It's such a good movie!!!
THAT TAKES ME BACK wow i know he's the villian but i think xur is cool but i also like grig and alex and centari as well
This is just as good as I remember.  I wish they would remake it and then also make a second one.
I saw this movie back in the 1980's when it first came put.  Very good movie.  I recommend purchasing it. It brings back some memories.
A very surprising sleeper that had special effects, drama, a love story, family orientation, and adventure all rolled up in one!
A very good mystery film.  Good stars in it.  Hitchcock does a good job. I highly recommend it.  Was up for Oscars should of won.
For film class my daughter had to watch this movie.  She really enjoyed it.  She loved how Hitchcock filmed this movie and like to story line.
watch it enough (as I have) you may find yourself craving something new and different., but for a classic ------- you can't find better.
Hitchcock at his best. Builds the suspense and it never gets old. I've watched this movie many times over the years and it's still a great movie.
I love this movie and the sender Movie Mars is awesome, I am quite pleased with both
This is my favorite Hitchcock movie. It is so different and good. Acting is the great and the story keeps moving. Just the best ever.
Rear Window is the Best Hitchcock film. Grace Kelly is superb, James Stewart is always great and Ironsides makes an interesting murderer.
Rear Window is one of Jimmy Stewart's best and most noteworthy movies, which you will want to watch many times!!!!!!
Classic Hitchcock movie, just like Pyscho. Love this movie as well as most classic films. You can't go wrong with his films.
Jimmy Stewart and Grace Kelly are terrific in this suspenseful thriller. And look for Aaron Burr as the heavy in this movie.
This is my favorite movie. I was delighted to be able to download it to my Kindle Fire.  The quality is excellent.
What else is there to say?  Hitchcock doesn't get better than this!  Jimmy Stewart is genius, Grace Kelly is GORGEOUS! A classic!
The colors in this movie are amazing!  Bright colors & sharp outlines.  They must have renewed the copy they used to make this DVD.
A very good Hitchcock movie to watch. strong story and directing that would capture your senses till the last minute.
A timeless Hitchcock classic. Great cast and performances. It  provides the viewer with the guilty pleasure of voyeurism as well as high suspense.
This is hands down one of my favorite movies. I never regret watching it. DVD was great, movie looked terrific!
Oh, this movie is wonderful--no trashiness, lots of suspense and great action and dialogue. James Stewart was perfect in this.
My husband knew every line of this old movie but it was new to me.  We spent a delightful evening sharing it together.
suspenseful  movie from the very start!  Cute and mysterious all in one!Would recommend this on to family and friends!  Love Jimmy Stewart!
Ordered this for my sister for a gift.  She was thrilled.  she has always loved this movie.  I will be ordering more in the future for her.
always a favorite and why not with the all star cast and the suspense of a Hitchcock favorite, they knew how to make movies back then.
This is a great classic movie and they just don't make them like this anymore.  Good story and great actors, well worth watching.
Old movie really well done.  Great story, acting and an all-around great movie!  I highly recommend watching this movie with someone special.
I've always liked this movie, it was scary the first time I saw it, but now it's still suspenseful.
THis film works on so many levels, it is truly amazing.  This restored version is fantastic, with excellent sound and video quality.
Alfred Hitchcock - Jimmy Stewart - How can you go wrong? Even today this is still a great suspense thriller. My daughter loves it too.
Alfred Hitchcock was one of the best directors and producers.  The video and audio quality of such an old movie was outstanding.
My wife and I like Jimmy Stewart and this type of move.  I would recommend it.  We enjoyed it.  We got a great price form Amazon.
SAW THIS MOVIE ONCE AND NEVER FORGOT IT, I AM SO GLAD YOU HAVE THIS ON DVD.  THIS IS A EXCELLENT MOVE OF HITCHCOCK.
Some people might say it's cheesy or boring, but it's classic Hitchcock. I highly recommend the watch and possible collection.
some thing that you can enjoy if you like mysters and the people who one the movie and a good picture
one of the most thought provoking and suspenseful Hitchcock movies ever. not a huge financial success, but exceedingly well made
We love Alfred Hitchcock moviesThis one is greatGreat actingGreat suspenseHas a lot to say about society - even today's
Based loosely on the Leopold and Loeb murder, Hitch does a great job of building understated suspense about a very nasty murder.
one of the cuter movies my children watched when they were young.  They were all born in the 80's and this is such a cute show.
Perfect condition. I have loved this movie since I was a kid. I can't wait to show it to mine.
if you are a fan of suspense and mystery on childrens movies, you will love this one.
just received my dvd or Cloak & Dagger and The Wizard and am very happy with my order. it showed up quickly and is in good shape
Throw back movie. This one takes me back to the 80's when you would really believe something like this could happen.
I used to watch this movie as a child and am happy to share it with my son.  Love it.  Thank you!!
Everything was perfect. I would definitely use this seller again and would recommend them to anyone.
Wonderful depiction of a free spirit, unfortunately his life was a bit anachronistic.Looks like he was born about 50 or so years too late...
if you like Kirk Douglas movies you will like this one nothing better then a good western they don't make them anymore.
This is an old black and white--but isd a great movie--would recommend this for someone who likes Kirk Douglas movies
this is one of kirk douglas best movie by far the acting in this movie is very good it is in black and white and widescreen this a very good movie.
I remember watching this movie and eating popcorn in the Joy theater.Glad to add it to my library.Excellent service and excellent product.Thank You
I love The WILD LIFE [ Chris Penn] And I have it on LASERDISC,,'Tis a great Comedy and A Must See :P
I AM WAITING TO GET THIS GREAT MOVIE ON DVD, ITS ABOUT TIME IT CAME OUT ON DVD
I bought this for my mom who has loved this movie her whole life.  Just a wonderful movie from the past!
It cames as stated so Im happy.  Haven't watched it yet  but I am sure I will need kleenex for it.
Because they are great actors and the story was a 2 box kleenex one.  My daughter and son-in-law just love them.
I bought this DVD for my mom because she loves old movies and it was on her Christmas list.  She has really enjoyed watching it.
Years ago my daughters and I watched this movie. It was already old. To be able to own it and reconnect with good memories has been invaluable.
my husband loves old movies; and always wants to watch them betterthan the newer ones. brings back good movie memories
Another awesome movie with Susan Hayward can't go wrong with her movies ,glad to see it released on DVD this is a classic
An oldie and a goodie. Get your kleenex box ready.  I was happy to be able to add this movie to my collection.
A sad and beautiful love story a wonderful movie a three hanky movie for sure. Great acting and fabulous script.
I've always enjoyed watching Susan Hayward act and this movie is one of my favorites - it is a real tearjerker, so I keep the kleenex handy!
This is a old classic, very highly recomended  Stars all of them , older movie but once u see u can never forget!!!!!!!
This movie is very good, but a tearjerker at the end. Don't hesitate to buy this as it will hold your attention.
This is one of my all time favorite movies. Was so happy that I was able to buy this to watch again.
MADE A GREAT BIRTHDAY GIFT,GIFT MADE MY COUSIN HAPPY AND SURPRISE THIS WHEN THEY MADE GREAT MOVIES. AND HAD MOVIE STARS
This is a timeless movie that is good for the entire family and I would recommend this movie to all ages.
Magnificent Obsession with Rock Hudson and Jane Wyman is a GREAT Movie and a real life story that touches your Heart and ha a wonderful ending.
This movie has a very good message to it.  We would do well to abide by this message, for our everyday lives.
I must admit I was expecting a different outcome, but the story line was deeper and more a depiction of reality.  I really enjoyed it.
I saw this recommended on a tv movie show and they said how good it was, and it didn't disappoint and a great ending quite unexpected!
Wish this great movie had a happy ending but Monty was explicit in this picture!  Just like his character to portray a poor boy!
This was is a classic  movie my daughter was surprised to get this dvd. She wanted it for some time now she own this movie.
love Olivia De Havilland.  disfunctional  family drama. wonderful costumes. great view of the past, manners and mores.
oliver de haviland is on top form hear and a great story about a shy heress with a dominering farther .watch out for the ending a true classic .brian
Wonderfully tragic love story. Olivia de Havilland is great as is Monty Cliff. That man was good looking!!! I always wish things end up differently..
At last one of her best!  Now if we could only get "To Each His Own" "Hold Back The Dawn" and "The  Dark Mirror".  Are you listening Warners?
A must see classic film.Torn between a loveless father and aman who only loves her for her moneya naive, plain-jane heiress learnscruel lessons.
This happens to be my favorite movie. The acting, the storyline and the ending all haunt me. I never can decide if she made the right choice.
Good seller and great service.  Movie was in tip-top condition.  I got exactly what I paid for and appreciate that.
I JUST LOVE THIS MOVIE. THE PICTURED IS SO CLEAR.AND OLIVIA DE HAVILLAND DONE A GREAT JOB.ALL I CAN SAY IS BUY IT AND SEE FOR YOUR SELF
My cousin talked me into getting the movie.  She enjoys it and I finally watched it and also enjoyed the movie.
Great movie - been wanting it for a while - got this for myself - nice. Have not watched it all but will do very shortly. Love it .
The Heiress is a classic film, and its remake in 1997, called Washington Square, is also an excellent film.
If you like classic movies, then this is a must see and should added to your collection. Great movie and acting.
I could watch this movie a million times and never get tired of it.  Monty Clift was so amazing and so handsome and Olivia was at her very best.
always loved this movie. great story, and just ending to monty cliff character. great acting by all cast members, especially Olivia.
AGAIN, SOME MOVIES MADE MANY YEARS AGO ARE CLASSICS.  THIS IS ANOTHER ONE OF THEM.  HEART-WRENCHING STORY.  ACTING IS BEAUTIFULLY DONE.
De Havilland gives one of the greatest screen performances of her or any other leading woman's career and William Wyler has never been better.
Thanks for the fast service and excellent condition of the video!  They don't make movies like this anymore.  Thanks for having it available!
This is another of Lana Turners greats, she is superb in this movie.I could watch it a million times again!
The DVD replaces the VHS that first introduced me to this excellent movie.  I will always have it in my collection
I love anything dealing with history, however one must remember that it is a movieand will not following direct history.  It is a great story.
This is a fantastic mystery with incredible cameos.  Both a great mystery and fun on the way to finding out who did it and why.
This is one of my favorite movies.  If you don't know the actors, you may not see the humor in it.  Also not for those opposed to Fox Hunts.
Whoever decided to do this movie certainly did a great job(for it's time).Good plot, good screen writing and make-up job.
This is just a have-fun movie!  A enjoyable 2 hours with fun actors and characters.  The story kept my interest and the ending is so much fun!
This movie is very clever and has an amazing cast. If you are a fan of &#34;who dunnit's&#34; this is a must have for your collection.
Great deal and a great movie,I liked watching this movie with my friends.The plot is good and different,from normallicy.Great!!!!!! Movie
Great date night film.  Thriller with romance.  If you like Jeff Goldblum and his dead pan acting, then you will like this film.  Good classic.
Was very happy to find a movie I remembered from years ago.  I thoroughly enjoyed it, and have seen it again, numerous times.Thank You,
great movie from start to finish, sleeper movie when it came out , great plot,funny at times and serious also.
Awesome movie, by a couple of people who would hit it big later.  There are LOTS of cameos by other famous actors in here too, watch for them!
This is one of the best comedy/adventure/chase flicks ever made.  Lots of fun with some interesting twists.  Don't miss it.
This is just an overall great movie! It has been one of my favorites since I was little!! A++
Because this is a good story.  And it's based on fact, which is something I'm interested in. True life tales.
I had this movie on VHS and I love this movie Cher is great in it, I watched it all the time
This is the true movie Cher should have won the Oscar for.  I will never forget her remarkable performance.
This is a great but sad movie at the end and Cher was incredible in it!  Eric Stolz did a great job playing this incredible man.
I received this DVD in the mail promptly and in good condition. I gave this DVD to my sister for a gift and she loved it. Thank you.
Cher & Sam Elliot are Awsesome together. I love how Cher Stands up for her son, and in the End Changes for better.. So Much Luv for Rocky... Brave
This was one of my favorites when it first came out...it is still one of the best!
This is a very unique story. And the actors are great in this. I think both Cher and Sam were perfect in this movie.
This is one of those authentic movies that you will never forget. It's so sincere and the acting is amazing. Eric Stoltz and Cher delivered.
i have always enjoyed watching cher movies--this one was a really good show and i enjoyed watching it again after all this time
Cher is amazing in this touching film about motherly love. The picture quality is better than previous releases.Kalle Kennedy london
One of Cher's finest acting roles so natural. Gutsy, loving a powerful movie showing that difference doesnt change who you are inside.
This is a great movie is very heart warming one that should be on your list of must see.Cher does a great job and cast is great.
This was such a good movie. The ending made me cry. I have watched it so many times already. I would recommend it to eveyone.Thank you
I truly love this movie! It came in great shape and was not scratched! I love this movie as it is so inspiring! Would def recommend it to anyone!
this is an excellent movie, it'll make you cry. i think it's so good because it's a true story. loved it.
this is a great movie and based on a true story and very good to watch any timr you want
Great film and great stars in it. Enjoyed the director's cut. Had other parts than the one I had on VHS. Will watch it many times over.
Cher is at her best in this movie.  Heart warming, encouraging, uplifting and realistic.
One of the all time favorite movies ever I haven't seen this edition yet and can't wait to watch tonight
it was great i enjoyed watching a movie from the 70's I had forgot how good the movie was. I will have many hours of enjoyment from the movie
This is an absolute classic movie.  A must watch for movie goers.  Coen brothers artistic piece for sure.  Watch It!
this tribute to film noir of the 40s definitely does the genre justice. surpassed only by barton fink, this movie is creepy and engrossing.
My husband loves this movie so much that he purchased a copy for a friend who is a real movie buff.
THIS IS A GREAT CULT DVD TO WATCH AT LEAST ONCE A YEAR.  YOU GOTTA LOVE EMMET WALSH AS A CHARACTER ACTOR!
Excellent movie and a premonition of what the Coen Brothers would bring later (Fargo, et. al.} If you haven't seen it, I strongly recommend it.
Awesome adventure and Roger Moore is fantastic as always !Great story, well acted, funny, too.I received this order quite fast. Thank you.!!
Great Movie had to own it after seeing it in the 70's. Great Actors in this one. Love theses type of Scottish Adventure Movies.
This is a great movie and Roger Moore does a great job in this movie, love the ending, love Roger Moore!
when my kids were younger we saw this and thought it was a great show. We all love this show.
Still believable and timely.  I guess we will be getting back into the &#34;cold war&#34; attitude again !!!  Too bad.
This movie was on HBO over the weekend. I am definitely going to purchase this soon. Linda Fiorentino is so sexy in this movie.
Movie looks great! Cannot tell it is an old movie because play quality is great. Cover was in nice condition too.
I would recommend this movies to all my friend. This movie has suspense, drama and some comedy. an outstanding movie classic.
Love this movie. Hadn't seen it in awhile. Great 80s movie. now I have to see the rest of the movies!
Maybe I should just buy the DVD. I've seen this movie many times now (including rentals) and always enjoy watching it.
This is a classic and I love the film...shipped fast and in great condition....I like 2 and 3 also but this one is the best
I'd only seen this movie once before. Amazon instant viewing is awesome. Good quality on the picture, and good selection of movies.
Michael J Fox in one of his best roles. Great flick. and we are only about 2 years away from the cubs winning the world series and hoover boards
This is one of the all-time best, most enjoyable movies for ages 13 and up.  Our adult children know the wording by heart.
When this came out no one imagined people would still be talking about it and referring to it almost 30 years later. Great scott! Great fun!
This is a classic story for the times and will always be going forward. Fantastic story line, action, acting and music.
This might be old school but its good school! This show is funny as hell! Everybody should own this show period!
Always loved this movie, fun to watch and of course the actors who are in it really make this a good family film.  The trilogy is so much fun.
Just plain fun.  I love sci fi and I love this movie.  Please, watch it with your kids, pass it on before it loses relevance...
This is where it all began. This series is great and one of my first introductions to the sci-fi genre as a kid.
My son is a Back to the Future fan so he was glad to get this for his personal &#34;library.&#34;
Very creative and fun family movie that we enjoyed very much. The acting and storyline went hand in hand; highly recommend.
This was a gift for a friend, but it is a great, classic movie, and the receiver was ecstatic to receive it!
Always a fun movie to watch.  It never gets old. Purchase and downloading very easy.  Although it does take a little time to download.
Ihave chosen this rating this dvd because it is a very suspenseful but funny film. I enjoy Michael J. Fox and Christopher Lloyd as actors.
This movie holds up amazingly well after all these years. Marvelous economy of storytelling. Lively, committed performances. A joy to experience.
Anyone who knows Michael J. Fox knows this would be a great movie!  Very enjoyable.  Don't like the sequels but this movie is the best!
it reminds me of a child watchen the movie thats why i bought it it works great and in good shape
I personally enjoy this movie :) I would recommend this movie to anyone who enjoys a good movie and some great action from the 80's!
One my most favorite movies of the 1980's I highly recomend watching this :) This is also a good family movie too
This is a classic movie of the 1980's!! Just a fun movie that has some nice reenactments of the past!! Great movie for the whole family.
I purchased this to replace one I ruined tring to repair it. I wanted to keep a full set. I enjoy them all so much.
Talk about a classic. This is one of the many movies that should be required for viewing. It should never be remade, though sadly it probably will.
So fun and affordable. We had it on VHS and wanted to update our library.  Great movie! Worth purchasing for your library.
This was our Saturday night 'popcorn flick of the week'.  Pretty funny still, maybe a little corny.  IL&M special effects were awesome.
This movie is great for the family even 20 years after it was made.  Everyone enjoyed it 10 year old boy and us parents.
The 1st in a series of 3 movies made popular a few years back. I recommend seeing all 3 movies for fun, but this is a classic.
One of the greatest movies of our time,,, How can you watch this movie and not love it? impossible! this is entertainment at it's best!
This movie will just never get old for me.  I have loved it since the first time I saw it back in 1985.  Its a great movie.
Back to the Future is a hilarious movie full of great performances that is entertaining time after time; and it is relatively clean too.
I've wanted to own this DVD for so long.  Thank you for making it possible.
Enjoy the Flower Drum Song, when I first saw it I fell in love with it.  Always wanted to own a copy.  Picture quality is great!
Flower Drum SongThis is a classic everyone should have.  I love it. I received it with no problems.Thanks,Dana
I have always loved watching this movie on television and I am glad to have finally bought it for myself. Great quality and the service was good.
Wonderful songs and a classic tale of love realized.  I hope the next generation finds this movie and enjoys it as I do.
Probably one of the funniest and pleasant musical love story(ies) I had seen in awhile. Well acted and superbly sequenced.
I liked the music, the songs and the story. This is one movie you can watch with the whole family and not be offended.
Good story.  Good Music.  Good Acting by all including some little know actors and actresses.  Lots of laughs too.  I recommend it.
My daughter and I watch this just las night and we even watched the credits and really enjoyed the music. We both Love technic color.
I loved this movie and I can watch it over and over.  Nancy is so beautiful and the co-stars were great also.  Timeless movie.
Received quickly.  I haven't played the DVD yet, but it looks as though it's in excellent conditon.
It has a very strong cast and the screenplay is written well. The plot keeps you on the edge of your sit
great movie!  perfect  example of Governmental domination of the private lives of citizens.  Every child should have access to this movie
Great movie. Takes me back to the eighties. Funny and cool at the sametime. Got this movie from my daughter for Christmas. Love it.
its must to add to your collection its fun and great movie and funny kelly Laborke dose great job in this movie
This is such a classic and always brings a good laugh. Saw this at a friends and had forgot about it and had to have for my collection.
I never get tired if this movie! It's as fun to watch as it was twenty years ago. Terrific movie!
I loved this movie when it first came out in the 80's and to this day I still love this movie. I'm recommending this to all my friends young and old.
I remember seeing this as a kid every weekend. It's always funny to me! A Definate Classic.
This was one of my favorite movies in the 80's and still to this day.  Makes me laugh every time I watch it.
This is a cute movie... The boys created a dream girl for them selves only to discover what they wanted was there all along..
makes me think of bill the science guy i love this movie i grew up on movies like this they need to continue to make great movies like this
Video quality is far better than the dvd.  Sound quality is also good.  Special on the movie has decent video.
Was hoping this would be one of the VHS copies that had the original beginning, but it's still one of the greatest movies ever.
Great movie such a classic. Watched this all the time when I was younger.  The effects still look good and hold up even today.
It was funny from beginning to end. Some what reminded me of some of my friends growing up. What runs in the minds of young boys?
This is a classic.  I bought this and a few others for when my kids are in their teens.  If they don't like them, they can move out.
Great Movie, Dvd, or Film. That has a very sexy looking women in it. ( Kelly Lebroc)Anthony michel Hall also does a great job of acting in this film.
a great movie in this way even better and have fun watching it and watch how to do things and some magic
Damn good movie! So good they made a TV show.... Just plane fun and good times. Being a geek rules!
I watched and enjoyed  this movie. I help think of what I could do with my computer if I put it to work.
Love  Anthony Michael Hall. I was so pleased to be able to add this to our collection. Thanks so much.
We purchased the DVD Weird Science for our library.  It is a wonderful addition to DVD collection.  Thank you so much
I love this movie, this was a gift to my son.He was a small one when this movie came out.It was a preferred movie, that I approved of!
Great film, great soundtrack, nice and clear picture. I have missed this movie, and I'm glad I finally got it on DVD.
This is a movie that every young boy wishes he could do. This is just a good movie for the family to watch. Every girl wants to look like Kelly.
I grew up with this era and this movie never gets old. Kelly is so incredibly stunning as she has always been.
I love my 80's flicks!! It was like I remembered. I Loved it! What a Flashback!xoxoCate T. Nation
Love this movie. Brings back old time when I was a kid, well when I was younger . Thank you
This is an older movie, but I enjoy it every time I see it. The first part of the movie is hysterical!
I enjoyed watching the girl being made. It is all about the girl in this movie. They create something in their room. Something pops out of the floor.
The movie is a classic, I hope they do a quality Blu-ray transfer!  I'll update my review when it's finally released...
Xmas in july is a great and fun movie for all the fans of Dick Powellanybody that loves classic movies will love these movie-i highly recommend it
I can't believe Universal havent given this classic a DVD release date yet.
This was one of my favorite TV shows growing up, it would be nice to see it on video or DVD.
Doris Day and James Garner are hilarious in this delightfu,l old-fashioned comedy, basically stating, a women's place is in the home.
I wonderful classic movie.  I am thrilled that I can now watch it whenever I want.  A wonderful addition to my collection.
I was raised with Doris Day movies and this was the last one to get for my collection. If you like Her movies this is a must.
This is a cute comedy with two of my favorite actors: James Garner and Doris Day.  A very entertaining way to spend an evening.
This is a good movie, love Doris and Rock together. They are so funny.  Got this very quickly and reasonable price!
A must have for you Doris Day collection.  One of my favorites and watch it over and over and over...
Dorris Day movies are terrific.  Everyone person should watch at least one of her movies in their lifetime.  They will make you feel good inside.
Enjoyed this Doris DAy movie. received in timely fashion in excellent shape.  Will purchase from your co. again!!!
This is one of her best movies. It makes you laugh almost continuously. A must have for all Doris Day fans. I would certainly recommend it.
What is not to like about James Garner and Doris Day.  It is a period piece but very watchable. Enjoyed it.
This film is great for all ages and very funny! I watched this movie when I was little and I still love it today. Great buy for any Doris Day fan!!!
As usual for Doris Day, it is a good, lite movie. I highly recomend it.
Classic romantic comedy.  One of my favorites!  I would recommend this movie.  Great for whole family. . . . .
Great movie love doris day she is just wonderful actress in so many ways it is a great family movie
I love this movie. I have always been a fan of Doris Day and theher romantic comedies are fun to watch.
As with any of her films another mindless fun romp, always a joy to watch her and or listen to her speak or sing!
James &#34;Jimmy&#34; Stewart In My Opinion Was Always At His Best In Westerns. Bend of The River Equals His Best of Westerns.
I purchased this movie because I love westerns and James Stewart. James Stewart is a better western star than any other movie I have seen him in.
Bend of the River DVD works so good - great sound and picture.  The scenery is so beautiful.  I am so happy with this purchase!
A VERY GOOD 1940'S WESTERN WITH A TOP CAST DOING THEIR THING.  IT'S GREAT TO WATCH OVER AND OVER.JAMES STEWART WAS AT THE TOP OF HIS ACTING GAME.
This is an older movie but it is very funny and keeps you going wondering what is going to happen next.
Classic movie on DVD to replace my VHS copy in my collection. Heartily recommend to anyone who enjoys a good classic western.
Both actors are great and I love Mrlenes songs and dancing. Destry is so cool and shows them all some good shooting. Best Western around
Forget Gone With the Wind, this is my favorite film from that bonanza year 1939 - and much my favorite Western ever.
This is a classic with some great stars. Miss Stanwyck isn't a snake charmer, but, she has Mr. Fonda in the palm of her hands.  Well worth it.
Barbara Stanwyck is wonderful and the story is so fantactic that it makes for some good laughs.  Her clothes are beautiful in the movie too!
This is one of the greatest of the classic Hollywood comedies. Barbara Stanwyk is quite hilarious, and Fonda an excellent comic foil.
Gregory Peck and Sophia Loren running around London trying to solve a mystery and uncover so much more.  Another underrated movie I would recommend.
The movie is a wonderful classic and I loved the paring of Shophia Loren andGregory Peck.The sound and picture quailty were excellent.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE, IT WAS MADE WHEN MOVIES WERE GOOD MOVIES, NOT THIS NEW CRAPE HOLLYWOOD IS PUTTING OUT TODAY!
Gregory Peck is one of my favorites. Sophia Loren is inspiration. The story is a good one. The players make it better.
So interesting to see Shirley Maclaine and Michael Caine as young sprouts. Good, smart and absorbing fun for a rainy night.
Has 2 of my favorite actors in it,  It's tame comparded to todays films , just fun movie to watch, no real highs or lows.
geat movie, good depiction of what war is really like.  Nice to see Macdonald Carey in something other than days of our lives.
Great screwball comedy with great cast!  Enjoyed it on TCM and wanted a copy of my own to watch when I wanted.
Charming and funny old movie with twists and turns in an entertaining plot.  Interesting surprise ending.  I highly recommend it.
hilarious, but so fast paces, you may need to watch it twice to get it all.  Sturges at his very best
love this movie. Always get a good laugh out of watching it. If you've never seen it you should. Came in same caseing that most movies do.
Looks can be deceiving. Lots of people end up buying a money pit, but turn the ugly duck into a swan. Great movie with lots of laughs.
Except for the lack of cell phones, this movie holds up very well over time.  It's one of the few movies that makes me laugh out loud every time.
I loved this movie since I first saw it when I was a kid.  Now as an adult, I had to have it in my collection. It is fun, Tom Hanks is at his best!
Can't believe you'll never hear of this movie on any top-100 or like charts. One of the funniest movies ever.
Such a fun, joyful movie!  With all the problems they had the love still shown through it all!  Delightful for the whole family!!
Great movie and so glad to have it in my collection.  As great today as when it came out the first time.
My husband and I feel the same way on our house lol. Its why we love this movie so much!
This movie is a classic! It also still holds true to any couple trying to remodel. The phrase &#34;money pit&#34; is still used today.
A great portrayal and insight re: mental health issues ...w/ humor and dignity ...relevant re: PTSD in today's world ..
One of my favorite movies . A funny and touching movie for Chritmas or any other time. The actors, the script, everything was perfect.
This is one of my favorite vintage movies. I've been trying to find it for a long time. Great cast!!!
it was so great that it was closed captioned so I could understand what was going on with that movie.
I love Doris Day movies and this is one of the best. You can't beat the Doris Day, Rock Hudson, and Tony Randall trio.
One of the best movies EVER!  I can watch it again and again...such a classic!  HIGHLY RECOMMEND!  Enjoy this classic film :)
This movie is too funny for words.  Of course, Doris Day couldn't be cuter.  Tony Randall also makes this movie complete.
Doris Day and Rock Hudson together make the best romantic movies.  I love them. They end up making everyone feel great after watching.
I  love all Doris Day, Rock Hudson Movies and this one dose'nt disapoint.Check this one out for your self.
This is a classic movie with my favorite actors. Rock and Doris are a great couple with everyday problems. Loved it.
I love old Rock Hudson movies, and could not find this in stores.  This particular one is an all time favorite!
Bought this movie from DH. And we have enjoyed watching this over and over. Classic Rock Huston movie. It' will make you laugh.
Not one of Rock Hudson's best but what can you say without Doris Day.  Still it is a funny movie that can be enjoyed by the whole family.
It's an old Rock Hudson movie that I love.  The quality of the DVD is great!  I order most of my DVD's thru Amazon, good quality, great service!
This has to be one of his best comedic movies. If you have ever been around a serious fisherman, you have to get this one!
A must-have addition to any respectable DVD library.  The movie is good, and the DVD is a studio-issue so high-quality.  Recommended!
This is such a funny tale. The acting is very good. Some of the situations he gets himself into are really comical.
My mom loves this show, she got me interested in old movies, so if you want to laugh, this is the show to watch.
This movie is just so good and so very funny. Rock Hudson is so wonderful in this role (so is the entire cast). Very Highly Recommended.
One of my many "oldie" favorites.  Rock Hudson and Paula Prentiss are a good match.  Not a rousing comedy but a steady one.
Another romance I remember seeing in my teen years.  Had to order it when I saw it.  Paula Prentiss and Rock Hudson are great together.
This movie is hilarious.  I always enjoy Rock Hudson.  He and Paula are a really good team in this movie.
A novice fisherman ( Rock Hudson ) that flubs his way trying to catch fish for a tournament.  A good entertaining comedy for all.
Wonderful movie!  This is one of my favorite Rock Hudson movies, and I like them all.  I recommend seller a lot.
Excellent film with great actors.  Great price on new, hard to find film.  Will appeal to younger generation as well.
It is tame by today's standards but it is still a good story.  I was so glad to find it and of course, Amazon always has what I am looking for.
I grew up on monster movies Dracula with bela Lugosi this is a more light hearted performance featureing  Bela Lugosi
it is still a classic movie and just as good as I remember, love it. I  need to get the whole Frankenstein collection
A great movie that keeps you engaged the whole time. You can't go wrong with Robert Redford anyway.  Good mystery, but funny sometimes as well.
I may be a cheesy 80's movie but I love it!  I was so excited when I came across this movie. Just had to have it!
yes this another movie that the whole Family can enjoy its funny and great story to it too have you up in stiches lol
I really had to dig deep for this moive, and boy was i glad whe n i found it. It's a true must have!!!
this is an awesome movie this movie is so cool. the effects and the acting are great. this movie rules.
A funny comedy and a good movie.
I loved this movie as a kid. I wasn't sure if the kids wld like it or not but they did...
A Wonderful movie. Everything I remember it to be. I have enjoyed it from the first time I saw it VHS.
Fun, Bizarre, and Vulgar.  Check this movie out if you want to see something that breaks the movie mold.  I love it.
Howard the duck is a classic, I love this movie with every childish bone in my body. Its funny and kind of intense at the same time.
How could anyone not enjoy the Dark Overlord? Howard battles to save himself and as always, a girl. This has some funny and campy moments.
Great movie for the whole family!  This is another I watch over and over again because it's so entertaining and delightful!
I loved this movie when I was a kid. I was so glad when I found it. Now my children love watching it.
Highly recommend. Instant classic. Great movie a must have for 80's movie lovers. You have to have this in your collection.
weird film but I couldn't believe the duck _uck scene.... got me alittle excited... I must be a sick prick... Funny movie good price fast delivery
Very funny movie. I have a duck of my own. Not as funny as Howard, but he tries. It plays great as well. Thank you. You are a good seller.
When this first came out I was 10....this movie has been one of my favorites & I am surprized there isn't a DVD version of it. Why?
I like the movie. it was good to watch because they focus on doctor Frankenstein instead of the monster in the movie.
He play's a great deranged scientist.  This is his first and his best. Cannot forget his portrayals.  KARLOFF the Uncanny.
I have PLAYING FOR KEEPS on laserdisc And On dvd as well,'tis One Of My Greatest 80s movies :)
The All Nighter is One Of My Favorite 80s Movies ,,I enjoyed The dvd,You Will Surely Love it :)
this movie was pretty good.I had never seen this movie before.anyone that gets this will be pleased,it's an enjoyable movie.
This movie has always been one of my favorites I always enjoy Doris Day's performance.  Too bad she never got the recognition she so richly deserved
Doris Day was a great actor and he thrills in this movie.  It highly recommend it to lover's of Alfred Hitchcock.
This is a great film.  I have it on VHS.  Why isn't it out on DVD?  Let me know as soon as it is.
this is a complete concert by the doors from 1968 . the picture quality is not great but very good while the sound is top notch
This is just a great movie if you like old movies, Mae West is just wonderful she was so sexy and loved her attitude
Only two movies of Mae West were not heavily censored, this one and Im no Angel. Both are worth purchasing.
I am a big fan of Hayley Mills and enjoyed this film immensely.  She is a first rate actress. Wow!
My child has a middle name of Laurel after the character the girl played by Hayley Mills. She was my fave child actor.
Hayley Mills and Deborah Kerr are great in this movie. You should endeavor to see the movie as soon as possible.
He has make a new logo for surf boards, he a girl of his dreams. Romance happens to Rick, and turtle makes a big wave board! Great movie.
Grat 80's flick.  I guy from Arizona in a surf comp... brilliant!  If you love 80's movies you'll love this.
I forgot how good this movie was.  Even after 20 years this movie did not disappoint.  It was great getting to watch it on DVD.
its a fun movie to watch with family, its a feel good movie and you find your self rooting for the characters
This movie scared me to death when it first came out but since I love horror movies I had to have this one for my own.
Can't act. Can't emote. Can't do much at all but look knock down beautiful. She is Catherine Deneuve without any talent, except for turning you on.
Morgan Fairchild is a wonderful actress. This is a movie any woman can relate to. A must see movie.
Typical stalker fair, but with Morgan Fairchild sans clothes in the pool and bathtub it becomes a must see.
How I miss Charles Bronson's movies where he portrays the ultimate tough guy under control of all situations etc etc.
Had to search a long time to find this movie, but it was worth it.
I had been looking for this movie for a long time. it plays very good. its a good comedy I will take good care of it. its a classic.
Great movie I like the plot and it had great action. This is my favorite Michael Dudikoff movie than American Ninja and his other movies.
This is one of the best movies ever made!!!!!!! I could watch it over and over. Must see for the ladies that like romantic comedies.
This is another hard to find in the store Andrew McCarthy movie that just is good for the soul. Lots of fun and laughter with a happy ending.
This is a guilty pleasure movie. My favorite part I saw him doing awful things to a dummy. This is classic. One of Kim Cattrals best.
I love this movie, watched it a long time ago when it was first on and thought it was great.  I love it.
I would watch is every time I could find on tv. I thought as much as I like it why not buy the disk.
This movie is so so funny there is no comparison I've never seen a movie like this one before ever.
One of my favorite 80s movies. I'm typically not a fan of either of these actors, but they pulled this movie off well. Both very lovable.
I know this movie is completely unrealistic but it's perfect for a dreamer like me! I love having it in my dvd collection.
I loved this picture when was made... and now I loved more.Tessie Martinez
watched it a long time ago and i finally bought it!!! it's worth buying !! it's better then the second one
Very good Movie. If you like Charles Bronson you will like this movie. I Liked it very much course he is one of My Favorite Actors.
Norman Mailer's genius shines through with every scene.  Very entertaining and plenty of black humour.
It is a movie of it's time with Barbara a hot women.It showed up on time and in great shape.
The title says it all.  There will never ever be another like him.  Greatness & Grace in its truest form.
i like to watch these kinds of programs and it showsgood things we need to know about people places
This is a great movie with some great stars and a great western star Glenn Ford. Please some release this movie on DVD.
I would recommend this movie to anyone, but especially Barbara Stanwyck fans! It kept me intrigued and I wasn't sure how it would end.
thank goodness for the old movies...the garbage that is out there today is not worth watching!
The Court Martial of Billy Mitchell is a great movie that is rarely seen on tv. A must have, if you are into old movies.
This was the best of the old Republic Serials. Even younger audiences will enjoy this timeless classic.  I wish it would come out on DVD.
I just enjoy old cowboy & Indian films. Hggyi ugfgu giddy huffy ugfgu ugf ugf ugf it'd it'd it'd uh
I LOVED THIS MOVIE VERY MUCH AND HIGHLY RECOMMEND IT . I AM A LOVER OF OLD MOVIES AND THIS IS AT THE TOP OF MY LIST.
When you want a quiet evening of drama and mystery, something to drink, a comfy place to sit and away you go with Ms DeHavilland
It was fun seeing beautiful Olivia de Havilland playing two parts, and she did it so very well. Very entertaining.  The picture and sound were great.
Olivia DeHavilland is magnificent and the story is pretty good.  I remember it as a kid and it still holds my attention.
A wonderful plot! Great actors.Loved it! I remember seeingthis film years ago and it did notdisappoint me.
O. de Havilland is excellent.  The other actors are good  The photography is very good, with black and white emphasizing the right moods.
Humphrey Bogart is my favorite actor.  There is no bad Bogey movie.  The Enforcer is not his best-known film, but it is well worth your time.
DVD in great shape. Received within a few days of purchase. Glad to see that there was no profanity in the movie. Thanks!
I love Shakespeare and I love Roman history. This movie puts both of those together with an all star cast.
This movie really describes what is the sweet life.Fellini big fan??????????? BUY IT NOW!!!!!!!!!!
If John Wayne is in it, how can it be bad? Joan Blondell and the Duke make a pretty good pair.
I like movies about the Alamo and there are a lot of them ,lets me see it from other pointsof view.
Great setting, actors, and story. the premise was fascinating and spellbinding. Love a good old gothic tale in black and white.
needed a copy of this saw one in Amazon decided to buy it very happy with purchase just what I wanted
Finally came out on DVD. I've been waiting to replace my old VHS tapes. It was great to watch it again with all the extras thar DVDs have.
Great DVD, solid in every way. Lots of action. This isone of Roy's best movies, you'll love it.
Gregory Peck was one of the greatest actors in Hollywood. You have to see this one! What a great performance!
Excellent copy. This noir still holds up with the best of them. For fans of the genre, it doesn't get much better.
Great quality and in good condition.  I like Joan Bennet.  She really played a great part here.  I think this was her best performance.
the movie is excellent and I look forward to enjoying it for many years,and I hope to keep it around for posterity.
This video is a good classic. The quality was great and it shipped fast. My wife ordered it for me as a gift and the whole family watched it.
Another good addition to my library. It takes me back to the time I first saw this film, almost 60 years ago.
another good movie from old days all the leading actors and actresses gave excellent perfomances it was a joy to watch. thank you
If you like old Scotland, you will like this, good old fashioned film, the good old days, bring me icecream
Another  oldies series my husband likes. If you are a fan you'll enjoy too.
Back in the day a serial accompanied every movie at the theater. They usually lasted 12 or 15 weeks. This was an enjoyable one.
Brings back memories of the theatre on saturday!  Waiting to see the serials and Captain Marvel was one of them.
This was a real treat. Great quality and my girlfriend's Dad loves it. He's always talking about how much he likes it. And nice price too.
I saw this on TV as a kid and have always had a soft spot for the cheesy plot and clumsy dialog. This set is a good transfer.
This a very nice, rare musical  starring Fred Astaire and the very young Joan Fontaine before she became famous in other movies.
The casting is perfect, the story is timeless, the drama will bring tears to your eyes and the cinematography is phenomenal.  A+++
great movie about evanglism with the love, faith, and trust in Jesus. Being totally free in Him no matter what
Kindness and selflessness towards another is what it's all about.  I loved the story of what took place to aid another who was in dire straights.
A tribute to the wonderful Ten Boom family.  A classic for anyone interested in this period of history. Excellent performance.
I love reading about the Holocaust and this was another book that I added to my books that teach and inform and help me better know and understand.
I love movies and especially ones revolving around historic facts. very good
an incredeble movie and an amazing story of survival and courage that continues to live and give testimony in today's world.
This was a great movie and it has a little of everything in it. I just wish they would put it out on dvd.
THIS IS ONE OF BURT'S BEST. THE ACTING BY ALL INVOLVED IS EXCELLENT AND THE STORY LINE IS GREAT. THIS IS A CLASSIC BURT REYNOLDS.
BURT REYNOLDS IS VERY GOOD IN THIS MOVIE. NO DISLIKES.  IF YOU LIKE REYNOLD YOU WILL LIKE THIS MOVIE. OK
love the tv pilot series, grew up on star trek all my life. it was great series to watch, nothing beats the original.
this is a great episode but would be better to have it on DVD. this isnt from the digital remasters though either. still enjoyable
That's a special and more (review) of the beginning of Star Trek. I like this.
I think the last 17 mins. {of humor}. makes it  a buy, if you dont have it
Another episode on my Top 25 list. There's plenty of action
This movie is over twenty years old and still has stying power with it's fun and unique story. New and old viewers will fall in love with it!
This movie was actually remade into a movie called Down To Earth. I prefer this original version. I would recommend this movie to anyone!
Great acting, but the underlying theme of how our actions affect others and that there is another reality after life made it more enjoyable.
a good clean movie that is as enjoyable to watch the thirtieth time as it was the very first time
good cast, interesting story line, a little humor,  what's not to like? Despite its age, it has stood the test of time.
Well what can you say if you are taken before your time being put into someone else's life that's great.
I really been looking for this movie for a very long time. Its a great movie to watch over and over
Worth a watch if you have the spare time. Prefer the update to date version though. Nice movie Amazon Prime.
Love this movie!!  Maybe these things could really happen - who knows.  Everyone makes mistakes even in heaven it seems.
Love this movie. Just good old fun as well as a touching story. Great acting!
Yeah, wouldn't it be nice if life actually worked out so the good guys win? Notably un snarky, where being nice matters... sammy
One of my favorite older movies... It may be Warren Beatty's best one. At least one that he is not *too* much of an idiot.
Just love How Goldie Hawn and Chevy Chase Play Off Of Each Other.. Great Comedy, A Must see Movie For All Ages
I was raised on this movie and I love it . Chevy Chase in his old role it was worth buying it.
Really a funny movie and I saw long ago, but I just wanted it for my collection in my library.
I love Goldie Hawn - this is a great movie - some great laughs - You will be happy with this purchase.
This is my wife's favorite movies.  Just what she wanted for Christmas.  This DVD will be watched over and over.
I remember seeing this as a kid and loving every minute of it.  It is one of my favorite movies and definitely one of the funniest!!
This is one of the best movies that Goldie and Chevy made together! We get laughs every time we watch it! Buy it and you will not regret it!!!
Enjoyed the movie and will see it over and over again with family and friends. Lots of laughs . Very funny
This is my favorite Goldie Hawn movie.  It makes me laugh.  It came in good shape, and it arrived in a timely fashion.
Chevy Chase, Goldie Hawn and Dudley Moore at their funniest.  Fun plot, great SF area scenes, and good - easy to recommend! :)
Got it in great shape. This movie is so fun with Chevy and Goldie, who I think are great together. Love the old movies like this.
Some older movies you watch again and they really seem outdated. This one held up and is still worth having and viewing again.
What a great movie it is funny but also bit of suspense the charactors are great.  I would recommend this to anyone
A real classic comedy.  Goldie is hysterical in this movie.  Goldie and Chevy are a great team.  One of my favorite old movies.
A movie to watch for fun. Nothing earth shattering, but very enjoyable. One of my all time favorite movies
Goldie Hawn and Chevy Chase have done many movies together, but this one is by far my favorite of them all! I love the scenes with Dudley Moore.
Any one out there that loves comedy will love this.  Excellent , Beautiful scenery  of the San Francisco Bay area.John Fields
I purchased this as a gift for a friend who is crazy about both of these actors. Class, fun movie!
I love this movie.  I grew up watching all these movies.  Now I search to find all of them.  These are great 'old' movies.
This movie is an excellent comedy suspense thriller.  Loved seeing it in the theatre in 1978.  But:  $47 for the DVD is just plain ludicrous!!
We highly recommend this movie as it is funny and clean.  You will enjoy it, be entertained, and spend your time wisely.
This was a gift. But the recipient loved the film. The shipping was fast, the selling cost was reasonable. The movie is full of action and funny
This is movie has had one of the biggest cult followings so to get it at a great price and copy was amazing
this movie has a lot of action if you into gangs like colors, king of new york buy this movie
I saw this movie at a drive in.  Lots of action, great music and it is definitely a popcorn movie.
Thanks I enjoyed the movie and my library has another classic in it's the inventory. Thanks a million for the memories.
Loved this movie when it came out years ago.  Still very entertaining and creative.  Watched it with my 12 year old daughter and she enjoyed it.
GREATEST STREET GANG MOVIE EVER.... THIS ONE IS A CLASSIC..IT CHANGED AMERICA
One of the best movies ever on Blu Ray?  Hell yeah I'll sign up.  Nice to see.  I've probably watched this movie over 100 times.  Can you dig it?
The Warriors is a cult classic,with many legendary quotes and lines and the fights made the whole movie what it is
excellent movie. i watched it back in 79 also. great actors . would like to see a part 2 to this
I wish they would release the original in Blu-Ray or DVD. There are some films that are better left alone and this is one of them.
This was a great find!Thanks so very much!  My husband was so thrilled to receive this as a gift!Terrific purchase!
This was a gift for my brother and he really loves it.
SUPERIOR CLASSIC ....WARRIORS LEGENDS
this movie was just outstanding the characters were so cool and Michael Beck was just spectacular I loved this movie
This was a birthday present and it was exactly what I had in mind. I would highly recommend this product.
Cult classic! Come on...it's the Warriors...You want it...just buy it already. Hopefully Hollywood WILL NOT remake this and ruin it.
I have always liked this movie. I like to watch it every once in a while! Just very visual and visceral.
My nephew loves this movie, bought it for him to keep, I know he would rate this movie two thumbs up
it is one of the best movies I had seen back in the day, everyone needs to see this movie
This is one of my favorite movies of all time & it is interesting to watch what 'The Warriors' go thru.
I just love to watch this movie when nothing is on and I need to be entertained for a couple of hours.
Saw this years ago and try to find it on whenever I can. The directors cut is really good. Made the transition to bluray with no problems.
TCM should be reading these reviews cuz this stuff is awsome. they just dont make these anymore.
this movie is entertaining if you like american gangs, very good story line and great lovable characters. a good thumbs up.
Have always enjoyed. Watching the Warriors come out and play.... Must see classic if you have not seen it yet.
My brother loves his DVD, thanks Amazon.
I watched this as a when it first came out and now have the dvd thanks for the bring back some good times.
Seems I have fallen behind in so many reviews of items I have purchased hope this will count for you thank you
OWNED THIS MOVIE ON THE CED VIDEO DISC BACK IN THE 80'S, AND FINALLY GOT IT ON DVD. STILL A GREAT ACTION MOVIE ALL THESE YEARS LATER.....
i like james remar as an actor..wanted to see him in an early film...was a good movie for it's time...
Another movie which should be under CLASSICS!!! Should be in everyone's collection of movies!! If you haven't seen - buy this !!
I enjoyed this movie and have watched it many times.  It is one of the best films of the 70's
Good price great movie.Why do I need sixteen more words when four are all that's necessary? Still four more words required.
Cast is star studded.  This is a fun movie.  No message, lots laughs..I laugh from beginning to end.  This is a laid back enjoy me movie!
Yes, Goin South did meet our expectations, it is a great, funny, movie with an irrepressible cast...always a pleasure to watch...Eths
love this movie.  usually shows on tv with standard vision vice hd.  great seeing it the way you would like to see a movie.
Jack Nicholason and Mary Steenburgen both did a very good in their roles in this very funny western movie.  Great
Great cast and overall good movie!  If your a fan of Nicholson or Belushi, it's a must have for your collection.
very good
Shows a younger Jack Nicholson and a new upstart, Mary Steemburgen.  Very good acting and storyline too.  Would recommend to friends.
With Christopher Lloyd, John Belushi, Mary SteenbergenVery Funny Movie - I should have bought this L-O-N-G ago Comprenda Pardner
We never get tired of seeing this fantastic comedy - this is the one movie that you'll grab if you want an evening full of laughs!!
How can I not love it with a cast which includes the likes of Jack Nicholson, Christopher Lloyd, and John Belushi.  It's a great comedy!
Even if westerns are not your thing , and they aren't mine, you gotta see this if you like Jack at all !
A strange movie to say the least but definitely interesting. Not a typical Cowboy movie. Filled with twisted humor throughout.
great movie, great transfer cant wait for 2 and 3 to make it to blu-ray in the states. classic movie
Watching this movie in home and a 120 inches screen it was like watching in theather for the first time. You'll be agree with me
this a movie that has become a classic for me!I never have enough of it. I watch it about once a year!Good show!
This is an enjoyable classic.  While not for everyone, if you enjoy the comedy of Eddie Murphy, this is worth your time.
Eddie Murphy is at his best, the story is compelling and I watch it regularly as a result. Thumbs up to Amazon prime for giving me this opportunity.
A funny movie and Eddie Murphy pulls off keeping it funny throughout.  A must to add to your library.  And Patty Labelles hit is fantastic
ol movie but still funny. Eddie Murphy does a wonderful job as  a cop.can see why more movies were made.BH-2 , BH-3
First of the series and the best of the three. Action is great and a some comedy to lighten the theme of the movie.
Beverly Hills Cop finally is on Blu Ray. Great PQ and a great movie. This is Eddie Murphy when he was at his best.
I can watch this movie over and over again. It is classic. I am Glad amazon has it on Prime.
A savvy Eddie Murphy and a clumsy Judge Reinhold.  This movie was very popular at release and is still a fun retrospective.
Had to finally purchase (again) the first one Beverly Hills Cop 1 just love this one worse while watching and keeping
This movie is very funny.My friend suggested it to me, and it was great. Very good stuff.
Great trip down Memory Lane to revisit the Land of the Lost 80s. It was fun to go back in time for a night. Fun viewing.
here are two unlikely heroes that butt heads all through the movie with lots of laughs and lots of not getting along
These two actors are at their best in this movie. Once again, Eddie Murphy is awesome in these type of roles.
Dear weelchair Assassin: There IS a sequel to this, called "Another 48 Hrs.", & it's EQUALLY GREAT!!!
Nick and Eddie what a combo! Funny, scary, real, all at once. Get it now! You won't be disappointed! Woooeeee!
Classic cop and bad guy movie. Murphy and Nolte are great together. Lots of action, good plot and laughs too.
I can only say that if I had a choice to buy this again or not, I would without hesitation!  I'm glad I did this time around!
Buddy movies ever made! Funny, sharp, suspenseful. Nolte is classic and never better in my opinion. Eddie singing Sting?!Roxanne!
You have to have lived with the cartoons to fully enjoy this movie. I love it and I also like the music. Pooh to critics who knock it.Bob
We have not seen this in years  we love the movie then and we love watching it again if you like these kind  of movie I would rent this
Robin Williams does a stellar job as the famous Popeye in this classic.  A good movie for people of all ages, very entertaining
Robin Williams was wonderful in this movie as Popeye the Sailor Man! A very funny epic battle with Bluto over the skinny Olive Oyl!
Very satisfied with the product.  The delivery was prompt and the product was flawless.  Thank you.
One of my favorite musicals I feel this was really well done. This is probably one of my favorite Williams roles.
the best movie played  great and so clear for our screen by the way the timing great and great packing Thank all for such a good time
This movie is very funny. I recommend it to everyone, especially adults who remember the old Popeye cartoon series.  The casting was amazing!
A good film. Robin Williams is very good in Popeye The intrigue is built well.  We pass by quite the ranges of emotion. It's like the comic books.
you may have to pay a tax to watch this, fun movie and you will love to eat your spinach! Glad to eat a hamburger and pay you you Tuesday!
Really enjoyable and robin williams at his best, suitable for young and old viewers, one to watch again.Just a good film.
Im a shelley duvall fan and remeber watching this movie as a kid and love watch it when I can with my family.
Had this on VHS tape. Had to get rid of VHS player and wanted a copy on DVD. Very funny movie.
If you don't have this in your DVD library, shame on you... SHAME! Rubber tentacles? C'mon! Buy it, it's like a penny.
This is a great kids movie,and was entertaining. If Popeye were real, this would be a 'strong' country! Ha ha ha
Groovy!  Reliable s Star Trek goodness!  You can always count on this cast for amazing entertainment.. Never a let down.
The best of the series.  Great acting and story.  I like the new adaptation but I like this one better.
The title says it all!!The very best of all of the Star Trek films.
I absolutely enjoyed the movie. It portrays how a person can succumb to the emotion of rage and anger. All the characters were gr8.
This is infinitely better than the first. Good story line. Better acting. Keep watching the movie series. Watch the series Enterprise too.
The only Trek is the one with Shatner.  I do not like the &#34;new&#34; Trek. These were great to add to my collection.
The best of the early series of movies. Good to go back and see the original cast. Khan was such a great villain.
First let me say that I am not a Star Trek fan, I watched this movie for the first time and I really enjoyed it.I am a fan of Ricardo Montalban
It was notable from the series that they did a follow up movie excellent movie once again I am an trek fan.
Its one of the best star trek movies they made. To see recardo montalban again older was great to finish old story.
A trilogy must have a beginning, and this one was it for my three favorite films in the Star Trek series.
Have seen this one several times and will probably see it again someday.  It's one of the best Star Trek films ever!
again, a Treky item must have - Director's cut with extra footage and extremely well done.  Sticks to the story line of the original series
Maybe the best of the Star Trek movies!  Blends storyline from TOS and the movies.  HD streaming is excellent for both video and audio.
One of the best classic star trek films ever.  Great cast.  Great action.  Great story.  Worth the time to watch it.
What makes this movie great is the conflict between Kirk and Khan and the fact that it's a sequel to an episode of the show. Cool stuff.
One of the best Star Trek Movies still to date, and sure do like the new ones as well but this oldie is a good one!
This Blu-ray version has much better sound and a lot cleaner picture than the original 1982 DVD pressing. I am glad to add it to my collection.
An epic story that has yet to be topped by any of the other Star Trek films. A must see.
So well done, this movie picks up where the television Star Trek episode, The Space Seed, left off. Well worth the watch.
This is a fun movie and anybody that likes Trek should watch it.  It will tell you the truth about Khan.
Seeing Khan in digital quality was great. Even for an older movie, still great quality, for both visual and storytelling.
Love the probability of Star Trek and Beam me aboard Idea.  Plus it is and  action packed movie makes it a a great movie.
This is the first awesome Star Trek movie (actual first one is terrible).  Don't got it? Get it! Music is BOSS!
AWESOME! IT MATCHES RIGHT THERE WITH THE NEW MOVIE &#34;INTO DARKNESS&#34; WILLIAM SHATNER & LEONARD NIMOY ARE STILL THE BEST.
Another excellent Star Trek movie.  Recommendation....see this first before seeing &#34;In Search of Spock&#34;Recardo Maltoban is an excellent star.
Wrath of Khan was the BEST of the Star Trek movies with Shatner and Nimoy!  A true classic from start to finish!
Best Star Trek movie! I love it. The story line, based of the TOS episode Space Seed, was ingenious and creative. Thank you Nicholas Mayer
It is definitely worth having the two disc special edition.  It's Star Trek, so what's not to love with it?
a, &#34;MUST HAVE&#34; for that serious Star Trek enthusiast.  i have had the VHS copy, DVD copy and HAD TO upgrade to BluRay due to my needs.
I think this is one of the best Star Trek movies ever made in my book of Star Trek Movies. Great story telling and so much more. 5 stars.
the best of all the Trek films!
Perfect audio and video clarity.  It is a very convenient way to view what has become a classic Star Trek film.
Great old school Star Trek. The best one in my opinion. If you like Scfi this is a must see
Recardo Montebaum is truly amazing as Kahn. The tech is kind of cardboard, two dimensional, and dated, but the characters are so rich!
A wanted gift for a special friend, who will be blessed to have this DVd. I am glad that I got it for her..
Not His Best But Classic Time era of a Simple American Story of What was a real way of Life and still is today !
One of the last Steve McQueen movies. Old style movie that is very good. I enjoyed the movie even though I had seen it on screen years ago.
I've always been a Steve McQueen fan and I remember this movie from the time it came out, and I was very happy to add it to our collection.
Steve's last movie. He was dieing but this movie shows both his softer side but also his comedy side too. Just a good basic movie that entertains.
Grease is like the bestest friggen movie ever. I LOVED IT. LOVED IT LOVED IT.
I love Grease II too,'tis one of my Favorite Rare Laserdiscs and I bought it on DVD too :P
My special needs daughter will only watch certain movies and ONLY on VHS.  This movie is one of her favorites.
Bought this DVD to replace my mom's VHS as this is one of her favorite movies. Love the story, good deal. Very happy!
This film is utterly fantastic love all the dancers actors music everything about this movie is purrfect...!!! FLAWLESS AWESOME GREASED~OUT~DUDE
love love love this movie even more than the first.. a total cult classic! so bad it's good! COOL RIDER!
grease 2 is an awesome sequal to an amazing film. While they switched this up they also stayed true to the style of the first.
Definitely not an Academy Award winning movie but fun to watch with my daughters , silly songs that stick in your head
Loved the songs in this movie and wanted it on DVD. Got here fast so could enjoy it on our long weekend at the coast.
This is Burt Reynolds at his best. Jill Clayburgh is fabulousl. Charles Durning and Francis Sternhagen give their usual stellar performances.
A great, funny movie. At long last, on DVD. Now we need more of Jill Clayburgh with An Unmarried Woman on DVD!!!
It gives a look inside of what it was like to be on THE ROCK.  Well written and produced.  Clint Eastwood at his best.
the service was super i order it one day the next day it came.  i did not watch it but the case is in great condition and this is not a bad price.
one of my favorite clint movies, very suspenseful, easy to watch, my only beef is that the escape felt too easy..
A nice addition to your movies. A good classic movie to add to my movie collection. Quick shipping with a good price.
Good and gritty old style movie suspense! Well thought out escape plan proved to be all Alcatraz could take. Even got the goat of the Warden too!
I remember watching this movie numerous times and now I am pleased and excited to know that they have released it DVD..
what a excellent classic  to have found always wanted to visit there just to see what its like not to do time
We have watched this movie several times andfinally decided it was time we owned it.It's just a classic in the Eastwood style!
A true story of a horrible prison &the great escape.really a well made film.a movie even your mother would enjoy.watch this film
A fantastic movie, not the typical Clint Eastwood flickbut a great performance. Good supporting actors plus a plotthat just doesnt quit.
I was great to watch...I've been on the Alcatraz tour and this movie brought back some memories.Its ALWAYS great to watch a Clint movie...
this movie is based on a true event and with a good cast of actors it brings a real look at inside the island prison!GOOD MOVIE!!GOOD STORY!!!!
love this all time favorite how a prisoner escapes the prison but it would have been nice if i owned a region 1 DVD player but okay thought
Love this movie, one of Eastwood's best films...Hard to find in any store..A must see..a musthave...glad to find it on DVD
I enjoy his westerns and his other movies as well as this one. I also like his dirty harry ones too.
Bought as a gift from someone's wish list.  They are a great Clint Eastwood fan so collect a lot of his movies.
The movie was in great condition and I received it sooner then I though.  i did receive it just as it was described.
a good movie of him you can teach and learn and lean what not to do and how it was there
Amazing movie, amazing acting, amazing story. Clint Eastwood is really cool, the  movie was perfect and very entertaining, I enjoyed it very much.
Clint Eastwood rocks, it is about a bank robber who is in prison and attempts to escape. Awell made movie, if you have not seen it, buy it.
This movie keeps you interested with the distinct characters.  Love learning the cleverness of these desperate felons to prevail escape.
I love the suspense leading up to the escape and the ending really stirs the imagination on whether they actually made it across or not!!
Clint lead all the way in this way.. really enjoyed watching it second time.. wish it was little faster but other than that no issue with the story
One of Clint Eastwood's best films. Awesome true story  and I for one believe he escaped. If you have not watched it, do so.
One of the best biographical movies I've ever seen. Excellent acting. Sometimes scary. The picture on the front cover is intriguing.
This movie is a classic and legendary.  It's a movie that will endure the test of time.  A must have!
I think I wacth this moive 4time this is a very good moive and the actor where very good ackor
Dunaway does a good job, The story is compelling, and well written. Photography is crisp and vivid, which brightens the sadness of the whole story.
Camp classic generations will adore. One of the best movies about Hollywood that will be admired for years. I loved it.
This movie is one of my favorite Faye Dunaway movies. Whether you belive the book this movie is based on or not, it is a good movie.
Great movie, I am glad to have it in my collection.  It is one of my favorites.
GREAT MOVIE ABOUT CULT CLASSIC JOAN CRAWFORD, I LOVE THE PEPSI SCENE, AND YOU WILL TOO, BE SURE TO BUY THIS ONE!
This is a true story, I've watched it a few times and would recomend it to anyone. the movie is really good .
Faye Dunaway is perfect in this role no one could have done this role at all!!
This is one of my all time favorites.  The story line we keep you captured from beginning to end.  A must see
its the greatest movie of all times. I love the movie. I recommend this movie to everyone who liked Joan Crawford. this tells you her life story.
ive been wanting this on dvd so i got it its one of my favs i bet the wire hanger sene was hard to do a must have
The Best King David on film, Richard Gere did a bang up job, true to the scriptures in detail and great acting, I highly recommend this rendition.
It's a nice  comedy drama with tatum o'neil & kristy mcnichols two high gilrls at summer camp with lots of fun.
I love this movie and I don't get why it is still not available to buy on DVD or download.
LOVED IT i got it for my mom cause she wanted to watch it with me. they also sent a DVD copy so it was awesome
Had to have it, for my TRAVOLTA collection !!!! This is a GREAT movie, loved the dancing, John has the moves & the BODY !
So cheesy, yet pretty entertaining .. if only for a lot of good laughs! What the HAY kinda play is that, you'll say .. over and over again!!
Love John Trivolta and his dancing is excellent.  The story is simple and tends to be a little bland, but the ending is fantastic.
Great condition.I've been looking for this one for years.Thank you for the pricing and quality.The CD was clean.Thanks!!!!!
I really like this movie,better then what was written about it.Nice to see Travolta's Tony,in the future.Nice story,and for me good acting.
Awesome follow up to Saturday Night Fever.  I love Fiona, who was in General Hospital.  Loved the dancing!  Fun to watch!
Surely you can't be serious if you never seen or like this movie freaking classic I don't care what any one says a must see trust me
airplane is so funny, i dont even know where to star becasue its always a joke
How can one of the top 10 funniest movies of all time get anything less than 5 stars? Do you really need a review?
This is a great comedy, and it did not seem dated at all.  Classic lines.
This movie is always funny. It was great. Got here in a good timing. Came in great packaging. Played great
This movie is an 80's classic. Everytime you watch it, you notice another hilarious scene. My favorite is when that lady speaks Jive.
This is the best of the Airplane series. In my opinion it is the only one. The others all went down in flames by comparison.
this is a classic everyone should have one.  this is the second or third one ive bought cuz no one returns the ones I lend out.
Packed full of all the jokes you grew up with and repeat on a daily basis. Incredibly funny and well written movie.
As long as you are willing to accept a little bit of outlandish humor, you will love this movie! It is a classic and super hilarious!
Perhaps the funniest movie ever made. Need I say more
this is really funny movie you will ever watch. I couldnt stop laugh. You have to watch the whole movie to understand and laugh.
Hilariously funny !  One of the funniest films, ever !  Clever dialogue that will have you cracking up. Highly recommended.
And in HD it's even better - the picture is 100% clearer than regular DVD. Anyone who loves the movie will appreciate it.
A must have for cult classic comedies! Right up there with Young Frankenstein, one of my all time favorite cult classic comedies.
these are Comedy Classics's, all the hidden lines and such and parody's too funny a must have and see keeps you laughing
The best and first spoof flicks of all time!A must see for any comedy fan.-jp
I really love this Movie one of the best comedy Movies really good Actors the quality is pretty nice! love it
One of the funniest movies of all time.  I look at it as a classic.  I watched it with my 9 year old son.  We both laughed our A$$es off!!
This has always been one of our all time favorite movies. It's a laugh a minute, at least. I Recommend it.
This movie is so goofy.  It has a lot of classic quotable lines.  It is a very funny old school comedy.
Says it was used, I don't think it ever was. Disc plays very clean and box looks new. No complaints.
This movie is one of my favorates so much to laugh about it just keeps you laughing.Cant seem to watch to many times.
Silly but funny, and the laughs last through many viewings - even though its now 30 years old. Also like having Kareem as a sidekick instead of O.J.
The unique, silly humor in this classic is a guaranteed laugh a minute RIOT!So much social commentary in this.  A laugh-a-minute LITERALLY!
The Zuckers (along with Ramis) are the Martin Scorseses of comedy films. This one was way ahead of its time. Great laughs.
This is one of the funniest movies ever. It is still funny every time I watch it. It is a great movie to add to your collection.
This is probably one of the funniest movies of all time. It is not politically correct...and at times a bit vulgar.
It's one of the funniest movie i have ever seen...thanks to directors,producers and the casts for their performances...it's really funny..
One of the most original comedies from the 80's. If someone likes this categorie this movie is a must have in private collections
This movie is a hoot!! There are so many famous people in it and the satire, puns, and jokes it is one of the funniest movies I have,
This has got to be one of the best comedy movies ever made. The slap stick is first rate and the word puns are second to none!
An old classic that I wanted my kids to see.  Still filled with plenty of laughs and can be enjoyed time and time again.
About as close to a perfect comedy as you can get. The lines come so fast you hardly have time to breathe. An absolute classic!
I love these Airplane movies, so funny. I could watch these for hours and never get bored of it. Classic.
Very funny, a classic in humor and turning a phrase. Very witty. Need to pay attention to get all the subtle jokes.
This movie will always be on my list of must see screwball comedies...a classic laugh out loud which will stand the test of time!
this is really funny movie, and this is a special DVD with a special commentary and trivia, watch the red mark!
One of the greatest comedies ever! It will stand the test of time unlike 90% of the crap that is out in theaters now. This is hilarity at its finest!
This movie is a classic. Even though some of the references are some what dated it is still very funny and one of the best comedy films ever.
I hadn't seen this movie in a dog's age and watched it again recently.  It's still funny, though the younger crowd may not get the references...
Cleaned up look, fast paced and well directed/acted....great way to spend a couple of hours.
always wanted this movie - it is not so great, but the history of the situation can been seen in many movies
The scene where Beatty and Keaton find each other in the crowded train station is a classic cinema moment. I loved this film.
A great lesson in history and a wonderful love story.
This film gives great insight into a time that our nation chooses to forget. The mixture of the eyewitness testimony and the film is awesome
not much yu can say. reds was probably one of or the greatest films of all times.
I have loved this movie for years but had to watch it on vhs  because it was never on dvd  now that is history as this dvd is great
An amazing true life story about an amazing human being!  Excellent performances by both Anthony Hopkins and John Hurt.  A must see movie.
This movie is a masterpiece in my opinion. Anthony Hopkins is brilliant and the man that played Merrick is brilliant. A real tear-jerker.
When I first saw this movie I was entranced with the touching story of John Merrill; I had to hve it in my video library.
Classic movie.  I couldn't wait to actually see this one.  I loved it.  Excellent older movie.  Disfigured man trying to fit in.
I loved this movie it's so sad at the end of itquick delivery of this movie and the movie was brand new
this is one of my most watched movies . just like it was at the movies . an a great price too.
I loved this movie!!!This is by far the best of all the dragon movies that i have ever seen!The action and special effects were wonderful:-)
I like this creative and inventive magical story when it first came out. It is still as charming a movie now as it was then.
No great extra features included with the DVD, but still an awesome film non the less. A great addition to the collection.
This is some proper old school fantasy stuff.Puts me in a Dungeons & Dragons frame of mind.Loved it!
This movie is a classic and I really enjoyed it in HD. I would tell anyone who enjoys movies of the type to check it out!
Before Game of Thrones and (Peter Jackson's) Lord of The Rings, there was Dragonslayer. A must see for fantasy fans.
I love me some dragons and this was a good dragon movie a real must see if you like dragons
For an early 80's movie the graphics are awesome. this goes up there with willow, the never ending story, and other such films, perfect for the kids
Every time i see this movie, i don't regret it. i think it's wonderfully done, and the story is great. it's a timeless classic dragon movie!
Hard to find, remember movie as a kid and never saw it at the video store,, probably the best hollywood dragon evermade.
This is on one of the best ever made.  You love dragons, wisards anddamisels in distress this the movie for you.
great movie... but was a gift for my sister... she loves this stuff more than me.  Also got her the whole collection
the first chapter of one of the most important saga of all time!!! The Jason history. Welcome to Crystal Lake!
Great movie, i like the spooky atmosphere. If anyone is interested in Friday collectables email me on taylor5821@hotmail.com
If you are a Friday the 13th fan, you HAVE TO HAVE this original in your library.  What a classic movie, love it!!!
Finally got the first 3 movies on Blu ray and I'm not disappointed.  Freaking love these movies...the uncut version just rocks.  Outstanding!
So, So GLAD to have this in it's UNCUT form...... The sound is crystal-clear and the cinematography is lush and engaging
It was stylish and original. Mrs Voorhies on her killing spree.I will recommend this to everyone.
I love every part of Friday the 13th ! This is a classic film from the 80's culture, it's really scary !
Thank you Amazon Instant Video for carrying TONS of awesome titles when I want to see them, instead of a bunch of junk
delightfully creepy. this movie still chills my blood. shared it with my nieces who had yet to see the film and they enjoyed the plot tremendously.
Very good movie. I liked the storyline better than the original one. Jared Padalecki did a great job. I would recommend it.
brand new, works great. good movie has a little bit of every thing, funny and sad, and good. got the movie fast very reliable to deal with. thank you
Love it still today as much as I did almost 30 years ago.  Phenomenal!  Cried as much as I did all of those years ago as well!
Very well acted, never overdone.  I had a heartfelt weepy time watching it - never got to see it first time around.
Hit close to home, and I'm sure anyone watching could identify.  A real tear jerker.  If you're feeling like a good cry, this is the movie for you.
Just as good now, or even better than when we first saw it way back when.
A perfect movie. Brilliantly written, acted, directed. It makes me sad but I still watch it over and over because it is incredible
Fantastic movie! Sound track was outstanding. Walter Matthau and Jill Clayburgh had some nice chemistry going throughout the movie! Loved it!
Had seen the movie on television, enjoyed it, wanted to have a copy to watch.
This is a movie I could gladly watch over and over again.  Walter Matthau never gives a bad performance, and this one was great.
This is a fantastic movie.  I see it EVERY YEAR.  It reminds me of people in our government that were really moral, caring, and intelligent.
stimulation for your mind and entertainment for your spirit, filled with lots of comedy old fashioned style, very enjoyable, try it
received dvd quick need to read the book and watch the movie so you can see what these secret organizations can do to harm people thanks thomas
I was thrilled to get this movie.  I saw it when it came out, many years ago, and have wanted to see it again.  Thank you.
I thank God every time I pick a good gay movie. And this was a good one. Acting was a bit campy but acceptable. Good and believable story line.
This one is far better than the remake. It is what a true horror movie that horror fanatics will love
Looks great.
I am so happy to finally find this movie on dvd.  I have wanted it for years.  Good classic scary movie
this movie is really creepy. i liked the old version and the remake of the movie. there was a plot twist and i really liked it.
This movie was really good. They don't make them like this anymore. They need to go back to this formula for making slasher films.
I BEEN LOOKING FOR THIS MOVIE FOR A LONG TIME IT NOT THE ONE I WANT BUT I STILL WANTED TO ADD IT TO MY COLLECTION GLAD YOU HAD IT.
Very pleased with my purchase. It was like new. Now I have both the original and the re-make. I enjoy both versions.
I have FLASHDANCE on LASERDISC 'tis a great Music MOVIE back in 1983,,A MUST SEE :p
Great movie.  Everyone will enjoy this movie.  Well done and it even plays well on this free player that amazon makes us use.
Even though Jennifer didn't do the dancing, I don't care.  The dancer who performed was fabulous.  And the male lead is yummy!
I have always loved Flashdance and this was a gift for a friend.  Can't wait to watch it with her.
Great music beautiful actress good storyline. and single girl with beautiful pit like me;)  great oldie that i can watch over and over
This movie is one that harkens back to a time of good romance & has extra with great dancing.  Jennifer was outstanding.
I just have to have this movie.  I am slowly buying movies I like on DVD.  On most occassions, I also buy the CD.
The music is awesome in this movie and I love the dancing. Shows you everything from original, descent bar dancing to ballet.
A splendid &#34;feel good&#34; film.  You keep pulling for the young heroine and wanting to give her a good spanking occasionally.
I'm a guy.I like girls.I like rock 'n' roll music.This show has it all!I recommend it for guys like me.
nice to see jennifer beals as a younger actor still has al the good looks many years later. one hot lady
One of the 80s classics that I love.  An inspirational dreams come true movie with a love story too.  Would recommend to anyone.
This was one of my daughters fav movies when growing up so she's getting a new copy for Christmas to update her DVD lib.
Love this movie, 30 years of this movie and still going strong... A must buy and Micheal Nouri still is handsome
It is a romantic film for people who love dancing.  It's a girl dancer at a night club for men who want an audition at a ballet academy.
I love dance movies and this is no exception. The dvd still works great. I bought this a couple of years ago I think.
I love the movie  it is exciting and I saw it a few years back and it was just as good this time a great theme and  just heart loving movie
great  film just love the music and dancing great acting from Jennifer Bealslove the movie I love the movie
this movie is awsome - it is a 80's classic -  if you love 80's movies and music - watch this
This one has it all- a good storyline, good acting, memorable characters, and introduces our favorite killer- Jason.
the movie is really good.  it is a good movie to get if you like the Friday the 13th franchise.
This one is better than the first. Still at a Camp, Still murdered one by one, still good!!
Steve Miner and the rest of the gang did a wonderful job.A great horror film!
This time.... Jason is the killer. He dosen't wear the hockey mask yet. I liked the way he killed everybody. What a great movie!
perfect for a gift. great classic movie. great story line. I bought this for a person who loves horror films and I'm sure he will love it
I think that part 2 is the best of the series. A must have in your collection !!!!!!!!!!!!
dvd came much quicker then the promise date and looked brand new.thanks for taking care of a classic dvd and handing it down.
He is as hard as they come. Mayo is going to beat Foloy. Mayo wants to the best Navial Aviator, he won't D.O.R.
only heard of this movie before, but absolutely loved it after watching it just once and found it to be much better than expected
Love the movie.  Any Richard Gere fan must have this in their collection.  Story shows how someone can make a difference in their life.
This is one of those movies you do not forgetit is a classic and i have wanted it in my collection for years.
I loved this movie when I was younger and I still do. It is one of my all-time favorite movies.
Also one I loaned out and never got back!  I re-ordered this one too.  It won't be loaned out this time!
Officer and a Gentleman I love this movie and have added this to my collection and would recommend anyone who not seen this movie to watch it.
I must be honest I bought this for my Aunty as she'd never seen it. She loved every bit of it
This was a great movie. It brought some great memories of life in the military. It had some great footage. Especially the first part of the movie.
Have always loved this movie, couldn't wait to get it in Blue-ray.  The quality is excellent.  Excellent story and acting.
One of the classics!!!! It's a great story with a look into what the naval officers have to go through in training. Great love story too.
Five stars for the Man. Richard Gere was outstanding in this move. A true love story, especially the end. He could have picked me up WOW
Richard Gere and Debra Winger play excellent roles in this romance and drama movie.  Definitely a nice addition to my collection.
Is it possible? Say yes to the fairy tale! Very excellent!
This movie just touched me in many ways that's why I loved it from the first time it came out.  Great actors make great movies.
The Blu Ray is FANTASTIC!  top pic and Audio has  six special features and no cgi in this film tops
great move, get a box of pop corn, sit on a comfy couch with a blanket and sit and enjoy a good movie, with a good ending.
This is one great classic movie!  The parts are well acted, and the theme of the movie is wonderful.  I would recommend this movie to others.
Great picture, although , a 5.1  mix  and  trailer would have been Perfect
Good actors plus I like Courtney Thorne Smith. Goofy movie but there was a plot . A teacher who learns to care and does a good job once he gets it.
If you remember this movie, or love '80s movies in general, you NEED this movie.  It's very fun and cheesy.  Classic '80s stuff here!
This movie is undoubtedly Mark Harmon's second best movie ever.  Lots of laughs to go around and of course the good guy wins in the end.
I really enjoyed this movie. The Delievery was fast which was good, cuz I needed it to do a school prject
I am loving these 80s movies and you can't beat the prices. This movie made me laugh 20-something years ago and still does today.
It's pretty good. Plays good too. I love it!!  I would recommend it. It's old 3D and not real D.
This one along with parts 2,4 and 5 are my favorite of the FT13th movies
the second best of the series. jason earns hockey mask
This is an great movie an is worth the money. Even if your not a friday fan you will still enjoy this installment
I like this product. This is one of my favorite chapters from the movie collection. I would most certainly recommend this product to someone else.
Another classic from Eddie Murphy. He and Dan Akroyd were so great together. They should have done more together. Really funny pair.
This movie has it all.  But most of all the comedy between Dan Akroyd and Eddie Murphey makes for great viewing.
Great addition to my collection!  I love Eddie Murphy!  Would recommend this movie to anyone who asked.  Eddie Murphy marathon anyone?
Eddie Murphy and Dan Ackroyd?  It's double the comedy with these two characters.  I've watched this movie like 50 times, and each time, I'm ROTFLMAO!
One of the best movies ever - definitely my favorite Eddie Murphy movie.  Oh Winthorp!  Turn those machines back on!
I miss the old school Eddie Murphy! This movie is just SO hilarious! A must for everyone!
This is a classic.  That is all there is to say.
This movie is one of the funniest movies that Eddie Murphy has done. He is a great actor in this role.
In it's day it was a good movie, I purchased for my daughter and she seemed to really enjoy it.
This movie is a classic. Eddie Murphy keeps you laughing through the whole movie. I have recommended this movie to family and Friends.
Very funny movie and surprisingly thought provoking. When the poor get rich and when the rich get poor then one's very character begins to change!
This movie is funny as hell! Eddie and dan together that's all it takes to make this movie cool as hell! Everyone should own this movie!
I loved this movie. It's a lot of fun, but the ending is confusing. I tried to understand it, but now I can fail to understand it in wonderful HD!
This movie came along at the right time!Funny and entertaining!The acting was first rate!Recommend (always) - Five stars!
nice to be able to watch old movies- they have a great chemistry together, and they are so funny together
It's very fun movie to watch and good movie put up with all of Jamie Lee Curtis movies .
I put together awesome christmas themed movies as a white elephant gift, it's not a normal Christmas movie but it should be.
How could you not like this movie. One of Eddies best movies. I watched this as a kid but didnt understand most of it. Now I think its great.
Nothing but the best for this classic!  Super actors and comedy in one!  Can watch this one over and over.
one of my favorites. might need another copy though, our friend liked this so she took it over to her place. *****five (5 stars)
NICE OLDIES BUT GOODIEMOVIE  LOOK HOW YOUNGTHEY BOTH WERELOVE IT CAN'T FIND THESE TYPE OFGOOD ACTING TODAY.
Classic, great for any library.
This is one of those movies that is great to have and watch whenever your in the mood to for a funny movie. Very entertaining and quality picture.
It is the best movie Eddie Murphy made along with Dan Aykrod,I think it is a very good movie.One who is into the stock market would enjoy
It was Funny, It had Love in it, Business & A Wonderful Message that the Rich Don't Always Win! I Love It & I would Recommend it to My Friends
A fun insight of the human nature of man and how money, can affect a person.  Worth a watch anytime.
Excellent cast, this is a fun movie, and even after seeing it ten times at least, I still enjoy it.
After all these years Trading Places is still a good comedy movie from the 1980s that is worth watching again.
Great, funny movie.  Love to watch it over and over.  One of my favorites. Does have some nudity so not a movie for small kids.
Memories, fun to watch.
This is one of the best and funniest stories ever written.The Performances are brilliantA longtime favorite of mine
Bought this for a relative that loves Eddie Murphy. Funny movie to watch whenever. Can't really beat the price either.
I GOT TWO WORDS FUNNY AND CRAZY! OR IS THAT THREE NO TWO?YOU FIGURE IT OUT LOL!
I really loved the movieEddie Murphy is really a hoot.The movie also arrived in excellent conditionThank You
This a great comedy.  It has a good story and many key, funny scenes.  The R rating is due to on quick flash of nudity and a handful of bad language.
Still funny today! Jamie Lee, Eddie Murphy and Dan Akroyd all in their prime with a Don Ameche &#34;F&#34; bomb, always a classic!
THIS MOVIE IS REALLY SCARY. SCOTT GLEN IS EITHER AN ANGEL OR AN ALIEN FROM SPACE.BUT THE MONSTER IS BIG AND UGLY.
I liked the book better, but this is good.  I read the book first and wanted to see the movie.  It has a good cast and is well made.
I enjoyed this film. It was entertaining and unique so will be memorable. Too bad the version used by Amazon isn't a wide-screen version.
I remember this movie from long ago! I didn't recall that Michael Mann directed It! Very well done! Hate is Our only enemy!
For those that enjoy a great suspenseful and/or horror story, this will hold you on the edge of your seat. Well characterized.
Although not as good as modern horror, this has a cult following for a good reason. NO SPOILERS! Highly recommended!
Sometimes it's good to escape from all of the pressures of everyday life and immerse oneself into silly humor just for the sake of humor.
This is the classic slap stick, silly, laugh from beginning to end movie. Val Kilmer is easy on the eyes, too.
Great movie, starring a young Val Kilmer.  It's a musical, and a parody of those old war/romance films.  Super funny all the way through.
this is a great movie. dudley moore is a great actor. love the movies that he plays in. would buy more movies with him in it.
Purchased as a gift, was a perfect for a Christmas present, still plays perfectly.  would purchase another copy for myself
This is a great movie that I wantedto add to my collection. It arrived in a timelymanner and was as described.  Noproblems and no complaints.
I grew up with this movie and I find it one of my personal favorites. If you love dancing. You'll love this. :)
Very uplifting and GREAT music.  Kevin Bacon has E N E R G Y I wish i had.  I'll watch more than once!
This is a great addition to my bluray collection. Great picture and sound and has some good extras. Well worth the price.
Thanx for the timely delivery of 1984's Footloose.  I luv this movie; specially, having 6 of the top 10 songs at once.  Last time that happened.
This movie always takes me back. It's a nice contrast between a puritan town's establishment and their rebellious kids. Memories.
An all time favorite movie that I could watch time and again and never get tired of.  The stars were excellent.
I first saw this movie when it first hit the big screen and really liked it and the Dancing suburb
If you like movies about music and dancing then you will love Footloose. It also has an excellent Spiritual message in it.
One the top ten 1980s films for me.....classic songs, great story awesome cast....definitely one to be added to any dvd collection
Always has been one of our household favorites!!! Just love the whole theme and how it all plays out! Of course the DANCING is AMAZING too! ;)
these films are the best, always should have our children watch them, the 2nd one was awful..... yuck, but that happens to the classics
ok this movie is great...PLEASE stop redoing these films...they are classic LEAVE them alone!!!! dont mess up a GREAT thing...great movie
Thank you, Amazon, for being my go-to place.The DVD arrived quickly, and in perfect condition.  It's a great feel-good movie to have on hand.
Couldn't resist this classic for my collection.  No problem with ordering or receiving the product.  Always great to do business with you.
This movie was actually a gift for somesome but she was very excited and happy when she opened in on Christmas Day!
Personal favorite.  Just makes me want to go out and dance.
Got it in a timely manner. Enjoyed watching it and comparing it to the new 2011 version. They were both good.
Got this for my Granddaughter, she loved it, and watches it all the time.  It was part of her birthday presents.
love the moives 80 moives are great havent see it in long time but would watch it over and over
We just recently got a Blu Ray player. So we ordered several of our favorite Classics. We love this show...Kevin Bacon is awesome.
I love this movie!  It's got a great story and great actors that have gone on to make more great movies!
This classic movie is a favorite of mine.  Replacing old vhs movies for DVD format.  Waiting to see new version.
I have always loved line dancing and I like kevin and lori singer, they dance so beautifully.i loved the movie.
This is my favorite movie  I loved this movie as a teenager.  Kevin Bacon is great in this movie and I love the music.
What can I say but this movie was superb---  Kevin Bacon did a great job of acting which is why he did alot of othermovies...Bring on the music!!!!
The movie was shipped fast and received in very good condition.  I will most definitely order from this sellar again
This is a great movie and recommend it to all. I love the music and story line. I have watched it many many times.
I have always loved this movie.  I decided that I wanted to own it.  I am very happy to have it in my DVD library.
This movie is awesome. Middle part of the 'Star Trek Trilogy'. Not to give any spoilers but they find Spock.
I've seen everyone of them and love them.  This is really a pivotal movie if you are into the series.
It's great to have the DVD of this Star Trek movie.  It was priced right & is what we expect from any Star Trek purchase.
Compared to todays hi-tech productions, it is a little old-feeling, but still, for the day, it was and is a neat movie. Spock lives!!
This video is awesome.  I just wish it was free on amazon prime like the rest of the series.  If you're not a trekkie, you might not like it.
The best I can say is that this movie should be in everybodies DVD colection, that likesSCI-FI.
I was so glad when they brought  Spock back .as he is one of the main crew .every one love having an alien on the bridge
this is a very entertaining movie.  well worth the cost.  It is a great show and I enjoyed it very much.
WOW! Great SFX rock the screen as Kirk risks all to save his comrade. Witness the glorious destruction of the Enterprise!
I'm sure any Trecky knows this movie and loves it.I recommend it to any one else after seeing The Wrath of Kahn
This is one of my favorite Star Trek movies.  I was glad to a special edition because I like to watch behind-the-scenes notes.
I am a dyed in the wool Star Trek fan, and I LOVE getting all the Star TRek movies on dvd. It arrived in record time, and was packaged well.
I loved watching this movie again.  It was a lot of fun.  Gotta love the old Star Trek actors.  I recommend this one for watching.
I love everything Star Trek, and especially love the original gang.  Dr. McCoy is always entertaining.  Spock wasn't what I expected, but ok.
I have watched this movie so many times.  Two of my favorite actors.  De Niro and Streep are great in this movie.
The way the actors interact with each other, and the beautiful way each scene develop is amazing!, a must watch!
yes, its a great and good movie. its a good movie to enjoy and to watch. i will give this movie a 10, for excellence. thanks, kate dougherty
I really enjoyed this story, Meryl Streep, always playing herself and adding humor to the story.One you will enjoy watching
Great movie that proves you're never too old to fall head over heels in love. Definitely a must see movie
Meryl Streep and Robert DeNiro just don't make any kind of movies but great ones.  I thought this movie was excellent.
How could one go wrong w/ De Niro and Streep together in the same movie?  Just watching these two actors in the same movie is worth your time!
I've seen this movie many times & never get tired of watching it.  It's a must if you like a great love story.
Great Stephen King flick!!!!  Always love Christopher Walken.
This is one of my favorite films. If you don't know the story I will just say the ending is surprising and satisfying - my opinion.
This movie does NOT get old.  It is still better than the TV series.  Christopher Walken equals a hit every time
This has got to be one of my all time favorites! It's a great film and Christopher Walken is wonderful in it!
So good it has closed caption
Good story and great acting.  I really like the twist at the end.  The movie itself doesn't hold up well from the 80s.
I love Stephen King and I love Christopher Walken-what a combo. Great story and great acting by Walken. One of the best book to film tansitions.
Another great 80's movie. Four star movie all the way! Christopher Walken in his best performance. A must see film.
Not much to say. I am fond of Stephen King so I enjoy the movies made from his works. This one is very good
I got this one for my father and he love this movie. he was looking for it on DVD for a long time.
I recieved my DVD The Dead Zone by Stephen King very fast in GREAT condition. THANK YOU
Christopher Walken in a Stephen King tale, can it get any better?!!  I'm a fan of both and I ordered it because of that.
This is one of Stephen King's really good movies. Christopher Walken is great. You really don't know what's going to happen next. And a great ending.
I figured it was going to be a corny horror movie like Steven King has made many times.  No, it was riveting.  Walken was perfect.  See it !
Stephen King has always been one of the best at horror and suspense. This movie has just the right elements of both.
This is a timeless movie, great story, great acting, a film to add to one's collection. I just wish it was available on blu ray.
I love this movie I remember seeing this years ago and it took me some time  to find a copy I like Christopher Walken &  love Stephen King movies
How can you go wrong with Kings writting turned screenplay and Chris's acting.  I've watched this many times and enjoyed it every time.
Recommend!Intense and engaging.  Christopher Walken and Martin Sheen were excellent!  Love the subject matter and storyline of the movie.
This is a very good movie I enjoyed watching over and over . And I like to watch it on the weekends.
Great movie, I loved this movie in the 80's and it  is hard to find in stores. IF you are into Vietnam action movies then this movie is for you.
One of my &#34;Top Ten&#34; movies from the 80s. Bought it in Dec 2103 and watched New Year's eve. Everyone liked it. :)
I've seen this flick many years ago and seeing it again still proved vary enjoyable. Money was not wasted with this movie.
Very intelligent 'finding MIA's' plot, with great acting all around, as well as some action surprises.  Good DVD quality.  Highly recommended.
this is an awesome movie. had no trouble watching it 'worked perfectly. it is a good story. actors are really good. it is a keeper
Loved this movie as kid. Got it for my sister. She really enjoyed it. Brings back memories watching movies together.
THIS IS A VERY GOOD MOVIE, I THINK ANYONE CAN AND SHOULD WATCH IT. SO BUY IT FAST IN A HURRY.
Isn't that just the greatest news...it was one of my favorites.
This was a great movie.  We saw it 20 years ago but it still is good today. I would recommend seeing it if you love Jack Nicholson and Meryl Streep.
Had not rewatched this movie for a long time. After seeing it, again think it is just a wonderful movie with Streep  and Nichollson at their best.
One of my all time favorites.
REST IN PIECE SIR TONY, DIRECTOR OF TOP GUN. HOLLYWOOD HAS LOST A TRUE GENIUS OF A FILMMAKER. SO PROUD TO BE A FAN AND TO OWN ALL HIS FILMS.
This movie will always be a favorite of mine. Although not based on a novel, Top Gun is the classic story of the triumph of the underdog.
This has been one of my favorite movies.  I have owned it on VHS but the tape was going bad so I needed to replace it with a DVD.
This  movie has it all! from great fighter plane action to inspiration! and more....  great balls of fire!
This movie is an amazing piece of 80s nostalgia. It's a must own, if not watch.So many stars so little time.
One of the greatest classic movies of all time. The cinematography obviously isn't the best but it is inspiring and motivating.
I, have always loved Tom Cruize, no matter what Movie he is in, this one was Great too !!!, hope there are more to come.
i  love  tom  cruise  moviesi  love  these  2  people  togethergreat  movie  to  watch  and  will  over  and  overagain  thanks.
Its good time movie when you want to just 'feel good&#34;, romance, action and of course Tom Cruise at his best!
If you saw Officer an a gentleman and liked it you will liked this. It is just more involved with all the actors  making it a great movie.
Awesome action movie. Bluray made it even better than before. I would highly recommend this film to anyone and everyone.
I loved this movie the first time I saw it years ago. I love the 3D version even more because it brings me closer to the action.
This is a classic movie that everyone needs to see!  It is a great family movie for parents and teens.  The music is fantastic too!
Who doesn't love all the hot pilots and Tom Cruise in their prime. Oh and the story isn't bad either!
The adults in the family seemed to enjoy it a lot.  Not really geared for children, but I'm sure you already knew that.
This is a great flick, lots of flying action and back before his got over the top.  This movie is a classic and recommended viewing.
If you like jets, you need to buy this movie. it's not the best quality video/sound but the move is like 30 years old.
This is one of those movies I can watch over and over. It has comedy, action, drama and some great music.
Aerial photography in this film is awesome!  If you like Tom Cruise and F-14 fighter jets, this film is for you!
Come on, why do you need a review of Top Gun?  Everyone' seen it.  It's campy and unrealistic and I Wouldn't change a thing.
This is an awesome movie! Such a classic! Being able to watch it on my iPad at any given moment is such a nice feature of Amazon Prime.
Top Gun is for me one of the gratest movies ever, the souund and music are incredible and Tom Cruise is for me a great actor
Classic comedy. Val Kilmer and Tom Cruise are so hilarious in this movie. Every cinema-phile should own this movie as part of his collection.
I love watching Top Gun, over and over.  I love the music they picked to go with this movie. Great movie.
This is another movie on the top of my husband's list. It had to be part of his collection. He loves it.
Ok who here can't love the old top gun, Awesome. . . . . . . . . . .
i got the vhs and now trying to buy the dvd. an awesome movie i hope it was correct in the way the airforce worked
Suspend your disbelief and go along for the rollicking ride.Great characters, music, and good action.Classic film for its era.
Great addition to any collection great dvd special effects and how the movie was made.  makes one proud of our country
LIKE BRAND NEW! WE LOVE IT~THANK YOU SO VERY MUCH AAAAA+++++I will ve back again! Thank You so Very much!
I always really liked/enjoyed this movie......now I like/enjoy it even more in 3D...a good job of rendering 3D to this film was accomplished.
Enjoyed every second of it. If you liked the movie and are a fan of 3D movies this is a must have!
Always a good watch! Classic! Love the volleyball scene, but who doesn't? If you haven't watched once before, definitely a must watch!
I liked it, its a old movie let me try to make the I like it go on for a page or 2 I like it, I like it. 3 words summed it up.
I miss the days of 80s films, where Tom Cruise began as an icon, and truly one of the best films to this day.
This is one of the all time "have to have in library" movies.  A classic!!
This is one of our favorite movies whenever we feel the need for speed.  Blu-ray just makes it twice as good!!!
This is such a wonderful movie.  It's got action,  a love story, it's funny and a GREAT story.  For women it has Lots of &#34;eye candy&#34; too!
I have seen this movie dozens of times.  It was fabulous in HD.  It is one of those movies that you never get tired of watching.
The movie was the hit of it's day (in the 1980's).It is still as relevent and appropriate today, as itwas then.
WHAT A MOVIE TO WATCH IN 3-D. IT IS BETTER THAN THE ORIGINAL. TOM CRUISE ROCKS. A MUST MOVIE TO WATCH.
This DVD is filled with some of the great up and coming stars of the 1980's. Tom Cruise is great!
One of my favorites, I wanted to be able to watch it in blu-ray.  Blu-ray makes a considerable difference in viewing.Highly recommend it.
a cocky fighter pilot gets recruited into an elite fighter pilot training exercises.The fighter pilot's antics  don't go over well.
This was cool in 3D. Obviously, this was not shot in 3D but some of the battle scence really leaded themselves to conversion to 3D.
Perfect Sunday afternoon flick for the family.  So many classic one liners and a good mix between action and drama.
The transfer to bluray rejuvenates this classic movie.  Friends have marveled at the detail in the picture on the big screen.
A true classic! I had to have on Blu-Ray for the greatest quality. Can't get enough of all the flying!
This is a good movie with pieces of humor,aerial action at a fast pace you'll love it.  Idid. Tom Cruise is great
The Experience of watching TOP GUN on Bluray was top class. It has special features (interview with Tom Cruise TV Spots etc. A Must Buy.
I enjoyed this movie the first time I saw it.  It has not lost its charm.  I'm glad I bought it.
A good action movie! and really suspenseful! Some nudity and really is not too good for youth! Unless you have clearplay
I, enjoy all of Harrison Ford's movies, have seen most of them, this is one of my favorite's. Will no doubt order more.
great story and acting, yet different to average  romance and drama. Will watch it again in time, one to add to  your collection.
wonderful acting , wonderful story plot so very well doneI have watched the movie over and over and never tire of it.
one of the movies that show that Harrison Ford is more than Star Wars..Use the force, Luke...He is a talented actor.
This movie deserves at least 10 stars.  The story and acting is the best this movie holds you from beginning to end
Great Movie !!!! One of Harrison Ford best movie, love it and glad I have added this to my collections and 100% please I did buy this movie
Harrison Ford always dose a good job.  The movie is action-packed,and shows life between Amish and others.  It is a good movie to see.
I requested this movie from Net Flix several times and enjoyed it so much that I decided to purchase it.  I enjoy all movies with Harrison Ford.
This one of Harrison Ford's best roles. The entire cast is great as is the story line. Also in the cast is an early shot at Danny Glover.
On time and in excellent condition.  Can't ask for more!
One of Harrison Fords best movies. There are no light sabers or aliens jumping out of the woodwork just good drama.
This may be the best acting performance in the career of Harrison Ford. It is a tie with his performance in Blade Runner.
The movie is great. It's about a cop who solves a murder by posing as an Amish person to solve a murder, which a boy had witnessed in a restroom.
What more could you want? Lighting was interesting and landscape was beautiful, too - really enjoyed the movie, too bad there wasn't a sequel.
This is a great movie - Harrison Ford is a fantastic actor. This movie is not filled with profanity and these days that is a blessing.
i bought this for my sister and she gets enjoyment out of it.harrison ford is one of the actors she will never get enough of
The story was among the best.  It shows people at their best.  It's the kind of movie you enjoy watching the second time around.
i always enjoy watching this movie, the actors are great and the story amish couldnt be better and kelly mcgillis was great
SINCE I LIVE IN CENTRAL PENNSYLVANIA, I LOVE THIS MOVIE.  A BIT BLOODY IN SPOTS, BUT VERY WELL DONE AND OF COURSE HARRISON FORD IS GREAT.
This is a good movie and I love the Pennsylvania dutch country where it was filmed. Harrison Ford is great also.
This movie is a classic with Harrison Ford in it. It takes place in my own backyard (basically) and shows truely how SOME tourist treat the Amish,.
Han Solo Indiana Jones The fugitive Jack Ryan this movie is up there with all of his great action thriller movies
Very enjoyable evening's entertainment.  A fantisy but a good depiction of the clash between two cultures.  We had a good evening because of it.
What can I say.  This is a classic Harrison Ford movie.  Well worth having in my collection. An easy 5 STARS.
This is scary and troubling ins some respects, for sure, but it still shows the courage of people and their human spirit.
Moving tragic human story of the horrible aftermathof nuclear war.This is one of the most powerful movies of all times !
Impossible to find at an affordable price except through Online Amazon Video. Great movie even though it is dated. Good acting and story.
Just for the Sarah Jessica Parker crowd alone? Or Robert Downey Jr...?Or Corey... well...Way overdue.
Classic Michael Keaton. Absolutely love this movie. Very clean movie- good for older kids. Wish they still made movies like this!
This is a good movie. Very funny. Michael Keaton and the manager were good together. They both got the car plant to work in both ethnic forms
It was purchased to show my mom a funny movie about american &#34;can do&#34; without all the sex drugs and rock and roll.
Peter Barton in the shower, What more could you want in a movie?  He's Perfect!  *wolfette whistles*
The end had to come are you sure Jason dead if not we will see. Collect it all at a good price.
This movie is a really good comedy and I love it. If you like silliness and laughs, you should buy this movie.
Great flick. The singing cowboy, the duke's kid and Andy Griffith, what more can I say. I Highly recommend... 1
this movie is for you if you are a fan of the great John Candy.  in this movie his vacation goes wrong until the end of the movie.
This movie is fun for the whole family and will make you laugh, cheer and just have a lot of fun. This one is a classic
One of the funniest of John Candy films.  You will watch this movie over and over.  Great price, fun movie.
John Candy's funniest movie ever made.  Too bad he's gone, he had such promise.  This is his best role.  Love this movie.
This is fun!Just be sure not to have too small of kids around, as some of the subjects are for adults only.
Another great John Candy movie. Funny, as always. Family  oriented.  This movie is funny, time, after time. It's one of John Candy's best movies.
One of Carl Reiner's best movies. A great story about a dad that never won anything in his life. And friends that help him.
Love this movie and watch it often because of John Candy, it is a family favorite and suitable for everyone.
John Candy is so funny. I have never seen this movie before and saw the description. It seemed like something I would like to add to my collection.
Great Movie with the late John Candy and a cast of Characters to beat all. Very funny set up and heart warming story with a great ending. Loved it.
We lost a great actor when he died.  John is so funny in this movie like all his other movies.
Star Trek. The 80's. You. What do all of these things have in common? Well, if you buy this movie you will see.
Product was in great shape and arrived so quickly. I had it on VHS, but wanted it on DVD...I love purchasing used DVD's this way.
This is my favorite of all the Trek movies.  Humor and adventure make up this movie.  Great addition to my Trek collection.
Definitely one of the best Star Trek movies and by FAR the funniest one in the series. Highly recommended by this fan.
This movie is one of the best of the Trek Films and defineately the best for Non-Trekkies. Lot's of fun! You'll have a whale of a time watching it!
Entertaining and heart warming.  Has a great story line and funny.  Had a green message about saving the whales.  I enjoyed watching the movie.
After Khan....this is my favorite of the Star Trek series.  I love San Francisco and it is fun to watch the interactions.
I had this movie on vhs, and decided to get it on dvd.  The seller was gracious, and the package arrived a few days later.
I love the old characters of Star Trek.  The acting was excemplary as always.  It was an exciting emotional movie.
Love all of the Star Trek movies! Always able to watch over and over and continue to be amazed with their adventures!
Travel with the Enterprise crew to our century and watch them save the future &amp; have fun while doing it.
I don't care much for the 80s style (didn't care for it much in the 80s :-) ). But as with all the Start Trek Movies & series, I loved it!
I bought this for my grandson and he has enjoyed it. It was shipped in a timely manner!
I am a Star Trek fan and I love all of the movies.  This is a particularly good story and one of my favorites.
A nice comedic tone that is lacking in most of the series.  Also, a nice break from the standard story line of most Star Trek movies.
I have seen all of the star trek movies but this one is my favorite. Great movie!!! Get the movie, you won't regret it.
My favorite of the Star Trek movies.  I like watching it  when I want to without having to wait for it be rerun on TV.
This wrap up of the star trek triology  met all expectations. Star trek fans every where will love this one.
Spock learning to curse, whales, mankind's misuse of the Earth, modern medicine vs future treatments and time travel...nothing more need be said.
This was classic Star Trek.  The actors were great, as always, and the story line was interesting.  Amusing looking at the controls.
Perhaps the most enjoyable as it took us &#34;back&#34; in time and created the most humorous situations of all the Star Trek movies.
This is by far the most fun of them all. Great to see them all again, but this is my favorite.
This is an excellent family movie.  We love it!  Would recommend it to anyone.  There was no problems with delivery.
It's just a good movie to watch.  Wish they made more like this one.  I would recommend it for a family night.
I must have seen this movie a hundred times as a kid. So glad to have it in my collection even if it is really cheesy now.
One of my favorite movies,the kind you can watch over,and over,and never get tired of watching it.
I think this is definitely a must see for fans of 80's movies.I really enjoyed it and thought it was a very good watch.
I am very happy to have found this old favorite of mine. Can't find treasures like this in the stores.
This is a family movie;good story line. This is how people should be treated,with love! Hollywood should make more movies like this
DARYL is a good Saturday afternoon movie to watch with the kids. It's funny and heartwarming. I'd recommend it to parents and grandparents.
I saw this movie with my kids so i had to get it for my grandkids to see.  It is a very good movie that will have you smiling & crying .
Since I was an extra in the movie Watchers and love all Corey Haim's moviesI grew up watchingI think the film was well made and has a good cast
i loved it years ago and loved watching it again on my kindle fire. too bad more people haven't watched it.
I like this movie!! It may be a little corny &#34;B&#34; type movie, but I always enjoy it.
Have been wanting to purchase this movie for some time, but, the prices were prohibitive. Finally got it for a decent price. Great movie.
Movie about a werewolf (the minister did it) and a teenage boy in a wheelchair.  Enjoy watching Gary Busey also.
I read the novellea and it was good. This film does it justice. King wrote the screenplay. The acting and effects are first rate. Higly recomended.
One of the best movie adaptations of a Steven King short story and one of two great horror movies starring the late Corey Haim.
Stephen King movies are always entertaining. interesting and intense and attention grabber could not leave my seat. good movies m
I did NOT realize that I had seen this before but enjoyed it non the less. If you enjoy these movies rent it!
Stephen King proves he can do no wrong with his adaption of his book, Sliver Bullet transforms into a movie starring Gary Busey and Corey Helm!
Stephen King's, &#34;Silver Bullet,&#34; is an old favorite, and it was a pleasure to see it again after so many years.
Has always been one of my werewolf favorites,  not lots of sex and not too gory. Good entertainment in how familys care for each other.
This movie scared me half to death.  Great movie.  A must buy for anyone who likes spooky movies.
This Is A Great Werewolf Movie.Gary Busey Is Great In This Movie.Anyone Who Likes Werewolves Will Enjoy This Great Movie.
I love this movie even though it's an old movie. It brings back memories of when I was younger and it came out. I still love watching it.
I like this movie because of the other stories the little boy tells. Also the action was great, and the mystery was alsome.
This is an suspenseful movie that keeps you guessing.  It had A Wonderful Twist at the end. This is not for young children.
i love this movie saw it the first time it came out.i had a vhs copy of it but bought a bluray copy.
I watched this movie back in the 80's when it premiered and was intrigued. It has stayed with me and now needed to watch and understand more deeply.
Terrific movie.  Its no wonder that Marlee won an academy award for her work.The seller is great.  Immediate shipment and received as indicated.
One of my all time greatest love stories.  I watch it whenever I feel lonesome or low.  Great actors and supporting cast and story helps as well.
I thought this meaning was a beautiful love story! William Hurt did an amazing performance with his signing. I loved it!
This order arrived before promised, it was as described, and the price was excellent. I am very satisfied with this purchase.
This movie is very funny, The actors are well cast and lovable,,My friends and family do movie nights and this is a must see.
Most of us played clue as children with our families, but the movie, based, on the game is entertaining and pure fun
We had never seen this '80s movie, and were pleased that we decided to watch this instead of rent a movie.  Thanks amazon.
This is such a great show, and I love that it has all of the endings!!  I have sen this movie a lot of times and it always makes me smile!!
This was definitely one of the funnier movies I have seen in a while.  Lots of dry and slap stick humour.  And DVD was in a great condition.
A nice relief from all the junk movies being produced today. I Especially liked the way the ending was written.
Enjoyable as a comedy who done it. Good cast and plot. Some really funny moments. Good interaction between the cast .
what a great film this is! it mixes in mystery and comedy beautifully. and who can forget the performance by Tim Curry as the butler. great work!
One of the best movies made in the eighties that the family could watch together and really laugh out loud.
This is an awsome movie with 3 endings. I had fun, first watching this movie, trying to guess whodunnit. very funny, and surprising ending!
If you haven't seen this movie, you should. Witty, clever, and fun! More movies need to be made like this one!
Very good film! Fun from start to finish and it has Lesley Ann Warren! One of the all-time sexiest women in movies!
I love the board game and the movie is just as good! Yes it's a little crazy, but I love it. I've watched it several times.
A star studded, over the top comedy. Tim Curry at his best. The classic game come to life. I have watched this at least 30 times
This was funny and entertaining the first time I watched it and it is still funny and entertaining many years later.
The extra endings make this really really funI would definitely purchase this item again and recommend it to others.
This movie will always be one of my very favorites!  In fact, when I purchased it, I could not believe I did not have it already!
the dvd works fine, the quality is excellent, it came on time and is all they said itll be, good price, good product, good purchase.
What a wonderful and timeless movie with such a great cast. This movie is a new Classic in my book.
A great movie I just love how they re-created the famous board game to the silver screen.
This movie is a classic. If you haven't seen it you really should. It is ageless and easily one of the funniest movies I have ever watched.
If you need a silly movie to laugh at - this is the one.  Saw it years ago and still like it.
This movie is definitely a classic, ths one that we can watch over and over again.Great for movie night !!!!!!!!
Silly humor but I've always love this movie!! Over the top madness! Give it a shot!! It'll be worth your time
This is one of my favorite movies for all ages! So grab yourself some delicious popcorn and enjoy!  GOD bless!
This movie is so funny, it is one of those cult classics where people love it or they hate it. I think it is awesome.
This movie is a classic. And I have always adored watching it even as a child. Its funny and keeps you guessing and entertained all at the same time.
This is one of my favorite movies, it has a great cast of characters, it is funny, nice plot, a very entertaining movie.
I fell in Love with this move as a kid & it never gets old! Awesome cast, plot & direction!
A star studded cast comes together in a movie that still keeps me laughing after all these years. Well worth owning
One of my all-time favorite movies. It's so much fun and simply a delight to watch over and over again.
I purchased this for my GF's birthday. We were really impressed with the quality. I recommend this to every one. thank you.
Very funny mystery movie with an awesome cast. It has an option for different endings too. There is violence, so it isn't really for young children.
It is an older dvd, but it is a good murder mystery,  It also has some light laughs throughout the movie.
Absolutely love it! Its the best movie to watch if you just want mindless comedy or a pick me up without the side effects
i am big fan of the game clue. so i watched it and it is better than the game clue. I really enjoyed the movie.
I love this movie. I remember watching it on Saturdays on channel 4 as a kid. How can you go wrong with that awesome cast!
What is there not to love about the movie &#34;Clue?&#34; It's perfection and the DVD is also perfect! No complaints!!!
I have loved this movie since I first saw it during its theatrical release. It's perfect to watch when you've had a long day and need a laugh.
I enjoyed the old humor with  mystery. Cast was good, characters were funny and interesting. Good Classic movie Would recommend
A MOVIE THAT KEEPS MY ATTENTION AND IS VERY ENTERTAINING.  FUN TO WATCH OVER AND OVER AGAIN AND I WILL!!!!
Love this movie. The characters are over the top. Just a really good fun movie with intentionally cheesy acting. Loved the French Maid...
Basically the main reason why I love this movie so much is Tim Curry. His is amazing as the Butler. I also love the  dark humor that is in this film
I love, love that movie. I used this movie more than 2 times. I'm glad that I bought it. I love and more love that movie. Big Smile.
Best of the murder mystery spoofs.  If you like this one, see also "Murder by Death" and "Haunted Honeymoon".
loved the movie think they did a fine job of adapting a board game into a funny film the characters are believable
This is a great comedy, lots of fun & laughter. Was a wonderful purchase, we watch it over & over.
glad too finally find this movie. I just loved this then and still love it. hope more do too! FUNNY
This was one of my favorite movies from the 80's. my friend and I watched this and laughed as we relived all the memories and music.
Probably my favorite John Hughes film, and that really is saying something. I love this movie lots. If you haven't seen it, you need to.
One of the best teen 80's movies.  It's about true friendship, school life struggles and love.  It was fun, emotional and memorable.
Sorry the filmed version of Everything's Duckie Edition (apparently) no longer exists, glad they got footage of the actors speaking about it.
Ive alwas loved this movie! Many years laters later I still enjoy it, and i dont see anything changing. It sure does take you back :)
I've watched this dozens of times.  Fun movie and great music so if you love the 80s and movies then watch.
AWWW to have the boy next door and the most popular guy in school after you..........what to do? what to do? Love this movie
Cult classic from the 80's all teenagers should see. Molly Ringwold ....Duckie just a cute movie Brat pack movie .......Fun to watch!~
i love love love molly i have every other movie shes in this was the last one i needed :)
I love this movie because I think that almost everyone in high school can relate to the problems portrayed in this  classic. Brings back memories.
one of my favorite movies ever! it actually inspires me on so many levels, and has the perfect 80s feel.
How can one who grew up with the Brat Pack resist watching Pretty in Pink in HD!!!!!!!!! Andrew McCarthy and Duckie as hot as ever!!!!
It has a great storyline and even better music! It has the ever popular happy ending with twists and turns along the way. Ducky is my favorite!
I BROUGHT THIS 4 MY DAUGHTER SO THAT WE BOTH COULD ENJOY THIS MOVIE 2GETHER; IT WAS OUT WHEN I WAS A TEENAGER!
It was just as promised. WE LOVE IT. I love sharing the 80's with my daughter. The movies were so awesome.
One of the best romance stories.  These classic 80's movies are so good, this one is a must have to your collection.
It was good back in the day and even better today!  I found it to be very entertaining to watch again
I streamed this movie recently and forgot just how much I love it! Any lovers of the Brat Pack will love this movie (a true classic from the 1980s).
I HAVE LOVED THIS MOVIE ON VHS FOR A VERY LONG TIME.  I WAS SO HAPPY TO FIND IT ON DVD!!  :)
I remember seeing this movie way back in 1986. Molly Ringwald is one of my favorite actrisses. The pesentation of the characters are most excellent.
what's to say about this movie but it's a classic.  I can watch it over and over again and not get tired of it.
A great movie. Was glad I found this movie to add to my movie collection.Trying to build up my movie collection.
All the actors were wonderful.  Molly Ringwald (sp) is so adorable.  Ducky is the greatest (Alan Harper - Two and 1/2 men!!!)
If you're into the 80's movies this is a good one to watch, Molly Ringwald at her finest the original brat pak. You'll love her in Pretty in Pink.
I watched this when I was a kid and wanted my daughter to see it. She loved it, I got it for a great price, and it was delivered quickly.
Excellent comedy that will entertain teenagers, adults, and elderly :) Definitely a must-see for movie buffs and everyone else! Yay.
Best scene in this movie is the parade scene.  Ferris Bueller your my hero.  It is a classic 80's movie.
Who could go wrong with this eighties flick? This is a must have that even our kids love. Very quick shipping and reasonably priced movie.
I have Ferris Bueller's Day Off 1986 ON LASERDISC,I love this Movie Much thats why I bought it on dvd too,,you won't regret it :)
This is a classic. I'm from Chicago and I never tire of the movie or the wonderful cast. It's fun to see how far they've all come.
It was late, could not sleep and saw this on my Kindle Fire HD.  Love the parade scene so I thought I'd watch it.  Great way to get relaxed.
Great oldie but goodie movie love ferris!!! Bueller... Bueller can't get enough. Watched 100 times and will totally watch 100 times more
Matthew Broderick breaks into the business fabulously. A comedy AND a chase movie, what else can you ask for?
Saw this when I was in highschool and it was awesome! It is just as awesome now as it was then!
Who doesn't love this movie?  Is an all time American classic. Come on, if you haven't seen this movie then you have issues.
Crazy antics, likeable characters, except, of course, for that buffoon of a high school principal. The entire family will enjoy it.
No matter how many times I watch this, it never ceases to amuse me.  It's a timeless classic of kids relating to school.
This classic still holds up with lots of laughs.  Saw with friends who never saw it before and they loved it!
I've often wondered how his older sister is still in school if he is a senior. He was born in 1962 and she was born in 1960. Did she stay back twice?
Probably the 10th time I've seen this but I needed a laugh and I got it again. CLASSIC HUMOR.5 stars 10 times
Loved it. This one is a classic!!
This movie is funny as hell! I love every part of this movie! Everybody should have this movie in your collection! Period!
I have seen this movie on HBO and it is funny so I recomend it to anyone 7 and up.Rated PG-13 for language.
An oldy but goodie.  Got it so we can watch it over and over and over again.  would buy again
Daughter asked for this--one of her favorites and I love shopping on y our site-makes it easy to get more than one this
Missed this movie when it first came out. My wife & I enjoyed it. After all these year great humor
I love this movie!  I lent it out and had to replace it.  I'm glad it finally made it to blu-ray.
Just plain fun! What more does a movie need to be? Matthew Broderick is hilarious. The supporting cast is equally delightful.
I love this movie and 19. This movie, like a lot of movies from the 80s will never be out of style.
This is one of those movies that stands the test of time. It is just a fun movie that keeps you smiling.
One the top ten 1980s films for me.....I love anything from the great 80s....definitely one to be added to any dvd collection
I have always loved the movie. it is one of my all time  favorites. I like all the characters in the movie. I highly recommend it.
great movie-made me laugh a lot!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!I had seen the movie before but I enjoyed watching it just as much the second time!
I have loved this movie since it first came out. Its fun and very enjoyable. Not heavy, light and fun. An old stand by movie to watch.
Good movie. Wish I was like him.
From the first moment I saw this movie, I loved it! Classic teen movoe with timeless themes & hilarious farce. Check it out!
Fantastic movie! I loved it from the beginning to the end! One of the many great 80's movies! Easily 5/5.
A great film. It will make you laugh over and over again.A film that the whole family can watch together.
If you haven't seen this show, watch it. Great one liners that are quotable classics. For anyone who has wanted to skip school for a day off.
One of the best movies from my childhood. I can't recommend it enough. Funny. Witty. All out good time for any occasions.
I watch this funny movie over and over,Matthew Broderick at his best I give this movie a A+ you will enjoy this Film
This is a classic movie that should be part of any collection. I love the movie from when I was a kid.
I bought this so I could watch it with my teen age daughter. She did not find it as amusing as I had when I was her age.
What else is there to say besides Classic!!!!???It's even better in HD, I love this movie and enjoy watching it every now and then.
Everyone should own this film. There's something so irresistible about it, even as it's 80s style becomes outdated. One of our all-time favorites.
This is a classic. I think we've all seen this movie at least once.  It's the kind of movie that puts you in the mood to take a day off.
This movie is a classic. What to do when you play hooky from school for a day. The principle was a hoot.
FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF is a total classic from the 80's...It must be one of the most memorable comedys i ever seem...REALLY FUNNY!!!!
This was a good escape from reality movie. I enjoyed it and I'm glad I never had a friend like Farris Bueller.
A classic comedy
Enough said this movie is a classic. Brings you right back to old high school days, comedy and a get away.
This movie is a classic. To not experience this movie is to live a sheltered, boring life. Matthew Broderick's talent is superb.
This is such a feel good, family film. Just love it. So funny and enjoyable. I would recommend it to anyone who wants a fun and lighthearted film.
I love this movie and even though I've seen it many times it always makes me laugh. A good way to kill a few hours.
Great movie. Have loved this movie since it first came out in the theater. The special features on this DVD are also very fun to watch as well.
What a classic.  Watched this many years ago and got it for my kids.  There was more profanity than I remembered.
&#34;Must Have&#34; classic movie!  As funny today as it was back in 1986.  Repeat: Should be part of any collection!
this movie is just as good as it was before even better. They really dont make movies like this anymore
Not only funny,this movie inspires youto enjoy life's ride.
This is a great classic movie. A must see. Funny movie. Great cast in the movie. Would never happen in real life.
The title says it all: This movie is a classic.  The principal is incredibly funny-- and Ferris is incredibly &#34;slick.&#34;  What a hoot!
This was a movie I loved as a kid and its still a great movie, I can watch it a bunch of times
THIS IS A GREAT MOVIE I BOUGHT IT FOR MY GRAND KIDS AND THEY REALLY LIKED IT
Ferris Bueller's Day Off is a classic funny movie,  I had seen it when it came out years ogo and it's still funny now.
Pure 80s fun. Easy to watch always a good laugh. Takes you back to when life was simple.Save ferris!
This is one of the few films that I would classify as not just an amazing motion picture but great art as well.A film you don't watch but experience.
Great dvd, good quality, fast delivery, and great price. I ordered this dvd for my husband Donnell and he loves this dvd.
One of the best movies made about Viet Nam. Nothing more can be said. It will be enjoyed for many more years to come.
Great movie. Although it was a sad time in American History, I thought the movie was well done and interesting to watch.
The folly of war, the warrior at his worst and best. This is the lead movie an any baby-boomer collection of war movies.
what can I say its a legendary movie.The quality is great and its a classic. Must have movie that is wonderful every time
It was good but it is even better now.  Shocking, futuristic and realistic at the same time.  Simply the best.
One great movie.  Everyone was playing their A game for this one.  I have seen three different endings over the years.  Who cares.  I like them all.
If you thought Apocalypse Now was good, wait 'til you see the Copolla's longer cut.  Amazing.
War and the human psyche as masterfully filmed by Coppola. He did it to the classic &#34;Godfather&#34; and he does it again to Viet Nam.
Finally, a Blu Ray with all the Apocalypse version in one set.  Terrific viewing on my large screen TV Theater room.
MAYBE, THE GREATEST WAR MOVIE NOT REALLY A WAR MOVIE MOVIE EVER MADE MADE EVEN BETTER, MAYBE.
There is nothing I can say about this brilliant film that has not been said before. The scrpt and the cast were superb.Sam Bottoms, you are missed.
Received the movie before the date expected.  Received it in execellent condition.  Thanks.  Love ordering from Amazon.
I had never seen this movie before so seeing it was like going to a theater , i loved it !  Mindblowing
This is simply one of the greatest movies ever made. If you have never experienced it, it is a must.
I really like the extra scenes and information in this DVD. Great movie in any case, one the best war movies every made.
Apocalypse Now is Francis Ford Coppola's best film and I'm wondering why it hasn't been released on DVD yet...please let me know when it will be.Mike
Very Good!!!
this is the 2nd time i have watched this movie and i have enjoyed it both times , will most likely watch it again in the future
It made film history. We still can visualise a lot of scenes. Well done. A must for anybody who loves the movies.
Maybe it is the best war movie ever. If not, definitely the best Vietnam war movie ever made. Full Metal Jacket is a close second
Wow! What a terrific movie...all the funny and sad things going on in a fire zone...I never saw this as a PRO war or ANti war movie....
One of the best movies about Vietnam and the sorry mess that we got ourselves involved in. Loved the 1st Calvary attack scene with Wagner music.
Apocalypse Now is a Vietnam classic to watch it in HD 56 inch flat screen and surround sound what an experience
THIS IS A MUCH BETTER VERSION OF THE CLASSIC MOVIE.  IT IS MORE REALISTIC AND THE STORY IS BETTER TOLD WITH THIS ADDED MATERIAL.
The movie is a classic, and the box set is beautiful. A must own for fans...
This is a great movie.It is very entertaining.I think Martin Sheen and Marlin Brando,Robert Duvall  did a fine job acting.
This is the best Cheech and Chong movie EVER! All the classic bits are here, including my favorite: ConTalk. I highly recommend this DVD purchase!!
I love this movie and needed it for our DVD collection I bought it used and it is in great condition. We watch it all the time.
this movie will make you pee your pants! this movie is got to be one of the funniest movies since up in smoke!
My husband and i love Cheech and Chong they are so funny and now a days you just need a good laugh
This must be the funniest dvd on the planet , but is this complete?I read somewhere that it should be over 90 minutes , is this correct ?
I love eddie murphy this is one of the best show he ever did I had to have this dvd.
What can you say about this dvd? Except its funny as hell! This whole dvd is bad ass! Plus it came in excellent condition and came extra quick!
Not for children, but fabulous for adults!  Eddie is at his best in this video!  Will watch over and over!
This is Eddie Murphy's Best Stand up ever! It is Hilarious! I would recommend it to anyone.
This is an extremely funny set! It has been imatated so many times it's to believe it is still watchable!
This is the funniest I have ever seen Eddie Murphy.  You can laugh over and over again, it's that good!
First time watching this, i almost piss myself in my pants.  He was that great, now he's a Mouseateer for Disney films!!
This is classic Eddie and Eddie at his absolute very best. This is a must have and his best performance.
Delirious is the funniest stand up in HISTORY!  'nuff said!!
I couldn't remember if I'd seen this, but I'm a fan of Eddie Murphy so it couldn't hurt to add it to the collection. It was fair.
a well written story top of the line acting a heart warming masterpiece a must have for any collection...get it!!!!!!
...just a small gem with beautiful performances from a stellar cast...
This is an older movie . . . But will never lose it's charm . . . A True Classic.  I Highly Recommend it.
HARD TO FIND BUT GOT IT FAST AND HAPPY WITH IT.  LOOKING FOR A DVD OR THE SAME MOVIE.  THIS IS A CHRISTMAS CLASSIC.
My favorite Ballo! Katia Ricciarelli is a brilliant Amelia. Pavo and Quilico both sing very well. I recommend it highly.
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1927/28. Had to add it to my collection.
Excellent restoration of a classic.  As clear as the day it was released.  AFI did an excellent job.  Great movie better then I expected.
real WW1 aircraft, fun, even my kids liked it, reading and all...must have... nice too watch a movie where in everything it REAL!!!!
It was the first Emmy. I can see why. Great story line and photography. Don't miss this one. Great movie!
This classic silent film in very entertaining and holds up well for a modern audience.  Music and some sound effects have been added.  Recommended.
This is a great but sad WWI movies about two friends that try to protect each in the sky over France.
I Love This Movie! I Gave It Five Stars for That, It Was The First Film to Win The Oscar for Best Picture!
I'm thrilled with my dvd of The Miracle of Morgan's Creek.  I love the innocense.  This movie was a big deal controversy when made.  What fun.
1940's movie about what happens to a small town girl when the troops leave for over seas.  Well worth watching
I THOUGHT IT WAS  SO HILARIOUS
This is the funniest movie I have ever seen,  the actors are great together. I laughed all the way through.
To put it simply: Sunset Boulevard is one of my favorite films of all time and a true classic.
i recently bought this dvd and i am absolutely in love with it. Gloria Swanson truly deserved the oscar for this movie, not Judy Holiday!
This is, of course, one of the most brilliant films ever made, and it gets better with every viewing. It's probably the best film about Hollywood.
it has a car chase  they go fast - they go around a corner  thye squeal the tires  blah blah
entertaining movie and great acting. i thought the plot was very interesting and great to see those actors from the birth of hollywood.
Sunset Boulevard, in my opinion is truly a classic and possibly one of the finest cinematc stories of all time.
The greatest classic movie ever made. You can watch it over and over and it never pales. This should be at the top of the list of any collection.
A great movie to own. I am a big fan of old classical hollywood movies and i thought this movie was really good. DVD quality is great.
A timeless classic movie about a has been wealthy movie star and a broke script writer trying to make his mark in the industry.
One of my all time favorite American Films. This may even be Billy Wilder's best film. A classic in every sense of the word.
always great story!!!
Many movies of this quality are not shown on TV except when Robert Osborn uncovers them. Great film and very good quality
This is absolutely one of my favorite movies ever made. It might get parodied a bit, but it is very good. Billy Wilder can make a great movie
Quick service. Loved this movie when I saw it in the theaters as a kid. Love it now. Highly recommended.
I like all of these old science fiction movies. Outstanding. They should make more movies like this one. I would buy more of them
This show was the best show I ever saw.  I still watch it every chance I get.  I plan to buy the DVD as well.
I am a collector of old movies and this is a good one.It's a little corny compared to today's , but the plot is good.
This action movies is something of the near future. The cast for this movies was also great. It also show something realism and creativity.
Classic Science Fiction movie that thrilled audiences without CGI.  See this classic and I think you'll enjoy today's blockbusters even more.
One of the best early doomsday movies.  Great George Pal special effects.  This film sets the standards for movies in the future.
This would be considered a Classic for SciFi. It is worlds away from what we view now.
Looks great on my new flat screen tv. llthey don't make sci-fi movies as good as this. a remake is in the process i don't think it will be as good.
This is a good and simple and short movie which saves the special effects for when they are really needed and then it really delivers.
This is a great old Si-Fi that we really enjoyed watching again... Dated but still good to watch... Video and Sound track were great...
One of the better old science fiction movies, with a few twists, some classic bad guys, and decent plot and acting. A cut above the rest.
This movie was made in the early fifties when in my opinion was the greatest era of sci fi ever! Please keep showing these great movies for free.
Great example of the Sci-fi I grew up with on late night Thriller TV.  This one was never a B movie.
This is a very good addition to my 50's B Sci Fi Movie collection. I enjoy watching these films often.
I read the book in the 50's - before the movie.  The book is now dated; the movie is still fresh.  One of my favorites.
A DUPLICATION MISTAKE OF MINE BUT THIS ONE'S NOT A DOUBLE FEATURE DVD LIKE MY OTHER ONE.  GOOD SCI=FI
A must for any serious collector of classic sci-fi. One of the better made classic sci-fi movies.
Oh how I love classic science fiction. Science Fiction from the 40s, 50s and 60s just take me back when I was just a kid who hid behind the couch.
This has been a favorite for a lot of years.  I enjoy this version over the newer one with Tom Cruise although it is okay as well .  thanks
Really enjoyed having the color in the movie. I watch it again and again. I ended up buying the movie on amazon.
Purchased for disbled brother. Quick shipment, great price. Would purchase other movies in the future. He loved the movie...
Ahead of its time for Sci-Fi movies of the time. A study in human emotion and response to a realistic threat during the 1950's.
I was surprised by the special effects very good for 1953 movie. And the story line was very good too. Really good. Super Good. Interesting.
This is a great movie another classic movie. I love this 1953 movie and the color looks great and the special features it comes with.
This Movie is a must for any science fiction Lovers ...The Transfer, Restoration and Color Saturation is Pristine The Clarity is Perfect.
This is an all time classic sci-fi movie from the 1950's & is so much better than recent remake. The 1950's were a great are for sci-fi!
This is so much better than the remakes. Only fault would be wish they had stayed more with the book.
I can watch it over & over forever! Nice clean Classic Movie I love it! Great Classic A+++++++++++
when this movie first came out I was a child but now it is so unrealistic but back then it scared me excellent movie for sci-fi  lovers
Sometime the older is better and this is one of them..!! If you wish to be entertained? then watch this old time , great movie!!
saw this movie many times over the years, when DVD came out, had to own it, the remake was just as good
This movie is one of my all time favorites. GREAT story. Wonderful special effects. Truly a MUST HAVE for any sci-fi movie fan. Pure enjoyment.
I have probably seen this movie a dozen times or more and I still enjoy it immensely. A classic from better times.
Much better than the newer one.  Would recommend it to most anyone who likes to watch older movies.  Loved it.
I can't believe how expensive this is...I found it on DVD for under 15.00 at Movies Unlimited..and its new too.  Good quality DVD.
just like the title says, it is one of the best scifi movies ever.with out all the grafics today they just dont keep up with this one.
Even after  60 years this is still one of the best and scariest Martians invade the earth movies. I never tire of watching this one.
One of the best sci-fi movie of it's time. A must see for anyone who saw the remake. They just don't make 'em like this anymore.
This is one the best scifi movies ever made, it was way ahead of its time 1953, great movie, great acting, if you love sicfi this is a must have.
This was always my favorite growing up as a child. No doubt great special effects for 1957. (Oscar winner) Thumbs up!
By far I like this rendition of the famous book. Although Spielbergs was a very good runner in my opnion.
This is a classic science fiction movie. You should at least watch it once. It is ahead of its time.
Perfect movie. Watch this over the years and never get tired of it. I love the older sci fi movies and think everyone should see this at least once.
Classic movie.  Good price, good service, everything I expected.  I would deal with this company again.
Sometimes the first film is  better than the second. Watch this then the Tom Cruise one. Excellent movies. Glad Amazon had it.
WHEN IS THIS GREAT FILM GONNA BE ON BLURAY PARAMOUNT ALONG WITH THE THE THING FROM ANOTHER WORLD WARNER LETS GET GOING.
LOVE IT!!  This is a real classic. I would recommend this to others. This movie is a must have for any science fiction buff.
I would say yes to everyone who asked about this movie. It was fantastic and the special effects are great.
I felt that this movie was excellent, much better than the newer version. It is a great addition to my collection.
War of the Worlds is a classic movie that you can watch over and over. Never getting tired of watching it.
This movie is too much. It looked nice back then. It has some nice sounds and gizmos. I wouldn't want to be there.
A seminal science fiction tale adopted to film. This is the original movie that just cannot be surpassed. It's worth seeing over and over again.
This movie was pretty funny! It's a typical Bob Hope movie and my mom and I both enjoyed it a lot!
another great movie with Bob Hope. always enjoy his comedies as your always on the edge of your seat with laughter
I've always loved this movie. Bob Hope is his usual comedian star. The movie will have you in stitches. This is a keeper.
This is a great movie and definately should be on DVD.Please release this one and in it's original aspect ratio.
a great movie with excellent actors. When movies were movies.....Takes time to develop, but well wart the time. Enjoy cw
Great, especially the part where the three of them sing a xmas carol.  It is a great Christmas time viewing material.
I was absolutely delighted that I was able to find this classic at such a good price ! It was in excellent condition.
I loved this vintage movie.  The acting was wonderful.  The plot simple but entertaining.  I would recommend this for light viewing.
Another Great Classic. I really hate the way Amazon has a demand on how many I should use to review a product - What a bunch of horse pucky!!!
A unique comedy with a dark side and wonderful , unexpected ending. Loved  it !!!  Recommended for mature audiences only.
Just as good in 2013 as it was when it was made.  Some films lose their appeal over the years, but this one is a delight.
THIS IS A MUST BUY FOR ANY BOGART FAN ... YOU WILL FIND YOU CANT RENT THIS ONE. GREAT CHRISTMAS COMEDY
Bogart should have done more comedy, It really works in this movie. Not over the top but  extremely funny. Well worth watching.
This was a very good movie , I had never seen it till know but was glad I did. a must see movie !!
If you think of Bogie as a tough no nonesence gangster you are in for a treat in this delightful comeady.
Watching this again after so many years, I caught a lot more of the comedy then I did as a child!  A great movie to watch again and again.
We're No AngelsI absoutely love this movie.  I would recommend this to everyone who love' to laugh.  It's good seeing Humphrey Bogart doing comedy.
This is a great holiday classic. A trio of well know actors put a funny spin on the criminals they portray. People of all ages will love this movie.
What's not to like.  Bogart at his best as a sly all knowing con man with an honest core.  Great cast, great plot, great movie.
Wonderful, underrated holiday movie.Unusual role for Humphrey Bogart.Peter Ustinov is also really fun.My entire family enjoys this film.
I loved these three actors together. The story line was perfect. You don't see Bogie playing comedy roles too often and he was wonderful to watch.
A Good  movie!  Enjoy watching it over and over!Humphrey Bogart is his usual self and  yet is humorous.Good family watching!nrh5
Glad to find this very entertaining old movie on DVD and much enjoyed since. It came in excellent condition and in a timely manner.
had a great time seeing it again.. took it to mother's and she enjoyed the classic also... so much fun
This is a classic of what Christmas should be about...and it is NEVER played at Christmas....
One of Bogie's best, he did not often do comedy and this movie he is at his finest. Don't waste your time with the remake, stick with the original.
If you like guys that went bad and then changing for the better, This is the movie for you. It is also very funny. Check it out.
I have only three Bogart movies in my collection:  The African Queen, Casablanca, and We're No Angels.  In comparison, the rest are fodder.
the digital remaster is fantastic.  I love this movie in black and white, but on my new kindle hd it was amazing.  you need to watch it
This is a great movie collection. This was bought as a Christmas gift and the receiver loves them. I myself, have seen them as well. Great stuff!
This old classic reaaly is funny. It is Audrey Hepburns most commical movie.
I enjoyed this movie very much, most entertaining, what more could you ask from the everlasting Audrey Hepburn and Fred Astair.
I enjoyed this movie as a child and it is nice to know it is as good as I remembered.
LOVE OLD FRED ASTAIRE MOVIES AND ENJOY THE DIFFERENT FEMALE PARTNERS. HE SEEMS AGELESS TO ME AND THE LEADING LADIES BEAUTIFUL.
Great classic film with unusual pairing of Fred Astaire and Audrey Hepburn.Worth the watch just for the gorgeous outfits.
This movie is a perfect choice for any Audrey Hepburn fan! I think I have watched it 5 times already.
I  enjoy watching Fred stair dance.  He is a man a gift of dance. T he story with Audrey Hepburn adds to movie.
Audrey Hepburn is perfect for this movie and I enjoyed it very much.
It's Audry Hepburn at her best. It's a must have for the classic collector. Audry and Fred make an awsome dancing couple.
Great Audrey Hepburn movie and the back story of beautiful high fashion and light hearted songs.  A beautiful experience. Must see!
This was a Christmas gift for a fashionista who always loved the film.  I know it was the gift she wanted....who wouldn't?
I saw this movie when I was a young teen  and loved it. It reminds of the good old days with the old cars and music.
I love this kind of old B&W; Grade B movie, this one fits my style !So I may be ait &#34;prejudiced&#34; , ha.
It is nice to be able to watch a movie without worrying about bad language violence and scanty clothes that is both interesting and funny.
I enjoyed this movie, old movies are my thing.  It's a great movie for the kids to watch with you.
A great movie with it all--love story, drama, comedy and a slight mystery as to how things are going to turn out.  Best part any age can watch.
Very good movie. I have watched a lot of old movies but never saw this one before. I enjoyed it.
I have seen this movie a long time ago but I love it. It's cute and funny and has a great ending. So worth buying!!!!
Love, comedy, music, great stars and fun.This is a classic for everyone.Carey grant annoyed, but gracious, kind and in love.
This movie is loved by both me and my wife.  A must own for rainy days under a blanket on the couch.
From the very first time (many years ago) this movie still makes me smile. What a classic! Still waiting for Father Goose to come out, too.
I enjoy Gary Grant movies and this is a lot of fun to watch.  To see him trying to take care of kids which isn't his style is enjoyable.
Another one of Cary Grant's awesome movies.  I enjoy his style and the predicaments he finds himself in.  I can never get enough of this actor
Cary Grant is handsome and funny and romantic as he always is and will be in my mind. Even in his final years, he was an enigma.
Great movie!  Two of the best actors in the business!  The comedy is darling for a family movie.  Such entertainment that stands the test of time!
These two stars together bring dynamite to the screen. It is humorous, romantic, family oriented and just wonderful. The kids add a great dimension.
great old movie.  entertaining the way a movie should be.  love that cary grant and sofia loren is so beautiful!  love the dialog.
Sophia is lovely and charming, the kids are cute, Cary is perfect!  The story is predictable but fun and takes a few unexpected twists and turns.
Cary Grant and Sophia Loren are superb in this good old fashion classic.  I gave this movie a 5 star rating as well.  I enjoyed watching this movie.
Cary has played many parts in his career but being a funny man is some of his best work, this is a good family movie.
One of my favorite movie. I like Cary Grant as an actor and I love Sophia Lorenz, fantastic and funny movie.
I remember this movie when it first came out, it was a great movie then and has aged very well over the years. Heart warming and great family comedy.
The movie is fun and the DVD quality is very good for the price.
BUT THIS ONE, A VERY LIGHT AND FUN MOVIE FOR ALL TO SEE, IF YOU LIKE SOPHIA, SEE THIS ONE
A sweet story and you gotta love the kids.  Great acting and the scenes - just a good movie.  One you can watch for several times.
If you like Cary Grant, this is a good movie to watch.  It is very entertaining if you like that sort of movie
Loved this movie, romantic, fun, and child friendly. Who thought falling in love could be so much fun. Love Cary Grant!
Makes you laugh and cry. They are both so beautiful. They can both be so funny. Old movies are the best.
I thought it was a good movie, I wished they still made movies like this...  Quality was good also.  Thanks
I can watch this movie over and over.  I love Cary Grant with his dry sense of humor and Gina was gorgeous.  I loved the music too.
If you like Cary Grant then you'll like this movie it's funny heartwarming and a joy; I've seen it over 20 times and still enjoy it!
Our family has watched this movie many times. It is a favorite. Cary and Sophia in their prime. Outstanding story line.
One of the best Cary Grant movies. Have loved this movie since I was a kid, and have shared it since, with my kids.
I have already recommended this to many, many people. He's at the top of his 'handsomeness', she shows how talented she is and the kids are great.
An oldie but goodie!  I had not seen it before.  We enjoyed it very much.  Cary Grant &Sophia  Loren rare so good, we enjoyed every minute of it
Shipped quick and in great condition. Another childhood favorite that my kids now enjoy with me!! Recommended for all :0)
I've been dying to find this movie on DVD! It's a classic love story and it has a great soundtrack!
I love this movie.  It is scary what love can make us do for someone else and what it will make us do in order to keep that person.
I love this movie it one of my all time favorites. The DVD can in good condition and came really fast thank you so much. I will enjoy watching it.
This story is based on Theodore Drieser's story, An American Tragedy.  I strongly recommend the book first; then watch the movie.
This film is a masterpiece.  A moving story that shows morality.Whether poor or rich one must decide how to behave.Thank you
this is another classics movie i love elizabeth taylor she is a great actressmontgomery cliff is also great in this movie
Elizabeth Taylor is gorgeous...and Monty Cliff reminds me of James Dean in this movie.  And Shelly Winters is skinny!!!  Very cool!
A classic human tragedy. One of the best stories ever written, as to the loss of one's soul, and it's terrible effect on  family and friends.
I know these old classics are a little cheesy, but I love them so much.  I think it's Clift's best work.
Probably the saddest ending I have seen in a movie, but a great movie none the less. Raymond Burr was scary as hell!
it was suspenseful, loving and good acting....ending was not your regular Hollywood ending, (as one would want) but still, it was a fitting ending.
All around EXCELLANT.  Wish he could have won oner grace kelly but that would have ruined her characters image.  One of holdens best!  Loved it!
Grace Kelley plays a non-glamorous role very well - no wonder this won her an academy award!  Watching this made for a very pleasant evening at home.
This is one of Bing's best movies.  If you're expecting the happy go lucky Bing musical this is not it but shows Bing can really act.
I wanted to decide for myself whether Grace Kelly earned the Oscar she won for this movie.  My report:  She more than earned it!
an interesting adventure.  the interaction between parker's and heston's characters made me enjoy it.  it was moving and they were convincing. :)
This movie has a good plot, some serious action and yet really excels in exposing the charater of the hero and heroine.  I really enjoyed it.
loved this movie heston is a great actor  in any movie that he is in thanks for the great price
Another great Heston movie of the period. Good action and acting. I love the movie.
Naked Jungle (1954) [VHS] What a great classic film. Charleton Heston and Eleanor Parker are electrifying together. Definitely a "keeper".
Great vhs tape. Works fine.  Great movie with Charlton Heston saving his village from mass destruction. A Must watch :-)
I remember this movie from when I was a kid. It's a good movie (if you are in to 1950's type movies).
This was very well acted and Charlton Heston was great in it.  I found it to be an exciting love story.
Marabunta, Shmarabunta - who cares about all that.  It's worth ten times the price just to look at Eleanor Parker for two hours!
I saw this movie a while back -- can't remember when --- the scene with the soldier ants is amazing!
Charleton Heston was marvelous in everything he was in.  My boys (16 and 11) love this movie!  Wonderful!!!
a timeless classic movie. I first this movie many years ago and have been searching for it for some time. Amazon had it so I bought it. that simple.
i have always enjoyed this christmas movie.  it is one of the best for cosby and with all the cast.
Another wonderful Christmas movie.
Purchased this for our daughter for a pre-Christmas gift while she was deployed in the Middle East. Great quality and delivery.
This is one of my all time favorite Christmas movies. I look forward to seeing it each year and hope to one day introduce it to my nephews and niece.
It's wonderful to see anytime I'm on wifi, and the added closed captions are what I've been finally rewarded with.
One of my all time favorite movies and I watch it anytime through the year.  Clasic, traditional, feel good movie!  Wish I could dance like that!!!
A classic that can be enjoyed by every age of viewer, and viewed at any season of the year.  Sensatiional dance numbers.
I had the VCR and wanted the DVD because it is such a lovely Christmas story.
I received all four videos in a short period of time and in perfect condition. Thanks very much.
What is Christmas without watching White Christmas at least once?  Love to watch this movie every year -- it is a classic.
Don't miss out on passing a holiday tradition to the next generation. Fun and moral.values imange suck a thing from Hollywood today.
White ChristmasWho wouldn't love this movie?  It is a clasic that one can not watch too many times!!  It should be a part of everyones collection.
I am excited to have this for next Christmas, who knows I may watch them sooner!  Classics are always worth having and watching.
This is definitely a classic.  Good acting, good music and a heart warming story.
tradition and it's the best Christmas movie ever made. I could watch it over and over. It's the true meaning of Christmas others before self.
I love this movie. It is a movie I watch every Christmas. They don't make movies like this any more.  A MUST SEE !!!!
The old Christmas movies are always the best.  This one is one of my favorites.  You can't beat Bing Crosby!
I love the singing, the dancing,  and the true sense of giving that is shown in this movie. I watch it at least once a year.
It's an old favorite, and we love it! Yes, it's corny, but it has Danny Kaye, who was just a fantastic entertainer.
Beautiful, brand new, prefect condition. Made a great Christmas present for my mom last year in 2011. She loved it!
My daughters and I can't get through the holidays without seeing this all time favorite and classic!  I recommend it for all ages.
I've had the VHS tape for years; now I'm looking forward to watching this DVD as well as the included extras.
Such a great movie, I'm glad it's finally on dvd.  I remember the first time I hears Bing Crosby sing White Christmas, I was hooked.
The movie is great and I really enjoy this classic story.  The songs are wonderful and never get old to listen to.
this is one of all time best classic holiday movies.  we watch it every year at this holiday season. it's a fantastic musical.
Another annual must see is well done in blu-ray. Colors are great and what more can I say. Buy it and you won't miss it next time it's on.
Replacement of a worn VHS copy.  The extras associated with this DVD and the quality of the picture makes this an excellent buy.
A great movie that is funny, musical, and sentimental. This movie is for everyone who loves Christmas, music, funny scenes, and a happy ending.
No Christmas is complete without seeing Bing Crosby, Danny Kaye and others perform this Christmas Classic. A great family movie.
Truly a classic...... i never get tired of seeing this movie!  VHS is all worn out.. time to get the DVD!
I have a granddaughter who loves older movies.  This was the perfect present for her for Christmas.  She loved it.
I have this movie on VHS but it got missed placed in my recent move. This DVD  arrived in great condition. A must watch for the holidays
Good songs, nice dancing and costumes!  The movie has a nice holiday feeling to it.  Very enjoyable!  Well worth viewing.
an instant classic! The music is great!!! The characters are fun and have great chemistry with each other! Love watching!
I like this film a lot. It's my all time favorite film for the holidays. I like Bing & Danny's bantar.
Just saw it for the first time on Christmas Eve 2006 and I loved it.
This was one of the classics of Christmas on early TV.  It brought warmth, patriotism, music and a lovely romance into our homes each year.
it was a great movie and I watch the movie on tv and wanted it for my Christmas collection. Watch it on  Christmas
Bought for a friend who had never seen this classic holiday movie.  We watched it and in the end they loved it as much as i always have.
Finally after years of advertisement. I've watched this program. Wonderful if you hunger for the classics.
Although aged in movie standards, it withstands thetime elements And is refreshing for the old but youngat heart for the modern gerneration.
Bing Crosby, Danny Kaye classic Christmas movie, great story line. Danny Kaye plays great role of instigator.
Best Christmas musical ever made.  Wonderful, full of fantastic dance numbers, and great singing.  Tons of popular songs came from this movie!
Can you really celebrate christmas without watching the classic movie White Christmas. This is a fun movie for young and old. A tradition in my home.
I love this movie and I now have it on DVD. I love watching all of the Christmas moves during the Holidays.
Item was great and it was as described. I am happy with my purchase and I would recommend to a friend.
I am very happy with this dvd. I love movies with Bing Crosby in it and was not disappointed.I would recommend it to everyone
What ever can you say about White Christmas?  It's just a classic.  Bing Crosby and Rosemary Clooney, two of the great voices.
I viewed Irving Berlin's &#34;White Christmas&#34; recently.  Beautiful color and sound with extras, this is the one to buy.  Enjoy!
an old classic movie which I still enjoy watching over and over. was  packaged well and arrived sooner then expected. Thankyou
Love the movie "White Christmas."  I had no problems in ordering, receiving, etc.  New condition as described and in good time.
White Christmas is a Christmas classic. I've watched it every year on Thanksgiving since I was born, and will until I die!
Anything with Bing in it, wonderful story, wonderful music, wonderful dancing.  A great Christmas classic, must add to your library.
Its your classic movie favorite remastered, upscaled and preserved for future generations. Great movie and good memories to share with others.
I watch this multiple times through out the year.One of the best classics I know.Bing Crosby's voice is a delight!
Now I dont have to hope the network will broadcast it around the holidays each year. Good color, true to the original.
White Christmas not only has a wonderful holiday season scenery to it, but the music is perfect for the holiday season.
Another one of our holiday favorites, we will now be able to watch year round.  This is a fantastic family film with great values.
What's not to love about this movie? It makes me feel good every time I watch it.........
This was great!  I got it on time and my students enjoyed watching it.Thank you.
Loved it. Great classic.  Winter is complete with White Christmas.  I recommend watching the movie on a cold winter day.  Enjoy!
The most Amazing Classic Movie in the World. This movie can never be recreated. you can't ever change this I LOVE IT
After all these years, Bing Crosby's voice is mighty nice and the dancing is so well done. What a lovely, whimsical classic this movie is!
All of these movies were purchased as gifts and the recipients were all wonderfully delighted to recieive them this year.
A great classic family movie for all ages. This is a movie that will last thru the years. The color and sound quality are awesome.
What a film, what a cast.  I love hearing Rosemary Clooney reminisce and the film is even more terrific than I remember it from my childhood.
Had a VCR tape of it and wanted to get the DVD. It is is wonderful, how can it not be with the cast it has.
Grew up listening to Bing Crosby and always loved this wonderful movie!  Very glad I was able to get it on DVD now.
I was so happy to find this movie, I wait to watch it every year at Christmas, it's a family tradition for our extended family.
Watching a live performance of this could not have been much better than this updated version. Sound quality is excellent and the color phenomenal.
Wonderful Movie, great quality on dvd.  I have wanted this dvd in my Christmas collection for a long time and the price was right.
One of the best Christmas movies I've ever seen. Great family entertainment and definitely worth the money spent. Great acting.
THE PICTURE IS SO CLEAR THAT YOU JUST DON'T WANT TO GO BACK TO VHS.IT IS SO VIVID THAT IT IS ALMOST LIKE BEING THERE.
I have always enjoyed this movie. We watched it when I was little and now 4 generations watch it together on Christmas Eve.
One of my wife's all-time favorite (sentimental) movies.  Decent job on the remaster, and we enjoy watching it every Christmas Season.
We try to watch this classic every Christmas and now we own it!  This is a wonderful edition - clear and quality picture and sound. Thank you.
This is my favorite Christmas movie. The music is great, the story line is fabulous. This is what Christmas should be
This movie, like other Christmas classics, is a must watch around Christmas time. I enjoy seeing it once a year.
This is one of my favorite holiday classics of all time. The sound was excellent and the way they recolored the pictures gave the movie a new flair.
One of my favorite Christmas movies! This version came in beautiful packaging and would make a great gift. Love it!
The Best Christmas Movie Ever. I love all the actors. To bad that we can't do that in our time frame of today, helping a officer of the military
This classic delights our family every time we watch it.  A movie to be enjoyed by all ages.  It is fun to watch every year, never get tire of it!!!
We love the old musicals and this one was missing from our collection .... It was great to watch it again
We watch this once a year.  This played very well, color and sound was wonderful, no complaints on the quality.
Loved this movie.  Had watched pieces of it on television through the years/  Great watching it from beginning to end.
This is one of the best Christmas movies of all time.  This Blu-Ray version, with all of its special features is the best of the best!!
Love the oldies but goodies!  Bing Crosby and Danny Kaye were great in this holiday classic!It is a holiday tradition in my  house!
Great holiday classic for the whole family.  I love the songs and the show. Blu ray makes the colors pop on this old classic.
This is the first movie I ever owened with Bing Crosby! I like it!
I love watching  White Christmas. I grow up with my parents always watching it at Christmas. It was one of my dad's favorite ones to watch.
The movies puts me in the Christmas sprit! They don't make movies like this anymore. The music is wonderful ! Dancing great !
A perennial favorite.  America's Christmas favorite classic.  DVD quality is good and the price was much cheaper than other places.
I watch this one every year just before Christmas.  Bing Crosby and Danny Kaye and good music.  A very good show!
its a classic  still holds up well in todays modern worldIt is a purchase for a friend who is creating a library of classic movies ..now on DVD
This is my daughters favorite movie. I bought it for her. She loves the movie. All in all it is a good movie.
A classic, at least in my household Christmas wouldn't be Christmas without it. The cast is stellar and the songs are priceless.
This should be a must for every household.  It is an excellent Holiday film all the family can watch and enjoy.
I havent seen this one yet but my wife says its a good one so I bought it on her behalf. thank you amazon
Still one of the best Christmas movies out there same catagory as Christmas carol, Wonderful Life and henry Winkler in an American Christmas
Great movie showing floor show type acts of the 50's. Danny Kaye and Bring Crosby do a great job!One of the have to watch movies for Christmas.
Very romantic, good, beautiful movie, about real people - in they's best, how they shoud be....  &#34;Fairytale&#34;, and really good one.
Solid film filled with fun, energy and classic storytelling. The background shots of Rome are fantastic and the characters are engaging.
Debonair Gregory Peck and classy Audrey Hepburn make this a wonderful movie to watch over and over. I Love it.
This video was in excellent condition and your mailing was very quick.  Thank you!
Not as fast paced as today's movie story telling, but it is a classic romance - clean - some humor and a well written and beautifully filmed movie.
This movie arrived even faster that I had imagined.  Can't wait for a long girls weekend (camping) to enjoy this!
ROME WAS SHOWN WELL IN THIS PICTURE AND THE STORY WAS WONDERFUL.  PECK AND HEPBURN MADE THIS ROMANCE WORK WELL.
Love this movie! What a great pair. If you are a fan of either Audrey or Gregory it's a to see movie.
This film is a classic movie staring my favorite actress of all time.Audrey Hepburn....Do I need to say anymore?
Beautiful fantasy about a princess who escapes her controlled life. Anything with Gregory Peck and Audrey Hepburn are always worth watching.
This film is the sweetest, most lovable romantic film ever. This film encouraged my uncle to become a reporter!
Has been so long since I've seen this, I couldn't remember it. What a lovely lovely movie. Hits the right note all through.
A beautiful very visual tour de force of Rome seen through the eyes of a runaway princess. Excellent cast as well as a touching love story.
I love this movie. I want on blu-ray, please.Audrey Hepburn and Gregory Peck did an amazing couple. It is refreshing and funny. Very lovely.
This is a timeless classic movie. I love watching it again and again. Audrey Hepburn and Gregory Peck are marvelous.
I love Audrey Hepburn and this is one of my favorites! It has great acting and is girly and humorous.
This is one of the most delightful movies to watch time and again.  It never palls., and Audrey Hepburn's Oscar was well-deserved
I've always loved this movie - anything with these two actors has to be good!  This is a great movie - very cute and touching!
great movie. i love aufrey and couldnt be happier with this purchase never seen it untill i bought and and im glad i did.
both stars are at there best in there acting in this video/movie. the sceenery is excellant and appealing to one
I really enjoyed it! Gregory Peck and Audrey Hepburn were so cute together! I would definitely say watch it! Two thumbs up!
This was a nice movie, I really liked Audrey Hepburn, she is elegant and convincible in her role. This was a film purely filmed in Rome.
This is a wonderful Romantic Comedy that is filmed all around Rome. My teenagers even liked watching this and they don't like black and white films.
Roman Holiday is a beautiful movie with a young Audrey Hepburn playing a Princess having fun in Rome with Gregory Peck.
I liked it and remember it as a kid. I think that those who think Wayne couldn't act or flat wrong.AGP
The hijinx of an island band of people trying to protect the island doctor and his family. It will keep you laughing!
really funny and lots of fun for the whole family.My family laughed so hard! We would tell everyone to buy it
It has been awhile since I saw this movie, but I love John Wayne in anything, but love him in comical roles.
This movie is a classic but still a wonderful movie!  Lots of typical John Wayne swagger, fists, and general fun!
This is one John Wayne that can be enjoyed over and over. Hey, it is not a western but it certainly is one of his best movies ever made.
I love the cast in this one!!! It is definantly a comedy and I really love this one!!  you have to see it!
A great John Wayne movie.  It's a movie a lot of people over look (not the typical action movie).  But great story line and the scenery is fantastic.
DVD arrived in good condition.  How can you not love &#34;The Duke'?  John Wayne & Lee Marvin spin an enjoyable story about life on Pacific island.
I am a John Wayne fan so this was on my view list. Great family movie. No sex, no violence, and no bad language. Just a wholesome entertaining movie.
I love itI love itI love itI love itI love itI love itgreat move for kids and adolets
Wonderful John Wayne family favorite for Christmas. Beautiful music and scenery plays well on Kindle Fire mini. great Prime benefit
This has to be the best John Wayne movie ever! It is action packed and very, very funny!! I highly recommend this to any John Wayne fan!!
On time, functional, bargain price, makes 62 of 169 movies in my John Wayne collection. Thanks for selling this to me
Another different Kind of role for John Wayne with the role of children in this movie, I would recommend this movie to anyone
What can I say if you like the Duke you'll like this if not you should skip it. I'm a fan I loved it and Lee Marvin was an added bonus.
good comedy. provides alot of laughter. just enjoyable to watch for everyone in family.also like island location. reminded me of my trip to hawaii
The Quiet Man [VHS]This is a fun movie. If like the fight in The Quiet Man. You like the fightin Donovan`s Reef.
THIS IS A FUNNY MOVIE.  IT HAS HEART AND A GREAT STORY.  I LOVED THE MUSIC AND LAUGHED UNTIL MY SIDES HURT AT TIMES.
This movie is classic John Wayne, with a lot of humor thrown in.  I enjoyed it, as I never got to see it when it was at the theaters.  Thanks!
John wayne movie ultimate entertainment. Enjoyable story line and actors working well with each other. Strong frienships and always meaning well.
This is one of the funniest John Wayne movies, great laughs, more for adults though. Very light hearted and comical.
One of the Duke's best, along with McClintock and North to Alaska.  He was bigger than life in my early days and a true patriot!
Another gift purchase.  A fun film directed by John Ford.  Lots of Ford regulars like Ward Bond, and John Wayne.  You will enjoy this
Its just a great story, gtreat actors and a happy ending too. Love Lee Marvin in this one - boats and guns. all navy stuff.
This a great movie. John Wayne has played many roles in movies and this was one of his greats to me.
Among Wayne's very best.  The supporting cast performed their parts in a most delightful way.  It ranks just below True Grit, and better than Hondo
If you want to watch a movie that makes you smile or laugh, then this is the movie.  I don't think John Wayne ever turned out a bad movie.
Another different John Wayne movie. Good cast, story, and wonderful location!  A must for the John Wayne fan.
What can we say?  It's John Wayne who is the same in any role!  Funny, serious and another Classic for the &#34;Duke&#34;!
John Wayne brings goofy, funny, good natured action as only the Duke of Films can accomplish. Great for the whole family with parental guidance.
One of Wayne's best, and a comedy at that.  He really had great comedic timing, and pairing him with Lee Marvin was downright ingenious.
Would recommend it to everyone. It is fun entertainment and easy to watch.  I am a John Wayne fan and like almost all of his movies.
John Wayne, Lee Marvin and Dorthy Lamour, what more could you want.  Another enjoyable John Wayne film set on a beautiful South Seas island.
This is one of John Wayne's best movies, along with the Quiet Man. I like his westerns and such but these are anexample he could play other parts.
A great movie to watch to forget your troubles or to watch when the weather is cold and snowy outside.
Great old movie.  John Wayne at his loveable best!  Great supporting cast.  Perfect addition to my John Wayne movie collection. Wonderful fun!
Just loved this movie with one of my favorite actors,along with Lee Marvin,Jack Warden, and Caesar Romaro on beautiful isles in the Pacific.
Another classic John Wayne movie. A little bit challenging for or young grand kids but a great family movie which we enjoyed.
Excellent movie John Wayne has always been one of my favorite actors and with Lee Marvin it is truly enjoyable
This was a favorite of mine and my Daddy's.  I was surprised to find it still available after all these years.
This fun film is timeless.  True entertainment in the John Wayne tradition.  Great for the entire family on any night.
Everything that I thought it would be. You won't be disappointed if you buy this movie, John Wayne is great in this movie.
This movie is a funny, enjoyable south seas adventure movie.  The acting is excellent and the characters are well played.
This is another good one with kids.  Show how we should raise are kids.  Not are kids running us.  Wish I could go back in time to the good old days
Great movie. Funny, romantic, makes you want to take the first plane to Polynesia.
I LOVE OLD FILMS ESPECIALLY ANYTHING FEATUREING JOHN WAYNE THE SEARCHERS BEING MY ALL TIME FAVORITE BUT THIS GOOD FILM.
It is the duke in a rare non cowboy roll and as long as he isnt playing as a 6 ft 5 inch asian conqueror then it is a great movie.
one of the duke's few comedies. good match with lee marvin who usually plays a tough guy.
Why can't they make movies like this anymore!DVD came in great condition, played without any problems and enjoyed the movie, thanks again.
excellent plot, great movie, great acting.  Some of these old movies are my favorites.  Awesome scenery, no need for special effects.
Beautiful, seductive and thrilling move you will want to watch over end over again. Grace Kelly was one of the most beautiful women.
Not only are the actors especially well-suited to the roles they play, but the plot is riveting.  I love the subtle humor
To Catch a Thief, is an outstanding move and has great performances by both Gary Grant and Grace Kelley. It is a perfect move to watch with your wife
Great scenery in the movie. Very good blend of suspense and light comedy. Grace Kelly is probably one of the best looking women ever.
I love Hitchcock and Cary Grant who could want more . Look for Hitchcock it's fun .  Grace Kelly is beautiful  .
I wish they still made movies with class like this one. Great style and locations. Iconic actors. I'd recommend this film to anyone.
I like just about all cary grant movies. This is one of my favorites if you like this one I would also recomend charade and north by northwest
lavish production, setting in south of France, suberb performances by entire cast--what's not to love? should be part of everyone's video library.
This is a fine Hitchcock film, with Cary Grant and Grace Kelly at their best.  Story is exciting and has humor as well as adventure.
It's a classic, has a good story line, features great actors, and has a slight twist at the end to titillate the amateur.
I am bias.  Grace Kelly amazing and always liked Grant in anything.  He is who George Clooney hopes to be when he grows up.
One of my favorite movies.. Great cast in an awesome Hitchcock who-done-it..  I will never tire of watching this film..
I just watched it over the weekend and I felt like I've never seen it before (actually have seen it about ten times).
A classic.  Everyone should see this excellent movie.  Full of suspense yet no violence as only Alfred Hitchcock can do.
What can I say?  I love Cary Grant movies and this is one you must have in your collection if you like Cary Grant.
The very best romance with a touch of &#34;who knows what&#34; is he really the &#34;CAT&#34; or is it someone we least suspect?A super movie.
Fantastic acting.  A lot of action and great romantic scenes. Cary Grant & Princess Grace do well together.  Fun movie.
Hitchcock movies are among my favorites and this is certainly up there. The chemistry between Grant and Kelly is wonderful. Good movie.
Outstanding mystery and suspence movie. Cary Grant was one of the best actors of his time.
Hitchcock at his best:  suspense, humor, style, and charisma.  The versatile Cary Grant, the beautiful Grace Kelly, and a wonderful supporting cast.
This classic Cary Grant movie is sensational!!  I'd advise this selection for your personal movie library.
ONE OF MY FAVORITES. A MOVIE THAT I HAVE SEEN MANY TIMES. I AM ALSO NOTICE HOW BEAUTIFUL GRACE KELLY WAS. THE MOVIE COLORS ARE FANTASTIC.
Cary grant is a fav of mine and grace Kelly is such a class act....could watch this movie several times over
A good mystery story that keeps you guessing.  Also a nice love story.  I recommend it.  Top acting by super stars.
Another of those oldies that gives a great deal of pleasure to watch. An old story even then it is still used in many ways today. You will enjoy it.
A classic... He is fantastic in this film.  Watch it and pay close attention to all the details.  You'll watch it over and over again!
Full of suspense, charm, and even wit. And what can be said about Cary Grant and Grace Kelly? Worth every moment spent watching it.
How can you go wrong with Carey Grant and Grace Kelly? This is as good as it gets - don't miss it.
My favourite Cary grant movie - and now in widescreen format so you can actually see what's going on!  What more could you ask for?
A truly great and wonderful movie.  Another old favourite.  Cary Grant and Grace Kelly are both great in this movie.
What is not to like with Cary Grand and Grace Kelly? The scenery was splendid and the little car she drove...I want one!
They don't make them like this anymore! Two great stars, a fantastic supporting cast, and the wit that is not written today.
Absolutely love &#34;the future mother in law&#34; and thoroughly enjoy this Hitchcock classic with such smart writing and two outstanding actors.
This is another movie I absolutely adore.  I don't think it has been released yet because I haven't received it yet.  But I'm not worried.
I was very happy with this video.  It is one of the best.  I was pleased with the service I received.
Every movie that I saw with Cary Grant is just perfect. He is a great actor, and Grace Kelly is lovely!
This a great old classic.  We enjoyed watching it again.  The suspense was there as in all Alfred Hitchcock movies.
With Cary Grant, Grace Kelly and Alfred Hitchcock how can you go wrong. Still Great. Would recommend it to anyone who loves movies.
another great classic film to watch, i enjoy it very dearly. and such a great price. i'll advise everyone to watch it
A favorite of mine. Very fun and beautiful to watch  Grace Kelly is so elegant.  Cary Grant is so classy.  Fun story line.  Beautiful costumes
This movie has it all acting,directing, writing and Cary Grant! Definitely a favorite that wil be watched over and over again.
Hitchcock, Cary Grant, fantastic color, beautiful scenery (including Grace Kelly); they really don't make 'em like this anymore.
This movie has always has been one of my all time favorites and glad to see that Amazon has it available.
LOVE, love, love this movie. What a great price for a hard to find movie.
THIS IS ONE OF MY HUSBANDS FAVORITE MOVIES AND HE JUST COULD'N WAIT TO SEE IT IN BLUE RAY. IT IS TERIFFIC,
Wonderful picture and color clarity. The sound is crisp, well worth getting it in bluray. A classic movie that is timeless.
What can you say about a classic DVD. It's a great addition to my collection.
Can not beat these oldies.Great acting, beautiful scenery.Overall good story.Would love to see more flicks in this genre.
I love the fact that they made this movie together, both of them being so talented and beautiful.  The plot was absolutely awesome.  A real classic!
I enjoyed the movie very much as Gary Grant is an actor I like very much. The story was good and I would recommend it .
I would recommend this film to young and old alike. The extras included on the DVD are entertaining as well as informative. pop the corn and enjoy.
Very fine copy of an all time classic.  The lead actors are stunning and the writing is outstanding.
Love the easy banter between the characters.  And who doesn't love Cary Grant?  He makes all his leading ladies look better.
Cary Grant and Grace Kelly were beautiful together, even with the large age difference.  The scenery alone makes this movie worth having.
I love CG so I love all his movies....they make me smile, make me think of good things, and just happy
I love Alfred Hitchcock films and I love Cary Grant so this was just another addition to my collection! :D
My favorite all time movie! A classic! Cary Grant and Grace Kelly! The French Riviera, an Alfred Hitchcock movie! Mystery, action, intrigue!
A movie everyone should have in their library. The scenery of the Riviera beautiful, one of Alfred  Hitchcock's best efforts.
Of course this is a classic.But the best scene is at Grace Kelly's door, when Cary Grant says good night to her.  Her reaction.
Sorta dumb plot but there's no denying the chemistry the have for each other.  I love their acting off each other whether dumb plot or not.
I enjoyed the light hearted movie starring the ever beautiful Audrey Hepburn. The Paris background made it even better.  Great!
I purchased this as a gift for a twenty something - as she requested. She just loves these old classics.
Y^ou will like this movie so much you will want to buy more of Jerry 's movies I will soon
We love movies with Jerry Lewis, Don Knotts, Tim Conway, Etc!  This is great clean family entertainment at its best.
this is a good old movie just let your self go  and laugh tell your side hurts its verry funny
Another Jerry classic fun movie.  You just have to sit back and relax to enjoy it and you get guaranteed laughs!
I haven't watched the video...I gave it as a gift to a Jerry Lewis lover!  However, I appreciate the low price and fast delivery!  Thanks!
Terrific movie, -very- well done.  Now if I could figure out how to save it I'd be glad I spent 9 bucks for it.  That's just too much for one view.
Unbelievable. One of the best movies ever made and not even a whisper about a new release. Yet we get releases of TV shows like Full House. SAD.
Cornel Wilde is an excellent actor and and he proves it. This film is located in 1800's Africa and is an exciting movie to watch.
I remember watching this Movie as a kid babysitting on a Saturday night and I loved it then--I am so glad it is on DVD.
Great adventure.Funny and entertaining...Too bad so many animals had to get attackedbefore Clint killed him.Good Bye!
This is a wonderful movie that has both action and good family values.  The little girl is so cute and the Dad is really good looking.
We were so excited when this was released on Dvd!! Clint Walker is such a classy actor! Also the little girl is shall we say "priceless".
Clink Walker is my man any and every movie he has been in I have loved it. And this one is my top choice.
One of Clint Walkers finest! Reminds me of a Disney film! When Clint takes his shirt off,is Mom's favorite scene! Great family film!
I had it in my library of movies for years but it walked out the door and never came back. Just had to have it for the grandchildren and me.
if you like Clint Walker and Grizzlies then you will love this movie, alot of adventure and nail biting alittle sad but an all around terrific movie!
Great Movie.  Good for general audience. Great acting and amazing scenery..  It was thrilling and a good family movie.  I would recommend this movie.
does show animals killed--bit in general is a good movie from the older days--good acting and great wholesome show, price is worth it
I really enjoy seeing Steve McQueen in westerns. His strong silent type hero serves him well in this movie. The ultimate western revenge movie.
A must have in a western / Steve McQueen collection - a forgotten classic.
A classic Steve McQueen western movie that I've seen about 8 times and I NEVER get tired of watching it.
Item was as described or better, arrived very quickly, professionally packed. Recommended. classic McQueen western Nevada Smith.
Just filling out my McQueen library..God Bless America! .God Bless America! .God Bless America! .God Bless America!
Another movie with the actors giving performances of very high very levels. It is very entertaining and worth the time to watch.
Glad to have this added to my Steve McQueen film collection.  Picture quality is very good.  ANd the price was more than right ....
This is a delightful film. Wonderful because it's loyal to the Tennessee Williams one act. Wonderful story of Willy and her slant on life.
You rarely hear of this movie but it is definitely, in this writer's opinion, the best movie Natalie Wood ever made!
It was just really nice to see a well developed plot, great acting and a story that kept my interest throughout.
Great movie with Robert Redford and Natalie Wood. This is my favorite Natalie Wood movie.  I had to have it for my collection.
What a wonderful movie bringing these two great stars together!!  Love the history on it and it is another treasured addition to my collection!!
This was a great movie! Robert Redford and Natalie Wood at their best. I find something new in it every time I watch it.
Sire wish they made movies like this now instead of the trash we are subjected to with all the obsebe dialog.
Great movie for Natalie Wood fans.  My husband is a big fan and enjoyed this one tremendously.  Great buy  for this household.
I could not find this movie anywhere.  This copy is in very good condition and I enjoyed watching it even though it was not as good as the book.
Very fast dancing just like my zumba!  Arrived fast and in perfect shape!  Great new addition to my Elvis collection happily stated!
This was the last of the movies by Elvis that I needed to complete my collection of Elvis movies. Fabulous!
I saw this movie years ago and loved it.  I still love it and enjoy all the actors in it.  I recommend this to everyone.
The plot is a circus setting - absolute all star cast.  Great movie if you like the old ones.  Not quite Moses but a great part for him.  RIP.
Who doesn't like a circus movie great color and I loved all the animals, costumes scenes just beautiful, will watch it over and over again!
I liked the movie it is Great. Cecil B. Demile movies are some of the best movies you can get. This movie has great actors in it.
One of the best movies that shows what a circus life was like back then and also shows what people can achieve if they put their minds to it.
This was a great movie about the big top. The inside of the circus that few get a chance to see.This was a winner in every sense of the word.
Big Charlton Heston fan, have most of his movies. I looked a long time for this movie on DVD. It is very good movie
This movie is a classic and has all the best actors in it. This movie is circus with excitement,drama and more.  Good movie to see.
This movie absolutely rocks.....what else can you say other than it is a good story and a good buy!  If you buy....you wont be sorry....
I saw this movie long ago and wanted it, I like Heston in just about everything I have seen him in.Jimmy S. is great in this too.
A very wonderful story that was very well palyed by all and very clear, almost a clear as BluRay - yes
He is a great actor and the movie about circus is one of the greatest. The oldies need to be shown to the younger people. They never get old.
I  have been waiting to see this movie again for a long time. Im so glad I found it. Thank u.
Received this DVD in a timely manner.  I haven't played it yet, but it looks to be in excellent condition.
One of the true classics, with an all star cast.  What could be better than that!  No swearing or nudity!Patricia Q
If you are a circus tent fan then this is a must see. Love every minute of it. Great movie Classic
Great movie with Charlton Heston doing what he does. Also had Jimmy Stewart in it. Very enjoyable movie and a load of fun for the whole family.
This movie is just plain old fun.  Nothing too deep or serious to weight it down, you just enjoy it from start to finish.
This disc is like a brand new movie. I've never seen this film as clear, and that includes viewing it in the theater when it came out.
This is what I like in a romance Movie lot of action that happen in it plus drama to add up love their!!
I love safaris and John Wayne so this was a natural love movie for me.  The cast was great together.  The humor added also to a great story line.
Love the old John Wayne movies.  A lot of the same actors play in John Wayne's movies so you feel like you know them already.
GREAT FUN WITH JOHN WAYNE BEING HIMSELF . SEEING AFRICA AS IT ONCE WAS IS WORTH THE PRICE LOOKS GREAT AS ABLU RAY
One of John Waynes best movies in my opinion lots of action while they are catching animals for a zoo
John Wayne movie.... need I say more? I guess I do since it won;t let me submit on those few words. hahahaha
This is a great John Wayne movie.Funny and full of fantastic animal scenes.Movie came on time and as described.Thank you.
An Action packed movie with a lot of laughter mingled in. A great cast. One of my favorite John Wayne films
Love John Wayne and loved this movie.  I really wish they made more movies that were entertaining like this one.
I have loved this movie since it first came out.  There is plenty of action and romance without anyone being killed or x-rated scenes.
A new twist for John Wayne the all around worlds greatest cowboy.  Very fun movie and lots of action hunting wild animals in Africa.  Great movie.
One of John Wayne's best efforts.  The animal scenes are terrific and the Henry Mancini score is renowned.Paul Baragona  Raleigh, NC  USA
thanks for the quick service . we enjoyed it greatly . we are john wayne fans . would recamend  .
This is another great one of John Wayne's movies that are funny and so entertaining.  Everyone has a great time in the movie.
John Wayne movies are great for families!  Hatari is no exception.  The fun and the animals add to this movie to make it great for the kids.
This was purchased for a friend who could not find a copy anywhere, so I ordered it for him and he loves it, watches it over and over.
This was a awsome movie love the oldies.  Better then watching the garbage on tv.  We need to go back to the old values.
I am a big John Wayne fan and this is one of his best.  Can't recommend it enough!  Though, most of his movies are awesome!
I ENJOY JOHN WAYNE FILMS THE SEARCHERS BEING MY FAVORITE BUT THIS IS A GOOD FILM SEEING HOW ITS DIFFERENT.
Not blessed with a deep plot, the movie is visually stunning and the actors appear to be enjoying themselves. Well worth watching.
One of my favorite movies. And is on my top ten list of great movies of all time. Love it A+..
Always been a Paul Newman Fan. But this is one of his best i think. He Plays a good playboy for a time that kind of thing didn't happen.
watch the great performances by Patricia Neal and Melvyn Douglas .  Paul Newman plays a perfect cad.  Must see for film buffs.
The perpetual misunderstandings between father and son is chilling.  Passed up by Academy but one of the truly memorable films. .
This is one of Paul Newman's best characters rather early in his career.He was always good, but this is one of his best.
anything with Paul Newman will be a good watch and this one is a classic movie to watch over and over again
Paul Newman at his best. Patricia Beal has that quality about her that makes you like her immediately. Very entertaining.
...one of Newman's finest, bless his heart.  Paul couldn't do a bad job of acting if he tried.  Dang good film.
I have been looking for this movie for years on DVD. Great western comedy staring two wonderful actors. Again why is there a minimum word count?
The is one of those outstanding comedic masterpieces of Jerry Lewis that is historic.  He is one of the best at physical comedy.
We purchased this movie as it is rarely shown on TV.  It is a very funny movie and Jerry Lewis is hilarious (which he is in all of his movies).
Crazy Jerry Lewis.  I love him so. They don't make movies like this anymore. He is one funny character and will always be one of my favorites.
Classic Jerry Lewis humor.  Can be enjoyed by people of all ages without being classified for adults only.
Always loved this movie.  Brings back good memories from my childhood. I was always a Jerry Lewis fan.  He was at his best.
Jerry Lewis is a fantastic actor and comedian. In this one he shows just how well he can play both sides. Stell Stevens is bad either.
he was creative, hilarious, talented in all his actions. He is one of the best of all time comedy( without dean martin)
Love me some JL, this movie if made today would still be relevant.  JL is one of the best because he really is...
Jerry Lewis is funny.  I owned this movie on VHS but had to have it on DVD.  Buy it, you'll like it!
This is the kind of miovies i like, very enojuyable and funny loads, and loads of laughs thank you very ,much
jerry lewis acts the part very well, but i like jerry lewis anyway. it is a good romance movie. love it.
You must see this movie, you and your family will enjoy it and laugh out-loud 100%.May I should see it one more time.
I always wanted a copy of this movie the first time i had seen it as a kid. now i have 1. Thanks!
I like Jerry Lewis, he is such a great actor. This movie is one of my favorite of his and I will watch more.
This movie, in my opinion, is one of the best movies Jerry ever made. At 70, I grew up with Dean Martin-Jerry Lewis.
After the our man flint movies I felt he could not beat that acting but I was wrong truly an excellent movie.
This was a very funny movie.  The cast was awesome. It was a wonderful film.  Every one should see it,
great picture would buy from here again this is a very old christian movie but this dvd was not expensive and it has great quality too
This is a classic film and I never get tired of watching it! It is wonderfully done for the era!
I received is Dvd and enjoying it very much , it is a 1950 classic . I first saw it at a drive in outdoor theater .Thanks
This is an excellent classic.  Great special effects bring this story to life.  Everyone should watch this movie.  It is great for the whole family.
Victor Mature and Hedy Lamar in a wonderful film.  Action, romance and biblical all in one fantastic movie.  This one is as good when first released.
This was a gift to my friend but i also liked the movie i am waiting for it to be put on blu ray.
Recall seeing it as a child and so it was nostalgic as well as fascinating. Great for today as well as tomorrow and forever.
I first saw this movie when I was in the 3rd grade, and it thrilled me then. I think it is a classic in Bible stories.
another biblical movie that has come to life its interesting to see the bible come to life i can watch it over and over
For the color alone....it was OUTSTANDING.Compared to most of today's trash....The story and actors are top notch.Excellent purchase at any price.
one of those great bible classics, really good one of better ones because love story and good acting and good sets etc
Good movie, decent picture quality, but not HD or Blue Ray.  As for what it is, its a five star.
Strong representation of the Bible story with great actors and actresses.  Wonderful addition to my collection of movies that are timeless.
Extremely well done. So impressed I purchased the movie on Apple TV. PURE enjoyment. Highly recommended. A MUST SEE. Loved it.
The picutre transfer is outstanding ... One of the better 50's movies made and I hope the studios release more of the classics
Another epic from the movie master, C.B. DeMille. Well cast, well directed. A credit to Mr. DeMille, with an assistance from the Bible.
Set in Bible era. Exceptional movie and cast. I would recommend to anyone. You can watch it  again and again.It is that kind of movie.
Seeing Victor Mature playing this role its one of the best. The one most important things about this movie its from the Bible.
It was a great movie and Victor was a good looking leading man and he played a great roll I like him in Bible movies best.
Just another one of Cecil B. DeMille's fantastic films. Had to get it to add up to my classic movie collection and did not dissappoint.
Always a favorite of mine, due to the director, who is not better in history.the best that i think that ever made motion pictures.
It's so great to be able to watch this on my computer, as well as on my DVD player at home.
Another good Biblical classic from the forties, Glad to have it in my Library. DVD and packaging was excellent. Audio and video was good.
a classic sci fi movie.  set in the future with Jane Fonda its racy and interesting and a classic.  super sexual at times.
Great Classic Movie, Saw it years ago, Jane Fonda at a very early age. Well Worth the price to see it again, Years ahead of it's time
A must-own for all Jane Fonda fans; she was glamous and the musical score in the film was brilliant, too
Bought just to see it again. It's been awhile. It's an old movie one of the first for Jane Fonda. Good old movie not great.
the package arrived in great timing. the packaging was great no damaging to item. the dvd played well. good buy.
this is one of the greatest b-movies ever.  its goofy, sexy and surreal.  other than "she" (good luck finding it), this is my favourite.
IF you can over-look her NAM past this is still an enjoyable piece of SCI-Fi  camp.
Very satisfied with the movie and of course with Jane Fonda. It has always been and will always be one of my cult favorites.
An Early Jane Fonda movie - surprisingly well done.  I love seeing her spinning around naked.
didnt know what to really expect from this when i bought it. it was very funny,and extremely cheesy. need more films as fun as this one
A definate reflection of decades past movie technology, but it was done well none the less and kept the attention span.
Jane Fonda half naked for over an hour?  I spell that A-W-E-S-O-M-E!It's a love letter to her from her husband, the director.
i saw this movie when i was in my teens,and thought it sexy fun;and it still is both of those. pure fantasy.
what can I say fantasy plus get to see jane fonda naked so you really cant go wrong with this film a must see
What can you say, good trashy Sci-Fi campy fun.  As good as it was when it came out.  Don't miss it.
Love this movie and am glad be able to see it whenever I like! Hope my friends like it too.
Just the opening credits is worth the price of the movie.  A rather young Jane Fonda set the pace for the absolutely crazy movie.
I've had the DVD version of this for years, and now have the Blu-ray! I've compared them both and can say the Blu-ray version is definitely sharper.
love the cast and characters and story. I watched this movie long time ago and my favorite character is tyrant!
I enjoy the risqu&eacute; in this movie. For a nerd like me this flick shows me the stuff. It is not bad for Christians to watch.
Greetings All, What a great movie, picture was nice and clean. Sound was wonderful. Glad to have this in my collection! Cheers, William
I had this movie on VHS so I had to have it on DVD. It differs from the book but it is so good anyway.
A real sleeper; not as socially engaging as it could have been -- but a realbreakthrough for the time.
This original movie is so much better than the newer ones.  This is the type of movie to add to a family collection.  You'll love it!
of, course, this is a classic, as far as I am concerned, can't beat Jack Lemmon, no matter what he does, he does it well!!!
Anything with Jack Lemon is worth watching.  The female counter was a good foil for his antics her strong acting helped carry the film.
Jack Lemon was born to play this role. A great snapshot of what some days are like. There is little exaggerating either.
One of the best comedies ever shot, with a great cast and everything in between. Just superb! And I just adore Sandy Dennis.
This is a hilarious, great movie and Jack Lemmon is so perfect for the role. I laughed and laughed and enjoyed it so much.
Jack Lemmon and Sandy Dennis are the perfect fit for this classic movie.  Everytime we need to get a real good laugh we watch this.
This is the original and best. This couple is hilarious. laughed throughout the movie. Who doesnt have days like that?
still one of the funniest movies ever.  had not seen for years but as good as i remembered.  too funny
WHAT A CLASSIC, IF YOU HAVE EVER TRAVELED OUT OF TOWN? THIS MOVIE IS A REAL MUST TO VIEW! FUN!
Funny Neil Simon at his best. A &#34;murphy's law&#34; plot that is well acted by Lemmon and Dennis. buy it
Another ignored classic that remains in VHS only format.... get with the times guys.
Life in a bottle, I still love his satiricle sence of humer lots of laughs and puns at real life situations
This movie is so funny I can watch is over and over.  The movie is enjoyable from beginning to end.  The whole family can watch it!
I couldn't quit laughing through the whole movie.  The actors were great and the plot was hilarious!
This movie is a classic!  The remake with Steve Martin doesn't hold a candle to the original version.  You'll love it!
One of my fav Striesand films.  Love her outfits as much as I love her songs!!!!  A must watch for all
I had this on VHT and replaced it with this one.  I love the move and the songs.
Barbra Streisand's best work is in this movie! Too much fun and watchable more then once.
It's old fashioned and has the fun sweetness of something we no longer have as much......innocence.
Transfer ok,sound good. Picture not restored,just transfered to HD. One of few that Rot.Tom.'s gives 100% fresh! Great fun,Great 70's clothes.
I remember this movie as a child.  I learned all the songs and sing them to this day.  I am so glad to find this movie again.  Thanks for sharing it.
Saw it when I was young and never forgot it. Thrilled when I was able to get it through Amazon Prime!  Thank You!
I am an avid Streisand fan, and also a Reinactor/Costumer so for me, this is the perfect movie!  Love it.
I Love Barbara Striesand.  It was a feel good movie to watch.  I will be watching it again and again.
Streisand at her best.  What an interesting story and the songs really stay with you.  Who can't sing most of them in the shower
beautiful movie , funny, and great songs. This is one of my favorite movies, and I have missed not seeing it.
This is a great timeless classic movie which I never tire of watching.  Barbra is a fantastic actress and I really reccommend it!
I find this one of her best movies with great songs and story.  Nicholson is ageless and Barbara never better!
Great movie if you're over 50 and appreciate this generation of movies or an out-right Walter Matthau fan. Would recommend.
So funny. So well written. Even my 15 year old son kept laughing. This has been a favorite fro many years. So glad it finally came out in DVD!
I saw this movie years ago, and could not wait for it to come out on DVD/Blu-ray.  Wonderfully written and fun.
Mathau's best performance. He and May are perfect together. If you haven't seen this movie, you must. I loved it.
a very nice old movie, i watched it from time to time on vhs, so it was nice that i could get it on dvd.  i liked the actors doing their thing.
A movie the whole family can enjoy with a nice ending.  A typical mathew  character part.I wife has see it many times and never tires of it.
The acting is superb.  The story line is great.  A real pleasure to watch especially since it was one of our favorites when we were dating.
Both actors at their &#34;subtle&#34; best. Extraordinary chemistry among the actors. You know some of these people. 1, 2, 3.
What an amazing talent, Elaine May. To write, direct and star in. Walter Matthau was also remarkable! One of my favorite movies ever!
A New Leaf (Special Home Video Version)Another great lost movie. How hard can it be to get it on DVDand get it out there? That about says it all!
I love this version of the Little Prince!  I had the VHS tape and so I sought out the DVD.  I am pleased with the quality of the DVD.
Are family love this movie we watch this server time I would tell you and your family to watch this you will love this
These two chums are so funny together.  Great family movie.  Adults and teenagers alike should like this movie.  Just good.
What a great, funny movie! everything works perfectly in this movie. See it before its too late!
Crazy entertaining this one.  Love the opposites of the characters.  Felix I and Oscar are so opposites it's perfect. . .no lack of talent there.
Both of these actors are gone.  They films live on and this one is a classic.  Still laughed just as hard as when I 1st saw it!
Fans of the Grumpy Old Men films should see this great team in their prime to see what comedy timing is all about.
Great classic movie, from which sprung the tv series of the same name, and a couple of grumpy old men movies.  Such a great movie...
I never get tired of this great film, and loved the TV show as well.  Not shown much anymore, finally decided to buy it and have it always.
A great movie, lots of fun. DVD quality very nice.
What can you say about these two actors. This is a classic. Hysterical and every way. Good old clean fun. Just that.
I've always liked this movie, and I still do. Its a classic. I feel the same for the television series as well.
Classic for a reason. Not a typical modern slapstick Noel Simon, but has a strong heart. A strory about bro-nance before there was such a word.
What else can I say? They keep going and going and going and get funnier all the time. Got to have it!
Just as funny now as it was when I was younger.  It arrived earlier than expected, in good condition, and the price was extremely reasonable.
FUNNY AS HELL!  YOU WILL LOVE IT! WE WOULD RECOMMEND IT TO OTHERS. TWO OF THE GREATEST ACTORS THERE EVER WERE, AND SO GOOD TOGETHER.
How can you go wrong with Neil Simon, Walter Mattau, and Jack Lemon?  You can't.  This is one of the best comedies ever!!!!!
Everyone loves this film, it is hilarious and well written and just fun. Even kids love it, safe for all ages.
Great to see an old film.  Just yesterday folks were discussing this movie trying to figure who was the lead with Jack Lemmon and I knew...
Such brilliant acting, directing and writing!  A timeless comedy of the perfect match made by opposites!  Will never tire of watching!
This is a wonderful movie.  I've not received my copy yet but I've seen the movie and I just love those two actors together.
It was great to show it to our grand-daughter, who had never seen it. Amazon Prime streaming video is wonderful.
I just watched this again and still love it.  Can't beat this original film and I love the Pidgeon sisters.
top pic q and and  top Audio and top composed the music. very good movie  staring walter matthau at his best
I saw this movie years ago and absolutely just loved it.  it is so hilarious and entertaining.  I'm glad I have it in my personal library.
One of the best movies of all time. It deserves inclusion in Best Of lists. Classic humor and classic pairing of actors.
VERY NICE PURCHASE
One of the funniest "off-beat" comedies I have seen. This will be a cult classic for years to come.
I loved Harold and Maude.  My favorite movie of all time.  Ruth Gordon says many beautiful things through out the still inspire me.
My friend introduced me to this zaney movie last year. If you like wierd, you'll love this. Very strange, but fun.
This movie is great... great story great acting... Still love it after all these years. Cant believe it took me so long to order it!
I bought this for a female work buddy, who says it is really good, but I don't see what the big deal is.
This is the best cult movie I have ever seen.  I loved it when it first came out, and love owning the movie to see over and over again.
Great Cat Stevens sound track. A wonderful quirky film. I saw it in the teater and just fell in love with Ruth Gorgon's performance
This is an amazing move.  It should be required viewing.  Listen to the message.  Relax.  Enjoy.  Share with the youngins.
This is a well written film and concept that is PERFECTLY cast. Bud Cort & Ruth Gordon were made for these roles.
This is a classic. One of my most favorite movies of all time. I have loved it for over 20 years.
This film still holds up after 30 years. Only Monty Python's Holy grail and Blazing Saddles made me laugh more than this black humor masterpiece.
I have to say this is probably the oddest film I have ever seen, but somehow it was still amazing! I absolutely fell in love with Harold & Maude!
This cult classic has stood the test of time.  It's just as funny now as it was when it first came out.
This is a fantastic film. The price was amazing and I've watched it over and over again. I would recommend this cult classic to anyone.
Cat Stevens does the music to Harold and Maude because he thought it was a great movie!In my opinion it deserves *5* stars!
Quirky, engaging . . . with a lot to say about life's path, life's connections and moments, and life's tough choices.
A wonderful story of very unusual design.
This movie is a filled with both funny and heart touching scenes that can be enjoyed by the entire family. Highly recommended .
A great funky movie!
Guys, if you have not seen this war film, you need to see this one because it is a classic.
Peter comes through in this one as usual, also in and The Lion in Winter with Kate Hepburn and Anthony Hopkins
Staci, this is not the same movie you are talking about.  The Mark Lester version was years ago, this is a new version of Black Beauty.
Graham Faulkner, the wonderful lead actor, has been missing since the 1980's, if anyone knows where he is, please post it here.
Wonderful full length theatrical movie. Have my own, but ordered this for a friend. I've watched mine more than half dozen times. Very inspirational.
Watched the preview, and elected to watch this movie.  It was well done and kept my interest throughout the movie.
Still a classic movie of St Francis. A Great Franco Zeffirelli film. Donovan's songs and singing out-standing. I highly recommend the movie.
Video taking up too much space.  I have always liked this movie.  I would highly recommend it to movie buffs
Graham Faulkner, the wonderful lead actor, has been missing since the 1980's, if anyone knows where he is, please post it here.
Music is great! A character building experience, this film rocks. My niece said Francis is a cute guy.
This movie makes me cry.  I love St. Francis.  It is an older movie yet feels timeless to me.  I also like the music
you have to have this, perfect for boys or girls, and brings you back to your childhood. a great one
This is a great classic movie based off the book.  Great!!
I remember watching this movie when I was a kid, and now my kids enjoy watching it, too. Great movie!
loved it as a child,and love it now.a instant classic that will never die....I'm glad that I added it to my cartoon collection.
Do I say more, Charlotte's Web you just can't beat.  I loved this movie growing up and now I get to share with my little one.
This was a gift for my sister who says it reached her in good condition.
This movie is great for children ....I used it in my class for English assignment and the kids love it and learned a lot....
good movie in very good shape, brand new, my grandaughter loves it its one of those movies she will watch over many time
One of the real masterpieces of animation and a gem of my childhood. Buy this DVD!
Great old movie.  Gave as a gift to one of my granddaughters and they really enjoyed it.  Highly recommend!!!! :)
Charlotte's Web....bought this for our granddaughter and she just loved it.  She has had it for quite sometime and still watched when she comes over.
A perfect family movie - delightful, even after all these years. Even the youngest members of the family will enjoy this classic.
Great movie! My granddaughter loved it 7 we watch it over & over. I would recommend this to any grandparent.
A wonderful story of encouragement and relationship. Far beyond a children's story, it is a series of life lessons for all of us.
One of my favorites in my collection of family movies. I may be in my 60's and no children left to watch it but I still love it!
Charlotte's Web is a true classic, they don't make movies like this anymore. Enjoyable for adults as well, sit and watch with your kids.
Just as I remembered.  Good for all audiences.  Reminds me of living in the country.  Relazing.  A good find and a good deal.
I enjoyed watching this Woody Allen film from the 1980s very much. It was a slice of the past I had forgotten about.
Casablanca as Woody does an homage. Diane is wonderful, and I don't know who Bogart was but he was great.
I really enjoyed this movie. It's a standard DVD so A/V quality is only decent when compared to blu-ray but that is what it is.
Hold up well after many years.  Diane Keaton looks lovely and is always good.  Woody is as neurotic as ever.  Some good laugh out loud moments.
Great movie! This movie by Woody Allen was a good experience. I would definitely recommend this to a friend. Amazing
If you could only watch one Woody Allen movie..............Play It Again Sam is the one.
Famous movie by Woody Allen. Great film, especially if you're already a fan. Classic. Funny. Slapstick humor.
Good conditions, good image and sound. One of my favorites. I recommend it to all movie lovers and specially to all Woody Allen fans.
This movie is hilarious ... especially the scene where the vinyl record flies out of the record jacket.  Love this movie!
If you like Woddy Allen you love this movie.  Diane Keaton and Woody are the best combination of entertainment, Great Movie
Hadn't seen this movie for many years but quickly fell in love with it again. Keaton shines. Allen' play remains brilliant.
Diana really should have won an Oscar for this movie and not Julie Andrews in the Sound of Music.
this is a wonderful movie it is one the 70's greatest movies. Diana Ross play Billie Holiday so well.
NOW YOU KNOW THAT I LOVE MY BLUES AND THANK YOU VERY MUCH
This is another movie that tells the story of the women I work with and it tells my story through song, script and drama.
Diana is a star and always will be. She can sing and act. She is the greatest and always will be.
great film but too sad. thank you---Joanne
I love this movie, Diana Ross is brilliant, right alone with the rest of the cast. Awesome movie, love it!.
Have always like this movie. Good story about Billie Holiday.
Lady Sings The Blues Arrived today. Please disregard any past complaint about not receiving the item.  I am very pleased.
Love all the great actors it this movie! Diana Ross at her most, beautiful voice and so realistic in the role she played.
I remember when this came out and loved watching it again.  I recommend this to anyone who loves to watch biographies.
A great historic singer actress with a great cast as well , in a classic movie that all should witness the great Diana Ross !!!
I love this DVD. I'll watch it over and over. I bring tears and laugher. I want to keep it forever.
I'M A BIG DIANA ROSS FAN  AND THIS HER FIRST MOVIE WAS WONDERFUL SHE DID A GREAT JOBWISH IT WAS LONGER.....
I have nothing to say that has not already been said about this movie. Redundancy has never been one of my better qualities :)
&#34;this is where my wife sleeps and my children play with their toys &#34;  just watch it and enjoy......pacino and his mob friends
Very well done movie with great acting, great plot and fast-paced, moving action. A delight it was to watch and get involved with.
fantasic!  pacino's greatest performance by  far he is so evil in the subtlest way and that shot at the end  perfect!  as good as the first
Great follow up to the masterfully great motion picture and this won best picture as well!
With a stellar cast, excellent story line, and lots of action, this saga will remain the best on screen.  Great
What a Great Movie!!!
this movie was the best i see it many times and the more i see it the more i like it
It was a replacement for a tape that quit working.  We were happy to find it available.  Thank you!  Good!
If you liked The Godfather, then this is must to complete your collection. I just like Part I and II, part III, forget it.
Movie was great.DVD was perfect.
this is a classic move. Al pachino is one of my favorite actors. It is a great gift and I loved it
Enough has been written already. This has to be one of the top five films ever made. Period. Full stop.
We liked the film. Our original copy was played out and we needed the new copy. No problems with it at all.
This and GF 1 are items I like to keep close even if they're not my enemy.  As good as any renaisance Italian philosopher
How can you go wrong?  They are like new age classics - incredible cast, great acting, great story - can't miss...
this is one of the best sequels ever it ranks right  up there with the star wars films great film
This is a great film by itself but on Bluray and with the special restoration it really shines. Great Actors and Story Line!A must see
Amazing the chemistry between Ryan and Tatum.  People complaining about Tatum getting an Oscar?  I have no idea why - that was just fantastic!
I have always loved this movie. It is a shame Tatum O'Neal doesn't do more acting. I really like her.
I really love this movie, the relationship between Ryan and Tatum was awesome. She was a good child actor, and cute
This was a most enjoyable film from the past. Tatum got an Oscar for her performance and it's east to see why.
great classic movie. if you love Ryan O'neal and his daughter who still has spunk this is a great movie to add to your collection
A classic from the nineteen sixties. The main stars work very well together. You will love the time period of 1933
Tatam and Ryan O'neal are both great in this movie, Tatum(for her age at the time) is soooo grown up.
I liked this film when it first came out and decided I wanted to add it to my DVD collection.  A fun movie!
I enjoyed watching this movie it was light and fun and will be happy to spend another evening watching the antics of these two again
Ya just gotta see this incredible movie to appreciate it!  Superb script and acting, its my own private cult classic!
The movie still holds up. Loved it. Great acting, a wonderful follow up after making The Last picture show. I'm a big fan of Peter Bogdonavich.
got this one for my 94 yr old mother to watch... her time period and i think she really enjoyed it
I have watched this movie so many times and I never tire of it. I love the beautiful black and white and the locations.
I wish they still made movies with as much &#34;meat&#34; as this one.  It's not completely digitized - good stuff.
This is a really entertaining movie.  Tatem O'Neill did a really good job and actually received an Oscar for her performance.
This is very good old black and white movie that is good for the whole family.  Keeps your attention through out the movie.
Lots of fun to watch. One of those movies you can watch over and over again and  enjoy. Highly recommended for the hole family.
have never seen it on dvd happy to add it to collection. have watched it already and will watch it again
I meant to see this movie during its theatrical release.  At last, I finally got around to viewing this treasure.  Do not wait as I did!
This is a great war movie and a fine performance by Alec Guiness so when are they going to transfer it to a DVD format already.
I really liked this thrilling movie. I enjoy watching movies from Amazon on my ROKU.  Will continue to subscribe to even more movies
Great! I saw it years ago, and it is still a good watch. This movie was ahead of its time.
Bought this for a friend, and he loves it.  Costumes are fabulous, old Los Angels intrigue, and acting is as good as it gets.
What a great movie - and such good acting. Jack Nicolson and Faye Dunaway are superb in this movie.
This film is excellent, and made in the 70's around LA, specifically East LA where I grew up. Great murder mystery and excellent music.
Following in Bogart's foot steps Jack Nicholson does a superb job in creating a classic gum shoe detective. This movie is a great piece film noir.
Jack Nicolson has a great performance in this twisted and mysterious thriller that continues the film noir tradition.
Great stars, great story great writing.  They do not make them like this anymore.  Too bad.  Nicholson is the best.
A classic movie
Nicholson, Dunaway, Huston, Polanski, Towne, Evans, and Goldsmith at the top of their game. One of the best movies ever made. 'Nuff said.
This is story telling at its best. I love the action and the surprises. The yarn is unsurpassed in detective tales.
Excellent  cast, great story. Anyone who has studied the history of how LA gets its water will see the implications in this movie story line.
Great actors, script, and direction. Very good film noir technique.  Worth seeing many times. The details are great.
A very good movie well done. I enjoy a good mystery type of movie and will probably see it again soon.
Video transfer is excellent quality for a film of its age. "DVD extra" interviews are recent and interesting. GREAT FILM NOIR.
Well, how doesn't like Chinatown? Great hollywood movie, good story and good acting all in one. I can watch it 100 times like it is the first time.
I may be prejudiced because I love mysteries and the old Noirs, but I love this movie. The plot is terrific and the acting first rate.
Two of my favorite actors played such awesome roles. Kept me on the edge of my seat the entire time.
Hands down......one of my all time top ten films of all time.  I never get tired of watching this film.
There's nothing about this film not to like. Just see it, especially if you like Jack Nicholson. Better than Five Easy Pieces, even.
One of the better movies I've seen in a while. The acting and camera work were both very good. Don't hesitate to sit down and enjoy this one.
This is a great steelbook and looks very nice. Arrived undamaged and excited to watch it. Fast shipping and is at a reasonable price.
This has always been a favorite and I am thrilled to have found it at such a great price.
The DVD arrived on time and in excellent condition.  I highly recommend the item for others who are interested in purchasing this product.
the fact that it is a true story makes you wonder how many other cops died or were destroyed by corruption.
Astonishingly great as all Al Pacino moves have the distinction of being. We love everything he does and every movie he is in.
I didn't know it was based on a real story until after I saw it. It turned a good movie into a great one. One of Pacino's best.
The movie is a bit dated, but it is still a classic. You can see that a young Pacino was going to have great career.
Very good depiction of crime. Al Pacino is great. I enjoyed being able to watch this at home and share this with others.
A good flick based on a real cop. Al Pacino does a great job, but when doesn't he? You'll like it.
Started to collect Al Pacino movies. Cannot find many in the stores. Had my young son-in-law watch it. He loved it!
Al Pacino is amazing in this classic movie.  Highly recommend seeing it if you haven't already.  And if you have, see it again!
This is an excellent movie with Al Pacino at his best.  If you haven't watched this movie...then you definitely should.
Great star turns by Eddie Albert and Burt Reynolds. The Secretary is great with her beehive and all. Joe Kapp and others do some nice work too.
Very good movie if you're interested in this type of genre.  Very, very funny movie.  Better than the latest version.
THANK YOU,TAPE & JACKET WAS FINE, AS YOU SAID IT WOULD BE. HOPING TO DO THIS AGAIN IN THE FUTURE.DON K
A great movie back when and now.  Whether you like football or not, it tells a good story of a star who lost it all.
Great movie that has quite a few big name athletes, celebrities, and actors. There are tons of memorable quotes in this awesome sports movie.
Classic Burt Reynolds.  Funny, serious, deceit and friendship all wrapped up in one movie.  A classic for any library.  Lots of laughs.
sorry I missed this in the theater it was a good movie for it's &#34;time&#34; not quite a chick flick close.
I love this movie because David Janssen is in it.  The actress who played January was so lucky to be able to kiss him, etc.
We are so glad to own this DVD ,we have been looking for it ,everyone should shop this way, saves time & money . Thank You
Thank you for this DVD! I have been looking for this movie and finally found it and in such excellent condition. Moviemars your great.
NOTHING. Classic of high caliber and quality! The movie was done very well from the script, setting, direction and acting!
It's the same movie that all these people are getting awards for but was made many years before. great movie.
I was great acting.  Slavery was much worse than this but some parts came close.  The book was much better but the movie was entertaining.
after owning the vhs copy. this it very high quality.  thank you for great copy.  would recommend it very highly.
I enjoyed this movie, took me back when I was a little girl hearing my mom and aunts talk about it. Thanks
An excellent portrayal of life in the South before the Civil War. A very good movie and I would recommend it.
Has anything changed in the game of football since?  Nolte, without needing to act.  Good introduction to organized sports.  A must watch.
This is a really cool movie and Nolte is really good in this. If you like movies about football, this one's worth picking up.
This was a regular movie shown on HBO back in the day.I would like to see it on blu-ray with commentary from the actors.
almost a Hemingway bio about his boating years....Good location filming, semi accurate about WWII European immigration attempts.top 20 movies
A really great film supported by great acting.
a strong subtle work of depth and quiet simplicity. i think Hemingway would have enjoyed this movie, and would have felt it held true to his book.
Great older movie.  Terrific acting and story line.  Really enjoyed watching it again.  Dustin Hoffman was at his best in this film
Good espionage flick! Is It Safe?! To imagine Nazi war criminals here in New York City cashing in on the profits they made from WW II!
This is a great film version of a taut and tense novel.  Hoffman and Olivier are superb, as is Roy Scheider.
Still one of the most tension filled films of all time. And stirred up by two great actors: Laurence Olivier and Dustin Hoffman.
Suspenseful, great acting/actors, & interesting Nazi historical background -- a complex plot that won't let you turn away for a moment.
Dustin Hoffman has the incredible ability to make suspense come alive, like no other actor.  This is one of his best roles.Bravo!!
movies I have seen. Very glad to have it. Would suggest it for all.It is a stop and start movie.
Exciting, Thrilling, Edge of your seat, heart thumping, nervous energy, mind boggling, scary, very tense and not to be missed.
I saw it when I was a whole lot younger - very glad to be able to find it now.  Hoffman was a whole lot younger too!
What more can be said......This movie has been out long enough for everybody to have already seen it.Better then 5 stars.
this is a great classic movie.  Murder and mystery and a great cast of actors.  Very suspenseful and expertly acted.
At last...this Albert Finney version of Murder on the Orient Express has subtitles. It was always a great movie......this makes it excellent.
loved this movie as a kid and it still one of my favorites. its about poetic justice and has a cast of great actors as well;D
Great cast, great mystery.  If you have never read the book, it will keep you guessing.  Seems to have elements of the Lindberg Kidnapping
The best whodonit ever!  Loved it since I was a teenager! I had to have my own copy so I can watch it when I want!
My favorite movie in that era. Death on the Nile is second, then Stephen King's books! I will do a marathon with this movie!
KIND OF OLD FASHION MISTORY  SOME ONE GETS KILLED IN A TRAIN MOVING TRAIN  ITS WELL PLANED PLOT BUTHERCUL POUARO ALWAYS FIND THE KILLER BY LOGIC
not action packed by todays standard.detective movie from the old classics,on a train.
A classic who done it. What a great cast.  I love these old mystery movies,  would love to see this remade again.
I grew up watching Agatha Christie movies and this was my first who done-it and so I fell in love!
If you enjoy a mystery, you will enjoy this. All my years in Law Enforcement and this is a Classic Mystery for all.
Good portrayal of a classic movie.  Great for a high school English class. Yes, Agatha Christie does live on even today.
wonderful cast, great costumes! Wonderful film!  The remake with David Suchet is just as fabulous and with a British wonderful cast!
I've read every book of Agatha Christie and this is one of my favorites.  Also have the movies and would never part with them.
I have always enjoyed anything by Agatha Christie.  The range of stars in this one is well matched.  Most of my favorites in very interesting roles.
This wa a good mystery with a good plot even as many time as I have seen it  is sill suspenseful.
I loved the book and I felt the cast did an excellent job in the film my all time favorite Agatha  Christie novel
Great movie. Interesting plot. Keeps you guessing right up to the end of the movie.  Great actors and actresses. Fun to watch!
I loved the film and I would like to see the DVD produced with tons of special features. please.
This is one of the classic spy movies of all time. The plot and ending scenario are still playing out today, i,e, the Snowden Affair.
This is one the best action films ever, and the blu-ray edition makes it even better.
Very well written script keeps the viewer engaged in this thriller. Robert Redford looks fabulous and does a great job figuring out what happened.
Much better quality than upconvert of the original DVD. Fair price. Glad I bought it.
This is one of the best ever movies! Great, fascinating plot!!! My husband and I watched it years ago. Still a favorite
Great storyline.  I've watched this one several times.  Redford when he looked his best.
Classic spy movie with great storyline, plot and acting.  This movie could very well be set in modern times.  Have watched it many times.
THE VERY BEST SPY STORY I HAVE EVER SEEN AND ITS US DOING THISITS FOR LIFE STYL WE DONT WANT TO KNOW HOW WE JUST WANT IT TO BE THERE
This is a movie that I have seen several times and it just as fresh as ever. It was well done.
I saw this for the first time in 1976 and it's just as good today! Redford and Dunaway are at thier best
Saw this at a 'drive in movie threatre' back in the 70's became one of my favorite movies. nice to see it on blu ray.
Great MOVIE! Saw it ages ago, then watched it again this year and it's still a GREAT MOVIE!
Robert Redford never goes out of style. He and Faye are great in the timeless movie. Great story, and plot.
Early Redford, exciting and spy active ala Bond from the period-I guess the turtle neck gives it away. Still a good movie
I saw this movie years ago and was thrilled to be able to watch again.  I would recommend it to everyone.
This has always been one of my favorite movies and I am not even a Robert Redford fan. But this is a great movie. Blu-ray makes it even better.
A nice little snap shot of the 1970s when the citizens of the US were questioning most everything its government may be doing.
a great story...notice the all star cast, and good acting (as always) by Robert Redford. worth the time, worth the $
Another great &#34;old&#34; movie.  I remember seeing it in the theatre and couldn't believe the beginning scenes.  I'm a huge Robert Redford fan.
Great script, Actors, and Director/ A keeper. For people not born before this was made YOU ARE missing a GOOD FILM
Exciting movie with reservations - some of the movie doesn't make sense - but - squint your eyes and enjoy.
The plot is great. The assassin's role in this film is terrific. I can watch this film twice a year forever.
For and older movie this one is very good. They don't seem to make them like this anymore, I would highly recommend this movie.
One of Robert Redford better flicks. I can watch it over and over
This is a great movie. I had it on VHS, but wanted to have it on DVD. Robert Redford is great in it, but he is great in most every movie. Enjoy
Wow! What a suspenseful movie. Good cast. Good story line. It could happen in real life too. A must see.
I really liked this movie. It is captivating, interesting and intriguing. It's like a Forsyth saga. I will order this movie again,  someday.
Loved this movie for the cars and the beach and the fashion and the horrible overacting.  Have watched it a few times and think its a good movie.
It's the story of every aging man's journey disguised in a Lifguard themed beach setting.Should be billed as a Holiday classic!
She is one woman who has style, class and a voice of her own. Also she plays well in movies too. I have to give it to her - she's good.
Enjoyed this movie as much as or more than I did when I saw it as a child. Diana, beautiful as always, and Anthony Perkins...The Joker's wild.
good movie very clear picture thank u for getting it to me so fast really enjoy my movie thank u
Good acting on the part of Diana Ross... I liked her more in Lady Sings the Blues... but this dvd is equally as well performed...
CAMPY AS ^^^^ BUT SO WORTH WATCHING FROM START TO FINISH BEYONCE NEEDS TO WATCH THIS TO LEARN HOW A TRUE DIVA ROCKS IT. OH YES CHILD.
I just wish I could find this movie on a DVD. My Grandson just laughs at Snoopy with his antics.
Star Trek is a household favorite beginning when I was s small child some 40 years ago....GREAT as expected as always.
I enjoyed watching this Star Trek movie on my new HD TV. It was like watching the movie in one of these mini theaters in the multiplexes.
I knew this movies. Years left I saw it.  I have all Star Trek Picture.  I love it.Cindy
This is so much easier than the old days when you had to go to the video store.  Amazon makes it easy to watch classic movies.  High recommend.
colorful and crisp picture, love watching any/all Star Trek episode or movie including the new cast presented in the present day Star Trek movies
always been a Treky - love this movie and a good collectible as it is the Director's cut meaning more footage - good collectible for a Treky
Was good to see it again. Brought back all the good memories of the Series! This is an undying franchise!
This was a very entertaining movie that had an great story line! Love the tv show and loved this movie!
This was a gift for my son and our family are trekkies so this is a wonderful movie.  It is a great addition to anyone's movie collection.
There is nothing like the original cast from the original series to create an original movie that is so enjoyable.
Go where no one has gone before! Classic Star Trek I loved that amazon prime instant video is carrying great movies keep them coming!
Beautiful homage to the original intent. Amazing V'GER in full light! The new spoundtrack with sound effects in place makes it worth it alone!
I have seen this movie many times and I still like it, even though the costumes look dumb. This movie is still a must watch.
I am a trekee  Love the new ones as will as all the old tv and old movies I theink Chris Pine was a great  choice
An extended TV episode.  Not quite written as a movie, but it has all of the charm of the original series.
Classic Star Trek! Seen it before, love to watch it again. Star Trek: The Big Screen Episode! This was definately designed for the big screen
Did not enjoy the foul language in this movie, there is never a time when it should be used in kids programming.
Good movie.  No, GREAT movie, but it would start and stop a LOT! I bet more bandwidth on Amazon's end would help?
Great movie brings back my childhood in the 70s, you can see a double feature for a dollar fifty back then at the haven movie theater. Good old days.
One of my favorite movies from years back. Walter Matthau and Tatum O'neil at their best. Great story. Picture and sound were excellent.
I love this movie. It's really funny and a great summer movie. The DVD is in great condition. : )
What a great movie from the 70's. Walter Matthau is great and it's fun to watch with my kids who are now in little league.
I was 10 in 76 and played little league baseball. This movie steeps me in my past and also reminds me of what the 70's were. A classic.
what is not to love about walter Matthau in any movie he is truly amazing one to watch over and over
this is my dads favorite verison of king kong and he's never been able to track it down so this christmas it was a barrell of laughs
I love this movie. I have every remake done. King Kong is good twist on love. I highly recomend this movie.King Kong.
This is a classic movie of king kong. It is a great addition to any collection. Especially if you collect classic movies.
i think this is a thrilling movie and jessica lange gives a wonderful performance(a bit too sex), but a movie for all ages. enjoy.ese
Have always loved this movie ever since I saw it in theaters. I it one of my favorite versions of this tale.
I WAS GLAD TO FIND THIS MOVIE ON DVD.  I HAVE HAD IT ON VHS AND WATCHED IT MANY TIMES!  NOW I CAN CONTINUTE TO ENJOY IT ON DVD!!!  :)
A very good movie with some tongue-in-cheek humor.  I have always enjoyed this movie,  and would highly reccomend it to all.
I loved King Kong. Simple but a success enjoy.
I found "Looking for Mr Goodbar" on DVD, on this site below![...]Good luck getting your copy!!  This movie is worth waiting for on DVD!!
i saw this movie along time agc but i thought it was good then & even better that im older not for small ones
Excellent DVD. GREAT GREAT GREAT GREAT GREAT. Very informative and interesting. It was a very pleasant surprise. Glad I bought it.
ONE OF MY CHILDHOOD FAVORITES ... VERY CLEVERLY PRODUCED! ... GREAT FAMILY MOVIE - KIDS AND ADULTS WILL LOVE IT ...
Have not had a chance to view it but the container arrived in good condition.
The cast, the plot and the soundtrack are all great!!! I can watch over and over again
Bugsy Malone is the quintessential tongue-in-cheek gangster movie and a pure joy to watch.  Don't have it yet? Go get it now!
Me And My Wife Was Laughing So Hard She Told She Never See That Movie Before Its Was A Good Movie.
This movie is a must have for any scary movie collector!! And I love the cover. This disc arrived on time and in perfect condition.
Classic old 80's movie with popular actress Bo Derek. Back in the day she as my husband would say is the cats meow, a real hotty.
One of my favorite movies as a kid. The acting was good, Bo Derek as eye candy, and the fact that nature gets even makes it a special movie.
One of those 70's movies, must have in collection. It definitely is a killer whale revenge movie. I like 70's movies.
Went and saw this movie at the theatre when it first came out and it made such an impact on me. Brought it to show my family and they have enjoyed it
This has to be one of my all time favorite movies. I watched it twice, since I got it. thank you
DO YOU HAVE MORE! SO I CAN SEND MY FAMILY THIS MOVIE AND ONE FOR MYSELF?  THIS WAS A GREAT FLICK!
This, to me was a much better movie than Jaws.  The story line had you in the edge of your seat till the last.  You could really feel for the Orca.
The movie was pretty good. A bit disturbing but you also have to think about the time period it was set in.
Pretty Baby movie shows an interesting story about prostitution in New Orleans. Great study of social problems in the early Twentieth Century.
This movie came it good condition.I remembed it when it was first out,way back then,i am glad I have it.
I think this is the first movie Robert redford directed and you can see why he is so respected as a fine director. excellent Oscar performances!
This story is sad and typical of many dysfunctional  families, Definitely worth watching. The acting was good and not over done.
I'm glad to have a replacement for the old copy from a TV showing.  Timothy Hutton deserved the Academy award for this performance.
I thought this was an excellent movie that showed the raw emotions of a family going through a crisis.
I've always loved this movie. The story is engaging, the characters well developed, the acting superb.It deserved the Oscar it won.
Have not seen this yet but this was highly recommended by my psychitrist for people going through depression and family problems.
Great movie. Very good acting. Emotional but has a great story of a resilient young man. Mary Tyler More is amazing as the distant mother.
This movie is so great...Learning to deal with life in a real family. It is something to think about when communication is not easy.
Nice, fun movie.  Watched it several times.  Will probably watch it again and again.  Lots of fun, feel good movie.
I loved this movie as a child. I would watch it every time it would come on tv. It's really funny and '70's cute ;) truly a classic
Watched this movie a long time ago and got to enjoy it even more without all of the editing that came on TV
LET THEM PLAY, LET THEM PLAY, LET THEM PLAY LET THEM PLAY, LET THEM PLAY, SAFE IS MY FAVORITE PART.
this is funny humor for my husband this is a movie he can watch over and over again like he's neer seen it before.
wow what a great movie I forgot just how funny this movie was!! it is well worth the money a must have!!
I thank you very much, my friend Lupe is going to enjoy this as a christmas present. Again thank you.
Old movie but funny
This is a funny movie you have to keep an open mind, no children should watch this.Here we go again they want more words.
this movie was hilarious about weed me and a friend went on a wk night 2JS b4 2JS ride there 2JS way back home a definite must 4 the heads
Best stoner film ever??? I think so... people who dont smoke weed can find humor in this movie too but its a musthave for all stoners
man, this is one of the funniest movies... Could stoping laughing. It hurts.. pass the chips.....
It's everything I hoped it would be and more. The story line and plot in the Napoleonic era were terrific. The acting was quiet well also.
The period that is involved is factual as were the lovely uniforms. This is a very exciting movie and you will play it more than once.
This movie stands the test of time. Gorgeous film making, compelling story, wonderful performances, etc. It doesn't get a whole lot better than this.
If you are to buy one film, based on filming alone, buy this one. The imagery is breathtaking.
I have the original non Blu-ray version. The picture and sound are  both much more vivd in Blu-ray.The movie itself is trully outstanding!
This movie is fantastic as an Action Flic, Historical Novel and Morality Play.  It is one of my Top Ten movies ever.
This movie is one of the funniest films that I had the pleasure of viewing to date. Henry Winkler is hilarious.
Please put this superb Henry Winkler classic on DVD so that humble people such as myself can afford it.Thanks!!!!!!!
I enjoyed this movie thoroughly, it was cute and comical and the actors were fun. I love this era of film and this picture did not disappoint me.
We love Thelma Ritter. This film is a perfect vehicle for her talents. The story is endearing, fun, funny, and surprising. Enjoy!
This is an older film, but the quality of the video was excellent.  Very good storyline very good acting I would watch it again.
What a hidden gem! It was fabulous from beginning to end and carried such a valuable lesson while providing tons of laughs.
It's romantic & funny and it's got drama, style, good  music, etc.  It's about friendship that eventually develops into love.
all three actors went on to do great work.  and eric stolz is so good, and of course I love Mary Stuart Masterson, this was one of her first movies.
Purchased this 'cause my hubby liked it way back when...Thought it would be fun to have in the collection...
Tear jerker but an amazing movie. Will watch this one many many times. Great actors with a great story line.
I'm in the process of finding the old 80s movies that I'd seen and liked.  This was a decent movie and will make a nice addition to my collection...
One of those movies I can watch over and over. I am happy I could add it to my collection of 80's movies!
I just can't say enough about this movie!  All I can say is, watch it, you won't be sorry.  Of course, that's just my opinion.
This was a great purchase. As promised, the item was in perfect condition and no scratches. Thank you to the seller!
The Cast on Some kind of Wonderful was super its a great High School movie with lots of good lines about three diff castpeople Eric @ Amanda Jones
3 of my favorite young actors of the 80s in a cute and sentimental story about missing what's right in front of you!
Wonderful movie. One of John Hughes best efforts.
Mary Stuart Masterson portrays a poignant third in this teen triangle, which  illustrates typical high schoolteen pressures.
HAVE ALWAYS ENJOYED THIS MOVIE. GLAD TO HAVE IT SO  THAT I CAN OCASSIONALLY WATCH IT
Great movie that has been under rated. Can't get enough of the movies from when I was growing up. Great time frame for all the awesome stuff
Watched this in my 20's. It is a timeless story and one that I am happy to now have in my collection. Thanks for offering it for purchase.
Great start to a great trio of movies!!! Great original story of a happy go lucky dude in Australia. Very funny
Great movie, a little slow at the start but you will love it and will be addicted! Paul Hogan did great as crocodile dundee
I like Paul Hogan in these two Dundee films. He and the cast do a great job. Always funny while informative. I liked it.
The Crocodile Dundee movies are somewhat nostalgic ( 80s era ).They are &#34;feel-good&#34; movies where the hero wins in the end.
We finally have Croc Dundee on dvd! I love to watch this one over and over. An all time classic.
I bought this for a gift. They really like it. They watch it often. I came in great time as well.
An all time favorite when I was a kid. Paul Hogan does an excellent performance displaying his confusion in an urban environment. i love this movie!
Crocidile Dundee is a good movie. Was very entertaining. Paul Hogan is a good actor. Good older action / comedy  film.
This is one of our favorites! Funny, exciting, a great family movie. All of them are keepers. Recommended highly!  Love the accent
Arrived in the condition I had hoped it would. Crocodile Dundee is definitely one of my favorites. Glad to finally have the DVD version of it.
I loved &#34;Call to Glory&#34; as a TV series and bought the VHS tape.  Although I've looked and looked, I CANNOT find the DVD of it.  Where is it?
My son loves this movie. It's his favorite movie in the world.A true classic and Richard Chamberlain is excellent. A great actor!!!
one of the best series made....Chamberlain does a magnificent job in this series, as he always has.  It was very well done....with much class....
I love James Clavell novels! I love Richard Chamberlain movies! So this one is perfect for people like me and my wife!
I was very excited to see this.  It is well done, with an all-star Japanese cast.  It is very faithful to the book.
Loved it when it came out and still love it. Nice addition to my mini series collection. Would recommend to anyone.
I am a fan of this series.  One of the best ever made for authenticity and realism. I love the theme of the series which is honor & integrity.
EXCELLENT!!Acting was excellent.The main characters were very believable.Didn't like the leading lady dying.Will watch it again
My husband and I have watched the movie several times, andwe think it is a very good movie. will watch again.
WOW. ONE OF THE BEST. UNBELIEVABLE, MUST READ you must judge for yourself, but I highly recommend it. one two three four five six seven eight. nine!!
Has this gone bluray yet?? If not it needs to.  However if you cant get it on bluray buy it on DvD.  This has to be one of the best TV series made.
This is a welcome addition to our DVD collection from the 70s this show was a mini series for tv
Takes you back to Japan(nippon) of old. Chamberlain shines in his role and you hope he makes it home but you know he will not.
Just as enchanting as the first time i saw it many years ago the films are in suprisingly good condition cocidering the age.
I have always enjoyed this show.  I had it on VHS and now I happily have it on DVD.  Great service.
I highly recommend this movie.  Richard Chamberlain is at his best in this exciting movie.  If you're a fan of Chamberlain, this is a must have DVD.
What can I say, this is an epic series that pulls me in every time I watch it. I see something new each time I view this amazing story.
A very good mini series! I've seen it a few times and I love it. I finally decided to buy a copy for myself.
I have always wanted to own this, I have been borrowing at least once a year from library, best example of Clavells book in movie form
i,m so very very pleased i love it its great service and product perfect shape made me so happy i came and trusted here
this is and old one, and I was so glad to be able to get it again.  I really liked years ago and still like it now.
seen movie years ago when Claudia was alive like it remember the movie and order it wild and crazy in a way but good kind of swamp Cajun movie,
Movie was enjoyable, the DVD quality is excellent. Long out of print, but there are still some copies to be found. Glad I found one.
Image did a great job with this one.  The print is near perfect.  I wish all their releases were this good.  Widescreen.  John Carradine is great.
We loved this movie it has great action, great acting, but it shuld only Vewed by grown ups 18 and older. but this is a reely great movie. SG
One of the coolest and most unique films out there. Get it at ANY cost.
Everything good about this classic film. The set decoration and cinematographer set the standard for this type of big production movie.
This was a gift and I was so pleased when the recipient called and expressed total delight with the quality of the DVD.
Wonderful, full of songs and music, beautiful decorations and costumes movie with great actors!One of the best musical movies ever!
What can you say about a great musical that doesn't lose it charm on the big screen.  Look for the young original Phantom of the Opera.
Always loved Hello Dolly.  This is a great version.  Great picture and sound.  Nice extras
Wonderful.  Great music.  Great acting.  A hit movie for all times.  Great acting.  A hit movie for all time.  Lots of talent.
This is a fun movie to watch. The singing is great. The interaction between Barbara Streisand and Walter Mathau is fun to see.
We have been waiting for quite sometime for this particular musical to come out on blu ray.  The movie now looks as good as when I first saw it.
MY GRANDDAUGHTER IS MOVING TO FLORIDA IN MAY,HER BIRTHDAY IS IN JULY.SO I LEARNED SHE IS INTO MUSICALSAND SHE LOVES HELLO DOLLY.ENOUGH SAID
AWESOME. NOTHING HAS CHANGED SINCE FIRST SEEING IT. GLAD TO HAVE THIS ONE IN MY LIBRARY NOW.
Yes, I've been singing these songs again every since I watched this DVD (x2). Thanks for having it in stock.
Gotta say big named actors, dancers and singers. Who wouldn't enjoy a gay old time with this classic. Barbara striesand
Holly Dolly! is a great movie and even greater on Blu-ray.  The color and sounds just come out at you.
I will always love this DVD it is in my collection. Barbara is excellent in this movie. I don't think anyone could have done it better.
This one has great songs, beautiful costumes, and great dancing.  All the characters do a great job.  I love looking at this one over and over again.
I was very satified with this dvd and with the delivery of the product. I will most likely consider another purchase from this seller.
Ah yes! Those songs and great music of yesteryear. A definite must for my video library. Good music remembered is worth having at ones finger tips.
If you like Streisand this is another movie that is so well done with lot's of singing and great acting.
Bought this as a gift for my Husband.  He loves this movie.  The colors and quality of the Blue Ray are very good.
This movie is wonderful. Barbra Streisand is so good in it, Louie Armstrong is great to see in his role.
This is a replacement for an old version of it and it was great. A great addition to anyone's collection of musical movies.
Hello Dolly! is one of the best musicals ever produced in my opinion.  It never drags and the songs are so good you will soon be singing along.
Well if you take the greatest musical and make it blu ray .. It can't get any better. I can't say anything more.
Purchased it for a Christmas present. My family seems to really enjoy it as they have already watched it twice.
This is a great movieand by far the best rendition of Hello Dolly!  Barbara Streisand is a great actress and fabulous singer!
This movie is wonderful and funny.  The music is fantastic.  I smille the whole way through.  It makes me feel happy.
I bought it for my brother who has always been a Paul Newman fan.  He loves this one and other movies from that era.
Love this--it is one of my favorite Paul Newman's movies for keepers.  Highly recommend it to anyone thinking of purchasing it.
Newman at his best..and Richard Boone makes a terrific bad guy.  I have watched this over and over and am glad to add it to my collection.
ONE OF MY FAVORITES.My kind of western. Great Elmore Leonard western. Good picture and lots of excitemnt. Best of Elmore along with valdez is coming
A great movie that has one of the most memorable lines ever spoken in movie history. (gotta watch it to hear it)
Loved this classic Newman flick, one of his many unique character roles. Such a talent. No matter his age, all his films were great.
Excellent Western for Paul Newman.Good script, good acting.Yeah, this is one of those films you can watch over and over.
This movie is her bestBy far...She show's her acting is greatNot just a dumb blondeLove Marilyn!
Since I was a young girl I loved this story.  Marilyn Monroe did the best job of her career.  A touching, funny story.
Good picture quality and the story line is one of Marilyn monores tope five movies. hope they release more of the old classics
My husband with Parkinson's enjoys watching the Marilyn Monroe movies, so I have purchased several for him to enjoyHappy they are available.
This is a well put together movie about Our Lady's apparitions to a young girl at Lourdes, France in the late 1800's.
IT IS A GRAT MOVIE BECOUSE YOU CAN UNDESTAND A LOT OF THE FAITH
A really great movie for the believer. And she is still just as beautiful today as she was back then. All the Glory to our Lord!
This movie cannot be made again.  It is both engaging and inspirational.  The acting is superb as well as the locales.
I remember this movie as a child.  It is a classic.  Jennifer Jones is wonderful!  I can watch over and over again
This is one of my favorite movies,  I love watching Jennifer Jones.  It is very touching. Good for the whole family
I adore this movie! Jennifer Jones has a brilliant oscar award winning performance! I cried so much, the plot is so great! Love it!
Solidifys my belief in Lourdes. Wonderful portrayl of the suffering she went through for the love og God & the Blessed Mother.
Lovely movie...they just don't make movies like this any more!!  It is very enjoyable to watch again and again. I highly recommend it.
The Song of Bernadette is a beautiful movie -- simple and inspirational.  I could watch this movie over and over.
This is an old classic about a wonderful saint. Excellent family movie. Everyone in the family should see this and it should be part of your library.
Simply put -- it is impossible for Hollywood to make a film like this one today.  All the more reason for viewing it.
I love this movie.  Beautifully depiction of the appearance of Our Lady to Bernadette - one of my favorites along with Lady of Fatima.
My wife loved this movie when she was young and fortunately they released it on dvd. Its a fine addition to the collection
This is just my type of movie.  We need  more of this type of movie even though some people wouldn't think so. But we do need  a variety.
A wonderful movie for around the holidays and also in amazing condition not to mention how the re-touched version is amazing looking great buy:-)
Great movie. The dvd is in excellent condition. Fast delivery. Very excited about this purchase. Thanks for the great service.
Very good movie with good acting and meaningful depth of a story that seemed realistic. Would buy again. Really liked it.
a great price and got it just three days after ordering it.This how you make a movie. old school  knew to do it right.
Always enjoyed this movie and I'm glad it was released on Blu-Ray and offered at a good price.  A lot of suspence and a classic!
Great classic TV film. A must have for all action film fans.
they never made them better a great viewing experience no matter how many times you watch it. Great stars in it as well as a great plot.
It was good; as well as, the movie and found a fantastic read and a good.  I highly recommend it.Anne Stickles
Great adventure movie Customer service was very good and I received my movie in good shape and on time. Enjoy
The original and a great star-studded film. The Blu-ray version is outstanding and a most welcomed edition to my collection.
this movie brought back memories from the first time i watched it--thanks for the great service--i enjoyed watching it again
Hands down, this is the greatest disaster film of all time.
Shelley Winters at her BEST. This was truly HER movie. And what a cultural icon this film has become. Thank you Irwin Allen!
I still go sailing but, I think of this movie often aboard ship!  Great acting and great stars!
A great movie with a all star cast, made the way a movie should be made. I have seen this movie several times, and I will see it again in the future.
This film is such a classic,!!!!!And once again Fox did a great jobYou guys did this movie toral justice
Edge of your seat viewing...great stars.....special effects etc., have made this movie into a true WINNER for all movie fans.
Enjoyed watching again. Not the same graphics as today's computer generated, but still great scenes.
Will always be one of the best ship movies of all times.  Spend an afternoon with it and you will see what I mean.
I've actually got to hold the pitcher seen on the mantle of the club that signaled the upcoming mission.  An excellent film in all regards.
Gregory Peck fan, plus an excellent movie. No action, just the gut wrenching responsibility of human lives following ones orders. A very deep movie.
Definitely the best war movie of all time and quite possibly the best movie of all time !!Runs neck and neck with "The Best Years of Our Lives" !!
A Gregory Peck movie my husband wanted for his collection.  He enjoyed this movie as he loved war movies so much.
A great movie on B-17s and the missions they had to partake in. Great Actors in it and some good action.
100% improvement on my older DVD for a very special movie. Excellent picture transition and much improved sound. Recommend upgrading this movie
good war drama.Gregory Peck is great as the leader un great pressure of command.
I have lost track of the number of times I have watched this movie, it is that good.  A must for any aviation buff.
I searched high and low for this classic film of wartime leadership. This film is mandatory at Command and General Staff college.
Just a great movie.  Saw it many years ago and then again recently.  Brought out some interesting emotions. i might even will see it again.
Gregory Peck, great actor, great movie enjoyed by the whole family, even the grand kids enjoyed this movie. Thanks again
Gregory played a Paranoid CommanderBritish Actor Dean Jagger as a concerning doctor.It's a Good War Movie for all
Timely delivery and excellent conditions. Good character portraital by the actors and a excellent story line.
Very good movie! Gregory Peck at his best! War footage worked into the movie very well! Worth the watch!
This version is ok, but the DVD is better.
6-5-2013 Enjoyed watching one of Mr. Peck's first movies. Gives us an idea about the Americans in England before WWII.
Even though I was not part of WWII I understand this was a rather realistic film.  I can see why it's a classic.
Classic war film loosley based on facts but the acting and plot line is terrific. One of the &#34;All time greats&#34;.
This movie is just as good as i remember but it in better quality this time around. Still creeps me out some.
A must have for OMEN fans.  Great picture quality and loads of extras for true Damien followers.
another great Classic, did not care for the remake, such timeless piece with Gregory peck again a good creepy movie
Love it! I love these old spooky movies and owning the dvd is the best. This is a classic with Gregory Peck love it!
Too scary to watch too many times. I might destroy it so I don't have to watch it again. wow!
My husband loves this movie!  Received in a timely fashion and in good condition!
Have this on VHS and now happy to have it on DVD.  Love watching movies over that I enjoy---this is one of them.
Loved this movie when it first came out. The Wilder/Pryor comedy team was a force that was fresh and just funny. Good movie to have in one's library.
I saw this year's ago and liked it.  I saw it again in the last few days and it was as good if not better.
This movie is hilarious and full of action.Rated PG for some language including brief racial slurs,sexual content,and violence.
This movie is one of Gene Wilder's classics.  It is a feel good movie with great humor.  This is a good show to watch when feeling down.
Silver Streak is one of my favorite movies. Great adventure, great action, and great humor. The romance angle is also very satisfying.
Excited to get this video - very happy with price and DVD.  This is a favorite of ours.
Terrific film. Gen Wilder and Richard Prior comic movie made by the best at the craft.Lots of mayhem before the big crash.
This is an excellent comedy mystery that covers a train trip from California to Chicago with great western trip and great characters
I hadn't watched this in a while.  I'd forgotten how much I enjoyed it.  Comedy, adventure, mystery -- all wrapped up in great movie.
I bought this movie for my brother.  He loves it.  I have to confess that I have never seen this movie.  Thanks.
This is a lovely, entertaining and funny romantic comedy.  The actors and actresses have a wonderful chemistry, and Richard Prior was never funnier.
Nice easy story, great interaction between Wilder and Pryor as top rank comedians of their time, all going in a fast pace. Just good fun.
Bought it because Patrick McGoohan was in it. He did well playing the villian. Liked McGoohan since Danger Man. Good.
I love this movie, I know it is old but all of Richard Pryor movies are all so funny and a good movie to keep you laughing.
gene wilder and Richard pryor at their best with a great cast and great plot  funny and entertaining at the same time
Great coming of age movie, even if it is dated. It is the age old story of rich and privileged verses poor
Love this film. Great young cast and some great vets too. Great story. Fun film. Young man growing up along with his friends.
It's a fantastic movie, it makes you feel good and you can relate to the characters. Everyone should watch it.
Excellent coming of age story. It is one of the best of all time and, the writing is age less.
I watched it several times when I was young, only now I know how good of a movie it is.
One of the greatest sports movies of all time and is abut more than a sport. It's a great story that we all face wether we are cyclists or not.
This was the best of all the Omen Movies. It really shows the battle between good and evil in all of us.
This one beats the crap out of the original.  I loved the way Damien &quot;blossomed&quot; into his UNholyness.
Hello My son had been dying to see this movie and was thrilled to find it new, he was so happy to see the sequel.  Thanks
my sister loves it, she is a real freak about scary movies, she loves even the b-movie productions of older films
This is a truly great film that needs to be re-released by the studio on either DVD or Blu-Ray. I am confident that it will sell.
This story has so many things going on with all the cast that you are never bored. Beautiful people ...great dancing. You cant loose.
This is a well-acted, beautiful film that shows the dancers, especially Mikhail Baryshnikov. at the top of their game. Wonderful film!
I love this movie!! It didn't get the credit it deserved!! The fight scene between Shirley MacLaine and Anne Bancroft is hilarious!
One of the classics of sci-fi!  Every Science Fiction fan should have Alien in their collection.  It's worth it to have this one on DVD.
A must see for all syfy lovers,a classic that ranks amongst the best alien movies out there,do yourself a favor and check it out
The alien movie is great.  Love the images and it is so science fiction if you love that kind of movie.
This movie is, literally, one of the best horror movies in existence and is incredibly joyful to watch even if you don't really enjoy horror movies.
I am a geek to the core; loved the  price on this item.  the movie is awesome, a classic of course
keeps you on the edge of your seat! still one of the best sci-fi thrillers of all time. this movie started it all!
Perfect mix of horror and sci-fi. Classic movie that holds up well. Loved it all over again. Recommend it highly.
This & the 2nd one are my favorites in this series. This one sets the stage for the rest. It's scarey, action-packed, & edge of your seat watching.
Another very well constructed story.There are only a few stupid moves by the characters but the story is excellent.High quality picture and sound.
is based on the mario bava classic "planet of the vampires" and thank god cause of that.
I have always loved Sigourney Weaver and sci fi, so the movie was excellent!  I would recommend it highly to those that love sci fi!
I really don't know what to say that hasn't already been said except the movie is even better @ 1080p and surround sound cranked with the lights off.
had to have this one forever because i think its the best scifi film ever and a must have for any serious collector.
I am happy to have a copy of this movie-it is a Classic! It is one of the best Sci-Fi films in existence.
Okay, I don't own this movie, but I have seen it.It is on my list of the best top ten scariest movies.
This was a great movie, so was thrilled to get it at a great price and to receive it so quickly
Excellent castGreat actingGood scriptWell thought out plotAnd after 2+ decades it still looks good and not dated
This is one of the best science fiction films ever made, along with Blade Runner. Ridley Scott does it like no other.
This, in my opinion is one of the best films ever made.  Scary as hell, beautiful to look at, great acting all around. Just watch it you haven't yet.
The bluray release of this sci-fi classic is incredible. Far superior to DVD or VHS versions of this film. Bluray is cool.
great movie .one of my favorites of all time in the sci fi genre.for sci fi buffs i strongly recommend
This was the first of the series and probably the best-very good tension and surprises and great action-very good story line
a surpringley good film good alien weaver is exelent a true oscar roll. scary fun see itits atrue classic love you weaver.
This is the movie the defended, and set the bar for the alien genre for me.  It was great when it came out and I still love it today.
all i can say about this excellent landmark masterpiece is:115 minutes of taut suspense.
this is a gift for my nephew for Christmas and I know he will like it as he has been wanting it.
Very mysterious. I just like the old film quality and looking at the ship. Great build of the ship. Amazing photography.
It's a good monster movie, the 2nd one was better, this is the 2nd best out of the Alien movies.
What a great movie considering how &#34;old&#34; it is. Love anything sci-fi, this was right up our alley! Thanks so much!
What can you say: great acting, a great plot, space, and, oh yeah, a freaking monster that's STILL the scariest ever!!
This is one of my ultimate favorite movies... superb story - superb acting - suspenseful - unbelievably believable. I highly recommend it.
Saw this years ago on TV and was delighted to obtain the DVD. I had forgotten all about it until I saw Amazon was elling the DVD
This is a story about Hillman the writer (who wrote &#34;Little Foxes&#34;) and it is great.  Wonderfully acted and produced.
A Robert Redford movie is a good buy.  He another actor I like . Action movie. Had to fine it and buy it.
Robert Redford does a great job as nearly always.  Likewise a number of the supporting cast did super in their roles.
A wonderful movie for it's day, and even today.I could see it being the Shawshank Redemption of the early 1980's, except this movie is true.
Reminds me of just a few years ago when I worked in a maximum security jail in Rochester, NY, before the reforms.
One of my husbands favorite movies!  Every now and then we pull this movie out and find it entertaining.  One of the reason I ordered it on blu-ray.
What a great movie!  Dolly Parton is fab in this movie.  Fonda and Tomlin are also fun.
Just as fun as when I saw it at the movies!  Great for a good laugh.  A good pick-me up.
This has always been one of my favorite comedies.  These three ladies made a great slapstick trio in this classic movie.
Just what I expected , am very satisfied.  What else can I say - it is what it is. Good.
I think that it is the best part when they tell what they would do to there boss.LOVE THE MOVIE SOOOOOOOOO MUCH
Surprisingly relevant - except for the fashion and hairstyles, of course,  They gotta remake this for the modern age!
this is one of the most funniest movies i saw. you'll never stop laughing from start to finish.
This movie rocks, who hasnt wanted to tie their boss up and be the boss for a change, real funny
They just don't make movies like this anymore. It is one of the funniest movies I've seen. I wish we had more
This movie was cast perfect!  The cast of characters keep you laughing!  Iam so glad I purchased this movie!  :)
Even though this is an old movie we thoroughly enjoyed seeing it again. Watching brought a lot of good memories.
Excellent movie and great opening music by Dolly Parton.
This is a great movie, with three big stars. Many people will enjoy this movie with its comedy, and hilarious mix -ups!
Just goes to show how one can turn a disadvantage into a very funny movie. Nothing too raw about it which makes it great for most of the family!
This is one of the best comedy movies that ever came out of the 80's. If you get the chance and time you should watch it.
THIS IS A VERY GOOD DVD. IT IS VERY FUNNY AND YOU ARE WONDERING WHAT WILL HAPPEN NEXT WITH THESE WOMEN.
One of my favorite movies, want to have my 15 yr. old son watch it.
So funny!  Way to go girls!  You showed them how to take care of an office and then some!!  Not for children under 15 yrs. of age!
All were just fabulous in this movie. I love Lily Tomlin so much and I hope she keeps making movies for many more years.
This is always a good movie to watch. Nothing real smutty or dirty about it. All the actors do a good job
I wish I was younger so I could have done half of the things theses ladies did to their boss.  Great movie for all ages!
I love this movie.  Very funny.  very entertaining.  A must see.  If you have not seen this movie, you must.
Dolly and her cohorts are at their best with Dabney...Casting was very good and a really funny movie with great music!
YOU CAN NEVER GET AWAY FROM THIS MOIVE I LOVE DOLLY N LILLY N JANE IT JUST KEEPS YOU WANTIN MORE OLD MOVIES
One of the best movies ever!  You cannot go wrong with this wonderful classic!  Get this one for sure!  A++++++
I love Matt Dillon's early movies and Ruth Gordon is hilarious in this 80's movie. Another good flick to add to the collection.
I love My Bodyguard,I have THE DVDM'tis A Small Treasure Fun to Watch! Sensitive,Grippin',,Brilliant,lol I'm gonna watch it now,G'bye :PP
Have always loved this movie and wanted it in dvd.  It's always fun to see the actors when they were so much younger.
Great movie about friendship with the quiet guy and how little you know when someone doesn't seem to fit in, Wallflowers.
Classic movie. A good movie for all ages still makes me want to kick a bully's but. I like it.
Loved this movie. Took awhile to find it but was well worth the search. I dont think my kids enjoyed i as much as I did. lol
just really like this movie for my collection of all time favorites  really like ruth gorden in the movie along with ray milland.
Ordered for myself.  Loved it.  Had seen before, but wanted for my collection of all the Omen series.  Would recommend to anyone.
I bought this for a friend and she loves the movie.it arrived within 10 days of ordering, whih is great.
Very funny, I liked it a lot, George Hamilton is hillarious
Funny movie. You will laugh and you will cry when you watch this movie. The actor who plays Zorro is very talented.
I saw this movie when it came out in the theaters in the early 80's.  It is a great movie and looks excellent on Blu-ray.
Good actors are in this. It is realistic and the terrain is very authentic. I kept my attention. It was based on a true story.
Great action film, one of the best for Bronson, and a great supporting cast, especiallly Lee Marvin. Not for young age children.
We like Charles Bronson , any movie he is in is always a thriller. We have a lot of his movies
Two great actors playing in a True Adventure outside.Great scenery  and action by all.I liked the Ending, also
Gene Hackman again is excellent as Popeye Doyle.  As good a sequel to the original as Godfather II was to the original.
I got this dvd as a present for my husband who likes military topics. It is an excellent movie and the quality of the video is very good.
I have Taps[ Tom Cruise ] ON LASERDISC,'tis a great Movie And 'tis A MUST SEE For Tom Cruise's FANS :p
I have always loved the movie and the DVD with all of the extras is great
Awesome about the military school. It is sad  you will cry but it is worth crying for . Please buy this amazing story.
The DVD was defected, and so I returned it.  I like the movie, but I wish I could find a DVD not defected.
My husband really likes this movie and I was excited to find on dvd/blu-ray. Looking forward to watching it as soon as possible.
As a former soldier of 24 years, I loved this movie. Had seen it years ago on a rented VHS and just had to own it and add to my collection.
Classic. Very young Tom Cruise ,Sean Penn and Timothy Hutton. Already can see how good they are. Excellent character portrayed. Vivid story.
this so funny all about a man getting super powers from a truck leaking out nuclear waste.  with powers to push thing with his mind.
They don't make movies like this anymore.  Chevy Chase was king of comedy when this was made.  I will buy more of his movies.
Watch Chevy suffer through domestic problems and nuclear waste while dealing with a self help book author and jerk! Worth the money and time!
You never see this movie on tv anymore.  It's a classic Chevy Chase movie and a good one at that!
it is a totally cool classic movie from the 80s that is extremely funny and brings back some really good memories.
I saw this at the theater, and every time it aired on TV.  Great cast, with loads of laughs along the way.
Very interesting movie, it tell us how we started in this world, it kept me watching till the end, I recommend to watch.
Ron Pearlman is the perfect cave man. Rae Dawn Chong needs nothing! Fire making is the thing for survival! Yes!
Has always entertained myself and family...had to have it on DVD. It's very informative as to life for cave people when we were evolving.
An excellent movie I had never seen before but was excellent and would recommend it to anyone who has not seen this yet
its enyoiable movie, I liked, plus learning experience for me,to see the reality of those days. defenely  a movie to wath agaiin
Well done.  Cute.  Helped bring humor to my sick wife.  Recommend to others.  Nice mystery story and nicely cast actors.
A cute movie. A movie for all ages. Funny. Suspenseful. Good storyline. A must see for Chevy Chase and dog lovers.
Really enjoyed this movie as a kid and it's one of those movies that's equally enjoyable today.  Glad I purchased it.
it is an awesome scifi movie that came out in the early 1980s, that I loved as a kid, and is still way cool.
I got this for my brother for Christmas. He was so thrilled. We loved this one when we were young. I know he will wear the disc out in no time.
I own this movie! I like Evreything about this movie! It Rocks!
The DVD Six Pack arrived within the time allowance you said we should receive it.  We will enjoy the movie many times. ~ abp
Don't care much for the language in this movie, but we love the story of the orphans being adopted by the race car driver
Just looking for old movies and thoguth this one would be a good one to add to our collection !
boy there are times I wished I had kids like this and my cars would be top notch and purr lol
If you like race cars, kenny rogers and a good story this is a great movie to watch over and over.
I enjoyed the movie very much. It is very light hearted and one of Kenny Rogers greatest movies. I loved it.
if you like race cars kenny rogers and a good story this is your movie you can see this with the whole famley
BEGINNING TO BELIEVE KENNY ROGERS ACTS JUST AS WELL AS HE SINGS.  GREAT MOVIE VERY FUNNY.  CANT SAY ENOUGH ABOUT IT.
Kenny Rogers is a great actor, and the role that he plays with the 6 kids is very heart-warming.  A great flick for all ages.
I love this movie because it has a lot of comedy and it's great for the whole family to watch. I laughted all through it
i love this movie
ONE OF KENNY ROGERS BEST MOVIES DIANE LANE AND ERIN GREY WERE EXCELLENT IN THIS MOVIE WOULD HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE
Great all age movie.  Truly entertaining for everybody.  Diane Lane as a teenager! Good background music if you're a Kenny Rogers fan
Loved it when it first came out and now I Love it with my son who is a NASCAR fanatic.  Kenny Rogers at his best!  Great gamily movie!!
The movie is great!!! I enjoyed it very much. The movie came in good condition. Thank you very very much.
i love a good ghost story, and this one is in my top 5.  much scarier than amityville, don't watch it late at night if want to sleep well
Saw this movie years ago. Have always been fascinated with the supernatural. Can't wait to see it again, it was awesome
I really enjoyed the suspense of this movie. You never knew when it was going to pop up. It kept you on the edge of your seat for a older movie.
THIS IS A GOOD SCAREY MOVIE LOTS OF THRILLS AND TO THINK IT IS BASED ON A REAL LIFE STORY MAKES IT EVEN MORE SCAREYER.
It has been documented that things such as what happens in this movie really took place. The movie is well made and is worth a watch!
I would recommend this to anyone who likes a good spooky show.  I had seen it a long time ago and had forgotten what a good scary show it was.
Long ago I had seen this movie on VHS. It was creepyback then and it is creepy now. Movie arrived on timeand in perfect shape, plays beautifully!
Very sick. Very funny.Doris the Dominitrix deserves great kudos! She was brilliant and (like most of the rest), unexpected.
I saw this movie long ago and decided it was time to watch it again and to own it. FAST shipping, great DVD
its good to see all the stars when they were younger im really happy to have it added to my collection so I can have movie day
AWESOME BIO OF HOW A WAITRESS TURNS INTO A MULTI NHRA WINNER IN A MANS WORLD
Anything to do with racing is right up my alley. Would recommend for all ages to watch. It's an excellent movie for everybody
THIS IS A GREAT MOVIE!  LOVED IT!  I THINK IF YOU LIKE RACING CARS YOU WILL LOVE THIS GREAT MOVIE!
yes this a movie bought back from my past wow john travolta and Olivia Newtonjohn i this movie together for a second time good story
Romantic action-adventure film, awesome, great and fantastic. Movie from the 80's classic and a must have, would recommend this movie. Love it.
Just a great fun romance action comedy.
I saw this movie when it first came out and really liked it.  Have seen it several times since and will probably watch it again and again!
I have always loved this movie, and decided to buy it.  It is so funny I could watch it every week.
One of my favorite movies that I have been wanting to add to my collection. Funny, entertaining and never gets old.
Michael Douglas and Katleen Turner formed in this movie a couple action adventure worthy of my collection, wonderful and another epic movie...
Already had Romancing the Stone in regular DVD, but love the movie so much I bought it in Bluray.
The DVD did not work and I have to return it.  This is the second time I received a defective DVD.
Double the fun!  This was a Christmas wish from a family member and they were very happy and surprised to receive it.
I love the perfect mix of action, romance, and comedy. It is very 1980's, but oh so cute! Very worth watching!
Good movie with great comedic talents acting their way through the jungle.  These 3 were hilarious in it & I recommend it in movie lover's collection
This has always been a favorite, a movie I never tire of watching over and over, and one where my children and I repeat certain dialogue, so funny!
Love it, its a great fun adventure. I really enjoyed the special features too.It comes in a cheap case but, it does it's job.
Michael Douglas and Kathleen Turner are both excellent in this romance thriller.  Plenty of good comedy as well.  I will watch this again.
Finally added this classic movie to my collection. Fun adventure. Just the ticket for the winter blahs! Fun stuff.Reynee
I am so glad that I finally got this movie on dvd. I love this movie, Joan and Jack---mega chemistry
I liked this movie and had to get it for myself. It is an adventure and a half. It is very funny. Probably the best from Michael Douglas.
This movie is an excellent work!!Good trama, in the simplicity of his lines, is a good story!!
With David Gilmour from Pink Floyd playing on this DVD or LP, it is great. I recieved it fast and in great shape.
I LOVED THE CD. It arrived before it said it would arrive. It is one of Paul McCartney's best work.
Great movie with super stars and wonderful entertainment. Profanities are well hidden and actually funny. Great movie for a mature audience
I really enjoyed this film. When I found it, I had to have it for my collection. Its a gotta have.
The way Roman Moronie butchers the English language is some of the funniest moments of this movie.  Kinda campy movie.
With Keaton at his best this is a movie that you will want to watch over and over! Great cast starring in it!!
I live in texas.This was a great  movie I saw it on hbo years ago its been a favorite ver since.
Classic syfy that can pretty much be watched with the whole family. Enjoyed having family time and remembering watching as a kid
love the movie and the sound and pic was great. no problems with the streaming. would watch again  great actors.
My son and I had been looking for this CD for quite a while.  It is one of our favorites
Again, the acting is what does it for me. This is a movie many recommended to me. I am so glad I got it.
I love this movie which has dennis quaid in. It's a reminder to everybody that we can get along.
It still stands the test of time, much like a star trek episode.  The underlying story makes it timeless.  I was brought to tears.
Many years ago, I saw this movie on sci-fi channel.  It was soooooooo neat.  Finally, I purchased it and am still happy with it..
Love this old classic!  And again don't have anything else to say about it but am require to type so many words.
This movie belongs among the great science fiction movies of all time.  I am glad to add this to my collection.
worlds collide as two enemy soldiers crash on a mining planet and have to work togeter or die.
This Science Fiction Story is truly a classic. Many areas are touched upon, but not in the classical Alien sense.
My husband has looked for this movie along time and the whole family has enjoyed it.  Very good and highly recommended if you like this kind of movie
this movie is awesomely creepy.  full of suspense and science.  The makeup and acting is amazing.  So super awesome- classic sci fi movie
This has been one of my favorite movies since I saw it when it came out.  So glad they put it on DVD.  It is the best of The Fly movies.
I gave it a five stare because I liked .I saw the original one it was a different way to tell the same story
I love the scares, the one-liners and the Never Say Die attitude of the stars makes for a great movie.
So glad I could catch it here my bluray wasn't with me and needed to see it before a show. So convenient!
Aliens was a great movie.  If you love science fiction, then this movie is a must have for your collection.
Few sequels are as good as the original but this one is different.  Way better than the original.
Siguorney Weaver gives me such wood so I always watch this DVD naked so I can play with myself. Uggghhh
this movie rocked!!bill paxton gives his best preformance ever!if you love action,aliens,gore,and comedy, you'll absolutly love this!
This is the real Aliens Movie, not the knock off. Great acting, award winning graphics and effects. Highly recommend this movie.
One of the world's BEST ever science fiction alien movies.  James Cameron directed it, so the characters, screen play, and set are all excellent.
It's a stand out in the muddled world of sci-fi and action films. The extra footage is worth viewing, but just to have it on DVD was enough for me.
The 80s have a special corner on classic films that will survive the ages, and Aliens is one that sets the highest bar for science fiction!
I am so glad to add this to our collection! Love Sigorney weaver and all the alien movies. and it came on time!!!
This movie never gets old. I've watched it many times and still enjoy it. Wish they made more similar to these.
I just love the Aliens series.What a concept and beautiful ,believe able cinematography!lets have some more of these.next stop for me is AVP!
If you love alien you will really love aliens.  I haven't seen it in a while and I had to purchase it.  The product came on time and had no problems.
The entire family enjoyed watching this one.A good science fiction, with plenty of action.A good choice for the whole family..
The tone was better, and the creatures were scary looking. I love this movie. Buy 'Aliens' while you can and go see it.This time it's war.
This film was always good.  It helped persuad me to decide i want to become a marine, and its is so scary and violent that it has to be a classic.
If you like creature features, this is one of the best. I love the characters. I can watch this one over and over.
Just when you thought this movie couldn't get better with age then came along technology.  Blu-ray makes this move even better if that is possible!
The best of the four movies by far. Personally I don't even think about 3 or 4. Great ride throughout and very well done.
This was a gift and was well received. The picture is greately improves fron the VHS. Also the sound track is much better.
This one never fails to excite you even if you have seen it before a couple of times.  A must keeper
OUTSTANDING MOVIE A MUST BUY KEEPS YOU ON THE EDGE OF YOUR SEAT.ALL THE ALIEN MOVIES ARE JUST GREAT ,LOVE THEM.
This sequel is fantastic.  If you haven't seen this movie, then make sure you purchase the original first and then watch this classic.
Seeing Prometheus in the theater prompted me to revisit the Alien films. Alien and Aliens are two of the best science-fiction films ever crafted.
this collection contains an amazing amount of extras along with the directors cut of the movie. it is fantastic to watch.
This movie has more spaces to move into. I like the way the camera moves. A little better than the first one. This goes on the shelf.
Everything's been said about this movie! My favorite comment: It was the first and most successful blending of the Sci-Fi and Horror genres!
Nothings better than watchin' some aliens get blown apart. It was my day to remember how we used to feel about them.(SICK)
I love this movie but now waching in 3d is so much better,was not hall movie in 3d but was exsellent
This was sort of the pre-Expendables Expendables - Scharzenegger, Weathers, Savage; plus awesome weapons and ridiculous fights.  You have to love it.
It was great to see this edition come out; enjoyed see it again but under the revised 3D settings. It was worth the purchase.
Arnold does some great kick-*ss in this movie. I love it. Great movie with a great supporting cast. Get it today.
I think Dutch should be our next president of the United States of America! Tight action, great adventure, right on acting. It has my vote!
I have this 2 Disc set Edition,but I like Predator II Danny Glover more :)
great item, I have received it on time and great quality. the movie looks like it was filmed this year not on the 80's,
Beautiful picture,clear sound,a good vintage sci fi movie with Arnold in top form action from start to finish an 3D to boot,nice transfer
The story line in this movie is very interesting. A alien hunter on earth. If you get this one you must also get Predator 2, they go together well.
love the movie. Arnold was awesome in this movie. this is one of my favorite movies of all times. thank you
I like this move so much. I order it from time to time to see it again.  I remember it from my younger days
The greatest action movie ever made. Nuff said!
I love this movie, but I haven't watched my DVD yet as my TV has died on me. I am sure I will still love it when I get to look at it.
This movie is great I was amazed at the actors then and now . I was amused the entire time .
I've loved this movie ever since it released and in 3D, it's super. Well worth the price, which was nominal, compared to other vendors
Great action/science fiction movie. Special effects and stunts are top notch. Good story line and a LOT of firepower!
It's great on my 1080p.... but it's old pictures but overall its bit better than you seen on DVD.
Arnold did a great movie here fighting against the beast.This is a must for any die hard predstor fan. Great stuff!
This was a great purchase. One of Arnold's better movies.Buy this one, not the sequel.
This is a classic.  We watch it every time it comes on TV and finally had to break down and purchase it.
3d tv last moment have very good titlles its a pleasure se Swarzengger in 3d and the action scenes are perfect
I LIKE  ARNIE,S MOVIES  AND THIS MOVIE IS  GREAT IN 3D . WOULD LOVE TO SEE TURMANATOR 2  IN 3D .
Clean, clear copy of the film. Still a great movie with cool characters and an awesome looking Stan Winston monster!!!! Still holds up today.
A good movie for Arnold fans. A must see prequel to watching Aliens versus Predators.
The seller sent this right on time and it was in excellent shape and of course is the best monster action movie.
I grew up watching this one with my father. it was a good one to see. i was little when i saw it the first time.
Great movie with some classic Arnold. Plenty of action, violence, swearing and blood. Did I mention Arnold? This is a great buy.
dvd is ok but the 5 stars is for the movie and this movie will never get old to me its still enjoyable till this day...great for the collection....
be sure an get this one i watchthis movie 3 times its that goodone of the best cost 2.99
WOW!!!!!!!!!! what an experience it was to see Arnie in 3d on a LG 55 inch 3dtv.  That was INCREDIBLE!
Great acting, Great special effects, Great story, Great momentum. Great movie.
this is a most! the classic predatos with the last technology ! a total different experience , most vivid , more adrenaline!
Every 1 who is a fan of Arnold knows he is a legend! Original movie. This is a good #throwback
My husband and I enjoyed the movie very much, the movie arrived on time just as they said it would.
One of my favorite Arnold movies. Great price . I would reccommend it to any one. Thank you very much.
Still as good as I remember it. thought it would seem old, but it was a timeless classic. I'm glad I bought it.
Movies are so much more entertaining when in 3D. No problems with this purchase or delivery. Better in 3D than it's original 2D version.
this is my favorite Arnold flick.. the only thing better than this would be Chuck Norris in any Vietnam type flick. Chuck rules!
this is a great movie.  I have seen it many times and still like it  plenty of action to keep you in your seatI have #2 also
I loved this movie. The dope scene seemed real as can be. Good action. Must see. Highly recommended... Ossie Davis was a brilliant man...
Great movie, an interesting take on the post-apocalypse plot. Glad I own it, a real treasure for my video library.
We use this as an introduction to literature for our 8th grade students.  They enjoyed the entire story.  We'll show it again next school year.
One of my favorite books and movies.  It is faithful to the story and very well acted.  Love the costuming and views of the countryside.
Compare this movie with it's look-alike "A Simple Twist of Fate." I much preferred this one - the passionate original story line and the ending.
story line is great, acting is even better. very anti-nuke, still a great mini-series. you really should buy this dvd.
This was just fantastic, by far the best of the Ripping Yarns!
This is a wonderfully romantic story, and an excellent production--who cares if it is low budget?! I am so thrilled they finally brought it to DVD!
I would definitely recommend this one! I have always loved period pieces and especially anything that was written by Charlotte Bronte'.
I have really enjoyed Jane Eyre for years and this one is very good.  I have watched several times.Thank you,  candpfoote
I like this adaptation of Jane Eyre very much and it was a great price!
another one of these movies I got for my daughter and she seems to like it a lot. I do believe she has good taste in movies like her father.
Loved it when I saw it on PBS years ago, love owning it on DVD. This version with Timothy Dalton & Zelah Clarke is the best. I never get tired of it.
Timothy Dalton does a great job in this version of Jane Eyre.  The movie is well done and worth getting if you are a fan of Charlotte Bronte.
you love jane eyre you will love this one - very romantic and very well portrayed by all actors -
I highly recommend this version of Jane Eyre. It's the closest to the book so it will make sense and is so superbly acted. Why wait!?
My daughters and I watched this series on TV and all think it is the BEST version of the story out there barr none!
Really nice version of a favorite classic, although Timothy Dalton is really too good looking to be an acurate Mr. Rochester. Very enjoyable.
I really like the actors in this version of the movie and find it intriguing and entertaining.  One of my all time favorites.
This is excellent! Beautiful singing from Elizabeth. I love how Mrs. Bennett and Mr. Bingley are portrayed in the movie. It's a good movie to watch!
We have watched more than on version of this, including a more modern version.  Of all the others this one from BBC is by far the very best.
I recall watching this with my mother was I was small on PBS.  It was lovely to be able to share it with my daughters.
How can anyone resist Jane Austen?  This is a very good adaption of Jane Austen's &#34;Pride and Prejudice&#34;.  I enjoyed it very much.
IN MY OPINION, THIS PRODUCTION BY THE BBC IS BEST.  THIS ELIZABETH AND DARCY SEEM MORE BELIEVABLE THAN MOVIE STARS IN THE OTHER PRODUCTIONS.
So much has been written about this and other versions that I would only be adding to the noise.  Excellent performances.
I was entranced by this version when I first saw it on TV and watched each episode 3 or 4 times as it was scheduled on my PBS station.
A very old version of story but I still liked it. It is interesting if you love romance and old fashioned values and if you love Jane austen.
This is an older version of Pride and Prejudice, shot mostly on set with 3 cameras but still a good one.
Again I like this version of Pride and Prejudice.  The acting was great and the characters were well depicted.  I enjoyed every bit of the film.
I have purchased different versions of Pride and Prejudice to view how each is interpreted. I am very, very satisfied.
This movie catch my attention long ago, dont know whyexactly, its diferent romantic and disturbing
well this is just a classic love story and music is great and hey you got to love the opening scene .. top movie :)
THis may be an oldie - but it is a goodie!!  I truly enjoyed this Mansfield Park more than the latter one.
Another great movie that didn't seem to get the play it deserved.  I love the mystery of the whole thing.  Watch it.
I love this movie. I have seen it quite often and never tire of it. now I can watch it any time I want to.
This is an almost classic movie. However, its not for everyone. This one was used as a gift.
Both Debra Winger and Theresa Russell offer great performances.  This film will not help your world view of the female gender.
I first watched this years ago, and laughed out loud the whole way through.  It's one of my favorite comedies of all time.
Grandson's favorite
Great performances by Nicholas Cage, Holly Hunter and John Goodman in a humorous, well-timed comedy showing the truths of human nature.
This film is pure Coen. There is hilarious action revolving around the story of an couple who kidnap a baby.
I simply love this movie. I am collecting as many movie by the Cohen brothers as I can. This is another hit movie by Ethan and Joel Cohen.
This is without a doubt, one of the funniest movies of all time! You will laugh if you have a sense of humor!
Now that I'm a mother of two a little hard to watch but all in all very funny. A classic Cohen Brothers movie.
I like this movie very much. Lots of funny parts. I like that the cop ends up committing a crime.
I've loved this movie for years and swear it is the best coen Brothers movie ever made. It was a real find. Totally satisfied.
Just too damn funny. Could not stop laughing. Nick Cage and Holly what's her name deserve oscars for this. It is corny, sure, but still a riot
This is one of my all time favorite comedies. I would highly recommend it to my friends and family. I never tire of watching this movie.
Love this movie. Makes me laugh everytime I watch it. Would love to see a sequel to this great movie.
I wish I could inject this movie into my bloodstream...It Entertains Me Exponentially.
a classic here, it scrambled my mind like eggs on a plate. there's no way modern movies could exist without this coen brothers film it is fantastic!
this movie is one of my all time greates man jeff b. is one of the best actors ever to hit the silver screen
MY HUSBAND AND I LOVE BRUCE LEE AND ALL HIS MOVIES GLAD TO ADD THIS ON TO OUR COLLECTION THATS A GREAT DEAL.
Bruce Lee was a great athelete...My favorite is Enter The Dragon but this is very good. All Bruce Lee fans should have this movier
Hello,. He is the fastest martial arts man of his time and no one to replace him. I enjoy all of his movies.
This is What I expected. Decent quality for a movie this old, great add on to my Bruce lee movie collection, OK packaging.
THIS MOVIE FROM BRUCE LEE IS THE ONE I LIKE A LOT. ONEBODY CAN MASS WITH BRUCE LEE.THE LAST FIGHT WAS COOL.I LOVE THIS MOVIE.
This movie is good to have if you are a Bruce Lee fan.  I consider it a nice collectible.
I'm looking forward to purchasing fists of fury to add to my collection.  I am a huge fan of martial arts
If you like Bruce Lee, then you should buy this movie.  I consider it a nice collectible.
Gorgeous film, wonderful but the sound on the DVD is impossible!
I love this movie. It's quaint and slow-moving and beautiful, richly filmed with captivating cinematography. I watch it at least once a year.
I've Loved This Film For As Long As I Can Remember.A Great Cast.Now On BD, Even  Better.Own It
Cost a lot and worth it! Brilliant drama, acting, beautiful views, one  little strange scene, but otherwise, a movie worth your time and money.
I have had the video for some time and knew I needed to upgrade to DVD -- This version is great and I am enjoying both DVDs in the set.
Watch this movie! You will laugh and it is a movie you will watch over and over again. JoBeth Williams and Tom Conti are fabulous.
It is the same movie I remember and there isn't any awful bloody scenes and sometimes I prefer that. It is just what I expected.
One of my very favorite movies. Love the Actors and their Characters. Jo Beth's costumes are wonderful. I wanted to be her.
It is funny, hilarious, fast moving movie. In good taste and one that the whole family can watch without worrying if it is o.k. for the kida.
I love it.I had read all the reviews and was very anxious to see this movie.It is great.A true romance.I think everyone will enjoy this movie.
May be one of the funniest, overlooked comedies of all time.
THIS IS ABOUT A WRITER OF STORIES WHOSE HUSBAND IS NOT THE SUPPORTIVE KIND - SHE WINS A PRIZE.IT IS VERY FUNNY.
This is such a fun movie.  Such a fun spy romance.  Just when you think it's over...it keeps going.  Great classic movie!
This is one of my very favorite movies. As a reader of romance I can identify with the main character. Funny and romantic-- excellent !
If you like musicals, this is a nice version of a Christmas Carol. Not he best but a good version.
Where's the DVD on this magnificient movie?  The music, the actors, the script are all perfectly mixed.
I like scrooge depending on who is scrooge. This guy was pretty good. Patrick Stuart as scrooge was OK but not as good as this one.
we have the VCR and loved it and wanted the DVD for more information...excellent - the best Scrooge on the market
I enjoy playing this dvd of  a Christmas it was nice to come home after working to sit down and watch this dvd
This is one that you will want to see again and again!  Wonderful portrayal, excellent filming, great actors!
I loved this musical version of The Christmas Carol.  Kinda brings back memerories when i lived in England.  I like Albert Finney.
Albert Finney absolutely nails it as Ebenezer!!  Classic film.  Watch this one every Christmas with the family.  Kids love it too!!
I replaced my original DVD version with this one to upgrade our holiday library. The sound and picture make this an enjoyable Blu-Ray!
I have always loved this movie, it has such an uplifting ending and the music just makes it more enjoyable.
This has been beautifully restored and the blu ray version is so clear.  This is a must have for Christmas.
I enjoy this  musical and feel its one of the better versions of Scrooge. Acting is fun and playful for old british feel
This is the best adaptation of a Christmas Carol.Albert Finney is Xcellent as old Scrooge.Scrooged from Bill Murray is a close second.Excellent.
DVD PICTURE EXTREMELY CLEAR. ARRIVED IN EXCELLENT CONDITION.  I LOVE THE CHRISTMAS MUSIC  AND THE TIMELESS STORY.
This is an excellent version of the story - and the music is great!  Albert Finney makes an excellent Scrooge.
Of all the versions of Scrooge, this is my husband's favorite from his childhood, so I bought it. we watch it every year now.
I have been watching this Christmas story for years. It is an entertaining musical with unforgettable characters and songs.Highly recommended!!
This is my all time favorite telling of the story of Scrooge!  &#34;Thank You Very Much&#34; runs thru my mind long after Christmas is over!!
Perfect story for the whole family at the holiday season. A must see for christmas lovers. A great story for everyone.
We always enjoy this version of the Christmas Carol with it's lively and heartwarming songs.  Albert Finney plays Scrooge to perfection!
We collect all the old Christmas Carol movies and this one was one of the classics. Well worth the watch!
I have watched this movie for years and still watch it every Christmas. It's a classic and well acted. It's one of my favorite Christmas movies.
The ultimate Christmas classic. You will hum the songs past the New Year! Even children will like it. BUY IT!
I like musical productions and this one is a good one. Albert Finney played a Scrooge and he convinced me he was really miserlly.
Out of all the Scrooge movie that I have seen. I this this one is the best. loved it!
This is the best film out of the Scrooge movies (in my opinion). If you like &#34;A Christmas Carol&#34; then go ahead and buy this!
This is one of my favorite Christmas movies.  Albert Finney does a great job, and the music is very good.
Have the VHS copy, but the blue ray really was great...looked and played well...glad I ordered it...it was delivered fast and a good value
One of my favorite Christmas movies of all time. I would suggest this one if you have never seen it.
My fav Christmas Carol movie of all time. The Blu-ray version is fabulous. Highly recommended for putting joy into the holidays.
added this to the Santa Clause, Miracle on 34th Street, A Christmas Carol, and Bad Santa for viewing at Christmas time
I always enjoy this version of A Christmas Carol and look forward to it each year.  I love the music!
Bought this as a gift for a friend of mine and she absolutely loves it!!  Brings back childhood memories! A Christmas must!
A great movie. Dustin in his early days. It's obvious why we still love him. Like wine, he gets better as he ages.
This is a classic and still one of my favorite movies.  I gave this as a gift and they love it.
This is my second favorite movie of all time. Who doesn't love Chief Dan George?? Many life lessons in this comedy, too.
love this movie and dustin hoffman is a great actor. this is a great movie at a great price.would reccommend
My husband and I both enjoyed this movie!! The DVD was in great condition!! This is a great addition to our collection!
Great wide screen transfer with vibrant colors and sound. This is the film that Hoffman should have won the Academy Award for.
Dustin Hoffman is an excellent actor and this movie is among the best in classics.  Controversial to some, but entertaining all the same..
the best movies I have seen. Dustin, as always, is incredibly versatile.Suggest it for everyone that like comedy.Excellent.
this is a movie you can learn and have some fun and enjoy your self and watch over and over
this is one of the best movies ever made. comedy everywhere and it also is the longest movie i believe 3 hrs long
Funny and great film keeps you watching. Old film seen it many times and will se it many more times!
This was one of Dustin Hoffman's best movies ever, his performance was equal or even superior to "The Graduate".
Seen this movie on both VHS and DVD; It is great on Blue Ray. It is worth every last penny.
This movie has been around a long time. However it never ages and never becomes outmoded by new technology. Always a great film!
Dustin Hoffman is so funny in this movie.  We watch a lot of movies during the winter and this is always great for a lot of laughs.
On my top 100 list.  Probably stretched Dustin Hoffman's acting and comedic skills more than any other movie he's made.
This is probably my favorite Dustin Hoffman film.  Although he is a great drama actor, he excels in comedy.  He did this one masterfully.
Wonderful.  I forgot how many great songs they have.
Great show, I am glad I bought it, I showed it to my grandsons and they watched the whole thing.
GREAT PERFORMANCE. I WOULD RECOMMEND FOR ANY SIMON AND GARFUNKEL FAN. ONE OF THE LAST GREAT LIVE PERFORMANCES MADE BY THE DUO AMIDST A HUGE AUDIENCE.
I have it on VHS, and wanted the DVD in case the VHS wore out.  Great story about a vanishing breed of men and time.
Excellent movie.  Lee Marvin at his best,  A very interesting story telling the tale of the Old West before the era ended.
great cast great story and mama cass singing gives me goose bumps. a must have for any collection. buy it now !!!!!
My absolute favorite western. It captures life on ranches after the winter of 1886-87.This needs to be out on widescreen DVD.
my brother loves older movies, so when we were talking he told me some videos he would love to have to I ordered them for him for Xmas
Dustin Hoffman was very good, and the final scenes of the movie were exciting and thrilling to watch.
what a classic film, the remake was horrable, should have left well enough alone, actually rating it from 0-10 i would rate it a -0000000000000
This was an old movie, and hard to find. I was really surprised that you had it. Thanks for the fast delivery, too!
A must own, Hoffmans best performance. Such a great movie, a must for any collector, very good film. Buy it.
The movie is well made but contains sexual content probably not suitable for teenagers.  I recommend parents preview first and then decide.
straw dogs is a very good movie dustin  hoffman is excellent  and so is susan george in this drama  this is also the uncut version very good movie.
Saturn 3 is a great action adventure scifi film with Kirk Douglas and Farrah Fawcett.
Its a bit campy and predictable but it is still classic Sci Fi and a great watch.  A rare case of a good story and great talent.
genius prerunner of the terminator in my opinion kurt is a great actor and farrah well what else can i say
The blu-ray, both technical quality of the disc and package, doesn't disappont the expectations. it also is a region free disc.
Great dark movie.If you are not overly serious about your Sci Fi then you might like this movie.Google it first, it is weird.
Another classic you should own if you are into the old scary movie thing like me!  Kids love it!  I had to have it & so should you!
My husband is a huge Dickens fan, he has wanted this on DVD for quite awhile, its vey nice, he loves it
Sweet and funny like the book. Shows how people have always been the same, and always will be. We're all just a bunch of silly old buggers.
Vey well done. Arrived quickly and in very good condition. Not very many other productions, worth it. Enjoed watching it.
I can't wait for this limited deluxe Edition of on of the greatest Movies of all time!!! WOW!!! Just buy this Miracle!!!
This is a very solid movie with good acting and cinemotagraphy.
This is a classic movie that will inspire you.  It is clean cut and great for the entire family.
This is the favorite movie of my best friend, so bought this as a Christmas gift.  He says he has watched it many times.
they just don't make movies like this anymore - great story - well done - great actors - you will love it
I always loved this movie. Heston and Loren at their best. I've waited a long time for this one, and this is a fine Deluxe Edition.
after waiting for so long at last we have a masterpiece with good sound and a very good picture.  a dvd you must own.
This is a very good quality release of the original Cid. This film is the reconquista on an epic scale.
I have never seen this movie but have heard of it for years.  i love both of the main actors in it and am looking forward to watching it.
Just look at the other reviews. This movie is 100% Five stars. That is the best way I can describe it. Finally, I can not believe it !!
This product was received on time in good condition. It's inspirational for me. The cast brings the story alive.
This was well worth waiting for.  The color and audio track are superb.  I only regard that is not in blu-ray high def.
Perfect Monster movie. Loved it. Reminds me of Godzilla. any monster fan would love it.  Back to the Rubber suit.
Great on Monster movie. Takes me back to when I was a kid...Itfits right in with the B&W; movies they made here in the 50's
Product arrived very quickly. DVD quality great, both visual and audio. Brought me back to my boyhood days at the .50 cent Saturday matinee.
Husband loves this flick and watches it during the year. It is a reminder of childhood and early TV viewing after school.
Watched this movie as a kid,and had to have it in my movie collection! Wished they still made movies like this today.
top film not the best pic q of blue ray I have see of a old film as old as it is
This one is super. Iliked everything about it. Watched it many many times. Great special effects. Except for the rubber fish.
A really good, old classic monster movie, with a lot of personality development among the actors. A good old movie!
i first saw gorgo in the sixties. this reproduction on dvd was excellent. i pulled my grandson in to watch it with me and we both had a good time.
A true masterpiece by director Dario Argento! A must have for and suspense or giallo collection.
this is argentos first horror film and one of my favourites how it all comes together at the end is amazing one of the best giallos i've ever seen!!!
This underrated mystery is the classic sleeper. You don't know what happened until the last, shocking second of the film. Riveting entertainment.
Me and my best friend in school use to watch this movie over and over again!  We'd act out the creature in the basement. LOL
One of the best non-Martial Arts movies ever to be released and distibuted by World Northal Pictures back in 1981.
Obviously a classic, both in it subect matter and in the production.  It opens your mind and satifies you perceptions:  visual, thespian and mental.
Another Hammer Horror that is a must have. Re-mastered and done well. Looks much nicer than the 1st. DVD issue out a few years ago. Worth the price.
Wanted this for so long, great movie. Shelly is great and Ryan is great, but the star of the show is Drew Barrymore. You love this movie.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE.  Its a lot better than I thought it would be. Its a horror movie with humor.  Very highly recommended.
I liked this movie since I saw it in a thearetr! With the new technology aqnd home theater options,it makes the movie ENEN BETTER!!!!!!!
A funny, scary movie.  The werewolf &#34;transformation&#34; was really something to see!  Great atmosphere.  Some really scary moments in this film.
This is a great movie with great animation of the transformation into a werewolf. Good depiction of a werewolfs activity and what it does to survive
I loved this movie when i saw it in the movie theater. I still love it on blu-ray! just the same as when i saw it on the big screen.
Very scary. Very funny. Featuring the excellent Griffin Dunne. A must for fans of the genre. Why has John Landis made so much rubbish since?
We loved this movie and could not believe we did not own it already! This is a classic horror film to be enjoyed by all!
The best werewolf movie ever gets a outstanding edition on blu-ray. A must have in any collection.
Holy cow what a masterpiece.  From the cinematography to the soundtrack this film is a near piece of perfect horror movie making.
Even with some of the cheesy effects this classic 80's horror flick is a must see.  Good soundtrack is a bonus.
A great Horror Classic. With lots of fright and lots of sick humor. Need to see it to believe. Own this, Rent this but most of all see it.
Best movie ever.  So well done and had to have my own copy.
This is one of my favorite horror movies. There is some funny parts to the movie.
Luv this movie. Not only a great horror movie but because John Landis directed it, there is a comic element as well.
I love this movie and I hope to see it released on DVD someday!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! It would definitely sell a lot of copies!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
i haveunrated version preetty cool could have been goreyer with a weird ending lots of nudity boys included
I really liked this movie.It was very good.The little girl was perfect in  the movie.I am glad I got to see it.My sister enjoyed the movie,also.
Great little gem of a film.  Laugh out loud funny and written to be that way.  Wholly enjoyable, and only slightly dated.
GREAT MOVIE WHAT A DIFFERENT FROM A DVD AND VHS THIS DVD IS BEAUTIFULLY CLEAR I LOVE IT I BEEN LOOKING FOR A DVD FOR A LONG TIME LOVE THE MOVIE
And also how sad! My step-son and I were sobbing by the end. Definitely a classic must-have for our collection.
i chose this rating cause i love this movie. every monster is in it. lots of good actors. the movie came on time
I've loved this movie since i was a kid and still love it on blu-ray!
This is one of my daughter's favorite movies from childhood and now it's become one of my grandson's.  So now they can enjoy it together.
this movie is sow kool i love the walf man in it sow real looking lot ove hard work making this movie i bet.
I'm so excited they came out with this on Blu-ray, it's totally clear and the sound is terrific, highly recommend.
I AM A FAN OF THE CLASSICS AND OLD SCHOOL MOVIES SO I LOVED THIS MOVIE AS A KID BUT I DONT REMEBER ALL THE CUSSING FROM THE KIDS LOL
This is a childhood favorite of mine, had to get it. This movie has a great concept, kids with guns fighting classic monsters.
Monster Squad is a great kid and family movie for probably 10 and older. Good monsters and special effects for an older movie. Fun, too!
My daughters loved this movie when they were young, so I ordered it in blu-ray for my grand children's enjoyment. Again great prices and its blu-ray.
we love westerns and this was not top of the line but has some great actors in it and it is a good movie.
I LIKE WESTERNS, AND THE ACTORS IN THIS MOVIE. I JUST WISH THEY ALL SANG MORE.
What can I say, John was the man. Enjoyed this when I was a kid and enjoying it more at 50.The Blu Frog Energy Drink Man
This is movie is fabulously clear and sharp in Blu-Ray. It shipped very quickly. My husband was very pleased to find it in his stocking.
John Wayne is the best at action movies whether westerns or war.  He does an excellent job and has a great supporting cast in this movie.
Have a copy of my own and my dad keeps borrowing it. Got this for him and he was tickled with it.  Would recommend seller to anyone
this is just one of his great movies. outstanding movie. great supporting cast . he wanted to depict the ragdety of the vietnam war.
the movie arrived in good shape and I am pleased with it -- but of course how can you go wrong with John Wayne!
This was a very good movie and Richard Crenna was great and I cried for Peter at the end too.
John Wayne took this idea straight to the top stating &#34;they got it wrong&#34;Even the Good Guys don't come backUSN(Ret)
Better then any other Vietnam era movie. And John Wayne is great....all star cast and a fun time in the not serious parts
I like the scene where the green berets manage to destroy the general's guards before capturing the general.
I lived during this war, it is a great show, it was worst over there then the show lets on but still full of sadness and sorrow.
This a great movie from 1967 with both John Wayne and Star Trek's own George Takei.
Always has been a favorite. I give it 5 stars. A great movie. Have always liked the movie for as long as I can remember.
gift to husband and I am going to assume he loves it because he loves John Wayne. Was Christmas gift.
I thought it was a great movie.  I would recommend it to anyone that likes a good John Wayne movie.  No problems.
My husband loves anything John Wayne and this one is a great collector's item. A great gift for him, too.
ONE OF THE DUKES BEST WAR MOVIES  SHOW WHAT THAT WAR WAS REALY LIKE  A MUST HAVE IN YOUR COLLECTION
This is a great movie. After all its John Wayne. There is no one else like him.He was one of America's great.
This is a eye opening movie regarding the Vietnam war.  It is an excellent movie.
I have always loved this movie and wanted to add to my collection by upgrading it from VHS to DVD.
Awesome HD. Viet Nam is a beautiful country--despite the war. John Wayne is typical. Came on time and in perfect condition.
I Chose This Rating Because Anything John Wayne Acts in Is Going to Be a Hit With His Fans .... Alan
This is a classic John Wayne movie about Vietnam.  You can't beat the Duke for bringing the truth to the big screen.
I love looking at these movies on memorial day.
James Dean died way too soon. This film gives an excellent look and  insight into what a brilliant actor he was. RIP James Dean
The movie is great, but the special edition disc is even better. It tells about the man, his passions and his life growing up. Very insightful.
Excellent film, but lost much of book's richness.  For example, there is no Chinese-American character.  Dean exhibits some fine acting.
I have this 2 edition set.  It's time to watch it again.  It's a keeper, and you won't get tired of it.  James Dean did very well !!
Truly one the the best dramatic movies ever made and wonderfully restored by Warner's. Keep up the great work on your oldies.
This was hard for me to find, so I was delighted to order it.  It's a fine copy with worthwhile extras.  Worth the money.
Beautiful film with one of film's best scores. Excellent performances all around and a stunning ending. Certainly Dean's finest hour.
Wasn't too keen on this story but I guess that is just my taste.  However, Dean is amazing in it and worth its weight in gold just to watch him.
love the movie because it has James Best in it and he is very funny he is my favorite acter of all time
Hooper is one of my all-time favorites. Was it ever going to win awards for best picture or best acting? Of course not, but it sure is fun.
This a great movie, if your a Burt Reynold's fan then be sure to add this dvd to your collection!
Great &  Very Funny Burt Reynolds classic about the world of stuntmen. Also stars jan michael vincent in his early days
IF YOU LIKE COWBOY STUNT MAN MOVIES THIS IS THE ONE FOR YOU.  ITS BASED ON A HOLLYWOOD STUNTMAN AND STARS BURT REYNOLDS.
Big Burt Reynolds fan.  Love the cast of characters, and if nothing else, the stunts & vehicles.  Not to mention the quotes.  Awesome!
Oh my goodness!  I found Hooper on DVD.  It doesn't get any better than Burt Reynolds, Sally Fields, and fast cars?
Always loved this movie.  One of my favorites
you gotta watch this if you haven't seen this, you are in for a HUGE treat..get ready to roll laughing.
A classic movie. Peter Falk and Alan Arkin are really funny.This still stands up bvery well after all these years.
A great and truly funny stupid movie but I am adding these additional nineteen words that are required of me to finish this rating.
Two great comic actors... and a third comic character actor, make this movie an enjoyable break after a long day a work.
Enjoyed this one. Had its boring moments but overall it's a very good movie. It's engaging, smart and fun. Good acting. Recommended.
It is just what I was looking for and I enjoyed it immensely as it fulfills my movie watching needs.
This Mister Roberts DVD is a classic and still very funny after so many years. The DVD arrived perfectly and plays great,
The comedy was fabulous. The interaction of the crew was terrific. So many different Stars, all together. Great movie.
Upon talking to the recepient he is very pleased with the quality of the movie.  It is not grainy and is a pleasure to watch.
This is one of the best Henry Fonda films.  He plays the character so well.  The character is well written and quite a hero himself.
One of my favorite WWII movies.  Remember crying the first time I watched it.  Even all these viewings later, still tear up.
They had some of the best actors out of Hollywood that goes way back like , Jack Lemmon , Henry Fonda and James Cagney . It is a very good movie
Bought this as a gift for my father.  Wonderful classic DVD movie about war time Pearl Harbor.  He loved this gift and it was shipped quickly.
I rented this for my grandsons visit. He had never seen anything, or heard of Henry Fonda, James Cagney, or Jack Lemmon! He was delighted!
Great movie about someone that wanted to &#34;get into the war&#34; and the road blocks in the way.  Nice humor for present/former military.
Fonda, Cagney, Lemon and Powell are superbly cast in this award winning classic.
Watching Henry Fonda trying to laugh hysterically is worth the money! This a great movie worth the popcorn and cokes!
It's a serious movie with humor in it. I just loved the whole movie.  It was pleasureable to watch.  We all loved it.
Mister Roberts is a great movie.  My wife and I really enjoyed it and recommend it to anyone who enjoys this type of movie.
Superb cast starring Henry Fonda, Jack Lemmon, James Cagney and William Powell. Funny and witty, wonderful supporting cast of characters
A great film in perfect condition.Terrific story, great cast Van Johnson and Jose Ferrer in perhaps theirs best performances. A winner..
I am very pleased with this dvd.It plays beautifully, the case and artwork are in near pristine condition. happy!
Excellent story and acting. Highly recommend it especially to those who like World War II stories away from the fighting part.
Henry Fonda, Jimmy Cagney, Jack Lemmon... a great study on characters and personal integrity. Humor off the wall and drama sneaked in under the wire.
Very funny classic movie. We've watched this movie on air tv over the years. Better on DVD. Great cast. They don't make em like this anymore
Good Movie one of my favorites - price was good also - need to hook up my DVD player - thank you
This is one of my all-time favorites.  This is an acting tour-de-force with Cagney, Fonda, and Lemon.  The timing, the dialogue, don't miss it.
A stirring preformance.  WW II vintage material but outstanding understanding of the era.  A star studded movie you don't want to miss.
Have seen this movie many times and it's always good; wanted it for our collection. Highly recommended to movie buffs.
I have been looking for this movie for a long time.  I love Henry Fonda and James Cagney.  I would recommend this movie to everyone.
I saw this film the first time aroundand still like to watch it. Henery Fonda and Jimy Cagney; what more could you want!
"Mister Roberts" was both funny and poignant. Members of our family from age 7 to age 80 enjoyed it. Highly recommended.
Very good movie.
I love this movie. It is definitely one that should be watched by old and young. It is a classic.
This is a classic. Terrific actors and great story. Still entertains after all these years.
If you love classic movies, this is the movie for you.  Can't get enough of this type of movie.  Especially one with William Powell in it!
Good movie, great price. This is one of my favorite movies, wish i could find father goose cheaper than 64 bucks
I have long enjoyed Henry Fonda as an actor and this ranks as one of his best movies in the latter part of his career.
I bought this for my husband for Christmas.  We love watching these kind of movies so I got a good deal on it and bought it.  I recommend.
What a great cast; James Cagney, Jack Lemon and Henry Fonda also with Ward Bond!Always great to see such great actors in movies.
What a wonderfully sad movie.  I love the old movies!  Henry Fonda and Jack Lemon played great characters and James Cagney was great as the captain!
Jimmy Cagney, Henry Fonda, Jack Lemmon.  A great cast working with a great director - John Ford.  Definitely must see!
I saw this movie years ago and just loved it. It's a complex story and interesting as well. Really enjoyed it.
One of Streisand's best, great team with Kristofferson. Loved it when it was first released, enjoyed it even more now. Collection must have....
I saw this movie when it came out, and loved everything about it.  The music, the story, of course I cried!!
Who doesn't love Barbra Streisand? Such a classic movie. Recommended to anyone, and bring the tissue box! Worth every tear.
Great item and price the person i purchase for love this movie and i would tell every one about your sight
This DVD is one of the best of Kris Kristofferson & Barbara Streisand performaces.A great  love story, with a sad ending.
was looking for this movie for quite some time and it is good.  thanks for having it on hand, you guys are always great.
~this oldie is a classic for us...appreciate having it in my library...I rcvd it in awesome time frame...thank you. jlw
Another classic Barbra Streisand movie with great story line and wonderful soun track. A must see for all Streisand lovers.
A very good, but VERY sad movie.  Unfortunately, it's the way the movie stars marriages come and go.  Such talent!
Received it very fast and very happy with the DVD. Well worth the money.
the  movie  is  awesome  and  people should  see itcause  this  movie  shows  how love  can be forever  and  break  all  the rules
I had forgotten that Kris could also sing well, but what a tragic story. The music saved the show and the intimate scenes.
there are several movies made with this title but this is my favorite several of them were also remakes of a early classic
Antother beautifol  movie with Barbra streisand she is a ex- lent actor and a beautifulsingers. the movie is very intertaing.
It worked on my DVD player. Finally, someone must have tested it to make sure it worked on a DVD player.
I purchased this for my mother - who is a huge Barbara Streisand fan. The movie is epic and certainly one to see at least once.
good movie with great music its worth the money and I just wish they would make more movies like this one
i have this film on VHS I want it on DVD, the music is great there is a song that reminds me of my mother, "one more look at you", I love that song
Barbra Streisand and Kris Kristofferson redo the film done by Judy Garland and James Mason a very good performance by both
I love this movie. I've had it for a few years on VHS, but wanted it on DVD Blu-ray.If you like older movies and Streisand, you'll love this one.
Ain't loved this movie since it really made me think twice and question the events of JFK's assassination. Will the truth ever be known!
Jane Fonda was great and looked fab!!!! Seen before, wanted to have it in my collection..a good thriller..Peace & Love
Love the old movies they don't make them like that anymore love the movie a fan of Jane Fonda also have a nice day amazon thanks :)
Great movie all around, but the last ten minutes will take your breath away. Jane is so amazing in this, just wait for it.
Jane Fonda did a great job in this storyline.  She is such a great actress and between Donald Sutherland and her, the movie turned out great.
New York is the backdrop for the dance between the realistic cynicism and the Puritanism. The moral is so relative and Jane Fonda so beautiful ...
I haven't watched this movie in years. It has definitely stood the test of time. Great casting too. Fonda is amazing!
George Burns at his best. Just as good as 'Oh God" and it has a twist at the end. Funny Movie. Worth an evening of Popcorn and a beer.
My asked for this movie because it is one of her favorites.  She was very happy to get it and I know she'll be watching it soon.
A great value of a very entertaining movie about life and the coming of age and loss of innocence. Jenifer O'Neill is nice to look at
One of the best male coming of age movies I've seen, because it is insightful and believable.
I saw this movie ;years ago and I was happy Amazon has it.I bought it on the instant video for my kindle . A really good movie i love the ocean
I first saw this movie in 1972 and at the time it was very controversial.  This movie is still one of my favorites and I am so glad I purchased it.
I remember seeing this movie when I was in junior high school.  It brought back many memories of the good old days!
One of my favorite movies as a young girl enjoyed watching again after many years. Good drama of a love story of a young mans first love
I remember when it first came out on VHS. I was surprised to find it on DVD. Great Movie! Thanks for making my day.
I had forgotten how funny this movie is.  The actors are great and the plot hilarious.  If you have not seen this you are missing out.
hilarious. slapstick  classic , family friendly. plays like a live action looney tune. laughed through the whole thing. classic and timeless
I HAVE LOVED THIS MOVIE AS A CHILD AND I AM THRILLED TO KNOW THAT IT IS STILL IN PRINT.  MUST HAVE, STILL VERY FUNNY...LOVE IT...
If you've never seen this movie - put it on your watch list. One of the few good, clean FUNNY movies.
This is a great movie! Anyone who doesn't have it shold buy it. It is hillarious.
This movie is my husband and my favorite. It's clean and very humorous. We would recommend it to anyone looking for a good laugh.
One of my all time favorites!!!  Very, very funny!  One of Ryan ONeal's only good movies. Glad to have it in my collection.
Barbra Streisand and Ryan O'Neil were very good in this movie. This is a movie worth watching over and over again.
I watched this again recently and was glad it still holds up.  What a hoot! If you haven't seen this you are in for a treat.
A perfect gift for my daughter who loves watching this story over and over.  Glad amazon offers all the oldies.
Warner Brother's still shines bright all through this now classic comedy. Great movie to relax and laugh with. Fun for the family too !
My wife and I thoroughly enjoyed viewing this zany movie once again and are happy to now own a copy!
I love this movie. I would recommend to anyone that enjoys quirky caper/mistaken identity type situations. A great light comedic mystery.
classic hollywood comedy, the chemistry between Babs and Ryan is just a joy to watch...AAHHH the clean fun of old Hollywood
Classic Barbra Streisand. This movie is just a lot of fun. Old time comedies for grown ups. I love the interaction between Babs and Ryan O'Neal.
This has to be one of the funnyist movies of all time . Strips is another one of these funny ones .
constant action, laughing all through it. Love to hear Barbara sing, have a lot of her movies also. something a family would watch
Another John Wayne movie.  Dean Martin does very well as the sheriff and I like Ricky Nelson-so cool!  The song Dean sings is very pretty.
if you enjoy the older movies pull up a seat and enjoy the great western of our great era of actors.
Movie came before stated time, good shape, plays perfect, good story.  Fits right in with other John Wayne films I  have.
He loved the movie, a classic western for arm chair cowboys.  All things John Wayne is his preference for any movie.
It you like classic westerns with John Wayne then you will want to add this one to your collection.  It is an excellent movie for thewhole family.
John Wayne was one of my heroes, and Rick Nelson had a lovely voice.  This is one of my favorite movies, bought to replace a VHS I already had.
This is a great movie starring Martin, the DUKE, and Ricky Nelson too. Good action, a bunch of laughs, thanks to Walter Brennan.TOM
...I like this movie so much, but it's fun and it has John Wayne.  They all looked like they were having a good time.
Yes, this movie met to my approval. I love John Wayne movies anyhow. I still have more to order before I am through.
Good John Wayne movie .Oldie but definitely worth watching again .Made when movies were movies and you watched on the big screen .
i love this movie 10 star not 5 it was the first hd dvd i bought allstar cast
This is a fantastic movie.  One of my favorite &#34;Duke&#34; films.  They don't make movies or have actors like this anymore.  This is a MUST SEE!
Great movie!  One of my favorite John Wayne movies. Could watch it over and over and not be the least bit bored.
Looks great after all these years. I don't even know if they could improve on it. I have just an ordinary 720 Plasma, and it looks great.
I really enjoyed this movie. I watched it after I heard a DJ talking about it being great. He was right.
I don't which came first but both movies with John Wayne, this one with Dean Martin, and the other with Robert Mitchum were great.
I have enjoyed and continue to enjoy the westerns as well as many of the John Wayne movies in which I will watch again.
Good movie, strong plot. John Wayne performs amazing as usual. This is a classic movie. Would definitely recommend to a friend.
If you are a John Wayne fan you have to have this one! Great picture and sound quality. Highly recommend it.
I am a western move and a John Wayne fan. I have seen this picture many times but still enjoy watching it.
You can't go wrong with John Wayne. Dean Martin played a great role, but I was shocked to seek Ricky Nelson smoke a cigarette. Still, a good movie.
The movie had the right mix of high tension and quiet moments - Dean Martin as I have never seen him before
Great classic John Wayne movie with a wonderful cast that work so well together that this is oneI watch over and over again!
Best western ever made with cast of stars: John Wayne, Dean Martin, Ricky Nelson. Ward Bond and feisty Walter Brenen.
I haven't seen this movie in years, it was great to see itagain.  Made back when they made family films.It's John Wayne, how can you not love it.
This is one of my favorite John Wayne movie I would strongly recommend it for any John Wayne fan, it's great!
this movie is really good and a must for your dvd shelf due to it has john wayne,dean martin, and ricky nelson
This is a great movie and has a great cast and great plot/  I could watch this every day. Great weatern!!
As before excellent, 84 year old uncle does not watch TV, lives for his old movies. When he is happy so am I.
This is a movie that I have enjoyed and seen several times over the years.  Will be nice to have in my library for my viewing convenience.
All time classic. Excellent cast and story line. Walter Brennen does a great job. Dean Martin is a good deputy.
I bought this movie for myseeel because I just love John Wayne and there are just certain movies that I had to have and this was one of them.
How can you go wrong with John Wayne, Dean Martin and Ricky Nelson. Loved Angie Dickerson and the Duke chemistry.
It doesn't matter. this movie will take you to the time that won't come back... EVER.Try it. It is great.
What can be added to this classic John Wayne movie (even though he did a remake of it). Must own for any true John Wayne fans.
The duke at his finest. A wonderful movie that the whole family can enjoy. Although they could have left out Rickies singing.
I really enjoy this movie.  I was born in the 50's and saw this movie for the first time in 1968.  I have enjoyed watching it ever since.
Love 'the Duke' and especially like those movies which have a good plot, but also have a bit of humor.  This one meets all those requirements.
I love her independance in all her films writers do her justice in all films I see with her .
Excellent purchase of a laughably bad movie.  Brando's &#34;Men With Men&#34; speech must be heard to be believed.  A good price for a good time.
EXCELLENT OFFBEAT STORY WITH GREAT PERFORMANCES BY ELIZABETH TAYLOR AND MARLON BRANDO AND JULIE HARRIS.
...and way ahead of its time...Dirk left us two solid gold treasures..."Victim" and "Death in Venice"...his finest works.
It may not be an accurate portrayal of the battle, but it's a great try. I've enjoyed it since I first saw it in the theater. Good film.
Great Movie..another Henry Fonda top rated movie with a geat cast of actors..a wonderful addition to anyones classics collection..buy it!
Henry Fonda is great and there are some great performances by Telly Savalas Robert Shaw and Charles Bronson. Realistic battle scenes
Very good. Clearly, the producers did not spare the effort, time, money, to come up with an old-fashioned spectacular movie.
All-star cast, WWII movie...doesn't get any better! High Def video quality was excellent.It's a shame they don't make movies like this anymore.
The stories told by my father come alive here with classic actors.  I could see this one over and over again.
This movie is one of the best depictions of the war.  It stays true to reality and shows what human toll was taken and human valor given.
My husband loves old war movies and was extreamly pleased with this movie.It has become one of his favorite movies.
One of the best films of WW2 ever made.  Actors are perfect.  My Father was in this particular fight.  Should be required viewing.
Excellent war movie and extremely clear on Blu Ray.  Item awas as described and shipped very quickly.  Excellent buy.  Highly recommended.
this movie has plenty of great actors and lots of action. Its one of the best wwll movies i've seen.
very good movie a lot of fine actors in this movie.It was like watching several different story lines at onr time.
ITS A FINE PIECE OF HISTORY PORTRAYED BY FINE ACTORS AND REPRESENT THE &#34;GREATEST OF GENERATIONS&#34; ITS JUST REALLY A GREAT MOVIE!!
Great movie, great actors! What more can you ask for? The story is a classic and the cinematography was fantastic.
Excellent blue ray transfer. I had the normal DVD but liked so much that I wanted a blue ray version.
GREAT  WW2 MOVIE ONE OF HENRY FONDA BEST MOVIE  WITH A WHOLE HOST OF OTHER WONDERFUL ACTORS  A MUST HAVE
its good to go back to what I was raised on and look back at the great movies I have missed
I love war movies. This is one of my all time favorites. This is a has to see show. All the people that played in it did a great job.
I like WW2 movies. I've seen this movie before on TV and I've always wanted to see it again. Amazon made this possible.
Henry Fonda did a superb job as did most of the others in bringing life to this bit of history.
It's a WWII classic, right up there with The Longest Day and Midway. One of my all time WWII favorites.
Another good Blu-Ray Transfer and it is better looking than the Dirty Dozen by far!
great war movie and it was fast moving with interesting twists by German High Command fooling the American command into thinking the war was over.
This is a must-see movie. An easy way to learn some of the WW2 history. Packaged well and sent on time
I really enjoyed this movie. It was exciting and had a good cast. I would recommend this movie to anyone that enjoys a good battle.
Outstanding movie. I had it on VHS and wanted a better copy
Lots of stars make appearances in this movie.  Overall excellent movie considering the movie was made in the 60's.  Recommend.
personally?  this IS far above a lot of these genre films. if you/ or someone you know, enjoys this genre, by all means, get this.
Enjoyed the tank battles and Richard Shaw as the German General is very good. Not much on Henry Fonda's part. Telly Savalas was very good in it too.
The cast is awesome, the story is fantastic and the entire movie is very well done!  I love this movie!
Certainly some embellishment, but excellent story telling.  The desperation of both sides was very evident.  The acting was also very good.
I have watched this movie a dozen times.  Cast of big name stars, usual army mistakes, but well done. Not true to life but still very entertaining
I purchased The Battle of The Bulge for my Dad because he enjoys watching old war movies.  It`s a great classic!
Anyone who likes WWII movies has to have this film in their collection.  It was one of the first I ever saw in color as a kid.
This is a great movie with superior acting by the well known actors. Scenery is outstanding. I recommend this movie to all WW II viewers.
One of my all-time favorite war movies.  Excellent.
I love this classic film. I am so glad that I was able to purchase this one for my collection.
Was thrilled to see this movie available on DVD...One of Richard Gere's first and under rated films....  A classic ...John Presutti
I had never seen this movie and wanted to check it out. I really enjoyed it. I definitely recommend it!
Loved the original, but this version is unique and funny. Love, love, love Lucile Ball. Reccomend to all those old movie buffs.
This movie for the 60' it's amazing,  the story it's  about a youn boy who lost his parent and his excentric aunt
Wonderful movie from the age of great musicals.  Lots of music and sets are wonderful.  Never bored with this one.
Lucille Ball was charming in this.  So what if she cannot sing.  It suits her character.
Excellent movie. The DVD is remastered and looks great from the old VHS version. A must have for Lucille Ball fans.
Undoubtedly the best musical performance of "Antie Mame".  Lucille Ball ISthe bell-of-the-southern ball.  Should be in every collection.
I have Mame with Rosalind Russell and this version as well.  Really enjoy them both! I have always been a Lucille Ball fan and she is great as Mame.
Gotta love this old classic.  Just wanted to replace my old tape version.  Always leaves me with a smile...very enjoyable
Hackman has made very few bad movies and this is not one of them. Good plot line and characters with a memorableending.
Excellent movie. I watched it a few times. One of the best of its kind. Great music. Very satisfying finale!
I was lucky enough to find this masterpiece on DVD uncut. I highly recommend the DVD.
My daughter will be glad we have a copy of this one, our old one was getting pretty bad. She will be happy to get it! Thank you.
it is the 2nd best to all the superman movies Cris is truly superman and we will miss him dearly.
What can I say?  I love Superman.  Christopher Reeves was great as usual and portrayed the man of steel just as he should have been.
This Richard Donner version of Superman II, is just fantastic, nothing more to say, don't think about it, just get it, you'll be happy you did! :-)
A follow up to Superman The Movie, which it also has great story, sound, graphics, and action. Complete your Superman collection with Superman 2!
Terrence Stamp as General Zod! Sarah Douglas as Ursa!Oh, yeah, and a guy named Christopher Reeve as the only one worthy of donning Sup's tights!
In this Superman Movie, Christopher Reeve battles Terrance Stamp and 2 others who are from his home planet. Lots of excitement in this movie.
I loved this movie from the first moment I saw it. The DVD does it justice and means that I will always have it with me for always.Dorothy Tillotson
Here is this film you will get to see the tip of Dustin's penis. I also enjoyed the revenge scene against the parole officer.
THIS IS A VERY GOOD MOVIE,, SAW IT ABOUT 4 TIMES IN THE LAST 20 YEARS, FOR ME TO DO THAT IT HAS TO BE GOOD.
This is one of the true all time Clint Eastwood classic westerns.  It doesn't get much better than this! Excellent performances.
Very good story about the things that happened durning the Civil War.  Of course, anything that Clint Eastwood plays in has got to be good.
Clint Eastwood in one of my favorite movies about the old west.  One of his best movies.  I think I'll watch it again this weekend.
I love it one of the best westerns made, Clint Eastwood at one of his best, one of the top ten western movies made.
Clint Eastwood is a movie icon...In the Western Genre he is at his best and "Josey Wales" in my opinion is one of his best.
The headline summary is all that needs to be said.  It is one of Eastwood's very best movies as a story as well as his directing abilities.
Classic Clint Eastwood.  I particularly enjoy seeing many of the same character actors in each of Clints movies. He's definitely a loyal guy.
I had to have a current format, my VHS player quit working. Chief Dan George and CLint Eastwood, it doesn't get any better.
Good old Clint never disappoints in his western style. One I was glad to see again and happy to have in my collection. Great!
Clint Eastwood shines in this film, a true classic.  Very well made, a film to enjoy over and over again.
It is a good movie. A family favorite.It is funny and serious for a western.. it may be old but worth watching.
this is one of my favorites when it comes to clint eastwood and westerns in general.  love it and watch it at least once a year or so.
Eastwood is at his best in this one. XLNT PQ and AQ as well. A must own for Eastwood and Western fans alike.
Clint himself said this was one of his best movies. It's a great western, one of the best.
One of my husband's all time favorites.  Can't beat the good ol' westerns!  I wish they made more of them like they use to do.
An outstanding western set during or at the end of the civil was.  Very well done.  It was a rough time in American History.
One of the best movies ever, right up there with the Real True Grit.  Makes me just want to talk to my chair.
I am in the process of buying every movie by Clint Eastwood.  There is not a better actor of producer.  Fast shipment.
The Outlaw Jose Wales is a great movie. They don,t get any better. I received it quickly  and was very much impressed the way my order was handled.
Quality of disc is very good. Story is unusual, and there is great acting all around. The interaction of Eastwood and the Indian chief is terrific.
Seriously do I have to write something. It is Josie Wales.  Nuff said. If you clicked on this to buy it, you know how good this movie is.
An early Clint Eastwood movie classic. This has got to be one of his most watched westerns of all time!
I know some people have different tastes, but this in one of my favorite Clint Eastwood movies.  The characters are great!
love clint eastwood, would get any of his movies, great family movie the family could watch. would recommend for family viewing
dvd came as stated was in very very good condition seller was very good at shipping and everything went really good would buy from again many thanks
I always like clint westerns and his other movie too. I got this one because my father and i watch this one and enjoyed it.
This is classic Eastwood, and I love Chief Dan George. Much better in my opinion thsn the " Spagetti westerns.
Clink has been aroud for quite a while but I don't get tired of watching any of his movies. He started out with westerns and I enjoy them still.
always loved clint and his cowboy roles.  this is a little different.  the story line has depth.  lots of actions.
One of the best Eastwoods.Typical story of revenge then betrayal and finally forgievness. Are you boys gonna rent this movie or just whistle Dixie?
One of my favorite movies. This movie arrived on time and in good shape. Not much else left to add.
One of his best offerings... Dirty Harry persona in the Old West.  Loved every minute of it... Great for the entire family.
a movie which just keeps you interested.action and story line are well done.this is anther movie for a night of westerns
Love the movie. DVD was good quality. If you like Clint Eastwood then I would recommend this movie to you.
This was a great Clint Eastwood movie as usual, not many of his I don't have.  Watch them over and over.
This is one of the best Westerns ever made. Clint Eastwood is superb as Josey Wales.  It's a must see whether you like westerns or not n
Eastwood's best western I thank. Love this movie and the others westerns he did. They don't make them like this anymore.
For me, this is, by far, Mick Jagger's best performance on film.  It's a great story, with an almost impossible to follow ending.
This is the funniest movie this pair has made. Jimmy Walker is fantastic in it as well. Hilarious! Must See!
Duke is great.
I had heard of ths movie and had't seen it.  I njoyed watching John Wayne in this.  And its a good storyline.  Would watch again, several times.
John Wayne, what can you say? And it is helping me complete my John Wayne llibrary of all his movies!
I loved seeing this movie again!  I saw it in the theaters and on TV..... I'm so glad I own it now and can watch it any time!
love watching good movies and clean movies, very enterning
This was an excellent movie with John Wayne performing at his best. A movie definitely worth watching. It is a real down to earth movie.
This is another favorite John Wayne movie.  He is in police work in this also.  It is very exciting.  I've seen it many times.
John Wayne can act any type part. He makes a great cop. The beach chase was incredible. Great tough guy.
I love everything John Wayne did.  And a big thanks for putting some of his work in Prime Video.  Sorry he no longer walks on planet earth.
Loved this movie.  It is one of John Wayne's best films. I could watch it over and over again.  It is really fun!
I gave this movie five stars.  I love it and the Seattle scenery is great. John Wayne is the greatest.
john was always good in these shows why don't they have shows like this any more it would be great
This movie is great .... One of John's better movies later in his career
I really enjoyed watching McQ.  It was a well made thriller that moved along at a good pace.  Surprise twist at the end that no one will expect.
I loved it when it was available on VHS and the love affair continues anew now on DVD.  Better picture quality.
I saw this movies, years ago at the movies. Had always wanted  copy of it. I have always likes Peter Fonda.
This is a great movie with susan saint james and peter fonda i am a fan of susan and would recommend this to anyone
Don't miss this movie! It is a classic! Great for the holidays too. It is a must for your film library.
I have loved this movie since I first saw it in the movie theatre as a child. Talk about entertaining, this movie is wonderful!
I could watch this movie over and over. It had me laughing, crying, and cheering for Mame. My favorite movie ever!!!!!
I love this movie and I would recommend this to all that love the classics. Just love love love it!!
I love this version no one does Mame like Rosalind.  I got this for my daughter-in-law because it is her very favorite movie.
This movie, with Rosalind Russell, is a classic!  And aside from Mame, my other favorite character is Agnes Gooch, played by Peggy Cass.
Auntie MameI love old movies and this is a great one. I now have both copies and love each of them.Thanks,Dana
Filmed almost as it was a stage version. Great fan of Angela Landsbury but I prefer this non musical version.  Terriffic evening family movie!
Great movie with Great actors. I love old movies and Rosalind Russel is one of my favorite all time actresses.
Have loved this movie for years.  &#34;Live, live, live. Life is a banquet and most poor suckers are starving to death.&#34; ~Auntie Mame
Acting was wonderful.  Story one for all ages,  Nothing could improve this movie.  It is great entertainment. It is great entertainment.
I've watched this movie many times and I still enjoy the humor, warmth and style of Rosalind Russell and Auntie Mame. A must watch
So many reviews already, just want to add my rating to the overall score.A classic, still relevant in its own way, still hilarious.
This is one of my all-time favorite movies.  Rosalind Russell is such a classic actress moving from one type of role to the next.
I bought this as a gift for my mom's birthday. We watched & loved this movie when I was younger.
It was a great classic. Loved her spirit. We need more people like her. A must watch for anyone! Five Stars!
One of my old time favorites.  So happy to be able to find a copy through Amazon.  Love the old classic films and this was one of the best!
This is one of the movies that should be shown to every kid so they have such a great outlook on life and how to start it.
Another great movie from the age of musicals.  Rosaline Russell is wonderful in this classic.  Good story line and very entertaining.
THIS MOVIE IS ONE OF MY ALL TIME FAVORITES. IT IS A CLASSIC THAT CAN BE ENJOYED BY THE ENTIRE FAMILY.
Love this movie. It's been a long time since I've seen it. I think anyone would like this movie.....a movie for all ages.
My wife ordered this one she watches this every now and then,she is a fan of rosiland russell.A great movie the oldies are really the best anyhow.
Well Rosalind Russell was magnificent.  This movie helped shape my life(style) and my attitude about life.  Love her spirit and versatility.
My 88 year old mother spoke about this movie so I purchased it for her.  I really enjoyed watching it.  Great movie.
One of the very best musicals, starring one the best Broadway and Movie actresses.  Stage stars do not always transition to to film but she does.
I loved all the characters in this movie.I swear I literally watched it 3 times.Good for children. Wow!!
Once again, had it on Beta so I was delighted to find it on disc. And Rosalind Russell was one of my favorite actors.
This movie will live forever - thanks for making it available for a reasonable cost.
over the top fun from Rosalind Russell.  i simply can't see anyone else doing this part, her timing was &#34;top drawer&#34;
ROSALIND RUSSELL IS THE PERFECT MAME AND THE SUPPORTING CAST IS ALSO TOPS.  SO MUCH SUPERIOR FROM THAT BOMB WITH LUCILLE BALL...UGH!  WHAT A STINKER.
Great Movie, one of the classics, thank you for making it available to the public! I enjoyed it a lot.
Was sent in excellent condition and in a timely manner. Will buy from this seller again.
I saw the play when I was young and the movie on TV. Now that it's mine I can enjoy it any time, who wouldn't like Rosalind Russell.
This is a really good movie.  Rosalind Russell does such a wonderful job of acting.  Glad to have it in my film library
This is the only version you should ever watch--skip the Lucy version for sure. It is way ahead of its time and really fun .
I have watched this dvd many times good picture and sound no problems. I would recommend this dvd. I would order more dvds
Rosalind Russell did an excellent job portraying Aunti Mame!  It is a wonderful way to view what was a play on Broadway! Love it!
I've always enjoyed the quick, sharp humor in this movie. Wish movies today could be this good, but too many are dumbed down.
This movie is a banquet and I eat it up all the time.  Fantastic comedy.  One for the ages!!!!!
True to the storyline of the book.  Rosalind does a better job than the Lucille Ball version in my opinion.
Great movie. Bought it for wife and she absolutely loves it. Great price also. would buy more if they are all that price
I always wanted to be Auntie Mame to my grandkids. This is a terrific comedy. The changes the family and house go through are such fun.
Battle Cry one of the best grittiest war movies ever. Shot on location in Hollywood, the snow covered forest chills you right to the bone. Authentic
WONDERFUL MOVIE - WAS MY FATHER'S FAVORITE - I LOVE IT TOO - GREAT PRODUCT
I bought this movie for my brother and he loves it.  I do not care for war movies but he is very happy with it.  Thanks.
I'm not too much into war movies but when I saw Battle Cry, it had my interest because it has a good romance story to it also. :)
This was and is my favorite war pic...depicting the marines during ww2...It did Leon Uris' book some justice...
I think it is the better of Marilyn. I also wanted to add to my collection. And am very happy with it.
I adore this fast paced clever and hilarious film!
After watching the most recent movie out on Marily Monroe &#34;My Week With Marilyn&#34; . I needed to see this movie again.  Even more fun now.
This movie is awesome! It happens to be one of my favorite movies! Watch it and buy it--I guarantee you'll love it!
MARILYN looks great and does a wonderful job.  The film is a bit too talky, however, and should have been livined up a bit.
I liked the scenario ,but more so I love Marilyn who was the most talented actress among all who have come and gone.
Oliver and Monroe, what a couple.  It is funny and enjoyable to watch beautiful Monroe.One of the movies Monroe was so beautiful.
The dvd quality was good. Receipt was within the expected time. Hope the dvd lasts for the rest of my life.thnx
Always loved this movie.  The remakes are good but not the original.  You rarely see it on TV so I wanted to have my own to watch whenever I want.
the original version is the best!  the chemistry between frank sinatra, dean martin, sammy davis jr., peter lawford and joey bishop can't be topped!
Enjoyed watching the DVD & the accompanying interviews & loved both. Excellent condition too. Hope it lasts me at least 30 years.thnx
this is a great movie with the oridginal cast. thest boy were the best at what the did, the heart and soul trancends time.
This was a present for my son who loves all the old singer most of all these guys thanks for helping make great day
I enjoyed the later ones but the very first one is a great one to get if you like frank sinatra.
I bought this along with the remake. What a great combo!
Classic Movie back when movies were entertaining and relatively clean.  You can't beat the Rat Pack for one of the best.
This item was for a gift and I haven't heard back from the recipient.  It came quickly and looked good.
This is a good movie, and I'm so happy can watch it through prime on amazon at no cost to me.
Excellent movie ! Well acted by Jack Lemmon and Lee Remick. Sad tale of alcoholism but hopeful for anyone in recovery.
One of my husband's favorite movies.  I would recommend this movie.
Only a little dated. Remick is outstanding. I am sure Lemmon served up a support so that she could soar!
I just watched the DVD...I had remembered how great the movie was, and it was nice to see it with commentary from the director! Thank you so much!!!
This old classic is a great homage to people who are afflicted with the disease known as alcoholism. The acting was great and the story was sound.
I've always wanted to see this film and the DVD was in great condition. I am glad to have bought this product.
Is this what were becoming?,,, makes you take a good look at what we want, and how bad that would be so bad for us, this SiFi Story line is great
I love this movie it's one of those movie. That just makes you thinkYou've got to watch it more than once to fully get it
Some great acting, good twists nd does keep you guessing till the end-unless you are one of the few who saw it in the movies
this is a really fun who dunnit movie to watch, great cast of characters. you will enjoy it very much
One of the best of its kind.  The writing and acting are wonderful. A worthy addition to any DVD collection.
Excellent it was great to get both widescreen and normal size screes for those who do not have widescreen pitty they did not do this more often
I ordered this to replace the one that I had. It is a very good documentary on Elvis Presleys life
Elvis is the King. I was so excited to see this being offered. I can not wait to watch this with friends and family.
One of the 4 best Paul Newman films (MacKintosh Man, Drowning Pool and Torn Curtain being the others).  All are must-haves.
Love anything with Paul Newman.  The plot wasn't typical PI stuff.  Casting was very good.  Ending was really different.  Will watch again and again.
This is really a great video.  Kirt Douglas and Doris Day are really good in this portrayal of a man who live to play the trumpet.
This tape was one of the best tapes I ever ordered.Beautiful music and a great story.Not too many tapes can compare with this one.
A pretty decent movie. I liked the characters, the story line was okay. I liked the surfing in it. An old movie but a good one.
Another classic surf movie! Even my wife likes this one.
nobody's made a surf movie that comes close to this classic, not ever. when they do ill be watching that one time and time again.
A great old movie made when they still knew how to make good movies all the time. I like movies that you keep you in your seat.
hi!  "them!" is one of the best 1950's  sci-fi films.  if you watch it once you'll want to see "them!"  again.  enjoy!!
A must have.Looks great on dvd.Excellant 50&quot;s SciFi
This was a good movie and I really enjoyed it.  Am a little surprised there were no sequalto it.
Love the older thrillers brings back fond memories of when I was a child.to me they were scary movies that came in the weekend afternoon.
I have loved this movie for years.  Now i own it.  i won't have to wait until it comes on to watch it.  Ants rule.
Though this came in vhs, it was in great condition and came in 3 days.  Great for those who love old black and white sci-fi.  Worth it.
This movie is one that we have enjoyed for many years and was glad that it was released on DVD
My daughter needed it for a college class studying movies of yesteryear.  She was amazed how many films "sprung" from it!  Highly recommend.
One of my all-time favorite hokey big insect scare-em-up movies. Black and white and just like the old drive in movies we used to scream and love.
I ORDERED THIS AS A GAG GIFT FOR MY HUSBAND, HE LOVED THIS LOVIE AS A KID AND STILL DOES, NOW MY GRANDSON LIKES IT JUST AS MUCH
It was a well done movie for its day and for me it was a fun trip to my childhood days
Don't miss the one. The best from 1968. Will keep you interested to the end. Great acting form all the cast.
A very sweet different kind of story but could make you sad and cry.  A very good read and would recommend.
This is one of my favorite musicals for the songs. I especially love Tommy Steele and Petula Clark's characters and songs.
great color. very clear. It's a great musical. My Wife and I really enjoyed it. Not enough people know about this.
I have been looking for this movie for a while.  It came fast and looks great.  What a great deal.
great musical featuring Fred astaire along with an all star cast.  enjoy this upbeat, happy movie that is sutiable for the whole family.
Finian's Rainbow is a very very old movie, but it is very enjoyable too.  I will probably watch it again.
Fun movie the whole family can enjoy.  We saw it years ago and purchased DVD while we were updating our collection.
Converting VHS to DVD and this was a 'must have' musical.  Good film, well reproduced and excellent service by the company.
Love musicals and this one is a great one. I can sing along with the words and the meaning of the movie is just great.
We saw this movie on TV and bought it for my son and his children to view.  It is a good movie.
I've been waiting for ages for this great film to appear on DVD.  Rod Steiger's performances are amazing, and Bradbury's stories are richly produced.
This should be in every syfy fan's video library! I've watched it several times and continue to enjoy it! Classic!
Always a classic.  From time I have to see this movie, or read the book.  Always a great way to spend an afternoon.
This is a classic cop buddy movie with the early works of both James Cahn and Alan ArkinSome great chase scenes with the vintage vehicles of the era
My husband and I have loved this movie for years but couldn't find it on DVD until recently, thank you.
I love Mariel. Even though this is too much of a lesbian theme for me, I still love the movies that she's in. I recieved it fast and in great shape.
Is older but plays well and doesn't matter was just glad to find the movie. Arrived in timely manner
how can you not own this.even though it ends just the way straight people think it should, it was good for the time it came out
Enjoyed watching this film from beginning to end. Mariel Hemingway is a great actress. Would highly recommend watching this film .
This is such a great piece of entertainment, I highly recomend it to anyone curious about the history of Nostradamus!!!!
It is a must have for anyone who likes war movies or our history. I have seen it once and I had to add it to my home movies. It is a great movie.
This is a gift for my dad who loves it.  He was so happy to get a new copy rather than a used copy.
Very factual account of JFK's PT109 war experience.  I would highly recommend this one. It is one that you will want to watchand share with others.
I love movies based on real life.  Cliff Robertson did a marvelous job of portraying John F. Kennedy.  This is one of my favorites.
Bought this as a gift for my father.  Wonderful classic DVD movie about PT-109.  It shipped quickly and he enjoyed it.
classic old movie, well acted. i actually got it for a gift for my grandfather and it was surprisingly good
Great book and a tribute to John F. Kennedy.  I was a young boy at the time but I recall with pride the accomplishments and heroism of our troops.
Another Great War StoryCliff Robertson Did a Great Job Playing JFKI Was very well done. Love  watching those pt boats
No concerns. The reason I like this movie, is watched it on Tv, several times & I was looking for it in a DVDThis is the first time for this DvD
Great movie.  Love all the old movies.
Hey---those of you who are in charge:  How come this here movie isn't onDVD or blu-ray, yet?  Surely would like to see it happen, soon.thank you
It show how men action when they under extreme conditions. the will to live and to work together and belief they will survive
Been trying for some time to find a copy of t his.  Really enjoyed the story.  Buy it.  You willlike it.  It is done very well and scenic.
This was on a list my husband has of classic movies he wants in his collection. He was very pleased with his gift!
Watch this movie when I was a child and I had to have it, I have been looking for this movie for a very long time , thank you Amazon.
Used to watch this one every time it came on TV. The story is not completely accurate, but I just enjoy watching it.
A great story...fantastic acting by all actors...sydney lumet was a master director...every film of his has been a treat to watch...
I love Michael Caine.  Wish I could get Sleuth on DVD but this one will do.  Excellent storyline and DVD.
One of the best plays recorded on DVD, and in line with another one of the sort - Sleuth, both the original one with Olivie and Cane,and remake.
Great mixture of suspense and comedy. Wonder sets and acting. Just like watching a play. One of my favorite movies.
Great movie! Full of twists & turns.Product was better than advertised and came much sooner than promised.
this movie is so funny when I saw it years ago. had a hard time finding it so when I saw it from this seller I bought it. would buy them again.
I am very pleased with this purchase. I watched it with my older cousin and his wife and all three of us enjoyed it.
Even though this is not in Blu-ray the picture quality is quite good.  I love this film and it still holds up.
Many movies are not like the book they follow but this one is very much like the book and the actors are supreme!
Burt and Goldie at their best.  Funny and heartwarming.  Always loved this movie.  Glad to see it streaming on Amazon.
Have always loved this movie.  Had it on VHS.  Replaced it with this DVD.  Burt Reynolds and Goldie Hawn. Romance and Comedy.  You can't miss.
I saw this movie many years ago and could never get it out of my mind.  It was cheap enough and I'm so glad I bought it!
This is definitely worth your while when you are tired and just want light ... and want to laugh or smile ... enjoy ...
Great DVD. Saw this as a kid and loved it. Now, saw it as an adult and loved it.
A friend was telling me she wanted this movie... I went on Amazon & found it for a good price & made my friend very happy..
Great action, great circus skills, and funny at the same time. The way adventure should be made. A classic that belongs in everyone's library
I have been searching for a copy of Black Belt Jones for years, and now I own one...sweet! Thanks Amamzon!!
This is the movie that started all the fast car race movies , a must have you will love it
These are 2 classic comedy's for sure! if you haven't seen these 2 movies then your missing out on some laughs!
They just don't make movies like this anymore. It really does capture the era and the characters well.  Brock Yates would approve.
Good old comedys. Lots of fun.  Good Price i highly recomend for thos who are interested in watching these types of movies. Good times.
very well made movies ,very fun n funny, i like an in joy watching the movies,great job,  thank you so much!!!!
I got this one for my father and he love it. he has not seen this one in years. this is for any fan of the movie.
Cannonball Run II  i realy injoy too fast funny grate for the family i even got the Cannonball Run  yeah the first one so much fun
SAW THESE MOVIES A LONG TIME AGO. WAS EXCITED TO SEE THAT IT IS AVAILABLE ON COMBO PACK.  CAN NOT WAIT TO WATCH IT.
Robert Logan can always be depended on toput in a very enjoyable performance. This isanother one full of adventure and humor.
(October 17, 1938 - November 30, 2007)RIP Evel, there will never be another daredevil quite like you...
Paul Newman is super great in this movie and sexy in the way he can only play it onscreen. A good movie
One of the 4 best Paul Newman films (Harper, Drowning Pool and Torn Curtain being the others).  All four are must-haves.
I watched this movie many years ago and loved it then, so I bought it on DVD when I saw it.  I love this kind of humor, along with Mel Brooks, etc.
I love this movie! glad it is out on dvd! la di dah dah dah oh la di dah !
Relaxing and satisfying, great movie.  An escape away from the city in a movie.  One of the few that leaves you thinking while watching the credits.
A quirky, funny story.  Burt Lancaster is hilarious.  Watch it a few times to pick up all the comic subtleties
One of my all-time favorite movies.  Very funny, great characters, and a town I would like to live in.  First DVD I bought when I got a player
An off-beat charming movie with a message about what's really important in life. No violence, no sex other than implied, and colorful characters.
The DVD quality of this movie is excellent and is far superior to the UK version which was so grainy I got a refund.  Beautiful movie on a great DVD
This was one of the best action adventure movies of all times.  Definitely worth owning.  You will have to decide who to leave it to in your will.
Again this is a great movies from the 80's  good entertainment and it is fun to watch.  love Tom Selleck
This movie is a great movie filled with wit and high adventure. I thoroughly enjoyed it. Tom Selleck is one of the best actors out there!
Love the picture.  An easy laid back and thoroughly enjoyable movie.  Great background music and beautiful cinematography. Would highly recommend.
I don't think that Selleck ever made a less than good movie. This one is full of action, adventure, and humor.
I purchased this DVD because I had seen the movie years ago and liked it.  I still do.  Love the movie.
One of the old movies that I liked. Glad I found it. This is how we used to react in  the old days! You need to find home too!
Fast Action - Romance - and humor - combined with a great DVD Blu Ray quality - you can't go wrong by ordering this flick.
I've waited for years for this movie to be released and it was worth the wait. One of Tom Selecks best.
One of our favorite movies of all Time.  Really like Tom Selleck.. The musical score is outstanding and compelling to listen to.
This is a classic. It is a wonderful movie. We were so excited when it came out on DVD - it took forever! Recommend it!
Great action, well made, not bogged down with garbage language. Tells a great story without you having to cover your ears.
Never a dull moment throughout the entire movie. Bess Amstrong does a super job also. The first movie I ever saw on a movie channel.
Great movie and being a pilot I was very much into the plot and Tom Sellick is one of my favorite actors.
Great CD -- fun, funny, serious.  As always Tom S. plays a good part.  This is a movie to see.
An heiress hires a World War One flying ace to seek out her missing Father in China. Action and romance ensue. Great music by John Barry. Must see!
I love this film.  Way too long enough for it to come out.  Now release Lassiter.  Another great Tom Selleck film.
Great movie,great cast,great movie line. There needs to be more like it. So many movies today  are not worth the DVD they are recorded on.
TOM SELLECK- NEED I SAY MORE.1920 SOCIETY GIRL MEETS A ROUGH RIDER.PREDECTABLE PLOT BUT A GREAT RIDE
I love watching Tom Selleck movies I haven't seen this movie in years. It made my day when I found this movie and at a great price.
Loved this movie.  Anything Tom Selleck is in is great.  This movie was fun to watch.  Great characters and great story line.
Waited a long time for this movie to come out in DVD and it is wonderful.  Comedy, adventure and romance all in one.
Can't see this movie enough--all-star cast, wonderful story, and a reminder to always see the best in others. Love it!
One of my most favorite books/movies.  Love the author and characters and story line.  It's definitely a classic, in my opinion!!!!
I can't remember a time I didn't love this movie or the book.  If you have seen it and read it, you must do so as soon as possible.
Great Classic Movie with a outstanding cast!Acted out very well !I Purchased this as a gift and they loved it !
My sibling loved this and it is a favorite of hers. Works great and I enjoyed watching it too. A good rendition of the book.
Grest film always enjoyed it lots of great actors in it directed well good story its going to last the test of time
A Classic !!! Not only one of the best movies of all time , but this has to be the best cast line up ever in the history of movies !!!
i have seen this before and will probably watch it again. It is a great movie if you like watching the good actors when they were young.
You'll love this version!It's the &#34;Director's Cut&#34; so to speak.Lots of extra footage, lots of extra DVD stuff, commentaries, shorts, etc...
Love the movie and book! Behind the scenes and deleted scenes are awesome!!! a classic!!! Excellent cast, all the 8o's stars you know and love!
The movies of the 80's can't be beat and this is one of the very best.
A must have classic movie for teenage of the 80s. 7 Great actors in 1 movie. Long before they all super famous
very good movie the other reviews on this say on all so I won't go on about it, good seller will buy again from them shipped and rec on time.
I read this in High School and i liked it, then they came with the movie and every thing came to life.
We rented this movie as my daughter was reading the book in class and wanted to see how it compared so she could write her report. Great Movie!
i love this movie because it very good movie and it a sad movie and i can't wait to watch it again
is good movie but you have to pay close to know whats going on but is good movie to watch
This is a movie that will be loved through the generations.A must get movie if you have read the outsiders book!!!!
This is a great classic movie that needs to be released on Blu Ray.The cinematography is fantastic and would look even better on Blu Ray.
This was one of my favorite movies growing up. My daughter had to read the book this summer so I ordered the movie. Glad I could still get it.
This is another favorite from the 80's that I just had to buy. The CD is great. I was able to reminisce about the 80's.
A classic!  Anybody who loves 80's movies or movies in general must see this one.  The cast includes many current stars of the 90's, 00's, and today.
it's a must see movie,very good cast, and now I have it in my collection, buy it now before it's gone
This movie is a great classic. It is a must see for anyone who grew up in the fifties and sixties.
SAW IT ON CABLE AND REMEMBERED HOW MUCH I ENJOYED WATCHING IT. HAD TO ORDER IT IMMEDIATELY. WATCH IT SEVERAL TIMES ALREADY.
This is an awesome movie!  Lots of stars who got their start in this movie.  Good stories with lots of emotion.  You can't miss with this one!
its th beste ever I love it I relaly do it has everyone good in it great cast and story
loving my growing movie collection, one of my favorite movies growing up for sure you should buy this movie, super good
A classic had to have it! Would highly recommend to any classic movie collector all the stars are so young
This is a great movie to watch for the first time, or to rewatch after a long time and you probably even forgot how excellent it is!
Great movie about overcoming obstacles and counting on your true friends. I used this as an inspirational movie in my classroom.
A great adaptation of the book, keeps the feeling of the novel, but story moves quickly on the screen, without getting bogged down in details.
Like the movie alot. I think that besides dirty dancing this is one of patrick swayzes good movies
love it one of the best movies of all time, what is so great is that even the schools are showing it for the kids.At least here in orange county, ca.
Still being read in schools today! My family enjoyed. A coming of age of sorts for young men. Both of my sons read it in middle school and enjoyed!
I have looked for this for years and was glad to get it and put it with my Geraldine Page collection
This movie was so funny ! my kids who are 13 to 15 loved this movie !  This is worth watching and with the hole family !
This movie has been a favorite of mine since childhood and as i get older, the more i love it.
this movie is 3 plus hours in case you do not like long movies.  a classic story turned to a movie.  for its age it is great wonderful graphics.
This needs Blu Ray and lets hope it comes!!! A truely Great Films!!! Best Picture of 1956!! Loads of Stars depending on your age of course!!!!
Very quick service and delivery.  I've always wanted to see this movie and was pleased to be able to order it.  We thoroughly enjoyed watching it.
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture from 1956. Had to add it to my collection.
I believe it's Victor Young who is playing his them throughout this movie.  What a beautiful song and movie!  Thank you!
Briefly,A carton box used, yet, in great condition. Wonderful sound andbright colors. What more?
It is one of the best movies I have seen in a long time. Very entertaining and easy to watch. Should be seen by younger generations
Good movie hard to follow until you realize she dreaming love her any way. Comment on aborshion is quiet interesting
This is a very touching movie. The performances are very good. Paul Newman as a director is a natural. Great to see James Olson in any movie.
I had to get this movie. Of Unknown Origin is the best Rat movie ever. What I love is, the fact that it realistic and the suspense is amazing!
Fantastic movie.  Saw it for the first time in 1972.  I watch it at least once a year.  Patty McCormack does an excellent job as the evil Rhoda.
This little girl is something else. The movie is fantastic and I got a really good deal. This is a must see.
All Time Favorite! !!!! This is a true classic. A must see. Sad and funny. The ending is perfect. Enjoy.
Great movie and a very good interview extra with Patty McCormack
saw this movie many years ago and fell in love with it. love suspense movies and this one is one of the best. would buy from them again.
This is a great classic!  It is upsetting and emotional, but great!  I was glad I was able to purchase this classic to add to my collection!  :)
all time classic
What a very good movie. The problem she needed a spaking and a good one. It's fun to watch.
Two-point-five thumbs up! Captivating and frightening. Loved every minute of it so much that I would recommend it to anyone, anytime.
I liked this movie a lot. All the actors do a great job, especially Patty McCormack (sp) who is quite believable as a bad seed.
I loved this movie.  I had seem it several times and there is something new in every movie. Great movie.
i never get tired of watching this movie. the acting is great and the story line is chilling. one of my all time favorites.
This, hard to get DVD is a classic. A great storyline, great performances and excellent cast. A must have if this kindof drama fits your likes.
Awesome! Patty McCormack at her best. Everyone I suggest this movie to thinks it is the best movie they ever saw.
Great movie, very entertaining, love it I have watched it about three times and each time is as exciting as the first.
This was a movie I enjoyed in my younger days. It was really creepy for its time. Get it you will love it.
One of my favorite movies of all time.  I have seen other version of this movie. This is the best one.
I love dark movies and I never ever watch black and white movies, but this movie is exceptional, dark and twisted, will watch it again.
I have seen this mover a few times over the years and enjoy it every time I see it.  It is a very good movie and the actors are superb
This is a great story.  The main character is really creepy and makes you wonder how many other little kids are just like her.
It is a great movie with a great ending!!!  She's such a bad little girl!  I feel sorry for her Mom.
A great old thriller with great actors and actresses. Well written story. Not what I had expected from a movie of that time.
This is a great classic movie.  I was able to watch part of the movie one day and finished the next day.
I remember this movie when I was little, it was very interesting but hard to find, this will go into my movie hall of fame:)Tonton
Old movie but it's a classic.  I would recommend it to anyone that likes a good old classic movie. Great!!
This is a must see classic.Prim, Proper and Poison.
I got it before the date, it was in a nice wrapped packaged , and the movie plays great. thank you
To me one of the best movies made by the Rat Pack .Love Peter Falks Roll,.A Must See For All
Received this free with disc purchase. My internet is too slow for that tho. Great movie on dvd. Good price.
Love the Rat Pack Plus Bingo!! Great music and lots of fun set ups.  Alway fun to see Dean and Frank and Bing.
Great music, Great (but stupidly funny) plot, Fantastic stars.  Had seen it a long time ago and wanted to own it
This is a classic! What a twist with the beautiful classy lady being a broad after all. The Rat Pack at their finest! What a great time!!
this is just another of the great classic movies featuring the Rat Pack (not all but a few of them)
A must for a real Paul Newman fan.  Not one of his greater known films but worth watching over and over.
The movie is just as exciting to day as first viewed by me in 1975. Great acting by all.
Bought this movie watched Newman In a Excellent performance as always.Give this movie 10 Stars********************
I thought this movie was very good.  I think Tom Selleck is an excellent actor and he did not disappoint me in this movie.
If you like good movies and with out the special effects, watch this one!! Tom Selleck plays a great robber.
I have Lassiter on VHS.  I waited 2 years for the DVD to come out.  It was worth the wait.
One of the best Selleck films.  What took them so long to re-release it is beyond me. High Road to China is another and it is now available.
Tom Selleck is a great actor and it is a pleasure to watch him in a variety of movies and TV series.
Excellent detail to the era, outstanding cast with a good story. Nothing beyond belief or impossible film effects, keeping it real!
I was so glad i got it in blue ray its the best movie ever ......................................love it so glad the best........
Christopher Lambert is good in any movie, however, this is one of his debut films and as usual he does a great job.
This was so good and so real.  The ending was amazing and conceivable.  I can just see it now. amazing!
i've always loved the tarzan series so i was happy to get the movie...and watch it with my grandchildren . love it.
theres never gona be anouther great man to play tarzan  but this one, if kids would watch movies like this now days things would be a lot better.
This is the most accurate story ever told about Tarzan every made. A must have.
This is What I expected. Good quality DVD, good memories, great add on movie for my movie collection, decent case.
fantastic picture and quality sound. Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes is a great story of tarzan's life
Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes is a classic great movie that's worth watching.  Also such a great love story.
Quick Shipment, arrived in great condition. Excellent product for the price. The adaptation of Edgar Rice Burroughs books out there.
A very well done Tarzan remake! The stars were great, locations wonderful, and the story was added to by filling in details we had never seen before.
The movie is a great movie. It is very interesting to see the transformation of Tarzan from baby to a man.
I heard this is the movie where Goldie and Kurt first met. Love all the 1940s period detail and history.
grand new , that how is . Thank's for great tape . I will enjoy over and over. ART F
Good movie.Ive watched this many times and if your a fan of henry fonda and some other top stars  its a great flick.
We have not actually watched the movie yet but we received it on time and are looking forward to watching it thank you
This movie and the first movie, Mr. Roberts, was my mom's favorite of all time, and I had to have Them on DVD.
i got what i wanted.  No problems.  A launching pad for Irene Cara.  Whitney before Whitney.  I wonder where she is now?
I love this movie, I was disappointed with the new,y remade one so i ordered the original. That's how it's done
Where were you the summer of 1976 when this movie hit the theaters? Great to go back down memory lane! Love it!
The acting is better, the singing is better...the storyline is much better and believable! Recommend this gem. Do not waste time on the remake.
This is a great movie of all times. I had beenn looking for it for a long time and I am so glad I found it.
I enjoyed seeing this 70's throw back.  Brings back memories.  I look forward to seeing the re-make with Whitney Houston!
SPARKLE IS A CLASSIC IN THE AFRICAN AMERICAN COMMUNITY, I'M GLAD AMAZON HAD SUCH A GOOD QUALITY DVD LOVED IT
When they speak of classics - Sparkle should definitely be mentioned!  One  of my favorites!
It is a teachable/classic movie for those who actually hope to change there lives for the better.
I love it, I love the old version much better than the new one, its defines the characters better. The quality of the movie is great. Thanks
MY DAUGHTER GAVE IT TO ME FOR BIRTHDAY! CAN YOU JUST LOVE IT?I HAVE TO USE CAPS! I HAVE TO SHOUT FOR JOY!
My wife love her old school movie for her birthday. This was on of her favorite movies to watch. .
I SAW the remake loved it and I wanted to get the original to add to my collection.  Both are great movies.
It's realistic, dramatic, and heart-warming! I will probably view it again and again. Great find and at a great price.
i like picture the movie and i will Recommend the movie for anyone like movie this very good movie to Watch,
I love this movie. way better than the new one. I would recommend it. See this before you watch the new one.
I saw this movie when I was younger and it still packs a punch for me. I love the sister and can understand what they go through.
I love this movie! I wanted to re-watch this movie since the new version was coming out. This version is much better than the 2012 version.
Loved it. I remember seeing this a long time ago.  It is a good movie.  I always like the originals better than the makeover ones.
The ORIGINAL is always better!!!!The remake is ok, but there is NOTHING like the original.  One of the best movies ever.
Good performances on the part of Lonette McGee... and even Phillip Michael Thomas... A back in the day kinda film... great!
The movie wasn't for me but for my mother. She loves it and was a perfect gift since the new Sparkle was released in theaters.
This has been one of my favorite movies since I was a child. Irene Cara has always been a favorite of mine. This movie is one that is a true classic.
one of the all time best classic films of all time. Its a comedy that makes you think. james Gardner and Louis Gossett Jr. are the best.
The movie played very well absolutely no problems. I would highly recommend it! James Garner and Lou Gossett are superb in this movie.
Funny, funny, funny.  Lou Gossett and James Garner are terrific in a story that could possibly be true.  Even if it's not, I still LUV it!
I love this movie.  Garner and Gossett are terrific con men.  The story is both funny and serious.  Susan Clark is wonderfully funny.  A classic.
A James Garner classic.  Just had to have it...very funny.(Must have more words to complete the block but can't think of any...darn it)
This is one of the few remakes that is as good as the original was.  If you need something to entertain you on a dark and stormy night, this is it.
This movie took my breath away...I highly recommend it, there are no words to describe it.
I left feedback for this item and I was wrong about the order.  My order did arrive on schedula and I was very happy with this site.  Thank You.
I recommend everyone get a copy of this movie. Even old movies like this one show what is taking place today in our world.
A little know movie but well worth the viewing. Take the time to watch it and I am sure you will want this to be part of your video library.
I first saw this when I was a kid and it blew my minde.  I loved it then and still do.  Good movie.
i saw this a long time ago an when i saw it here again i just had to get it . the price is good to an the moive is great.
this is a great movie. it is one of my husbands favorites. very suspenseful.spooky to, you'll love it! We do!
A GREAT OLD MOVIE.  I REMEMBERED IT, AND IT STILL GAVE ME NIGHTMARES WHEN I WAS LITTLE.  PRETTY GOOD SPECIAL EFFECTS FOR SUCH AN OLD MOVIE.
I WATCHED THIS MOVIE YEARS AGO. I LOVED IT THEN AS WELL NOW. THIS MOVIE IS ONE OF BEST IN IT KIND.
another hard to find movie scored from amazon. all star cast with a great story to tell with all the in and outs of daily life at a large hotel.
It is one of my favorite movies ever. The story is so crazy and amazing. Scorse it is a great director. Very good story and well made. I LOVE IT...!
Early Martin Scorsese movie featuring Teri Garr, special kind of movie with stars & producers early in their careers, enjoy watching these artists.
The birth of TRUE Rap/Hip-Hop... not like the garbage and filth that's invading the airwaves today!!!!!..totally glad i was a part of it!!!
Krush Groove is one of My Favorite Movies,i have it on dvd,'tis a great Movie :P
this was a moviei always talked to my kids about to watch and was never able to find in local stores and on dvd. thanks
krush groove is iconic it' takes you back to the true originaters of rap music. The performers was the best in the 80's era.
This movie although poorly acted showcased a lot of the early talent back in the mid 80s. It was great to rematch it!
Not only is this movie a classic, but the delivery was fast and packaging was great. Product arrived unscathed.
A must own movie for the hip-hop and rap lovers. Shows all the classic rappers in their youthful years. Classic movie. 5 stars all the way.
This movie THE MIRACLE of FATIMA will be a wonderful way to present the message of Fatima at our Home Vistiation Program of Our Lady of Fatima.
another great 80s classic this movie is such a joy to watch!!! great story and just a great overall movie!
The story was based off of Gordon Parks real life story.  A very good depiction of life in the early part of the century.
This is a classic dvd and I was very happy to find it. I received the dvd in one day, and it played perfectly!Thank You!!!! Great service!!!!!
the only book report in high school that i got an a on and very proud of what i learned about life and faith and i will never forget it
I love this movie...  It's an old but good movie......
I ordered this as had never seen.  LOVED it.  Peter Cushing is always terrific.  Good color, acting, and liked all of the movies.  I would recommend.
if you love old time horror this is the movie for you all of the actors do an excellent job in bringing forth and atmospheric creepy cool movie
Buy this movie now !! Dexter is great. Music is awesome. Acting is very real.
Well this film is pretty good not his best film something different well I am surprises of the film prince did
This ia avey old but good movie. i will recommend it to anyone that loves Prince movies. its a funny movie.
I liked that in this movies Prince tried to bring back old time Hollywood and the roaring 20's time and era.
I felt that the depth of emotions could have been shown better by drawing on a deeper range of chemistry but overall I liked the film an awefyl lot.
I know this movie did not do well, but i love it!It was Sexy and the, the soundtrack was good.
This movie moved me from the music to the scenery to the storyline. A tragically beautiful tale, based on a true story.
great movie.  great plot and history.  its an incredible movie about the heroic efforts of a few Jesuits, and one renegade (De Niro).
I absolutely LOVE the music from this movie, and the movie was excellent as well.
This was a great movie.  Though it was Hollywood, I think it still captured the turmoil and temperament of the time.
One of the best.  Our kind of movie.  Easy to download.  Played well through our Roku player.  One of the better roles for Dinero.
This movie will involve you and break your heart. Robert De Nero's performance of the slave trader turned priest is nothing short of marvelous.
I don't know anyone who has seen this movie who doesn't think it is incredible. It will break your heart.
I have always loved this movie, but especially love the music used in the soundtrack. It lifts the soul.
This movie is a classic. You will watch it over and over again.  Love it, always have. And it was free with Prime.
Our church is going to watch it this weekend. I've only heard about it, but hope to be inspired to reach out.
My husband and I both really enjoyed this movie and it was had very beautiful locations and it was very thought provoking!!
I absolutely loved this movie. Its a life story about faith, love, charity, humility, and the call to serve Christ.
Its a true story and one that touches the soul.  I am buying copies for my family and friends.  The music is wonderful!!!!!!!!!!
It is a great move showing how greed, prejudice and religion of Western Europeans affected the indigenous people of the Americas.
Excellent over looked movie. Blu-Ray looks and sounds good. Well worth upgrading if you already have the standard dvd.
Great actors Liam Nelson and Robert Deniro incredible scenery great story but a bit of a sad ending bring Kleenex
The scenery is beautiful.The score, by Ennio Morricone, is heaven.De Niro and Irons give amazing performances.Beautiful movie.
This is a classic! Beautiful music, great actors, great story. I even bought the soundtrack, I think it is a master piece.
I do not like being required to write a specific number of words to tell some one I got what I wanted
an oldie but a goodie.  I hadn't watched it in years and it was on the tv so I wanted to have my own copy to watch over and over again.
I REMEMBER REWARD THEY WERE GOING TO GIVE IF YOU COULD PROVE BERT DIDN'T DO ALL OF THE STUNTS PERSONALLY. FINE MOVIE. K
Ive seen it before and I just loved this old film. No more to say about this but I have to enter 10 words
This is a GREAT movie to watch!  I LOVE this movie and ALL of the songs in it!!!  The whole cast does an awesome job!!!
Little Shop of Horrors is a really funny classic movie that we all enjoyed. It was a blast from the past.
This movie is a cult classic.  Tongue in cheek and good for a few laughs.  I love the alien plant.
This was a movie i grew up on, and i was glad to own it again, thanks.
we all know all the words to the songs, we all have at least 2 favorite song or they are all our favorite. i love this movie, great casting!
ANOTHER GIFT FOR MY 25 YEAR OLD SON.  I ACTUALLY LOVE THIS FILM AS WELL AND HAVE EVER SINCE I WAS HIS AGE.  IT STILL IS A MUST SEE.
Not quite the Jack Nickelson movie, but an awesome musical. I would highly recommend it for teenagers and up. very well done.
Loved the original and I love this. Steve Martin is the greatest. Ellen green is a fabulous singer.
RICK MORANIS is a star in this musical for all ages. The tunes are memorable and the dentist is unforgettable, hehe.
Such a classic, I know this isn't the original but it still is a great funny sad kinda movie to watch.
I ordered this for my daughter.I watched it as a kid and enjoyed it. Needless to say it was a hit. I am happy with my purchase!
It was amazing watching the alternate ending :) best video ever! i was so pleased with this dvd on bluray
Love this movie!!! The singing...the weird story line. It's funny and has a great cast!!! Just can't say enough about it!!
I have a copy of the original as well.  It was fun watching them back to back.  Both are excellent fun.
A funny movie, based on the musical.  Both the picture and sound quality of the DVD is good.  Weused regular shipment and it arrived on time.
Excellent and comical to the very best. This was an excellent buy and I highly recommend it. The quality was fabulous and the price is just right.
loved it 2nd time to view.  unique and hilarious  You must check it out, I am sure you will like
I haven't seen this movie in years. I liked it then and I like it now. There is just something about a plant that eats people.
This was for our daughter; she likes some of the older 80s movies and has been wanting this for a while, she really liked it.
this is a funny odd old movie, just needed to add it our collection of movies.  funny movie in a twisted way.
This has to be one of the best musicals I've seen in my life.  While it is not trashy like the Rocky Horror Picture Show, it is still perfect.
Love this movie...the songs are amazing ...Steve Martin kills it! Granddaughters love musicals and had never seen this one before and loved it too
I used to watch this movie growing up, so funny-and slightly twisted ;) Frank Oz directed it! Steve Martin is hilarious as the psycho dentist!
Very funny. Impossible storyline and that makes it even funnier. Also provides a good idea of why dentists become dentists.
Feed Me!Hey, it's Rick Moranis, Bill Murray, et el.Musical adapted to movie - very entertaining!!Good for kids yes? hahaha!
One of my all time favorite movies.  Just watched it again with my granddaughter.  She loved every minute of it.
this is a genius movie it is my favorite of all time. musical and acting combined in perfection with an all star cast. I just love it.
This is an oldie but goodie and would recommend this to anyone who loves old movies its a bit corny now but still funny
This is another movie I ha on DVD.And I am very satisfied all the way aroundthe picture/the sound /the supplements.All excellent.
I love this movie. Everything in it is perfect, everything. I can't say enough for it, it is absolutely a classic.
This Musical kept my interest all the time.  The quality of the video and audio was good taking into consideration the original releasing date
I loved this movie so much, I seen it when I was younger as I was growing up and I cant get enough
I was looking this movie for my brother and every store was sold out when I enter amazon I finally found it it make my brother smile on Christmas
The Director's cut is awesome! I had to watch it twice! Seymour and Audrey both die and the plant takes over the world! I loved it!
I love musicals, but this one is the best I have ever seen. I can watch it over and over again. &#34;Suddenly Seymore standing beside me&#34;
i love move think was little  funny poeple  how can little plant eat people i love the moive and my friend watch over andover
I am so glad that I found this movie. It is a lot of fun. Rick Moranis is really great in this.  thank you.
I have loved this movie since I was a youngster, and still love it,brings back old memories when movies were good and not just about sex.
Yes, it's a little gory in places but the musical scores are terrific. If you don't like going to the dentist, this movie will make it worse.
Steve Martin as the sadistic dentist is perfectly cast. Rick Moranis has a good singing voice. And the music throughout is toe-tapping fun.
This movie is a must see. One of the best movie remakes of all time. Our yearly Halloween tradition :-)
my favorite part on the movie was the plant gets shocked at the end and before it blows up it says a bad word.
This movie was great before and still is.  And to see how the actors have changed over the years.  Good movie for a look back in time.
This is a fantastic movie!! If you like military movies and ever went through bootcamp in the military it will bring back the memories.
Great movie with Webb as a tough DI. Realistic styles used to train men and without all the profanity like in Full Metal Jacket.
if you have watched full metal jacket and loved the scenes with the drill sergent, then this is a great movie for you
Bought it for a friend of mine which is a collector himself and knowing him this must be worse watching as well as keeping
I think that Jack Webb gave on of his best performances as a Marine drill instructor on Parris Island. Give it a looksee.
A good story well acted. If you were a fan of Dragnet, you will love this movie.  Peggy Lee is awesome.
This movie was still pretty funny after so many years, it will forever remain a classic throwback film not just a classic hiphop movie.
I love the movie. it is very entertaining, but was difficult to find.  If your into comedy and a true movie collector it is a must have title.
Perfect conditioned and much appreciated.
One dvd to own very funny and the rap group the fat boys did a very great job in this movie
I saw this movie when I was a child and it made me laugh. I havent seen it since then so i bought the DVD and i still love it.
Who's That Girl? Finally we got The dvd ,'tis One Of my greatest Romantic-Comedy movies of The 80s..A Must See!! :P
A very fun romp!  Madonna's best movie.  Outstanding for a rainy day.  A brilliant example of our times' mad cap comedy.
Really liked this movie as a kid & I found it for a great price. Was shipped in an reasonable amount of time.
This movie to me is one of the best 80's movies. I remember watching as a kid. I loved it then, and love it now.
Just forget whatever you think of Madonna.  This movie is so hilarious.  Makes me laugh every single time I watch.
This is the funniest Madonna movie of all times. She will have you laughing and dancing to the soundtrack. It's a must!
I absolutely love this movie, so wehn I ordered it I was happy to see that it was still as cute and funny as I remember!!
I am a child of the 80's and still love everything about them, including this movie! It never gets old and even my kids like it!
im glad i got this dvd.i remember watching it as a kid late at night.very telling of what the industry can end up like.
Very interesting movie to me. Shows how much goes into making a commerical to sell you something. Yes its fiction but i believe based on some facts.
Albert Finney is really good as the plastic surgeon whose patients are dying off.  And someone is trying to frame him!
It came on time and it was at a great price. I mainly got it for one actress and it was something new from her old roles. I am glad you had it.
This is an excellent thriller for the time period in which it was created.
I'm so happy this movie came out on DVD. It has a very catchy theme song as well as a great story line.
Not Dudley Moores greatest but for the money worth watching. We enjoyed it but probably will not need to see it again.
This movie is so funny and interesting from the beginning to end. Elizabeth McGovern shines in her role, as usual.
Dudley Moore at his best, and Elizabeth McGovern is lovely. A great story, reminds me moments of my life, great moments. Thank you.
IN GREAT CONDITION.  ARRIVED ON TIME.  VERY PLEASE.  GREAT MOVIE.
So glad that they brought this one back.  A very romantic and interesting movie.If you like Cheryl Ladd you will love this one.
i really had a hard time finding this one but again you had it is about the VIET NAM war from the eyes of the doctors and a love story very good
this is actually a love story.  it depicts what could have happened and did happen during the Vietnam war.  it is based on a true story.
I'm glad I finally replaced my video of this movie and got it on DVD, I've been waiting a long time to do this.  It's a great movie!
I bought this for a gift and watched it for the first time. If you like the sorpranos you will like this movie
great and a good depiction of that era a bit bloody but then most people like that for sure so watch it...
All actors men and woemen were perfect in there rolls.  it was very emotional and yet hard harted,  Just the way you would think a Mafia would be.
A bit long but well worth it. Excellent plot, ending and acting. DeNero may have been the lead but the intire crew was exceptional-
I enjoy these types of movies. keeps u on the edge of your seat. I had already seen it but enjoyed it again
The movie featured a great cast and a wonderful story of growing up and friendship.It sort of dragged in places but was worth the watch.
This is a great DVD.  I rate this movie up there with the Godfather.  It is excellent.  I would give it ten stars if that was applicable..
The background information answered all my questions.  The pic was nice and clear,and I was able to hear everything clearly.
This is my favorite movie of all time! I can watch this movie everyday and will not tire. Love it!
Great movie. Will even watch it again shortly.  If you like organized crime movies you will love to watch this one
This DVD came very quickly and exactly as it was described. It is one of my favorite films withsome of the greatest actors and actresses of all time.
I loved the story.I loved the score.I loved the performances.Everyone brought their best for this American classic!
joe pesci is awesome in it and it one of the best mob movies ever. that is all whoooo whooooo
This is an interesting movie with good acting and directing. If you're interested in gangster genre movies, this is one for your collection.
This is a classic film. One to have in your collection. I got it at a good price and it was delivered on time and in new condition.
in response to what another reviewer wrote about her beauty.The film is excellent as well...
I used to watch this movie when I was little and I have never stopped liking it so I happy I got as great copy and at such a great price
this was along time favorite and i looked along time for this movie was very happy  to find it
funny, funny , funny ! plus it's also got some good action parts ! gang fights and such !
Very good acting and writing. Cool story of the New York life ,back in the day.
This is a good movie to watch for any Jack Kerouac fans. Films of On the Road and Big Spur were just in theaters this past year.
This movie would be wonderful out in DVD, but please release it in it's original aspect ratio which is 2.35, for we will loose half the movie.Thanks.
You don't have to be an Egyptologist to enjoy this movie; scenery of Egypt is amazing, plus it has an incredibly interesting story.
Love the movie, looked for it on DVD for years - it is not an academy award winner but I really like it.
Really pleased with this Blu Ray edition. Digitally remastered so the images are nice and crisp. Better than the regular DVD. Buy it!
This is the best version of this movie ever.There are others but this one is the best.The costumes and settings take you there.
I love this movie.  Merlin is my fave character.  This Dvd is great.  The coulor is outstanding.  get this movie if you loved this movie.
this movie is a classic, I first saw it over twenty years ago when it first hit the theatres, and now it is a must to have in my collection.
We have liked this movie from the beginning.  Needed it in DVD to replace VHS.  Good story line and following of the Story.
The casting is perfect, and the effects are awesome for it's time.  The whole production is oozing with lush beauty that is truly magical.
One of the better fantasy movies made.  A must own for any collection. Great movie that will probably be overlooked by the younger generation.
Again and all time favorite.John Boorman's treatment of the Arthurian story is suberb.Great cast and direction!And such a great love story.
I never get tired of this movie. It's the best celluloid Arthurian adaptation.
This is a great movie to watchedIt was so good to watched a movie that I never have seen before
Loved the movie.The DVD was perfect.
One of my all time favorites!! Its great to have it in dvd collection now too. A must have for the medival-King Arthur etc fans!!
This is a great movie! Long, but worth every minute! This is one of the best movies on Arthur and Merlin.
This is a great movie. it is one I try to see every few years, as it is a really great movie.Good acting, good dialog and very cool cinematography
Saw this movie a long time ago.  I bought a vhs version but now I got the dvd.  I like the movie.  ls
This is the best of the King Arthur movies. It has a great cast and tells the story well. it is my pleasure to own it.
This version of Excalibur is a classic in my book.  Never get tired of watching it.  No bad language, some nudity.
so glad to get this on a DVD... my VHS version bit the dust years ago...  love music and the action
I always loved this legend, and the acting of everyone involved in the movie is excellent.
Like the singing film &#34;Camelot&#34; this movie too deserves 5 stars.Is a great movie, and one that will be around forever!
This movie has it all. Sex, battles, romance, humor, pathos. The way Merlin is played is so out side of the normal acting and I love it!!
The best King Arthur version of the story.
King Arthur and the Knights of the Round Table.  Based on the book, &#34;The Once and Future King.&#34;  Casting perfection.
Everything about this film is sensational- lighting, pacing, dialogue, mood, music, and the script just carries the actors along. Wonderful stuff!
I have always liked this movie and was thrilled to find it for such a great price.  Very pleased with this purchase.
As a retired member of the NYPD's Internal Affairs Unit, I will tell you that this film classic is about as real as you can get.
Great gift.  My sister loves this movie with Burt, says it is one of her favorites.
This is a great movie, I enjoy Burt Reynolds movies and have most of them on dvd! This is a very enjoyable flick!
I give this product 5 stars, because it's not the easiest Burt Reynolds film to find on DVD.  Yet, this one was in perfect condition.
I like this one a lot.  Very romantic and appropriate for lovers.  Gorgeous.  A MUST HAVE.
funny, funny, funny!
Truely enjoyed this fun filled movie. The country setting and the inventive antics of the Woody Allan character are hilarious. Check it out.
this movie really had a fun, funny message of silliness and charm. i enjoyed woody's take on a very old and very worn subject.
This is a awsome movie full of nudity. Not for younger viewers. This is a must have for you mature adults enjoy.
I love it because Blu-ray and it's addition to collection filling my Blu-ray collection is what I doing right know.
Love this concert,it's AC/DC @ their very best.When's it coming out on DVD ?Dan
An awesome classic concert for sure! I'm glad they finally decided to release this on DVD!
Great movie on the power of the media that still resonates today.  Griffith and Patricia Neal give great performances.  Well written and well acted.
I have never see Andy Griffith like this before.  He played the part too well.  This is a must see.
This movie was great!I wasn't actually looking it up on Youtube, but when it came up, I had to have it.Thanks!!!
They Don't Make Films Like This Anymore.Should have won an oscar for best film and best actor. A must see film.
I am always so happy with Amazon This movie is kinda of a hard to find and yet they had it and once again customer service was great
This movie is a must see.  This is a different side of Any Griffith's acting.  A classic.  Came quickly and was well packaged.
The message conveyed by this filmed masterpiece is prophetic and 50 years ahead of its time. It's how things work, today; and more than ever.
Yep an early iconographic movie with Jack at his best - yet different!
I mean who doesn't love Mary Poppins. I have this on dvd, but wanted to get it on Blu-ray cause I enjoy it so much.
This movie is a classic.  I remember watching this movie as a kid.  It is a good wholesome movie and I am glad my kids enjoyed watching it.
based off the British novel.  full of magic and adventure.  this movie was like Julie Andrews first movie.  great for kids.
good music and cute storie.  my grand kid love the songs. .Glad I rented it.  Wish it was $0.00, it is worth more but can't afford more.
I'm a nut for the special features on movies and upgraded my copy of Mary Poppins simply for the extras ;-)
I saw Mary Poppins a long time ago, and I wanted to see it again! I thoroughly enjoyed it again !
I enjoyed this as a child and was excited to get it for my daughter. She enjoys the movie as well and loves to dance and sing along.
Julie Andrews and Dick Van Dyke are always wonderful.  And Mary Poppins is a true classic! Nothing more need said.
I loved this video and watch it whenever it's on the TV.Thanks, Amazon, for having it available for purchase.
I grew up watching Disney movies, and musicals are just great. I'll I love this one and put it to my children, highly recommended.
It's such a great movie to watch, own, or rent :) I'm looking forward to watching it more often on my iPad!
Greatest movie of all time!!! A must see and must have for all ages! The story is witty and fosters the imagination
I can't help but remember that Mary Poppins is one of my favorite Disney films of all time along with Cinderella.
I enjoyed watching this movie once again. I rented it after watching the movie Saving Mr Banks. I found it very entertaining.
Everyone needs to get this movie and enjoy one of the best, fun, happy movies every created. I love all the singing and dancing.
A simply magical musical. Disney's finest. I enjoy this film more now than when I was a kid.  Exceptional digital and audio transfer.
Mary Poppins is a timeless classic, the songs, and the acting is so Disney-like, it always will remind me of my childhood.
So glad to finally own this Disney classic on blu-ray!  It will be watched for many generations to come!  Thank you!
As I remembered it, still 50 years later a wonderful movie to share for all. Recommend it for the entire family.
best kids movie of all time julie andrews and dick do a great job with the kids jumping in to drowings  and having tea way up in the air
as always this is a very good movie and HD only made it better, we bought it for our Grandchildren to watch, and they really like it.
This is a classic movie, you couldn't go wrong watching it over and over again. Fun for the whole family!
This is great literature, music , dance, actors, and sceneryAdults and children will love the music Chim Chim Cheree and the dance Step In Time.
Mary Poppins, what else needs to be said.  My children, who claim to be too cool for this old film, thoroughly enjoyed it.
Though the actors have fully matured, the video is still beautiful. I will recommend to my friends, I am enjoying it.
I think everybody with little children should have this movie in their collection.A movie that makes you feel happy and keep singing the songs in it.
Great clarity. Great old movie that still catches the interest even after 50 years. Still a fresh new movie for today
Again, this was a gift and I am sure it will be played many times. It was played on Christmas Day to the enjoyment of all who watched it.
Mary Poppins is a classic and my children enjoy this movie as much as I did at their age. Highly recommended
Our family loves this movie.  We had it in VHS, then we got it in DVD.
Never anything like it before or since. Julie Andrews teamed with Dick Van Dyke for one of the funniest, creative and heart-warming movies ever.
a wonderful story for children and adults where there are no evil bad guys and nobody dies. Truly good entertainment.
Who doesn't love Marry Poppins? It's an excellent family movie with a great cast and after seeing Saving Mr. Banks, you have to have this movie!
Love this movie it is such a great classic and no matter what age you can't help but sing along. Supercalifragilisticexpialidocious!
This will always be enjoyed by generations to come. Julie Andrews was the perfect choice for Maria. Loved the extras with the film.
I loved this movie. I had never seen it and my fianc&eacute; insisted that i watch it. I was pleasantly surprised at how much fun this classic was.
Wonderful story to see over and over I was very glad to upgrade my VHS collection with this timeless tale.
Funny, clean, makes the imagination flow.  All the singing is wonderful.  The Sound of Music and Chitty Chitty BAng Bang are all equally as good.
Even my five and three year olds still loved it. It's got it all for a great family movie night experience.
What a joy to see this in all its original splendor. Blu ray and 7.1 sound are perfect. A true classic!
Definitely a must see movie.  A good family (all ages) movie that will keep the interest of all who watch
Mary Poppins film is a classic you cannot miss. It's a family film that will enjoy everybody with a child heart.
Great family movie with an inspiring message of love and forgiveness.  I strongly recommend this movie for everyone to watch.
it is an excellent movie, very enjoyable. i love the music and the acting. julie andrews is an excellent actress
What could be better than Mary Poppins for good old family entertainment?  Love this movie and so do the grand-kids.
This is a classic wonderful story - with wonderful music.  It is appropriate for young children to watch with parents.  A good family movie!
Great family movie with wonderful songs.  I watched this before going to see Saving Mr. Banks and enjoyed both movies even more.
It has been years since i have seen this and I had forgotten what a great movie it was. Great for the whole family
Watched it as a child ...one of the great Disney classics and I would never miss it when I ws a child.... Now my Grandkids love it also.
The packaging on this DVD was really nice. I am giving this to my niece who is 11. She is going to love it.
This is another example of the great movies that were made when Walt was alive. The cast, the plot and the visual are great.
a perfect movie for every one even adults and have some fun and use your mind and enjoy and look better
This is one of the best movie Hollywood has ever put out. Children and adults will always want to watch this positive story.
I bought this to just review the dance scene with the dancing on the roof top.  The entire movie was an enjoyable escape into childhood.Mary DeBoer
Wonderful movie, even better on DVD.  Just a little bit of sugar helps the medicine go down.
Great quality on this movie. Completely faithful to the original. A Disney classic at its very best. Add it to your collection now!
The kids loved it as much as we did when we were children! Wonderful story and a great message. Classic Disney.
Mary Poppings is a movie for the whole family. It is fun and holds adventure that all can enjoy. Have fun watching.
You NEED this movie. Kids or no kids, Mary Poppins is a must have movie I love the songs. I love Julie Andrews. I just love this movie.
A classic, fun movie.  Merely replacing my old VHS copy with DVD so I can enjoy it over and over.
Classic movie that never gets old.  I love Julie Andrews and Dick Van Dyke in this movie.  I wish I had had a Mary Poppins when I was a child!
You can't go wrong with any of Disney animated or movies.  Just saw Saving Mr. Banks and had to get this.  Love it
Exceptional classic that every movie library must have.
I bought &#34;Mary Poppins&#34; for my granddaughter who is 12. She loves the movie and I really enjoyed seeing it again.
Great dancing, great personnages, great acting,,,what's not to like. Two hours of pure delight! The songs are exceptinals: Tuppence, Superca...etc...
I have watched this film many times, and highly recommend itto anyone.  They don't make them like this anymore.  I'd give it 20 stars if I could!
Good olde Disney film!You just can't beat the combination of actor talent and Disney special effects.And good music all add to a pleasant experience.
Still magical; still mesmerizing.  My granddaughter absolutely loved it.  She smiled through the whole thing.  I forgot how much fun it was!
This classic film has something for every age group, and I get something new from it every time I see it. I highly recommend it.
Mary Poppins is a wonder-filled movie, one of my favorites and a must have to add to my Disney DVD collection.
For everyone who loves Mary Poppins this video is the best.  My children watch it over and over again always a favorite.
A classic-so very well made and perfect for kids of all ages. They need more movies like this. My 4 and 5 year old grandchildren love this.
It's a wonderful movie one of the Disney classics! I bought it the quality was great they did a great job on the remastering for hi definition.
What can you say.  She is MARY POPPINS!  Gotta love her. She is everything you wish you could do and more.
I purchased this movie for my grandson after renting it for him. At six, he loved the magic and the dancing!! Couldn't have been more pleased!
Love the songs, Dick Van Dyke, Julie Andrews & all the light hearted entertainment.  Amazing how clean fun can be so entertaining!
I sent it to my 4 year old granddaughter and she wants to watch it everyday!!  Wow!!  My daughter has really enjoyed it all over again!!
Every child should see this movie.  The songs are wonderful and fun to sing with your child.
We love Mary Poppins and love this Blu-Ray edition. It's an amazing production best appreciated in HD.
I love this movie. It gives me great joy to watch it. I will watch it over and over again.
And what do you expect, if your under thirty you mite want more from Good Old Walt. Personal favorite, love it.
I love this movie plan to buy it would recommend it to anyone of all ages will watch it again soon.
classic that you must have, delivered quickly, price is right, if you like julie andrews you will love this calssic that everyone should see.
although I saw this many years ago when I was younger it is still a great movie and a real classic one all can enjoy for a long time to come
Great singing, acting, and a great story.  I can watch this once or a hundred times and still enjoy the movie.
who does not love a circus theme.. and as always, dumbos big ears. kids will come to adore this lovable movie.
If you into Disney movies this is a good addition to the collection.
Such a great movie, I love that it came to Blu-ray, so happy with it, great for the whole family!
One of my favorites as a child, who couldn't love Dumbo? Couldn't pass up the chance to own it for myself!
Bought for my grandchildren and they love it; I'm expanding their Disney collection and what child wouldn't love to own a copy of Dumbo
Another Movie that the whole family can enjoy great story Elaphant born with huge ears and his story in it a must see
I loved this movie and still as an adult I bought it so my daughter can enjoy it as well alot cheaper than a DVD and she cannot scratch a vhs
This is a great movie for the whole family. My kids enjoy all the DIsney movies and I really like the older classic ones alot.
When my grandson gets older, he will most likely enjoy this movie. If nothing he looks at the colors right now and is hearing the sounds.
Great kids classic a must have for any Disney fan, I bought for my wife and grandkid and they loved watching it many times
the big ears in this movie is so cute and yes I'm a grown adult but I love my Disney movies
I enjoyed it as much as I enjoyed it when it first came out. I liked it better on Blu-ray than on DVD.
No one can watch this story with dry eyes. endless beauty and love. Any one without a heart will grow one with that movie.
I remember it well from my youth, from my children's youth, and I even like it now.  Disney the old fashion way.
I was happy when I put this movie in my VCR and it worked. I was excited to have a working video of a movie classic.
My dvd version was about worn out.  It's quite an improvement from what we had and brought a different look to a favorite.
This is such an incredibly adorable Disney classic.Ho very happy to have found it.What a perfect purchase!  THANK YOU!
fun to watch with kids lovely nice story I highly recommend it I give you more than five stars !!!!!
When it comes to family movies and fun, its hard to beat Disney. Great picture and great sound; these movies never get old!
I like being able to find classic movies for a good price. I now own movies that I didn't even own on VHS. It is really cool!
A true Disney Classic to be shared for generations. A family movie to hand down. A heartwarming story for one and all
The move arrived promptly and is a great show. My kids love it. It is a gift for my sister in law
I bought this because my grandson LOVES animals , he is 2.5 and just hasn't stopped asking for me to put it on.  It's a classic MUST HAVE!!!
Disney Classic!! Disney Classic enough said!!  Just adding to my video collection for my entire family to enjoy.  These are hard to find cartoons!
It was an entertaining movie of interest especially to children.  Dumbo and Bambi were the 2 Disney movies I remember seeing in the 1940's.
I loved this movie as a child, so I purchased it for my kids and they also really love it!
A classic
daughter had never seen movie, loved it , watches as one of her favorite movies, she talked about it for days
One of my favorite Disney films!  And, like I am sure DVD fans out there will agree with me:  sure glad Disney put extras on it!!
My daughter absolutely LOVES this movie.  Can't say enough good things about this classic movie.  I recommend it any parent with kids.
This movie never gets old.  Classic soundtrack.  Beautifully animated.  Takes me back to my youth every time I sit down to watch it with the kids.
DUMBO ARRIVED ON TIME AND IN EXCELLENT CONDITION. THIS IS A MUST SEE MOVIEFOR ALL DISNEY LOVERSUnder the Tuscan Sun (Widescreen Edition)
My son used to watch this over and over as a little boy so I thought it would be cute to get it for his son. Great packaging and quality.
I like the cute elephant. He is my favorite character in the movie. I believe my dollars would be better spent on this film than any disney sequel.
This traditional old Disney movie so touching and loving and sad all rolled up into one. Family all love it.
I purchased this for my granddaughter and she loves it.  But then who doesn't like a Disney story or flick, young or old!
Who does not love Disney movies? I love them all and hope to own them someday to share with my children.
My 18 month old is obsessed! We watch it every day! And the parents love it too : ) A Great movie - very watchable quotable and lovable
The movie is another great story that comes from my childhood from the time that disney was making for the whole family to watch.
This is yet ANOTHER TERRIFIC purchase for the little ones in our lives!!! They have SOOOO enjoyed this dvd! TIMELESS & CLASSIC & GREAT ITEM!
Another Disney movie that didn't disappoint me. My kids and I really enjoyed it.
The Blu-ray version of this movie is the best ever! It is so beautiful and has many great special features. Great for kids and kids at heart!
Disney Classic with superb color and clarity.  Great video for all ages. The Blu-ray version has awesome color and crisp sound.
My grandchildren never tire of this one. I think it is the best version of Alice in Wonderland. A timeless classic!
I love Alice in wonderland. Children's movies can't get any better than this. Every generation should watch Alice in wonderland
Another special Disney movie that is a classic to add to my collection of Blu-ray Disney movies I truly enjoy.
IT WAS A FAST AND EASY WAY TO GET WHAT I WANTED. I WILL DO MORE SHOPPING THIS WAY. GOOD PRODUCST AT GOOD COST. liked  THE DVD THE WAY TO GO
I decided to buy this for the holidays as mom & the nephews loved the movie & wanted to share it together when they came to visit.
great movie all Disney movies are the best to own never get tired of watching them I own a lot of Disney movies
I have always loved this movie, it is one of my very favorite Disney movies.  It is even better in blu-ray!
This movie, although this version is the original is filled excitement and humor, very relaxing to look at, highly recommended.
i still love watching tis movie at least once a week.this is by far the best disney movie of all time
I was so surprised to be able to see this movie so much more clearly in blu ray.  It made for easy watching.
I bought this because I rent this movie so often on here anyway.  The blu-ray is an amazing version!  It comes with some nice features as well!
Well it's a very funny Disney classic, an accumulation of weird and extraordinary characters, there is something for all tastes. Oh it's late!
Thank you so very much!Thrilled to own a Disney classic such as this!  Wonderful for young and old alike!
Had to have this movie all my kids are to old to like it but I love it great movie to have got it for a great price came fast
I recently started collecting Disney DVDs and was thrilled to add this one to my collection at such a great price. Timeless classic
Alice In Wonderland is one of my all time favorites that Disney has covered ;-) Definitely worth a watch ;-)
i love watching classic disney films so im glad i got this one at a good price and it wasnt scratched and worked great
My daughter loves this movie!
A wonderful take on the Lewis Carroll tome, with the usual fun Disney touches, and family-friendly. A great time for everyone.
Love this DVD - I have it on VHS, but it was getting old.  Happy to see the story again.
My niece really likes this movie. This is a great family movie to watch as well. I really like this movie.
Of course, Alice in Wonderland is crazy and colorful and full of adventure.  The scenes are cute and young children enjoy this classic.
It was a gift, the person was very happy with this 'Materpiece edition' - received earlier than stated.  Very satisfied w/item and delivery time.
I bought this as a 3rd birthday present for my daughter and she LOVES LOVES LOVES this movie! Especially when she falls down the rabbit hole!
This is another Disney classic movie that I reccommend for everyone. This movie is a great one too sit down and let your troubles float away.
This is a good Disney movie we all love it and no the remake cannot compare to it so get this you will like it
The best movie in those days and made my mind think unlike the todays cartoons and movies. This is the one for you I know it is for me.
it is a wonderfully put together movie. has a good story line, characters and animation. worth a watch!
How can you go wrong with Alice in Wonderland.  You can't.  Take the time to buy it for someone you love.
Always a favorite in our house.  Great imaginative characters and story, one that is watched often by my 3 daughters.
This is the original and the best Alice. I am a kid again when I watch it. It never gets old.
I bought this as a gift for my only granddaughter so I have not viewed it; however, my son tells me she LOVES it!
What fun to romp with Alice once again. Loved it as a child and loved it once again many years later.
This is an older version and my kids loved it so got it for the daycare.  Great if you need a little break.
Always loved this film and now so do both of my daughters.  A fun film with lots to think about.
Everyone in our family loves this movie.  It's a great anytime movie.
My favorite disney film. A valid alternative to Disney sequels! DISNEY ORIGINALS!
ALICE IN WONDERLAND is a total classic from DISNEY!!! The tale of Alice is a classic, and the DISNEY version is the definitive animation of it!!!
i loved this as a child and like having it in my collectiionxxx xxx xxx xxx xxx xxx xxx
Another traditional Disney...It is so good and fun and a neat presentation of the book. Everything in it is engaging and the queen is crazy.
Love this movie still watch it to this day its so magical, funny, and refreshing to watch.
This movie is so cute, and I am glad to be able to share it with my children now! It works great and was shipped on time. Thank you!
great classic movie and many special features available for the whole family to enjoy and you got to love the blue-ray picture!
I love the classic movies!They dont make them like they used to but I enjoyed this so very much and so do my nieces and nephews!
The Grandchildren love it. Ben many year since I first saw Alice and many more since I first read it.
This is a classic Disney movie that was enjoyed by the kids.  It is great to see these older Disney movies on Amazon instant video.
Great movie; purchased for my kids because we loved the movie - and it's a hit with the kids as well.
My son and I both love this video! Terrific buy! Great quality and well worth the money I paid for it.
A hard one to find in DVD.  Glad I did.  I have some History with the bloodlines that come to the USA and this just lets you enjoy.
This was a great movie...true and wonderfulHis dedication to the horses went straight to my heartGood for him!
I saw this many years ago & wanted my grandkids to enjoy too.  They did & I sure did.  So great to see these marvelous animals.
I have always loved the Lipizzaner horses so when I saw this movie over 50 years ago I  fell more in love with them.
this film tells an event during the last days of ww II. the saving of an important piece of irriplaceable culture with the help of thr US Army.
This is a wonderful true story .  Both grown ups and children can enjoy this dvd together , especiallyif you love horses.
Love this video! Just a great classic! My son, age 3 absolutely loves it and has requested to watch it over and over.
I can remember watching this as a child and now my child loves it as well. This is a good buy.
I saw this movie when I was about 6 years old and love it!  I highly recommend this movie to all who love nature documentaries.
A classic &#34;tail&#34; of boy meets... mermaid. Love knows no boundaries, not even the streets of New York or the ocean.
I got this for my daughter who loves mermaids, she is so happy with it. It has dated a lot but still worth it. Tom Hanks is great.
My daughter will be so surprised that I found the movie on your website that she couldn't remember the name of! Thank you!
One of my all time favorite movies. it's such a classic with young tom hanks. I love mermaids and it's such a great movie.
Very funny  movie.  Man encounters mermaid.  He takes her home and puts her in his bathtub.  It gets much funnier from here a Must see.
Absolutly love this movie. I've been trying acquire it for a while. So glad you had it for an inexpensive price.
This movie is shockingly good. Creative and fun and well done,this movie is like going to Disney Land for the first time. It is so much fun!
I love this move because a love  story and like a men to find he true love and the love of his life.
This movie is a all time classic. I love this romantic and yet sad movie. It came in perfect condition, no flaws.
One of the first mermaid movies I ever saw was Splash, no other movie compairs to it. If you like mermaids than this is a must!
A movie that is not only a great comedy for all time but a great movie about relationships. Not only a chick flick but also a guy flick as well.
Splash is an excellent film. It is just as hilarious today as it was when it first came out. Truly an awesome purchase!
One the top 1980s films for me.....Tom Hanks, John candy  Darryl Hannah.....great together, definitely one to be added to any dvd collection
A real great blast from the past. Was so happy I found this so easy and one click purchased had it two days later! Perfect!
This is good fun, glad to have it to add to my collection of movies.  Always liked this, along with Big.
Great movie. Always enjoyed it, am so glad to have it back in my collection.Tom hanks is really young.
Bought this as a gift. Hard to believe the movie Splash is having a 20th Anniversary. Great movie. Great deal. Thank you.
The DVD was priced fair, and arrived in a timely manner.  It was enjoyed by all my family and the grand kids loved it.
A very good movie that I have enjoyed in the past and now in the present. It is good to have in back in my pr3esent day collection. G.Goff
I enjoy a good Tom Hanks movie and this is one of his earlier ones. Funny and yes it pulls at the heart some too.
This is one of those what if movies...What if mermaids did exist.  Would you give up your life on earth to be with your true love?
this is a very light movie that you do not have to figure out a plot.  It is one of my favorites.
Of course it's a Very Unreal Situation but acting is good & it's a cute & funny storyI share it with my grandchildren who like it too.
This is a very funny movie.Tom Hanks fans,this is a must own.Found it quickly,ordering was easy.The price was great.I recommend getting it.
Big Fan of the film .The added background work was insightful. Has a treasured place in my collection.would recc. it to all mermaid fans
I loved it when it first came out and I still love it today! I only buy movies that I intend on keeping in my collection AND WATCHING THEM!  lol
Usually if I purchase a Disney classic, it's a five star to me.  By the way, my granddaughter liked it also.
An oldie, but a goodie. We love watching this movie at home with the kids. It never gets old and we can't wait to watch it over and over again.
Like all the Disney movies they are so entertaining but on BluRay they are spectacular!  I totally love this movie
Disney movie at its best in this sword and the stone classic. Can't go wrong, especially when it is digital.
One of the best Disney movies of that era. A great story about reaching for the best in life. Music is great too. I like singing the songs.
Tis is a great Disney classic! My grandkids, (and I) love it. Tis movie makes a great addition to my collection
What can I say it is Disney and the grand kids loved it-has been watched several times.  Delivered in good condition and on time.
I love this movie, i am so glad that it is released again for Disney lovers everywhere
Great movie!  I love it, my children love it.  Amazon makes it easy to watch.  Coulnd't be more pleased.  Must buy!
I grew up watching this movie, I loved is then and I love it now. watching it on blu ray looks so nice!
This is one of Disney's all-time classics I'm glad they put this on Blu-ray I really enjoyed it thanks Thanks again
great as always cartoon movies were so so much better back then i wish they were still that wholesome and fun
I bought it for my grandkids and they are enjoying watching it.  I had it in VHS when it first came out, but it is worn out.
Great Movie!! Brought me back to my childhood... The disc works great too!! It was  good buy for my little girl!
my grandsons asked Santa for this movies for Christmas they watch it all the time .They have asked for more of these movies.
My husband and I loved this movie when we were younger and our 3 year old daughter now loves it as well.
Just a good movie. It holds the test of time. I love the little owl, Archimedes. He's so funny with being so negative.
I bought this for my 9 yr old son for Christmas.  He loves it but I knew he would as this was a replacement for a worn out VHS tape.
Def a classic.  My daughters love the story, and it's fun to watch it with them and remember how much I loved it too.
I love this movie it is so typical Disney and is so cute, the songs and everything about it. One of my favorites.
Great for you kids. My boy loves the movie, and you'll probably get a more positive message from this type of movies, other than modern kids movies
The Sword is classic Disney. I can remember it from when I was child and it is still good to watch. A must have for anyone's Disney Collection
great movie about a young boy who can pull the sword from the stone when no one else could good.
Its a good one to add to the DVD collection.  Full of fun and magic for the whole family.
Thank you Thank I really love this piece. Its made my hair a lot more fuller and it looks so real.
It is really good Disney. Colorful and very imaginative....and funny, suspenseful, and, as per great Disney, everything works out in the end.
My grandchildren had never seen this classic...and they loved it..  Seeing it through their eyes reminded me why I liked it as a child!!
Can't go wrong with this classic! Loved it since I was a kid and still love it as a 29 year old adult! Ha! I wish they still made movies this great.
I'm 19 years old and still love this movie.  Get it.  It's fun!  Merlin is the man
We gladly added this to our collection. It was entertaining & historical.  Good color.
IT GOOD MOVIE WHEN I WAS TEEN KIDS WATCH THE MOVIE GOOD AND GREAT SHOWKEEP TO REMBERS ALL GROW UP ACTION GREAT.
Disney classic which is weird for a horror movie but hey this is Disney.  I LOVE this movie when I was young, now and forever
Nice Disney movie that is suitable for the entire family,Enjoyable story line with a good ending. Good movie. Disney quality.
Another great movie we've been searching for. I was delighted to find it. I believe that about says it all.
Very well done. Not gory or cause anyone to be afraid. The actors do a great job.  This is a movie when thay made good movies
We saw this movie on television many, many years ago so I was happy to see that we could now get it on DVD.
I loved it a lot and I wouldn't mind watching it again and recommend it to someone else to watch
lots of laughs and nick nolte is at his best in this hilarious spoof of the rich life in Los Angeles. recommended
Classic and very funny movie. Don't make em like this anymore. Classic movie with great ending and the Talking Heads song.
Love Bette Middler. She steals the movie. I could watch this movie often. It has a fast pace and keeps you laughing.
Great storyline. Well written, good actors. A good watch, we enjoyed it and will watch it again. good good good
I really like this one. I finally got in on DVD. I had it on VHS years ago, Still love the actors and the idea of the movie.
This is one of my all time favorite movies. The entire cast is marvelous. Nolte, Dreyfus and Midler are awesome together.
Highly recommended! one of my favorites, I can watch this movie again and again...and have! this is a must see classic AAA+++
This movie is hilarious!  I 'm not a fan of Nick Nolte, but he was the right guy for the part for sure.
Danny Devito and Bette Middler are 2 of my favorite people.  Comedy can't get any better  than this.  I highly recommend this movie.
A comedy with the creators of AIRPLANE! & Naked Gun!A MUST SEE!!!!!!!!!!!!A Movie w/ the best cast!!!!!!
Because it is a funny movie.  Bette Midler and Danny DeVito are hilarious.  I love them both and together they're amazing.
I don't want to say too much and ruin the story but this movie is a chain of really hilarious events.
I love this movie ,ITunes does not have it ,plus I needed to download all my favorite movies that make me laugh on my ipad mini.
I have always loved this movie, it's got drama, suspense and all out hilarity. A gem from the 80's vault.
Very funny, DeVito at his best.  It seems to have weathered the test of time, and remains a funny movie.
what a wonderful show it is so funny and very amusing the actors are great and i would recommend it to anyone
Ruthless People is one of the funniest movies ever made. We had fun introducing it to our 25-year-old grand-daughter.A thousand laughs.
I am very happy with my DVD, it was in great condition, thank you
Movie was just as funny as I remember from years ago. So glad I purchased it, just watched it the other night and the hubby and I had a great laugh.
You can't watch this movie without your sides hurting, funny for all time, DeVito at his best and Muffy was not hurt during the filming.
THIS IS AN OLD MOVIE, BUT IT IS REALLY FUNNY. EVERYTIME I WATCH THIS MOVIE IT'S JUST LIKE I JUST WATCHED IT. I RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO ALL.
Tough Guys in a very very good movie.It has humor and action all rolled into one.Buy it, you'll like it...
Funny movie from two great actors. Both of whom were great in their days. I think this is a classic movie and enjoyed it a lot
Funny classic that even the kids can watch! Fun and entertaining! Clean entertainment that there should be more of nowdays
Lancaster & Douglas are perfect together .... however, I'm unable to view the DVD because it is in a european format?
I'd like to know why this movie hasn't been released in region 1 format. It's pathetic that it hasn't been
even though this movie was never released in region 1, it is worth seeing. the 80s had some great under-appreciated movies! This is one of them!
Great comedy, drama, and craziness that could only come from 80's Bette Midler! It's a good movie that I will love to laugh to many times!
what do you expect when you mix Middler with Long? great great funny story, about where love could lead you sometimes :) great commedy
I remember watching this movie on VHS. I was so happy to get it on CD to add to my collection. I loved Bette Midler & Shelly Long.
I love this movie it is so funny and the actors are wonderful I would recommend this movie to anyone
This showcases two of the most unlikely yet same comedians.  The fast witty snaps and jabs make you hurt from laughing.
Best  movie ever,  love  comedy,  nothing  like  Bette Miller. Keeps you on your edge of your seat too. Love it. Thanks Bex
This is a classic great comedy for anyone who loves comedy! These two together definately compliment each other's character!
I received this movie in just 13 days after ordering it, a good result. It's a very funny movie well worth watching.
Well written, great actors and fine acting. A terrific story, very funny! a must see. I saw it when it came out, had to see again!
Based on a somewhat true practice by the Aluminum siding salesmen back in the early 1960&#34;s I love the fact this is an insta-download movie
Classic comedy with and all star cast - maybe a sleeper, but a great movie should be added to anyone's collection
THIS MOVIE IS ONE OF OUR ALL TIME FAVORITES, IT IS SO VERY FUNNY AND TRUE TO THE SORT OF CHARACTERS YOU MIGHT MEET ALONG THE WAY, GREAT ACTING
If you are in to sixties, and like old cars, with all the trimmings. DeVito will fill all you need, to relive the whole life of being a sales men.
This movie was bought for my brother.  He loves it.  I must confess that I have not seen this movie.  Thanks.
A great movie, especially if you are from Baltimore, very ethnic, and very entertaining, it is worth seeing a few times,
My daughter opened on Christmas morning and was very happy  put it in the dvd player right away and we all were singing
Bought a bunch of these singalongs for my son and he loves them! I had some of them when I was younger and loved to sing with them!
This is great for home or in the car! Love the songs/videos. The wide variety this disc has and the quality is great. My 2 year old loves it!
Great Movie keeps the grandkids busy I watched it with them A + A + A + A + A + A +
Awesome, classic family film.  Jim Varney is one of the best actors of all time... to bad he's dead.
This is a heartwarming story of the orphan who finds a home in the country.  Liked this version and so did teenage daughter.
I loved this since I was 12. This is one of the few movies that is actually better then the book it was based on. I really love it.
I have always loved this movie and am so glad it is now mine on DVD
I love this movie. It is a favorite like My Fair Lady! It is timeless and spans EVERY generation. Even some men like it!
My husband and I enjoy watching this DVD as we remember watching it fondly years ago when it was aired on the PBS channel.
I am glad I purchased these and don't have to wait for them to air on PBS. Nothing like some hot chocolate and an hour of Anne.
Sheer enjoyment. The DVD edition is very clear. Recommend replacing your VHS copy with this one!
This is such a wholesome movie, with a great storyline, and great characters.  Very good for the whole family to enjoy.
Don't miss this endearing family movie, its a heartwarming tale of second chances and the bond of love.  Its a KEEPER!!!
All of the Sullivan DVDs are of excellent quality and I am pleased with all I have received.
Excited to get this video - very happy with price and DVD.  Daughters and granddaughters love this series.
This is a wonderful movie! It makes me wish that I could have lived back in that time and on that wonderful Island.
A very good program and safe for kids to watch. very uplifting and safe for kids to watch alone. Good series.
Solid story that teaches many important lessons. It's not just a movie for young girls. Richard Farnsworth was one of the best!
great family movie.  i enjoyed it when i was a child and cant wait to share it with my children
I think Anne rocks! This is one of my personal favorites. I just smile when I think of this movie.
DVD in great shape - enjoyable version of the Anne of Green Gables classic story.
My daughter's and I have watched this over the years on TV and love it!  I is beautifully filmed and acted.  I would recommend it to anyone.
this movie is very long but it is very good and heart wrenching for the family.  it is funny and sad all in one.  it is a movie to own!!!
Anne with an e. no one could have done a better job than Megan Follows. she is perfect for the part.
i really, really love the tv show it show real great on the tape it is very wonderful to me.
Another Excellent miniseries that needs to be on DVD-USA Format... Keeps you interested & anxiously waiting for the next scene.
I bought for a friend who will be attending law school. The acting is superb but the message is most important.
IF YOU'RE WONDERING WHO GAVE US THE RIGHT TO AN ATTORNEY, WHEN WE ARE ARRESTED, BUY THIS MOVIE. IT'S VERY INFORMATIVE
Had to read the book in law school, and when I saw there was a movie of it I just hads to have it.  Hallmark Hall of Fame production.  Excellent.
This is a great movie based on Gideon vs. Wainwright, an important case in American History. I recommend it for anyone interested in their rights.
I am THRILLED this is coming out on DVD!I haven't seen it since the late 80's/early 90's.It's really beautiful!!!=^..^=
A charming tale, especially appropriate to watch around Labor Day, end of summer.  Great cast.  You will want to go to Maine.
This movie was one my husband requested for Christmas.  He enjoyed Gary Cooper and he was glad to get this for his collection.
If you like the Foreign Legion and a good buddy story then get your Man this one.
movie was a gift for my father he loved it I seen it some 20 years ago and I remembering liking it also
One of the best pictures of Gary Cooper, it is consider a classic, buy todays standards.A must see, if you have Never.
Back when it was, good vs evil, plain and simple, as it basically is.
This is a Movie that is Very Well Done; if people were to really Study this Film, they would be able to Learn something Good from this movie.
A film well remembered from high school days -- one that has stuck in memory ever since.
Nipsey sez keep a watchful eye on Dell and Gateway!!! They may just take over the world!!!Add it to the collection fans of 70's Sci-Fi.
A classic science fiction story that stands up well after all these years.  A pity that the series of novels were not continued in additional films.
This movie led the way to the computer age and is before it's time in the way automatons should be viewed. Thought-provoking.
Very, Very Good!  Thank you!
This movie always scared the heck out of me, because during that time our world really wanted automation. Great Cast
this is a full screen version as others have pointed out but still a great film. No extras on the dvd
We have this one on VHS but were upgrading it to DVD. Good science fiction story and nice to have in our collection.
I have Three O'Clock High ON LASER DISC And I have it on DVD too 'tis One of my Favorite Comdies of The 80s,you aint gonna regret it :P
This footage and performance was so good I can no longer listen to the studio takes of the songs.  THey just can't compete.
yet another gem that has not found its way to dvd.. this is a good horror flim long overdo for dvd. horror fans wont be dissapionted...
A great nostalgic horror movie from my favorite decade! Beautifully restored on blu ray as well as a powerful dts remaster!
my friend was so happy with it; it was a gift for her and she was so excited and surprised when i gave it to her.
this is a good story with a byline of self sacrifice touched on a few times and that on which depends the survival of a whole race of people.
I didn't buy the DVD, but the blu-ray is indeed great. This movie never looked better.
This is a classic, and it was a great film!, and I encourage anyone to get this movie you will have second thoughts about cheating!
Movie arrived on time and in perfect condition.  I can watch this movie several times per year and never get tired of it. No complaints.
This is just a gripping story a oldie but goodie one movie that I know that all of my friends have seen and love!
Blu-Ray In Excellent Shape.  Very Fast Delivery. Will Do Business Again With Seller.  Excellent Seller.
Awesome movie, I remember watching it years ago and decided to get a copy of my own. very surreal movie
Great Suspense,On the edge of your seat thriller. You have to maintain control of your desires. They will get you into trouble.
Very suspenseful great title love the movie and had to win on blu ray I see a long time ago
This product was a gift for a family member.  They enjoyed the product alot. This is a great product and I recommend it.
Michael Douglas & Glen Close, are two of my favorite actors! I could watch this movie,  over & over again!!
This is one of those movie that is good to have in your collection, if you enjoy thrillers. Great quality picture and sound.
Wonderful thriller with surprises.  I also scream at certain scenes even though I've seen this film at least 4 times.
ok so this is one of the best movies of all time. its sick.. twisted. and the performances of michael douglas and glen close...rediculous
The video loaded quickly on my computer and it was great quality! I was able to enjoy the movie with no problems or interruption! Great service!
Tis movie ought to make men think twice before acting.  It was crazy and very interesting, if you like suspense, I recommend this one.
Thanks for the fast delivery. I have this movie on VHS but was glad I found it on dvd.
One of the all time classics, that is still very entertaining. This movie is entertaining and timeless, a good watch.
I loved this movie when I first saw it and I liked it even more when I watched it again. If you like original movies this is one to get
Wonderful classic film. A true joy to watch.
This movie is a classic.  Comedic timing is great.  The acting is good and the characters seem so real.  We can relate!
A great holiday movie. And it's free with Amazon Prime! Great to watch with your visiting relatives during the holidays.
The funniest movie ever. In the history of movies there has not been a funnier movie. Love, love, love this movie!
Of course it's a five star! My family watches this every Thanksgiving and it never gets old. I love it.
this show was the funniest show ive seen in a while if you havent seen it yet i would ty
a good family movie for the family to watch together.love steve martin and john candy together.compare to uncle buck movie.
This is an AMERICAN CLASSIC.....  Like Caddy Shack....PLANES, TRAINS and AUTOMOBILES Never gets old.....GREAT MOVIE....This is.VERY VERY FUNNY...
very good movie. I can watch this again and again. in fact I have just about wore it out now.
Great family movie. It is a comedy great.  Love and miss John Candy.Steve Martin is superb!  It's one of our family holiday faves.
Great movie! I loved watching it twice .It's a classic now and i would recommend it for your enjoyment. nice
This movie is hysterical!  John Candy and Steve Martin are perfect together, and make this movie part of a fun Thanksgiving tradition.
A wonderful film of Thanksgiving and what it means to really be thankful.  I family treasure definitely!  Highly, hilariously recommended!
I like this movie and so did my dad.Rated R for brief strong language.Canada:PG.Great fun for the whole family.
Planes, Trains and Automobiles, the movie was very heart warming and funny at the same time. I laughed I cried and sad oh my goodness many times!
A film for the ages. It will never get old, and will spark a good smile to all who watch. Good message too.
This is a real feel good movie.  There are parts in the movie that will make you laugh and cry.
IT WAS SO FUNNY WE HAVE TO WATCH IT AGAIN. IT GREAT WITH SURROUND SOUND SYSTEM. THIS MOVIES MAKE ME TO STAY AWAY FROM SLOPPY ,ANNOYING PEOPLE.
For some reason, we had never seen this movie classic.  It is a John Hughes production and it is very good.
This is my all time favorite of John Candy. He and Steve Martin are perfect for their parts. I love it.
Great holiday movie!  Good clean humor for most part and great for the whole family.  Would recommend at least everyone seeing once.
It just funny but I love the end since we never know people's situation and we ignored them most of the time with our selfishness.
Not as funny as some of their other movies(independently of each other), but still a good time and several laughs to be had.
hilarious and sadly close to reality in transportation. My neighbor just went through something like this on a trip from Texas to chicago.
John Candy and Steve Martin. What more could you ask for. Can't wait to sit down with all the family and watch this classic.
Hopefully this will be the extended verion that has played on network TV.Thank you John Hughes!!! R.I.P.
Still one of the true comedy films that are actually funny, still to this day. truly a classic.  Watch it.
Great movie.  Still holds up.  Best John Candy movie evero.  Good for the whole family.  Should be a Thanksgiving tradition.
Good edition and enjoyed watching it thoroughly, great movie to watch during the holidays. Watch it over and over thanks
What's there to say a true classic from The Best of The Best  beyond Hilarious but yet with a flaire of an inside blossoming friendship
This movie is lots of fun, and full of adventure for everyone. I'm not sure what else to say without giving anything away. It's worth watching!!
Awesome Movie, we watch this every Thanksgiving for over 20 years now. It's a good holiday movie. I would recommend this for your holiday season.
always a happy thought.
Had lost our original copy. Very pleased to have it back in our library. Great poignant movie. Martin and Candy were perfect together.
really like this one. good family entertainment except for a few choice words by steve. overall well thought out movie
One of those movies I can watch about once a year and still thoroughly enjoy. John Candy and Steve Martin are awesome together.
Excellent movie to watch around Thanksgiving! Steve Martin and John Candy at their best. Once my wife saw it she couldn't wait to watch it again.
I start out the Holiday season the night before Thanksgiving with this movie every year!  On blu ray it's magic!
Classic Martin and Candy comedy at its best.  I have seen this movie too many times to count, but still enjoy it every time.
This is a classic funny movie for Thanksgiving. Steve Martin and John Candy are a great match. I could watch this over and over anytime of the year.
this is one of john candys best movie it is a very funny holiday movie it is really great in bluray a must have holiday movie.
I gave this 5 stars the streaming was perfect and the movie is hilarious,  can't go wrong with this from amazon
I want the half !!!It made me laugh so good 10 years ago.It still works now. Even after my divorce. So it tells you how goooood it is !!!
I seen Eddie murphy in concert for Raw and he was so funny I had to get this dvd to have
Funny as hell baby! I love Eddie Murphy this is his second movie after delirious! Everybody should have this movie in your collection!
Eddie murphy is the Best and if not he's in the top 3 all time.  Great stand up.  There haven't been many that you could watch over and over.
Raw is what this is. Eddie at his best. The early days were some of his best.
Eddie is too funny.  Great for a good laugh or/and share it with the right kind of company (smile). Funny
I love his New Jersey Accent, its hilarious!!, as eighties comedies go, this was a very entertaining one to continue watching!!!
this is why Eddie is one the best, great material and easy to explain this special set him as one of the best of all time in comedy.
Eddie at his very best, certainly not for the kids but funny, he defines funny in this one!
After all these years Eddie Murphy is still the best. Very funny and entertaining. Had to keep the kids in the other room though.
Fantastic , funny dvd . It will have you laughing from beginning to end . Very happy with this purchase
As usual, the video-on-demand quality was not as good as the DVD.If you like old science fiction this was pretty good.
My daughter wanted this DVD and so I ordered it. She loves it and highly recommends it, especially if you love the Japanese anime.
I remember this movie from long ago...it still has a strong impact. I'm using it with my substance abuse clients.Product was in great condition.
Gave it as a gift so I hope it was in good viewing shape.  I won't know until  the recipient opens and watches it.
This Movie Is well Worth Your Viewing Time. Very Good acting, Good Storyline. A+
This 4 star movie could help answer that question.  One of the most horrific movies due to the nature of the disease.  VERY REALISTIC.  Must see.
What a disturbing and wonderful movie all at the same time.  It came in good condition and promptly.  Thank You!
Great great great.  Lots of fun and with a message. Recommended as must see for all, especially IRS agents...LOL  Terrific movie
For anyone growing up in the 80's this was a coming of age story. The issues are still relevent and potent. One of my favorites of my generation.
seen this one when I was a teenager. still had the same effect on me now loved it. has a real powerful lesson behind it all  teens should watch
One of Robert Downey's best and first roles that represents a lot of what he truly went three in his life, but he made it out in top!
The movie works really well, there are no issues and the case is still nice. It's definitely in good shape.
Another of my favs and could not find it in stores, but so glad I found it on DVD. Love it!!!!
Got this for a friend who just could NOT wait for it to come in the mail. She says it's hilarious and will watch it over and over.
You've never seen RDJr. like this before. Watch him slip down the spiral to hell in this drug fueled tale.
I have loved this movie since ... Forever! Really shows life in LA in the 80's if you we're rich... Beautiful... And Jami Gertz!!!!
Probably the best movie Robert Downey Jr. has ever made.  And I love the soundtrack.  Delivery was prompt.  I always show this movie to my guests.
I love getting together with a close friend and watching this movie...we do it at least once a year, being 80s buffs.
For those of us from the 80's.... You get it. Solid sound track, pretty cheesy now that i'm in my 40's but still has a very cool vibe.
Maria Callas was a woman of incredible talents on the opera stage and they are now available to us on this film---even without her great singing!
To get to see La Divina at work is worth the various directorial vagaries.  Maria Callas deserved a better movie than Pasolini gave her.
lots of action, story line is good, could be better but all in all it was an enjoyable show to watch
Great movie!! Love all movies Arnold. Lots of action and lots of fun. Going to buy more movies for the Arnold collection.
A very entertaining and imaginative story with plenty of special effects to keep you  focused. Makes you think about the possibilities of the future.
Excellent action movie. I enjoyed very much,typical Arnold movie, but still action packed.Good back round music and special effects. GREAT
I love this movie and it works great thanks for selling it at a good price. I hope we all remember the fun in animation.
This a classic for those who love the 80's action hay days! I love me some Ahnold and this one is still good after all these years!
Conspiracy, Arnold, Action, perfect recipe for a perfect movie.  You won't be disappointed.
I love the Running Man - Awesome Movie !I Gave This Movie To My Nephew for His Birthday & He was So Happy.
My husband is a great Arnie fan and enjoys any of his movies.  This is just another example of another.
Thank you very much for a great movie at a great price. I am very happy with my purchase. I have rated this at a definite 5 star.
What's not to like if you like Arnold movies.  All the action you need without having to worry about if it could be true
i received this movie dvd months ago & listed posting/review at that time, please see earlier review. thanks in advance
This was not for me and I am afraid I really can not comment on the purchase.I helped a friend out and that was all I know of this purchase.
Nicholson, Streep, and Waits.  May be a little slow for some, but the acting is fantastic.
How can you go wrong with such a cast? Excellent and thoughtful. A must see, but not on a day when you do not want to feel sad. Excellent movie.
Two of the premier actors of their generation put on a stunning performance, as does the city of Troy, NY where I was partially filmed
This is a pretty good version of the story. I have not heard of it before although it is advertised to be well known.
I found this movie on YouTube and wanted it to use in Sunday School.  I try to collect all of the movies about Jesus and this one was good.
I finally found this on DVD. I had this on VHS then my old VCR broke. I am glad they had this on here.
Fantastic old flick.  Many old movies are so stupid, but this one will make you smile andhold your interest.
ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES.  Good quality and no lead-ins which I hate on DVDs.  Anyone who likes Jason Robards or Jane Fonda should see this.
My kids love this movie! Great purchase! Love Amazon Instant Video. Streams great on my both of my Rokus! Hope Amazon gets more kids videos!
But the packaging was a little bit too much! Its better when you use the Envelopes. And it saves your customers money!
Hubby just loves it, now he can enjoy his movie on our wedding anniversary today, thanks all so very much.
Barfly is another big favorite of mine,charles bukowski did good,I watch this every now and then also,it never gets old it just allways gets better.
GREAT movie w/ laughs, great music, love the premise ...what must a babysitter goes thru ...Elizabeth Shue is a terrific actress...
this is a cute movie for all ages.  adventurous and funny this movies has a great plot and makes a lot of sense
The first and most awesome movie of Elisabeth Shue I have seen. &#34;Don't f%@# with the babysitter!&#34; Best line ever!!
Loved this movie. So cute. I remembered it from way back in the day. It's still fun to watch now.
This is one of my FAV all-time movies. I am glad to finally have it in my collection. Its a 80's-90's ICONIC movie.
Wish I would have had this babysitter growing up maybe life would have been a lil more exciting :) Exciting movie for the family.
I watched this movie when my children were younger. We thought it was so funny and entertaining. I just had to buy it to add to my movie collection.
Lots of action, humor, excitement and teen crushes. Teaches some good lessons about not judging by appearances too. Kids loved it.
THIS MOVIE (WHICH I THINK IS GOING OUT OF PRINT) IS ONE OF THE MOST ORIGINALLY FUNNY MOVIES I EVER SAW.  WELL WRITTEN, WELL ACTED.
This is a classic. Loved it since I first saw it &#34;a few years back.&#34; I particularly liked the blues scene.
this movie brought back memories from when i was a child. i loved this movie. had to get for my collection
Have seen it before.Wanted to own it so I could any time I wanted.It was good then and still is
Love this movie! IT's funny and great for the whole family! It's classic 80's and I just love it! The cast is awesome!
Great beginning for Elisabeth Shue!  Loved watching this movie with my daughter!  So much fun to see how they get out of each situation!
despite seeing it 1,000 , 000 i still love it. it's funny as hell and i laugh every time i watch it.
One of my all time favorite movies. The blues scene is one of the best scenes ever written. I've seen it at least half a dozen times over the years.
Great fun movie for the family,one of my family's favorites,never get tired of seeing,and always provides a laugh as well as some sweetness!!!
i so love and miss the 80's takes me back to when i was young and things were simple, This movie is great another classic to me!!!
good entertaining comedy kinda like porky's or such, it is ratherjuvenile but a lot of laughs, good for ther younger set.
these movie is a great movie and on blu ray it looks even more awesome in blu ray i would recommend these movie
My hubby enjoyed the movie, very good actors in it!! I am very happy, thank you very much!! Thank you again.
This is a wonderful movie for the whole family.I really enjoyed it.Everyone  in my family enjoyed watching this.
This is one of my favorite childhood movies. I've watched it a thousand times. I just love it. Buy it!
This is good old movie. Not by todays acting standards but for its time it is funny and well made
My wife asked me to get this movie for her ,so I did . I loved this movie growing up, and if they have it on Blu-ray, even better!
This movie is about as fun as it get's for an 80's movie. This would make a killer musical on Broadway too!!
This movie is a classic, that I've been watching since I was little kid. I would recommend it for anyone.
this was all time fav. got vhs now have the dvd. great condition and great movie.thanks  so glad got this movie
This very funny from start to end. The cast are perfect for the film & add much to each scene.
I like going backl and watching this movie.  That's all I have to say. That's all I have to say.
Great Movie!  This movie is from the 80's and always loved the story line...get Another Stakeout for the Part 2 version!
Great movie! Richard Dreyfuss is his usual wonderful self. Emilio Esteves is a great companion for him. The two of them are a great combination.
Love the actors in this funny, cute, sexy movie! Remembered I hadn't seen it in awhile and wanted to buy it again!
These old movies are the best.  None of the sex and bed scenes that don't even fit into the plot. it's a great family movie
I just plain love this movie, funny funny funny. These two actors a great together and will make u laugh. Buy it, it is worth the time and money.
Anne Ramsey, Billy Crystal, Danny DeVito, Rob Reiner (Meat-head) Star in it.  &#34;KEEP AWAY FROM ME YOU MURDERER!&#34;Outstanding and Funny!
How wonderful when the lost find one another...and we have fun along the way.I purchased this oldie because it is a treasure!
I gave this as a gift to my 85yr old mother-in-law an she loves it...............................So she gives it a 5 star
I really enjoy this movie. I think it is so funny. They picked the right people to act in this movie. This is a must see movie.
Fairly close to book. Same sort of black fatalistic humor. Flashback disconcerting for first time viewer. Set leaves something to be desired.
Terrific older movie I hadn't seen for a while but it was as good and as crazy as I remembered it.
It did not take long to get to my home and it is in good shape so no problem with this at all.
Had not wated this movie in years. Streamed over Amazon to my TV. It was a great classic in high def.
Very good movie just as relivent now as back when it was made. This is a good movie to watch.
Kinky, funny, ingenious, sad, grotesque. These are some of the words I use in describing the film. Brilliantly directed and acted.
I read the book years ago and it was a pretty tough read but the movie was adapted well and I enjoyed it.
To read the book and then watch this movie is a mistake.  But if you like seeing the B-25 in flight and you want a laff, this is the movie.
A very good cast, a great story, and a lot of crazy plot lines. As a veteran, I can tell you that this is not so far from the truth.
Although not as good as the book. But, not an easy book to bring to the big screen. It was fun to see Martin Sheen as a twenty something year-old.
This is a classic...amazing how the book was able to transfer to the big screen. ..Kudos to the screen writers!
The humor remains great.  The message so right on even for today.  War is insanity!  One of the bet movies ever made
This Classic film about Wall Street shinanagans is a must see for any film buff.  Michael Douglas gives his best performance.
This is one of my favorite movies. I love the stock market and I love Charlie. This was a good story with a great cast!
Awesome seller!  I think I received the DVD in the mail about 30 seconds after I ordered it.  Very impressed!
This movie is definitely a classic and a must buy for those who appreciated Boiler Room and like making $$.
It was really amazing, the talents and Miss Julie Kent was excellent. A course as always, Misha was excellent. Love the scenery too.
I am very happy with my purchase and it arrived right on time and it plays great and I have no problems with it at all.thank you
One of my favorite movie's from the past. So worth a watch, especially for othse with pre-teen kids who want a clean family flick with a fun twist.
I have always loved this movie. I'm glad I purchased it so I can watch it whenever I want. Thanks!
Shelley long was a very good actress and is a very funny movie to watch. I like it very much.
If you are a NEW AGE believer you MUST get this sweet movie and IMAGINE if it COULD really happen I LOVE THIS MOVIE AND EVERYONE IN IT
We love this movie. So funny and clean for the entire family. Tough to find a decent movie these days. This is GREAT and funny.
This is so funny and such a good movie.  It is definitely worth watching.  I love it!
I love this movie because it could happen and it is great fun.  people get what's coming to them and more!
why oh why cant films be like they were in the 80s...watched this one many times and still could watch it over and over...classic
Super Funny. Loved it. I would recommend this to adults. Not to children. But other than that it was really good.
I love this movie!!  Shelly Long is fabulous!  I was tired of renting in from Netflix and Amazon's prices are tough to beat.
My son loves these sing-a-long movies! It's all we can watch in the car right now! If you are a disney loving family, then you will love these too!
We had this music movie in VHS but this is first time we have this music by DVD. Its very good one. Thanks & have a good day!!
My husband loves this movie. I also remember it from school but this purchase was the first time my sons had seen it. Truly a great Disney film.
I start every school year with this dvd to inspire kids to love math. It is genius!! A must have for all teachers who teach math.
Very prompt!  Got it just before I needed it.  I teach math and this is a good way for students to learn!  Love it; love it; love it; love it!
Awesome! It's my son's favorite movie! Thank you for shipping it so promptly it's in awesome condition. Service was great!
Donald Duck, my favorite Disney Character. I remember seeing this as a child, it was as much fun watching it with my 2 year old daughter again.
this is for my grandson Joshua...  learning math with Donald is a great beginning for a child and fun too!  great!  love Pam  thanks again Amazon
The movie is awesome! I'm happy with my purchase. The dvd came to me in great condition. Thank you so much.
A classic Carpenter given classic treatmentGreat print, great sound, great extrasBeware this disc is region locked to A
there was a time period, this and they live etc that JC was tops, a must have to any fan
This is how I want my movies to be. Strong, powerful, and demending. This is a classic of the European film-making.
Everyone has already said everything that can be said other than hearing it from the horse's mouth.  Fellini is the man and this is his finest work.
If you love great films Frederico Fellini's 8 1/2 has to be part of your collection.  It's not the usual plot-driven movie as much as it's a dream.
Let me know if you find a better film.  I can't.
This is one of my all time favorite films svn though it is very heavy and extremely sad with Redgrave is excellent form.
A must see. Vanessa Redgrave is phenomenal and deserving of her academy award. All acting was superb by all. Very realistic.
Playing for Time Vanessa RedgraveHow do you rate this product?I love itPlaying for Time Vanessa RedgraveHow do you rate this product?I love it
I saw this movie on TV many years ago, and I also read the book. I am so glad to now have the DVD
This is a top notch movie!  Reminds us of huge historical significance of awareness of our pasts to protect our future.
What a great acting job Vanessa Redgrave did in this dvd.  Truly a sad but truthful portrait of what life was like in the concentration camps
I was thrilled that I was able to find this old movie first of all. The DVD is great quality and Clarity. I am enjoying it.
See Jerry at his best in diffrent rolls he is so funny in this movie, a must have for the collector
GREAT COMEDY FOR THE FAMILY  GREAT FILM WITH  JERRY LEWIS PLAYING ALL THE VARIOUS FAMIY MEMBERS.GOOD STORY FOR YOUNG AND OLD
While most Movies characters struggle with playing two characters at once, Jerry Lewis makes it look easy to play more than five characters at once!
Funny!  Ending was awesome.
this i have from sometime ago  an excellent movie it is here on my shelf dvd and vhs cant remember when ordered thank you
If you have never seen Dick Powell before you ought to see this movie he was delightful and easy to watch and listen to. Very enjoyable old movie.
It doesn't get any better than watching Basil Rathbone & Nigel Bruce as Holmes & Watson.  A real treat for all.
love the characters and the story.  those old movies are the best.  Sherlock and Watson, those actors really know their stuff
I love the old Sherlock Holmes movies.  I like the ones with Rathbone the best.  You can't go wrong with these movies.
Basil Rathbone can do nothing wrong in this series period!  This is my favorite of the 12 movies made by Rathbone & Bruce.
I JUST LOVE THIS CLASSICS &#34;WRITTEN ON THE WIND&#34; HAS A VERY GOOD STORY FOR ROMANCE LOVERS I RECOMEND THIS MOVIE EXCELLENT
This is a classic tale about a wealthy and spoiled family from Texas.  It involves jealousy and drinking.  Sibling rivalry.  It's got it all.
If you have never seen this movie about a CIA agent that retires and writes him memoirs you have missed a great flick.
this is a Great Movie...we love it.  Walter Matthau is great in every movie he 's in. I'm sure everyone will love it.
Walter Matthau is at his best!  it is a good story without being nasty and violent.  A really good adventure and the characters were great!
great classic with REAL actors who don't feel you need foul language to make a movie great. plot keeps the movie pass quickly with a cute ending.
Great movie! Walter Matthau, Ned Beauty. Highly recommend. All star cast exellent story.Can you say Edward Snow den. Worth buying.
WALTER MATTHAU PLAYS A VERY INTERESTING ROLE, I REALLY LIKE THE STORY AND HOW IT ENDED, I WOULD RECOMMEND TO ANYONE.
Just outstanding...one of my top ten movies...thinking about watching one time each year...unbelievable story line...try not to miss this one
THIS IS ONE OF MY ALL-TIME FAVORITES.EARLY CHRISTIAN BALE-- GREAT ACTOR!
Story was delightful.  I like war pictures like this.  Movie night with a friend and a good story.  Very touching movie.
This is one of those films that not everyone enjoys.  It was such an improvement over the DVD copy we've had all these years.
This is a gripping story of one young boy's experience during this very tumultuous time in Chinese history. Christian Bale was excellent in this.
Great story and i really enjoyed the acting in this movie.  This is a movie for the whole family. Buy it!
An amazing performance from Christopher Bale when he was a  child.  Beautifully filmed and a story told extremely well.  A classic.
A wonderful story that grips and holds your attention. A dynamic story well worth the read. Enjoyed his storytelling style.
Great movie and a great story very touching, real life Chris Bale great acting, Real story that happen during WWll
Christian Bale gives the best performance of his career in this movie in MHO. One of my all time favorite movies and will watch again
Excellent Spielberg film that I (think) debuts Christian Bale's acting as a young boy--one of my favorite movies of all time!!
A classic movie and christian bale to boot. I love a good steven spielberg movie to help me remember why I like movies.
Always liked this movie and wanted my own copy of it, finally got around to buying it.  Good quality BRay, plays well.
Wonderful movie. The little boy is played by the person who is now Batman. He does a wonderful job. I highly recommend this movie
this review is on the blu ray disc of the movie -movie- 5 / 5video- 5 / 5audio- 5 / 5great great great blu ray transfer.a must have...
From the  first time I saw this movie, I knew I'd be watching it over and over. A WWII era theme and great music...what more would I need?
I enjoyed this movie when it first came out, and after all this time I still find it interesting and well worth watching.
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1987! Had to add it to my collection.
A Beautiful Piece of Art. Long, but worth it. I had seen it before many years ago and enjoyed it as much the 2nd time around.
very happy
This DVD is great, has lots of features, the movie is quiet long but you wont regret. comes in a hard see through box.
I would highly recommend this movie to everyone. I had visited China and really wanted to compare what I had seen when there.
First of all, the music. Second of all, the beautiful photography and detailsin costumes. Having lived in China I have an interest in its past.
I love the ending when the old man renounces God and then instantly gets killed!D'OH!!!!
I love this old stuff. It's fun, silly, nostalgic, adds variety, takes me back in time. My husband and I liked it.
I was very surprised of how much I loved this one! It is a lot of fun and it has a cool little story. Do not hesitate!
I've been waiting for years for this to come out on DVD. I've even seen it for over $100 on VHS and now it's finally here! Well worth the money.
not a family movie violent activities murders adult type action movie this would be R rated more than likely good crime movie
My husband is a big James Woods fan - he even met him this past summer!  I was so glad to find this older title available, he loved it!
Saw this movie years ago and loved it. Wish I could buy and download to watch on my Kindle Fire when internet not available.
Great Total boby workout with an optional rewind for longer aerobics, only if you want.Awesome production, very classy, and IT WORKS! Love it.
I 'd seen this before when I was in middle East.loved this DVD. really good  for all over the body toning.Worth to recommend to everyone.
its a great routine ,makes you sweat and get in shape, I love the firm work outs  its worth a try.
This is a great video! I used this along with the other volumes (1-6) in the total body series. I highly recommened that you START OUT SLOWLY!
Among one of our favorite movies!  Directed by Robert Redford.  Great cinematography and great story!  Many of the characters are actual townspeople.
We enjoyed watching it in English, then I watched it in Spanish.Anne SticklesIt is a goood movie and very enjoyable
Great movie. As a resident of New Mexico, I love movies that depict the people and natural beauty of this state in such a wonderful manner.
Have been in love with this movie since it came out in theaters many years ago.  Could sit through another two hours if the movie was to go on.
this is a great movie. very enjoyable. i love it and wish more people could enjoy it like me.
This is a great, "feel good" movie.  I ordered one for myself and one for a friend.  The DVD's were brand new and arrived within a few days.
This is one of my favorite movies.  Robert Redford s first director. I think the name Milagro should tell it all.
The music is good and the story captivating.  It's an old movie but one I could see again!  I would recommend it for certain.
Having grown up in the area where this was filmed, it brought back many memories.  I really enjoyed this movie.
I certainly hope you will die soon and &#34;Does anyone win one of these?&#34;  A wonderful cast and ensemble. Holds up very well.
News on tv, throught he stories of a producer, an anchor and a reporter.I loved both the film and the extras!
The very best of MM , I good buy. I love this movie. This Movie all of Berline's best works
I have love this movie from the day I first saw it and not for the reason most. I am a Johnny Ray Fan.
Great show. It was just as good now as it was the first time I saw it.
If you like musicals don't forget to pick this one up.  loved it 30 years ago  on TV and love it better on bluray.  even my 8 year old loves it
This movie is great! Marilyn Monroe was a good actress in her early years. Very good story line. Would recommend it to anyone.
An exciting musical with a cast the type that would be impossible to put together in the same film.  The same old story but well presented.
One of the best movies made with a touch of nostalgia and memories that helped to make the movie enjoyable.
Saw tis movie years ago with my sister.  Liked it then and wanted to see it again.  Just as good the second, third and fourth time.
I Loved the story ... The little girl coming to young man that kids picked on .. He showed them. Great Suspense too!! I Loved Every part of Movie.
Thanks for having this in stock.  My sisters and I enjoyed this movie back when it came out and were estatic when we found it on line.  Thanks.
I love a good ghost story and this one is both chilling and funny.  It hits the mark for best highly overlooked films.
in the world is the Blu Ray release of this excellent film?  So much dreck has been re-released in Blu Ray wile this film sits on the shelf.
It was a &#34;cute&#34; movie as my wife said. I am glad I watched it with her. Anyone who has lived near the Finger Lakes area in Upstate NY should
This is my all time favorite scary movie.  It is kind of slow but does keep you on the edge of your seat.
An excellent movie with superior acting with a real meaasge.If you haven't seen it - you must!!!
I really love this one! The ending is very sad!
I am frantic to get enough time to watch this movie! I am a Harrison Ford fan and I am sure I will enjoy this movie also!
Gamera is really neat, he is made of turtle meat, we are eating  gamera.....
SAME AS ALL MY REVIEWS ON THIS MISS MARPLE SERIES. ALL ARE GREAT AND JOAN HICKSON IS THE BEST MARPLE EVER.
THIS IS OUR VERY FAVORITE MISS MARPLE. IT IS THE ONE THAT GOT US HOOKED ON HICKSON AS MISS MARPLE. THE STORY LINE HAS A LOT OF TWIST. GREAT STORY.
Classic Roger Corman Alien ripoff that starred Robert Englund, Sid Haig, and Joanie from Happy Days with a set made by James Cameron.
Great Movie to any horror collection.  Going to make a perfect gift for our horror movie buff in the family.
On Friday The 13th, Jason will meet his match.Great movie. Bad dvd. The dvd has no real features.This film is presented in a widescreen format.
A typical Jason movie, with all the galore & sexy women one could hope for. A must see for Friday The 13th fans.
I have watched all of the Jason movies still creepy thanks dealer.
3 stars for scariness, but I like this movie. You get to see Jason without his mask for a long time! Love it, just love it.
As expected, James Spader did a great job. The movie kept you on the edge of your seat til the end. Was well worth the money.
This movie was a real sleeper and is still as good as I remember it.  Thanks for a quality product.
What can I say. It got here fast, plays like it should and I have no complaints. I love this movie. Awesome!
This film can hold up even in today's horror film market! I remember seeing this film in 1989 ans was like, &#34;Wow!&#34; Awesome story!
I seen this movie and loved it. So I got it for my son. He really like the movie and still talks about it
A great zombie movie based on a book .  It is a true story.  It is Wes Craven at his best.
there is no plot and all the sequences seem to be leading somewhere but there is no end, no destination.
This is  a very funny movie.The tunes are GREAT,  as one may remember from the album,"MAGICAL MYSTERY TOUR".
the magical mystery tour is a great movie.  fun to watch. performance is very good.  I would buy this again.
While the cinematography and resolution are not the finest, this was truly a trip down memory lane.
This DVD is not the best as far as the story line but the music will always be the greatest bt the Beatles.
Again as I have said, Alan Autry showed he can make any role work.  Although I thought, He should have been saved.
Excellent movie. A classic for Le Carre' fans. Black and white helps with this genre.
Good story line, good acting.I like all the John LeCarre books and have this one as well...the movie mirrored the book.
John Le Carre is the king of spy novels. This is movie that catches the time, plot and atmosphere of the book just great
Richard Burton gives an unparalleled performance. And you thought Daniel Day-Lewis was spectacular?  Check this out. You won't regret it.
excellent classic, worth collecting...
This movie is like a spirit rain. It refreshes the spirit.I feel closer to the Lord by owning the Rainmaker.
This was a good film and great performances all around! They re-mastering is superb! If you like this film..Get it!
Incredible class movie, a favorite of ours!  We watch it often for there is so much to learn in the behavior of 2 brothers.
Spencer Tracey is superb as is a young Robert Wagner. Interestiing story of the strugle of each persons morals. A great movie.
Great Movies! One of my favorite Spencer Tracy movies along with Old Man of the Sea and Devil at 4 O'clock.
My husband liked this movie so much he said he had to have it if ever came out on DVD.  He likes Sidney Poltler.  Good additon to collection
ONE OF BEST EXITING MOVIES OF ALL TIMES FULL OF ACTIONYOU HAVE THIS DVD YOU MUST KEEP IT BECAUSE ITS THAT GOOD
shoot to kill one of my favorite movies with tom berringer and sidney potier. a must watch if u are a fan of both actors
Who doesn't like Sidney Poitier?  I loved the scene with the bear.  Both men are true to their own environment.
Great movie, good value for the money. Great movie, good value for the money. Tom & Kirstie were gorgeous! Thanks.
This is a really cute Disney DVD that children love to watch and sing a long with. It is very entertaining for children of all ages.It is a hit,
For all of us who wish to remember the magic of Christmas and snow and the pals of the neighborhood.
This is a great Christmas video. A must see. The video arrived ahead of time and was in great shape.
I love to watch Christmas celebrated around the world, and very pleased to have this one in my collection. Put a log on the fire and enjoy!
Fantastic film.  A favorite to watch year after year.  Great if you liked "A Christmas Story" and one the whole family should enjoy.
I had the newer version and wanted to see if the original was as good and thankfully I loved both versions of the DVD's.
FANTASTIC FILM NOIR...IDA LUPINO AND ROBERT RYAN KEEP THE TENSION HOT AND THE EMOTIONS HIGH IN THE CLOSED QUARTERS OF HOUSE
This is James Caan at his best.  No one is better than Jimmy.  This is one of the Top Ten Western movies of all time.  I love the low key gunfight.
very slow in developing plot line but a still a wonderful movie. this is an Angela and john Huston must see.
EVEN,. . . For those of us who spent time inand around the area of S A I G O N,This movie is a genuine "Flashback"
Good script.  Good actors.  Exciting action.Too bad it's so expensive on DVD.
This movie is an all time cult classic B movie.  What a hoot!!!
This a great movie to watch. It was really good. I love watching Melanie and her co-star falling in love in this movie.
This is an awesome movie that nobody seems to know about. One of my favorites so I am glad to find it on Amazon.
a well made movie about a man trying to replace his broken robot. Set in the future when things were bad.
this is a good movie based off a book with short stories it won me over the director is on my top 5 list
this movie is superb about 3 men having to take care of a little baby.  they all do the dirty jobs.
A, great DVD, very light, feel good Movie, great actors also. Buy it you won't be disappointed, it's great & funny
I watched this movie on a airplane one time. Liked the movie enought to buy it to see the whole thing. Its a make you feel good type of movie.
It was brand new as stated and received very quickly.  This is one of my favorite 80's movie with Tom Selleck.
This is the cutest movie. I just love it. I have seen it several times and still enjoy it. Thanks!
One of the best movies ever. NOT FOR CHILDREN. The language was bad but the story was good.  :) I liked it.
Hilarious!  Brings back wonderful and yet funny memories of fatherhood. A great trio of men who can adlib and play off each other wonderfully
This movie was pretty much like Kickboxer,he fights a dude that hurts his friend.This and Kickboxer are me top fav Van Damne movie ever.
Package arrived on time in all original packing. This was my grandfather's favorite movie and i'm glad to have this dvd in my collection.
If you're going to purchase this movie, you've probably already seen it and are a Van Damme fan. Great movie, great buy.
A great fighting movie!  Fight scenes, fighters, music and even the cheesy acting/story are all great!
VAN DAMME is awesome in this one..really good fight scenes..good story lines with good acting always go together..
It's a real shame this hasn't been released on DVD.  An outstanding film that deserves to be in a decent format.
Excellent Classic, one of my favorite stories as a child. A hollywood drama of the time an entertaining movie to watch.
Debbie Reynolds and James Garner are in the top of their form in this romp.  Pure Debbie Reynolds - you can't lose with her in the top spot.
I remember seeing this one as a teenager.  A great pairing of Garner and Reynolds, and a must for comedy collectors of the Sixties comedies.
this movie is funnier than the 1st one,adopting a baby girl to start a family & loses money,wife now works
Dudley and Liza together again is amust see..Very satisfied.
Order it today you will love it. this is a funny movie and the cast is great its one you will watch from now on
Highly recommend.  Shipper was very fast. What can one say about a 80's Horror flick.  Recommend shipper for speed and packaging.
Great Copy and still watch it today. Looking for more classic slasher flicks from this era. The Film is well preserved.
got my dvd very quick, and the dvd works great.  my grandkids are very happy with this dvd. thank you.
this is an oldie but goody. wish it was on dvd but it isn't. we bought the vhs because that is all that is available. much better than not at all.
Highly improbable, but wonderfully entertaining!!
This movie harkens back to the days when monsters had a little personality and a lot of zippers!  &#34;Classic&#34; is too small a word for this gem!
I enjoyed this original movie more than the remake.  I am attached to the original movies from childhood.  I will watch it again.
Great B movie with really bad special effects and dubbing. So bad it is good. Mindless movie for a rainy day'
GREAT PRICE GREAT MOVIE IT'S ALWAYS GOOD TO HAVE THE GOOD OLD CARTOONS TO FALL BACK ON AND SHOW YOUR CHILDREN.
I have enjoyed this DVD.  My daughter really loves it.  It was her favorite growing up.  It's a holiday keeper.
have loved this movie for years and am glad to have found it on amazon.....This is such a cute movie for any time of the year....thanks
This is a classic favorite of mine, I will enjoy it year after year.  Great bargain and very good quailty item.
I only had this on VHS, but no longer had VHS player. CDs areMy daughter and I like the 'razzleberry pudding' song best.
This is a fun version of A Christmas Carol. Some of the music is really funny - adds a different dimension to the story.
My Grandson is very happy with is gift this Christmas, he has watched it over and over again so I'm very happy.
Watching Mr Magoo brings back many memories.  A fun movie and the music is sweet
Brings back alot of memerios when I was a kid watching with my dad. Now I watch it with my son who likes it.
Mr. Magoo's Christmas Carol is a timeless holiday classic.  This is a wonderful nostalgic cartoon that the whole family will enjoy...year after year.
Voice of Jim Backus and some great songs, as well.  A Cliffs Notes version of the Christmas Carol classic that leaves you smiling.
This is a favorite from childhood.  The magic hasn't faded.  The music and lyrics say it all.  &#34;Magoo you've done it again!&#34;
This is a clean classic Christmas movie and an absolute must have..over all i would HIGHLY recommend this item
It was nice to watch an old favorite of mine. I haven't seen it since I was a kid. It arrived in excellent condition and I have no complaints.
This is one of my most favorite Christmas cartoons.  I remember watching this when it was on TV back in the early 60's.
what else can u say about our lovable magoo. u gotta get this one if ur into Christmas flicks. yes, even in florida.
What a great Christmas gift to myself. I grew up watching Mr Magoo and was so happy to have this in my collection of DVDs
I.ve enjoyed this cartoon since I was little. Jim Backus does an excellent job as Mr. Scrooge. One the whole famuly can watch and enjoy!
Jim Backus at his finest acting, a delightful Christmas story the whole family should set down and enjoy together, a should buy movie for Christmas
There is no better Christmas video (IMHO)!  We grew up with this and, of course, Rudolph the Red Nosed Reindeer.
Why I chose it.....be cause I like it...see the 5 Stars ! Would I recommend it...if the like MAGOO then yes I would .
Old time classics are still my favorite.  This is one I watched as a child. I may be dating myself, but I like to watch them more than my kids!
I call myself The Queen of Movies, and I really enjoyed watching this movie, and plan to watch  it again soon!
This special takes me back. I have not seen it since I was a kid. I was surprised how good it was and how much I still liked it. The music is great.
They never show this on TV anymore. Growing up, they showed it every season. It has good music and good &#34;acting&#34;
Another fun Christmas movie. Jim Backcus is excellent as Mr Magoo playing Mr. Scrooge. I'm delighted to have it in my collection.
Great bluray release I always loved this and. My kids got a kick out of this version. The songs are great and entertaining.
Mr Magoo as Ebenezer Scrooge is priceless.  I have loved this since my children were tiny and I was young!
Do you remember Mr. Magoo?  If so, you'll probably want this classic in your DVD collection!
I have always enjoyed Mr. Magoo's Christmas Carol and recommended for all ages,especially cartoon fans and Mr. Magoo has incredible humor.
Nice packaging and a perfect print!  Nice extras too! Hopefully the same attention will be given to the RANKIN/BASS specials one day on BLU RAY!
I enjoyed watching this on my kindle fire, it was one of my favorites as a child, haven't seen it on TV in decades
So glad to see this video as it is a truly special Christmas Classic that was missing from TV for many, many years.
One of my all time favorites. You can never go wrong with Mr. Magoo. It was great sharing it with my grandchildren
Very good movie i watched all these movies when i was young and liked them then and still like now.
well worth the wait, Phan 1 and 2 are the best in my opinion,, 4 is very underrated also. the price and quality are top.
A great scary, if campy, film. The Tall Man is back, freakier than ever. The upgrade in quality is fantastic via Bluray.
Outstanding old horror movie part of a great series. It was great back when it came out and in my opinion it has stood the test of time (&#60;:
This is a classic movie. was pretty scary back in the day and is still the same today . not for kids. arrived on time .
I love this item and it came to me fast in the mail. I really enjoy it and works great with no problem at all.
Had been to Louvre before, but husband had not!  Showed him this older movie and it showed history of building along with important exhibits!
Good story and entertaining.  Well acted.  Enjoyable.  Patrick Swayze is good in his role.  Piper Laurie is great as the mother.
this is a great movie. patrick swayze was a great actor and played in alot of good movies. he will be greatly missed.
What a fine action film this is! Probably the best of it's kind ever make. Others may disagree, but in our book it's tops.
Bruce Willis is one of my favorite actors.  He never disappoints me!  The action is fast and exciting.  I love it.
Bruce wills is always a great actor. i'd watch this again and again and again. Watch the next episode and see how his children have grown
I have always loved this movie, and judging by the fact it still is not yet a free rental, so have many others.
Good movie had no problems receiving it! If your a Bruce Willis fan these are some of the best movies of his career in my opinion.
One of the best action movies of all time. Great at Christmas or anytime. A true classic, better than the sequels.
This is probably the best action packed movie of all time. "Welcome to the party pal".
I chose this rating because this movie is awesome.  I like the quality of the movie.  I would recommend this to anyone who likes action movies.
This movie is a great compromise on a Saturday night.  My husband loves the action and I love Alan Rickman.
The first of the series, it was always the best...as old as it is, I can't believe Amazon Prime doesn't make it free, however...
I have seen everything he's done, what more is there to say? He will still be kicking butt when he's 80. I'd like to see him do some more comedy.
The first of a series is always the best.  Willis is funny and always pulls off his deeds of destruction.
This is a must have for any action movie lover.  It's a great action movie that you can get away with calling a Holiday classic...
I have enjoyed every one of the Die Hard movies, including the newest one at the theater.  Love the action and the fun moments.
Was great when it came out and still a classic after 25 years.  Alan Rickman is just wonderful.  Great bad guy
It's a classic and the actors are superb.  A unique kind of Christmas movie and great entertainment with some memorable one liners.
I love this movie, its awesome, its my favorite movie of all of the Die Hard ones,this movie is a must-have for any Bruce Willis fan too.
really like this one - had the VHS but no more VCR.  this whole series is good, even the newer ones.
I keep going back to Die Hard every Christmas.  It just never gets old.  I'd far prefer this movie than Miracle on 42nd Street. :)
and Christmassy as all git out.  In a moment of weakness it has a go at Philadelphia, but otherwise a good flick.
It really was a great movie. Bruce Willis is excellent in it. I've also seen Live Free and Die Hard. I can't wait to see the rest of them.
Best movie ever. Will recommend to others. This was given to my brother as a gift which he loved it.
Who doesn't love Die Hard - I'm watching with my teenagers now to bring them up to speed on all of the classics :)
Foreshadowing clues make this movie one that I love to watch, especially as I recount how small incidents can pack such punches in our lives.
The movie was in excellent condition.  What can you say about Bruce Willis as John? NOTHING--it's the same John and getting in trouble.  Thanks
Best of the series. classic Bruce Willis. Funny, action packed. Great holiday flick with some classic lines. Would recommend to all!
my favorite action movie and a great bluray transfer for a movie that came out 24 years ago.this movie will always have a special place in my heart.
Yes, it's true. This is one of our family favorites. Especially at Christmas. It's because that's the only time we are all together.
This IS one of the best action movies ever!  A definite must see, especially with a couple of friends and a beer in hand!
Hands down the most perfect action flick ever made!
My superhero is in this movie. How foretelling the movie is. I like the action. All thumbs up. Alright Rad
Love the die hard movies,this completes my collection.Lots of action,comedy,always comes out on top.Bruce Willis is a great actor.Like all hismovies.
This is the first of the series with Bruce Willis.  Great movie, lots of action,violence and language.  Not for children.
Saw this movie when I was a teenager. Always loved to watch Natalie Wood and Steve McQueen. I watched it twice this time.
This is my all time favorite movie. Natalie Wood and Steve McQueen are great in it. It's a love story of the time.
Natalie Wood and Steve McQueen are timeless in this classic. After not being able to find it elsewhere we downloaded it from Amazon. Thank you!.
Steve McQueen and Natalie Wood are excellent in this movie. I really enjoyed it. Good movie from two of the best actors
My favorite Movie of all in the World thank you for having it available for us especially me. Thank you
Love this movie it's a very interesting light hearted love story about a confused man and en even more confused woman who end up falling in love.
I love this movie,it has a nice pace,and I love the different ,the asain women are so pretty with the long black silky hair.
I saw this about 30 years ago and loved it; the second viewing was not a disappointment.  A timeless film ahead of its time.
A film i have loved from teenage years and being able to understand the deception that beautiful girls go to enabling them to support a family
I love this film and that is whey it is considered a classic. A must see, for me a must own.
The acting was great.  The script was well written.  The cinematography was suburb.  You will like this movie a lot.
This is a great movie.  I taped it on VHS years ago.  I wanted the DVD.
Interesting story line and great food.  Have found the recipes for the dishes in this movie............. including the turtle soup.
A very good movie. I love Babette's quote, &quot;An Artist Is Never Poor.&quot;
This is one of my favorite movies. Although getting use to English subtitles with French language took some time, it was worth it.
Superb movie.  Not for thrill seekers, but the more philosophically inclined.  Knowing Danish helps, but the subtitles are good.
This is a wonderful story for children, young or old.  My daughter loved it and still loves it now that shes grown.  I love it too!  FIVE STARS!!!!!
Buy this DVD!!!One of the cutest movies out there for the whole family...For big kids and the little ones!ADORABLE!
I always loved this movie me and my sister we were talking about it we always have much fun looking at this.
m a c a n d m e  g r e a t f o r t h e k i ds cool
My grandchilden and I just love the dvd. We have worn out two of the "Mac and Me" dvd this year all ready. It is the best movie.
I have always liked Charleton Heston, this movie was really good.very historical and i liked the story very much. i watch it a lot
I have the original with Paul Schofield but love Charleton Heston and he did not disappoint.  Recommend it for movie lovers and history lovers.
Charlton Heston makes the times and circumstances surrounding the untimely death of Sir Thomas Moore by Henry the VIII so very easy to understand.
Finally broke down and bought it. The acting is not the best and the story is a bit sugary sweet, but Preston Tucker's story inspires me.
excellent and entertaining, never knew about the story before seeing the film, good message to pass on about not giving up on a dream
Great story about a real person. Jeff bridges is excellent in this role. Just luv him. Very inspiring story you will enjoy it.
It is too bad this car never made it.  America could use such a reliable vehicle today.
We should have had the big 4 Tucker was cheated. And he made good car.
This was an amazing movie. It was clean. It was riveting, it was a movie worth seeing again and again.
Great family friendly entertaining historical drama / comedy.  Will watch again.  Only thing yo worry with kids are the brief accident shots
Wonderful adaptation of a great man's quest for the &#34;All-American Car&#34;.  This should be shown to kids in schools today.
A great American story--both frustrating and inspiring and very well made.  I do wish I had one of those cars!
and on point. In three words, &#34;A must see!&#34; Good screenplay, good plot line, great acting. You won't regret taking your time to see this one.
My son loved it , he is just 9 yrs old.Kids need to know few things happen in past can sal made to happen in future.
This movie should be shown in our schools. Excellent movie. Excellent lesson in how America has been declining since after WWII.
I ALWAYS ENJOYED HIS MOVIES!  MY HUSBAND REALLY LIKES THIS MOVIE BECAUSE HE IS A CAR AFICIONADO!  SO I REALLY ENJOY WATCHING IT WITH HIM!
Have loved this movies for years when I could find it in DVD format I grabbed itLove Lindsay Wagner  and it's a great story line
I love this because it is so easy to get involved in it. It always makes me wonder what I would choose if this ever happened to me.
Love this movie very much.  I had had this on VHS and came across it when we were cleaning the tapes out to get rid of.  so I wanted this on DVD.
loved it and would recommend it for those who like to dream of what could have been had they gone in the earlier years to live
This wonderful movie needs to be released on DVDso it can be appreciated by a new generation.
A movie with a wonderful plot. Kept me trying to figure out how it would end. A exceptionally enjoyabe movie from beginning to end.Thank You
Marc and Lindsay has such great chemistry.  The ending was so beautiful.  It took my breath away.  This is such a beautiful love story.
This movie kept me in suspense. I cried at the ending because Jennie found her true love and went for it. The ending tells all. Beautiful
I saw this movie years ago I love Somewhere in Time and this is a nice go along movie I am glad I purchased this movie.
I love this movie and am glad to be able to get it on DVD, but wish widescreen and English closed caption was an option.
You have a horrible childhood!  This needs to be in everyone's collection!  Love this movie and watch it consistently!  Never gets old!!
Thanks for the great DVD. We are enjoying it. It was in great shape, quick shipping and the item was exact ally as described in the ad
This movie will keep you laughing from the begining to the very end ..this a excellent movie for Eddie Murphy
Eddie Murphy makes the funniest movies. I love how he can dress up and be almost all the characters and the movies be so funny .
in this one.  No matter how many times I watch this movie I never get tired of it.  It is a good one to have for any collection.
Coming to America is am all time classic. Non stop laughter from beginning to end. Also the Blu-ray extras =shed new light on the movie.
This movie should have a warning on it stating : Will cause you to laugh uncontrollibly. No need to explain the movie, its just a comic classic.
This is one of Eddie Murphy's all time best.  It's a movie that I never get tired of, especially when I need a gut busting laugh!!
The era when Eddie and Arsenio were at their best, well Eddie still cracks me up but this is one of the movies that helped him really get rolling!
Really! We are talking about Eddie Murphy!  This movie is funny as hell period! Eddie is the master of comedy! Everyone should own this movie baby!
Just recently saw this movie again, this is a cute family movie.  I enjoyed it.
Eddie Murphy is at his best in this classic comedy.  They don't come much better than Coming To America.
Really one funny movie!  My favorite scenes are obviously the Soul Glow scenes. JUST LET YOUR SOUL GLOW... JUST LET IT SHINE THROUGH!
Just clean and refreshing! The way movies were made back when.
Extremely funny and in my opinion, Eddie Murphy's best movie out there.
I don't ever get tired if watching this movie. I've purchased the DVD and I just can't get enough of this movie love it
Funny, and fast paced movie. Lots of action, Nude scenes (brief) not for the children. Adult entertainment. I forgot about the &#34;R&#34; rating.
EDDIE MURPHY DOESN'T DISAPPOINT IN THIS ONE.  HE'S SO TALENTED AND SO VERY FUNNY.  WE WATCH THIS ONE OFTEN AND LAUGH EVERY TIME.
i haven't seen this movie in years and I just watched it again and I can definitely say that this movie was still awesome after all this time!
Seriously who doen't like this movie?!?!  This is another one of those movies that everytime I pass it on tv I stop and watch.  Hilarious.
Eddie Murphy is one the best comedians out there and the funniest of this is one the best movies is has ever done love it.
Laughing in the aisles watching Eddie play at least 10 characters in this film.  Poor little rich boy.  Hilarious as always
Definitely one to have in any DVD library, classic Eddie Murphy
It's a comedy, It's light hearted and Funny.  The family has watched it more than once when  comedy relief was in order.
i LOVED THIS MOVIE.EDDIE MURPHY IS SO FUNNY AND A GOOD ACTOR.I DEFIANTLY RECOMMEND THIS FOR EVERYONE.A MUST SEE FOR MOVIE LOVERS.
One of my favorite Eddie Murphy movies of all time.  I love the parody on the McDonald's franchise.  McDowell's: Home of the Big Mic!
A Classic funny movie with a excellent cast a love story with prime time Eddie Murphy a laugh a clean funny movie I really enjoyed it !!!
Eddie Murphy's best. (when he was still funny)
This was always a favorite of mines. The picture was nice and clear and the sound was very good. Good  movie for Eddie Murphy fans,
I GAVE THIS AS A CRISTMAS  GIFT IT IS A GREAT MOVIE EDDIE MURPHY IS A GREAT  ACTOR  AND I LIKE THE ART WORK.
been years since I first saw this movie, again it was as funny as the first time I saw it!!
How could you not love Coming To America.  Classic movie, classic Eddie Murphy, Classic James Earl Jones. LOVE LOVE LOVE!!!!!
My husband loves this movie.  He watches it way too much.  Everytime we have company he brings this movie out to share with guests.
I remember this movie from chilhood. So funny and rich. Absolutely loved it. Still fun to watch even now 2012.
All of the Crocodile Dundee movies are great fun!!! The Australian people in the movie are just like the real thing!!!
great movie, just as great as the first one and love the plot and paul hogan as crocodile dundee! yAs
We've got all three Dundee movies on DVD.  They're well written, well acted, and enjoyable to watch.  Good family entertainment.
This product arrived in excellent condition and very speedy service.  I'm very satisfied with this product.
Great movie and one of the few sequels that were as good as the first.
i have really enjoyed watching both Paul Logan and his wife in their movies, and I would buy this again.
A fun follow up to first outing. Nothing very challenging. Just plain fun, and the bad guys get it in the end, as they should.
Love ALL these 3 movies!!! Wish he had made more of these and I would have bought them too!! Crocodile Dundee in LA is great too!
I love these movies. a good price on DVD with Closed Captioned. replaces my VHS copy from Cable that has no CC, which I need more now.
This is my favorite of the 3 Crocodile Dundee movies! Lots of action and adventure with a twist at the end--fun!
It is an action adventure film, where the girl friend is threatened and Crocodile Dundee goes to the rescue.  Very entertaining.
A boy and a horse clash with greedy and dishonest adults. They go off into the sea and one hopes they find a better place (rather than dying).
I love everything about this movie. It's well made and my favorite actors are in it.  It's an adventure and a laugh.
I always liked this movie. De Niro is a riot along with a great cast. Owned a VHS tape and just ordered a DVD; this movie is a keeper!
This is easily one of the 10 best films of the 80s.  As a comedy or an action flick, or even a drama, it's near-perfect.
I WATCH THIS MOVIE OVER AND OVER WHEN I WANT A GOOD LAUGH ... GRAET STORY LINE WITH PLENTY OF ACTION AND COMEDY WITH A PERFECT MIX.
It has action, comedy & a good story.  The acting is great as well.  It's a thoroughly enjoyable movie & I did enjoy it.
Very entertaining film which was serious in spots and very funny in others.  Robert DeNiro was great and the elusive Charles Groden was cleaver.
MY SON LOVED THIS MOVIE. HE ENJOYED IT VERY MUCH. HE THOUGHT IT WAS VERY FUNNY. THANK YOU VERY MUCH.
deniro & grodin make a hilarious pair as they travel across the country.  dodging good guys and bad guys, finally.
I have watched this movie at least 20 times . great action although the movie. Dinero at his best,great actor.
Love watching this movie!  The actors/actresses are excellent and the movie leaves me feeling good with a lot of laughter.
Very of its time, but still very funny.  However , it took ,me a moment to remember I had watched it when Amazon email appeared
Funny and entertaining.  I love DeNiro in this and Grodin has such a dry, witty sense of humor in this.  I can watch this over and over.
Its fun when the character goes through un believable situations and comes out on top both actors are my favorite, Great Stuff
This movie has it all, humor, drama, adventure, love, hate, good, evil, everything. A MUST see movie!!!
Once again Charles Grodin has chosen his movie scripts well! He brightens the movie screen and brings to life a movie worth seeing.
Just the most fun to watch these two characters!  An all time favorite!
DeNiro and Grodin are great together. Many unexpected twists and turns during movie.  DeNiro fans who have never seen this one should enjoy it.
an absolute classic.  great entertainment if you haven't seen it
A lot of great comedy and singing in this movie! And of course Chico is always worth a watch to see him play the piano!
This is a great film.There is nothing but hillarious comedy in this.You  will enjoy every minute of this gem.
Got my dvd way ahead of schedule.  Brand new and not damaged or anything.  No problems here. Now I will enjoy it and laugh.
Hard to find.  Very funny and uplifting.
I was very excited to find out this movie had been made into a DVD...I have it on VHS....good movie...excellent condition...fast dlvry...thank you
I loved it when I was little and I still do :) The movie is funny and your enjoy it.
This has always been one of my favoriet movies and was glad to get it at such a reasonable price.
This is two young women blending their strong suits to outwit the men and prove they belong in the FBI.
This movie cracked me up. I have watched it over and over and I am waiting to buy it on DVD. This is a great movie to watch with your friends.
I have waited forever for this to go to DVD good clean humor that makes you want to roll on the floor
This is a a great comedy. wonderful acting and plot. Very funny can watch it over and over. You will not be disappointed.
This film is a must see...And hopefully, it will be available on DVD as soon as someone realizes how wonderful it is!
Having seen this film many decades ago, I was thrilled to finally have a copy of my own. Great film with two remarkable performances.
It brings back memories of how much fun this film is. Loved it. Glad it's in my library. Great acting between the main stars.
A classic film which seems to me to be as current today as it was when released.
GREAT CAST SHOWS THE BEHIND THE SCENES DRAMA OF REALLY HAPPENS IN WASHINGTON POLITICS, LAUGHTON WITH A SOUTHERN DRAWL GREAT.
One of the best political films I've seen.. lots of great behind the scenes shots, filmed during the Kennedy administration
I have watched this movie at least 10 times and the first one,&#34; Topper &#34;even more. I never get tired of this good old movies.
Great old comedy with a great cast, great line's and fast paced movie, never a dull moment in this movie well worth your time.
It's an old movie which has been colorized.  Old fashion special tricks to depick ghostly happenings.  Very enjoyable.
The original movie was great and this was just as good. I love old movies I'll watch them numerous times over and over my tv stays on TCM daily
A fun movie for a stay inside day. I really enjoyed it! Topper movies are one of my favorite series.
its ok the the movie is fine i am enjoying the movie sorry for that it is good i love it....
This is a classic movie that has excellent acting for its time & is just priceless. It was a wonderful purchase & it watched over & over.
I love this video and have owned it for year. Great introduction to chakras and has wonderful meditations with beautiful visuals.
This is one for everyone's collection, a true classic.  Comedy, tragedy and social commentary all in one!  Great dialogue and directing!
Sort of a play on an older fairy tale about a world traveler, though this might be missed by many of the viewers.
One of the great screwball comedies of the 1940s directed by a master of the genre and showing off the talents of two underrated stars.
I'll gladly recommend this product to all my friends and family members! Beautiful piece of work.  Well done! Thanks
this is so funny
I love this movie, I was roll on floor laugher. This very very funny. It old movie but it great moive
This is another one of my fav's I love Bette Midler. Great movie never boring
There are a great cast of characters in this and they keep you laughing!  I am so glad I made this purchase!  :)
Bette midler and Lily Tomlin.  Why on Earth would you need a review. It is as fabulous as one would expect!!
what a fun sweet movie this is.  Bette and Lily are incredible together.  This is a fun one to watch with my kids. Safe viewing and a fun story line
This is one of the funniest and most underrated movie of all time. It is a great, hilarious show with many great stars.
This is one of my all-time favorite parings. Bette and Lilly are great comic duo. Had me wishing for more.
This is a great little movie with Bette Midler and Lily Tomlin.  I can watch it over and over.  It arrived promptly and in great condition.
I love bette midler all her movies are so funny and this one is just as great as the others
Great movie, watched it growing up and always loved it. Only had it on VHS so now I can enjoy it on Blueray!
I enjoyed this movie, it's fun to watch I think Bette Midler and Lily Tomlin play well off each other.
Funny story line put together with great actresses made for good entertainment that a mixed audience could watch and enjoy
You can't go wrong with this all-star comedy. It is a unique double-down fun time. Don't even pause to think - just watch it!
I love Bette and Lily together.  It was great to see this movie again after so many years.  Still enjoyed it as much as I did the first time.
If you haven't seen this movie you really need to. It has been a favorite of mine since I was little. Bette and Lily are hilarious.
Bette Midler ad Lily Tomlin are great. Each portrays a set of twins mixed up at birth and the results when they find each other. a very funny movie.
Ordered this for my special needs daughter.  She will only watch VHS and then only movies she saw when she was a teenager.  I appreciate the shipment
I saw this on cable when I was a kid and I have always loved it.  J2 Communications where is the DVD for this great movie?
I did not purchase this movie.  I have however seen it.  Ryan O'Neal, Anne Archer, and Omar Sharif are fantastic in the movie.
this the version of this story keep you on the edge all the way and show the good never get what they what
I use this movie after the students have read The Great Gatsby. The students really enjoy this interpretation of Fitzgerald's classic!
I'm a big Gatsby fan.....this version of the movie didn't get much respect, but I loved it then and still do today. Pretty faithful to the book, too!
The Great Gatsby was a very good movie!  But then, it has to be because it has Robert Redford in it.
Charming in every aspect.  Redford at his best.
I recently saw the modernized version of this film; which is very good.  So I wanted to watch this classic version just for old times sake.
The movie is great  Now we will see new make up to compare to the old and thanks it was excellent condition
This is a gift to compliment the new great gatsby movie I got as a gift as well. I bought this based on other buyers reviews.
i love this one because of robert redford the clothes are great and so is the acting and mia farrow is good to
Good acting and delightful film.  LOVE is all consuming.  I hope that more people get to watch and enjoy this adorable film.
This is truly a classic movie!  Robert Redford and Mia Farrow are superb in their roles....their acting outperforms the Leonardo version by far.
This version is as good as the new version with DiCapri.  It follows the book line and a little closer.  Loved it.
Robert Redford is great in the lead role as Gatsby.  Totally close to the book.  An amazing story of class, romance, and human behavior.
I have seen The Great Gatsby several times over the years and I have enjoyed it each and every time.
Often when a movie is made of a really great book something is missed.  Not so  with this one.  It's a great movie, and be ready for the ending.
This is a very goods movie.  I have not seen the newer version, but I really thought that this version was very cool.  I recommend it.
I love this movie and have since the first time I saw it.  It is placed in a time in our history when elegance was a life style.  It's so pretty.
Great movie so much better than the remake. Was interesting to see how the very rich lived during the 20's.
The transfer Paramount made for this classic is simply gorgeous: great colors, contrast, no DNR...The fans should be pleased.Highly recommended
A beautifully sad movie about two long, lost lovers who are reunited only to be torn apart again.  A classic.
Talked about hopeless romantic, i thought my case was pretty bad; however, Mr. Gatsby really tops it. I feel much better about myself now, haha.
An excellent movie I saw when it first came out and thought it was so good, I wanted it in my collection!  Terrific acting!!
i always loved the Carpenters. they are my number one group. the veijdo's are so great. i can't say enough about the Carpenters.they made good music
Anything that has Karen's voice, and drumming, and Richard's piano work and arrangements can only be fantastic. It's very enjoyable.
I love there music and there music videos. I enjoyed there albums and there concerts as well. this one is for any police fan.
The videos are great to have but the Montserrat documentary on the making of Ghost in the Machine is the best.  A *MUST HAVE* DVD for Police Fans.
i really love it when you can trust someone and then be so very very happy that you did its just what i wanted ty
another retro movie which is good to watch but not as good as gatorbait 1
this is an oldy but goody.,  I saw it years ago and wanted to see it again. I was pleased to be able to get it.
i like the outdoors and Cajun movie I have both of the DVD gator bait  and gator bait two movies
Loved it! :) Gross, campy and scary..... just the way I like my horror movies. Randy Quaid has never been freakier. Watch and enjoy.
this movie was a childhood favorite of mine, and I wanted my kids to see it, they loved it. great movie.
she did not know she could get this on dvd she was thrilled thank you hope you have a very wonderful new year
t h e g a r b a g e p a i l k i d s  i s great
received item as stated movie was on time and in perfect condition, will look for owner for future purchases thank you!
this movie is funny ,crazy,nasty, I mean dirty kids.They get into dirty things,the movie was funny ,but they  are different
This was a delightful story.  Amy Irving, Peter Riegert, and Reizl Bozyk were absolutely wonderful.
Oh, if we all could have the face of a young Amy Irving and the love of a caring pickle salesman!  It was endearing without being schmaltzy!
I would consider any one that enjoys reading about some one that is has a life like Delancey!it is a real good book ot read!
Wife likes it I like it. A happy wife is a happy life. More movies should be made like this.
the thing about this movie is, river phoenix is f-ing amazing in it and so is martha plimton.  this is a really good movie.
Great movie. Watched it when i was a kid and loved it. Even better after i had kids of my own. The movie ment more and you could really feel it.
An hilarious movie that wasn't widely seen.  Caine and Kinsley are in top form in this spoof of Holmes and Watson.  Thoroughly enjoyable.
a good moviea fine casta pleasure for holmes lovers
still as funny as i remembered it, glad they put it on dvd.caine and ben kingsley are a great team. wish they made more movies together
I just love this movie!!!  Mr. Caine is, as usual, incredible.  He is SO good with a comic part.  What timing!!!  Just a jewel of a film...
This movie is wonderful. Great acting. Michael Cain is superb. Watched it upteen times. Thses two make a great pair.
I loved it!  Lee Irmey is a natural at leading and talking to certain people and opening their stupid eyes.
Just what I expected. Great movie. Quick delivery.
Outstanding movie, the action, suspense, great movie, have recommend to my friends.  A part of my private collection.  Again Great movie.
This is a true mans movie.You want action, you want reality, you want it in a format told by R LEE ERMEY, How can it be anything but Awesome.
Not talked about too much by people, sure it isn't groundbreaking like Halloween but it has good gore and an awesome setting.
Finally saw this. Lived up to the hype. Recommended if you prefer these 70's/80's movies as I do.
The dance was wonderful to watch, the story was choppy. The lead actor did a great job. Wish the story went more into his earlier life.
One of the best vietnam war movies ever!!  Unique in seeing a perspective from the other countries side.
I LOVE THE HISTORY OF THE CELTIC LAND AND ENGLAND, MARY AND ELIZABETH WERE TOUGH LADIES OF THEIR TIME.THE MOVIE WAS GRAND....
I've always loved Kathyrn Hepburn as an actress.  Her portrayal of Mary Queen of Scots is marvelous!  A great supporting cast!
Cary Grant at his &#34;His Girl Friday&#34; best. I liked it more than I thought. Strong and convincing performances all around.
Two actors giving an entertaining performance.  A fun story line, mixed with some traits of people in all walks of life....some good, some bad.
Laraine Day and Cary Grant have great chemistry.
I REALLY ENJOYED THIS MOVIE ALOT. I AM INTO HISTORICAL AND MILITARY MOVIES. THEY FASCINATE ME. THE MOVIE IS WHAT I WANTED.
a great film
I had never seen this movie before- thought it was very good- I would recommend seeing this movie. This movie was unexpected
Its a bit 80's but the story is still solid.  I really liked the performances of the supporting cast!  Fun!
Jodie and Kelly did a believeable portrayal of what a rape victim suffers during and after inside and outside a courtroom.
the movie isn't too realistic with her going over to the attorney's house, but other than that, the acting is superb.
Well there is thce hollywood version and the true story.  Both are very sad.  I like Jodie Foster and Kelly Mcgillis's acting.
Since I had seen this movie.  I forgot how hard it was to watch the rape scene.  Excellent acting especially Jodie Foster.
its to bad people have act this way just because a young lady dresses niceand people get the wrong idea.
This was a great movie to add to my collection.Jodi Foster was sensational in this movie.A must movie for all Jodi Foster fans.
This is a great movie about taking on spectators in court for egging a rape on against a girl in a bar.
I would highly recommend this movie, good acting, great court battle, one to watch over and over.  Jodi is # 1
How hard is it to do the right thing when your entire world stands against it? A great & memorable performance by Jodie Foster.
serious subject - Kelly McGillis and Jodi Foster had some serious Chemistry - interaction on-screen made for a really good story to watch.
Jessica Lange and Dennis Quad sizzle in this love story that spans 25 years. If you live in the South, you will love the southern charm.
Fun and entertaining.  Has a stellar cast.  A great view, a classic movie.  Highly recommended.  Merchandise was in good shape and shipment was fast.
This is one of my favorite John Travolta movies!!! I CANNOT believe it's not on DVD!!! Really I mean what the hell? We need THE EXPERTS on DVD!!!
I love this movie. But then again, I love 80s and 90s movies. It's delicously 90s.  The outfits, the hair LOL I found this movie really entertaining.
this is one the best thrillers I have the pleasure of owning it keeps you guessing till . the very end
this film i 1st saw on hbo in the late 1980s. very freaky film thru out. the last 30 minutes & the ending is a trip. very good mystery film
HALLOWEEN! #4 Good quality in DVD format DiviMax Edition. Plays fine on any DVD or Blu-Ray, and even on gaming consoles.
well i had to get this to add my collection and i love it michael always trying kill someone in his family lol
ALL THE HALLOWEEN MOVIES ARE TRUE CLASSICS AND STILL SCARE ME EVERYTIME I WATCH THEM .....CAN'T HELP BUT WATCH THEM OVER AND OVER  .....GLORIA
this one michael myers returns, we purchased because we love the movies and wanted to have the whole collection recommend highly
Very good movie.  The Return of Michael Myers.  We can never get too much of Michael Myers.
Great horror movie!! Liked the gore and all that happend in the movie. Have this before on dvd and wanted it on bluray!!!
I love all the halloween movies with the exception of no. 3 because that one has nothing to do with the others
Was so happy when they released this on blu ray. Love the halloween series. The colors and sound make the movie look almost brand new.
I bought the tin collectors edition because this was my favorite one (besides the first). Get them now before they go up in price.
I enjoyed the 1,2,4 and 5 this one is a good one to get if you like the michael myers stories.
a great horror movie have watched this movie and this was a gift for a friend of mine to complete the set for himMary
This is actually my favorite out of all the Halloween movies. It has good characters and good acting.
Already had this on DVD and lost it. I have all the Halloween movies. and needed to get this one again. Very happy with the company.
Horror Fan. One of my childhood favorites :) Need to buy it on bluray so I can complete my collection.
I just love Michael Myers, the story is great. Also very good scenes. You can really get into the plot.
So much better compared to the original dvd, so clear and crisp.
great movie, gave the entire set as a gift.  All the scare without the gore.  These movies are classic horror
When it's Halloween this is a great movie to watch because when you  can't go trick or treating this is the movie to watch
this is a very good movie. keeps you guessing all the way to the end. great movie.a must have.. about a very disturbed little boy.
For those who are in my age catagory whis is 65 and over will abslutely love this one! 's one of the best ever!
Great sequel to the original movie. If you like the original movie, you will also like this one. Well done.
Nice dvd, throughly enjoyed it, great family movie, Good to see all the old faces in a continium of caccoon , as a carry on.
Classic old movie, very funny and heart warming, it even made us cry when Joe died. Great family movie. A+
both this movie and the sequel are truly entertaining. I love all the actors and the story is great. Highly recommend
a great sequel to the original.Very comforting if you are dealing with the demise of your parents due to old age and illness!
Great Movie I have watched in many times A + A + A + A + A + A +  I Love on Howard
Just as good as Cocoon, only with a slight good twist.  Wonderful cast of characters, when you have that and a great storyline your set.
I loved Cocoon and love the sequel as much.  It helped to tie up loose ends that left me hanging from the first one.
What a fun movie this was. It used to be in Florida. How exciting it was to me to watch it. I have no words for it.
This is an excellent movie and in near perfect shape.  Thank you very much.
This movie kept me laughing. The picture quality was very good and so was the sound. I just wish there where extras.
I've always loved any movie with Betty Grable. She was a teriffic dancer and loved her singing. Her acting wasalways enjoyable.
WOULD RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO ANYONE WANTING A MOVIE WITH ASTORY BEHIND IT.... NO SEX .... NO FOUL LANGUAGE .... MY KIND OF MOVIE .ALAN .
DVD in good shape.....Remake of another movie about Vickie.......I watch film noir over and over.....gotta love dark psycho type old movies
This is a wonderful film noir...lots of twists and turns. Highly recommended !!!
i saw this film in my intro to film class in college and really enjoyed it! i need to find more like it!
They don't make 'em like this anymore! Suspense, romance! Fantastic.  I never, never get tired of watching this movie! Great acting, also!
I ENJOYED IT VERY MUCH
One of the classics. Fun, happy, timeless.A great film for the whole family.
It does not get better than this with Betty Grable, Carmen Miranda and Don Ameche together in a delightful 40s musical from 20th Century-Fox!
Betty Grable = always talented as the rest of the cast was...... a movie I enjoy over and over ...Classic for sure !
Saw this movie a long time ago and still find it funny. It's an old school comedy that always got my attention.
DVD arrived promptly and in excellent condition. Viewed when first came out,  family again enjoying the movie and now my son's family is enjoying it.
A classic, funny movie with great actors,I love that I could get this threw Amazon instant video too! And a great price for it as well.
A good romantic comedy and unusual fatuations, with a happy ending, plus good special effects. I also like the subtitle options.
This is a fun movie, makes us laugh every time! If you like bad 1980's acting and humor, this is a good one!
It is a movie to share with your family and adults on movie night. It is funny and entertaining with a good plot and characters and ending.
Almost forgot this movie until I was browsing the list here and found it..bought it and had no idea how much i forgot how great ir was.
I would recommend it to everybody. I have always enjoyed this movie. Its a full staff of older actors. great
highly fun and funny film. however the price amazon is asking is way too high i had to get used thank god all i had to do was clean the disc.
I bought this movie for myself. It is very funny. I have watched it many times and highly recommend it.
This was a really good film. perfect for halloween fanatics the world over. They kept you guessing all the way through.
This is toooooooo funny.  It is a great family movie.  You will laugh till your sides hurt and so will everyone else.
love it I was looking for this movie a long time had the vhs can't find it so i bought the down load love it
Great find. Good to see how the 007 series started. Hard to find video.
IF U LOVE JAMES BOND BUY THIS---THIS IS THE VERY FIRST BOND MOVIE---THESE R  THE REASONS WHY EYE BOUGHT IT---EXTREMELY HAPPY
wahou i never know bond was so old, well this version is. a bit crud not really the script we know now. thanks
This was a great childhood cartoon for me growing up. I have it for my son. He likes watching it.
I had this on VHS and like to watch it every once in a while to bring back memories of the past
I was happy when I found this movie and have watched at least 10 times since I got it.  Need to find more about the Flintstones and Jetsons.
i really got the movie for my self more then the kids i love the flintstones  and im collecting them
Sweet, funny, and heart warming.  I really enjoy  William Hurt's work.  It is a movie the family can watch.
Great movie, but I do have a soft spot for William Hurt movies so I may not be quite as objective as someone else.
Even though he didn't headline the movie it was good and you could tell he was the person that took control of the movie.
this is a good story classic american hisory,very moving,good character envolment,this is a fun one to watch and needs to be seen
Anything with John Wayne in it is a hit with me. These great movies never lose there appeal to me.
A very good and old movie with John Wayne I loved it very much. I like all these kind of movies.Thank YouJoan Jackson
John Wayne against the evil frontiers man.  Can he make any movie great.  Great movie to cuddle up to on a cold wintery day. long live the Duke
Both the case and the movie were in  excellent shape and delivered in a timely manor.  Thanks  RWM
A classic from the classic error of movies.  This one is an asset for your video libriary.  Go out and get this onel.
Flying Leathernecks is another action movie loosly based on the battle of Guadalcanal. This title is a good addition to my library!
Great story, cast and soundtrack. John Wayne saved the day as a only John Wayne can. It's a classic Hollywood movie for everyone.
Two very good movies, not the best John Wayne efforts, but not the worst by a long way.  Good quality prints for a good price.
It's time to get this,along with Man Without a Star,transfered to a Region 1 DVD.A combined package would be very attractive
Cary grant was better in comedy rolls than anything else just a wonderful movie that influenced today's greats Spielberg included
A Cary Grant movie my husband enjoyed and wanted for his collection.  A great addition to his collection of movies.
I have seen this movie about 20 times and am still moved by it's story. It's one of Rudyard Kiplings' greatest stories.
One of Cary Grant's better movies and really fun to watch. Would make a good film to view when having company over. Definitely should buy.
What can I say, I love Cary Grant movies and this is a must-have.  You're a better man than I am Gunga Din.
just a wonderful movie. of course cary grant is one of my favorite actors. There is a lot of humor which makes it move right along.
This movie is one my husband's and my favorites.  Truly the best of acting and a lot of suspense. Recommend highly.
Din, Din, Din - You're a better man the I, Gunga Din - Classic movie from the age of great movies
still one of the best classics ever made, now it comes withme on my kindle, to watch anytime i get bored withwhats on cable.
1939 seems like the greatest year in the history of Hollywood. This classic is full of adventure and comedy for all ages.
One of the greatest adventure films ever made. I love the cast.  Lucas and Spielberg definitely borrowed a little from this movie for Indiana Jones.
One of my all time favorites. It's entertainment at its finest..The cast is outstanding and it has something for everyone..Not to be missed
This is by far my Favorite Movie of all Time. The story the actors and the memories. I will watch it many times
My husband loves this movie and it came in a beautifully illistrated cover. will order again in the future. thanks
Love everything Lucille Ball appears in. She is a good comedienne, as well as a serious part player. Will probably order more of her VHS soon.
This was a wonderful film.  I like Raymond Massey and all the other actors.It arrived promptly and in good condition.
I have seen the new Lincoln movie recently but this and Young Mr. Lincoln with Henry Fonda are far better movies.
I highly recommend this film.  It is very entertainingand enjoyable to watch.
Its always rewarding to get the thing you ordered and in a timely fashion. What more could you want from life?
excellent movie.  It shows how the actions of one can be the catalyst for many to stand and do what's right.
I love any movie with Ginger Rogers in it. William Powell just adds a plus.An old film, but well done. I recommend it.
Ginger Rogers only did 10 or 12 movies with Fred Astaire - but she was in more then 90 movies - -This is one of the best
I first saw this movie on television and fell in love with it. I was so excited when I found the DVD on Amazon.
This is  one of my all time favourite William Powell movies. I've watched it many times.
That about says it all ! This was well written and well acted and just plain fun.  He reminded me of the Thin Man.
Another fun movie for us William Powell fans!  But I have yet to find one I didn't like.  Loved Ginger Rogers!  Good supporting cast, too..
If you liked William Powell in the Thin Man series you will like this one . It has been restored so the picture is clean . Good entertainment !
This is one of my favorite classic movies!  It is different from so many that were made from that era!  I love these two together!
Great soap opera type movie with even better performances. The story lines strong all the way through. Very good movie!
This is one of my favorite Cary Grant and Carole Lombard movies.  I'm so glad you had this available to purchase.
Love Barbara Stanwyck, and her earlier movies were some of her best and the chemistry between her and Henry Fonda in this were the best.
A necessity for all Barbara Stanwyck fans! It was enjoyable to watch and the humor was fantastic for an older movie.
I saw this movie on TCM and fell in with it. Had to wait a couple of years in order to obtain this gem.
This is a great romp. Stanwyck is ditzy and cute and such fun to watch. The cast is great and everyone does great job. Oh for movies like this today.
An honestly decent guy persists in a difficult situation. Some very compelling twists and turns. It's honest, raw, and beautiful.
Still never made it to dvd and its a delightful comedy very hard to find. Highly Recommended!
This was a godzilla film I had never seen before. Great action scenes and the acting was pretty good, too!
My brother bought this for himself, he loves Godzilla moves the old ones for sure !! and he will probably buy more too.....
awesome movie especially for someone whom enjoys watching Godzilla movies and seems to have everything from gamera to ultraman available
Hope the new Godzilla 2014 is better than that pathetic one in 1997 with Mathew Broderick. That did not even look like Godzilla.
I bought this movie due to it being a classic Kaiju movie of which it proved to be true to its call
This movie is very good. It is The second godzilla movie ever so yes it is kinda dated but it was made in the 50s so let it be.
I like the movie because of the other monsters in the movie with Godzilla. Also they gave the monsters name.
One of the best movies ever. Great story and filmed so well. It's well worth watching and owning. A movie you can watch many times and still enjoy.
I remember the headlines of this sad story back in the day and this really presents it realistically. Highly recommended.
GREAT FILM!!! Now where is the bluray? This film goes along well with &#34;A TIME TO KILL&#34; or &#34;THE BUTLER&#34;..
IF YOU WANT PASSION. WATCH THIS MOVIE. HACKMAN'S PASSION FOR GETTING THE BAD GUYS IS REALLY A GREAT TREAT TO WATCH.
Sweet great fun exciting I loved it you will to. you need to get this right now or you will miss out.
Ordered this for a friend an she loved it! She just loves to watch this movie. Although kinda hard to watch.
I purchased this for my mom for Christmas.  Not sure how the quality is but I don't think it makes a difference since this is a great movie!
Love this movie.  Love that I was able to find this movie.  Movie was in great condition and so was the covering.
DREAM A LITTLE DREAM is a wonderful Romantic/ Comedy 80s movie,I have it on LASER DISC And DVD too.you won't regret it :P
had no idea how much i forgot how great ir was.one my favorites. a must buy .Almost forgot this movie
yes,cool movie, very well made, an funny fun to watch movie, i like the classics syle, great job to all,  thank you!!!
Always love this movie wish they put on DVD
Best movie ever made! Finally, finally, finally out on dvd by Warner Archives! Great quality, all original music! Thanks Warner!
I just love this movie and even though it is not an official DVD release of the movie, it's the next best thing!!
This movie is incredible. I have waited a long time to get it on DVD. Worth watching.
Have always loved this movie, what can I say, I'm an 80's girl!  I still hold on to my old VCR just so I can watch this movie every so often!
I had this movie on vhs and I was trying to find it on dvd and finally did and it plays great thank u.
I would order from this vender again. Enjoyed this movie when it first came out. And just wanted to add it to my collection of movies from the 80's/
love this movie when i first saw it on vhs and i really wanted it on dvd . great movie would recommend it to everyone i know
Ilove this Movie to bad this movie is not on Dvd yet cant wait till it is its one of my favorite 80's moviesAmerican Anthem [VHS]
This movie is old but I love watching movie's with action and love and to this day I can watch it over and over. What a great movie
I bought this as a gift for my stepdad.  It was just the movie he wanted!  Great picture and a great price!
Great Move and service . The movie was as I remembered it. Great action and Historically accurate I enjoyed it from start to finish.
a good movie and plaid
gives a fine example of what it must have been like fighting in Korea during the police action.  would recommended it.
Just a good movie on the Korean War, and there are not as many as were made WII ........so a good movie too watch
It took years to finally get this and I love it and I put it with my Geraldine Page collection
I have to get all these old Chevy movies because they always make me laugh. He did such a good job on the character, Fletch.
A great movie - I just would like to see it come out on DVD!
I love Chevy Chase. He is so cottonpicking funny. And I love him in the National Lampoon series. This is a great 2 for 1 buy.
Chevy Chase is great in both of the Fletch movies.  They are so dumb and corny that you can't help but laugh!
Got a better copy.
IT IS AN AWESOME MOVIE I LOVE IT I THINK I HAVE WATCHED IT 10 TIMES ALREADY.CHEVY CHASE IS A GREAT ACTOR.
I Highly Recommend This Product.I Am Well Satisfied With My Purchase.I Am Very Satisfied With My Purchase Of This Product.
This is a very good movie i wish they made alot more movies like this one it has everything a person could want and then some
Had seen this movie a long time ago and liked it.  When I seen you had it, I had to buy it.
How nice to have both of these together.  A welcome addition to our video library. The 2nd one is our favorite because we love that dog.
this is a great sequel so she had the baby she wasn't in this film,pity!it's a very sensitive heartbreaking thrilling horror
The Fly 2 is a very good sequel, the dog scene is a gut wrencher.
The two movies are together in one so I save space, the movie arrived in good condition and plays well.
I have TAP ON LASERDISC,'tis a great Movie, A MUST SEE :p
This was a Gift  Im sure  its fine when it arrived  it was in good shape it wasn't squashed or anything.
Best show to watch if like dancing but only on vhs wish could find on dvd. Came in fast Great shape
I love Gregory Hines.  I love tap dancing.  He was truly a great dancer.  Sorry I never got to see him in person.
Loved this movie as a kid and know I get to share it with my kids. I didn't realize it was an extended version and I really enjoy seeing more.
Always loved this movie and now it has extra scenes that were not included in the original.  This is a great family movie.
This is a great movie for all ages. It is what you would expect from an early Walt Disney movie.Right up there with Mary Poppins!
there is nothing i don't like about bedknobs and broomsticks was a must enjoy movie also was a favorite from my youth.
I kept renting this movie from Netflix and decided it was time to get my own. Just a delight. Highly recommend.
Product is as described and would not mind recommending to friend or wouldn't mind purchasing some more in the future
Very enjoyable - another delightful opportunity to leave the realistic world and spend some time in wonderland.  She is great.
Both my boys loved this movie when they were young and it never stops keeping them laughing.. its Great!! what else can we say
This one does have closed caption, thank god that I took a risk to buy this and watch this DVD.
This movie is a fantastic movie for people of all ages! It is so hilariously funny, but has a tinge of mystery and suspense!
I watched this movie as a child and now my kids love it as well. I can't resist NOT to watch it when they want to.
This film has Angela Lansbury, Knights, Nazis, magic, and animated talking animals. It really doesn't get any better than this.
Really enjoyed it. More musicals like this should be made for new generations ... but this is tough to beat for simple, good hearted fun.
Have always loved this and watching it again after so many years, this time with my grandsons, was a lovely experience and fun to watch.
Enjoyed this as I did so many years ago. Great fun and entertainment, to brighten up a sometimes depressing world.glenn
I loved this movie as a child and my 2 year old loves it too.The animation in the middle of the movie makes it a great surprise for kids.
I grew up watching this movie and it never gets old, I love this movie a lot it is so enjoyable
I loved this charming fantasy of wartime England.  It was good to see Angela Lansbury - she is an excellent white witch.
The football match is the best ever. The movie is worth the match.
We' ve seen the movie many times and we still love it. Great if you liked Mary Poppins and enjoyed the cartoon/real actor mix.
Loved this movie as a child, and now enjoy it with my children...It's magical... !
This was a great find. I loved this movie as a child, now I can watch it with my grand kids!
More than one generation have already enjoyed this movie and I am certain that several more will as well.  Its classic Disney.
This is such a great movie.  I watched this as a kid and loved it then and still love it now!  I bought it for my kids and they love it too!
The movie is from disney.  Its is an enjoyable movie for all ages.  Excellent for children and adults alike.  A family movie
One of my childhood favorites a would be witch. Who is force to take in some kids and go on a magical journey,.during world war 2. in Britian.
I love this old classic Disney movie. The picture and music have been masterfully restored. A pleasure to watch even for today's kids.
a movie that voth my Mother and I had fond memories of this Disney movie; it made an idyllic birthday gift for her
Wonderful movie.  Angela Lansbury is a very favorite of mine.  We had this on VHS and definitely want it on DVD.
Ordered for friend.  He loved it.  Said was as he expected and no glitches.  Wanted it to view from time to time even tho older movie.
Saw this many years ago and always wanted my own copy. Great that you had it for me to purchase. Loved it again.
I fan of the old movies.  I watched the modern version of Mighty Joe Young.  I like this one better.
Just as I remembered watching on WOR TV many years ago on Thanksgiving Day. Great to have this on DVD now.
The Special effects are good It was Cute and the fire scene I would recommend it to all family's. Just Watch
This was purchased for a friend that has thanked me several times since receiving it.  I was glad to find this movie still available for purchase.
There were two movies made of the same meaning.  I believe Mighty Joe Young was great, for it's special effects and ofit's acting performance.
I believed to be a great movie considering this is the first time ever seeing it at all. That's all
i grave it to a another person and they think  it was great to them. they really love it very much.
This is such a great old movie, one of David Niven's best in his earlier days of acting.  He plays a great romantic role!
Excellent overall.  A litlle slow in starting.  Early Technicolor was only fair. Vera-Ellen was outstaning. Great David Niven Acting.
Vera Ellen is one of my favorite actresses. I loved her in White Christmas & any other movie I've found her in. She dances like a dream!
Got it quickly at a good price.. we both like the color and quality of the movie and got it quickly
Sydney Portier rules in this great colonial African Drama.It's a must see!!!
It has the great style of Carpenter. Better than the most recent version; it really captures the spirit of the book.
Only on amazon have I found this classic movie. It has edge qf trhe seat drama. It also has a lot of gunfire action! I has a very good story line.
I like this version of assault on police, because it involves gangs of all ethinic backgrounds, religion and origin real classic.
Assault on Precinct 13 is a classic movie from John Carpenter.It is a must have in your collection. I recommend it.
OH YEAH, AWESOME MOVIE. FANTASTIC PICTURE QUALITY AND MOVIE.!!
i have seen some remakes of this film but they do not compare to this one...a very good movie..excelent..highly recomended
this movie far exceeds its later edition. this edition is disturbing, but excellent. the violence, the gore, everything is heart-pounding.
a raw and insteresting film never seen one like it love john carpenters films he always has something diffrent then anyone else to offer
What an old genius with the movie making thing. This man had the mind of a real criminal without a doubt!
This is light-hearted comedy! I laughed because it was funny which it is. Get over it!
Excellent production for its time.  Probably truer to the novel than successors, although Ty Powers version had the incomparable Linda Darnell.
This was requested from a grandchild as a Christmas gift and that child was thrilled beyond reason.  Entertaining to say the least.
This is one of my favorite silent movie truly when it was made it was a head of its time not one of the classics but the classics of all time
I highly recommend this film.  Lon Chaney is great as the Phantom of the Opera.
OH! Did'nt you see? What a pitty! If you have ever falling love, you can understand the Phantom's heart.
GOOD MOVIE NICE AND CLEAR I FOR GOT HOW THIS MOVIE WAS LOVE IT FOR A LOW BUDGET MOVIE THEN IT COMES WITH TWO LOVE IT
Interesting this guy is not in more movies. I liked this guy just as much as Randolph Scott. This movie is very good for an older movie.
It was fantastic, It is one of my favorite movies and couldn't find it until I checked you site. Thank you
Have loved this movie since it was released.  Can watch it over and  over again.  Some friendships are forever !  Love this movie:)
One of my all time favorites. This DVD is a must have for everyone's collection. I totally recommend this classic!
My best friend and mine's favorite movie.  We've loved each other since we were young girls and stayed in touch our entire lives.
Great movie.  Two of the strongest actresses playing amazing roles.  Combines comedy and serious issues that make for an enjoyable movie.
This &#34;Beaches&#34; DVD is a great movie about friendship, old movie great plot. I love Beth Midler...get the tissues out!
Story of love and true friendship that rides the storms of life.  It show how two people so different can make a relationship work.
laugh, cry, get mad, all the actors even the kids do a wonderful job in this movie, it's a classic!
Thank you for offering this movie. My husband has really enjoyed it...my croup waited to let me know
bought it for my best friend, she loved it.. its the story of us! LOL
This is one of the best movies from a while back. It is funny and sad too.
BETTE MIDLER'S TALENT, VOCALS ACTING IS SUPERIOR. EVENTUALLY HOPE TO BUY THE MOVIE.AND TO START COLLECTING A MOVIE LBRARY THROGH AMAZON.COM.
What a movie, I searched for a long time and now I'm enjoying it, Thank you so much for this great movie,sound , color  in perfect condition.
I WISH I COULD FIND A GREAT LIFELONG FRIEND LIKE THAT. FRIENDS ARE HARD TO MEET. THERE ARE ALOT OF PARASITES BUT NOT MANY FRIENDS.
Oh I love this movie.  It has love, friendship, jealousy and everlasting trust.  I would recommend this movie for anyone who loves a tear-jerker.
SAD STORY, BUT SO INSPIRATIONAL!  PURCHASED THE SOUNDTRACK ALSO AND MIDLER IS SO TALENTED AND FULL OF ENERGY! BUY THEM BOTH
Great movie, watched with my daughter and mom, have plenty of Kleenex available; it always makes me cry when I watch this!
This is one of my favorite movies. I have it vhs now for modern time I purchased the dvd. It is truly a classic about friendship
Miss Midler is at her very best here...warm, touching, sentimental.. and Miss Hershey is no slouch either.. Highly recommended.
This story hold a close resemblance to a friend and I.  Still brings tears to my eyes no matter how much I watch it.  A real feel good movie.
Everyone should watch this movie at least once while they are living :) it's a wonderful movie and was a film before it's time :)
IF YOU ENJOY COMEDY,THEN THIS IS THE MOVIE FOR YOU,GOOD ENTERTAINMENT.GOOD WAY TO SPEND A NITE WITH FAMILY,WATCHING A GOOD MOVIE.
The movie was good, but the cast made it better.You can't help but laugh over and over againat the messup and more mess ups.
It has all the greats in this one. I love Fred Gwynne, Lou Diamond Phillips and Reuben Blades. I highly recommend this one.
This movie is an obscure, totally forgotten comedy from 1989 but its one of the funniest movies Ive ever seen.
Excellent picture quality  very good audio no extras even though there are no extras don't let you put it off by it is very good film
The dvd came with really cool art. Still in love with this movie and Jessica Rabbit.
This is one great movie!! It was beyond its time when it came out but i love it. Picture and sound quality is good a must buy for the collection.
What is not to love about Roger Rabbit?  Great family movie night movie.  Ground breaking and a nice movie to watch.  Perfect with popcorn.
This is a great classic for any movie collection.  Completely forgot how good this movie was.  Would definitely recommend for any movie collection.
This is a fun movie to watch with the whole family.My husband has wanted this movie for sometime,I was glad that I was able to find it.
I've always loved this movie, it seems a bit hard to find now a days.  Now that the main character has passed this one may become even harder to find
This is a classic that still stands the test of time.  Was able to show this to my 14 year olds and they loved very minute of it.
this movie deserves more than 5 stars..i was laghing my head off when i saw it,it's more than funny,i realy realy loved it with all my heart
Bob took a mime class so you can see the weight of the rabbit.  Bob Hoskins is a superb actor!
The funniest bunny since Buggs. Already a classic.  Don't miss the extras showing how the amazing special effects were achieved.
Great older movie a must see for all familys,and now on dvd instead of VHS. good cartoon and live graffics
The introduction of annimation blended with true life has opened a door to even more classics since this one was produced, thank you!
Oh my gosh, thought it was awesome as a kid and still think it's awesome now! Really different but still good! Bob Haskins is in it! Need I say more?
This is a timeless classic and a pioneer in its field. Anyone who likes a good laugh would love this one.
This movie mixes real life people with cartoon characters. What's not to like about that? Goofy, crazy, zany, trust, etc.
Another DVD I had to purchase to replace our first copy that my 3 year old wore out. Price was right.
This is a great movie to set and enjoy both worlds,  Love having this to add to my movie collection...
I bought this for myself love this movie. If you are a fan of the classic cartoons you will love this
Cool World 1992 waiting for that one to come out on blu-ray, brings back some good childhood memories this one.
This is the last great animated film before computers took over hollywood and ruined moives forever.
It's a great movie that the family can enjoy. Maybe not for the very young but older kids might enjoy. Patty-cake!
Great emanation, great action pact fun and exciting.  Who is to know why the villain always tries to hurt the innocent.
Nice version of a very fun movie. Interesting extras, though a few are a bit difficult to access.
The item was exactly what I ordered. It arrived within the time span that it was supposed to and in perfect condition.
Way ahead of it's time.  The HD visuals are spectacular.  Great acting and great writing in this classic movie.  Amazing.
another one i had on v.h.s and now i got it on dvd  i love them toons they are so cute :-)
I love this movie am going to watch this movie over and over and never give it up cos of how funny it is ...
It is a fantastic, hillarious movie. The actors in it were fantastic in their actions. The most funniest movie I have ever seen.
Salaam Bombay has been one of my favorate movies for many years. It show how street life is in India. I highly enjoyed this movie
One of the best Indian movies and one of my top 25 movies.Fine production.
This is fantastic!  Great music, Great story,  Awesome photography!  I promise you will love  this film.
This one by far is the best and my favorite out of all they made.If you haven't watched this one you really should!
anybody looking for good horror from the 80s this is it.i recommend you buy this one it best so buy it you'll thank me later.happy halloween.lol
IT'S A VERY SCARY, FUNNY MOVIE. YOU MUST SEE IT. BUT THE PRICE IS RIDICULOUS!!!!!! I recommend this horror movie
THIS MOVIE IS ONE OF THE BEST HORROR MOVIES OF THE 80S. IT IS DISGUSTING, FANTASTIC, SEXY, AND GREAT MONSTERS...LOVE THIS ONE
Nice creepy atmosphere to this movie.  Ms. Quigley is HOT! Can be watched again and again!
I am very happy that I got this movie for the little ones. They love it just as my kids did when they were young. God bless.
This was the first and only pound puppies movie in the 80's but the movie was really good to have.
bought this for my little girl n this is what she has been watching ever since she got it.great songs n great cartoon.i even like it too.
Skin Deep tells the story of a successful author and alcoholic who struggles to remain monogamous.  Lots of laughs in this film.
Love this movie! This is one of John Ritter's funnier movies, the part with the glowing condoms is hilarious! Great flick!
Skin Deep is very funny.  The best scene is the feuding condoms in the dark.  Absolutely hysterical.  I laughed so hard.
One of my all time favorite comedies.  John Ritter is amazing in this.  The direction is flawless.
John Ritter was a genius.  Absolutely hysterical physical comedy.  You'll love it if you think Charley from two and a half men is funny.
I got up from a sick bed to see this movie back in 1952; it was worth it. I do not tire of these epic movies.
Superb! Two of my favorite actors. If you like bibical stories as I do, you will enjoy this film. The love story of all times.
A definite 'must watch!' Portrays God's love and wrath so well. David represents each one of us so well with all our strengths and shortfalls.
Great biblical story in olden times.  You would be able to get ideas of collevting the good benefits of life.
I love to see the bible come to life i wish there were movies on the entire bible i can watch it again
Shows the human side of David from the Bible.  Strong acting and good representation of the Bible story.  Glad I have it in my collection.
Wow!! Breathtaking storyline. Wonderful screen writing, and a beautiful movie to be watched by young and old =
David and BathshebaThis movie was all that I expected. It is shown as it is written in the Bible. It is really good, and I enjoyed it very much.
A great movie for the family and/or christian gatherings....Saw the movie years ago, never grows old...I would rate this movie a 5 out 5 scale.....
Great movie about David and Bathsheba. Very interesting and great acting with Gregory Peck and Susan Hayward. Don't hesitate  to get this one.
Wonderful comedy, Fun and intelligent.Definetly a movie to watch more than ounce.
I really enjoyed this movie...It never won any awards but it is a delightful movie.  Comedy, action, romance...what else could you want?
It may be a little corny, but I think it was great fun to watch. Really enjoy Selleck in this one.
This movie is a classic!  One of the best of all times!  Romantic, tongue-in-cheek, exciting, and hilarious!  No one should miss this!!!
Her Alibi is not a well known video but I thinks it is one of Tom's best comedy. Strong supporting staff. Fun movie the family can enjoy.5 stars
Funny script!  Sellek is great as always.  Really funny scenes!  Laughs in this are for all ages!  Timeless movie.  One of my favorite movies.
Solid piece of fun filmatic fluff. We need more fluff and less obnoxious crap these days. Cute love story with unique twists around a theme. Enjoy.
awesome movie i had seen this movie many times before and it's a great Christian classic and the price is great dvd is like new no problems here
My mother bought me this movie along with The Robe.  Both are great movies.  Superb acting and great messages!  Even the kids will enjoy it!
This is a good sequel to The Robe and one I would recommend.
If you love biblical stories this is the movie for you and the family. Love it. Great DVD and great condition!
Actually,  this is a good movie.  What the haters don't understand is that the role personifications reflect the sensibilities of the time.
Unlike most sequels it didn't try to remake the first movie. But took it in an entirely different direction. Well Done.
It was a great movie.  I loved it.  I saw it years ago and decided I wanted it in my home movie collection.  I would recommend it to all.
I enjoy watching the older movies.  This is a classic and great to watch.  It was greatly priced too that I couldn't pass it up.
Another "my" era actor. Very good movie and a classic.
This is my favorite movie about Ancient Rome and the Christians and the Gladiators and how barbaric the time was.
don't like to rate it looks ok for a dvd I do not like to rate so you can see if you like it
I am so proud of Demetrious because he accomplished what his friend tried to do.  To make his fellow man free fromthe Roman rule.
Anyone who likes a good storyline and great acting, then I would recommend this movie.
I love this movie and the power and rightiousness it delivers. It is part religious and soul searching of a man torn between love and religion.
This one is one of my top 5 John Cusack films. Touching on the difficult subject of young love, this movie showcases what to do, and what not to do.
Classic 80's. Loved it... but knew that I would.My teenage kids loved it too. We are collecting all the 80's teen movies.
My kids see references to this movie in their movies.  Great movie and good story line.  Brings back good memories.
I absolutely LOVE this movie. Cheesy in all the right ways. Came to my door nice and safe and right on time.
lovvvvvve this movie! cameron crowe hit a home run on his first time out. only competes with ferris bueller in my book as best of the '80s.
Bought this classic for my husband at Christmas.  What else can I say?  classic classic classic classic classic classic classic
This is such a great romance and classic movie.  A good one to add to your movie collection and enjoy.
I love me some John Hughes films. this is a good one that every one should watch today and every day.
THIS IS ONE OF MY FAVORITE 80'S MOVIE! EACH PART BRINGS ME BACK IN TIME..THE SOUNDTRACK IS AMAZING TOO AND I FELL IN LOVE!
I got this for my sis. i saw the movie with her and instantly fell in love with this romantic comedy. Best of John Cusack !
This is an oldie, but has lots of famous faces. Melanie Griffith, Harrison Ford, and Sigourney Weaver. I had to own it
I loved this movie when it first came out and it is still good (even with the 80's look!)  Watching this is a fun way to spend an evening.
One of my fave Melanie movies, the other one is.."Too Much".  they are both great.I would recomend both of them.luvmusic12/02/07
One of my all time favorite movies.  I had it in VCR tape, but can't live without it.  Love it!!!!! Had to have a DVD of it.
The presentation of the DVD was complete and to the point. We received the DVD in record time!!! Thanks so much.
Each and every actor in this movie is doing his or her very best and their best is extremely good indeed.
A TOTAL CLASSIC - ACTING ON THE PART OF MELANIE GRIFFITH WAS ACADEMY AWARD CALIBER - AND THAT VOICE - OVERALL SUPERIOR WRITING AND DIRECTION - R.D.A.
I have this movie on VHS and enjoyed it enough to update to DVD. I like the music, the performances, the scenery, and the victory for the underdog!
Very enjoyable movie.  Harrison Ford and Melanie Griffith actually have good on screen chemistry.  Very good supporting cast.
I bought the dvd with the cd because this is sucha  delightful movie and soundtrack. A real favorite of my husband's, too.
I have always loved this movie and watch it all the time when it comes on tv, now I can watch it anytime
This DVD movie is enjoyable; very close depiction of the Bible story . It was a really fastinating film to watch
got the dvd, not blue ray or hd quality, but old movies are better when its a little bit unclear.  overall good movie and better than vhs.
The movie was astounding, well put together and of awesome quality. I would treasure it for years to come
I first saw it in 1954 and I still love it. I don't get tired of it.
this movie had good color.  and speaking and sound was awesome.  I thank you for sending the movie so promptly.
Absolutely beautiful! You feel like you are living right there in ancient Egypt. Wonderful acting by very talented actors and actresses.
I love the subject matter and have been to Kitty Hawk! Want to take family and imbue let them see part of that
This tape helps you look normal and not muscular. You see good results and your clothes fit better and you lose inches as well.
Excellent workout! You will feel this one and at the end complete exhaustion occurs. Too bad this is not on DVD.
great routine i have loved it since 1986,  I still use this workout even though Im older, it is a great workout
My favorite Firm Tape, the one that started it all! Very Challenging!!! You will need a lot of strength & stamina! It's a great total body workout!!!
This is a very good The Firm workout, one of the classics. It works, and makes your muscles shake.Would highly recommend.
This is the best home video exercise tape that I have ever had and the best one produced by the Firm.
An all time classic - I wish modern movies were like this one. It brings back the memories of old times.
A great cast, everyone is nice in the film, which is refreshing in a way... Don't want to give it away as to why. Definitely worth seeing.
I had recorded this movie from TV onto VHS tape years ago.  I am so happy to have it on DVD.  It is one of my favorite holiday movies.
I really enjoyed The Enchanted Cottage even though I have seen it before the story line is very good and Dorothy McGuire was VERY good
Anyone living in this enchanted cottage will be beautiful, even if they are homely or disfigured. This movie is enchanted too!
A story of how love wins out....just a classic....well written and acted.  A film you will want to watch again and again.
The product arrived in time, in perfect condition.  What a wonderful movie!  I wish a remake could be made with today's technology!
I love this movie because love was enchanting and private.  To be able to shut the world out and live with love is a beautiful thing.
I remembered this movie from seeing it years ago; It has left that much of an impression on me.  It explains the magic of love.
A real classic.  If you like a good old fashion romance, this is a great movie.  I would recommend this movie to everyone.
I received fast, courteous and accurate service. The DVD came uncrushed and exactly as promised. Love the movie. Thank you!
Five Stars because it is one the greatest classics.A great love story and beautiful message in life.Robert Young and Dorothy McGuire at their best.
an oldy but goody.  Makes you feel good especially when you are sitting with your special one.  Buy it...you wont be disappointed.
My wife remember this movie and wanted to see it again. It's an oldie but goodie for some sentimental people.
I haven't seen this movie since 1989-90. This is a classic that I can't wait to share with my friends. It brought back so many memories.
It's an excellent quality recording. Now if only it were available in DVD! I'm told I need seven more works.
I have watched this movie many times over the last 50 years. It is a classic. Betty Hutton is a quality actor.
My man Charlton Heston. He could have been a little nicer to the cleaning lady but she was playing a roll as well
Really a fan of chuck, therefore this couldn't be anything but great!!! I have no problem with purchasing/watching this one
Again here is a good and old movie and as you can see I really like these kind of movies, love Charlton HestonThank YouJoan Jackson
This movie arrived on time and it was excellent. I saw this movie many years ago and I am glad that it was still available.
This was an excellent dramatic movie with Charlton  Heston  doing  an outstanding acting job. He really enacts the roles he portrays.
Charlton Heston was awesome in this movie.  This is one of my favorite Indian westerns.  I really love this movie.
This movie can be super fun if you think of yourself as Charlton Heston, and the Indian guy as Obama. Ha! Take that!
I have always loved this movie and had to add it to my collection. It is a special collectors edition too so added bonus.
I LOVE THIS MOVIE IT WAS A GREAT STORY AND HAD A CLEVER PLOT TO IT AND WAS NICELY SET UP FOR A SECOND ONE
nobody can scare you like Stephen king he is the best of that.good scary movie..but parts of it is gross,and sad..
close to the book / very well done / even better in blu ray for the dark out door stuff much sharper
The disk and case were in very good condition.  I'm a very big Stephen King fan so its great to add it to my collection.
good move better then too was so good that i just couldnt beleive i havent seen it it was a good move
Its pet semetary, its a classic.
This is another great adaptation of King's novels.  I think this is the best adaptation by far.  The acting is very good.
I am So glad they put this on bluray. I wish they would put the second one on bluray as well.
a must see film hold on if you like horroe you will love this movie very sad the the child was killed
One of my favorite Stephen King movies of all time, git it because hubby had never seen it, he loved it too
Great DVD, But don&#34;t forget to get Pet Sematry 11, there both great to have, we enjoyed this a lot, and I watch it a few times.
good scary movie . . .of course I love everything that Stephen Kings does . . . .
This is a great fun classic filmAnd Image really did a great job .All the way around.Ehnks image
What else can we say - this is a creepy show and one of Kings best - must have for the King collector!
I first read the Stephen king book pet sematary  when I was highschool  this is one of the best adaptations
I have watched this film several times. It is truly a classic one of my all time favorites. Lots of chill and thrills
This is a gory film and will be enjoyable for horror fans.This is a great movie!
i was extremely happy with the delivery time, and movie was in condition as stated, would by again. yours truly happy customer.
It is a very interesting classical movie that i have seen over and again, and have recommended to several other persons.
The Fright Night movies are great, part II was a perfect sequal, really great sharacters from pt.1 as well as new ones.
I loved it, I've saw one and two.  Definately a must have for a horror fan.
I love this movie.  It's not as good as the first one, but it's still good.  I love that it's scary, yet campy and funny.
It was just as good today ,as when I saw it the first time That I enjoyed it!  I sincerely Thank,You!
a good video it shows how hulk can act but its in his type of atmosphere wrestling.
My brother is into wrestling and asked me to order it for him. He said it was pretty good. He collects the wrestling dvd's.
I bought this for my 10 year old son after he would see it playing at the comic book store. He loves it!
Just an absolute classic!
Why does Gotham City look like LA? Why does the rubber shark that weight 2 tons not pull Batman's chopper into the ocean?
I love all the old batman and got this a a great deal and also bought the remote bat mobile
West and Ward premise their roles from television to the big screen in this great follow up to thre hit series.
My  older son watched and enjoyed it. I was not aware of this purchase but if he liked it I liked it
holy blast from the past Batman!greastest line ever: Holy Strawberries Batman, we're in a jam
Looks amazing on Blueray!!!!! Extras put it over the top!!!!! Highly recommended!!!!!! Closest thing we have to the TV show on DVD.
Great price for a great movie. Although it isn't as serious as the newer batman movies, it is still a lot of fun and adventurous.
This was on Tv alot during the Michael Keaton Batman Movie.I would love to have this DVD.
I enjoyed the old shows and the movie. this one is a great one to get if you are a fan of the show.
This is campy and fun. I saw it on Netflix and bought two copies for my great-grand children.  I would recommend it for young children and teenagers.
This was a wonderful movie. It brought back memories of the past. Great sound and quality picture, it was worth the price I paid.
This was another great movie and this time his partner has joined him in the fight against crime.  I just added it to my collection of great movies.
My two year old thinks this is the greatest movie of all time. All he wants to do is watch batman.
A fun romp of camp that takes me back to my childhood in the 70's
This one also was a great buy.. It was on time and plays well. It came on time.. My son loves it. Great buy!
This movie is an instant classic. You'll love the antics as much as the kids.
It is a funny movie. It goes great with the series. It is a must have if you have one in the series.
I ruined a tape of this movie and wanted to replace.  So was able to do it in DVD format.  At a good price and quick.
If you have ever had a dog, you will love this movie.. it is great.. even better with Jim Belushi's comedy
Dog lovers everywhere should really enjoy this film.Jerry Lee (the dog) almost steals the show (and does in several scenes).
The best of the best
This is a completely awsome video. It is one of his best movies ever! Definately one of my best purchases.
I once dated a K 9 cop.  This movie reminds me of him and the dog he handled.  I also liked John Belushi's character.
We saw this movie years ago and wanted something with some humor in it.  This fit the bill.  Thanks, P Pratt
Belushi family has talent. I'm glad to have this movie in my collection again. I am pleased to say the DVD condition was good and it worked well.
Any story with shepherds has to be number one.  Jim Belushi was a great partner for this dog. Made a great team
Stars Jim Belushi. A cop and a police dog that is smarter than the cop, team up to stop crimes
The three movies are totally hilarious.  To have them packaged together is a big bonus.
There is only a few dog movies that I would ever spend money on. It is heartwarming and great family movie for the whole family.
Good movies. Great dog. would love to have the dog. 3 movies in one set. Funny and good story line.
This has got to be a favorite if you love policemen or dogs. The dog steals the show. Tons of laughs.
This is an absolute gem! Olivier and Hepburn are utterly sublime, and the humor is sheer magic. Oh how I wish this was available on DVD.
What a great movie. Great to see Lucille Ball in a dramatic roll. would recommend this movie to anyone who likes mysteries and suspense. Great price.
Good performances and a good film noir movie for Mark Stevens and Lucille Ball.  Has a great cast!
An oldie but a goodie Lucy plays a wonderful part and it is a great movie although old but worth watching I would recommend to anyone
Very touching and tender story.  A young Maggie Smith showing a great future in film.  All in all, a delightful film
A remarkable portrayal of a lady of great authority and convictions: Smith IS Jean Brodie!! A must-see for all of her fans
Intelligent, entertaining dialogue with a few gems interspersed throughout the movie.  This sentence added because 9 more words are required.
Maggie Smith is a really gifted actress.  This was a fun movie to watch.  Will watch it over and over.
Jean Brodie is a pip. Touching, ironic, and full of great quotable lines delivered in a great scots accent, And Pamela Franklin is hot.
Maggie is one of my favorite Actresses, I had never seen this movie before so thought i should get it.
This was a favorite movie for our neighbor.  I purchased it for him as a birthday present.  It arrived quickly and he was overjoyed.
Looking across the world at grand lady  who gave her intellect and teaching skills to advance the education of young ladies.
I loved this movie when it first came out, but I bought it to have Maggie Smith's performance on hand.
I had to have this one for my collection as I think it is one of the best roles Maggie Smith has ever had.
Another holiday classic movie. My wife's favorite.
I love this story and always have, so I'm biased.  I've watched this movie year round.  I believe ... I believe
A good classic.  Love to watch every Christmas
They don't make them like this anymore - they should - They would be shocked at the responses. Good job.
I purchased the remake but felt I needed the original for my library. Natalie Wood was perfect in this role.
I bought this and 3 others for myself for Christmas and they will be a great tradition for our family for years to come!
a wonderful holiday movie it can be a tradition in your family like mine  thanks so much i now have both movies
Have both of them in VCR's much prefer this one so i bought the DVD....delightful
It is the first and best of nay made after it. I've always watched this black and white original enjoying every minute of it.
Thank's , For thegood job in sending it to me . It came in good shape and quicky . ART
THIS IS A WONDERFUL CHRISTMAS MOVIE EVERYONE IN THE FAMILY CAN ENJOY AND LOVE FOR YEARS AND YEARS TO COME
An all time favorite that's been around for some time.  Great movie for everyone to have, for sure.  A must have!
Love to watch this movie with the family on a regular basis.  You won't be dissappointed.  It's good for all ages.
when you watch this it makes you believe even if you know better.....well done and a must for every Christmas...keeps the season right.
One of my favorite Christmas movies. I remember watching it as a kid on our black/white TV. The color version is nice, too.
This is my favorite version of this movie. Another feel-good classic that keeps the faith in good will and humanity alive.
This movie classic is one of those movies you must see every year at Christmas.  Edmund Gwenn is brilliant as Santa.
What's not to like? This movie is a classic and should be shown to future generations to come. You have to &#34;believe.&#34;
Love this movie. It's a must see every year at our house. This is a classic movie. Packaging was great.
The best christmas movie made.Its timeless.
Excellent!  A favorite for years!
Great family movie that is exactly as you remember it.  A welcome addition to your family DVD library.  Wish they made these nowadays.
Even in black and white, this movie outshines all the updated attempts of this amazing Christmas classic!  It's simply timeless!
The movie was given as a gift. The person who received it was very happy that it in color and black and white.
This is an all time favorite that we watched on TV for years. We are very happy to have it in our collection.
This is a wonderful family-type movie. Natalie Wood is so cute in it. Maureen O'Hara is as good as ever.
One of my favorites since I was a child, plus like the black and white.  Good remake with the new one also
I have always loved the depth of this movie especially the commentary on psychology as a profession and how damaging it can be young people!
I can't heap anymore praise on this film.  We all know that it's a classic!  Five (hundred) stars!!
My wife and I enjoy watching this movie every year.  It's a classic story that never grows old.  I highly recommend this movie!
This movie brings back wonderful childhood memories along with being TOTALY delightful! Brings you back to the way department stores used to be!
Movies like this make Christmas very special.  Another classic Christmas tale no house can do without.
This movie is one that I must watch each year. The acting and storyline are top rate. This gets me into the spirit of Christmas
This is such a great movie. The acting is superb,  the costumes  are so period,  and there us no re-make that can do it justice!!!
Guess my wife figured we needed it in the cabinet to watch all year is why she bought it.  I am sure we will enjoy it many times.
Come on now!  We all know this is a classic at Christmas or any time of the year that you need to believe again!
Seriously, this is a classic in my household. Love this version (not the new one). Watch it every year at Christmas and it still touches my heart.
I love this move!  Spouse and I watched it last night and love it.  Have wanted for a long time.
Although black and white is great the color adds a new twist.  You will enjoy this seasonal classic. The past is great.
Watch this movie with children. The will along with adults believe in Santa. What a great Christmas movie. Great Blu-Ray edition.
What can yo say about an old classic?  This is one of those you must see.  Something about how they made movies back then was really neat.
this is a good movie, may be a little serious for my nine year -granddaughter but her Mom wil watch it with her and she will enjoy it
One of my fav's! They did a nice job of remastering the old movie which makes it very enjoyable to watch.
This is my favorite Christmas movie of all time.  I highly recommend it to everyone!  In Blu-Ray, it is even more amazing
One of the best!!!  An absolute christmas classic!!!  This offers a color version as well as the black and white version which is my favorite!!!
Of all the Christmas movies, Miracle is still my favorite.  It looks terrific in Blue Ray.  Edmund Gwenn is terrific.
Mom loved because it is the classic version and the true mircale on 34. Better than all the remakes that have been made.
This is the original Miracle on 34th St. It is in color. We just enjoyed it. I will pass this move down to our children.
thanks for the tape.  i have loved this movie for along time.  it ani't christmas unless i get to what this movie.
What a sweet, heartwarming story of faith & love - not just in Santa Claus but in each other as well.
Better than the newer versions. Loved that it was black and white or colorized. Great classic movie! The way movies should be today as well!!!
This is a classic just like It's a Wonderful Life and should be watched by everyone every year-----great, great movie.
What can I say, It is a great movie.  One that the whol family will enjoy.
I could not fault this movie A++++++++++++++++++++++++Edmond Gwen was and is the real Santa
This is a wonderful Christmas movie. If you love old movies this is a perfect one to get.
This is a classic, wonderful Christmas movie!  A must have for your Christmas movie collection.  And I got it for a great deal!
This is one of the best Christmas movies out of the past, and I enjoy watching it with my family every year.  Happy with purchase.
Love this movie. There is nothing better that a classic Christmas movie anytime of the year. Will watch over and over.
For all Christmas lover's this Movie is a must-have for your collection.  This movie is enjoyable and will be loved by your whole family!
Watched the color version by mistake.  Will watch the classic black and white next Christmas;  Great movie to add to my collection.
A GREAT STORY TO BE SEEN AT CHRISTMAS TIME THAT WILL MAKE YOU FEEL NICE ALL OVER AT ANY AGE.
Now, really! Christmas isn't all Christmas should be without watching one's favorite Christmas movies. Bonus! Maureen O'Hara in lead role!
This is my favorite version of the classic Christmas story, Natalie Wood is great, cute as a little girl and very believable!
A Christmas classic - Natalie Wood and Maureen O'Hara are great as the mother/daughter in this with a great supporting cast.
You can never go wrong with this movie.  Even my kids love this as a classic Christmas movie. Merry Christmas.
I was four when this movie came out and it is a classic.  Always magical and always heartwarming.  Love it! Looks like Christmas when I was a child.
A perpetual Christmas favorite, this was part of a CD movie pack that I gave my hubby for Christmas. We both love it. Thanks for the speedy shipping.
This is a great movie and to get it in a Special Edition was a bonus.  I love this classic movie and am glad to retire my VHS for this DVD.
I have always loved this movie.  I just wish it had been the black and white version.  Great Classic !
All time classic. I have watched this movie sinceI was a small child. It was a tradition on Christmas Eve. Wonderful movie.Would recommend.
I love this movie.  A must have movie.  A must see for those who have not seen it. Wonderful movie.
Miracle on 34th Street 91 (1947) is a great movie and well acted and that is why I gave this a 5 star rating. Recommended for all ages.
A true classic that can't be replaced.  The actors in this are so great, and the video is wonderfully made!
One of my favorites.  I watch it every year and never get tired of it.  A classic for all times.
Love this movie, teaches us to believe in things we don't think are possible, a very good job of showing how to trust ohers
It is just a wonderful movie. Has a nice story line and can be watched by all ages. It lets you believe again.
Who  couldn't believe after watching this classic movie.  Acting is darn good.  Wish all movies were so jolly.  Merry Christmas !
classic must have along with its a wonderful life and white Christmas. It brings back so many childhood memories at my grandparents house.
This is one of the all time Christmas Classic movies and a must have for any Christmas movie collection. In B/W or color
Great movie and always a classic and the old VCR copy broke so needed a new DVD set to see
The Mircle on 34th Street.This is the only version to watch.  Yes, Santa does exist.This is a true classic to watch every Christmas.
This movie is a Christmas classic and no matter how many times I see it I never tire of it.  You don't find movies like this anymore.
This is a timeless Christmas classic. It may appear &#34;old&#34; to some, but should be viewed by each generation of kids and adults alike.
This DVD has both the colored version and the original black and white. Great bonus features. If you enjoy fun movies this is for you.
Great classic movie
As I stated, another good one. I am not for remakes but this was actually a good one although the classic is still much better
To me, having seen all the remakes , this is by far the best, the most believable, and the one. I wanted to own.
Packaged good and arrived early. I like the black and white version better, but is cool you can see how they looked in color as well
we have quite a few Christmas movies that we rotate and watch each season, this is an old favorite I added to our collection.
This is my favorite version of Miracle on 34th Street. It brings back a lot of memories form my childhood. I would highly recommend it.
Bought this and other classics to add to our collection. Great price...no shipping!! We're very pleased.
This is an everlasting Christmas classic movie. Great. All the family love it and we watch it every year. Must have.
the movie is an all time classic i am most happy with it and found it to be in good condition when i received it
This is timeless.  Great quality.  Appropriate for all in the family.  We watch every holiday season and it never seems to get old.
my all time favorite, i hate searching for for it on TV on Christmas day. I was able to watch it while preparing xmas dinner
This was a Christmas present for a 7 year old who loved the story and appreciated that it was colorized!
This was a double treat because it has two versions, one color and one B&W.  What more is there to say about this classic.
purchased as a gift  it's a classic for a friend up dating their library to DVDs It's a classic  wonderful story
This is such a wonderfully done movie, and not as twee as most yuletide movies that have children in them.  Wouldn't recast a single role.
I gave this Christmas classic movie to my daughter, who enjoyed it as much as I did.  She was very pleased with the gift.
We have always loved the story.  This blue ray edition adds great detail and clarity to one of our favorite holiday movies.
A Christmas classic that will be replayed for years to come.  We bought this to replace the VHS version.  Fast shipper.
This is a treasure of a movie to own. It's quality is exceptional a great find. I'm very pleased to own this DVD.
Funny movie! Mind candy with a lot of truth. Every man should see &#34;Every Girl Should Be Married&#34;. For his own good! LOL
This DVD is great for Cary Grant fans. My mom loves this movie. It is about romance and has old fashioned values.
I have always loved Cary Grant and I think this is one of his best movies ever!  It's a darling movie!
This movie is a very funny movie, if you love Cary grant you should have this one in your library.
I think I've watched this movie at least 50 times since getting it!  Fun movie!  A classic!  Cary Grant and Irene Dunne make a great team!
Just a classic wonderful, heartwarming movie. How can you not love Cary Grant and Irene Dunne. Just wonderful wholesome entertainment.
Very cute romantic movie. My mom really liked it. A wife that is presumed dead returns and the fun starts!! Cary Grant is great as usual.
I saw this way back when I was a kid and thought it was romantic and fun - and I really enjoyed seeing it again!
great comedy and very very funny
How can anyone not love this movie?!?!?!?! Well acted. Lots of fun! An oldie and goodie! Cary Grant and Irene Dunn. A very enjoyable combination.
Performance of his character is flawless and as a result I have purchased at least another six or seven of Bogart's films.
Grabs your attention in the beginning and never lets go!  Excellent cast, well acted.  I would recommend this movie.  Humphry Bogart at his best
Two veterans, Bogart and March, put on an acting clinic under another veteran's direction (William Wyler) and it couldn't be more fun to watch.
Bogie is a screen legend.This film is another gem from the 'man'.Bogie plays a heavy and is superb,as usual.
This movie is great, so many one liners that I still use with friends today.  I loved this movie was a kid and it carries over, still a classic.
This is such a cute movie, I really like the 80's and 90's movies. most all girls in middle school with love this
This movie is so good that grown men aren't even embarassed to admit they've seen it.
I remember when this movie first came out and how much I laughed. Still does it for me. Great family entertainment.
i loved this movie as a kid and now i get to share it with my kid! she loves it too!
Classic fun!
I loved this movie when I was a kid.  Now that my daughter is in scouts it was a good family movie to watch and laugh
A wondeful camping designer movie. It will make you laugh all the way through. the fashion rocks and everyone will enjoy it.
good family movie the underdog type fight against a would be know it all... nice view at showing kids there is worth in anything you do
Such a great 80's movie! This brings me back to my childhood. Fun, exciting, and cheezy beyond comprehension makes this a choice for all ages.
one of shelley long's best movies!she's warm,witty and quite humorous and  has a great supporting cast!
I love this movie. I have watched it alot but enjoy it every time. I just love Shelley Long.
I have loved this movie since I was younger. I love the setting and how the movie ends. Love it.
I was so surprised that I found this movie it is hard to buy at video stores. A great mystery. I love it.
Fair price for so much.  The quality is good especially since this is a fairly old BBC series.  I am loving every minute.
We finally went through all the sets of DVDs from all the Jeremy Brett's Holmes, and every one was a gem
Arrived in excellent condition. It's a classic and it is very difficult to find Jeremy Brett as Sherlock Holmes for such a low price.
Brett- arguably the best 'Sherlock'. Basil Rathbone is probably the best. Cumberbatch is awesome too!This series took me on a nostalgic trip
Good price and service.  Have all the J. Brett Holmes collections, he's the best Holmes of them all.
Jeremy Brett brings Holmes to life on the dark moors of england.  A very accurate film portrayal of the book
I have several other dvds of JB's rendition of the British sleuth. This one is my favorite because the stories are longer.
Jeremy Brett really fit the Sherlock Holmes character .  Couldn't stop watching these 5 discs until I'd seen them all.  It really is a good buy.
The Granada production is incredible. The sound track is crystal clear.  Jeremy Brett is the definitive Sherlock Holmes.
The movie is the closest that I have seen is following the original story.  The acting was very good and the scenery beautiful.
Man Richard Pryor and Gene Wilder are such a great comedic duo, this movie is no exception, check it out!
These two in action...It doesn't get much better than this.  You gotta watch this movie.  I'm surprised it's not a cult classic.Cheers...
I saw this movie before and it rocks!Rated R for strong language and nudity.Canada:14A.
What can I say about Richard Pryor and Gene Wilder.  This is one of several films they've made together and this one makes me laugh.
now this is what you call a comedy movie  I wist they did movies like this to day  the pic q is top q
Clean and absolutely original humor. I was literally laughing the entire time. IF YOU WATCH ANY MOVIES, WATCH THIS ONE.
This is a great film! Everyone in it is fabulous!  This is a must have a lot of twist and turns.  This one will keep your interest! Recommended!
The movie was interesting watching ll the turns and chagnes in the movie. I've shared it with several members of our friends and family.
I bought this for my husband because it had the town of Bridgeport, CA in it.  He loved the movie.  I like Robert Mitchum.
How great can Mitchum look?  As good as he does in this old flick!  But then he was a hunky bad boy & great actor!
If you like bad girls on film here is the Queen Bee!Those cold lifeless eyes and double crossing heart.It is worth buying this movie just for that.
Out of the past is a great old movie. Interesting story and good acting by all, especially the principal actors.
This is a very good take on on a very human,D. H. Lawrence novel. It has an excellent cast. And a very good feel for the time period.
A little too much emphasis on the saphic subplot but otherwise fairly good as adaptations of Lawrence's work.
From start (wonder what makes a man's stomach carry on so, Miss) to the end (How are you Mrs. Ullnot?&#34; it's a joy to watch and a joy to live.
I think its Bogarts best film.Finally on Blu-ray and can be enjoyed over and over again.Thank you guys who put this film on Blu-ray.
even after all these years the story line and acting are riveting and engaging.  so good to see real oscar quality acting.
This is a real classic. Put together two great stars and this is what you got...doesn't get much better than this
bought for my mom. she has Alzheimer's and is really enjoying watching the old classic movies! gh rete ertre rte
The movie African Queen is a great old film of simpler time with two of the great actors and a good story to tell.
Maybe the best of Bogie's films.  I loved how they played off each other.
I am not a Humphrey Bogart fan but I have always loved this movie.  Had not seen in in many, many years.
Those two actors are the best out of the 40's. The dialogue was real; and, the fear and danger were real as well.
Adventures of a reluctant hero and the woman behind him.  A wonderful story of an unlikely relationship that is wholly believable.
How could anything go wrong with these two great stars in a movie.? Both funny and charming. And so colorfull!
I have always loved this movie and just wanted to see it again. Its a clasic Love Hepburn and Bogart
Superb acting. One of the truly great performances of Hepburn and Bogart. This movie will have a place of honor in my dvd collection.
This is one of the few movies that should never be re-made. It's a classic and is a perfect example of the way acting should be.
Bogart does it again with a superb performance in this very suspenseful and successful film for everybody to relish and be thankful for!!!!!
Bogart and Hepburn - and the entire supporting crew........makes this an All Time Classical edition to my library of THE BEST DVDs made.
Excellent. Arrived on time, played perfectly, have waited to replace my VHS copy. Thank you.
a great movie to watch, how hepburn and bogie are stuck together and have to make a go of it, despite their differences.
The movie has a good basis and carries out interest from beginning to end.  The acting is perfect as are the actors.
I love this movie, can watch it over and over, they are really cute together in this in spite of the real storyline being one of war and death.
Such a fine mix of actors put together!  It was funny and kept my interest worrying if the famous two would survive their dilemma!
This is one of the best of the best.  Great in every way.  Stars, direction, filming...all tops!  A necessity in every collection.
While the rendering could be a bit brighter (maybe it's my TV), it's extremely good for a movie shot for 1951.
A great Bogart-Hepburn movie to add to any collection.  The quality of the video is very good.  Hightly recommended to everyone.
The cast, director & crew went through hell to film a wonderful script on location, at times with disastrous personal results - but for us, worth it!
Bogie and Kate. Enough said. Spectacular direction by John Huston. I enjoyed it as a kid. I still enjoy it.
The movie came in perfect condition - as always!  You simply CANNOT go wrong with an old classic romance like The African Queen!
I saw this movie in high school and loved it. Now that its on DVD I had to have it, and it lived up to the memories.
Without a doubt, Bogie's best performance and I have seen all of them. Hepburn is superb as prim and proper &#34;Rosie&#34;.
one of the best films ever made. The movie was two people and they keep ne clued to the screen every time. Not many actors can pull that off
The service received from this business was wonderful.  This movie reconnects us to the past, when life was not so busy.
Only one question.  Why is this classic not on DVD???
Clasic "stormy Romance". Very good plot and action. Every one should have thismovie and pass it on to new generations.
This is just one of the best movies ever made. If you have never seen it take the time to watch. The performances are great and so is the story.
I saw this movie years ago and loved it then and love it now! Great acting by both actors! Super!
What a pair!! Couldn't imagine Bogart in a comedy but he really outdid himself, as did Hepburn. Good job, great photography, quite entertaining.
What more can you say about this movie, that's not been ad already.Dynamite cast, dynamite Director, dynamie photography. Great acting, great story.
The color was fantastic! The movie is just as good as I remember, after seeing it years ago. Well worth my purchase.
I hadn't seen this movie in decades - since seeing it again, I have a whole new appreciation for the superb acting and quality storyline.
You can't get any better than Bogie and Hepburn.  They are great together and this is a classic
I've had a fuzzy home recording for years and finally couldn't resist the price. It's nice to watch such a great pair of actors clearly.
I have always loved this movie. Now I have it in my collection and I can watch it when ever I'm needing a good cry.
One of the greatest movies of all time.  Classic Bogart and Hepburn - awesome supporting cast.  Timeless story that never gets old for me.
Same good story as ever now in color.A very small cast is all it took to make a timeless classic.
Humphrey Bogart and Katherine Hepburn!  What a combination in this entertaining story of World War II intrigue mixed with romance and adventure.
defines classic and brilliant film making.
Beautifully restored video and sound on the disc. Top quality and great film. Easy to use menu very happy with this DVD.
This is a great film....if your a fan of claymation then this is a must have!Truly is great for all ages!!!!!
My almost 3-year-old granddaughter loves this movie - she watches it often at my house.  She loves the animated movies.
Really cute movie great for kids animation  was good thank you for letting me rate this movie it was a good one
Art Carney was spectacular in this movie.  He deserved all the accolades he received.  Touching theme, sad ending.
It really shows you what matters in life.  I would recommend this DVD,, if you enjoy family moves and pets, or have an elderly relative
Excellent movie..very nicely done. Art Carney in a great role for him...he was very talented! You will enjoy his cat &#34;Tonto&#34; also.
A real tear-jerker of a movie.  My family really enjoyed it.  We saw in on TV first, but immediately knew that we wanted a copy.
I usually don't like to pay $16 for a dvd, but this one was worth it.  I really enjoyed it.  I recommend getting it if you are considering it.
you'll love it or you'll hate it . you might fall somewhere in the spectrum in between . i do not like green eggs and ham . check it out .
This is a wonderful story about a man with a low IQ who is turned into a genius and back again. Poignant and true to the original story.
Cliff Robertson showed what he could do in the starring role. A very good movie. Recommended for those who take their acting roles seriously.
Loved this film on the big screen...had to add it to my GOOD gilm film collection!
It came as described, in perfect condition and played great, but the movie a classic, took me back to my youth, thanks again.
Always liked the sequel and was unable to rent it. Great price, great product. Came in excellent condition. Thanks!
I GREW UP WATCHING EDDIE AND THE CRUISERS BACK WHEN THEY CAME OUT IN THE 1980'S.BOTH OF THEM ARE TWO OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES OF ALL TIME
I love this movie. The music was awesome. the movie was great and I love the band and the romance also.
Great music....as a musician, appreciate the story. Highly recommend  "Just A Matter of Time" & "Garden of Eden".
The sequel is a winner and its a big 10.The music rocks again.I would recommend this movie to anyone.
Great rock-star fantasy.  If you were ever in a band, or wanted to be, you've gotta see this!  It's just a lot of fun (and great music).
The actor passed away so no more ernest  moviesbut I watch his movies over and over again yearly great
This has to be one of the most funniest Christmas movies of all time.  I have always loved the Ernest movies.
Jim Varney is quite a character god rest his soul. This movie takes me back to when I was a kid and my kids will watch it as well.
The best Ernest movie ever!!! We watch it every Christmas and can't wait to see it each year...
This is one of my favorite Ernest movies, as well as Christmas movies.  If you're an Ernest fan, you'll love this movie.
Ernest Saves ChristmasReally great hilarious movie for Ernest, nothing more needs to be said fantastic.
Jim Varney's acting is missed in this house. My kids enjoyed his antics and morals of his shows always showed through
This is a great holiday classic! Ernest Saves Christmas is loads of fun, I'm happy to have found it at such a great price!
What could be better than Ernest at Christmas. This is a family tradition to watch this movie every year. Love it.
REALLY REALLY LIKED THE MOVIE AND WAS WORTH WHAT WE PURCHASED IT FOR AND WOULD BUY MORE ONE DAY SOON
Ernest in a delightful Christmas story showing his fantastic acting in a comedy. A very fine Christmas story for the whole family to watch
This is one of my three all time favorit Christmas movies. My husband and I watch it every Year at Christmas time.
For the Christmas movie fan, this is a must.  Ernest P Worrel is always a guaranteed laugh, but this one has some heart too.
I love the Ernest movies and this one is probably the best.  I try to watch it every year.  I also love that it was filmed in my hometown of Orlando!
Ernest was my hero!! Simple minded and a great heart! Family fun and laughs all around! I would recommend to anyone!
I bought it new and it was just as i remembered this movie Funny Great a Real family movie for everyone to watch.
one of our favorite Christmas movies - glad to find it on DVD
if anybody remembers the old commerial with earnest t. world, then you'll remember the old classic & funny movies he was in & you'll want this movie.
thank for the quick responce . enjoyed the movie . funny , would recamend for whole family very funny .
Always loved the movie,I got it to give someone,Hope they like it as much as I do.here is to Christmas.
This is one of my favorite Christmas movies.  It is fun.  I think that Ernest's love for Christmas is adorable.
Well done and very entertaining. Good acting, photography, color (very clear) story with some believability. A good 40's western not to be past by!
I have always liked this movie ever since I have seen it on TV, I bought it because it is not shown that often.
Very good quality, good color, good story, etc. good shipping, i liked about everything. wish we still had good movies like this today
This early Superman was very good, I wish I could order more. Are there more of these available? I would definitely order it.
This was surprisely very entertaining and held my interest. It's funny hearing the announcement at the end of each episode.
I am a huge fan of all Superman movies and television shows. I have very few that I do not enjoy.
I had seen this when it first came out, I loved it then, and that still hasn't changed. If you like a good war film, this is great.
We liked this movie as a follow-up to the first one.  Anne grows up and goes to school and finally finds love!
Anne of Avonlea and Anne of Green Gables are two of my favorite movies. They are so &#34;wholesome&#34; and good. I feel uplifted each time I watch.
I have always loved this movie and am so glad it is now mine on DVD.
Love Anne of Green Gables it has always been my favorite movie right there next to Pollyanna! This is a day off movie!
Both my husband and I enjoy watching this DVD. We enjoyed watching this series about Anne's life when it was aired on PBS some years ago.
If you enjoyed the beginning of Anne of Green Gables you will love to see what happened next.  My, my, such old fashioned values and so good to see.
Thank you very much.  The box and tapes were in perfect shape.  The video was perfect also.  No problems at all.  Thank you.
this is a movie for alone time,a time to remember the good old days or wish you had them,it is good!good! good!thank amazon.
Anne of Green Gables is a classic.  Love it.  This series is one of my favorite.  You can't go wrong.
I love this writer. I have read all of her books that I could get my hands on. This movies brings her writings to life.
These movies are great for kids in the foster care system during the 40's - 80's.  Very well done.  Thanks!
Megan Follows is great as Anne and continues to do so in this sequel to the first one.  Exciting and full of warmth and love.
DVD in great shape - Megan Follows makes this story worth viewing again and again.
This sequel is almost as good as the original and has the same cast.  Outstanding family fare.Paul Baragona  Raleigh, NC  USA
I enjoy these kind of movies.  Simple, entertaining, clean, good acting.  A good family show which I would highly recommend.
One of my favorites.  Very heart-warming and realistic.  I love the movies and the Anne books because they take me to a different planet every time.
I hope the first two Anne movies get a proper digital remastering someday.The last one &#34;The Continuing Story&#34; really sucks so, don't bother.
I loved the books and I loved seeing the way they were portrayed in this series.  The DVD's are clear both visually and audioly.
This is a great movie!  Love the story, actors, costumes, everything!  Will be sharing it with my nieces this weekend!
if you own the first one than you need to buy this one.  they truely go hand and hand!  just as good as the first and very good for the family!
i will love to show this tv show to people and they will fall in love them just like i did.
Was a gift, so did not open package. Grand children love and requested the selection. Package arrived on time before the deadline.
Weird old classic British film.  Michael Redgrave steals the show as a ventriloquist who's dummy starts talking back to him.
Bought as a present for a person who just had to have it because it was such a good DVD.
Enjoyed it so much!The story and the comraderie of the crew was so wonderful to see again.LiveLong and Prosper!Love Spock!
collection.  Only collect ones that Shatner is in.  Don't particularly care for the other &#34;new&#34; Trek ones.  Only Shatner. He is the best.
If you like Star Trek then need I say more?I would imagine you would have watched already.If not take the time.
I enjoy every Star trek movie out there. I also enjoy watching them over and over again. highly recommended in my opinion.
'Nuff said in the title.  it still is one of their best! la la  la... ta ta ta, zoop!and so on!
the acting is great, and the story line is impressive.  It plays well on my computer.  I reccomended it to anyone into star trek.
Star Trek fans just know.  Blu ray gives the film detail and makes the starships look real.  Any Star Trek is good
I really liked this movie I 11 Star Trek's . I have 2009 Star Trek that is verygood movie too.
Almost the last one to complete the series in my collection - being a sci-fi fanatic - I love this one
THIS UNCUT VERSION ROCKS REALY ALOT BIGGER AND BETTER THERES EVEN A MUSIC VIDEO
Yep, This is the character that got me hooked on this series! Yes the series was really good! Still, I haven't purchased this item yet.
ONE OF THE BEST BODY BUILDERS OF ALL TIMES.GREAT JOB LOU.
I enjoyed this movie and pleased it was still available, even if used.  Pleasure to do business with the Company that sold the product.
I watched this on my computer, and the color, sound and picture were all excellent. I enjoyed it very much.
Alan Ladd is one of my favorite actors. I had not seen this film. Yes. It's an old movie. I thought it was pretty good for an old movie. Kinda mushy.
This is still a timeless movie! It's great for those who are Odd, The Dreamer and The Original. In a world that expects normalcy, Fight On! Dream On!
Really took a flyer on this Movie and didn't have clue what to expect.  What I got was a lot of laughs. I'ts Goofy Funny.
This movie rules and needs to be released on DVD. Thank you!
Anything with Weird Al in it is automatically hilarious.  UHF is a classic comedy and should be seen by anyone needing a spirit lift.
Great movie that I grew up as a kid watching. Weird Al is great in it. Who wants to drink out of the fire hose? LOL
One of the great cinema classics. If you watch this and don't say &#34;Wow! This is the greatest movie EVER!&#34; There is something wrong with you.
I'VE ALWAYS BEEN A FAN OF WEIRD ALS. WELL THIS IS HIS BETTER ACHIEVEMENT. I THINK HE SHOULD DO ANOTHER MOVIE.
This one is a good one to get if you like his music and movies. this one is for any fan of his.
This is a very funny movie. I cant wait till the dvd comes out. If you havent seen it do and you will be laughing the whole way through
this was a gift to a very special friend who likes this movie very much and wanted another copy of it
Probably one of Steve McQueens greatest movies. Only this one can happen!
I really enjoyed this movie.  the cast did a great job of making the film look great. i would reccomend this for all friends.  thanks barbara
Ordered for a friend.  He loved it.  Had wanted it for a long time.  Said no glitches and was as he remembered it.  Good color, etc.
this movie is a movie that  be beat it is the movie of all time they  knew how to make movies with this one thanks
This is agreat classic movie that was unique because Steve McQueen and Paul Newman, who were competitive actors, costarred together in.
I got this to add to my 70's disaster movie collection and a perfect addition to the collection in general..
One of the movies you have to watch to believe, so typical of it's time, but good special effects, only downer is seeing OJ Simpson
Great old movie from my childhood was also a great movie again for my kids. It made for good family night.
this is Great movie for those who like irwin alllen movies nice collectable great effects for its time. old school fire fighting.
Great movie. Plently of fast action in this one.Well written of a story and produce. Plently of movie stars in this one.
A classic great movie
One of my favorite disaster movies. I've always liked Steve McQueen in whatever role he's portrayed.  A good movie to watch over again.
this is one grear movie the towering inferno with an all star cast and the bluray is great the picture is very clear and the audeo is excellent.
Dated movie but very typical of the time it was done.  Coburn plays the womanizing, invincible spy.  Sort of a spoof of spy movies in general
This is such a great spy spoof.  A true classic that stands the test of time.  This is one of James Coburn's best performances.
Had to have this collection. Have Matt Helm collection and had to get this too. Two very good films. A lot of fun and great looking ladies!
it was very nice going back to the 60's and seeing the future..He is afterall, the American James Bond !! It is a great addition to any collection!!
Love to watch James Coburn andreally enjoy this character he plays in these movies and was happy to  see you had them.
Way before James Bond, Flint was the super hero who had the wit, charm, and charisma to save the world.
James Bond -- Suave, debonairre, the penultimate spy.Derek Flint -- James Bond had the neat stuff. Flint had all the girls.Need I say more?
Funny funny all the way and 60zs eye candy their was reviews of these in old playboys . It's kinda like Austin powers funny as s***
America's answer to 007...James Coburn makes a great secret agent. I grew up with these movies. I am glad they are on DVD
These are strange movies, odd and all but I really like James Coburn and he did a great job.  I would recommend to anyone who is a Flint fan.
this is a great movie, and looks great on blu-ray! I'm very I got this. I love it! thank you!
i love this movie bc its has one of my wife in it and her name is danielle harris and she now older and around my age too (:
This is the 5th of a killer movie series! There is no better movie than this! I can't get enough of this series!
ALL OF THE HALLOWEEN MOVIES ARE JUST AWESOME AND REAL CLASSIC SCARY HORROR.....THESE ARE GENUINELY A CLASSIC HORROR OF ALL TIME ..............GLORIA
one of a number of the mchael myers we purchased because we love the movies and wanted to have the whole collection recommend highly
Michael Myers is ruthless and full of rage in this Halloween sequel.  I recommend this movie to all Halloween fans.
this is a great movie for the halloween season. great acting, good story I will watch it many times at the season
I've always liked the Halloween films for as long as I can remember and this looks amazing on blu ray.
I enjoy all the movie that he was in the Halloween's ones. this one is for any fan of Donald pleasence.
I like this movie as well and it has a really good storyline too. I like the death scenes in the movie also. I would recommend this movie.
I have watch this movies all the time, just like them so much. I don't know why just  like them.
Great movie and quality.  These movies are good for a scare without witnessing the blood and gore.  Gave the entire collection as gift.
Love the old horror movies. I got room for plenty more in the shelf. Watching old nastalgia like this makes feel like a kid.
Received dvd in great condition and it was on time. If you have 1, 2, &4...you must have 5 :) cheesy but awesome!
If you haven't seen this awesome movie, you are missing out.  It is very compelling.  It is one movie that makes me cry.  Great movie about humans.
Classic, great movie with lots of well known actors. Cant say a bad word about this movie!! Great for your collection!!
Well worth the money.  Great story.  Don't pass this one by.
This was a great movie when I first saw it and it still is a great movie. The Dvd arrived in great condition. Played it as soon as I got it.
excellent. breathtaking. no futher comments. its one of my all time favorits. I love watching movies that involve water and underwater.
It's a classic
I saw this movie just a coulple of weeks ago and really liked it. This weekend I'm buying both the origanal and the specil edition! RENT IT!
Classic old movie, very funny and great effects for the time. A bit of harsh language, but great family movie. A+
One of my favourite movies. Love the visuals and the premise behind the movie. The actors performed well and an excellent story line.
I loved this movie and when someone took this one I had to have another one.  The movie was in excellent condition.  Thanks
Nice movie that shows how much we have to learn to each other before we are ready to meet anybody form outside or our planet.
i enjoyed this movie great actors very interesting check it out if you like underwater adventure
Terrific movie...shipped quickly so I could enjoy watching it soon after ordering it. Adventurous, great CGIs and good acting.  Just buy it.
This DVD and its cover is in perfect condition! Delivery time was fast.I'd give a 6 star if I could.  Thank you so much!
One of the best Sci-Fi of all times i think, i had not seen it in years.  So when i saw part of it on tv the other night i had to buy it, so i did.
This is one of my favorite newer movies.  As a person who usually buys movies of the 40's and 50's,  I love this for my collection.
One if my all time favorite movies.  Epic special effects and great all around movie.
one of the best underwater movies ever done and still stands the test of time I may add excellant... Must own
Love this. Working on getting all DVDs. Have over 500 movies on VHS. Starting with &#34;A&#34;. Soon will be selling the VHS
This is a GREAT film. When do we get it on DVD?
This is a wonderful movie.  Wonderful cast.  Wonderful story.  This movie will make you mad, sad, and glad.  I recommend this seller.
I got this movie for my husband and he really enjoyed it. He has seen all Karate movies to date.
I have watched this movie alot and love it even more each time.  The older oriental man is a fantastic actor.
I bought this DVD just to have in my collection. Its a classic and I bought all the Karate kids just to have and show my future children!  :-)
this may be my favorite movie, very well done with a great story line, teaches kids a good lesson. my be my favorite of the series.
I truly enjoyed this movie of a love story and the particular love of a Man for his children.
I ordered this movie for a friend who does not have a computer. He enjoys the movie.
I have loved this movie forever and am so happy with the purchase.  All time great.  I love that dog
I loved this movie. It was great to watch. It has great funny parts. The dog is great. Also cutie.
this was the greatest show i love it funny funny have a great day to all of yall ty bye
This movie I just loved.  the DVD was recently purchased to replace the VHS copy I had.  I am doing that with several of my VHS movies.
I saw this years ago and now with my kids and I still find it to be a wonderful movie.  The kids loved it, even my teenager.
movie for my mom. she loves all animal movies. they make her happy. lfjowf dfjow owjf woejff woiej wofj lfajf
I actually got this movie for my 6 year old for Christmas. She loves it, we all get together as a family and watch it, Its a Classic and Funny!!
Tom Hanks at a younger age, and even then a wonderful actor. This movies makes us cry, laugh, and everything between.
We have seen this movie so many times and always love it. Tom Hanks is great, as usual and you have to love that dog!
Only part I didn't like was the dog didn't make it.........Almost as bad on the heart as Old Yeller............:0(  Good acting and great dog.......
THe dog steals the show..Anyone who has ever owned a mischievous dog will enjoy this film!! Hanks is great too.
I loved this movie.  It is one I will watch over and over. Tom Hanks did a fantastic job with his part, and so did the dog.
I love this movie. It has comedy, action, and is a tear jerker! Worth the price it's offered as.
This movie is awesome. It is filled with laughter throughout. One of Tom Hanks best movies I think.
I love Tom Hanks, but his supporting 'actor' - the Hooch Pooch, makes this movie Great!  I highly recommend this movie for everyone!
My kids loved this movie when it came out. Tom Hanks is great as a detective and the dog is fabulous.
A drooling dog, enough said. My kids love this movie, that is full of heart. Tom Hanks is adorable as per the norm back then.
Tom Hanks at his best ,this movie is great,funny human and dog story,funny happy and sad it has them all.The kids always loved to watch this movie.
Everyone will love this movie, if you own a pet you will love it even more. It even is a great price to boot.
WE just love this movie, it gives lots of laughs that lightens your spirits and it is just good fun.  P Pratt
I'm glad to have this movie in my collection again. I am pleased to say the DVD condition was good and it worked well.
This movie is hilarious. I loved the dog Hooch. He really made the movie. Well worth watching.
i love this movie a great story of a mans best friend.. a heart melting story that will make you watch it repeatedly.
A classic that cannot be remade...even though they tried.  Great acting and great overall movie.
This was a gift, but he enjoyed the movie very much, and I have seen it before, so I know it is a good movie. Was well packaged and came promptly.
bought for my mom. she has Alzheimer's and is really enjoying watching the old classic movies! sdfhqpew9thp egre rtgert retet
The movie An Affair to Remember is a great old film of simpler time with two of the great actors.
Doesn't everyone love this classic romance?  It's been copied or imitated many times, but the original will always hold up.
Great Love Story.  I love this classic romance movie.  One of my favorites of all time.  Happy with my purchase.
A romantic giant of a film. Excellently played by all of the cast. The villa that they visit is a dream.
One of my favorites. It is funny, serious, romantic, and insightful. One of Cary Grant's best movies. Deborah Kerr isn't bad either.
A real classic chick flick. Such a great movie that all women should watch. I would absolutely recommend this movie.
I have seen the original Charles Boyer version.  It was good but this Cary Grant/Deborah Kerr version is better.
This is a great movie. I got this as a gift for my mom's birthday. Ihave only watched it once, but I loved it.
I love this movie. I sure hope Cary Grant was a Christian. Would love to meet him in heaven someday.
A three-hanky classic that sparkles with bright witty dialogue throughout. Deborah Kerr and Cary Grant lend a special charm throughout.
This is one of my all time favorite movies.  But, yes, you definitely need a box of Kleenex at the end.
An old favorite that I will watch over again. Some classic love stories just never get old and this is one of them.
Great acting and a wonderful musical score.  Have seen it many times and enjoy it every time. One of my favorite movies
Love this movie and was happy to get it.l...A really great story and enjoyable cast, love that it is mentioned in Sleepless in Seattle
I think they were passionately in love in this movie for real.  Sophia was trying to deceide between Cary and Ponti.  Ponti won!
I enjoy this moving ever time I watch it. Its definitely a tear jerker, thats why I had to have the dvd
Great Cary Grant movie, one of my husband and my faves.  Have on vhs and wanted to replace with dvd.
I love this movie and am so glad to have it.  I had it on VHS and just recently wanted to update my old movie collection.  Great movie.
Best movie ever made! Cary Grant excellent, Debra Kerr outstanding! See it, rent it, Buy it! A classic must see.
This one is truly a classic.  Everyone, from 13 years up, should watch this movie.
This movie is well done.  It is very entertaining and a Cinderella story worth watching!
A sentimental story by 2 stars who do it justice.  Nice escape movie on a cold evening.  It won't disappoint.
I WATCHED THIS DOZENS OF TIMES GROWING UP. IT IS BY FAR ONE OF OR THE BEST LOVE STORIES EVER.YOU WILL NEVER BE DISAPPOINTED WITH THIS.
Since I was young I have watched this movie and was elated to be able to own it great price too
this is a movie for the ages, it is a great movie you can watch over and over and never get tired of it
This is a classic movie. I had to have it. I always watch at Christmas and now any other time I want too.
I'm an old Military man.  Tears filled my eyes.  One of my favorite classics and I'm happy with the DVD.
This was a wonderful feel good movieI would recommend it to everyone. very good classic love story. :)absolutely loved it.
This is one of my very favorite movies ever!  The DVD is in Great condition & was a very good price!!
I have see this film many times over the years and never tire of it.  Every time I watch it I enjoy it as much as I did the first time.
The DVD was good.  This is my favorite Cary Grant movie, so I wanted it for a keepsake to remember my Mom.
brilliant and fabulous
There is no over-emphasizing the beauty of this classic.  Carey Grant and Deborah Kerr at their finest.
Tracy and Hepburn. A pair made in heaven. Adams Rib, Pat and Mike. Their chemistry is undeniable.  Love love lovr
great movie with tracy and hepburn. funny romatic story. would recommend it to anyone. all ages could enjoy this i think.
The Desk Set is a fantastic holiday movie along with Auntie Mame. Don't miss this great 1957 classic with Hepburn and Tracy!
Classic, classy, funny...a great escape for an evening. I have watched this movie many times  and each time it delights.
What more could I say about Tracy and Hepburn?  Either you love them or you don't.  I bought the collection so you know where I stand.
I love the Tracy & Hephurn combo.  This movie is fast moving and funny.  I would recommend it to anyone.
This was an older quirky movie and I loved it, in black in white and recommend it for all ages.
Watch it. especially at Christmas time.  The rooftop scene is a classic, not to be missed, as is the scene after they were caught in the rain.
Iconic movie stars and a great story line.  Anyone who likes Katharine Hepburn and Spencer Tracy will like this movie.
Great actors Tracy and Hepburn in nine great movies it is the best collection from their early films to their later ones all were great.
Love old movies. these are good. Good quality. nice case, not like the TCM movies where the DVD's are stacked one on top of the other.
I love Hepburn and Tracy and this was one of the best. Would watch it over and over! Thank You
I got this collection for my mom, and she stated the first disc wasn't T&H, but it was still a good movie.  She enjoyed others as well.
This is the best Spencer Tracy-Katherine Hepburn movie I've ever seen.  Wonderful dialogue and bits, funny, and just plain sweet.
I was very happy with this video and pleased with the service I received.  This video is one of the best ever.
Great for Hepburn/Tracy fans as well as computer nerds - see where it all began with the large tape mounts and punch card input.
This set contains all the great ones - my favorite being DESK SET. Each movie is on its own disc which is a very nice feature.
I can't think of a single Hepburn/Tracy movie that I don't like, but this is one of their best.  They are terrific together!
I have loved this movie since the first time that I saw it. Katie is her wise cracking but eloquent self.
This Is one of my favorites. I love this kind of ghost stories. Gene Tierney is great in the role of Mrs Muir. This is a good family movie, too.
Awesome story.  Happy to finally have it on DVD.  Quite a love story if you've never seen it before.  A must see.
One of my favorite old movies. I don't have 14 other words to use.  why do you require a certain number  of words?
The Ghost and Mrs. Muir is a classic.  They don't make them like they used to.  I miss the old fashioned values movies used to have.
I have loved the movie since the early 1960's.  I still cry at the end! The video is well worth the money!
One of my favorite films, this DVD was a terrific addition to my film library and I'd strongly recommend it to everyone.
Love old films & when they become available on DVD I add them to my library. This is a gem.
this is one of my favoritge movies. I have watched it many times.these are two of my favorite actors. thanks for having it
We both enjoyed this one and it brought back some good memories of times gone past. Will be sharing this with family.
this has always been one of my favorite movies.  there are 11 more words required before I can stop writing.
This was always one of my favorite movies. I had not seen it for many years and it still passes the test of time. Great movie!
A true classic that remakes don't do justice to.  A romantic period piece that is casted, directed and filmed to perfection.
This movie is a classic in my opinion. What a story!  Totally entertaining and enchanting.  Do not miss this one.
I love the classic movies ! This one was exactly as described and I was so happy that I could get it on DVD.
i love this movie.i watch it over and over. gene tierney does so good in the movies. buy it and see for your self
This is a movie the whole family can enjoy.  It is a good story with actors that I am sorry to say are no longer with us.
How wonderful that I was able to finally replace my old, beloved cassette with a new DVD that arrived speedily and in perfect condition.  I love it!!
This is a delightful movie, the only objection is the few language items. But otherwise its a very great movie
i watched this movie on turner classic and enjoyed it then so now i can watch it when i  have a desire to see it again
this movie is a classic. I own it and purchased this as a gift. it is a wonderful love story. great performance by all characters.
This is one I wish I had bought many years ago, I couldn't be happier, it's a great movie! This is one everybody should see that has a heart!
I remember watching it with my mom when I was little and grew to love this old movie as much as she does
One of my favorites. Great item for my collection.
THIS IS AN OLD MOVIE BUT A GREAT LOVE STORY, REGARDLESS HOW OLD IT IS.  TOTAL CHICK FLICK SO GET YOUR TISSUES AND SIT BACK AND ENJOY IT. -SMILE-
I am an old movie buff. This is one of many I will be adding to my collection. I enjoy watching when taking some me time.
I always liked this movie and the TV series that they had. Brings back memories. Love the actor and actress.
This great film touched me deeply.I love everything about it.Please do not forgett the tissues.
loved the ghost and loved mrs. muir. this is an old classic that gets better every time you watch it.
THis is a wonderful story - poignant and funny in many places.  I always loved Gene Tierney- if you like old movies, you will love this one.
This movie is a classic, black and white. It is a beautiful love story. I recommend it to everyone to see it.
I am a widower in my 70s and love to watch old movies.This one is great.
I have always loved this movie and was so happy that it worked on my DVD player. One of the best movies of it's time!
Outstanding classic movie. Liked it so well that I lent it to my daughter, and now she wants her own copy!
There has been a few of these movies made, but the original is still the best, even in B&W - very funny!!
This movie was a delight to find! I enjoyed it when I was a teenager and never forgot it. A wonderful movie. I highly recommend it!
As always Rita Hayworth is a fine a performer as she is beautiful to look at.
Great movie great deal love it, nothing like older movies . A Rita Hayworth fans must have in their collection
I love Rita Hayworth, and for anyone that likes old movies please see this. As well as Gilda, another great Rita Hayworth movie.
I bought this as a gift for my father who has always wanted this movie, so I ssurprised him with it for his birthday and he loved it.
SO VERY VERY LOVELY TO AT LAST SEE THIS MOVIE WHICH IMPACTED THE WORLD SO GREATLY.
For the horror buff in you this is a good Jason Movie.  Longtime horror buffs will enjoy this sequel in the series.
The product arrived on time and in mint condition. I purchased this for a gift and they loved it!! Great way to educate on Romero! Thank you!!
This is a good movie to have in your collection, it was the same as I remember, but now my kids can laugh at it too!!
Just a lot of good fun and parody... what else is there to say? Remember the movie from when I was a kid.
I saw this movie back in the 8os and always wanted it it was just a good movie I like louise fletcher.
This is a clasic of the movies with Peter Seller I enjoy thos movie new god in every word thanks
I used to wacth this great movie in the DVD format but, now in blu-ray, it never look better.
A movie favorite.  Plays well.  All as expected.  One of my favorite Peter Sellers roles. With Jack Warden and Shirley McLaine.
Refer To the account I have given above. Once again, an outstanding  and Oscar worthy Performance by the 20th and 21st centuries.
Another Classic!  We plan on purchasing this DVD also.  Very we'll done and Peter Sellers is Gold.  See it if you get a chance.
I'm not certain I fully understand this movie, but it is brilliant Sellers (and a sad but true commentary on mankind.)
Amazing.  What more is there to say?  A wonderful movie, and it looks even better now.
This is an all time classic movie. Peter Sellers should have gotten an oscar for his work in this highly creative and original film
In my top 20 of best movies of all time.  Lot to learn about life from the ending on the pond.
I love the movie ,I had seen it 1 other time and had to have it . I was thrilled when i could buy it
Great movie.  Was excited I found this movie.  The condition of the vhs and the cover where still in good condition.
I have already submitted revies for these three movies.  Please do not contact me again about doing reviews.  Thank you.
This was a gift for my Dad and he really loved it!  He has really enjoyed this dvd and was so pleased to get it!  Perfect gift!!  :)
Two words, Paul Newman  what a great movie, one I saw many years ago & have always loved & one I had to add to my collection
This was a great movie in excellent condition and received on time.  I really appreciate it and will keep ordering.Thank you,Barbara P.
This man, he wowed his audience. He seemed to be so in touch with his character it was amazing. He was one of my favorite actors
this movie oozes heat.  The acting is superb.  great movie for the collector.
Paul Newman and Joann Woodward was a great team on screen and in life.  This is a Paul Newman classic.  Great buy!!!
Another good Paul Newman movie. I like all his films and this one is another good one to have to add to our collection.
Paul Newman And Joanna Woodward made a couple of great movies together,and this was one of them
I like movies with Paul Newman in his earlier filming days. Joanne Woodward is also very good in her role.
All actors were perfectly cast.  Story was intriguing and entertaining.Can be viewed over and over again without becoming boring.
The deep south, a share croppers prospective wooing the rich socialette, who became Newman's wife, a marriage in Hollywood that lasted a lifetime!
This movie was a huge hit when it came out. It catapulted Robert Redford into fame and a very successful career.
Paul Newman, Robert Redford and Katherine Ross, three great actors, great directing, great camera work, great characters, great story. Great movie.
This is a rather fun way of telling a tale of the old west. I enjoyed it and would recommend it as a family movie. thanks, Bobby J.
Good, old western with the best acting you have ever seen.
What more can be said.... one of the greatest westerns ever made!  The start of the buddy pictures.  A great DVD as well with some nice features.
For someone not beging a western fan i found this movie pretty entertaining. This is a pretty good movie i enjoyed it alot.
I forgot how much I like Paul Newman and Robert Redford as a team.This way I have a western to view if there is nothing good on television
Quite entertaining, good acting by two top stars, though the story is loosely based on fact.
Should have won best picture for 1969. How MIDNIGHT COWBOY got it, I'll never know.
This is a favorite of my husband and had to be in our collection. Robert Redford and Paul Newman. Great.
Newman and Redford as Butch and the Kid. A must-see. If, which is highly unlikely, you have never seen it, you've missed a great American film.
It is a movie you could watch over and over again. Plenty of action and  plenty of laughs. Two great actors
Great Movie, well told.
I think this is a great western themed movie to watch of the early days of Paul Newman and Robert Redford.
Great western. Keeps you thinking. If you like westerns of old this is a must see. Good family film to watch.
Humor, Adventure, Scenery, History, Action, Professionalism  This movie is excellent.
This movie is awesome. Tons of special features, which I was really looking forward to. Received it in a timely manner.
My husband and I love this movie.  That is why I ordered it.  It is a movie with great actors.
I was very pleased by this product. It is a DVD I have wanted to own for many years and now I do.
This is one of my favorite movies.  The actors and good and appear to be having fun making the movie.  The soundtrack is outstanding as well.
this is in the top three movies of all time and is in my top two for best westerns of all time. absolutely.
love baseball movies.My father played pro ball, so its a tribute to him as well. I'm adding to my collection all the old baseball movies.
I got this movie as a gift for my husband.  He loves it!  It is one of the best movies ever!
This was an excellent movie and I would recommend it to anyone who loves Baseball.  My wife and I really enjoyed it.
One of the best baseball movies ever.  I ordered it and 2 others for my grandsons who are playing baseball.
ONE OF THE GREATEST MOVIES OF ALL TIME. GARY COOPER AT HIS BEST. A CLASSIC FOR ALL TIME AND ALWAYS WILLBE
Great movie, well acted and written, a true classic. This movie is a tear jerker so be prepared. Even non-baseball fans should enjoy it.
I have watched this film at least 4 times in my life and loved it each time. Wonderful movie.  See this one you won't be disappointed
I gave this movie to my husband for Christmas & he loves it.  He says it's hard to say if it is accurate; but it is a good depiction of the Babe.
Paul Newman was one of the best actors that Hollywood ever had.  The plot? One of a kind.  A must see by everyone.
A wonderful film in every way.  Mason was fabulous and so was everybody else.  A MUST SEE.  One of the very best courtroom dramas.
I have enjoyed Paul Newman's movies for year, and this is one of his best roles.  You'll enjoy this movie!
One of Paul Newman's best performances. It's the fourth or the fifth time I've seen the film. Indispensable.
This is his best acting performance ever.  Truly a first rate drama.  I could watch this movies over and over.
I've seen this picture beforeand always like every time Iseen it again. One of the mostpowerful performance of PaulNewman.
My brother has been searching for this film for years and was so happy when I gave it to him for Christmas.Thank you so much!
The acting in the movie is not the greatest, but the fight scenes are pretty good. Classic movie, I def recommend it.
BEST OF THE BEST IS REALLY ONE THE BEST OF THE BEST FILMS RELATED TO MARTIAL ARTS. GO GET IT IF U HAVE NOT SEEN IT.
I'm a big fan of all the best of the best movies. If you're not in it for the fighting, then watch for the drama.
This is a wonderful and inspirational movie.  Tommy truly depicted the heart of a champion!  Awesome movie and I highly recommend it!
Another great movie... could have been longer, but very enjoyable.
A must see film one of the bestest martial arts films of its kind classic 80s production and great cast, need this on blu ray release! :)
I soooooooooooo love this movie, Great team aspect and dynamic. It was cool, watched it several times. Gonna get it on blu ray
I enjoyed this movie being a vietnam veteren reminding me of things in the country when I was there but not what the sargent did
kind of hard to watch, but still a good movie tough, a very realistic tale of what happens behind the scene of a war.
I really really wish this film were out on Blu-Ray/but I can't fault this for being a DVD.The picture and sound are good/but sadly it's not Blu-Ray
Love Mickey, and got this to add to my collection of Mickey movies. This is one of his first and glad to have it. Thank you Amazon.
one of mickey rourkes earlier movies  done before he became a STAR  he and morgan freeman give first rate performances  5 stars for sure
Was glad to grab me a copy of this movie. Love Mickey Rourke. He is always awesome.Thanks for reading my review.
Mickey Rourke is awesome in this movie. He is the best actor I have ever seen in my life. Terrific portrayal of this character.
This is an old WW2 movie and if you are into WW2 fighting, it is an above average movie. Good action.
One of the classics.  Glad I added it to my musical library.
While musicals were never really my forte, I saw this one at the movies when I was a kid and loved it .... still do. Ray Walston was a HOOT !
Gwen Verdon at her finest.  Great performances by an amazing cast.  Great music and incredible choregraphy.  Gwen Verdon and Bob Fosse - such a team.
Ray Walston movie that is so awesome and terrific to watch.  Can't miss for my collection...
They don't make em like this anymore...great choreography, terrific Gwen, a wonderful musical!  See it!
I liked the movie when I first saw it as a young child.  I enjoy it even more as an adult.
Great movie, great music, great dancing and such a classic premise: selling your soul to the devil. I highly recommend it!
One of the best from the past. It was made before all the foul language, overdone sex and violence. Entertainment for the wh;ole family.
Ray Walston is wonderful as the devil & he & Tab Hunter play off well against each other! If you like musicals, you'll love this one!
I think this movie is very funny and if you love the &#34;good ol'&#34; movies, then you must have this one in your collection.
I just love this movie and was so happy when they finally put it out in DVD format. You will laugh like crazy.
I used to watch it when it first came out and it was great. Then I grew up and started to miss the good 80's movies. I really love Bronson Pinchot!
Have watched movie several times very happy with purchase of these dvd would buy again really enjoyed it thank you
I purchased this due to when the song came outi truly enjoyed the song.  The DVD is good and ourfamily enjoyed watching this.
For a very old movie, this worked great...  No glitches and the sound was perfect...  Even the cover was in great shape for it's age...  Thanks
love it love it this dvd tells it the way it is just like i would like to say to the snobs of the world
Haven't seen this in years and just thought it was time to watch it one more time. Hilarious comedy that's fun for the entire family!
Seen this long time ago on TV, glad I finally got it, all need to cheeck this out
I saw this movie when it came out many years ago and loved it. When I saw it on netflixs I wanted have a DVD of it.
I LIKED THE CHARACTERS AND ENJOY WHERE THEY FILMED THE MOVIE. I ALSO LIKED THEY THEME SONG. IT WAS VERY FUNNY.
This movie is funny and it brought back happy child hood memories,you can't go wrong with movie,it is not a little kid movie.
Love this movie!  Adore Barbara Eden.  Gorgeous and funny :) I hope the series comes out on DVD starring Barbara Eden.
this was one of the funniest movies ive seen in a long time and love watching barbbara eden movies and shows when there on.
I remember seeing this movie when I was a little girl and I love the music. then I found out that they made the movie after the song.
A great funny movie.  Barbara Eden at her best!  I love the Theme song from this movie!  Takes me back to the good old days!
I love the Original Movie , so is great to have , and for A Great price , in Super Condition. In great time.
This is a great movie. I would rather have it in dvd. But still a movie to watch.
it was very scary to see what it could be like if there were a nuclearshowdown that came down to us and another country. I MADE MY LIST!
Let me raise a glass in toast to the filmmakers, and add my voice to the courageous chorus which sings, yes, nuclear war is a bad thing.
This is a great movie that really causes one to think about the world we live in and what would happen should a nuclear event occur.
My brother had me to buy this for him.  He says it was a great movie.  It sounded like something I will have to borrow and watch.
I watched this movie as a teenager and came across it and bought it, brought back memories of my youth a great movie
This movie is not for kids,  Its tells what could happen if we released the missions on each other.  Lost of lives of loved ones and more violence.
I loved this movie because it was so realistic. I just hope that this never actually happens. I would recommend this movie to my friends and family.
We have &#34;Let it Ride&#34; in VHS so obviously of no use anymore.  I plan to buy the DVD.  We absolutely love it.  So funny.
This movie is as hilarious as it is sad. For those who like English humor it is a must see.Totally absorbing.
I saw this video many years ago and liked it then. It was made several years and did not know if it could be found, but Amazon did find it.
Beautiful sites, funny dialog, and good acting make this a great Saturday night watch by the fire.  I highly recommend for your viewing pleasure.
When I feel down I watch this movie...it gives me a smile. Its marriage gone stale and Shirley does something about it.  I enjoy sharing her journey!
Love this film, without reservation.  Anything featuring Tom Conti has my vote!
Finally after years of complaints by loyal fans, someone at Paramount listened and Shirley Valentine will be released on DVD on May 1, 2007.
I haven't seen this movie in years.  I just liked it so much I wanted to have it in my library
I have watched this a few times on Video.  Man oh Man it is beautiful on DVD.  Great story, great scenery.
This movie is a British comedy and &#34;Shirley&#34; plays it well after leaving her nasty husband!  Every woman can identify with this lady!
I believe this to be, very much, in the top four of all of Robin Williams' movies. Nothing short of enlightening.
First time I've ever watched it. Greatly enjoyed it. It made me miss my writer's group form back in the day.
This Movie Is Great. It's a very powerful movie.  It Plays Great Too. Thank You. I recommend this movie to everyone.
You will probably cry but it's really really real real good. So that should even things out I guess. Thank you.
It is a movie that I can see more than once. My son watched it too and liked it. He was in high school at the time.
My son is 16. This was shown at his school and we watched it all the way thru. Heartbreaking and exhilarating at the same time.
I saw this one on VH1 classics on TV and this one is a good one to get if you like poetry  or robin Williams.
Loved the movie when it first came out and love it now.  Wanted my son to experience this great movie.
robin williams at his best this is a classic film. one of my favorite williams movies, good quality color and sound  PAUL.
Watched this back when it was released.  Recently got it on blu ray.  Love this movie!  Carpe diem indeed Robin Williams!
Perhaps the best performance ever by Robin Williams.  This is a must see for any movie fan.
I enjoy the story and the way the actors play their parts. An amazing portrayal of what Jesus makes in our lives. Anne
An excellent classic film. Well acted. Richard Burton is excellent in the lead role and Jean Simmons is a classically trained actress.
I love the movie "The Robe".  Thank you for making it possible to purchase it!  God bless you and your entire team!
Seen this Movie quite a few times and still a great movie, ranks up there with the Ten Commandment .We love Christian movies and you can`t go wrong.
A good movie and very entertaining. I honestly don't think I would have survived way back then,a very trying time.
An excellent moving picture. Is also historical, thought provoking, and biblical. One of my favorites.
Nothing like the old classics to entertain friends and obtain a glimpse of Bible information, great picture quality too, very satisfied.
Great acting performances and movie.  Richard Burton at his very best!!!  Always a delight to watch this movie unfold on screen.
The grander is superb. The acting of the high quality not seen in more recent movies. And they did it under budget.
This is the first CinemaScope movie I ever saw as a child.It is, to me, a very inspirational and the cating and sets are fantastic.
This was a good movie, but I disagree with some of it's writing but the actors ware great I say buy it
A great movie, beautiful costumes, rich set design ... we love this genre: Romans converting to the newness of Christianity. Good acting as well.
this is a classic, the movies of this time where the best, a great story and just a wonderful family movie.
It used to be shown every Easter, and should be again, It is a heart wrenching movie and one of the best.
This is a great and timeless movie and this version has great sound and coloration.  Highly recommended for anytime, not just Easter.  Thank you.
This movie brings back memories of when I was younger.  This is one of my most favorite movies, any time of the year!
This movie was enjoyed by my family when I was a child and will be added to my collection to watch upon my retirement.
The Robe is one the best religios movie ever made.  I love this movie every since i saw it when i was a little girl.
Fist time I've watched this through..What a wonderful story and the love of Jesus showing through.. The acting was superb and scenery was beautiful.
I like any movie that has to do with the birth or death of Jesus Christ and his ministry. This was a great movie.
Beautiful film.  Good acting.  Recommend it.  Amazon does a good job of delivering on time.  I have always been satisfied with ordering from Amazon
Hadn't seen this movie in a long time, and I wanted to add to my Easter movie collection.  It's still a great classic, and worth purchasing.
This movie takes a religious story and tells it like the way it was ment to be told. I found the acting very good.
Another excellent movie.  It's just to bad they don't make movies like this now days instead of the junk now being turned out in Hollywood.
I highly recommend this film.  It is very moving and a beautiful film.  I would give it ten stars if I could.
This is a very good serious type of movie and makes you think about things.  Very good actors and a good drama movie.
It is just like the movie the Robe when I first saw it.It is a good movie. I also think that you will like Ben-Hur movie.Susan P. Keefe
THIS IS A GOOD MOVIE  BUT ITS NOT REALLY BASED ON THE  SCRIPTURES ITS MORE FOR ENTERTAINMENT MOVIE PURPOSES THOUGH
If you are a Doctor Who fan you will like this DVD story is great but special effects are ok.
Very inspirational movies, and in these times of national hysteria,  a  remind of why citizens SHOULD NEVER LET THEIR GOVERNMENT DISARM THEM!
Keys of the Kingdom is an inspiring, wonderful, and exciting movie.  Gregory Peck plays a wonderful part as a priest.
loved the story, the stars, and beauty of the message. simple Christianity--it works. a must have classic for your video library
I rate as I see it (nothing more or less) - I call it as I see it.  I am truthful!!!!
I had forgotten how good it was and enjoyed again as if for the first time.  Gregory Peck is magnificent in it
My favourite movie when I was young, was thrilled to be able to get it on DVD, there were some good sermons in this movie as well, loved it.
If there were more movies like this being made, more people would go to the theaters, and watch less reality TV shows!
Nevefr knew this was a true story until I started watching it.  Doesn't it seem like all great men start with a poor beginning?
Wonderful Christian message and entertaining. This is one of my favorite old movies ( Despite the racist portrayal of the maid at the college.
i think everyone should see this movie, what AN AMAZING PREACHER!! many people did not realize the position he held!!
Must see!  what else can I say.  The message of this film is something that our culture should consider, and by God's grace pursue.
It is the same review that I wrote before. I really like Biblical stories and this in one of my favorites.370663358209
This older movie is so well done.  The color and actors show what real movies should look like.  Timeless my grandkids loved it too.
I thought it's gonna be a melo movie but it turned out to be excellent. I loved watching it. A must see!
Now this was more like it!!! There is no comparision to the above mentioned this is a far superior movie.I loved it even though it was an old movie
This story is fascinating and wonderful. Ruth is courageous and strong. I like to see movies when the women have strength.
This movie is older but very well done. So colorful and alive. Wonderful story, beautifully told. Family favorite for years!
the dvd was better then the vhs the color and sound was great like it was new and hadn't been copyed from vhs
the casting was very good.  Anyone who watches this film should read the Bible book of Ruth to see what is Hollywood fiction and what is truth.
I love this movie thank you. ive been dieing to see this move thank you so much for having this movie in stock
Great story of how love can overcome bigotry and prejudice. Out of the love Boaz has for Ruth springs the lineage that produces King David.
This is one of the best stories I've seen on DVD about Ruth. Very excellent I would recommend this one to anyone who is serious About Bible stories.
This is a fantastic movie. There is nothing vulgar or inappropriate in the movie. It's a great movie for all ages.
This story never gets old.  Like a fairy tale for adjusts A Cinderella story.  I wonder if that is where the Cinderella story emerged from.
This movie is well worth the buying. I love the biblical story of this woman and how the Lord came to use her for a better purpose in life.
Now I understand what's Ruth is all about it. Her faith in God to stick with her mother in law to go back home after her late husband's passed away.
This movie is a very accurate retelling of Ruth's story.  Great actinglike is seldom seen today.
A great DVD.  Wonder inter action between the stars.  Wonderful story line.  Super service..
One of the most enjoyable story of Michelangelo.  Very enjoyable to see and intriguing as well.  Gives us an idea of history.
One of my fav movies.... love it... it's not the Ten Commandments, but Charlton Heston is great!!
it looks so beautiful on blue ray, it seems to jump out from the screen at you. one of the great epics.
A great historical movie about one of the greatest artists of all times and the Pope that helped push him to greatness.
THIS MOVIE IS ONE OF MY FAVORITES I LOVE IT TWO GREAT STARS LOTS OF GREAT ART AND GOOD ACTING I RECOMMEND TO ALL WHO LIKE CHARLESTON HESTON
This movie is about a great and somewhat tormented artist against the titan, Pope Julius. In short, you just can't go wrong with these great actors.
Great acting excellent story, educational and revealing. The head of the early Catholic church in conflict wth one of the world's geatest Artists
A very well-made and well-acted film with fine script, music, production design, etc. The enhanced 2.2:1 widescreen picture is sharp and excellent.
I am very pleased with my purchase. It was sent very quickly and in great condition.  I will buy from this company again. Loved the movie.
What a classic must-see film by 2 of the best Charlton Heston and Rex Harrison, they don't make them like this anymore.
We need to push ourself and sometimes we need assistance to enable the possible  best use of skills and new wonders
this movie was entertaining about a great and special painter of the world. well worth the watch, and great actors as well.
It fully met my expectations. You can tell this disc comes from the original 70 mm., 2.20:1 ratio respected and all.
One of the classics from the '60s.
This is one of Hestons masterpieces in my opinion. This movie was very enjoyable and fun to watch. Its a good family film too.
Don't ya just love bobby
I have HEARTS OF FIRE THE LASERDISC!!! I like it and I'd like to get it on DVD too :)
WHAT CAN I SAY FROM START TO FINISH THIS MOVIE IS NOTHING SHY OF A SUSPENSEFUL AUDIENCE AND A GREAT STORY
What can I say a must have for all who enjoy movies with a gay theme and it's a collector's item I'm very happy again!
I remember seeing this movie in my 20's.  Keeps you at the edge of your seat.  Good story line too.  Al Pacino amazing in this..
A very very hard to find movie. Love Al Pacino. Great addition to my collection. Recommend this movie to my friends.
very very wonderful to watch. i like the fact that the even did it for the pope. i love this movie.
A lesser known movie , but ranks up there with the CLASSICS.
I loved this TV movie years ago.  Took a long time to find it on DVD.  It's really campy sort of like Carnival of Souls.
a good scarrie movie that does not have blood runing every where, no bad words, no naked bodes and alein killing people.
This is another present for my Sis.  She expecially asked for it and I am sure she will like it. Making her happy makes me happy
i bought this film for a family member. they are a barbara eden fan. they loved the movie were very satisfied with the amazon purchase.
While there are some poorly acted portions, here and there, this is a fine fun movie, yes, well done overall.
This was a gift for my son. I have never seen the movie so cannot comment on it. However my son was happy so that's all that counts.
I love the story of this movie, the main actors, music, scenery, everything that makes you want to see it again and again.
I love this movie.  I didn't care that it was used; it plays like brand-new!  The service was prompt!  Thank you!
My husband loves this movie. He kept renting it and I desided to buy this copy for him. Great movie!
This DVD is one all fans of M. Douglas need in their collection.  Both are suspenseful & keep viewer on edge of seat.  Great.
Very well acted, I've watched this years ago and was very glad to get this DVD. Michael Douglas plays the part well.
Skip the details.  The movie is excellent entertainment and looks stunning.  That's all you need to know.
Was Great Then, Now Better Than Ever on Blu-Ray.
This was one of the better movies that year. Watch it, you'll like it. I got a brand new DVD at a good price.
Great Cop movie that takes you over sea's, you will enjoy it from start to finish...get it
Great colors & action. Sound is superb. Douglas is a great action actor.
the ugly american who should've remain in the USA.  very Hollywood with a happy ending.  limited insight into the Japanese Yakusa world.
A rare one this - the incredible Jimmy Stewart in a heartwarming and not your run of the mill story.  Great twist at the end.
LOVE Harvey, and Jimmy Stewart. Enjoy watching it over and over. One of the classics that everybody should have in their collection.
If you think you canAn original story that you couldn't replace if those filmmakers tryJimmy Stewart at his comedic best
I love this old movie, I love Jimmy Stewart, I've watched many times and I never tired of watching it.
our family get a kick out of Harvey.  James Stewart is a great actor. we love all his old movies.
Are you kidding? It's a classic. It's James Stewart. It's Harvey. What's not to love?!!!....&#34;let me give you my card.&#34;
love this movie it is funny and sad all at the same time
When I saw this as a kid I really did not get it, now that I am older I think it is a real comedy classic.
Truly one of the great performances of James Stewart and Josephine Hull. This will have an honored place in my comedy collection of dvd's.
This was so special; I didn't remember how good this movie was but we spent a most enjoyable evening watching this.
This is by far the best movie ever made. You almost believe that Harvey is real. This is Stewart as his finest.
What can you say about Harvey. Just really a great movie.
I highly recommend this movie to just about anyone. The quality online was great and it was nice to see again.
I bought this for my boyfriend and his dad. We all enjoyed watching it many times. The price was right!
A true classic and timeless comedy! Funny from beginning to end.  This movie was funny 50 years ago and it remains as funny in 2013!
Out standiing movie... Atrue classis. I just saw it preformed on broadway. Thank you for leaving it black and white
Must see if your a Jimmy Stewart fan. I've seen it several times and I always get a good laugh out of it.
Jimmy Stewarts favorite movie. I wish I had noticed that it was on tape and not DVD, but it's just as good.
This is a classic I love Harvey and we were very pleased with everything  thank you
great fun about a very tall bunny based on a play also about a very tall bunny
Harvey is soooo funny and Jimmy Stewart is great in it. Good story line and good movie to own. Love it!
A lighthearted comedy with a underlying message for all man kind to be more loving and patient towards others.  To stop and smell the flowers.
Jimmy Stewart at his best!He is so good at bumbling along in a movie. Such a lovable character. Enjoy!
It was sent to me in a timely manner. The movie is the best. No problems at all.
great family movie  digit redone watch it on HD tv like being in the movies not cursing or nudity classic not like the trash they make now
This is a great movie, it's how we wish we could act around people, without a care in the world.
This movie is hysterical.  I laughed from the beginning to the end.  What a great way to spend some time.
There isn't much I can add to this wonderful movie.  The BD update is crisp and clear as well as audio.
The subject title says it all.  Good dialog/writing and great acting/actors is all you need - not blood, gore & special effects.
One of the best movies ever made. Love, love, love Jimmy Stewart!. It's a great movie for a family to watch together.
Jimmy Stewarts' character makes you feel like you can see the rabbit too! Very well made on really enjoy playing it.
There is only one,  Harvey  !!!!!  A  must have.  ;)  A  Great  Movie .  James  Stewart  best  movie, hands down .
very good dvd of this movie, movie is just as funny as I remembered it to be.  would definatlry reccomend buying this copy.
Because of this movie, our cat has a name. Such a well done movie with great acting. Do not watch the remake, it's terrible! Stick to the original.
I love that I finally have this movie for myself and don't have to wait for some station to air it.There was no damage to the product.
This movie is so much fun for all ages! It really has you laughing and cheering for more. I wish they would have made a sequil!
A great film and one of James Stewarts best with great acting by him and all of the cast.
I would recommend this delightful movie to anyone!  It's Jimmie Stewart at his finest!  Anyone who hasn't seen this film needs to see it.
Stewart at his comedic best.  Some of the best performances by some of old Hollywood's greatest character actors, as well.
This is absolutely hands-down my favorite film noir.  Stylish thriller with surprisingly tender moments.  Ida Lupino and Robert Ryan are magnificent!
Always appreciated Henry Fonda movies and this was no exception.  Well acted, well edited, just an overall enjoyable old movie.
A classic film noire, you'll love it.  Robert Young, of Dr. Welby fame, goes against type as a real rogue.
great little known movie by the masters of magic Penn and Teller.  You can actually hear Teller speak in this movie.
I was so pleased to find it . Back when i loved Busey. Im a jody foster fan. it got it fast
This film is readily available upon only [...]An excellent film. A very good story line well done with excellent actors.
There is nothing that I could say that hasn't aslready been said. I added this to my Hannibal collection, and it was well worth it.
Been waiting to compare the original &#34;Red Dragon&#34; with the Anthony Hopkins remake. Was not disapointed. Great flick!  Highly recommended.
This is one of these movies that you can watch over and over again and still think its funny! laughter is good medicine.
this is a five star movie if you love the game of basketball then this movie is for you the doctor's all the way live in this movie
Chet was the James Dean of jazz. Perhaps the most innovative and lyrical improvisors of all time. DVD has very sharp picture and great sound!
Fantastic film need a lot of tissues cancer is a horrible disease I hope one day there is a complete cure
`Every &#34;adult-child&#34; of a father or grand-father should watch this!!Moving, touching and educational. Amen.Way to go &#34;Amazing-zon&#34;!!
One of my all time favorite movies. It reminds me so much of my dad an I. Great price. A must have for your collection.
I been watching this movie since i was little. It's still a good movie. It's has alot of suspense and also a mind blowing ending. A Must See.
Love this movie!  Awsome soundtrack from Fastway too!  I could watch this movie over and over again. A must see!
This movie is awfuly scary. this movie is awesome. it's a must see for all horror fans
This movie might not be the best movie in the world, but it does have ozzy and gene from kiss! That's good enough for me!
Had to upgrade from my cassette to this better sounding cd. Fastway really kicks butt on this one! great movie too
I Loved This Movie, And I Love The Sound Track. Fastway Was An Awsome Band, And They Really Did Great Music.
I loved this movie as a kid and right around halloween time I found this movie on amazon. Love this cheesy movie with a killer soundtrack by Fastway
This flick is pretty money...it's so cheezy but if U were intothis type of noise in the 80's check it out again.
Beat the new one all to hell. The movie was terrific. I would recommend you see this one and not the new Hollywood remake.
The songs are still good today as they were back in the day.Great!!!!
I have BIG SHOTS ON Laserdisc,'ne gonna get it on dvd too when it releses.'tis a great movie.
big shots they finally put it out on dvd ,even if only on dvd-r .i still recommend buying it .it one of best 80s movies.
A film that leaves you pondering well after it's over.  Those who enjoy noir/supernatural will appreciate this.
I only have one word for this movie.  Awsome! see it.  You will not be dissapointed.  If you liked jacobs ladder, you will love this movie
This movie is one of the best f**king sci-fi movies ever made.  Good plot and scary as hell.  Makes you wonder "what if".
I saw this movie when I was young and it really stuck in my mind,it is not a great movie but it was a reflection of the times.
I loved it.  no dislike whatsoever now all of my friends are going on your site to order movies...1!!!!! keep up the good work
Wow! very interesting movie, unusual story with a few twists, a different kind oftake on beauty and the beast very adult, and very underrated.
This is a really loving and great movie!IT REMINDS ME OF BEAUTY AND THE BEAST ONLY WITH MORESEDUCTION AND LOVE!A MUST SEE AND A MUST HAVE!
funny clasic, Love  with stars like Richard Pryor and Red Fox, Great Movie to watch, a lot of cursing so not for kids, but my kids are 33 and 36  LOL
HARLEM NIGHTS IS NOTHING LESS THAN A CLASSIC WITH ALL THE GREATS!! THIS MOVIE IS NON-STOP LAUGHS AND CLASSIC LINES!!
There is no other movie that can touch the outstanding cast that is featured in this film.  Excellent in comedy!!
I absolutely love this movie.  It is comical and entertaining.  I think the actors are wonderful and the acting is outstanding.
THIS WAS A CHRISTMAS PRESENT. I DO NOT LIKE THIS MOVIE. BUT ALOT OF PEOPLE DID. THEY SAY IT IS GOOD.
I enjoyed a look at a time gone by.  The story was well acted. I love watching it more than once.
This is funny as crap! I think all the names in this movie says it all! Period! Plus it came in excellent condition and came extra quick!
Great casting; acting; movie!  Della Reese's performance is awesome.  Richard Pryor and Fred Sanford are sorely missed.  This movie is a keeper.
we love all the stars in this movie young and old good story line and lots of laughs. young eddie murphy is great
one of the best comedies ever.  The DVD just makes it that much clearer.  the only down side is lack of bonus material.
Two very funny leading actors in a good comedy movie. These two actors work great within the movie and delivery a very good performance.
all the afro greats from the 70's 80's and 90's. Going to shoot me in my little pinky toe, best line ever.
MOVIE WAS HILARIOUS! MRS. DELLA REESE WAS A RIOT! LOL. REDD FOXX WAS FUNNY TOO! I REALLY LOVED THA MOVIE!
This DVD is of excellent quality and arrived ahead of scheduled time. I would recommend this buyer for future purchases.
The DVD was in excellent condition I had no problem viewing it. I have had no problem with any of my orders.
Seriously? They want to know why I like this?C'mon these guys are classic and great together.Need I say more?
You wont see a cast like this often. Great movie. One for the collection for sure. RIP to some of the Greatest comics Foxx and Pryor :)
I've always loved this movie.  It's not one of my favorites but there's a great collection of cast members and it's always fun to watch.
This a rare movie were you have all the comedic greats in one movie with a great plot and storyline.
I could watch this movie once a month.  Seeing some of the greatest comedians of all time in one film is just mesmerizing.
Quality Video, great picture, movie is funny, seen it many times and will watch it again, a lot of old favorites acting in this one.
I haven't seen this on TV for a long time and wanted to order it.It is a very funny movie and I enjoyed it.Very happy.Thank You.... SC
Red Foxx, Richard Pryor, Eddie Murphy together? I would kill for another movie. Hell, just another wholesome movie that is fun to watch.
Eddie Murphy and Richard Pryor together is a treat. Then add Redd Fox and Della Reese and you have a great win.
this is one of my favorites movies.  it arrived earlier than i expected which i like very much.  it has good quality and sound.
This is a parody on evolution quite expliict and imaginative,but like everyone else I felt the first movie was enough!
Movie was well written and great cast of actors. The store was made close to the boolk in the action
I have always loved these movies. Thank you so much for making this one available w/ my Amazon Prime subscription.
my son loves all movies that remind him of king kong were still waiting for the new planet of apes &#34;CESAR&#34;
A classic Sci-Fi film, redone well.  Great brain candy topic directed to allow your imagination to suspend disbelief for a while.
Nice to finally have this classic movie on Blu-ray. As all blurays the added picture quality is the reason to buy this one.
This was a great innovative film when made, and it is still amazing.  I decided to add it to my collection to have it always.
I got this gift wrapped and sent to my brother. He loved how it came to him. And it was in perfect condition.
one of the greatest movies ever i first saw it at the drive in theather and i love every minute of it
This was everything I remembered it to be. I enjoyed it was I first saw it, and I continue to enjoy it now.
As good as it was almost 50 years ago.....storyline and characters hold up.  Can't wait for the newest edition coming to movies!!
I remember this from my child hood days.this show is very intriguing.  I love to watch it.  I use Netflix to buy each episode in order to watch it.
Great classic. Have wanted for a long time and now I have it. The original is always best, Recommend highly.
Have always liked this show and now I can watch it commercial free whenever i want! had to buy the entire set
What can anyone say about this classic? It's even better in Blue Ray. It has great quality picture and sound.
This movie looks great! It's even better than what I remembered. Good price, I think you will love it. A great time piece for your collection.
This is the best of the apes series followed by the second one. I love the Charlton Heston' s role in this movie.
Seller provided great service at a very good price.  DVD arrived in the condition promised.  I'd deal with them again.
Charlton Heston did a great job in this one, this is how I was broken in to the movies to begin with.
This is my favorite among Kurosawa's movies and is certainly one of the best movies of all times. Story, photography, actors, all exceed!
Some movies are made to be lived ... this is one of them. A feast for the eyes, sufficient to be transported in another world.
This film is not only one of the best that Akira Kurosawa directed, but it is based on events that happened during the Age of War in Japan.
Another great Kurosawa epic! a Must for Kurosawa enthusiasts.  A perfect addition to his legacy of classic films.  Buy it and enjoy.
I have always been facinated by Japanese movies.  This is another classic war epic which reminds me of "Ran."
this was also a fine film very well acted and thestory line was okay . always like roddy mc dowell the man was decent .
Still A great movie and always a classic !  I enjoyed this when I was a child and still do !
Most people would think this movie is cheesy. But I like all the Ape movies. To me the time frame this movie was made in makes it a classic.
Awesome Great movie  they should make a new movie just like this planet of the apes  A great movie a must see
Love Sci-Fi and nothing beats the original movies from the late 1960's and 1970's when these movies were made. Love It.
same as the first one i loved this second part...nice movies all the edition  not that i can say  good buy
You can't go wrong with a movie if you use great actors.  This move was ahead of its time yet still doesn't look lame!
I am  Mark Harmon's Fan ,I have Worth Winning on LASERDISC And On DVD too,'tis a great Comedy. :)
This is by far the best Mark Harmon movie ever.  I love the plot, the twists, the gags and the laughs!
this is one of the greatest movies done by Mark Harmon and shows off his acting ability to comedy and seriousiness
This was a very funny movie.  Couldn't stop laughing. It is true that Agent Jethro Leroy Gibbs of NCIS can smile!
Kirk Douglas plays a interesting sheriff. DH loves this movie he watches it often. It doesn't turn out as you would expect.
My husband loves this one and we have watched it over and over...good quality sound and vision with no problems at all
Here is a old time movie from yesteryear that the whole family will enjoy So go and buy a copy today
one of the better WW2 movies
Great movie! A must have for war movie buffs......suspense and action in a fast paced thrill rideFIVE STARS
tLike he Man Who Never Was, this movie illustrates the problems faced by the British people during WWII and their willingness to rise to the cause.
Kenneth More proves to be an astonishing actor.  Accepting a promotion, seeking the Bismarck. Questioning his son's safety. He is a true actor.
This is a true story.  It is a cat and mouse chase of the British vs. the Germans.  You will enjoy this movie.
This is a great war story told from the perspective of the British in WWII before the US entered the war.
this is a great movie. i have really enjoyed this dvd. it is a must see if you like war movies or documentaries.
I saw this movie as a kid and enjoyed it.  I was glad to find it at a reasonable price.
One of my favorite sea movies. Very entertaining. Watched it several times. Gives a good perspective on both sides of war.
This is a very good movie to give to someone as a Christmas present because that is exactly what I did.
Very interesting history story. Explained a lot to me that was confusing about what had happened.
Great, moving and true patriotic tale of the eight flyers put on trial after the Doolittle raid in 1942. Highly recommended.
Very good movie about WWI air combat with good aerial scenes.The cast and acting was topnotch. Recommend this to those liking action movies.
I have loved this movie for years...just love the dog fight scenes and the whole story and characters are excellent.
What a surprise.  This was a great movie depicting the life of an early German aviator and the egos these guys had.
I enjoyed this movie.  It was done well and represented thaw WW I German air corp accurately.  The plot was good and the ending was unexpected.
Very interesting story. I havent seen too many World War One movies told from the German side. If you like planes and drama good movie.
A classic movie no special effects. Real acting and real planes, does it get any better. Staring some of the best actors ever !
Great classic.
Great movie! George Peppard at his best. Especially good musical score by Jerry Goldsmith. Read the book but the movie was better.
Have not seen this movie in years and found myself enjoying it as much as when I first saw it in the 60's.
Awesome movie.  This is from a time gone by that details when America was a great nation.  Its sad to see where we are headed now.
was a very good world war movie. the action was good,ending great. great one to put in a collection receive in excellant shape
I really enjoyed this movie. I wasn't sure if I would like it or not but all the actors did a really good job. I was pleasantly surprised.
This is one of my favorite Submarine movie.  Robert Mitchum and Curt Jerkins are great advisories and they are both good guys in their own ways.
Classic war movie says it all.  Still entertaining  after all these years. Quality of video is very good.  Enjoy the suspense
One of my favorite WW2 movies.  Good story and great acting.  Shows that even in  wartime , people can have heart
Good World War II Navy (destroyer/submarine) movie.  Mitchum is excellent and plays a master technician, chess player in this action drama.
This film does an outstanding job of providing perspective from both the hunter and the hunted.  Well worth the time to watch.
love these old WW 2 type movies I rate this movie at a 91/2 just because its Robert Mitchum.  Great story line and a wonderful ending.
This is a great Sub/ destroyer movie.  It is a good old fashion chess match. If you like WW II navy movies, you will love this one.
This is one I've seen at least 4 times over the years. A great show with a valuable message that came true with time
Very good film. Great chess game. Great acting. This is one of my favorite submarine films due to the story and actors.
Robert Mitchum is SO under-rated. He brings interest to any part--from comedy to to drama, from sinister or evil to heroric. Not to mention romantic.
Two great actors, telling a great story. Both are hero's in thier own way, keeping the crew in the game of cat and mouse.
Great performance by Robert Mitchum And Kirt Jurgens, one of the best Sub movies ever if you like suspense its a got to have!!!
This replaces my VHS copy that was nearly worn out from watching. Now I have a DVD that i can watch. Love this movie
Curt Jurrgens @ Robert Mitchum you can't get a better pair for a movie with lots of action on both sides
I saw the movie as a youngster in the early sixties on TV and still find it a fascinating and well directed/acted movie.
This remains one of the great &#34;sub&#34; movies Hollywood has done.  Juergen is still a superb actor while Mitchell walks tall.
Next to Hunt For Red October this is my favorite submarine movie.  Many wonderful actors who are now gone.I miss good movies.
Who is the hunter? Who is the hunted?  A war movie with character.  Robert Mitchum is excellent as the unknown, newly assigned Captain.
I love this movie!, a military classic.  I actually have it on DVD but since I love watching movies / TV shows on Prime I saw it again.
another movie i saw on tv and i had to have it. a very well written movie set in world war 2.
excellent plot and excellent sidebars they don't make them like this any more.One of the great all time classics post war movies
This movie is a timeless classic.  Great story, great acting.  I'm not big on war movies, but this one is the exception.
This is one of the few films on the conflict in the south atlantic during WWII. Well done and a great ending!
A psychological drama as much as a war film.  The film does a good job of showing the often pointles nature of war
Excellent movie for everyone who enjoys a good story line.  Always worth watching it even if you've seen it 1000 times
this movie is great...I've watched it several times in the past 40 years, and each time it is refreshing.and good entertainment
I was in awe from the first time I watched it years ago. I had a Video tape of it but it unraveled in the VCR player years ago.
Even if you have seen the Star Trek episode, this is still a great movie.  I only wish the video were available in widescreen.
A great movie that still holds up today as dew movies from this era can be and woth every penny.
I can't recommend this movie strongly enough. A well written movie that will have you wondering who you really want to see prevail.
Classic good war movie pitting two captains who both are tired of war, and the crews that admire them.Robert Mitchum defiantly shines in the movie.
It is a good movie based on WWII action at sea with a good cast. I have always been interested in WWII movies and history.
this showed that men can fight and kill but still have a common bond that they share in loyality to friends and shipmates
I love this movie.  It is one of my favorites, if you love WWII flicks then this one is for you.
mitchem is mitchem what else is there to say. sit back and enjoy what use to be.
Very suspenseful with lots of action and a great plot for an older movie.  It does have a predictable ending.
Truly great.  It is particularly fun to see this ad compare to Red October
Good actors with good ole fashion acting. Two experienced captains and how they try to outwit the other. The ending may surprise you.
a great movie at a good price, a movie of two great minds plotting against each other. a good movie
You will have a ride of your life if you like war movies. The main actors play it to the hilt.
I'm a submarine Vet - but this story was just unique, and Robert Mitchum has always done a great job with Navy / Marine type roles
I had a uncle that was there. He told us stories about it.I read the book, the movie is great.
my dad loves this movie and enjoys it a lot, he is happy with the movie , my dad loves war movies
love all versions of war movies...especially those ot the MARINE CORPS and its music.....JUST CANT GET ENOUGH OF THE MUSIC OF THE MARINE CORPS....
Love this movie.  It never gets old.  Love the Michael J. Fox and Christopher Lloyd duo.  Hope to own the Blu-ray set soon.
Second movie baby! I love this movie its funny as hell!  I would tell everyone to go out and buy this movie!
Man, I watched this movie and thought it was great.  I asked my kids and they said it was great two.  If you watch it you might say its great three.
My favorite movie of the series. Could watch this movie anytime. What is there to complain about?! I would recommend this movie to anyone.
This series is a classic and I will probably watch it every year or two just to relive it's awesome-ness.
Very enjoyable - more complex than other 2: watch all three several times: you'll pick up something new.
It was just as good as it was when I first saw it.  Love Michael and the cast.  Would recommend.
we liked the movie me and my son watch it all the time it goes in the awsome files we give it a
I think this movie is better than the first movie. I am a big fan and enjoy all of the back to the future movies but this one is my favorite by far.
Love the Back to the Future movies; there is adventure, wit, comedy, suspense, plus the returning characters in the series which makes it amazing.
Rented the movies for movie night with the kids. Still a great family movie after  20 years, everyone loved it.
LOVE IT, LOVE IT, LOVE IT!!!  Good picture and great quality.  A movie I watched growing up and me and my daughter enjoyed it very much.
This movie is just plain good.  As with all the movies in this series, this is just plain fun to watch.  I have loved it since I saw it as a kid.
Love it! Great for all ages!  Back when movies were truly family quality. Back when movie were movies and not all computerized.
DVD came in excellent condition, the story as poignant as I remembered, and I happily give it five stars as a rating.
If you are inlove or want to be inlove or like to see a love story youmust see this movie.
This movie is a classic.  I've seen it several times and I intend to keep on seeing it over again.
This is a great movie, a great Love Story, Great Acting; I can just watch this movie over and over!
Marlon Brando and Red Buttons are at their best in this movie! This  is a great love story!
I was in Korea and Japan - Wartime and peacetime. Loved this movie, One of Marlon Brandos best! What more is there to say.
Love this movie, it's the best of Marlon Brandon. I loved this movie of all the Brandon movies even better then Streetcar.
Loved it.  It's a wonderful love story.  It's one of my all time favorites.  Would recommend it to all my friends.
I enjoy this movie it's a classic awesome movie there is mystery and romance in it one of my old time favorites.
Another excellent acting on Olivier's part.  Also a very suspenseful movie!  I am also glad to add this to my Olivier collection!
nothing bad to say about this old favorite. i do love owning it. great for a girl weekend to sit and watch and be enthralled with a good story.
If you like Hitch and you like the black and white dvd you will love the blu-ray.  Great movie and viewing quality is 100%.  Great purchase.
Blu Ray Is Flawless! PERFECTION all THE WAY!!! Movie Is TIMELESS CLASSIC!!! LOVED IT!! JOAN FONTAINE IS SO GOOD IN THIS! Whole Cast IS EXCELLENT!!!
As a Hitchcock fan, I am surprised that Rebecca is often overlooked as one of the director's top thrillers.  the cast is top-rate.
I owned the VHS version, updated with this DVD. The sound and picture quality are fine, and I can recommend this product to all.
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1940. Had to add it to my collection.
This film is one of the top films to see in your lifetime.  The acting is impeccable as is the cinematography. And, the film is true to the book.
Great classic! The quality is very good and in excellent shape. So glad I finally got this movie on DVD! :)
this is a delightful movie and it has adventures and  suspense for the whole family to enjoy. thank you for the enjoyment
Another awesome movie thank you I like Sir Lawerence Olivia also.Please recommend movies like this and Johnathan Rhys Myers.I have several of him.
Purchased as a gift for my wife, she is very pleased with this movie and greatly enjoys it. Couldn't be better.
Great quality movie. Picture is clear and good. Would recommend this movie to anyone to watch. Love it. Thank you.
I ordered this DVD for a friend of mine because she had not been able to find it.  She is elated with the purchase.
It's always been my favorite book and now its my favorite movie.  Many books alude back to the Manderley Mansion and Rebecca.  The ending is amazing.
I thought I would never get to own this classic movie! I have been hunting for  awhile and I finally found it at a reasonable price. Love it!
Rebecca was high quality, very pleased for such an old movie!  A great movie for Saturday movie night!  Pass the popcorn please.
This completed my dvd seriea of all academy award winners.  It is a great movie and it arrived quickly and in excellent condition. NP
Laurence Olivier is magnificant in this old flick.  The storyline is very engaging and the video resolution is wonderful.  Heartily recommend it.
As described ...  came on time  ...  favorite movie.
One of my favorite movies. It arrived in time stated and in good shape. The price was goof also.  You would not be disappointed.
I loved this book and the movie was just as good.  Suspense & romance!  Even in black and white is worth the watch.
The ending was a beginning for the character.  Start fresh and forget the past.  I dont want to ever cross Judith Anderson thats for sure.
I have loved this movie since I was a kid and I am now 48+! Love that the classics are now on DVD!!! highly recommend it!
I love this movie.  It was great.  I saw part of it aired on the TCM channel and then ordered it to have in my own library.
keeps you watching till the end. makes you want more it is very tense & I loved the end too.
Another great movie. As a lover of older movies, this is part of my movie collection.  Will love to watch this movie constantly.
Based on a fantastic DuMaurier novel, this movie has withstood the test of time. Still relevant in its issues of relationships, it can still thrill.
Hitchcock  preferred to twist plots to suit his vision. Happily he didn't do this with Rebecca. A B&W classic tale beautifully filmed.
Movie and quality is great. Picture is clear and good. Would reccomend this movie to anyone to watch. Love it. Thank you.
I absolutely loved this movie and who wouldn't when it stars the beautiful Ingrid Bergman and handsome Gregory Peck? I would highly recommend it!
Another mind twisting mystery from Hitchcock. Great story, top notch actors, and it sucks you in until the last. Enjoyed it thoroughly.
The transfer is very good. Not a full blown restoration, but certainly looks very good for it's age. Not the best film he ever made, but pretty good!
Ingrid is so beautiful, Charles Boyer is so handsome, the sets are magnificent, story is on the edge of the seat thrills ... it's truly a classic.
I still have not watch this movie all the way so far it is good they found out he is not the real doctor and he lost his memory.
I read somewhere this was a heartfelt product from Jane Fonda and it shows. Great acting in the 3 lead roles.
This has to be one of the best animal movies ever since milo and otis. this is a great movie.
I loved this movie so much that I bought several and sent them to youth centers. The scenery is spectacular, great fun and drama
An amazing movie!  Everyone should watch.  Few words, but not needed because of the tremendous impact the story and visual images have.  A must see.
why isnt this film on imdb.com? this movie is great, first saw it with my dad, then in my highschool french class.
I bought the DVD to replace the video which took up too much space.  It is a movie I would recommend
Clive Barker is one of my favorite artists and Nightbreed does not dissappoint. Danny Elfman does a classic score. What more could a girl ask for?
I love nightbreed, I wish they would hurry up and have the cabal cut was released here be r soon.
I love this movie.Given the era it came out,its very original.Nothing like it at the time.
The extended 2 and 1/2 hour cut is coming to blu ray later this year. So you should put off until then to buy this forgotten gem.
this debut Clive Barker film is an instant cult classicthe monsters live in midianwhat you dont know yetis the monsters are the good guys
The movie was absolutely great not boring and interesting love story. At the second day shipping was easier than running to the store.
This movie accurately portrays Flint and its residents... I would know, I go to school there....
the greatest meatballs movie ever.After you see this movie you will forget about the first three.
I REALLY LIKED THE MOVIE A LOT. I AM INTO HISTORICAL MOVIES VERY MUCH. I AM FASCINATED HOW PEOPLE START IN LIFE.
Arnold and Lonie did a great job with this film I would buy it all over again .I highly recomend it
This was an EXCELLENT & true-to-life portayal of the life of Jayne Mansfield.  Loni Anderson played the role better than anybody else could.
This is one of my all time favorites. Turner and Douglas are great sparring partners, each trying to outdo one another in evilness.
We wore our vhs copy of this out and hope we don't wear the dvd out it is a very funny movie the actors are great
HA HA HA.....sure any of us married people can relate!  Funny in a lot of ways.  A must see movie.
A combination of love and hate.  One of Danny D's entertaining works of all time; and If you listen carefully, several Psalm scripture too!
love , love this movie. i bought it for my daughter who was going threw a divorce. delivery was on time & the movie was in perfect condition
Mum was so happy when this movie came, she absolutely loves it.The quality of sound and picture is great.Thanks so much.
a excellent movie  all actors at top of there performing careers a humorous comedy hopefully no one hast to expierience for real
If you like old movies this movie is great to have. I like it a lot. I enjoyed watching every moment of it.
The first time I saw this movie, I really enjoyed and love watching the craziness that can go on in a marry at anytime !!!
This movie is hilarious. This IS high school with naughty boys and sidesplitting pranks and great perspective of when you were young.
Arrived on time as usual with Amazon Prime, A classic adolescent comig of age comedy movie. Get ready to laugh again!!
Seller was prompt in making sure item purchased was received in a fair amount of time. Am tickled with my purchase :)
We really love this movie! Loved it when it came out years ago & love it now! Would always recommend!
If you haven't seen this, it's a must. Silly, fun and entertaining. Wouldn't recommend for children, adults and teens only!
Classic teenage fun! A great cast of nobodys were gathered to create a movie that stands the test of time. Everyone wants to go to Angel Beach!
love the movie love the price love hot guys in shower room ohh la la OH and the transfer to blu ray? just ok
Great, funny movie! Just don't drink anything before you watch it, you'll pee your pants from laughing so much. I almost did!
Purchased for the husband. One of his favorites to watch over and over. A classic he says. Good price too.
Great movie!  I was glad to see it came out on DVD.  I will have to get the other two movies!
This was a very good and fun movie to watch. If you like good comedy this is the movie to get.
A raunchy classic that will never go out of style.  One of my all time favorite movies and is funny in any era
This is a cassic and it is so funny.  I find that Amazon has a great choice in movies Wide selectin.
Loved this DVD from day one.  All the characters are phenomenal.  I have recommended this to many.  Sequels not as good.
A funny, funny comedy filled with actors not known for their comedic roles. A rip-roaring good time follwing these lovable nerds to college!
This film is one of my all time favorites.Guys, if this is what the 60s was like, dust off the time machine, set it on 62 and press SEND.
Many belly laughs....Jack Benny at his best!  Loved it!
One of the greatest movies of all time. The opening is fantastic, Benny is superb. Everyone should see this one!
Just a wonderfully funny movie - Jack Benny is great and of course, so is Carol Lombard. It has twists and turns - and turns out hilarious!
This Movie is the best veronica lake one.Very funny!Love her father he is the best in this movie!
i didn't expect much from this movie I just got it because it had Veronica lake and I must say I was pleasantly surprised.
this film I remember in my childhood. with veronica lake and Frederic march it is a love story which I believe you will like
Funny Story! This movie s the precursor to the T.V. Show &#34;Bewitched&#34;. I don't think Veronica lake was ever more beautiful.
Rene Clair & Veronica Lake; how could it be better. Frederic March is a wonderful foil, completely overwhelmed by Lake.
I loved this movie as a child and love it just as much today.  Veronica Lake is good in this comedy.  The true &#34;Peek-a -boo girl!
This is one of the great classics with Veronica Lake. She is awesome in this movie. It is comedic and enchanting.
This is one of my favorite VERONICA LAKE movies! This edition is the first time on DVD and I already own it on VHS.
I love Veronica Lake, she was great in this movie. I saw it years ago on Laser Disk. This Blue Ray restoration was fantastic.
One of my partner's favorite movies from his childhood, one of the movies they based Bewitched on. Veronica Lake was gorgeous and the perfect witch.
I don't understand why this movie is not out in DVD. It's such a classic of its time and place.
The movie arrived on time and in excellent condition.  Will keep ordering.Thank you.
My how things have changed since this movie first was available.  I had it on VHS and wanted it o  DVD.  A great movie.
I got this movie for my grandmother. I have never seen it but she loves it. It was in the condition that it was described in.
Great old movie. Great old stars. Beautiful settings. Great family entertainment.  I enjoy movies from this era.  I would recommend to all.
One of my favorite movies, and the DVD works well. Color and sound are good, and I can recommend this to all!
Also another great movie from the past and I had this to my collection.  Movies back then were movies and so enjoyable.
I loved this movie since I was a teenager. Troy Donahue and Sandra Dee takes us to a gentler time.  Give me the older movies anytime.
This movie had just as much appeal as it did when it was first shown on the big screen! A definite classic to add to your collection.
This movie had many of my favorite actors.  Great story and the DVD was in great shape. A great movire to share.
Have  seen this  movie countless times and still enjoy it . Very  1950's but still a great movie worth seeing again and again
I remember this from my childhood and wanted to see it again. It met all expectations! Thanks for making it available!
the movie is great movie-i think it is one of SAndra dees best ]thank youLinda Counts
The DVD was in perfect shape and running order..There was nothing missing and the clarity was perfect..
This is a favorite and I would love to have it on DVD.
Good movie with beautiful scenery and great music.  Saw this as a teenager so I am joyfully reliving my past.
This movie is one of my favorite ones and I love the theme from it and it is a haunting movie.
good purchase ,,no problems...good case and quality .. i also love the movie ....love watching it over and over..recomend it
I LOVE THIS MOVIE. IT TAKES ME BACK TO MORE INNOCENT YEARS AS A TEENAGER. SOMETIMES IT NICE TO LET THE PRESENT GO.
This film is a must for a collector. Brilliant acting by all and the music/theme is wonderful. I would recommend this as a "chic's flick".
This movie is an underrated classic! If you love movies and have a sense of humor, you must see this!
This is a great and funny movie with a ton of great actor's! Blake Edwards scored with this one for sure!
how to stick it to Hollywood establishment. Fun and silly and pointed in it's satirical look at the Industry.
Great movie!  Very Funny!  Great story line and some weird shenanigans going on.  Blake Edwards does know how to tell a story.
Much underappreciated Blake Edwards send up of Hollywood, Richard Mulligan is laugh out loud funny!  William Holden and Robert Preston likewise.
i seen it before it was funny great and some good actors and you could get along with the script it was great
Blake Edwards at his best.  Takes on his own industry and tells it like it is.  Rich satire and fantastic acting by Richard Mulligan especially!
One of my favorite movies, if you haven't seen it you should, some of the best preformance by actors not in rolls that you would normally seen
How can you not love this film. A wonderful cast absolutely putting the screws to the Hollywood system AND Mary Poppins topless!
GREAT LOVE OLD MOVIES THEY SHOULD KEEP MAKING THEM TODAY TODAYS MOVIES ARE NOT FIT TO WATCH WITH FAMILY ON THE MOST PART
FUN, ENTERTAINING, AND A GREAT ESCAPE FROM EVERYDAY NORMAL LIFE. CLASSIC DISNEY THAT MADE THEM THE GREAT COMPAY THEY USED TO BE.
Glad to get it love the old movie can in on time .good people to work with will use them again
Disney did a great job on this movie.  I highly recommend it for adult & family.  It will leave you with a melody in your heart.
THis is a great Disney movie.  I love Dean Jones and this is another one of his greats.Sort of the usual storyline, but still fun.
Great Film ! Disney at its best. My kids(5yrs and 8yrs) loved it, so did mom and dad. I would recommend it for anyone at any time.
I will always love this film, just because the childhood memories I associate with it, and the numerous times I saw it as a kid.
Time to break the heat with this laugh filled winter comedy. Great fun for the whole family to watch with a big bowl of popcorn.
One of the really good Disney shows from way back when.  Not like what is out the market today.
I had this movie on vcr tape ,It was going bad so again I went to Amazon ,found it , bought it, loved it Just as remembered.
We have it on VHS but wanted it on DVD.  This is a funny movie.  It has action and comedy combined.
glad  you had this in stock remembered this video when i was kid and enjoyed it hen now i can enjoy all the time
This is a must have Disney movie!  I don't know how many people are aware of this movie, but it is a wonderful classic that I just had to have!
Cute 70's movie, good Disney fare.  Lots of action and no real violence.  Wholesome family entertainment.
Movie from my childhood. Great owning it! They require a certain amount of words in their reviews so here we go.
These old movies are wonderful! The whole family can watch them and they always have a fun story line to follow.
this is another great movie with great actors in it and i would also recommend this to all out there that likesswashbuckling type movies
A Old Favorite, this version is rare and hard to find, and is as good if not better than the current version.
The story is well known, but watch Robert Donat's acting. Just great. The set is also worth watching.Great movie.
Another great movie that tells the true story of one of our Native American Tribes and it's Chief.  Why couldn't the whites just let them be?
CLOWNHOUSE is the first film of VICTOR SALVA ! And this is the BEST ! (and jeepers creepers).
This was the creepes thing ever, It was much scarer when i was little, but It still creeps me out so it has to be good. It's worth watching.
A real good horror flick without all the gore. A young Sam Rockwell and two unknown actors make this a very spooky flick.
I had forgotten just how much Freddie was unable to come to grips with his fame and fortune. So sad for such a talented guy.
This is a great movie based on the reknowned 70's comedian"Freddie Prinze"(Chico and The Man).It's a must see!!
The movie is beautifully digitally remastered and features many new bonus features the movie will play in all US Blu-ray players
Wonderful! Classic! I would highly recommend this film as it is a masterpiece! Great actors and plot! Watch it, you'll like it!
What a stellar classic!  How can you go wrong w/ Liz Taylor and Richard Burton?  The music and scenery tops it all off.
This is another epic I would never forget.  Shocking, dramatic, the best.
Have this classic in video and just had to have it in DVD - especially since both stars are no longer with us.  Amazon - thanks!
No one can match her looks.  Where her acting is weak her beauty takes over.  She was a real star.
I got this movie for one of my granddaughters, who had never seen it - she loves it!  Elizabeth Taylor is the perfect Cleopatra.
Nuff said.Taylor's masterpiece, Burton's best performance ever... you will understand why it caused such a ruckus back when it was made.
There are 2 DVDs for this large and awesome movie. I really recommend. Good movie.
Wonderful sets and costumes.  How can you go wrong with these strong actors.  Glad I have it for my personal collection.
Another brilliant love story, i'm a sucker for romance be it old or new and this one is truly a classic.r
Hope you enjoy the sharp color and defination of the film. Will make you want to convert all  your collection to Blu-ray
Great film .I intend to buy this movie on Blu-Ray.Definitely from Hollywood's golden yearsElizabeth Taylor is excellent.!!!!!!!!
So far such a romantical movie is neverScreened It made a eter nal History inThe movie span. It is aMagnus opus ,
I was actually impressed more with the production values. For this time period I am sure this movie was over-budgeted.
Don't look for a German accent from The Duke (or really from much of the cast), but it is a very good drama.
I have almost all of Waynes major movies so I thought why not one more.  Like all of his movies that I have this one didn't Dissapoint.
It also I didn't have on DVD. Have also on VHS.  A good World War two movie with John Wayne taking a new course
Great movie. This was one movie I never seen but I am glad I got it. It was a really a great movie. Thank you very Nancy Brushia
Great movie for all the John Wayne fans - I was Navy for 6 years,so I'm partial to a good sea story.
I RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO ANYONE WHO LOVES JOHN WAYNE MOVIES.THIS MOVIE IS A CLASSIC AND SHOULD BE REQUIRED VIEWING
different type of roll for john wayne. alot of suspence and alot of action . any john wayne fan who enjoys a good movie
Very Good Entertainment from John Wayne, but get it on DVD and in widescreen. Great cinematography.
This package arrived in a timely fashion and was wrapped very well.  We have viewed the movie and it is in very good shape.
Everytime I think I have enough Wayne flicks I come across another one that I just have to have. So, I ordered it.
the duke is at his best, Lorren Becall is wounderful a great move that is` full of drama got to see Baby.
John Wayne & Lauren Bacall make for a great movie along with beautiful scenery.Paul Fix makes for an interesting chinaman.
My husband and I love John Wayne and we have been collecting his films for many years. This is one film we have been looking for and it is excellent.
One of John's best - I always liked Lauren Bacall -thought she was really good in this one - worth the wait.
This is a great little known crime film starring Fabian and Karen Black.It's a must see!!
WHAT CAN I SAY ABOUT THIS PICTURE.........ABSOLUTELY AMAZING PICTURE OF THE FIRST BLACK HEAVYWEIGHT CHAMPION OF THE WORLD............
A very good movie based loosely on the life of one of the early African-American heavy weight champions. Also and early James Earl Jones movie.
what a great movie. the race war was going on even back then. what a shame we must be defined by color as to who we are.
This is a great movie about perservience. Three young ladiec start their own exerceise business and have to fight many odds to keep it and WIN.
Terrific score and Hong Hong scenery for this action film. All the dreck's on DVD, why not this excellent movie?
This movie is done with a good story, great and clearpresentations and is one of my all time Gable favorites
The film was great, saw it years ago and it's not tarnished in any way. It's still a great story and fabulous actors
Very clear print. Very interesting to see Hong Kong So many years ago. Enjopyable viewing. Great shots of Trams and The Peak tram.
we love frank sinatra and didn't have any of his tomy rome stuff. Great music and action with a surprise ending
Absolutely awesome movie. Gregory Peck is at his finest!! I would highly recommend it for anyone who's a Peck fan.
This is an outstanding film that has no peer in understanding the citizen soldier in war and the aftermath in peace.
This Spencer Tracy classic sorely needs to be availble again on DVD. Tracy is at his usual best in this film.
spencer tracy is close to his best . i collect all his movies , but when he stars with  katharine hepburn , he is at his best .
It is very useful and fun,  I recommend it.  It is fun and keeps you moving really moving.  Have fun.
Great Film that tells a true story on an epic scale.  Reminds you of something from the David Lean or Cecile B. Demille era.
Not only is this movie based on fact, it's a fabulous watch. Well acted and very well done. It's a movie I'll watch again.
Bought this as a gift.  The recipient was thrilled to get this movie.  So for all intent and purpose it was a successful purchase.
This is a comedy about the life of Hewy Long, the Governor of La. It is a movie I have wanted for a long time.  Thank you
The greatest actor.  He knew how to choose a script that showed honor, integrity and heroism. Hollywood needs more of his stock
It;s John Wayne! Can't say enough, Loved it! It's all there Action, Romance, Drama, Intrigue  and of course funny. The End!
Another John Wayne movie I bought because I love all of his movies.  This one is one of my favorites.
can't beat these old JW movies and the cast was good also.. Love watching the old Black and whites five star.
What can I say. Another John Wayne. I have not found one I didn't like.  Not much acting, just very enteraning and a fun watch.
John Wayne need I say More. He rules as always. The Fighting Kentuckian is one of his best ever. It is a must see.
A very enjoyable movie. John Wayne is delightful in this early movie. It has lots of action and a plot that is easy to follow..
This is one of John Wayne's best movies. Loved it! Exciting and fun to watch. The Duke is the best!
I like the story, I like the actors and actresses, I like the music, and I always like Frank Capra (director)
You will love the movie and the story plot is a funny one plus a lot of beautiful ladys to.
I love all of Jerry Lewis Movies, they never fail to have me laughing out loud. I try and buy them whenever i find them.
this will cheer you up you can just sit back and laugh good for any age see it with the whole famaly
This is one of my favorites. Typical Jerry gags and I loved every minute of it. I recommend it for the whole family.
Nuns on the run is a bit dated, but a good watch.. all I had to do was get rid of the Japenese subtitles and all was good.
We love this movie! No matter how many times we've seen it, we still find it hysterical. If you are looking for a a great comedy-this is it!
If you were raised Catholic, as I was, you'll love it.  If you're offended easily, have a drink first. I enjoyed every minute of it.
Excellent movie.  Quite unusual for Sean Connery.  A good mystery with interesting twists.  I want to see it again at the theater.
Sean Connery is excellent in all of his movies.  This vision of the future was well done, very imaginative.
I enjoy the references to mythology. I like some of the quotations. I don't know this movie as much as my Father would know.
I enjoyed this movie even though at the time of its release, computing really wasn't capable of such a transformation.
Wonderful movie!!!!  This is a movie that can be seen over and over again.  Wonderful plot!  Wonderful actors and actresses.  Totally great movie!
Hell with the story, plot, and all that. I just enjoy pausing on the Ally Sheedy close ups. She's cuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuuute!
My son and I loved watching this! He watched it over and over again, cheering on the robot and just loved every minute of it.
Good for kids. Bought for kids as these old shows are so wholesome for young kids. Better then a lot of current cartoons
I received the DVD in perfect shape and in timely manner.  Thanks!
love short circuit. such a great movie.
Its Short Circuit. one of the best classics from my childhood. What makes it better is that it in BLU RAY!!!
Great movie! I use to love this movie as a child. I got it for my family and they loved it...
i love any movies with steve guttenberg. he did a great job in this great movie. watch this for a great movie.
love this movie!!!!!! love the actors very cute great for kids to watch wholesome movie! would recommend this to anyone.
Loved this movie from when it was first released. Story has not dimmed over the years. Hilarious, good fun that I will watch and share with friends.
My grand kids and I love this DVD. It has a cute story line and is very entertaining. I will keep it.
Perfect Movie for the Family~!!Two Thumbs Up~!!They just don't make themlike they used to, this is a Classic~!!!
This is a good movie.My son really likes it.I like it.Just a good movie to enjoy.
Great classic movie, Arrived fast and in perfect shape. Glad I got to share it with my son for Christmas. He loved it.
Very funny movie  well done and some fine actors in it put the movie across this one good for your collection. The second movie no bombed.
Great and funny show keeps you on the edge of your seat with a surprising twist at the end.
A Robot, the evil military and a scientist falling in love with a hippy chick. How could this movie get any better?
i got it fast and it was cheap it remindinds me as a kid wen i watched it agein ..
Great Fun!  Have seen it on tv, over and over.  Glad to have it in my library.
Saw this years ago and remembered it to be so engaging.  I wasn't disappointed to see it again.  It is funny and loopy....
I grew up watching this movie when I was a child. I recently bought this DVD and I still love it. This movie is timeless.
I Remember Seeing This When I Was Younger It Was Great Then And Still Great Now Great For A Family Night!
I've watched this movie half a dozen times and it never gets old.  This is a great movie for the whole family to sit down and really enjoy.
I watched this movie when i was a kid. I loved it then and i still think it is funny. I love number 5 the robot.
This is amazing, one of the best movies ever, and coming to the PSP, I hope they release more classics on PSP!
This movie was a little campier than I remember, but it made for a fun movie night, nevertheless. The quality, service and delivery were great.
I Have Seen This Movie And It Is A Fun,Movie For The Entire Family.I Highly Recommend This Movie To All.
An excellent DVD.  Very funny.  It was delivered on time and in excellent condition.
Short Circuit is a fun and entertaining movie. It's great for kids of all ages (even old ones like me).
Another good sit down with the family classic movie! Just as good as the first time I seen it lol!
i saw this movie when i as a little kid. the movie was one of my favorites. now that i have it on blue ray i can watch it over and over again.
I really enjoyed this movie. It's fun to see an old fashion sci fi with all the the &#34;Mod&#34; styles of the times.
there isn't enough stars available for a movie that shows Raquel Welch in her prime with men tearing plasma off her wetsuit.
For an older movie the Special Effects are very well done. Watched it 3 times after my husband watched it. Must see to enjoy.
Wow!  This movie is beter than I remember it.  It came in a very timly manner, well packaged for protection.  I will order again.
This a great movie with excellant actors, a great story, and wonderful special effects.  I am very happy they made this into a blu-ray.
This is an excellent 60"s sci-fi film. It was done with intelligent thinking and the special effects are great for that time.
Great special effects for his days and awesome captivating storyline.
If you like a stirring idea of what the future holds for us medically. A little far out but is really so close.
Still holds up well. and Donald Plesence is a very smooth villain. Raquel Welch has her best role here. Awesome..watch it over and over.
I thoroughly enjoyed this movie. Again this movie is very different from the latest edition.  The actors did a pretty good job in this movie.
I liked the flow of the action of the story and found the route they took very interesting and looked a person in a different light.
i'm not going to review the movie, if you're buying this you've seen it already. movie worked well and all is good
One of Disneys classics I remember it from 50 years ago a child's memory from long ago some of Disneys top stars
I think this movie is wonderfully delightful, it shows how talented Walt Disney was before all the trash was brought into the movies.
I truly enjoyed this movie as a child, and even now it makes me laugh.
Yes this movie is a little corny but I still like it.  I remember watching it growing up at Christmas time.
I bought this as a gift for my sister-in-law, who loves to watch older movies and she absolutely loved this one.
I haven't seen it since it first came out, enjoyed it than and I enjoyed it now. Will watch it every Christmas.
One of the all time great movies ever made. Very happy to get this one for our collection. Kids love it to.
Excellent Item came just as described on site and on time arrival by provider.  Great Great Great Great Great Great
I received this well within the estimated time.  I t was well packaged, but easy to open. No problems with any part of the process.
After poor releases on VHS and DVD, Babes in Toyand is finally restored to pristine picture. Great family film from Walt
I remember watching this movie as a little kid, and it is just as great as I remember it. It looks amazing on Blu-ray too. Worth getting.
I loved this movie as a child and enjoyed watching it with my son. I'd recommend this movie to anyone.
The print on this was incredible, looked like it was shot yesterday.  very stage bound though but annette was as always, cute as a proverbial button.
i enjoyed the movie and the sound and color up grade was worth the price i had the orginal one would but it again.
have always loved this show and now with it on my kindle fire I can watch it with the grandkids
Really love this movie. Have seen it many times and hope for many more. Always a favorite with my family.
As a child that has grown up watching Disney movies this is one of my faves and great addition to my library.
This is for anyone you loves Disney a True classic. for fans of all ages. I remember this one as a kid bought it for myself as of 2013 I am 35.
Rememberd this movie from when I was a child and purchased this for my nieces and nephews to enjoy and create memories.
I had the cassette, now I own the DVD.  My friend Tommy, I have watched it many times, so I know how good he is.  Well so is Annete.
I grew up watching this movie. I always loved it.  I bought it and my kids got the biggest kick out of it.A must watch video!!!
The old classic Disney movie I saw as a child.  It's still so good, scary and fun to watch.  For children and adults of all ages.
Very pleased with my purchase. The VHS was in excellent condition. Wish it came out on DVD though. My son really enjoyed the film.
My kids had this when they were little so I am so glad that my granddaughter gets to watch it now on dvd!
My kids love this DVD. It keeps their attention and they just love to sing along with the songs. Very good!
My husband and I enjoy this just as much as our daughter does. So happy I found this and will purchase more later!
This movie is great.  I'd say the funniest character, is the guy that says hello constantly.
I do love this extremely funny movie.  I recommend strongly to watch this when you need a laugh, because you will!
Very funny film with a great ending, Dudley moore is great in this film and the cast of Crazy people really compliment each other well..
Excelent crime drama that has it all; Fantastic chase scene, detective mystery, lots of action, good suspense and an unexpected ending.
Best underrated flick of all times!! Buy this one, you won't regret it!
One of my favorite movies - purchased the DVD as a holiday gift to myself. Definitely a must see for Action lovers.
Excellent Blue ray disk. I enjoy the blue ray disk over the DVD's as you can watch a Blue ray and DVD on a blue ray laptop.
Classic crime drama keeps you glued to the action, highly recomended.This film even had scenes that were shot in my old neighborhood
if only all your movies were the clear.  great great great.  thank you very much
With this film, &#34;I am held in some invisible vice, and I can't get away.&#34;  AND I LOVE IT!!!  Always have from the first time I saw it!!!
A Freidkin gem. The best counterfeiting film ,made in the U.S. A rather surprising ending and a great cast...great soundtrack also!
love the oldies still a goody think you. A great movie for all the see, still vary nice as I remember it.
This was a birthday gift for my husband.  He has liked  this movie since he was a young man.  Thanks for offering it.
This I have loved forever.  The colors and costumes and the music are wonderful!
I hadn't seen this movie in many years, but it was just as great as ever! I've, also, read the book many times. Thank you so much.
This has to be my most favorite musical of all time.This movie has everything... etc., etc., etc.!!!
It was wonderful when I watched it as a child, it's is wonderful to come back to it with my daughter!
Really enjoyed this modern version - especially Yul Bryner.  The beautiful music in this film has lasted for many years.
Brought back many memories of the first time we saw this movie. It became a classic for us. Great to see it again.
The oldies are the best.  This never goes out of style and I always cry when the King dies.
Great story and music. There are so many things I could add but I will just say that it is great....et cetera, et cetera, et cetera  :)
How wonderful it is to see this movie again on it's 50th Anniversary.  Highly recommend.  The scenery and musical score are wonderful.
This copy is for my 21 year old granddaughter who listens to the Sound Track all the time but did not own the movie.
I love revisiting the simpler times and really love the music.  Deborah Kerr and Yul Brynner will live on in eternity in this movie.
this was a great gift for my granddaughter she was so happy to see this movie again since she was very young when she saw it last
I am such a fan of the old musicals. Music,costumes and the acting, what a great way to spend time.
Loved the story line and the numerous characters.  Another movie that is a wonderful addition to any collection.  Great actors.
Good story but the best part is the singing and dancing.  Rightfully one of the musical classics and I recommend it.
What else is there to say about this film. Its one of the best ever made should be in everyones collection.
This has always been one of my favorite movies.Great entertainment, singing, dancing, romance and tragedy are all part of this classic musical.
I am a lover of the old musicals I could watch them over and over. Still wish they were making them this great. Very good.
A TOTAL CLASSIC!  These types of movies are Never Out-Dated!Wonderful Actors, Scenes, Songs, Wonderful Story --what more could you want?
Not enough words in any dictionary to say how WONDERFUL this movie is.  GREAT story, GREAT costumes, Wonderful music and songs, some history.
Such good character acting and they made it very believable and enjoyable. She so proper and he so pompous. Absolutely delightful.
One of the classics. Deborah Kerr and Yul Brenner are spectacular together as Anna and the King.  Don't miss it
Perfect for the best view of how each scene can be important to move the plot and audience forward together with purpose and emotion.
Un cl&aacute;sico del cine restaurada y buena edicion ya casi hab&iacute;a olvidado a estos grandes actores, Bryner y Debora Keer
I grew up with this movie and have always loved it. Now I had a chance to buy it online, and I am so glad that I did because now I have it forever!
The King and I is a great movie.  I always wanted to watch Yul Brynner is his stage play, but I was sad to hear that he passed away from cancer.
This was a gift. The anniversary edition was a great upgrade from the standard DVD. Not a lot more money, either.
I think that I misunderstood this movie.but some of the girls don't wear undies, so that's pretty cool.i give it five stars.
Loved it, Yul Brynner and Deborah Kerr gave the best performances, and I loved all the music as well as the story.
This is a wonderful muscial that everyone should have. The music is lovely and the cast is awesome.
A classic masterpiece in all respects--no one could do "The King and I" better!  I love it!
excellent, was excited when movie came out. great to see. wonderful story line. buy, see for yourself, you'll love it
I bot this for my grandchildren the love watching it every year. it is a great movie to watch .enjoy
My family loves watching these two shows. We miss them when they are not on tv anymore, so it was wonderful to find them.
GREAT NOSTALGIC CHRISTMAS CARTOONS.  REMINDS ONE OF A YOUNGER TIME, AT YET IT NEVER GETS OLD.  GLAD I BOUGHT IT!!!
One of my favorites at Christmas, very glad to have it in my christmas collection!! My kids were happy to watch them all while they were homd.
The dvd can really fast and in very good shape.  Very happy with the service I recieved.  I would use the company again for future purchases.
Two great Christmas classics that might not be as well known as some of the others but a great find for a  collection
This followup show to the original is very well thought out and carries on the Christian theme of celebrating the birth of Jesus Christ.
I love watching this movie around the holidays, it's been one of my favorite movies since I was a child!
This was a gift for our grown son. This was one of his favorite childhoodChristmas stories. He wanted to have it for his kids to watch. Thanks.
1. Bugs Bunny's Christmas Carol2. Freeze frame With Road Runner & Wile E Coyote3. The Fright Before Christmas With Bugs Bunny & Tazmaina Devil
If u like johnny its a plus he is so sexy in this movie. My 2 year old is addicted to the movie its hilarious! Buy and download a very funny movie
Item arrived on time and was in great shape. It was a Christmas prez for my daughter who had watched it on tv one day and had to have it on DVD.
She says this is one of her favorites! This young actor is quite a versatile talent and has been a delight since Benny & Joon.
It made me happy. It was so funny! Johnny depp was amazing in it! As he always is. What a great cast!
gotta love johnny ... the movie when you wonder who is that hott kid .great movie, a must have for the collection
This was bought as a gift for a person who loves anything about Johnny Depp.  I have not seen the movie but I'm sure I will when I visit her.
I love this movie have watched it many many times. Customer service was super it was sent out so very quick.
Definitely one of the best. Johnny Depp is great as Wade Cry Baby Walker. There is great music, great scenes. It is just a fun film all around
Always a great combination to watch with the original hairspray. They go together real well.
Cry Baby has to be one of my favorite movies. I absolutely love this movie, I could watch it over and over again. :) It also came in great condition.
This is a great fun movie to watch over and over. Will add to my library immediately after I watch it. Watching movie do not disturb.G
just a good silly funny, love story, i thoroughly enjoyed it, a great date movie, i recommend it, if you like to laugh this is a good one
Thank you very much, Excellent film just what was required to brighten up the day and have a good laugh to
The product was even better than stated and arrived earlier than expected. I would absolutely deal with this seller again.
excellent, innocent and beautiful. A unscripted look at life in a gypsy family. Highly recommend this film. Hate Amazon film rating
ANOTHER WELL DONE FILM NOIR ONLY THIS TIME IT RIDES THE RANGE.  ROBERT MITCHUM IS FANTASTIC IN THIS WESTERN NOIR
I was enthralled by the beautiful and very graceful Lorreta Young in this tale because she never fails to impress with her acting.
This is a delightful romantic comedy, well acted by the three main stars.  It should be released to DVD so more generations can enjoy it.
Great picture great movie loved it so much waited a long time to get this on dvd, won't let this go in a hurry if ever at all.
Ben Johnson is one of my favorite actors and the western movie remains a favorite, I really enjoyed this story.
I have always liked this movie, so when the chance came to be able to buy it. I could not resist. Thanks Amazon!
Ben Johnson need I say more, funny good story line, clean enjoy watching it over and over, must have if you like weasterns
John Ford just took the stock company to Moab, made a little picture that is a great wrap-up in a blanket treat on a foul weather winter night.
I really like the storyline of the movie!! Lots of tension and sexual situations!
It was probably one of the best movies ever made with Theresa Russell and shows her at her best.  Stunning, and for along time not available.
i love this movie great story line good acting recieved this product in the time frame 5 star rating recomended this movie to friends
Great movie and I hope they will put this entire series on DVD.  I've watched many episodes and would like to have the whole series.
Good soap filmed in England. Lana Turner shines in role  of other woman in love with a married man. Probably most enjoyable  to Lana Turner fans.
It came quickly and had enough action for my teenage nephew to watch all three within 36 hours of getting it.
thank you was a gift came on time was just what i wanted thank you very much love it.so does my son it was for him
Got this for $18 and for blu ray cant pass it up for that price, quality really good, hey its blu ray
Not alot you can say on this. You like Sylvester Stallone you will like this trilogy. Good action adventure movies.
I got this set for my husband as well as myself.  We both loved all the Rocky movies, thus we bought them all in one deal!
Love the Movies then , and Love them now.
I Like Sylvester Stallone Movies And This Trilogy Was Very Enjoyable To Watch.These Are Movies That I Can Watch Many Times And I Can Enjoy Them.
This is a solid box set to have for your collection.  Rambo added a whole new word to our language besides &#34;Yo, Adrian&#34;.
Who has not seen these? I had all of these on dvd, but had to get these on blu ray and they did not disappoint.  Get these great, all are so good!
Yeah, Rambo is a guilty pleasure for every guy (and woman?).  Very interesting to see Sly's aging over the years.This is a good box set -- get it.
This is a great movie.  nicely done and entertaining. I would buy it again. We were all very glad it was available.
Didn't know that there was a movie for this series.  I'm glad that you were about to provide the proof that it exist.  Just loved it.
great movie loved it and wish  they would come out with a sequel with even darker tales. one of kings best.
Some great actors here that you would not have expected in a horror anthology! A really fun 90 minutes-get you some!!
If your a child of the 50's or 60's, this is a must for your sci-fi collection.  Although quite hilarious today, it was a scary then.
It was the original theatre release and the 2004 versions that were re-edited. It's hard to find the original so I'm glad I bought it.
Great collection verison of Star Wars Origanl episodes and worth purchasing through amazon if you are a fan of Star Wars.
Glad I could add this to my colection to replace the CD of have of it. Looking for the others to go with it.  Like the action
This was a very nice dvd. It was very interesting to watch. Like the star wars series.
Good movie good story and great special effects.  Carrie Fisher was hot then but now shes older.
Thank God for Lucas! Me being an artist, this has enhanced my imagination. I first saw Star Wars in 77'. It still has the same effect.
Another great star wars flick and another great addition to my movie collection we love them all. Star wars is highly reccomended for any sci fi fan.
My 10 yr old loves all the Star Wars movies and he watches them over and over.
Although not as great s the following two episodes Star Wars is great fun and incredibly intresting
This is a classic you don't want to miss.  Digitally remastered makes this a worth while home experience.  Don't miss out.
It is still fun to sit and watch this ground breaking film.  The characters are still adorable and the whole family can watch this without worry!
The 1977 version is far better than the updated with added CGI...The 2004 version is a nice bonus and the price is right...
Seeing this at home on my big plasma with the enhanced sound was nearly as spectacular as it was in theaters.A great job!
This movie is so much fun! Its action packed and very funny! I loved it!
As advertised.  Good quality image on 720p and 1080i HD TV's.  Completely happy.
It is great original one that was seen in the theater when it was first released
This is the only copy that I can find that has the original Star Wars. It is great to find a copy left with out all the horrible added stuff.
My son is a huge Star Wars fan.  We watch this as a family and we all really enjoy it.
This was a re-purchase of a dvd that I had purchased before...it is humorous and pretty good at that. Yay Luke!
Darth becomes a good guy. Luke  discovers he is leia's long lost brother, Lando wins the war. This is a must watch episode. The Ewoks were great.
I am very happy to have the original theatrical release on DVD. I think that it looks and sounds great. It is just what I wanted from this DVD!
Star Wars Episode VI is mine(and my best-bud)'s favorite star wars movie from the original trilogy.
The filmakers couldn't make a film like this if they triedMaybe they can re-make itThey do everything else
One of my nieces favorites. She absolutely loves this film. This is a solid value as well. No extras included.
I Love This Movie,they don't make them like this anymore,This is an old fashion family movie that moves you heart.
The DVD sound and picture are so much clearer than my VHS tape; I also noticed stuff that I didn't remember seeing before.
For those who enjoy the oldies...this is a goodie! The entire cast of this one makes it a great one to watch!
This is a great movie. the actors are the best, the store line is good & you can totally feel what these people are going through in this era.
This is nice to have in your collection.  This movie is what got it all started.
I love watching this with my uncle when I was little and I have never grown tired of it. Glad I was able to find it on Blueray!
the series lasted a very long time. they combined wit with a feeling of how much human life was worth no matter the nationality.
Post - Vietnam era humor that one might say is about dealing with stress in the otherwise grim settle of a field hospital.
I loved this series when it was on TV. It made me laugh and cry. Very excited to get the set.
loved it the first time and love it again
It was the best in its time and continues to be so.  Does not disappoint great cast great story lines&#8230;&#8230;..
The DVD was new, worked fine. I'm perfectly happy with the purchase and delivery. Thanks!
We watch a program each night before turning the lights out.  Just fun to watch.  Recommend the series. Characters can get to you.
Another classic movie that everyone should have in their video collection. An all star cast of great actors, very funny.
m*a*s*h is one of my favorite sitcoms!  i now can watch it any time i want to.  the movie is also very funny!
One of the top 100 movies of all time. Great acting, screenplay and directing.  A  must see for all movie fans.
MASH is a most popular and enlightening TV series for all ages to really enjoy and cherish for a lifetime, and thanks, Amazon, for a great price!!!!!
It was fun to recall the series. I remember watching it front the beginning to the end and now I can do it all over again.
My husband and I were wanting to re-visit the original cast of MASH. Now that we are more mature (older) I think it was even more fun.
ALTMAN'S CLASSIC STILL ARE UNDERESTIMATED TODAY. HOWEVER, TIME WILL HOW GREAT IT SHOULD HAVE BEEN. GREAT BLURAY EDITION FOR A MASTERWORK LIKE THIS.
This is a classic!  I loved MASH when it first came out and still do. Was so happy to get it so I can watch often.
This was great, It was good to find something that I watched years ago that still interested me and was available in good condition
One of the first and best anti-war, tell it like it is, movies. Started a great tv series.
This series never disappoints.  Humor, humanity, disgust with stupidity and anger at the waste of war.  I never tire of it.
This is the third best army movie. The first best is Catch 22. the second best is Kelly's Heroes.Thank God they didn't use John Wayne in any of them.
Hey guys, if you dont have it, get it. The Box set of M.A.S.H.is a must, you wont be dissapointed
I am slowly going through the dvd's and trying to remember everyone who played on Mash. It is nice to take your time and enjoy the stories.
One of my all-time FAVORITE movies!  How could you not like it???? I watch it over and over and over again an never get tired of the jokes.......
This was a great gift for my husband.  He loves both the movie and tv series and this gives us many hours of entertainment.
I love this movie. It is so funny. We love the tv show as well. Donald Sutherland and Elliot Gould were great. A good movie to watch.
packaged well. worth the money, great classic movie. I would recommend this to anyone. definitely worth it. cool. done well.
This is for people who like to watch (REwatch!) MASH again (and again).  This was a very low priced series.
Always liked Mash and this is a great deal for all seasons plus the pilot movie.  Definitely recommend for your viewing pleasure.
Bought for my husband who is big M*A*SH Fan. He has M*A*S*H in Beta,VHS, DVD and now Blue Ray. Love it great movie!
two disc collection with scenes not seen in the theatre version, do like finding deals such as this when looking.
a funny look at our man and women that had a lot of things going on in there lives during the war
what can I say other than MASH will be a great movie years from now.
I have loved this series for years since I was in Vietnam.  It is great to finally have a set for myself to watch when I want.
A great buy for a person into TV History. It is my favorite comedy series although the movie was not as enjoyable
This movie is a great comedy and it also gives a different way of seeing how a mash unit operates. You really should check this film out.
Excellent series and fabulous price during the Gold box offer.  Wanted this for a long time and now I have the entire series plus the movie!!
Although the long running series was very good, I do not think it compares to the irreverent, witty and gritty original.
I'll watch anything he appears in, and I saw this movie years ago.  Goldie Hawn was even less annoying than usual; It holds up well.
Both Goldie Hawn and George Segal are in top form. This film is just raunchy enough is be really funny.
A classic
One of my favorite movies, it was one of those sleepers that turned out to be a huge success. I highly recommend it. Mossy
I saw the original release and then again years alter and loved it both times. Highly recommended.[...].
Tongue in cheek humor with very interesting details about this tribe lifestyle ~ I have all the sequels too and have enjoyed them all
The movie was ordered for my daughter in law and she loved it. She is a big Lucy fan so she enjoyed the comedy in it.
Got this to me fast and I love to watch Lucy and Bob together. Thanks for getting it to me so fast.
Pure comedy genius. Bob hope and Lucille Ball are one of the funniest duos that you could ever see on the silver screen.
What a great old movie! I really like both of these actors & they are great together! Good clean fun comedy!
What can one say, two nutty, funny comics together at their best. Wonderful film. I give it 11 out of 10.Regards Zy
This is a great movie. It is very different, but if you like the unusual you will love this dvd.
It took a while to obtain this quite rare gem of a Helen Mirren movie, but it has been worth the wait. It arrived yesterday.
I saw this on USA,I loved this movie,I wish It was on DVD,I hate bugs,too but I don't gasp everytime I see them.
finally this film is getting released. Such a great horror film. Pick it up for Halloween and have a great time watching it.
a must see movie for any horrow movie fan very scary the scences are filmed at night witch makes it more scary a very good movie to watch.
This DVD arrived early & in great condition as it was ordered new as I had seen this DVD several times before & I still enjoy this movie!
I loved this movies and was so happy to find it available.  It is a good addition to my collection.
Bought it for my co-worker and he loves it so much. He stated that he would recommend it to everyone.
took you back in time where true love comes to life in this great love story marie osmond was great.
I have loved this movie since it was on TV many years ago. Love it even better now!  It's a great movie!!  :)
I love this movie and am happy to have it on DvD.  It's been my favorite Christmas movie for years.
I am pleased with my purchase. It came quickly and is in very good condition. Comedy.
Usually sequels aren't as good but this one is nearly as good as the hilarious first movie. Worth seeing!
A simply timeless movie delight! It still speaks to the oftentimes fioolishness of modern society and the things we value!
Dan Aykroyd and Gene Hackman make a great team!!!!This movie is one you will love, and watch over and over again.Enjoy
Whenever I need to relax and watch something very funny this is the first DVD movie I pop in. Dan is great in just about every movie he appears.
The movie is immensely packed with action from start to finish and is a movie that keeps my attention. A great movie to watch.
Great collection verison of Star Wars Original episodes and worth purchasing through amazon if you are a fan of Star Wars.
By far the best of the now-sad Star Wars saga. It had just the right balance of seriousness and whimsy. This is one of my top 10, all-time, for sure.
Luke loses a handIf that wasn't bad enoughHe gains a father
the enhanced and theater version seem to be equal with an exception to the enhanced version which told and showed you alittle more about the movie
After the 97 re-releases, Empire became my fave. of the 3.  Loved it!  What more can you say.
This movie now deepens the Star Wars saga from lasers and a shoot em' up trilogy to a saga of good and evil. I would highly recomend this!
Finally the middle movie. I've been watching I & III and they were getting a little old. Thirty three or so years old and it's STILL a great movie.
I have watched all the movies that I got from Amazon.com, and I am very pleased with all of them. So thank you so much.Wanda Myers
Classic movie.  Love it every time I watch it.  Michael J. Fox and Christopher Lloyd are a hard to beat pair.
Excellent! Almost as good as the first Back To The Future!  Brings all the installments into focus and finishes the trilogy in fine fashion.
Man this movie was funny.  The hole family laffed a lot.  I would watch it again if I wanted to laff some more.
This series is awesome. I think these are one of the few trilogies where I feel like all three movies are equally good.
My son is a Back to the Future fan so he was glad to get this DVD to add to his growing personal &#34;library.&#34;
A GOOD MIXTURE OF ACTION AND COMEDY.....LOVED IT.  THE FIRST IN THE SERIES. I AM A FAN OF M J FOX
Love all of the movies.  This one was just as good and tied up the storyline pretty well.  Would recommend it to others.
Back to the Future Part III was a great movie. It was great to have it when I was on my trip
I love this movie it is very good. I would recommend all of the back to the future movies. I love it.
Awesome movie highly recommend it to anyone. I am a 80's movie fan and if you are you will love this
The Jetsons are a classic and I love them! I remember when I was a kid and I use to watch them... seeing them again definitely brings back memories!
I like this movie! Good for the kids! And good for my nephews! That's that back in the days cartoons!Thanks Amazon!Dee SmallsDecatur GA!
A very enjoyable animation from Hanna-Barbera team. Classic cartoon series with a addition of songs. Recommended for the whole family.
Tony Curtis surprisingly at his best. Loved the period in which this film was filmed in. A cult classic to be sure
One of my favorite movies. Lot of Hollywood included but some facts too. I enjoy history or unsolved crimes especially this one.
What can I say? A great Steinbeck novel in a movie, shows the desperation and struggle during the dust storms.
I bought this as an accompaniment to teaching John Steinbeck for my English 11 classes.  It is a well-done film and a classic.
This has been one of my all time favorites.  It was filmed during the era and is a very stirring movie.  A true all star cast!
I just love old movies.they remind me of the good old days.i just love henry fondai plan to buy many more from this web site.
Back in those days, people were so desperate to find work, it nearly matches the times of today and how desperate they are.
Excellent movie, loved it. Would highly recommend this to everybody Henry Fonda is great in this movie. Came on time..
Classic Henry Fonda movie set back in the depression and what families went through, must see for entire family.
Tops in acting, directing & script (taken from Steinbeck's famous novel.  You feel you understand what the Great Depression was like.
a classic that had been long overdue in watching.  very pleased with the content and actors.  I bought this for a gift for a friend.
this is how my Mom's family came to live in Washington it fits to the T.  I am thankful they were tougher than me
A wonderful movie for all to view. This story has a great moralto it. which gives one something to have each day of our lives.
A great classic film in every respect. The film and it's message are timeless.  A must see for any movie buff.
Excellent movie. I have always made a point to watch it when it came on TV.  Acting is superb. Henry Fonda a favorite.
This movie is truly a classic. Just love it !  It`s helpful to me, My life has been so hard, it helps me feel less alone in my pain.
I only bought on movie an it wasn't this copy.  Better check my order.  Either way this is a great western.
I was browsing and stumbled across this gem. I had heard the name but had never seen the movie. I loved it from beginning to end.
Another one of John Wayne's great movies. A look at post Civil War life. What men were willing to do just to survive.
The Undefeated was a fun film to watch. Featuring history and action following the Civil War. the Stars  made this film.
Mother enjoys this movie and seeing the actors in this movie makes her day. We just like this movie very much.
Another great classic with the Duke. Good cast, good action, even romance. I recommend it. John looked really good at this age.
a very good movie about the civil war and the aftermath. rock hudson co stars in the movie didn't cost much to get it.
A few great actors, love the theme, westerns show people they have something to believe in even now with our economy.
This was a Christmas gift for my daughter who has just become a John Wayne fan.  I bought her one of my favorites.
This is a great movie about two forces that where enemies in the past but due to events become fast friends.
Very good movie; what can I say, I'm a biased fan of the late John Wayne.  Rock Hudson also does a good job.
A true John Wayne classic.  If you are fan of John Wayne and of Westerns in general, this is one movie you'llenjoy immensely.
I have just about all of John Wayne's movies in my collection now.  I love his western movies the best. There will never be anyone to fill his shoes.
All the actors are superb and the story is well done.Brando is his usual greatness and his character is surprisingly different.Enjoy this movie.
Though I have seen it many times--I decided that I wanted it in my collection. One of my favourite movies with Marlon Brando.
this may be the best emotional war movies of all time,the inner conflicts of the characters is outstanding and how the conflicts play out
Brando Played a Great Part
Brando in one of his rare film portrayals. Based on the novel, it depicts World War Two in an unbiased manner. Well worth watching,
Best movie ever always loved it i recommend it to others a true classic upgrade to dvd for best view
Love this old classic....Shirley Temple is darling in this movie...Such talent that will be admired for decades to come...
Great old time classic. It's clean and has a happy ending. Enjoy Shirley Temple movies and the classics. Great movie
I was a Shirley Temple fan as a little girl and now my granddaughters are big fans...... sweet movies for little ones!
Been watching this movie since a little boy ,,,Still my favorite all time of hers !  Wish it was remade in color though ? Is it ?
This is a perfect movie for the entire family.  Shirley Temple is the best.  Glad this is on Amazon Prime.
I love Shirley Temple movies but this one is my favorite. I never get tired of watching it! I recommend this movie
Its a classic! Been watching this movie since forever n it still makes me cry. Its been remade BUT never better than the original!
This is such a beautiful story and Shirley Temple's best in my opinion.  It makes me laugh and cry.  What more could you ask.
I really enjoy this and I love that my whole family can watch it.  Shirley Temple is as cute as ever - if your a fan you will love it.
Great movie no matter how many times you watch it through out the years. Now another generation now loves this video.
What can I say other than its a classic as are all of her movies from yesteryear! Enjoy on a Sunday morning or any morning.
What a beautiful little story!  My girls LOVED it, and I really appreciated the G rating.  Definitely a must-see for the whole family!
I watched the movie with our girls (7 and 8).  They loved it and it provided a trip down memory lane for my wife and I.
Classic movie.  Actually you need to watch out for Anne Baxter (Eve), trying to work her way up to stardom and fame.  Excellent acting.
A women admires better Davis charcater.  Wants her part in play and gets it.  All comes around goes around in the end.
This Is Simply One Of The Very Best Pictures Of All-Time, Featuring EASILY The Greatest Actress Of All-Time...Ms. Bette Davis !!!
While one actress claws her way to the top, another succombs to the horrors of middle-age.  Starring Thelma Ritter.
The blu ray of this film is excellent  it never looked so good. I notice black and white movies are very sharp .
Love it in Black and white. The perfect old movie. If you love Bettie Davis you will love this movie.
received the movie within a few days and the quality is excellent.
You can't go wrong with this film when Bette Davis is a Bitch she is great. I love her movies
a movie i would be watching right now if i didnt have to give this review - blah blah blah  starring son=meone , written by someone
One of the best Betty Davis movies ever.  Incredible acting by all.  I watched it many times on TV; it is better to own it.
All About Eve is one GREAT FILM. A must see. It is fast paced and very smart. It also has a walk on by Marilyn Monroe.
The movie Itself was a great testiment to Bette Davis but In Blu Ray RESTORED It looks like new. IN Book Format! With pictures etc.
What a steal of a deal. Such a great price. The dvd is in great condition. It arrived as promised. I'd shop with this seller again.
One of the great acting roles for Bette Davis.  Great story, excellent cast.  Aging actress being upstaged by newcommer Eve.
A great movie, a real classic, in a format that must be for all classics! A Book with the movie!
Bette Davis' performance is great in this movie. I love this movie. I really like to watch old movies alot.
Classic film at its best. To bad they dont make films like this anymore. Bette Davis is magnificent in this film.
The dvd is in excellent condition. Fast delivery. Very excited about this purchase. Thanks for the great service.
a classic...great stars.
Silly movie.  My kids have discovered Mel Brooks and this movie has become part of their collection.  Silly, slapstick and fun.
There are enough zany characters in this one to keep you glued to the screen if you like MB movies.
High Anxiety is one of the funniest movies ever.This proves the genius of Mel Brooks.
IF YOU ARE A FAN OF MEL BROOKS, THIS WILL BE AN EXTRAORDINARY ADDITION TO YOUR DVD LIBRARY.  IT IS WITTY & TOO HYSTERICAL FOR WORDS!
Simply Said, this is in my opinion the best film Mel Brooks ever made. Harvey Korman steals the whole movie.
A spoof on the Hitchcock classic that doesn't miss a beat,proving Mel Brooks is king among all comic geniuses.
Love this film! One of his Best!  A classic great as a healing comedy movie, to soothe the&#34;savage beast&#34;.  Get it , if possible!
If you like Mel Brooks movies and like to laugh, this is pretty fun to watch!The decision to buy this on Blu Ray was simple!
Mel Brooks at his finest  in this  take-off of a Hitchcock thriller - PLUS typical Brooks timing and play on words and sterotypes.
One of several classics from Mel Brooks. His usual cast of characters are always a kick, especially Gene Wilder and Cloris Leachman.
i received the movie fast i liked the actors in the movie ,this is a very funny movie thanks tommy a
This was a great purchase after having no luck finding it locally.  Every viewing of this movie has played flawlessly.
This is one funny movie.  Anybody want a good laugh.....buy this DVD.  You will be glad that you did.  Thanks.
Equal opportunity offender leaves no sacred issues untouched.  Classic Mel Brooks is funny as heck!  Just don't go looking for Part 2.
very good received before date given.. my favorite movie all time and at a good priceThanks you for making my movie collection complete
This is always a go to if we can't find anything to watch on tv.  Old movie but a good one.
If you like comedies you should get this movie. It's great! Mel Brooks is a genius. A great piece to my movie collection.
Although I had seen this in the movies, I still wanted to own a copy for myself and my friends, it is one of Mel Brooks best !!
I love this movie.  The send up of the French Revolution is worth the price of admission -- Harvey Korman is fantastic as usual.
One of the funniest movies ever only wished they had made Part 2 or even Jews in space man rolling on the floor funny God Bless Mel
Now this MEL I love!Brooks cracks me up in all his films but this one is spectacular!Funny from start to finish!
one of the funniest movies ever I gor my movie on time and in perfect working orderim looking for more hard to find  movies
it was a great movie got it quickly and in great condition I loved it iloved it I loved it
Probably Mel Brooks's greatest work.I often wished he would have made a &#34;part II&#34;
MEL BROOKS MOVIES ARE ABSOLUTELY HILARIOUS. YOU LAUGH FROM BEGINNING TO END. I WILL ALWAYS WATCH A MEL BROOKS MOVIE OVER AND OVER !
This is one of the funniest Mel Brooks movies you will ever see.  It will have you in stitches.  I have watched it with many friends who all agree.
This movie is something else you have to have a great sense of humor to watch this, I always enjoy it!
If you're a fan of Mel brooks, and want a funny, funny, family friendly movie, it's here.  Just hilarious.  Must Have.
A brilliant, sarcastic treatment of history. A bit out there on the edge at times, but does an excellent job of laughing at ourselves.
This is a classic comedy that will last for decades.  To H_ _ _ _ with political correctness...this takes it to the very end of FUNNY!!
Classic 1960's movie before the Viet Nam war put Hollywood in a dark mood.  Fun, Fun, Fun!  Packed with classic stars!
As usual, Walter Matteau does a great job in this romantic comedy.  DVD came in good condition and I have no complaints
This is a real good movie from the late1970s good cast it has comedy satire humor drama all you would want in movie plot this is set in
I was told about this movie by a friend. It exceeded my expectations. The music and dancing were great. I would definitely recommend.
The music is great, the acting is fun, the story works, the b&w is effective -- an enjoyable gem of a production
I DON'T ANYBODY WOULD TURN THEIR NOSE UP ON THIS ONE IT IS A GREAT ONE TO HAVE IN YOUR COLLECTION I GIVE IT AN  A+
Being a di-heart Elvis fan I was very happy to get this along with Stay Away Joe and Tickle Me to add to my DVD collection.Love
This is a classic movie and worth watching . Tear jerker and good storyline find the time to watch this movie
Elvis has always been one of my favorites and this has always been one of my favorite movies.I really enjoyed it.
Whether you are an Elvis fan or not, this is a good movie.  Takes place at the end of the Civil War, but has some good 1950's rock and roll music.
I just love Elvis and all his movies and music, He is a wonderful singer and actor. I will always watch and listen to him.
I am a riel Elvis fan. Headroom was not a very good actor. But I really don't care. I really like countless no matter what.
All Elvis Movies are good clean fun and great to watch .I purchased this as a gift and they loved it !
Fun to see Elvis as a cowboy!  His songs still are fascinating and the storyline held my interest well!  Sure can ride a horse!
Another straight story, done pretty well. Wish he had made many more movies. Collection is almost complete. Miss him lots.
The only movie Elvis ever died in..the only one I ever cried in!  Good movie though!  If you have a DVD library, you need this one too.
If it's Elvis it's great!! I watch it over and over. You can't go wrong with Elvis movies or music.
Elvis did several Westerns and this is one of them. His role as a half breed Indian and is done quite well.
His main movies were military and western, but played all of them well.  He is the man that most people would like to be in the movies he made.
watching this movie on a large tv is great ,, the scenes are fantastic ,, lot of action ,, one of my favorites
Been a John Wayne fan longer then I have worn Levi's....Good product / good movie. Another one to add to my collection.
One of John Wayne's better Action Western Classics. Acting is average with some laughable spots in this movie.
In text with most john wayne movies he's in charge asuseual. Interesting,inovative,keeps youre interest.
John Wayne is great has always, love to watch him in any movie,, will watch this one over and over...great buy,, keeper
al ways  been abig  john wayne  fan  and I  love this movie  and you had it real cheap  so thanks.
One of the great  John Wayne movies in which he made during his career. I enjoy seeing all his movies. One of the worlds great actors
Absolutely love this move.  I am a big Stuart Whitman fan.  I received the item in the condition as promised by the vendor.
Big fan of John Wayne and have several of his films and will give 5 stars and recommend any of his films
John Wayne proves how versatile an actor he is!  In this movie he's funny and serious as well! The supporting actors are great as well!A great flick!
John Wayne was the best actor of his time. This movie is one of his best.
This is one of my favorite westerns.  My dad watched them all the time and now I enjoy them too.
I LOVE John Wayne. I have most of his movies. Everyone who likes John Wayne should own this wonderful movie!!
good story line,good acting,very funny at times,adventure,excitment,a twist at the end of the movie,very good i recommend it.
This movie is very entertaining. It provided an all star cast. I am looking forward to purchasing it on blue ray.
Bandolero ! is a good western with Raquel Welch being the whole show. It is good escapism,and at the time she was the top sex symbol in films.
Great movie!  A true western classic!
The original and the best. The remake was good but this orignal is superior.
Great move, wish they would make more great movies like this one, where else could find more movies the Amazon
Terrific movie, I am a big fan of older classic movies and this is one you just have to own.
This has been one of my favorite movies for many years.  The dvd is great.and I enjoyed it very much.
It is a great old movie and brought back a lot of memories from that era. Raquel Welch is always fun to watch. What a comedy.
The video came in to me in great shape and so quicky ,. Thank you for it . I will enjoy it for manny years. ART
Like new , I can't be happier. You send it to me very quickly. I will enjoy it for manny years. ART
Tank's for the outstanding job in getting this tape to me. It is like new, you grt it to me so quickly. ART.
I love the old Charlie Chan movies.  The plots were simple but they were enjoyable and often funny.  No real violence or foul language.
I WATCH ALL OF THE CHARLIE CHAN MOVIES.  I HAVE A DVD OF EVERY ONE I HAVE FOUND.  DIFFERENT STARS, BUT ALL ARE GOOD.
Thak's you for the outstanding job in getting this tape to me. It's like new. I will enjoy it for manny yaers. ART
As a Charlie Chan collector I enjoyed this. Although not PC in today's world, the mysteries are good. I got more.
This dual DVD was so classic for me being a classic buf..I loved th scenery in this movie and the overall feel of it as well Very good.
I was delighted to get this disc. The King in New York had content re the McCarthy hearings that was fantastic! Haven't watched the other movie yet.
Notorious in Bu-Ray?  Who could say anything negative? Own the non Blu-Ray version, but everything is so much better in Blu-Ray
EXELENTE, LA MANO DE HITCHCOCK ESTA PRESENTE, EL GUION, LA DIRECCION Y LAS ACTUACIONES DE INGRID BERGMAN,CARY GRANY Y CLAUDE RAINS FORMIDABLES.
Love this movie with Cary Grant. This movie is the perfect love story. You can't help but fall in love with the characters.
AM A BIG FAN OF CARY GRANT AND BERGMAN. LIKE TO SEE THEM TOGETHER. WILL RECOMMEND THIS TO MY FRIENDS
I love all of the Alfred Hitchcock movies! I also love Cary Grant and Ingrid Bergman! What a great movie to add to my collection!
Notorious is one of the best and most interesting movies I've ever seen, and I highly recommend that you buy it from Amazon!!!!
Love Cary Grant and Ingrid Bergman and together they are even better! One great movie! Filled with suspense and a love story as well!!
Cary Grant does a wonderful job in this movie & it is atypical for me.  Highly recommend that you view this movie.
Bergman is a drunken trollop, Grant is a sadistic cad.This is elegant, sly, witty and very naughty.eat em up yum.
Great suspenseful movie. One of my favorites!! It's a great movie to add to your collection. What's better than Cary Grant??
Great acting from some great actors.  Great story.  Had this on VHS and watched it for years.  Glad to have it on DVD.
What an exciting movie from beginning to end.  And Cary & Ingrid are a perfect pair & I am very fond of Claude Rains.
I love this film from Hitchcock. He was great at making spy movies and this one delivers. It's a wonderful spy drama.
Bought this movie for my Grandmas birthday. Watched it with her and was surprised by how great it was. Would recommend to others!
Excellent, well-paced and well-acted movie. The two leads work excellently together and the villians are menacing.
I saw part of this on TCM one day and just loved it and want it in my library.  I can't wait to sit down and watch it all the way through.
Love this movie. Love Carey Grant. Love Ingrid Bergman. So happy I found this old wonderful movie to enjoy today.
This is one of Hitchcock's finest films. I'd recommend it to anyone who likes excellence in filmmaking. The quality of the DVD was great.
The dvd was received in excellent condition.  I am glad you are in control of things.
Everything about the movie was good.  The quality of the DVD was much better than the VHS copy that I had of the movie.
It's Bette Davis, and I was on a Bette Davis kick.  I loved that woman and really enjoy watching the old movies.  It was just as I had hoped.
This is quite an amazing story about the tragedies that arise from controlling parents and sibling or intra family rivalrys.
This is a nice classic movie and I just love her in these dramatic roles.  One of her best movies.
All you have to do is look into her eyes! And you will get spooked!! So easy for her to spook you!! Love Bette Davis Eyes!!!  The song too!!
This is an all time classic.  I Loved this movie.  Great cast and I recommend it to all my family and friends.
Love the classic older movies. Can be mysterious without gore & sex in every scene. Wonderful performance by Bette Davis
Love Betty Davis and this was very well done. A great psychological thriller. My speed. No nightmares just a great period piece.
This is another great movie with Bette Davis but Olivia is the one who shines in this movie. Great cast and great story. Check it out!!!
This movie still scares to hebe gebes out of me, love watching it again and again love Bette Davis in this .
Packaged properly and arrived on time. Fantastic production! /so much fun to watch how the different movies por\\rogress through the decades.
These are both classics. The original with Frederick March will always be number one. Charles Laughton is always great playing a heavy.
GREAT CAST AND GREAT ACTING IN A LONG MOVIE YOU DONT WANT TO END. I RECOMMEND THIS ONE FOR YOUR DVD LIBRARY.
This is classic film making.  They  have made many Les Miserables but I think these two are the best.  Thanks Amazon!
Having enjoyed this movie when it first came out, I was happy to see it on the excellent video and am so satisfied with the supplier.
Good oldie. Excellent acting. I have seen it several times over the years. It holds up well as the top movie version of Les Mis...
This is a good movie with James Stewart in the lead.  These old westerns are enjoyable to watch and most are quite affordable.
Jame Stewart is a good actor. I enjoy his western movies, I would recommand this movie to anyone who like old western
The story line is really good. Well acted and wrote great picture love it. It shows a good side of the Indains
Really like the entire movie except when the Indian maiden gets killed.Really sad when prejudice doesn't let us see the greater good.
I chose this movie because it's an altime favorite of mine and I needed a new copy.  recommend it to anyone who likes Jeff Chandler and westerns.
This is a great movie which is worth viewing many times.  I pull it out ever so often and replay it again.
Broken Arrow, is outstanding story.  As a life long fan of James Stewart, this story is a favorite to watch.  Having it on DVD is a plus.
If you like a great western's like me, and the way it should be, then you can't go wrong with James Stewart!! todays westerns is a joke lol.
Saying I love it is an understatement. This being a FAVORITE, I knew what I was looking for. The picture was clear, (no interference).
This was yet another great movie to add to our son's collection of Jimmy Stewart westerns.  He enjoys it a great deal.
We are loving it we watch several time a week, and never get tired of watching it, we will never get tired of watching Jimmy Stewart Movies.
Great classic!!  We watch a lot of classic westerns all the time. This is just another one in our collection
This is a great story with James Stewart and other well known actors.  Would watch it again.  Try it.  You'll like it.
I saw this as a young person when it was first released. And Jeff Chandler was my favorite actor then.
I have seen and now own all of his stuff. None were the least bit disappointing. Re-viewing them over the years has always been a joy.
A very hard video to find, but Amazon had it, this is one of Mel Brooks best films, very funny.I reccomend it highly to everyone.
Nothing like this, classic Mel Brooks, well thought out, and clever writing with over dramatic moments that has me in stiches
John Wayne's first movie! How handsome !This western, because it was made when movies were in their early stages of developmentis a masterpiece.
Much better than the full frame format edition.  The wide screen really brings the scenery into play.  The quality of the transfer is superb also.
This movie is so much fun to watch.  I believe it is the best John Wayne movie ever.  Crystal clear after all these years.
Thank's the the video came in great shape , like new . I enjoyed it so very much, and agen. ART
A truely great job . The tape is in great shape and very well . You got to me so quickly. Thank's ART
Fantastic film I loved it, the video is not of very good quality but for a film this age worth the purchase.  I would love to get it on DVD
One of the all time classics, great movie. excellent quality. Glad I could add it to my collection at such a good price.
quite simply , the best film ever made about the American revolution; a classic!
Always enjoy watching this old movie.Never gets old.I enjoy watching any movie that Henry Fonda is in.I always recommend watching this movie.
Product arrived promptly and was exactly as described.  Video and Audio quality excellent.  I experienced no problems of any kind.
i bought this movie because it is one of my favorites.i love the primary and supporting actors and the story line
One of my favorite Henry Fonda movies from a time in our hisotry I am so very interested in; will always keep.
A wonderful movie with great actors depicting the history of our country!A love story with suspense and a happy ending.
Very good and intertaining movie with a great cast. One I remember seeing on TV in my youth. History works
The service was excellent.  I would buy from them again.  The movie was enjoyable.  I had not seen it in a while and I enjoyed it.
This movie is one of the classics.  Henry Fonda and Cludette Colbert are perfectly cast in this historical drama.  I loved it.
Good Hitchcock film. Germans sink a ship and only people thati highly recommend it a.Good stars in it.  He sure got the best.
Excellent acting. Hitchcock is the best.
Astonishing film.  Well done by Mr. Hitchcock.  The cast is magnificent... I don't think there are any actors now that compare with this ensemble.
This would be a great one to watch with a group of friends and discuss. It's also fun to see a young Hugh Cronyn.
I could watch this one a year. It's a classic. Even giving it's age, the story, the acting, the suspense is still worth and watch.
Intense treatment by Hitchcock at his best... a single venue movie... it all takes place is a LIFEBOAT! Bankhead at her best, as all players are.
It is amazing how a whole movie can be captured in a lifeboat.  Movie is really done well and the characters very interesting.
Intense, riveting, as only Hitchcock can deliver. I liked the way he worked his way into the film. Tallulah Bankhead was spectacular and funny.
James Stewart in this movie reminds me of any 60s father just trying to have a good vacation with his family. And Maureen as always is amazing.
This is one we watch with our son who is now 31... nearly every time he comes home to visit.  It is a classic.
Great classic film from the 1960's.  There is a little swearing in it, but it's still a great family film.
This is a great movie, it's funny and entertaining.  You just can't go wrong with a James Stewart movie.
I loved it and will watch it again and again so much fun and Jimmy is fantastic in it so is Maureen love her too!
Great theme and some fun comedic segments.  Good character acting and family interplay.  Jimmy Stewart has always been the best.
Always a pleasure to see Stewart movie.  That man could do comedy as well as he did serious roles..
Always loved this movie and find it says what most of us think at times about vacations we go on and things that happen. Jimmy Stewart is great.
My sisters get together once in awhile to watch old movies, this one was a hoot to watch.. loved it.
This is one of my favorite movies. The actors are priceless. The story is a bit silly, but well worth watching.
Again, wasn't born yet when it was made, but it's such fun and funny.  I enjoy watching it whenever I feel the mood.
Watched this when I was a kid and enjoyed it and I wanted it for my dvd collection Watched this when I was a kid
On of Jimmy Stewart's best. The Tom Hanks of an older generation. Love this movie and now my kids do too.
Once again, the old classic are the best.  Good wholesome humor, without sexual and violent content.  I highly recommend it.
This came very quickly and is in great shape as far as I can tell.  As it is a Christmas gift, I do not know how it plays.
Wonderful movie. Wanted to buy classic westerns for the nursing home I work at and know they will love it. I watched it and it is great.Thank you.
First saw a clip of this movie on M*A*S*H and just had to see it in person loved it even for an older movie it was real good
Yet again, who remembers George Segal but seeing this movie again after 30 years brought back to me just how excellent his movies were.
Well written and fast moving. A movie was made of this novel. I enjoyed the whole book and the excitement it produced.
An excellent and intelligent spy thriller. Beautiful score by John Barry. The enhanced 2.35:1 picture is very good.
This has a great story full of comedy and adventure.A story of times gone by not realizes by todays generation.
One of my favorite movies and still not on DVD or Blu-ray what a shame - would definitively be a best-seller ...
While not exactly true to history, I very much enjoyed the film. I first saw the film in the late 1950's. Thank you for making it available.
A great movie.  Long one of my favorites  Beautiful in Blu-ray  Recommend it to men and women  All three stars were good
I've always enjoyed Basil Rathbone as Sherlock Holmes and have many of his movies but not this one so was so happy to finally find it to buy.
I loved this movie when I first saw it and now I"m glad I have one for myself.  This is the exact one I wanted too.  Thanks  Rainey
My family really enjoys the old Sherlock Holmes black and white movies and Basil Rathbone is our favorite Holmes actor.
A great story about World War II and I like seeing Sherlock take care of this business but I was sorry to see people get killed in the end.
Loved this on TV for so long. This tape is very clear and sharp. Would like to get the whole set.
One of TOM BAKER's best with a solid and intence story that can keep one trying to think of ways to help the Doctor.
This is one of my favorite episodes of the British television series Doctor Who.It has a mysterious plot with logic puzzles inside
Got to have all the Tom Barer episodes. He is the best doctor of them all.Will keep buying till I have them all.
Big Tom Baked he is my favorite Doctor Who, the effects are cheesie comparied to the new shows but I still like the older ones the best.
Great video.  A bit dated by today's standards, but that just adds to the Dr. Who charm.  A must have for Dr. Who fans.
what can I say, the more Doctor Who that is released the better the world is. great redone special effects and of course the original version.
This release does NOT contain THE KING'S DEMONS. Go to the Amazon UK site for a better description. This is a 2 disc set though.
Dr. Who : Tom BakerGreat Actor  ---  I Like Him, as An ActorGreat Show ---  Like the Show, a Lot
Movie is great. Love old school Dr.Who episodes and this one is a must see for any and all Dr.Who fans. Highly recommended!
This 4 part adventure is really one of the best ever made!Perfect introduction episode for people who don't know the series and a must for every fan!
Quarterback Princess was very hard to find am so glad to receive it in such good shape.  We watch it all the time.
Great movie, didn't think it was available, great condition, kids just loved, how young helen hunt was  thank you so much  angie
I thought this movie was great when I was growing up and SO glad that I was able to find it on DVD!!!
I had no idea this movie was available on dvd... Thanks for copying it from vhs. Such a old movie... but a real goody.
Helen Hunt was great as a young woman going after what they say she should not do... play football. A great fanily movie
This is a classic movie!!!  Dom Deluise is great! I recommend this movie to anyone who wants a good laugh.
If you haven't seen this movie, buy it now!!!!!  I loved it.  Typical Italian family... LOL!!!!  Loved it when it  came out and love it now.
Wonderful animated fantasy. Throughly enjoyed this movie. Not recomemded for children. This is an adult cartoon due to subject nature.
i saw this when it originally came out and was very happyto purchase the memory.  thanks so much
This is one of my &#34;must have&#34; movies. I upgraded to Blu-ray. It is a bit dated now, but I still look forward to the possible new sequel.
And the ending was superb.  Really. I would watch the entire movie just to see that ending.  And I mean that.
I've watched Ralph Bakshi for quite a few years. And have enjoyed his animated romps. This is one of his earliest efforts.
I love the movie. I hadn't seen it since I was a teenager. It was great and arrived in a timely manner, it is in great shape as well. Thank you.
Saw this movie more than five times when it came out in 1977.  The animation and story are riveting.  Ralph Bakshi is a master.
One of my all time favorites! I love this movie and saw it in the theaters when it first came out!
I so love this Movie I remember watching this movie as a kid and watching it on Blu-ray it still didn't disappoint.
...that never really had a chance the first time (it got pushed out of the theaters by a blockbuster.)The ending will catch you totally off guard.
This wonderful film is not often found in DVD or in VHSBut it is well worth having in you collection.
A good story, good acting & just a good movie.  Families can watch this movie.  It is a good addition to my library.
I hadn't seen this for quite some time and was really surprised to find it.  Good cowboy movie, I will continue looking for the old ones.Ann
We are glad to own this DVD ,we have been looking for it ,everyone should bye this way saves time & money
a great ol time western movie dedicated to the way cattle drives were journeyed back then. a must-see for all those who enjoy great westerns.
I saw this movies as a kid in the theater, and was glad it was relesed on dvd.
If you like stories of the &#34;west&#34;, you'll love this one. I've watched this one several times and still I'm not bored.
If you like realistic western life here you go.  Still holds up over the years.
This was the first (I think) true to form western that I'd ever seen years ago. I still enjoy it today.
I have seen this movie numerous times on tv and it is great. My only problems is where's the DVD????????????????
Not one of her better movies but its was enjoyable to watch and show and teaches children not to be selfish and be willing to give to others.
Our grandchildren fell in love with Shirly Temple the way we did 70 years ago... Beautiful movie - be sure to watch it with the kids.
I loved this movie when I was a child and now I can show it to my nieces & nephews and their children on DVD.
Great movie if you like Susan Hayward and Tyrone Power. What chemistry.Edgar Buchanan was great too Love this movie
Great cast, great story, great movie. 'Nuf said.
Was a gift for a friend and he was really happy to get it as he was looking for the movie his self.
I would highly recommend this movie to Clark Gable fans.  I remember seeing it when I was  a kid.  It's  better than I remembered.
It is a B flick b tommy. Lee Jones is great.  This should be on DVD.  Nice shots of central park.
Wife wanted to see it again, so I thought I should buy it for her.  We watched and it was as good this time as the first
This movie cracks me up no matter how many times I've seen it. It'll always be a favorite in my house.
DVD arrived on time, in perfect condition packaging and performance. Very pleased.
How can you go wrong with this fantastic Funny movie. Love John Cusack. So many funny bits in the movie to name.
I love this movie!  I watched several times when I was a kid and loved it.  It was a must for my DVD collection.  Hilarious, classic one-liners!
This classic is finally available for home viewing.  My family bought 5 copies (4 siblings and Dad).
received better off dead right on time. quick and will consider buying from in the future. thanks
I've owned this movie in some form for many years.A classic early John Cusack comedy. Goes great with One Crazy Summer and Say Anything.
I still love this movie. And now, my kids do too.
This is a Cusak classic that no one should miss. i highly reccomend it to every one who loves JC.
This movie is ridiculous but we laugh at it every time we've watched it which is a lot.  it's a great movie
This cult classic flick just keeps getting better and better with each passing year!  A true laugh out loud movie!
An 80's classic!! What a good flick. The overall cast is good with tons of funny lines and the paperboy just never gets old....2 dollars!!
I remember watching this movie as a kid.I had to find it & thank goodness it is on dvd.This keeps me laughing from start to finish.
we have been looking for this one ... we had it on vhs but cannot locate it !!!  THANKS !!
I've been changing my movies from VHS to DVD lately. Especially in the western genre. Your delivery was faster than I expected. Way to go!!
I can never go wrong watching a John Wayne movie and this was one of the best ones.
Of course my husband was very pleased since this is one of his favorite actors.  Anything John Wayne will be great.
because it was a great john wayne movie i will allways like to watch a good john wayne movie anytime.
This film came out the same year I was born.  Used to watch it on TV when it was aired.  I love it, the story and action
This is a great John Wayne move.
I was happy to have this movie and glad it came so fast and in such incredible like brand new quality
This movie is great for all ages. I think John Wayne movies stays true to the &#34;gun slinging&#34; way of life.
Have always been a fan of John Wayne's. He was a true patriot and loved America just like I do
John Wayne is great
John Wayne what more can you say.  I loved his canine companion &#34;Dog&#34; and was hurt when he got killed at the end.
One of John Wayne's best movies!  Nothing more needs to be said - it's the Duke!  That's it for me.
This has to rate as one of my all time favourite movies, and definitely one of my top three John Waynes.
I love all the John Wayne  westerns and this is no disappointment. It is some different from his others but very good.
ONCE AGAIN, WHAT ELSE IS THERE TO SAY. ONE OF MY TOP 5 WAYNE MOVIES. I CAN WATCH THIS ONE OVER AND OVER AND NEVER TIRE OF IT.
MY HUSBAND HAS FOR SO LONG WANTED THIS MOVIE AND WHEN I GAVE HIM THE PACKAGE HE ALMOST CRIED AND WAS SO HAPPY
More action than El Dorado.One of Johns Better movies and of course him and Maureen O'Hara have always play a good duo
Wonderful John Wayne movie.  I enjoy all his movies as this one was all I needed to complete my selection
Love this in blu-ray. Makes it all the more enjoyable. Who doesn't like John Wayne? He is an american icon!
This movie is a must for Duke fans.  The DVD is quality and the transaction met my expectations is every way.
This movie is a classic. I just love John Wayne. He is one of my all time favorite actors. The movie played great also.
What a great actor, I just love all the John Wayne  movies. The plot is so John Wayne. Just a great cowboy.
If you love John Wayne you will love Big Jake.  It is one of the best moviesthe Duke made.
Any John Wayne movie is great to watch, and his movies with Maureen Ohara are classics. Good addition to my collection!
The reader needs to understand that I am an admirer of the late John Wayne and am in the process of collecting many of his films.
It's a typical John Wayne. If, like me, you love The Duke you'll absolutely love this movie! Few words, lots of action ... and tough love.
Good old John...... A lot of drama,  little comedy, makes this classic.....Like the intro to the movie
big jake the name instantly says john wayne in one of his most powerful performances ever john wayne always rules
Reminiscent of "The Talented Mr. Ripley" in a somewhat dark comedy.  Excellent cast with twists. Michael York is the mainstay of the movie.
A different and true perspective on WWII, my era, but had not viewed this before.  A truly worthwhile film.  Glad to find it at Amazon.
Very good war movie. (True story)Max
I have enjoyed Shirley Temple for years.  Nice addition to my collection of movies as it is a good movie.
i love this movie because my great grandma loved it and i have been wanting this movie forever it remindes me of my great grandma
One of my wife's faves for the holidays. Already watched it and it still can make us laugh. If you like feel good holiday movies this is one too get.
Great little movie.  Kinda silly but I like it anyway.  Good Christmas story.  Dolly did a great job in this one.
Love the doctor, even the old one.. I recomend the doctor at any stage of his 50 years.. Go Tom baker
Loved this movie as a kid and its one of the first scary movies I remember watching. Great for the collection.
I watched this movie when it first came out on TV.  I purchased a copy for me and my boys.  We like suspenseful and scary movies!!
I haven't watch it yet but I like this movie and always have and always will and have waych ever since it came out
This has to be one of the best horror movies made.  It's not gore, It's not super scary, It's just good.
Very pleased. Didn't think I would find it anywhere. In my opinion this is a classic. Happy I found it this.
Not sure how this particular victim manages to get revenge, but the story is entertaining enough to keep you interested for the duration.
Great TV movie made for TV, was one of the better horror flicks of thst yer, I waiting for thid to come out for years & now finally a blu Ray
This is a really good movie, made from a book written by someone who actually lived the life portrayed. Very good movie!!
This film really needs to be added to Amazon Prime I would order it in a heart beat! I only saw it once but i would love to see it again.
I bought this for my mother. She has always loved this movie. She is also more comfortable with VHS rather than DVDs. She was very pleased.
I bought this item as a gift for my step dad and it works great.  He loves this one alot
This movie is a great comedy! My husband - who is not into classics - loved it as well. Eddie Bracken plays his role well
My husband is a collector of John Wayne DVD's.We really enjoyed this story line and of course the Duke.
I can watch his movies over and over, its funny, exciting and serious and keeps you at the edge of your seats in everything he does.
I have always enjoyed a good western, and I am a fan of John Wayne so I thoroughly enjoyed the movie.  It is funny and good entertainment.
Excellent Blu-ray transfer.  I had this on VHS and then on DVD but the Blu-ray is outstanding. One of John Wayne's funniest movies.
Item arrive on time and was in perfect condition.  I love this movieand am grateful its still available.  Many thanks!
This is a fantastic movie.  Love it,  John Wayne is the greatest actor & the whole cast is great in this.
what can I say am a John Wayne fan.  This is one of my favorite movies and finally got a copy. LOVE IT!!!!
I love John Wayne and Stewart Grangerand they are playing wonderful in thisadventure movie, going to Alaska.
The Quiet Man [VHS]This has a funny and fun fight. Like the fight in Quiet Man.
What an effort to make such a movie - I liked the humour - just the right movie to watch Saturday night
It arrived in a fair time line and was just the movie i hoped for.  John Wayne is even better when he comes from Amazon.
If you like John Wayne you will enjoy this one it is one of his first movies but very well done enjoy.
I am a very big duke fan,this is one of the best if you ask me,not much action as the others,but funny i like it very good price got here fast!
One of my favorite John Wayne movies.  Great price and lots of entertainment here.  Love any movie with John Wayne.
Great John Wayne movie.  I don't think I have ever seen one that I did not like.  Comes in record time.
One of my favorite John Wayne movies. Shows him in ways his other more serious movies don't. A definite for the John Wayne collector!
When men were men and not afraid to adventure out'. Keeps your interest and a great performance by the DUKE!
He is the most favorite actor of mine.Love all his movies.All I have is a DVD;now/so changing all my favorite movies over to DVD's.Thank-you
alaskain gold rush john wayne style. one of his funniest movies. Plenty of gun and fist fights for the action lovers and romance for the ladies.
Hands down one of John Wayne's best movies.  I can watch it again and again and not get tired of it.  Very highly recommended.
north to Alaska is another good film by the late great john wayne just one of many starring john wayne
john wayne find somebody today that are even worth putting his boots on. action and comedy at the same time, pure greatness
Another great (1986) flick with fun 80's special effects.  There's no story, but it all keeps you watching along in fun.
This is a rare fine. Never released on dvd unknown why. This is a must have for cyborg lovers. Full of action and comedy.
One of my favorite all-time actors. Beautiful to look at and to listen, Jennifer Jones is gorgeous.  All of it is bigger than life.
I recommend this movie, the price and packaging were great, all descriptions listed were accurate. Did I say I liked this movie, buy it.
We lost a great and handsome actor and a good human being, when we lost Gregory Peck.  My goal is to own all his movies.
Its not a great film, certainly, but you knew that already. A must for camp enthusiasts, to be sure. A classic.
I wonder why my mom let me see this when I was a kid. I remember it well now I'm in my seventies. Good movie but a little long.
What can you say about a classic. Unusual part for Peck and Jones. Great actors in every part. A must for any DVD library.
I like Alex Cord.  I just wanted to see him in another movie.  its an ok movie, not the best.
I love Clint Walker. The color was great and the story was good. Would like more of this type movie.
yuma was a great western played by clint walker of cheyenne fame, he showed that he could really act not just a tv star!
He's perfect. Clint is a very good roll model for children because he always goes for the right side of the law.
Hollyweird dosen't make movies like this anymore. Considering the junk that hollywood comes out. Movies like Yuma will continue to be classics
Great. I love Clint Walker, this movie has allowed him to display his wide talent base. Hughly recommended.Regards Zy
I am a Civil War buff and this story was awesome and would highly recommend it for anyone who likes period films.
i was glad to be able to purchase this mini-series. i saw it on tv a while ago and i had to have it
This complete miniseries is well woth the price If you enjoy history you will enjoy this one for sure Buy it
Received the set as advertised, excellent sound and picture on all discs, played well an my Bluray player and on my laptop.
An absolute must for the Civil War buff or someone wanting to enjoy a great movie.  I liked it so much I bought a copy for my son.Enjoy!!!
I love this series.  Got it for a very good price in a pkg deal.  Would recommend it to others.
Ghosts Can't Do it is a movie with Bo Derrick. A fun movie about love even after death. Enjoyed watching.
I REMEMBER WATCHING THESE WHEN I WAS GROWING UP AND REALLY LIKED THEM, NOW MY 7 YEAR OLD IS LOVING THEM JUST AS MUCH!
I love Dan Aykroyd. I love Bill Murray however my wife hates him but loves this particular movie. Funny, zany and off the wall!
Just as great as when they were made.  Love the special effects and of course love Acroyd, Murry and Ramis.
Another great movie, great plot and amazing special effects. Worth watching if you want some good laughs. Top notch stuff.
This is a typical Bill Murray movie, but the supporting cast is awsome!!! Nothing here to take serious but funny!
dan aykoyd is as terrific as ever.  we brought back old times watching this.  good to add to any collection
the best! the original! ghostbusters just as good!,just as funny in only the way ghostbusters can be watch it with your kids!
Purchased this for my granddaughter's 6th. birthday and she loves watching both movies.  What a great gift for a great price.
saw this double feature on amazon and pretty much had to have it. classics that are a must have. so affordable as well.
One of our favorite movies! All the actors are great and the movie line is so funny! Great take for a rainy day!
these were great classic movies. a must see fun for the whole family. so all i can really say is Who Are You Gonna Call
We all can sing the song, and know the cartoon, but there is nothing like the real thing! I love both movies!Who you gonna call? GHOSTBUSTERS!!!
This is a great combo-pack for both the movies! We got it as a gift for our son who is a huge Ghostbusters fan!
It was a great movie with lots of laughs.  It will keep you laughing  and in these days you definitely need something to laugh at.
Dan Akroid and the other one really shined out in this movie. Annie Potts, love that voice of hers. Of course her acting is outstanding also.
You just got to have it - being a Collector - they are enjoyable for my opinion that is -
This movie brings back so many memories. All happy. Still hear the theme song played on the radio. just had to have the movie again.
I'm 28 so these movies mean alot to me.Great flicks for a great price.
I really enjoyed Ghostbusters it was surprisingly funny and fun. We really enjoyed watching it and highly recommend it to anyone.
My husband absolutely loves Ghost Busters. So when I saw that I could get both movies on the cheap. Can't explain how happy I was.
Came in good condition and happy with the stories.  I like to see ghost stories whether they are serious or add some humor.
Got this video to replace one my wife had gotten for our other child years ago and she said it works. Its doing a good job so far.
Oh what a tangled web we weave, this movie is really good, some people are just plain evil, and have no way to stop it!
I had been looking for this movie for a long time and finally found it.  It is an excellent remake of the original.
This was one of my favorite mini-series, Jane Seymour was fabulous in it, and I was thrilled when it came out in DVD with closed captions.
I have been waiting for a long time for this one to come to DVD. I enjoy it immensely.
this is FAR superior to the the original James Dean movie which only tells the second half of the bookdon't we all deserve this on DVD???
This is still one of the best movies to ever come out of Russia, and it still is great even today
I really enjoyed watching Carmen. A course I have been a Baryshnikov, fan for many years, since he defected in 1974.
tHIS IS THE MOST DEFINITIVE ROSENKAVALIER. I SAW IT YEARS AGO WHEN IT WAS FIRST MADE INTO A MOVE. HAPPY TO OWN IT NOW
uh, i believe this HAS the restored musical sound track, in spite of what one reviewer says.
This is a workout I always use.  I just hope there will be a DVD format for this program before my VHS wear out.
What can you say, Gilad is the best of them all!  I have all of his DVDs and love them all!
Gilad is old school and he basic moves still work, I do this workout when I want to focus on the basics and I get results!
My wife told me she loves the quality of the videos and she is going to buy the rest of the set of his videos.
This is an excellent old film with the one and only Rudoph Valentino. Good quality dvd as well.
The charisma the glowing passion the personification of stardom all shine from the screen
The quality of the DVD is horrible! I sent it back onceand the one I have now is bad but I can hear themusic and I love the artists.
Excellent visuals and music, this was well thought out and well produced, there were 100's of people involved in this production
Great Historical Pink Floyd,,,,The behind scenes was very enlightening... Roger Waters is still ahead of his time,, No one can compare to him
For any Pink Floyd fans this is a must great visual effects fantastic music lots of other rock stars join in the fun
Its historic, epic, and fantastic. Buy this and you'll love it, much better than grabbing it off PBS or continuing to watch it on your old vhs.
This is a great concert & worth having, wish I could've attended, lots a stars who did Waters' work justice.  I had to own it.
There could have been no better way to celebrate a great piece of History. The music and the stars were fantastic.
I liked Pink Floyd. I already had this dvd on VHS. 5.1 sounds alot better now than my old VHS.
My husband was waiting a long time for this DVD. One of his favorite bands of all times. I recommend this to anyone into head music and Pink Floyd.
Not as good as David Gilmore, but still very good in it's own right! Try it you will like if if you like Pink Floyd!!
I have always liked Pink Floyd. His is great. I am collecting some more of him in the near future.
Fast action movie.Plently of shoot em up in it.It was like almost the first movie that came out.So if you like the first one,you like this one.
Enjoyed the first one and not disappointed with the second.  Nick and Eddie make a great team.  Highly recommended and very entertaining.
We saw this a very long time ago with our daughter. Watched it again over 10years later. Really enjoyed it.
anyone likes bill cosby will certainly enjoy this movie. it is so funny and he is very good and funny in this one. you just gotta get it.
this just replace the video tape that went bad. it's for my son who loves corey haim and corey feldman!
The movie is funny and we needed a new one after our puppy chewed our other one.  It cme on time.
Now I can watch it on my kindle wherever I go.  The two Corey's are the best.  Too bad one of them died.
I got this movie for my mom for Christmas and when she watched it she enjoyed it. She said it reminded her of being with her friends again.
ONE OF THE THE BEST COMING OF AGE MOVIES  SOMTHING WE ALL CAN RELATE TO  THE TWO CORYS  DID IT AGAIN
A great 80's movie.A must see for fans of 80's movies.Anyone who is getting ready to get there license should see this.I really liked it.
License to Drive is a great comedy. I would highly recommend if you like comedy movies. This product is great!
this movie will from start to finish will have you laffing your ass off im not kiddin wait till grandpa shows up to pick up his caddie .
this movie is Hilarious .One of Heather Grahams first big screen pics! and you can't beat the two Coreys together
Although Haim is no longer with us, this movie stands out as a comedy but more than that - the movie is fun!
A+ this was also another great dark movie.....original version...Richard Widmark excels as a psycho killer.......Gotta love old film noir...yes yes
One of film noir classics. Great story and actors make this a movie you shouldn't miss. Don't pass it up!
My wife and I love this movie. Cheryl Ladd is Amazing as ever. Staci Keenan Does an excellent job acting.
I loved it as a tween...I could relate to her and her mom's situation, so this movie was an escape for me.
I remembered this movie from my teens years.  I liked it then, I like it now.  If you like 80's and 90's movies, it won't disappoint.
Personally I love these movies. It reminds me of when I was a kid. It's a different kind of comedy but it's still a good movie.
I love Ernest!  Every family in America needs to own the Jim Varney collection.
There are many Jim Varney &#34;Ernest&#34; movies out there but, for some odd reason this one in particular is my favorite!
Good stuff!I need a laugh from time to time... Ernest, is good at that.
Was there ever a better movie than ERNEST GOES TO JAIL?  No, no there wasn't.
something for everyone, a cute little doggie, comedy, adventure, love, hate, a hero and a villain. We lost one of the best.
This is a very funny movie.  It was very great to watch.  Jim Varney is a very funny person in his Ernest movies.
this was on my husband's wish list, so it was a gift for christmas we just finished watching it, very good movie
If you liked the first one you will love this one hes back mogyi  this one take you on twist and turns you have to see to belive
My wife loves the movie, too! They are strange animals, indeed! One little mistake in raising them, we're in for a big trouble.
I loved the Gremlins films when I was growing up. This was a great sequel. Great to watch now in HD.
GREMLINS 2 is a great movie too!!!! The first one and this one are classics recommended to all the family!!!! It's really FUN!!!!!
THIS WAS MY FAVORITE ONE FROM THE FIRST ONE BECAUES IT WAS MORE DARKER MORE CHAOTIC MORE FUNNIER MORE HIPPER... AND I LOVE GIZMO
The first movie was a drama. This one is a comedy. I love them both.The movie DOES have director commentary which is absolutely hilarious.
a childhood classic, they should make another movie of these guys, the gremlins could get in to a lot a trouble with today's technology
Gremlins you just gotta love the first little creatures that spawned all the other movies like critters, ghoulies and whatever is out there.
It's a Joe Dante movie ?  Do i have to say anything more ?  This man is fantastic !
Had the 1st movie never knew they had a 2nd great movie love it and my kids liked it a lot great family night movie great price love amazon
I love this sequel as much as the first film!  It is extremly entertaining and enjoyable.  I have both films now and watch em all the time!
I loved Gizmo in the first one and this second movie. I don't like all the ugly and gross gremlins though. I thought both dvds was equally good.
Funny & entertaining.  Got the 1st one for my daughter so I had to get her the sequel too so that she can have the whole set.
Love this movie!!  This is a must have movie for adults and kids.  Gift for my son's birthday, he just loves Gremlins!
This movie is a classic for me.  I loved it as a kid and had the joy of introducing it to my son.  He loves it, too.
this is a movie you have some fun and enjoy your self and watch when you want over and over
I really in joy this movie it was funny and cute with all the  gremlins I love gizmo  he was my fav
If you liked Gremlins the movie then you will really enjoy the sequel Gremlins 2. this video has more havoc than in the first movie.
Great movie. I love this old time movie with the little gremlins. thank you, I could watch this all the time now I oun it.
my 3 kids just love this movie. they can not sit and watch more than a few scenes without bursting into laughter. A blast from the past!
What a cute, kitschy movie!  My son and I laughed and laughed (he is 9). Don't take it seriously, but enjoy the time.
This is a really funny movie to watch with your kids.Get out the popcorn.  You and your kids will have many laughs!
GREMLINS II is as cool as the first Gremlin movie, which was real funny!!!Really interesting film about these little monsters...
Great sequel to the first movie. Loved the first movie and i love the second one as well. I love how it plays out.
I absolutely loved this movie growing up. This was a great buy and it was fun to share this movie with my nieces.
We enjoyed the first Germlins movie. This one isjust as enjoyable. Never know what they are going to do.Would recommend it.
Why more sequels were never made I will never understand! If you ask me I think Gremlins Vs. Critters would be a great film!
this item is very nice fits well and is smooth and I would recommend it to any one fast shipping great item
If you lived through the 60s, 70s, 80s - keep Kleenex handy.  This one hits the heart.  I'm still aching...
This is a very sensitive and touching movie I loved it. I frist watched it some 18 years ago I think, I was very touched by it.
This is the first Sci Fi Flick I saw on the Big Screen when I a young boy. I loved it then and I still love it,
What a great collection of the best of one of the greatest bands ever the Moody Blues.  The collection takes you back to a great place and time!
Very effective use of episodic form of a movie to show how life can be portrayed in different views of one.
this movie has a lot of life in it.  it's my favourite godard but i haven't seen 'em all so it's my favourite godard of the godard that i've seen.
This is a good bluray conversion. I remember seeing this movie as a kid absolutely love it they don't make me like they used to
Don't sweat it, this is what you think it is. Order with confidence, its a great transfer of a classic.
my favorite Dolph movie.brian benben is great as a nerdy fbi kiss ass.i actually bought a car because it was used in this movie.
good action and story. if like dolph lundgren. you will this movie. i have most of his movies and enjoy watching them often.
Simply amazing.  Well worth it.  My DVD and Blu Ray movie collection is now complete as far as items from the past.  Triple A+
This was awesome when I was younger I turned it off I was so bored with it this time.Still cool
A stupid movie that brings back fun memories. This is Dolph at his best. A drug dealing alien and a hot-headed cop what more could you ask.
Bought this for my son. He wanted this movie after seeing it a long time ago and he is very pleased with this movie.
This was finally released last month on Region 1 DVD under the film's original title, Dark Angel. (Previously available only from UK or Australia).
Classic movie.  Have always liked Dolph Lundren and this move is just great with the sarcastic remarks and special effects
this is a great movie very suspenful  a must for any dolph lundgren collector and very good movie keeps you watching
i watched this movie as a kid.  the classic comic character turned to a movie.  the action you remember.  2 thumbs up.
Loved this movie back in it's release day. Couldn't be happier to finally own this on bluray. A great addition to my collection.
A terrific cast and a wonderful score. They should make more movies like this one. Truly entertaining and a fun filled time.
I love this movie.  Warren Beatty is an amazing actor.  If you like suspence,twists and a spice of romance don't hesitate on buying this movie.
very underrated and very underappreciated film.best comic strip gangster flick I've seen in ages! =DAl Pacino and Warren Beatty are great!
The color costumes in HD are fabulous.  The story is comic book silly but the visuals are spot on.
It was something I real enjoy , I have had this movie for about two years nowthere was a lot of good action
Andrew Dice Clay is the greatest talent in the history of comedy. How this movie did not win best picture is a mystery to me.
Highly recommended for all fans of the 90's music scene. This movie brought back memories and was non stop laughter. The Dice Man at his best!
This movie is still great after all these years. It is so loaded with embedded one-liners you have to watch it several times just to catch them all.
This movie was very funny.  I think anyone would like it.
Its an oldie but still good to watch. I like the Die Hard movie series. Bruce Willis is a good actor.
Action from start to finish.  I wouldn't want to be a cop if my days were like those of the main actor.  Story line very good.
I love the die hard movies.  Order came on time and in good condition.
The Die Hard 2 - Die Harder  DVD is one of my favorites.  If you are a Die Hard fan this is a must have.
this is a good dvd played like new  it had lost of action shooting .i give this movie a five
I love all of the Die Hard Movies.This one is no different. It is just as action packed as the first.
If you have seen this movie, do you really have to look at these ratings, you should know it's a great movie.
Classic movie that keeps the guys happy.  They love it and I intend to buy this whole series.  Bruce Willis rules.
I enjoyed all of the movies. this one is not bad. this is for any fan of die hard .
LOVE this movie. Bruce Willis does such a great job. It is full of action. It is not for young kids, there is the language issue.
great movie to own. i love this actor. the scripts in this movie are great. you need to own all the die hards and i think they should make more
It streamed perfectly and without any problems.  I had no issues. It was a great movie. I can wait to watch Die Hard 3!
Great follow-up to Die Hard.  Bruce Willis is great in the role.  Definitely worth a look.
Got to say it kind of seem like it was going to repeat its predecessor but it had a nice twist and turns to the show that made it enjoyable to watch.
Bruce Willis makes this film worth watching. It's for guys who like to grunt while watching a movie.
Another piece in what turns out to be a great adventure through a four part action viewing experience!
This movie broke my television. It was moving so fast I lost my TV. So quick and slick. Roaring good.
I loved it, it was so sad at the beginning and the end quick shipment I loved it and shows how Michael was treated through the years AAAAAAA+++++++
Buy this if you are A Michael Jackson Lover.if you Love Michael Jackson like I love him Buy it
What can you say. Great performances from Walkien and Fishburne. One of the best film noir releases in the last 30 years.
good acting great story this movie will keep your interest the casting is excellent action the whole way through the movie
One of the best Christopher Walken films. Gritty and violent !!! All-star cast with Fishburne and Caruso !!  If you like Walken, watch this movie !!!
WHAT CAN YOU SAY - IT HAS A GOOD CAST, AND A GOOD PLOT WHICH TRANSLATES INTO A FANTASTIC MOVIE. BUY IT !!!
great movie glad we didn't have to pay for it again more or less.  keep more movies like this on prime
This is an old classic. I love this movie and it should have the same nostalgia as 'New Jack City' or 'Scarface.'  Love it so I had to own it.
I really liked the movie very much. iam very glad that I purchased it from you!!!!! thank you very much, rennea burgess.
this movie was great its fst moving and action and Christoffer Waken is fantastic , the video was smooth  and not problems with it
This is one of the older movies about the drug trade.  Very informative and plenty of action.  Great cast of characters.
One of my faves from long ago.  Christopher Walken has always been a favorite of mine, such a great actor.
What an excellent movie. Cool to see all the actors when they were so young.
This is one of the BEST concerts going for TODD fans.  Back up singers in spandex dresses, hands moving to the beat and classic TODD at his best!
Killer movie-must have,look @ the cast &amp; imagine them @ their best.Need I say more?
Although crude in several places... this movie was powerful. Acting is superb... Keeps your attention until the very end...
If you like Sean Penn, this is a great movie.  It will keep you on the edge of your chair. For me, anything Penn is in is the best.
One of my favorite movies from my childhood.  Watching it gave me the same feeling as I got when I was a kid.  Lovely story.
This original version is way better than the remake especially since it does not have the creepy bath scene.
This movie provides women insight how men think and see the world around them. It is one of the great movies concerning male female relations
Best reenactment of JONESTOWN from such an early film.  I think it was one of the best movies about this movement.
The movie is not for me I was helping my sister buy the movie and it arrived on time she was very happy  thanks
Good movie the first time I've seen it, still awesome to this day!!!!!!!!!!!!!! A true story that needed to be told!
I FEEL THAT POWERS BOOTHE PORTRAYED JIM JONES EXCELLENTLY IN THIS MOVIE,AND I RECOMMEND IT VERY HIGHLY FOR VIEWING.
a good movie saw it as a young adult and it reminded me of the old times and the old nuts out there praying on people
the movie was just as good as the first time i saw it  powers booth does a great job portraying a crazy man
Amazing true story of Jim Jones and the events that led to the suicide of hundreds of people who followed him and his ways and false bible teachings.
Excellent MOVIE. GREAT GREAT GREAT GREAT GREAT. Very informative and interesting. It was a very pleasant surprise. Glad I bought it.
My mom has been wanting this movie forever.  She just got it today and plans on watching it tonighjt.  Thank you for the fast delivery.
Super service. I watched this show when I was much younger. Brought back many fond memories. Look foward to more such transactions in the future.
it is great to be able to see a great  classic like this on dvd.it is truely wonderful to see these great movies come to dvd restored.
Very good. Funny. I would recommend this.  Typical John Wayne. Not his western style but his army style.
Any John Wayne movie works for me and the boys, but this one was a hit with my wife and daughters also.  Should be in any Duke movie collection.
I love It!  It didn't get an Oscar so don't get me wrong.  But it is light and fun to see John Wayne in a different roll from his tough cowboy films.
My wife's favourite actor and and this film does not change her mind. A good family movie  will be enjoyed by all
A little different setting for the Duke but he pulls it off bereft well. You can never go.wrong with a John Wayne movie. Enjoy!
Did John Wayne ever make a truly bad movie, I personally don't think so!This is a great movie!Alan ......
I have never seen this movie before and I enjoyed it. Not the usual for him, but I really enjoyed it.
I love this softer side of John Wayne, but I was disappointed  that it was not the colorized version I was expecting.
Great post war whodunit with film noir qualities and great direction from Jaques Tourneur.  Robert Ryan was truly an underrated actor.
REST IN PIECE SIR TONY, DIRECTOR OF DAYS OF THUNDER. HOLLYWOOD HAS LOST A TRULY GIFTED FILMMAKER. SO PROUD TO BE A FAN AND TO OWN ALL HIS FILMS
Tom Cruise has one of his younger but better performances in Days of Thunder. It keeps you on the edge of your seat rooting for him to succeed.
I watched this movie every chance I could when I was a little kid. It's basically Top Gun, but they're driving stock cars instead of flying planes.
I'm sure everybody already has this movie in their collection, but I had to get the Blu-ray one!!!! must have it in Blu-ray, it is worth it.
This is the best racing movie I've ever seen. I watched this movie with my grandson and now he wants to watch it every day
I bought this movie cuz i am a huge NASCAR fan and i have never seen this movie! cant wait to watch it!
this is a must see movie if your a raceing fan you will love it i watch it over and over and see something new each time
Its a nice DVD to have if you like Tom Cruise movies.  Its an older movie but still not bad.
Good ole nascar, funny movie good actors. Item arrived on time and was brand new in sealed box, can't ask for better than that.
This is one of my husbands favorite movies, so I got it for him and he is very happy. (Happy husband, happy life....)
I also own the dvd which on my WS LCD is unwatchable, the extreme letterboxes leave only a thin sliver of picture, due yourself a favor get the BD.
This movie is one of the best racing movies that has come along in years. I give the movie 4 stars.
Great movie with great actors.  This movie is truly a classic. Perfect Sunday afternoon flick for the family to watch.
This was a really enjoyable movie and the blu-ray version just adds better sound and definition to an older title.
I enjoyed this movie, I love Martin Sheen. Corny love story, but I thought it was interesting, didn't really like the ending.
Have loved this movie since I was a kid first time I saw it.Sad ending but the rest of the movie makes up for it.
DVD now!  or even HD DVD.  this is a great film staring one of the world's finest off-beat actors, Jeff Goldblum.  what's the hold up?D
This is it. Moody and dark and reeking of pure evil. Goldblum had a good time with this role.
Please put this great classic racing movie starring James Caan on DVD so that humble people such as myself can afford it. Thanks!!!!!!!!11
this is another great old racing movie.  the goal is they got to race to Monte Carlo.  intense racing from start to finish.
The movie made because of Those Magnificent Men and There Flying Machines. I love both movies and I own them both. Love it.
The 60s brought great movies, suitable for all ages. And they didn't come out every other day, either. Tony Curtis - hero, good guy, and ladies man.
If you like funny movies somewhat in the category of Jules Verne you will enjoy watching this one - I did enjoy Tony Curtis
Glad they finially released this to DVD, great entertainment for the whole familyeven my 13 and 14 year old grandsons liked it.
BOUGHT THE VHS COPY RECENTLY IT DOES NOT SEEM TO BE AVAILABLE ON DVD. ITS AN EXCELLENT FAMILY FILM WITH BERGMAN AND SALLY PRAGER
My dad was looking for this movie, The Great Escape II: The Untold Story. I found this on this website and it is a good movie.
I am happy to say this arrived in a timely manor and runs well all the way through. I hav not had any problems
If you love Frankie and Dean then you will enjoy this film! Charles Bronson is terrific and its just a lot of Western Fun!
The movie arrived on time and in very good condition. I haven't watched it yet but will soon.  I'm sure it will play fine
Good movie, good price for an old video. Looks like I have eight more six more four more two mo....words. I'm done!
I enjoyed this western comedy.  Guys will probably like this movie more than ladies.  This is a must for collectors of western comedies.
An oldie classic, come on Deano, Franko, Ursulaooo, Bronsonooo, 3 stooges, nuff said......you need more don't bother, you're too young or dead.
Frank Sinatra was much more than a crooner with attitude... He had a sense of style that endeared him to a large audience...
A great movie, entertaining Western with a little comedy.  So much fun to watch. Good acting, well done movie.  Surprise happy ending.
This is one of my favorite movies. Definitely top 20.This is not an action flick by any means but it is a great love story.
after the first episode you'll be hooked on this series, Sam Neill is excellent and this IS based on a real spy, WOW
The series is well done. Great dialogue, great acting. It's a winner in my book. Sam neill is wonderful in this series, I felt he was reilly.
one of the best.... a must for anyone wanting to get the feeling of what it was like over there (I did) - music helped set the mood - it took me back
if you like comedy with a dark twist this movie is for ,very funny and also disturbing one of cages best roles
This is how I like Nicolas Cage...quirky, crazy and unpredictable!  Following the rapid decline of an already unstable mind was hilarious!!
I have purchased this movie 3 times now over many years. Great vampire flick. Even my children love this movie,
We enjoyed this movie, but of course we're horror movie fanatics who love so many different kinds of horror movies. This movie worked for us.
The bar room scene alone is worth the price of admission. Great acting, directing, and fun, fun, fun.  How about an overlooked gem like this?
the best vampire movie ever. a perfect display of how modern day vampire's would live. without being spoiled by hollywoods and ann rice's mythos.
I had never seen this film before now. Bill Paxton is hilarious and Lance Henriksen is great too! Also no hissing vampires!!
LOVED THE MOVIE BECAUSE OF THE MEANING OF THE MOVIE. WOULD RECOMMEND THIS MOVIE TO ANYONE. WOULD LIKE THIS MOVIE IN DVD`
I have been waiting for this movie to come out on DVBD for what seems to be for ever. I am glad I own it now
This is a great movie, the boy who stands for what he believes in is fabulous!!! William Petersen shines in a very subdued role!!!
A Great and very Enjoyable Movie
We like this kind of movie.  Just wish they made more like this instead of the racy ones they are doing now.  The teen agers even enjoyed this one.
This was a very good movie, had me sitting on the edge of my couch, the acting was very good too, I would recommed this to all who like history.
This is a very good historical drama and that it is true story, based on events in that time of political unrest.
One of my favorites. Just what I Needed. Arrived right on time. A must have. A great buy at a great price. 2 Thumbs up.
Jon cryer is great in this movie. Runing from the mob and finding true love in his home town. It's a must watch film.
It's a great 80's movie that people forgot all about! The young Jon Cryer is great! And whatever happened to Keith Coogan?
This is a movie from the 80's that was a coming of age with Jon Cryer and Keith Coogan. It is a funny movie
the product is in great condition for an older movie. it is also a great price and they mailed it straight to your door. how convenient.
This was a movie that is fun and Jon Cryer is excellent in the main role.
The product was better than stated and arrived very quickly. Would absolutely recommend this seller to others and would use them again.
I highly recommend this movie.  It is a reminder that Jon Cryer was a very good actor even after Pretty in Pink.
John Cryer, awesome, shows a young Cryer and his acting skills back towards the beginning of his career, long before 2 and a half
I bought this tape for my sister because she absolutely loved the movie.  I have never seen it, but I plan on borrowing it to look at.
It came faster than I expected, and they are great.  I can't say much more about this one except I love it.
A most excellent investment of a truly great performance.  I had it on VHS and it wore out and was scratchy.
I loved the plot and how he organized it. Of course, since he's my hero, he couldn't miss. He has a wicked sense of humor and his timing is great.
I put my order in on Friday , my package arrived before the due date.It came Monday, I'm very pleased.
We were replacing some of our VHS tapes and we ordered this one.  It was still a good movie and outcome.
The sex scene in this movie was great. I think one of the best in my opinion. Pierce is great too.
I love this film and watch it every few years. it's a great black comedy with Michael Caine brilliant in it.
Great suspense.  Michael Caine is excellent.  The bad guys are very convincing in this picture.
The fine actor Michael Caine is at his best and shows how to get to the top of the heap by using a little &#34;magic.&#34; GREAT MOVIE!
We own this movie on VHS.  And have played it near to death.  This DVD is a crisp, clear copy of the movie and plays without problem.
I loved this movie when it came out and I watched it on TV nearly every time it came on. This movie is better than many shows on the SyFy channel.
This movie should be watched by everyone.It will give a person plenty to think about.Highly recommend it to everyone!
i love the unusual
A totally good movie to watch. You have to put yourself back into the days of the cold war which I grew up in. I really liked it.
A gripping story of a B-52 bomber crew dealing with the start of ww3 and there personal feelings of loyalty and reason.
This movie had a great cast. HBO was just getting it's stride in movie making. This was very good and still very real.
This is definitely one that seems to have not made the radar when it came out.  Most people will find the story intriguing - highly recommended.
Wow this movie is so awesome, just the best ever when it comes to Nucular War movies, never seen one as good as this one, a must to have.
I really enjoy watching Benny Hill.  I first saw Benny Hill on PBS but was dissapointed when they took it off of the air.
It's a lot like the other video disks that have been put out already but always fun to watch. So watch it.
One of the best documentaries on early Hollywood ever, but I'm waiting until it's out on DVD before I purchase it. Reader, go thou and do likewise.
Buster Keaton, what can you say about this actor except he is fantastic in this silent movie. A great family show with lots of laugh's.
I got this for my young grandkids. They didn't like the movies but I loved them and have watched them a few times.
This film is timeless.  Probably funnier without a voicetrack and shows the skill of Keaton for entertaining an audience.
One of the best in the zombie genre ever filmed! Fun AND Horror! BRAINS!!! Blue Ray was a good view. I'm DEAD???
Cult classic,never goes out of style! I grew up watching this movie and now my kids really enjoy it. Everyone should own this movie!!
Love this movie, it's so funny rather than scary which makes it great to watch whenever I need a pick me up.
This is a classic every Zombie fan should have a copy of this in his or her collection classic movie
An excellent movie mixed with dumb humor and gore,  a humor, drama, and horror all wrapped into one. Highly recommended.
I love this movie,punks,zombies,and brains what more could you want.
Since I love Zombie movies, I have to give this a thumbs up.  A little hokey from time to time, but I am not sorry I bought it.
Awesome movie for any fan of horror/comedy.  Just don't fool your self into thinking that 2, 3, 4 or 5 are ANY better than the 1st and original.
I like GOOD zombie flicks.  This one is a classic.  I love it.  Well done, good story, acting, etc.  Can be very funny at times.  Recommended.
There is no doubt that this is the very best and sexiest Horror movie ever made.See it! Enjoy
1 of the most entertaining movies ever made ! Succeeds at both comedy & horror, A REAL gem !
the video was great and  I loved It so much.It brought back many memories and made my day!Thank you very much.
Husband enjoys this move so much.  Arrived in excellent condition. Would recomment this movie if anyone is interested in a good comedy.
I don't care what anyone says this is the best movie in the howling series...its campy gory and just plain fun!
this is one of my all time favorite movies and finding it here was like xmas all over again love this movie it's hilarious
I use to watch these when I was little. I was so excited when I found them on here.  I still remember Mr Toads wild ride at Disney World
These are some of my favorite recorded animated characters!  I love the artistic work, the characters, etc.  Any child could watch these at any age.
claymation fans and parents alike will marvel at the crispness of the image quality and the heart-felt stories!
Night of the Creeps is one of my absolute favorite 80's horror movies. If you like comedic horror, you should definitely give this one a try.
I Love That Movie It Was Good Comedy Me And My Wife Like Those Movie. I Never Get Tired OF That Movie.
One of my favorite movies all time.  Dekker is a genius.  The Monster Squad and this movie are just incredible.
This is a hilarious and well made sci-fi horror film about space slugs. It is also a tribute to 1950s monster movies. Definitely check it out.
One of the best zombie movies I have seen.  Funny, scary and fun to watch. Highly recommended.  Blu-Ray worth buying.
Night of the Creeps, is as much fun now then it was back in the day.
this was a real classic james stewart, the making of the f.b.i. or g-men buy this one.
I recieved this movie in great condition, this is one of James Stewarts greatest movies, and he has made quite a few great great classics
This is an excellent classic movie. James Stewart and Vera Miles are tremendous. The film is very well written and produced.
Give me a good immy stewart movie anytime. I love his performace's in all his movies westerns / action/ true or fiction
Wonderful classic with Jimmy Stewart.
An interesting film envolving John Wayne and James Arness. A must buy for fans of the american legend.
This is not his typical western BUT still a very good story and it is John Wayne. As I said you cannot beat John Wayne!!!
Wayne was always great in westerns but this is one of his best not westerns. It is a very good movie for its time.
He hunted Japs in WWII, now he hunts Commies, and a good job he does. Great 50's propaganda film. Get it.
This is by far one of my favorite movies of all time, its packed with tons of action and horror, a recipe for any fright fan!
What can you say about Bruce Campbell! He's from Grand Rapids Michigan! We are gathering a collection of his works!
He was just as good as I remember when I was a Teenager growing up ! Brought back a lot of good memories . Thank,You!
This a great thriller suspense,about greed and revenge,this is not b movie,great acting, I wish this movie was on dvd?
This is a great movie to watch; love the suspense.  I will enjoy watch it again though it did help me decide to be cremated when I die.
I've been looking for this movie on DVD, for some time. So glad you had it on Amazon.com. Great movie! Thanks!
I wished that I could have purchased this on DVD.  IT is an awesome story.  Very well told.  Great purchase.
ok so glad I have this DVD in my Collection, As I could not imagine my collection without it! Thank you.
I know, I know...it's a major chick flick but ya gotta see it. Some of the best Sue S. since the Rocky Horror Picture show.
This is one of those movies that you can watch over and over again. A feel good movie that is one of the best around. I love it.
I'm a James Spader fan, and this movie I saw quite awhile ago.  I like I then, and decided to buy it for my collection.
Always a classic.
Smashing love story.  Seranden and Spader will steal your heart.arrived on time and wrapped very good.  no damage.
Definitely does what the title says - gives you the heebie jeebies to watch :)  John Goodman is a riot (as always) and Jeff Daniels has a great part.
This is a good classic 80;s movie. John Goodman is funny in this movie. But it's hard to believe that bugs may take over the earth some day.
Thanks for reminding me why I still don't like the country & spiders!!!! My crew was going bananas, and I loved it!!!!
spiders creep me out, But I am a sucker for horror so  make myself watch it. Very unique and hilarious
If you are afraid of spiders, this is not the movie for you.  John Goodman is fabulous as the bug exterminator.
I seen this movie on television and it's a movie I can watch over and over.  I love when Amazon has these great movies at low prices.
Love this show, has drama with a hint of comedy and some gore in it.  Great cast that makes the show worth watching
had it on vhs. needed to up date it to dvd. took me long enough time glad i finally did.
Terrific movie. One that I will watch over and over and enjoy it immensely.Good movie to watch on a eerie Halloween night.
Liked it since I was a kid. Was a little cheesy and bad drawing since I have gotten older but it's still a good story and lotta fun to watch
I love this, I watch this with my children and they loved it to.  I grew up watching this and it still holds it's own.
This movie classic is one of the best.  We loved it when my daughter was a child, and now our grandchildren love it too!
This is a classic DuckTales adventure! I love this movie and so does my family. I would recommend it for sure!
this has been one of my favorite tv shows since i was a kid, and this movie is awesome! i love ducktales!
I love it still watching still watchable no problems whatsoever thank you very much for the experience.Great movie I'm a huge Disney fan
I loved this video as a kid and to find it on DVD is GREAT!!!
I highly recommend the movie  hopefully it will be released on to dvd soon
silly and fun. I saw this a long time ago and I knew that it would be fun to see again
Love Peter Falk in this underrated movie. I laughed ot loud. Great cast too. This movie can really lightne your mood -- I recommend it highly
Really enjoyed this movie and now it is in color....I remember the black and white version and enjoyed that one too.
really played houdini to the hilt if you love magic you will love the movie but you will cry at the endind very well played
I choose this rating because I love old movies and this one was just great---it will stay in my old movie collection
I loved this movie when it came out and I still love it It did bring back many fond memories
A musical version of the original. Very well done and funny! Some great stars and the sets are visual of the original cartoons!
This is one of the best classic war movies ever made!!! I was very happy to find this movie here on Amazon now on DVD format!!! A Must see!!!
Hey..it's Bob Marley, nothing can be wrong...a great artist who left us too soon...highly recommend...right on... you'll be dancin..Peace & Love...
I mean again its Bob he has something real to say in all of his songs you know.If you dont like real dont get Bob.
Was received the item very quickly and in good condition. My son is a huge Bob Marley fan, this was a must have for his collection.
As usual, it has all the excitement as if you were there.You just can't get enough of BOB. He's the Greatest
Aguirre, the Wrath of God is a movie that takes history and makes a movie with moral implications. Good entertainment.
One of the greatest films ive ever seen.  Hypnotic, dreamlike but brutaly real. what an experience
i love everything about Lucille Ball. this movie fits the bill. it was nostalgic, funny and a made to feel good movie. it will not disappoint.
Great old movie.  Lucy at her best.
excellent movie, Lucille Ball does it again with her busy body ways and her shenanigans, but the story has a happy ending. Worth the watch
the movie was good like it. I was able to finish my collection of the franchise. the plot was good.
Great Movie; I saw it back in 1964 when it first came out. I however like the movie Gadiator (which covers the same period) better.
If you liked El Cid or the Gladiator, then this is a must. I think that it's a better story telling then the Russel Crowe remake.
I had no idea this edition existed!  It exceeded my expectations.  I was so glad to get this!  One of the centerpieces to my collection.
A true classic movie on WWII, based on true evvents. Some liberties  and artisic liscense are taken...to be expect. But very well done
Love this movie. Thanks for your great service and pricing.
My husband is a big fan of this movie. It was  great anniversary and Fathers day present.Thank you. It's the best.
Just we needed to see what these bomber crews were going through during ww2. This was a really well made movie.
One of my all time favs/I can still put it on and watch it and cry and laugh and be a proud American
We love to watch this movie to remind us of the brave young men who fought for our country in World War II.
Its an all around great flick and would make a great movie to have in anyones colection,,,awesome true story of great men and machine
Love this movie! Such a good story and great cast! Highly recommend this movie! A Must see! Would buy this movie again.
This is one of the best movies that I have. I watch it all the time. They should all be this realistic.
shows how the people of the now nearly gone greatest generation were.....when men were men.  I need 4 more words to finish this rating
I liked this movie when it came out.  I bought a VHS copy for my mother in law that she wore out watching.
This is one of my favorite Gangster movies of ALL times!.Sean Connery plays a great role as a &#34;rough&#34; beat cop. Great stuff
Very enjoyable. The story line and the actors are awesome.  Highly recommend adding this dvd to any ones movie collection.
Awesome and based off the book by the now Lt. General (ret) who was the pilot.  Incredible heroism by one of the feworiginal planes to make it
I love this movie, for some reason. SO i bought it. Sorry for yelling at you guys like that. Anyway if you havent seen it, buy it.
I recommend this  to every one who loves the old movies.One of my long time favorites.Arrived quickly and great packaging.
Outstanding Korean War movie with a great performance by Allan Ladd.  A true classic war movie showing American patriotism at its finest.
true story and very good
I am very happy to be able to aquire a quality repro of an old movie that features historic aircraft. I also commend the prompt service and delivery
One of the best boys own style adventure movies ever done.  Riddle of the sands also starring michael york is also good.
Excellent drama, camera work and dialogue.  The casting was exceptional, too.  I would recommend this movie to any adventurous movie watcher.
Hadn't seen this movie in years. It met and exceeded my expectation. Amazon does and pretty damn good job on getting this stuff to me in Kuwait.
Love James Belushi and he was great in this movie!  Very funny and had it's romantic moments too. Great movie
My daughter wanted to get this to give as a gift. When it came she was happy to be able to give this as agift and it works great.
This old movie are childhood favorites of mine.  It is a joy to view it in the comfort of your own home.
I love movies that really have a meaning.  Plus this was filmed in NC  - this was a fantastic movie
This movie his funny, packed with great actors story line and it even tickles the funny bone allot. It's great for a weekend movie night....
James Belushi is a great actor and the cast also makes the movie. Just a good movie with a good feeling all around. Glad to have it.
Love this movie! If you're a Bette Davis fan, you'll enjoy it. It's one of the best movies she starred in.
This is one of my favorite movies,  I already had itst in VHS but I wanted in DVDGreat, great movie
No one will ever top Bette Davis, and I mean No one. She is the greatest of all female actresses, very unique.
What a brillant movie. I loved it. Bette did a wonderful job playing the governess.Sheer magic. Watch or buy the movie you won't be dissatified.
Very heart-touching movie, from beginning to end.  If you're a Bette Davis fan, you must see this one and add it to your classic collection.
This is a truly great film. I highly recommend it. It's one of Bette Davis' best! I'd give it 10 stars if I could.
Wonderfully classic Betty Davis. Excellent movie. I am so pleased to have it in my collection of classic movies. A must have Betty Davis film.
I have to say that this movie spooks me , but I really enjoyed it all the way through and watch it again and again.
2010 is very good. I had the movie 2010, someone tookthe DVD,so I had to order another copy of 2010
like the book the movie excellentmust SF-fan
This Blueray disk is sharper and clearer than I remember the original movie theater CinemaScope version------and I saw that at least five times.
This movie is better than the firstI am not a star wars guy, and I can watch Star Trek for short periods of time.But this movie was very entertaining
A SiFi Classic, A pretty good follow up to the all time SiFi Classic (2001 A Space Odyssey) Both of these flicks are my all time Favorite
Great Second movie a continuation of the first, loved it, DVD was is great shape.
love this movie one of my favs...along with the others i ordered, would recommend it. this movie is a classic...
This sequel was way better than 2001: A Space Odyssey...I don't know why it didnt get much attention....
Classic follow up to 2001 space odyssey. Why should we rate classics, they are in a class by themselves. Doh!!!
Great movie. Such a cast.  Such acting.  Make sure to get 2001 along with it.  Like Ying/Yang, need one for the other.
Not quite as antiseptic as the original but a very good sequel non the less. Mr Kubrick and Arthur C. Clark... What a Team!
Much better than Cubrick's 2001. Me was surprised by great effects. Collectors add-in.
The movie makes me really informed about the coming years. I feel like I am in the military when I watch it.
This picks up where the previous movie left off. Well scripted and written along with good characters.A fine movie to pair with the original.
Martial Arts along with villan you Love to Hate. Not very realistic but a good movie just the same.
This a great classic ninja movie that I was glad to get my hands on. Hadn't seen it in years.
A great movie with fast snappy dialogue. If you like mobster movie's you will certainky like "Miller's Crossing".
this one, and Barton Fink are my favorite cohen brother movies. this movie from 1990 is fantastic gangster drama...with style to byrne.
This is a good movie.  We will enjoy watching this movie again from time to time.  All went well on this purchase.
Excellent movie!  This movie is very entertaining and has a full cast of stars who give their best in this movie.
Perfect for guy's night, action, science fiction, a true 90s classic.  Predator has been my favorite sci fi character for years.
This was one of my faves growing up. I still love it and watch it when i think about the days of old.
sequel of a Best movie like Predator, this time the City Hunter arrive to a city and Danny Glover must be defeat him...
love all my classics. danny glover did outstanding in this movie. thank you for a great product and I recommend to anyone
Great sifi about the Predator, it shows a little more about the predator and how we, humans are just hunting sport, awesome
I love Danny Glover and he and his character help make this movie great. I love good creature features and this one is up and the top of my list.
If you loved the first one, you have to see this one.  Great cast with Danny Glover, Gary Busey, and Bill Paxton, you won't be disappointed!
I liked that it came the exact time it was suppose and most of all I enjoyed watching this movie a lot.
Have the first Predator Movie & enjoy it so when this one came out, I saw it & it's a very good movie to have in a collection!
rates a 5 star for  alien loving movie goers. Well done and worth the rent. Would not recommend this for the little ones just adults.
This is the second in the Predator films and I think it is the best one.  Danny Glover was perfect in the part.
Gary Busey? Bill Paxton?count me IN!!P2 is nearly a perfect movie. I couldn't recommend a single movie more than this one.Now bring on P3!
just another great thriller from Seagal you can watch it over and over he is great with his marshall art's and he bring's the story and a great cast
This is a movie that I wanted because I love martial arts movies since I am a student of it.
I owned this movie before on DVD. But I'm not satisfied on the DVD, So I bought the bluray. Hope all other Steven Seagal films be released on bluray.
Steven Seagal leaves a great impact on me in all his movies.  He is just awesome and boy can he move.  Buy this DVD
cd in great condition enjoyed watching it, fast moving a splendid Seagal movie as always very entertaining great way to pass the time
This is my husbands all time favorite movie. And the movie arrived on the time just as they said it would.
This was an excellent movie! Screwface and his jamaican posse! Great movie! Who knew that this magic to Screwface was he had a twin!
Purchased for my husband who is a martial arts enthusiast and likes almost anything Steven Seagal. This is his favorite movie.
one of the ultimate Steven Seagal movies.  Not much shooting, more his fighting and attitude.  Cool fights, cars, and a few hot ladies.
Oddly funny as all Woody Allen movies are.
If you like Woody Allen that is.
One of Allen's best
i loved this movie. i don't like woody allen. just never got into his movies but i watched this and i loved it. interesting take on life.
Good stuff !  Sometimes it's good to watch the events of the lives of other people to see how they handle things.
Simply Allen's best film - totally complete and perfect.
Alan played himself once again in this movie, but it was still refreshing and interesting.  And, of course Diane Keaton was outstanding.
This is one of my favorite Woody movie.  As usual, the dialogue is excellent and the actors are terrific.
If you are a fan of Woody Allen, do not miss this one. I am sure that it will go down as one of his all time greatest.
Woody Allen movies don't get any better than this. Enough said?
Great price! Excellent service. Wonderful family movie with two GREAT actors, Mickey Rooney and Judy Garland.  I recommend this DVD to everyone.
Hilarious good, clean fun! Mickey Rooney at his best (comic genius)...pairs up with a very young and lovely Judy Garland, who radiates in this film.
Mickey Rooney At His Best. I Have Yet To Find ANYTHING Of His That Wasn't GREAT. I Highly Recommend This Dvd.
Greta Garbo at her best.  I only wish the movie were in color.  But the storyline was most true to the book.  Not a typical hollywood version.
I had never seen this movie previously.  I'd heard of it for years and am really glad I added it to my library.  I totally enjoyed it.
I have all of Van Wilder Movies they are awesome !I recommend all of them for your collection or rental viewing
you want to enjoy evining with you wife friends or whoever you enjoy with take this moviehot,you go remember old times.
taj is funny I love this movie I owned it before but got watched so much it got damaged now I got this one and I am careful with it
this movie is one of those campy comedies, it's not raunchy, but there are some scenes with a little nudity-but it was very enjoyable.
I saw only a portion of this movie some time ago, and am very happy that I can mow view the whole movie at my liesure
The older I get the better I like these old movies.  I thoroughly enjoyed this one and I would recommend it.
i like all of the thin man movies and i got this one on my kindle...its a good classic mystery which i do enjoy to watch any time and frequently ...
long time looking to complete my collection of getting all the thin man movies watched the six of them all good movies.
Great mystery movie with some humorous overtones. Dashell Hamell good job. I have the whole series. A good movie to rent.
This was very good.  When it comes to these two actors, it is always great (personally speaking)
A rare thing--A sequel that in many respects surpasses a very fine original. There is some good stuff here--but the two stars make this thing go.
My grands love this movie! It is the same movies my children watched when they were their age.  I have it on VHS but decided I need the dvd.
This is a classic. I love this movie. I've been watching it since I was a child and it's absolutely timeless.
It is full of laughs and very heartwarming.too.  The animation is great too.  Good movie for the kids or family viewing.
Timeless and wonderful movie for all of us dog lovers.  Thank you for a great movie to share with my grandchildren!
I was very excited to own this classic family movie on DVD we are a family that loves dogs and this was a great movie!!
This a a good movie that keeps the kid's attention for the duration and has a wonderful message at the end.
Such a good movie!! My children enjoyed it, now i've just purchased it for my grandkids!! Timeless classic!! Looking forward to enjoying it again!!
So amazed how many remember and love this movie,  my whole family and their respective loved ones included.Even our dogs love to watch.
I got this movie to add to my grandson's video collection. My kids had it on vhs and liked it.
Great Movie. If you have never seen this movie, it is a great kid movie. There is also a second one that is good too.
such a cool movie i hope you will share n  care the experience . good songs to sing and dance to.
I use this movie to keep my grand kids still, not running around the house, great as a babysitter, I like too
My daughter loved this movie and I wanted my grand-daughter to have the same experience. She already loves dogs so this will be a hit.
I remember this from my youngest daugter ( 24 ) ans my grandkids will love it too. That is when the 11 month old gets a &#34;little&#34; older.
This was one of my sons favorite movie.  I have it on VHS and wanted to make sure I preserved it for my grandchildren so I purchased it on DVD.
This movie is a nice classic. But is not really one that I would watch much.
The DVD plays well and the movie is wonderful.It's a very compelling story. Garbo is superb.It is one of her best movies.
INCREDIBLY SNEAKILY ACTED & IDEAS & COMEDY ALL WONDERFUL & CLEVER VERY WILD & ODD GREAT LOVED IT ALOT SO THERE..
I saw this movie when it came out and loved it then.  It is one of those fantasy stories you can watch over and over again. Very entertaining.
this movie iss heartwarming funny andd somtimess makes no sense, but it is a great Tony Randll movie, showing the range of his body of work.
Tony Randall does a great job in this classic movie. He is funny witty, and added some great straight comedy to this.
I love this movie. Tony Randall shows off his acting ability, as he play numerous parts. This movie is fun and there are little life lessons here.
I picked this up as a gift for a friend. the move was in good condition and packed well. I have not seen this move so i cant comment on how it is.
Quirky and charming. It really showed Tony Randall's prowess as a character actor. The ensemble cast were great also. Thought provoking also.
I watched this movie as a kids with my father and loved it.  So glad I found it to watch again and again
This film is truly a classic! One of Tony Randall's very best performances! I enjoyed it now as much as I did as a child!
I've only seen a snippit of this movie B-4.  I hope I enjoy it.  I'm looking forward to watching it.
This is a great old movie.  It brings back some great memories of the old days when movies were really funny.
I had seen the movie a long time ago. I was very glad that I could buy the dvd.Susan P. Keefe  It's still a good movie (dvd).
You've just got to see this movie. Music, entertainment and incredible dancing at its best, even though it became a hit in 1940!!
Fast service on quality dvd, a color musical featuring Fred Astaire dancing with Vera Ellen. Enjoyable musical film !
Vera Ellen is no Ginger, but none the less, a very suitable dancing partner for Fred. A very enjoyable movie with some of the best music of that era.
This is a great story and a really wonderful film version.  Bette Davis is for me (as always) wonderful to watch.
The best of the tear jerkers. Bette Davies plays tragedy to the hilt. Be sure you have a box of tissues at hand.
This one of Bette Davis finest works. From start to finish the movie catchest your attention. It is movie magic with a sad ending. Buy it or Rent it.
To me and my wife. We think Dark Victory was the best Bette david movie ever. She possessed raw emotions. This product was great.
Bette Davis lives it to the hilt in this movie, and plays it for all its worth.  Geraldine Fitzgerals is also excellent as her best friend.
Loved it!! Excellent movie with lots of great actors. Loved Betty Davis Performance!!  Millie
She is one of the all time greatest actresses ever. I love this movie. If you are a romantic, you must see this.
If you don't like silent movies, this one might very well change your mind. It was the most successful film of its time and deservedly so.
This a classic film. Great performances by all stars.A must see for every film buff.  In fact, a must own.
This is a great short story. It's a shame it's in Black & White.I enjoyed it immensely.
If you like silent movies... this is a rare one to have. I like taking classics to compare them with the modern versions.
Remarkable film. Can't say much more than that.Cinematography excellent. I am always amazed by the skill of early filmmakers; the clarity.Beautiful.
Any movie that Jeanette MacDonald is in is great!! Love to hear her sing! A beautiful and talented lady! Highly recommend!!
Delightful story. No fiction, but realism in its most poignant. Melodious songs and clean entertainment for all the family. Highly recommended.
Great cast of stars, who's who of British actors. Great color and great flying action.You cannot go wrong with this one
Classic movie with big name actors, easy to love. Great special effects for the time too. I would definitely recommend.
Nicley done blu ray.  Movie was well done and watched it with teen sons.  They enjoyed it too.  Well worth the price.
Great movie, Great cast, whatmore can be said that hasn't been said already? This edition is even better with the extras on disc 2.
Great World War Two movie done in the 60's style.  Aerial scenes are fabulous and music score is great.  If you love WWII movies see this
My husband wanted this Movie.  He's probably watched it 10 times since he got it.  Thank you for making this available.
Credit given to Dowding and Air Marshall Keith Park who deserved it. Worth watching. Ian McShane and Edward Fox add humor.
This is a well done movie with lots of favorite actors and a close connection to the reality of the time.  Great music.
A great movie about what England had to deal with during that fateful war with Germany.I highly recommend this movie.
This is a classic move with one of Michael Caine's best films. This is a great cast and an action based theme.
One of the all time classics for history, aviation and World War Two enthusiasts. Highly recommend this movie which was priced very reasonably.
This is a great movie to relax to after a busy day. Lovely voices and lovely music, as with all of Mr. Eddy's films.
This is one of those fun, timeless movies that everyone can enjoy.  I wish they had it in DVD format but, until they do, I was lucky to find the VHS.
Excellent political film with a fine cast in top form.
A moving story of national politics!  Very, very good cast and all do a splendid job!  You will enjoy this film!
You don't realize how good these movies were until you actually take some time to sit down and watch an old classic.  I thoroughly enjoyed this movie
It is a moving story of the coming age of a spoiled little rich kid.  The sea scenes are super.
Captains CourageousI  love old movies and this is the best of my collections. Watching it brought such great memories.Thanks,Dana
All the actors were at their prime and taught valuable lessons. We would recommend this to family and friends to watch it.
A favorite of mine that I will never get tired of. A great message for fathers to learn. A great movie for children too.
Amazing movie from the past.  Tells a timeless story about a boy influenced by a man who is like a father figure.
This film is well done and Spencer Tracy shows what a superb actor he was.
I believe this is spencer tracy's finest contribution to his history of filmology. anothe classic that never gets OLD. 2 thumbs up.
I had this movie many years ago in VHS and re-ordered it in DVD format.  It is one of my families all-time favorites!!
I gave this movie to my Father for a gift. He said it was great. He loved it. I would recommend this movie to you.
An excellent film, which earned Spencer Tracy an Academy Award. The 4:3 B&W picture is very good.
A great story and film for the entire family. A story of courage, honesty and integrity and that everyone should watch.
Great BW movie.Great Cast, good adventure movie.I saw this one when I was a kid, and I never forgot it.I am happy I have it in my collection.
This is a great movie to watch as a family. Great movie even though it's an old movie to watch. One of the classics.
I had heard that this was a great movie years ago, but when it had beenformated to dvd i decided to purchased it it was a great movie to own.
Truly a great movie. Very touching and very human.Wish this movie would come out on DVD.
Another treasure I was happy to uncover. An intriguing and very scary story that fits well into today's technological and philosophical concerns.
This movie was the best and surly we should all become aware of machines taking over as they will one day.  It was very sexy.
Was looking for the movie for a long time. Very happy to have it to my collection.
The Demon Seed is quiet scary movie.  It doesn't pop out at you like other scary movie.  So, I would say it was quite enjoyable
My dad is absolutely obsessed with this movie, I got it for him after he was talking about how good a movie it is. Needless to say, he's obsessed lol
thought I had seen all his movies but this one escaped me.  He was never disappointing. And was a great actor  greatly missed
One of the greats of all time. Such a smooth cool style.  He died way too young.  I loved all his movies.
Truly a great performance of gambling, romance, seduction. Great job by Ann Margaret.  Edward G Robinson and Steve Mcqueenas masterful as ever!!!!
If you want to know who Steve was just watch this movie. It's is one of his finest roles. Check it out
top blu-ray add this one to my Steve Mc Queen collection has sum  special features on this Blu-ray top pic q
Great action movie.  Showed more cleavage than I remembered for a '65 production.  Steve is the coolest, but Ann-Margaret brings the heat.
This is one of my favorite movies.  It is filmed in my favorite place, Big Sur & Monterey/Carmel area and is very well acted.
IAM SURE ITS A VERY GOOD MOVIE, IT LOOKS AS IF IT MAYBE????? IAM LOOKING FORWARD TO WATCHING IT !!
A touch of comedy in a scary movie! Very good film!
This movie was great in arrived on time and in clean, neat, condition played excellent will buy something else in the future.Thanks!
James Coburn has always been one of my favorite actors, and was just right for the part.It is a very entertaning Western...
I saw this movie back in the 80's and loved it. It's timeless. They could easily remake this movie. If they do, I only hope it's done respectfully.
I enjoy Clint and rod Steiger  westerns. I like watching the old one that you never get to see any more. this one was a good one.
What a lovely piece of casting, acting, and  character interplay even if the younger crowd doesnt understand it. Images and sound were both lovely.
This is another Sergio Leone classic and with Coburn and Steiger (both Oscar winners) and well worth the money and time.
I love this film.  While it may not be the most exhaustive Beatles bio it is the definitive Beatles bio.  Release it on DVD!!
This is a really good VHS about the Beatles. It's too bad it's not on DVD. I have to go to someone's home to watch it.
I got this movie for my mom and she love it so if she happy with it i am to. thank you
It looks likes its trying really hard to be a bad movie...but it just comes off as awesome...RECOMMEND ONLY TO REAL NINJA
This movie is hard to find on DVD at a reasonable price.  It has been nice to own it on VHS.
Good old fashion movie. Better quality on dvd. Enjoyed the movie as a kid  back in the martial arts craze years.
i always loved this and been looking for it on dvd and finally got i am very happy and continue shopping with you again
Great Movie!!! Enjoyed it. The download was extremely fast and easy. I look forward to all future transactions.Thank you.
A great film noir. Movie builds, and builds. I happen to really enjoy this film. The stars are all great actors. TOM
Since I began watching noir regularly a few years ago, this is one of the best films I've discovered.  A must see
I saw it years ago and thought it was good then and still do. Makes you realize how the years have passed, Nick Nolte was a lot younger then.
Forgot how wonderful a movie can be....no f,,,,ing words and still a lot of fun.  Best characters and a super duper nice story.
This is one of the best movies to reach the masses. It is a wonderful rendition of the Steinbeck classic.
I love this movie.  I had an old copy that I watched over and over.  It finally wore out and I ordered this DVD for a replacement.
I wanted to see this forever and finally did - it's great, held my interest throughout and I'd sure like to see it again.
Love this movie very cute, funny and a great story my father and I would watch is movie and laugh he loved it.
Loved this movie from day one. Thank you for having it on listing. I have seen it so many times.
This movie is one of my all time favorites!!  If you have never seen this movie, I reccommend you watch it.
A truly entertaining movie!
one of those goofy movies to watch with your girl on those stormy days, well worth watching dont forget the popcorn
you should get this movie. one of the greatest movies of the series.
Love this movie. My absolute favorite Christmas Movie. I just had to order it because 24 hours of this movie is not enough. (:
From the wool jackets with fur trim, to the tacky leg .... a fun time for all.  Remember, don't put your tongue on flag pole
Classic.Epic.Masterpiece.These are the only words needed to describe "A Christmas Story, the greatest Christmas movie of the last 10 million years
One of the movies that define the holiday season. The amazing point is that it reached this pinnacle in the modern era.
family time is best spent watching stuff like this can only help kids see life just a little bit different from how things use to be
I watched this movie as a child and had to watch it again for christmas. Still one of the best ones out there!!
What is Christmas without &#34;A Christmas Story.&#34;  I grew up watching this movie every year.  I was so happy to share it with my son.
This was a Christmas gift that I bought for our family to enjoy year after year. And so far we have!
It's a Christmas classic and I love to watch it every year. It is so funny and even though I know what's going to happen, it still makes me laugh.
This is a great classic movie, it will always be a classic very funny and very entertaining I would recommend
This is an all time classic favorite, my parents loved it, I love it, and my kids will love it! All I need is a lamp made from a sexy woman legs.
Love this story watch it every year sometimes not at Christmas time, makes a very nice gift for friends and family and easy to order for Amazon.
This is a Christmas classic and a must for any holiday collection. The nostalgia is an awesome feeling. I am glad I purchased it.
This is one of our favorite Christmas movies. We had it in VHS and when we converted to DVD we purchased this. A great movie and purchase.
A Superb movie which is timeless with excellent performances by the cast. A must see during the HOLIDAY SEASON for the entire family.
Along with Bill Murray's SCROOGED - this film MUST be owned and viewed every holiday season! :-) Enjoy and share with all those you love.
A holiday must have very funny for the whole family keeps you laughing. Always loved this movie glad I can share with my children
Our all time favorite Christmas movie, so glad we have added it to our Christmas movie collection.
GREAT HOLDIAY CLASSIC&#62;&#62; LOVE WATCHING IT EVERY YEAR AND LAUGHING WITH MY HUSBAND AS WE WATCH IT&#62; IT NEVER GETS OLD
Great movie! Classic!  No more needs to be said :)! A true classic especially for the holidays.  &#34;FRA-GIL-EY&#34;! That's all I need to say!
Love this movie! I got this for my boyfriend for Christmas, because this is his ultimate favorite Christmas movie ever since he was a kid.
This movie is a classic and is so funny. A great holiday movie for the whole family. A must see movie!
This Christmas movie is a classic. I ordered this movie to watch with family for the Christmas holiday. We enjoyed it so much.
This is a very good movie, and a oldie. You can enjoy the movie because it is from back in time!!!
This Movie Was Just The Trailers it was not The Movie is Awesome and Love it i would give this movies rating  a 10 .
Loved the film.  This story was set where I live and it is fun to try to recognize the places mentioned.  Great movie for kids and adults alike.
I think this is one of the best family holiday films. My children and I all love to watch this movie around Christmas.
A Christmas Story is a classic, rating it five stars does not even do it justice. A must see year after year.
he loves it. good deal for the price. I don't know what else to write about this.  It's okay is all I have to say.
This is a Holiday Classic.  From the stuck tongue to the BB gun &#34;You're gonna shoot your eye out&#34;!  A great tale of growing up too.
i ordered this as a gift because it is a great christmas classic and can be watched over and over
This is by far the best Christmas movie to watch. No matter how many times my family watches this we never get tired of seeing it again.
I'm thrilled that they are giving this DVD version a much needed facelift. Widescreen version, interviews, ect. This is one of my favorite movies.
Reminds me of my youth. I could watch this story 100 times and still enjoy it. It makes me happy.
I love this movie.  It's a Christmas time favorite.  Would recommend again and again.  Great movie for young and old alike.
Wanted my grand children to see this movie.  I saw it when I was a little girl, great movie, did not remember a lot of what happened.
A great Christmas classic that never gets old. New generations of people will see this for all times and I certainly have.
This NEVER ages into a ho-hum movie.  It will still be entertaining 'newcomers' seventy-five years from now.Donald Frederick Curie
This movie is great it reminds me when I was young, Ralphie&#8217;s age, and I wanted a Red Ryder BB gun.
I saw it years ago when it first came out and enjoyed it again on Blu-ray,I will watch it every Christmas.
Gave this DVD to my two sister in laws cause they love the show.  They absolutely love the DVD.  Great Christmas movie and gift.
We love this crazy Christmas movie.  It was so much easier to view and enjoy in the blu ray version.
I'm not a big fan of holiday shows, but this a favorite of mine regardless of the genra. A must watch during the Christmas season.
Peter Billingsley is wonderful in this snow day classic.  Great any time of the year! HI-Larious!Amazon seller great, fast shipping!
I had waited years to watch this movie and I am so glad that I ordered it. It is a timeless classic and makes you feel good after watching it.
I bought it as a Christmas gift for some of my grandchildren. They loved it.  (:  This movie will never get old,generations can enjoy it together.
I don't think I've missed watching this since it came out years ago, and to think that almost shelved this one, thank goodness they didn't
A great story about a kid who wants something very specific... I remember being like that.  Enjoy this Christmas classic.
This is such a classic. My mom watches this movie every year, like 100 times. SO I got it as a gag gift.
WORTH WATCHING EVERY SINGLE CHRISTMAS!  A GREAT COMMENTARY ON THE XMAS SEASON.  DARREN MC GAVIN IS UNFORGETTABLE.  A MUST FOR THE HOLIDAYS.
Fun movie and one that brings back all the memories. A family tradition to watch this film every year. Wonderful!
what can you say traditional classic. I is becoming traditional for us to view this movie every Christmas. Love the fact that I can now stream it.
Since I was a boy about the time this movie takes place, I can really relate to this kid.  It is a fun Christmas movie!
Decorating Christmas cookies with out watching this movie just cannot happen!  So funny and I love it!!!
Everyone needs this movie.  It's so good and always puts me in the Christmas spirit.  It never gets out-dated, a perfect film.
This movie is good for all generations, kids to adults. It doesn't even appear that dated since it's such a well-done movie. Love it every year.
Just a great movie. I look forward to watching this over and over again.This is a must for any &#34;Christmas collection&#34; !!!
What an All-Time great Classic!  Lots of fun and good Holiday Humor!  A very original score!  Don't shoot your Eye out!  Hahaha
this movie is awesome. i watch it every year and it's always a hysterical movie. my whole family likes it.
Every year, we watch this classic!  And every time, we pick up something new while laughing so hard we can hardly breathe...  Love this movie :)
You can't go wrong with owning this story. It's one of the best christmas stories ever. So I bought it.
One of the best Christmas movies ever.  I saw this when it originally came out at the theaters, and watch it at least once a year.
Best Christmas story ever as far as we are concerned, haft to see it every year, It' even better than 'Bad Santa'.
We enjoy watching this movie ever Christmas' it has become a tradition foreverone to sit around the TV and enjoy the movie as a family
A Christmas Story is one of my favorite Christmas Movie I watch it every December never gets old so funny classic
BEST CHRISTMAS MOVIE OF ALL TIME! The DVD case was flimsy and felt cheap, I wasn't too crazy about that but as long as the DVD, it worked just fine.
very good and that is no joke, mom really likes the movie, it is her favorite and she will watch each xmas
This movie has been a favorite of mine for years, and to now finally see it in the clarity of blu-ray puts the star on top of the Christmas tree.
Fun to share with a whole new generation. We enjoy this movie year 'round it has turned into a family classic.
A classic. Great for all kids and everyone who used to be a kid and remembers what it was like.
we watch it every year and never tire of it. It takes us back to the simpler life we knew
Christmas just isn't Christmas without this as part of your Christmas Eve Film Festival. This is truly a holiday classic and favorite.
I bought this movie for my son as a Christmas gift.  He loves this movie and so do I.  It's a classic.
It is a beautifully done ole fashioned Christmas movie..Very enjoyable and took me back to yesterday.The locations and acting were supberb.
It made me remember those days and I laughed a lot. I would reccomend this movie for the family it is very funny.
If you enjoy Christmas then you must have this in your Christmas move collection. This is a timeless family movie that is just a must have.
I have to at lease watch this movie every December..late at night with a mug of Hot chocolate to get me the holiday spirit.
One of the best classics out there!!!  I highly recommend this one if you want a movie to watch around the holiday season!
We love this movie it takes me back to when I was a kid.  Good quality recording and was packaged perfectly.
I love watching this movie as it is good for several hardy laughs. Several scenes remind me of my own childhood.  Especially decoder rings!
I love this little movie...so cute and so much fun to watch. A totally different time in America...Love all the actors!
This is such a great addition to any Christmas movie collection. It's such a classic and I love this movie!
There are some movies that you just can't get enough of, this is one of them.A Christmas Classic.  Must be part of your Christmas collection.
This is a heartwarming and funny depictionj of Jean Shepard's boyhood in Indiana in the 1940s. He wants a BB gun.
Arrived quickly.  Fair price.  Bought this for our daughter's family to replace one they had actually worn out!  Thank you!
This movie never gets old. It reminds us all of America's Golden Age. It is funny, sweet, and reminds us all of our crazy families.
A wonderful companion to the new Broadway musical.Too bad it can't be seen by everyone.Hopefully, it will tour
Its a timeless Christmas movie that should be played every holiday at everyone's house.  Buy it, its worth it.
Loved this movie as a kid nowMy kids do as well. Got here onTime well package. Must buy for kidsof all ages.
I finally wanted to own this movie so we have it to watch every Christmas! It was also shipped out very fast!
This is hands down the best children's movie I've seen. I laughed my hind parts off. Great family movie!
A Christmas Story is a great holiday film. I always love this moive. One of the few movies that i would watch back to back.
This movie is my favorite christmas movie...cause it has everything...comedy, wit, tears and a lot of holiday magic...
Classic movie now on bluray.  Can't get any better, put the leg-lamp in the window and break out the bb gun!
This is the most favorite Christmas movie of all times because you usually end up watching it over and over and over! Great movie!
A classic for boomers that lusted after BB guns when they were youngsters.  The acting was superb and story line works for any era.
What can you say.  It is a clean movie that you don't have to worry about with the children watching with you.
What a classic. How can you not like this movie. Takes you back to that time. I watch it every year.
Christmas just wouldn't be the same without a marathon of A Christmas Story. I love this movie and I'm glad to have it in my 'library'.
This movie is a classic so I decided to buy it.  We used it in our Christmas gift exchange and everyone loved it.  No problems at all.
Loved it when i was a kid and my kids are now watching it.A modern American Classic, must see around the holidays.
No matter how many time I've seen this movie it still makes me laugh.  It's a classic>
I watch this every christmas. It is hilarious. More of an adult christmas movie, kids will not get some of the humor. Especially between the parents.
I love this movie and bought the CD so I could watch it on my schedule. The CD is well done, no problems
I was worried about the blue ray quality but it turns out excellent. The movie does not need any review from me. It is a classic and I love it.
Best Christmas story on film, well written, well acted. Makes you feel good. And it is very realistic - for me, anyway
What's not to love.  This is movie that can be watched and enjoyed for years.  Nice remaster, and we enjoy watching it every year.
This classic is wonderful,and now complete on dvd.It is a family tradition at our house. Own it for your own!
Try to watch this every Christmas season. Great family entertainment. It might be somewhat advanced for children under the age of 6.
This has to be one of the best christmas movie I've ever seen. PERIOD.
Watched this with our kids and now watching it with the grandchildren.  Lots of fun to enjoy as a family tradition!!
I gave it as a present so I don`t know how it looked. Basing my review on a love for the movie as a whole.
My kids ask to watch it year round (age 4 and 6)  I remember this movie when I was a child and I still love it!
We watched the movie again this year, probably for the 15th time and laughed out loud as usual; so I guess it's worth it.
The season wouldn't be the same without this funny adaptation of childhood. I watch it every year and every year I find it funny.
This indy flick from the 80's quickly made it as one of the Christmas classics. I double dog dare you to buy it!
The movie was funny and Christmasey.  A holiday treat that we will add to our list of must see Christmas movies.
Product was as described and It arrived in time for Christmas! My father loved this movie so I bought for him to enjoy anytime he wanted to watch it!
A vivid portrayal of the thoughts & dreams of a young boy at Christmas growing up in the backdrop of classic Americana.  I could SO relate...
This movie is a must have for your Christmas collection. Talk about classic. Brew up a cup of hot cocoa and enjoy the show!
We own this on Blu-Ray! Great holiday classic! My parents haven't seen it before. I bought the VHS for them to enjoy this holiday season!
i love this move. the boys imagination is just wonderful. also the lamp is so ugly I am glad the wife broke it.
Well pleased with speed of sending and receiving this item.  Was in condition described.  Am very pleased.
Pop in the Tape.  Pres play, and let Ralphy and Company remind you whats its like to be a kid again.
Humor much like Better Off Dead, we like that kind of humor. Great family funny movie. Enjoyed watching it this year.
Nice to sit in the comfort of home and enjoy this movie during the Holidays.  Crisp color and sound from Blu Ray makes it even more lifelike.
What else is there to say about this movie? Its an instant classic. We watch this movie all day every christmas!!
Can't say enough about this delightful Christmas story.  It brings back my childhood I spent growing up and spending Christmas in the 1950s.
This movie is a Classic. It reminnds me of the good ol days whe. my brothers and I wished for The Redyder BB gun. I love this movie.
A timeless classic that can be enjoyed each and every christmas. I'm glad to see that this film has finally made it to Blu-ray.
I have this movie on DVD and love it,so i bought it on blu-ray which only makes it more of an all time classic!
This movie is right up there with  such classics as 'It's a Wonderful life'.  It is very relatable and can be safely enjpyed by the entire family.
this is one of my husbands favorite movies at Christmas time ... so glad I was able to order it and have it arrive so quickly !!thank you !!!
My daughter-in-law had never seen this so it was a perfect Christmas gift that arrived in the nick of time! Thank you!
I have purchased this movie several times over the years and for some reason it keeps disappearing.  I will try my best to hang on to this one
This is a great movie...a classic. We watch it every year, between Thanksgiving and Christmas. A must-have for our DVD collection.
I for got About this movie.. seen it  when it first came out. and loved it. Love the music on it. cant say enough about it
Perfect story with a great soundtrack, one of the best movies of the 80's.  It really needs a bluray/cd release.....!
To "the powers that be"--please release ELECTRIC DREAMS on DVD!  It is an absolutely WONDERFUL film!!!
I absolutely fell in love with this movie years ago but have been unable to find this on DVD until now. Great movie.
I chose the 5 stars because I like Charles Bronson.  He is fearless and fights for the under dog.  I really like his movies.
this is my favorite of all the DEath Wish movies,CB really takes care of the bad guys.you got to have rhis movie.
I love Charles Bronson & I got this as a Christmas gift to my male boss. He just loves these Death Wish movies.
I loved this &#34;Death Wish&#34; series and bought three of them in all, for a friend who is a real die-hard fan of Charles Bronson.
totaly a great and inspireing movie i loved it was one of the best movies i have ever seen ..
great additon to myh JLC collection. this was a different vein from what i am used to seeing her in.  excellent quality and delivery.
Jamie did a Good Job of acting in this one. It's a Good Movie to add to your Collection and watch all action in this movie.
Just love Jamie Lee Curtis in this movie. She shows how stong she can really be and get the bad guy.
Great action packed film. An excellent retelling of the famous 1929 massacre. A must have for action film or history films.
This movie is fantastic!  The era of the "Chicago Gangsters" of the 1920's is well documented! I highly recommend this movie!
EXELLENT VIDEO TRANSFER, LOOKS LIKE IT WAS FILMED YESTERDAY. GREAT ENSEMBLE MOVIE, LOTS OF FAMILIAR FACES. GOOD COLLECTOR ITEM.
This was a really great movies for it's time. I would definitely recommend this to lovers of old time movies.
a great movie to watch and enjoy yourself and have some fun watching and maybe learn about the past etc.
This is an older movie that I was glad to find. Not a dull moment on this one. Jason Robards is fantastic as Al Capone.
This truly shows what happened on that day. Great cast and they all work well and its a piece of history.
Great classic gangster movie,if your a classic gangster movie fan this one is for your collection.Plus lawerence Tierney plays a great Dillinger.
This film tugs at your heart strings, and allows you to easily engage with the characters. Loved it, and do so every time I watch it.
Patric Swayze and Demi Moore at their best.Demi Glows in this one. I don't think she did a better movie.
I love this movie and needed an updated version of this. Seems to be working great. No complaints here yet.
Who doesn't love this movie? I have it in VHS & now in DVD. We watch it over & over. Thanks, Amazon, for all the great movies you have.
I love GHOST Much,'tis One of my Favorite romantic movies,I have it on LASERDISC [FS] And I have the DVD [WS] too :)
Love the movie.  Love anything Patrick Swayze played in.  Demi Moore was excellent in this movie.  I cried all the way thru.
Love this movie - have watched it several times. Miss Patrick Swayzee - he did a great job with Demi Moore in this film.
I had to replace my DVD, since the first one walked away. I was very pleased with the speed in which I received this one, and the price was fair.
Humorous and touching love story. Whoopi Goldberg is great most of the time; just wish she didn't get TOO silly as in the scene at the bank.
A very heart catching movie one of the late PS' best and it is a movie that I believe many will come to regard as one of his greatest.
Great gift and in great condition
Patrick and Whoopi make a great pair!  Love the movie.  Must have this in your collection.  Have this also in old tape version.
one of the best girlie tear jerkers ever made and fun for guy's too cos whoopie is a hootGhost (Special Collector's Edition)
I highly recommend this movie to those of us who like romantic comedies. This is a modern classic that I'm sure will never truly die out.
ONE OF MY FAVORITE MOVIES. SERVICE WAS GREAT.THANKS.A MOVIE THAT EVERYONE SHOULD SEE. I LOVE THIS ONE AND PATRICK SWAYZE WAS THE BOMB.
This is a great fun to watch movie that will make you laugh and cry I can watch it over and over without getting bored.
Love this movie, Whoopi my favor actress, love the way the show heaven and hell, glad I did get this movie for my collections and 100% please.
This movie features something for everyone. Mystery, thriller, comedy and love story all wrapped into one. A must see for everyone.
i have always loved this movie, i waited long enough for the right dvd version , GREAT price !! its a awesome choice !!
Now I remember why I always loved Demi Moore! This is a great movie; my wife & I both had tears in our eyes.
It is a great ghost suspense movie. I love Demi and Patrick in this one. The shipping was here on time and in the quality they said.
I LOVE this movie, especially the scene where Patrick Swayze goes to meet Oda Mae, and watches her at work, and ridicules her.  REALLY funny.
A great love story with a little humor added in with Whoopie Goldberg's performance.  This will become a classic yet.
I HAVE ALWAYS LOVED THIS MOVIE, I LOVE THAT I NOW HAVE IT ON MY TABLET AND CAN WATCH IT WHENEVER I WANT TO.
What a joy to re-live this amazing classic whenever I want to.  What a love story.
This is the epitome of a love story. Patrick Swayze at his best. Demi Moore while she was at her most gorgeous. What a couple they made!
Great story and great musical score. Have seen it many times and enjoy it time. A real classic for all time.
This is a wonderful movie. It is a love story/comedy/thriller all rolled into one.  And you can't miss with a Patrick Swayze film no matter what.
This a great movie. I believe that the people who had died are around us watching over us and sometimes make positive things happen.
This is an old movie.... but a classic.  Enjoyed watching it again after so many years.  Good good good good.
Great movie I purchased it to add it to my collection. Got it at a great price too.
this has always been a good movie to watch.  there are some movies we watch all the time and this is one of them.
Loved  it i can watch this movie all the time its one  of the  best all time i liked it better in  blu ray
Great classic.  I don't really have anything else to add except that I like seeing Carl on Scandal now as the POTUS.
The list of actors an actress's is long and the setting is very good.  It is just a overall good love story, and right vs wrong. G.Goff
It's got a very unique premise, and Whoopi Goldberg is often pretty funny in this movie. It's a classic.
What a great movie. I have seen it on VHS but had to have it on DVD.
This DVD was received in a timely manner.  I am very happy with it.
the movie is a great one, with Patrick Swayze as the 'hero' of the story.  With Patrick Swayze as the hero, what else could one want in a movie?
This film should be a requirement for United States citizenship examination. This is one of the best romantic films in Hollywood legends.
got this for my mom for christmas.  it's one of her favorite movies and the price was so good i couldn't pass it up.
Part thriller and part love story put together in a great story that tugs at the heart strings. Get the popcorn ready :)
The movie is believable.  This isn't a movie you watch; it's a movie you live.  The action and suspense never stop.
Great movie.  It makes you feel the whole range of emotions.  You literally feel as if you are a combatant in the movie fighting for right.
If you are a demi moore fan then you'll love this movie ghost this is a classic.
Ghost is another upgrade to a well loved movie from VHS to DVD in our movie library!!!  LOVE the quality!!!
I love this movie and have watched it numerous times.  A great love story, great cast and a good ending.  Fantastic!
this is the all time love story - have your Kleenex handy at the end, you will need it !
I loved this movie when I first went to see it in the theater and I like it even more now that I have my own copy to watch it when ever I want
This is one of my favorite movies.  I highly recommend it to anyone that is looking for humor, suspense, and a great love story.
I love this movie; it's so funny and touching; plus it played like it was new. Thanks again and hope to do more business with you in the future.
This was the most touching Love story since Love Story with Ryan OnealIt brought tears to my eyes and all the actors were very good
Ghost is one of those movies that you have to have in your film library. Whoopie Goldberg is so funny in this movie.
very good love story, NOT a chick flickjust a good old fashioned love story with a twistkinda makes ya think about things....
Great old movie, originally out on VHS, lucky to find it on DVD. Shipment arrived within a very short time. Very satisfied. Thanks.
what can i say about this movie but it is just the best there is nothing but good i have enjoyed it a few times and will continue to in the furure
I was sooo impressed with the Veronica Cartwright's acting.
James Garner pales against the pairing of these two great stars!  Great story - and thought-provoking!
Hepburn again proves she could act any character, from Holly Golightly to Eliza Doolittle to Karen.  She was a beauty, and all class.
I think this film is very moving and well done. The subject content isn't over-the-top though it deals with sensitive matters.
This is a great movie from back in the day with several stars in some of their earlier performances.  A movie before its time.
My husband loves all these old Scrooge classics - we have many.  I'll review more after I've watched all of them.
I enjoy playing this dvd of  a Christmas it was nice to come home after working to sit down and watch this dvd I just watch it on my boss computer
I chose this rating because I am very happy with my purchase.  So far I have not had any bad purchases in either my music or my movies.
An earlier version so don't expect all the bells and whistles when it comes to special effects but still a good telling of the story!
My husband requested this older copy of a classic tale. He loves it.We watch it at the holidays as a family.
I enjoy this movies when I was a kid and still today, I really liked this movie. I purchased it used and it played like new.
A Christmas must have!  I love the old versions of &#34;The Christmas Carol&#34;.  This is my favorite.Perfect for all the family.  Enjoy!
This version from 1951 is probably the best known and well loved story from Charles Dickens. Wonderful and well worth 5 stars.
I and my family have enjoyed this video for the holidays. This was a very good buy and the bonus features were even more appreciated.
I love the Scrooge and Christmas Carol films, esp the vintage ones. I was pleased to see these were available and pleased that I bought it.
The best version of the best Christmas movie.  No movie could get you into the Christmas spirit more than this movie.
One of the best movies ever made.  One of the reasons this movie is a holiday tradition is because it speaks to to the good in us all.
what is not to love you buy this cause you need it or love it, so I bought it, thanks
Great old classic with &#34;the&#34; best cast of all times!!  A family favorite for years!!This is definitely a must to watch every Christmas.
I have always loved this version of Scrooge even though it was made before I was born it is a classic!
you have to add this one to your collection if you are collecting christmas carols. It's a great story and a must have.
Always like the older versions of the wonderful story.  They are enjoyable and comforting and I can now watch it whenever I want----even in July.
Classic don't have Christmas without it.  Get the popcorn, make a fire & sit back & enjoy this american classic movie.
My favorite christmas carol. Watch it every christmas and  out of all them this is always my ultimate favorite. Brings true
Fast service, good condition when it got here no problems, will probably order there again played great made my Christmas perfect
I am very pleased with this purchase.  It arrived in time for the holidays.  This is my favorite version of A Christmas Carol.
As always I couldn't be happier.  I received my dvd in goood condition and in the time stated.  I will be back!!!!!!!!!!!
I Love this movie! I bought this movie for myself  instead of a gift for someone else. Glad I did!
This is the Christmas Carol I began watching when I was quite young over55 years ago - He is the crankiest and the best of Scrooges!
Excellent Movie . I like to watch it every year--The CD version has a good picture and sound, it is in black and white.
It's a classic - the original I believe and in my opinion the best !!  A must inventory item for the holidays.
I have retired this since I got it one DVD. I put a few miles on it before I retired it. I recommend it.
This is a christmas movie all should have and watch it every christmas time its a great family movie for that time
There are many different versions of this.  I like the 1938 and 1941 versions of this.  Solid classic acting.  Great Style acting.
This is one of my favorite versions.  It was a very reasonal price and arrived a couple of days earlier than expected.
love this movie so much it's a good story really it is and the actor are good too yeah yeah
I never watched a Christmas Carol that I did not like, the old ones are very fun.
This the best of all the Christmas Carol movies,the sound was perfect and picture was sharp and clear, I love it
Being a particular fan of this Dicken's tale, I have copies of all the most popular versions of this story.
this is a classic and I was looking for this one and I found it in a very good price thanks a lot
I very excited to have purchased this DVD. Now I can watch a Christmas classic anytime i want. This is another great DVD for the money.
Thank you so very musy . It's like new. It ran without a problem and in great shape, Top to Bottom. ART
I love this type of movie so what can I say but it was a very enjoyable time watching this movie.
all I can say is that I have looked for this movie and a few others for a long time. am very happy with it and have already watched it twice
These where very enjoyable films. If your a pirate buff then I highly recommend them for your collection.
Very funny movie.  I'm always looking for some good comedies and I really thought this was a great one to watch.
Very funny movie. Loved it, I have always loved Dick Van Dyke. and he gave a great preformance in this movie
This arrived in excellent condition and I am very very pleased.  Also arrived on time.Thank you.
Saw this a long time ago.  Have not viewed this DVD yet, but know I will enjoy it very much
My husband loves these older movies, as I do.  The service in getting these movies has always been good, and very prompt.
The stars in this movie are legend. Gable, Tracy, Colbert and Lamarr are at the top of their game and make this a classic.
Great old sci-fi movies.  House of Wax is, of course, and old classic that thrilled me in the 70's and still does today!
Very well done and I like the black and white.  It was Edgar Allan Poe-ish and I liked that.  Would recommend.
You can compare the two, Spencer Tracey was great, but I am a Frederic March fan.  I love his version.
If you rent these say from Netflix or if you buy them from here, make sure you watch the 1941 version first as you will be saving the best for last.
great movie saw it when I was 12 , its was great back then and its just as great now !
This movie wwas made befor sex and violence were mixed with four letter words.  This truly is a great performance by Fredric March.
Wanted Freaks but saw this with 3 other great movies. Bought it, watched all of it and consider it a great deal.
TCM does it again. Freaks is the main draw of the set and that alone is worth the price. So far you can not be disappoted with TCN.
It's a 5 Star movie  just outstanding to watch ,Spener Tracy is just so great in this movie buy it and enjoy it over and over again.
i was recommended these films by a friend and these films are definitely two great horror films and are a must for any classic horror fan
I love Golden Era Hollywood films and the fashions of the day, and of course, one of Hollywood's most amazing actresses.
Why are we not allowed to see the great ELEANOR pOWELL ON A RE-MASTERED dvd OF THIS OR ANY MOVIE SHES IN.?????
Very good movie for ALL the family most entertaining Charles Laughton was brilliant in this role! Margaret Obrien what a Gem!
A wonderful movie.  Back when comedy didn't mean running head first into a wall or swearing with every other word.
It is the same reason as above,The actress, the actors of that era.were the best.and also the stories.Thanks Ellen
A great film, and a great slice of the spirit of WWII!WHEN WILL WE SEE IT OUT ON DVD!
Glad it was newly released!  So fun and delightful to the eye!  I highly recommend buying this wonderful film that just melts the heart!
good as the day i first saw it  the people in it look so young /funny  but thank You all
I watched this not too long ago onTCM classic movie channel and thought it was great.  It has a great cast and I'm glad to have it in my library.
Or better yet, having a Greer Garson DVD set with this, Mrs. Parkington, Valley of Decision, Julia Misbehaves and The Miniver Story.
This is one of my all time favorites.  Everything great.  Hard to improve on perfection.  As usual, Grant was a great father figure.
IF YOU ARE A FAN OF THE OLDER WAR MOVIES, DON'T MISS THIS ONE. IT IS STILL A GOOD STORY,  EVEN IF TODAY, A LITTLE DATED.
A old favorite with great actors.  Brings back memories when I went saw it at the movies as a child.  Glad it was put on DVD.
One of the best submarine dramas ever produced. Ironically, this mega drama paves the way for the ultra funny &#34;Operation Petticoat&#34;.
No fairy tale story here. Based on actions of many Submarine crews, sure it was an era film, but stop and look what our Submariners are doing today.
This is a great movie, i have seen this movie several times and I wanted on dvd
good sub movie, a little propaganda for the home folk, but a good made movie, that is good acting... bye
Great WWII movie! And Cary Grant is wonderful, as always. This movie gives insights into the attitudes of the time.
If you are a classic war movie buff, this is a definite fill for your collection. Good drama and good acting.
This is a great movie for anyone who likes old war movies.  Good plot and if you like U571 then you will appreciate this classic.
This  is one of John Waynes best war movies. The setting is on a sub on it's way to Tokyo Bay. A lot of action.
Was a very good movie, I had seen it years ago but still like it.  Good  buy.  'Buy it you will love it.l
I haven't seen this movie in a long time, and I enjoy it as much now as I did in the past.
yep I love Cary Grant!!!!!!! Very good movie! Captivating and so enjoyable! I hope you get it! God bless yopu
A true great job. The tape is in great shape and it came so quicky. I will enjoy it for manny years ART.
This is a classic movie that I greatly enjoyed watching again with friends and others who hadn't seen the original.
THIS WAS A GREAT MOVIE AND IN GREAT CONDITION.  AS ALWAYS ARRIVED ON TIME.  REALLY APPRECIATE IT AND WILL CONTINUE TO ORDER FROM AMAZON.THANK YOU.
One of the best! Even though I loved the remake with Steve Martin, it's always a treat to see the original.
One of Hollywood's very best...Elizabeth is a young ingenue who is so endearing in her role in this finest of movies.
A great film, wonderful, good clean story, great acting and directing can't hardly miss with Spencer Tracy and Liz Talor
I love this movie, and you must also watch &#34;Father's Little Dividend&#34;  It is like the second half of this movie.
Who can resist Spencer Tracy, Elizabeth Taylor and Joan Bennet!  A fun movie with a timeless theme about weddings, nothing has changed!
The original version of this movie. Spencer Tracy and Elizabeth Taylor make a good pair for this one. Great for old movie fans!
Specer Tracey and Elizabeth Taylor are like art work in this film, such a beautiful picture together. Great movie, loved the comedy moments.
What can you say about Spencer Tracy.  The greatest actor ever.  Great movie and I would recommend it to everyone.
Been wanting to get this movie for my  collection it's funny and heartwarming and with Tracy and Rooney how could a person go wrong, love it !
Remember when actors could act? Remember when movies had a point?Films like this one have earned the label, &#34;classic&#34;.
This is one of those awesome movies you never get tired of watching. I recommend this movie. I know you'll love it.
I absolutely love this movie.  Saw it years ago and was excited to find it on amazon.  I have watched it many times.
Spencer Tracy was great, but this might be Mickey Rooney's greatest!  It will warm your heart over and over!
I have always loved this movie and was so happy to find it.I treasure it and have already enjoyed it many times.Pam Pitts
We have really enjoyed watching this classic several times with our children. It's interesting and it's clean with good moral lessons.
Another great Spencer Tracy and Mickey Rooney classic!  It is definitely a must for the home movie collection. I wish there were more.
Am glad to have it in my collection!  Thanks so much - will watch it sometime in the future when I retire.
this is why she got the oscar...Liz at her best and most beautiful. She was a ral actress and will be missed.
one of the best movies I enjoyed from Liz. Good story.Seller was easy and disc was as promised. very happy with purchase
I bought this as a gift for my husband but I liked it too! Yul Brenner is always thrilling to watch on the screen.
Saw this when I was a young girl and loved it way back then. That's when Yul Brynner became one of my favorite actors.
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1930/31. Had to add it to my collection.
incredible movie.What an ending.That is more than likely a part of the legacy of my mother's side of the family.Bravo
I like the 1921 version of this movie Starring Rudolph Valentino and Nazimova. Very good. Plus the Garbo is good ofcourse
This is one of the best classic movies ever made. I love the romance between Greta and Robert. It's just so beatiful. Pure joy.
Simply stated this was Iriving Thalberg's last film when he was MGM Chief before his untimely death and it is MGM's greatest ever film.
A good story line with some excellent acting although I found the smoking everywhere and anywhere a bit off-putting compared with todays attitudes.
Loved the music, dancing, so many stars!  Highly recommend for those who love classic film musicals featuring so much talent.
ANOTHER CLASSIC MUSICAL. GREAT MUSIC BROUGHT BACK WONDERFUL MEMORIES. THEY DON'T MAKE THEM LIKE THIS ANY MORE. SUCH A SHAME.
WHAT A GREAT MOVIE AND GREAT CAST, THE LATER SERIES WITH THE BBC IS ALSO GREAT.
This is one of MGM's best Dickens films and contains some wonderful performances by the excellent cast.
This is a fine family film. It tells a story of a young boy struggles and his success along the way. Well Done. This is a movie worth watching.
Please release this masterpice on DVD as soon as possible.Dark humour, twisted and very violent. A must for Peckinpah fans.
The film is excellent. Something quite different from what some movie watcher's might expect. Actor Warren Oates is simply great.
This is a sleeper that is just now being appreciated.If you are a Sam Peckinpaugh fan, ypu will not be disappointed.
but i hated it that he got killed in the end of it that made me a little bad but good movie
I saw this movie when I was in the military many, many years ago.......Its still a great movie and the picture quality was great..
Pacy version of a tale similar to Bonnie and Clyde .Both good central performances making this one of the top film noirs.
My husband and I have always loved this movie and I am glad to have it in DVD! The special effects are great!
Very funny dark comedy/ vampire spoof.  Roman Polanski and the late beautiful Sharon Tate.  Awesome movie!  I love this film!
Delicious musical love story with some of the main characters in show business of their days Impressive coreographical and visual findings
"A Glittering Super Colossal Heart Warming Toe-Tapping Continuously Delightful Musical Extravaganza"
Love this movie, there is a sad part in the middle but it has a good ending! I bought it because of Gene Kelly and Judy Garland.
Judy Garland, the great actress, makes this movie so enjoyable.  Times were simplier and values were high.  It's a great, old movie.
Have watched this movie many many times. Great songs and I love that vaudeville setting. Gene Kelly's first movie! He was so very handsome.
I really liked this movie when I rented it and thought it was worth owning.  It's fun, has good  songs and is very patriotic for WWII
One of the best musicals of Judy Garland and Jene Kelly,wonderful music,plus the performance of Martha Eggerth.
I highly recommend this film and would give it ten stars if I could.
a great film that anyone over 50 will enjoy that loves musicals- Judy Galand and Gene Kelley are great
Although this is a fairly old movie. I enjoyed seeing it again. I have kept it on my watch list since I will definately watch it again.
What can I say but good clean fun and entertaining. Sharp colors and images and great sound. A real popcorn classic.
I have this on vhs from amazon a very entertaining movie.My favorite Bette Davis movie,
Dear Gentlemen,This is a wonderful movie and the product is in great shape.  I would recommend it to anyone.Yours Truly,Terese Merlo
There was only one Bette Davis and she was one of my favorites.  I loved the movies from the 1940's.
Classic Joan Crawford.  John Garfield great.  I love old movies good old acting.  I will watch again and again.  Tape i good quality.
Well done and an excellent remastering of this old movie! You will like this work if you are a Gable fan and appreciate a good story.
A very interesting film but why is Amazon charging so much? All these WB titles are $19.95 at the WB online shop.
One of my favorite movies.  I have an interest in the historical events during World War 2.  This story captures the intrigue.
Great Classic move relating to WW 2. Enjoyed it so much wanted to add to my collection so that others could view.
This movie is a good look at Americana during wartime!  It is on the same line as It's a wonderful life!  You will enjoy this movie!!
This movie is first rate.  I do not know why it is not better known.  If you like Mickey Rooney movies, you will love this one.
wonderful story, and the acting was very good...was fun to pick out Robert Mitchum and Alfalfa from the little rascals
This movie is full of hope.  Comfortable old town shop with lovable characters.  Great songs and a happy ending.  A feel good movie.
Great Movie. Very happy to find this one. One of great old movies that came out. Very happy to add this one to my collection.
ANY VAN JOHNSON MOVIE WAS GOOD.  JUDY GARLAND WAS GREAT.  TO BAD THEY ARE BOTH DEAD. MUST WAS FANTASTIC GREAT
This story is timeless. Gorgeous costumes, superb acting, and outstanding singing! If you loved You've Got Mail you will love this earlier version.
The filming is beautiful in it's very vintage, Hollywood colorful.  The script is soothing and it's just the cutest movie. :)
i gave it this rating it amde it here in great shape. it is a great movie , it would be a great movie for anyone to watch
A must for Garbo fans.  Greta at her best.  All 3 movies I give 5 out of 5!  Just buy it.
I have the missing reels of this film in my closet, alongside some other reels marked Amberson, property of RKO pictures.
What else can you say as with all of Spencer Tracy movies, this was a great movie and Irene Dunne, and Van Johnson were also very good.
The remake of this movie did not do it justice.  thou both are great movies.  Spencer Tracey is a great actor.
even though it's not hd, this is the best war movie made. it's spielberg's favorite. dvds of this movie are hard to come by.
This is so touching.  I am afraid they don't make many good movies anymore.  I wonder what has happened to people's taste these days
I love Spencer Tracy and he is as good in the movie as all the others.  It's a different twist.
Susan Hayward's performance is powerful as she portrays Lillian Roth's struggles with alcoholism and her recovery.  Very moving and honest.
I recommend this  to every one who loves the old movies.One of my long time favorites. Fantastic actressArrived quickly and great packaging.
I love watching Susan Hayward in any movie!  So glad to have her movies on my shelf with other great shows! It is plainly a must have!
i have always been a fan of susan hayward's this movie like all of her other ones is excellent. i highly recommend her movies to everyone.
Nice offer from company of old but inspiring movies.Thanks for making available atreasonable price.
One  of the many gems filmed by the Great Actress SUSAN  HAWARD  in the mid to late part of her life what a performance .  M T L
This is one of my mom's favorite movies.  She has enjoyed watching it and I was glad to find it for her.
Was very pleased. Surprised I found it, in DVD and mostly it arrived before the due date. Will continue to look for more old movies to purchase.
Any movie that Jeanette MacDonald is in I really enjoy watching it. She was such a talented lady! Highly recommend this movie!
Just plain fun.  I loved this movie.  Binnie Barnes is absolutely wonderful.  Jeanette McDonald is not really sizzling, but very attractive.
Acting of Nelson Eddy and Jeanette MacDonald is always adequate but the voices magnificent  and unforgettable. These are permanent classics
It arrived early and in good condition.  This was to replace an old VHS version. We enjoy all Janette McDonald and Nelson Eddy movies.
Great story.  Love the story of Christ and all He endured for the world.  Everyone should watch it for spiritual growth.
This is a terrific movie. Arrived in excellent condition as stated. I've wtached this many times over the years and really enjoy it every time I do.
IT IS THE GREATEST!  REMEMBER THIS AS I WAS GROWING UP AND REALLY LIKE MAX VON S PLAYING THE PART OF JESUS.
Judas in the fire????  is this the right suicide?????If anyone can explain this to me, please email me on taylor111133@hotmail.com
just a awesome dvd and it looks and sounds great and i can go to the chapters that i like without having to fast forward
It's great. Every time I watch it, I learn something new. I'm very happy with it.Thankyou so much!
Great Movie. Anyone will enjoy this. Looking for any movie Anazon usually has it even if it is a very old classic...
This actually is the greatest story ever told.  Very moving and a well done production of the life of Jesus Christ.
A gripping tale of Jesus' life. It is a little lenghty but worth watching if you get time on a stormy weekend afternoon.
i like this movie because of the character, all them are great encore entertainers.This movie is great for the holiday family moments.
This is one of the best movies made of the greatest story ever told.  I love having this version on blu-ray
This was a gift.I have not seen it but the children said they are enjoying it..............love anything as a story of Jesus.
Finest flick I have seen about the life of Jesus.I highly reccommend it for any and all, inspirational and well done..
Awsome movie  great actors.  And  of course this is the greatest story ever told.  They don't make good bible story's like this anymore.
All I can say is that, this is one of my most Favorite Movies!!  I listen and watch this movie all the time.!!
The movie is a classic, especially around Christmas.This is a must have for your Blu ray / DVD library.Very family oriented.
reasonable price ,good movie delivered on time and if you like religious movies this is one of the best ones made. I would recommend this product
Another great movie to add to your christian movie collection. Was very happy with the speed of delivery and condition was excellent. Thank u
This is a wonderful recreation of the original film.  The colors are vibrant and the sound is crisp and clear.
This in my opinion is one of the best films on Jesus Christ that was ever made.  It is moving and the film I have seen.
Awesome and Inspiring. It's like you're actually there Jesus and the Apostles.  Great depiction of the Holy Scriptures. I recommend watching.
20 words can not describe this dvd because my wife really enjoyed it so much it now has become a part of her library
a very different performance for max von sydow  a man known for his roles like the exorcist and needful things
This movie is a classic... and of course it's about Our Lord Jesus Christ...I really liked it a lot. Thank You
THE GREATEST STORY EVER TOLD IS JUST THE RIGHT NAME FOR IT. THAT REALLY TELLS IT ALL. BE BLESSED AND ENJOY IT. SHALOM
Again, I wanted this classic film for my library!  Very good quality, this is definitely a must have film to keep.
Max Von Sydow gives an excellent portrayal of Jesus Christ. One of the better movies made and well worth watching.
Good quality for a very old movie! I love those old BB movies with their elaborate dance routines Berkeley is a movie icon!
Great dance numbers and music with stars of the 1930's musicals.And Busby Berkley dance numbers really filled out this 1930's classic.
Ayn Rand's superlative treatise on human authenticity and honour put to film. One of my most loved film works nicely presented.
this story reminds me of the american spirit. it was good. would be a good movie for a class on the constitution.
How can you not love anything with Gary Cooper?  I read the book long again and don't remember the suicide.Mary DeBoer
How can you beat Gary Cooper and Patricia Neal?  And in a movie of a book written by my favorite author?  Amazing!
I have always enjoyed this movie. The lead characters are strong in the movie as well as the book. Gary Cooper is fantastic as Howard Roark.
I haven't watched this DVD yet, but it arrived quickly and in excellent conditon.
A great movie with a spitfire of a costar. Pat Neal! He has a gift to jump into the role as though it was he in the part, not just playing the part.
if you like Ayn Rand's Atlas Shrugged, you'll also like the Fountainhead....it was relevant when she wrote it; it's even more relevant today, imho.
Another classic movie. Angela Lansbury's first role. this is why you hear the term 'are you trying to gaslight me?'.
What a twisting story. Enjoyed every minute of it. It was a Classic mystery and suspense thriller without all the blood and gore!
one of the better movies I've seen easy to understand but still keeps you at edge of your seat good
Early description of domestic violence, emotional style. it has held well since 1940s. The story is almost the same today
If you like Ingrid Bergman you will truly enjoy this movie.  Black and white but still worth watching no matter how many times you have seen it.
This is a great movie. Ingrid Bergman in one of her best performance. If you like costume movie get this one.
I love old films and this is my favorite Bergman file  I can watch a lot  Angela Lansbury in her first role is as good as the picture of dorian gray
Just buy it..... great performanaces all the way around. It is the first movie appearance by Angela Lansbury. She is ageless!!!
Classic story. Absorbing psychological thriller.  Still holds up. Entire cast is excellent.  Fun to see a very young Angela Lansberry.
Charles Boyer is the handsome rogue and Ingrid is just so beautiful that you will want to see her in every second of this wonderful classic.
I would highly recommend this film to anyone.  It has a lot of drama and suspense in it , and is very entertaining.
I haven't seen this yet but are looking forward to seeing it.  I have heard for years how good this movie is but have never seen it.
I watched late at night and i was kind of sleepy but i couldn't fall asleep until i watched the end... Very entertaining really good story!!
As a fan of these actors, this is a keeper.  Also in the movie is a very, very young Angela Lansbury (Murder she Wrote).  A definite keeper.
If you like clasics of this time period, this is a very good one.  I do !
As their style, it is unique.  They are three nuts who probably had I.Q.'s equal to Einstein'.  This is just fun and makes you feel good.Bonnie Clark
Although my favorite Ivanhoe is the one with Anthony Andrews from 1982 this one is a classic with memorable leads
Beautifully photographed, very well preserved and very nearly as clear as BluRay.  A very wonderful story well played by all.
This is of the style and quality of  family entertainment that is rarely available these days.  A wonderfully done version!
I enjoyed the acting as Elizabeth Taylor was young and beautiful and Joan Fontaine acting was great.  Robert Taylor did a wonderful job also.
I purchased this as a gift for my husband.  He just loved it.  I highly recommendthis movie.  He loves the older movies from the 40's.
you cant beat paul muni for acting...THE BEST. the whole cast was great, and the movie... they just don't make em like this anymore.
This is a feel good movie I recommend highly for those of you that enjoy the older movies.  I am very pleased to have in my collection.
After reading the good earth this is a must have for my collection.The movie follows the book very very well.
did not receive poems. the Good Earth is one of the finest movies made. thank you--Joanne
This is one of the BEST movies I've ever seen. I love Paul Muni andI would recommend this movie to all movie lovers!.
t was a great movie when it came out. If you have never seen the movie you enjoy the suspense and acton that the stars bring to the screen.
I had forgotten how good these movies were, this was a follow up of a purchase of Where Eagles Dare by the same Author.
This is one of my favorite cold war movies of all time.  Great bluray transfer, great exposure.  Do not hesitate to buy it.
Must have for any cold war movie buff. Somewhat spy thriller with real action of new nuclear submarine adventure. All star cast
Transcription to Blu-Ray honors the grandeur of Cinerama. The polar sets become three times as obvious. Very, very, very funny!
While perhaps not as action packed as today's unbelievable action movies, this is a realistic adventure that won't disappoint. Highly recommended.
great great video on girl groups. Wish it was available on DVD...
GIRLS WATCH THIS MOVIE OVER AND OVER , CRY A SAME PLACES.IT IS A STORY OF A  EVENTING HOSE AND ITS RIDER, THEIR SUCCESS IN EVENTING COMPETITIONS.
it looked like a good horse movie.It is a good family movie, with a good theme and plot and a happy ending. Oh yea!Yes I would recommend it!
He may not be a &#34;super&#34; hero but it is one of my favorites and John Ritter's finest performance.  I must have for fans.
Product came quickly and exactly how described by seller. I am very satisfied with the purchase.
i got what i wanted for a great price. it was fast and easy, plus this movie was hard to find any where
Very fun movie that my wife and I enjoyed. I like John Ritter but in his short life he made some real bombs. This is not one of them.
John Ritter at his best, now if only Hooperman would come out, that would be a great addition to any collection.
Great item I would recommend it! Totally met my expectations! The movie was enjoyable and what I thought it would be.
Lana Turner is beautiful in this movie, also a wonderful actress. So is Van Heflin good in this movie too.. Great fan of both.
Such a great movie. It could have a mega remake. The Remaster is so well done you could not tell any difference.
I have wonted to have the movie for year and now it is out on dvd great loved it have watched it good job works great and great picture
Made in 1930's was very shocking for it's time.goba ,gobble, goba, gobble...we except her. one of us,one of us!Really great film.
It is a classic from the 1930's very different, very interesting, I love it.
I have watched this romantic film many times and am never bored.  Great acting by two of my favorite actors.
We have seen this movie before and just wanted to enjoy it again.  Can't miss with a great duo as the stars.
This film was THE film the year it was released.....so I am enjoying owning it now and thank you very much.
This is a great classic movie, this movie just as good as the TV show, great for the Dark Shadows Fans!
love this tv series will enjoy this movie for years to come.  dark shadows fan watch it when i was a kid. enjoy all over again as an adult.
Great movie, good story, a must for all Dark Shadows fans to see. This  is a great movie, all Dark Dhadows fans should see this movie.
Brings back the old style as before. Looking for night of dark shadows to complete the movies series. Great to own
what more can I say But Its Dark Shadows it was good to see it in hd for the first time Love it.
We love scary movies and this had a little bit of everything.  Definitely a notch above the recent movie.  Couldn't compare!
Great old vampire flick. Well made, good affects & great acting. a good period piece worth the price of admission
One of the few horror movies, to ever bring back great memories. The atmosphere in it is was it really gets me.
I like this movie because it brings back many childhood memories. It probably isn;t the greatest movie in the world but to me it means a lot.
I am happy it came out on DVD. I was unable to see when it came out in the teaters and now I can watch it at home whenever I want too.
I am glad to have the dvd version. The music, the costumes, the story. It was a treat to watch on the big screen.It is always great to watch.
Classic tv show, have all the episodes on DVD, now have both movies. This movie and the other oneAre very good.
I bought this a s a gift for a friend who weve been watching Dark Shadows since we were kids. We both loved it
I never got to watch this movie as a teen, but now I can watch it over and over Love my vamps
EXCELLENT alternate version of the TV soap opera classic, MUCH, MUCH more satisfying movie than Mr. Depp's production. --Phillip Logan
Been a fan from the start. My grandma introduced me to this show and I watch it with fond memories of her.
Item was as described. Had it on vsh tape. Wanted it on Blu-ray. A lot better quality. Love the movie.
watch the series from begining to end on netflix. Loved the series and loved the movie We may buy it
Truely a great job. It came in great shape . I will enjoy it over and over again. Thank you. ART
i really like the the older movies. this one is a great movie i love all of the stars that are in it.
great cast and great musical, Jane, Debbie, Tony, Russ to name a few were terrific.  Love this movie, beautiful costumes also.
Typical movie of the period. Lots of good music and mix-ups in romance with a happy ending. I never get tired of the old musicals.
This is a classic in the  footsteps of &#34;on the town&#34; a classic of the post war film . Very good campy and funny very enjoyable
I love all of Jane Powell movies! She has a great voice & is a great actress too. Wonderful mother daughter movie.
A very good remake, which had a lot of similarities to the original. I highly recommend to any zombie fan.
this is one of the best remakes ever made, just as good as the origional.  My hats of to Tom Savini, that guy is a horror god!
This a better film than 68 version in every way! Best of all color! I was starting to think it might never hit DVD. Thank god
Yes, its the remake.  It is still one of the best zombie movies of all time and is directed by Tom Savini.
a great remake,diffrent from the original but keeps the same basic concept,please if you love zombie movies this is a must own
Loved this movie as a kid and can appreciate it even more today. Really miss thus type of campy humor in today's movies.
I love SciFi comedies. I like Robert Urich, Ron Perlman also plays in it.  I have been looking for this for a long time.
This is a great movie and I have wanted it since it came out in the theatres and I glad to add this one to my collection.
I feel like a kid again when I sit down and watch this ridiculous movie! This movie cracks me up every time.
a really great toungue in cheek comedy ... great acting team ... the story line is a hoot and runs smoothly with pleanty of laughter scenes.
It's a silly SciFi movie which can be fun to watch about once a year or so.
This is a funky movie full of satire.  The people who buy this surly know what it is like.  If you like camp, you might want to give this a try.
I am a big fan of Robert Urich and this was one movie I laugh clear through. I hope to get more of his movies.
Not the best movie ever made.  But it is still a lot of fun.  Frat on the shelf to pull out every now and the for nostalgia.
Hepburn and Nolte are great together.  It's offbeat, highly improbably but not entirely impossible.  You don't have to think, just enjoy.
Gymnast learns karate and kicks some seriouis ass.  Former Olympian Kurt Thomas is recruited by the U.S.to become a karate spy.  Great story!
So bad I love it.  Richard Norton shines in the villian role and holy cow John Barret in a small role.
This is actually a Christmas gift for my niece who is curious about Alan Quatermain after watching the League of Extrordinary Gentleman.
In spite of its title's nefarious promise, there are no mimes - royal or otherwise - in this movie.
Interesting characters and the action makes you feel you are traveling on safari with them.  Good quality video for the price.
Great classic movie.  Superb British actors.  Good cinematography from the desert to the falls to the lush grasslands of Africa.
I enjoy older movies.  This one was very good.  It's very well done for it's day and some wonderful African scenery.
This old movie is reasonably wholesome.  The language is clean and the story is interesting.  I have watched it several times.
Because it is a very good movie. The actors are great. It's adventurous and it's a love story. Do I need to say more.
I purchased this item as a gift. It is much watched and loved by it's owner. Reasonably priced as always.
I was so greatful to gain access to this DVD on the story of Vincent Van Gogh's life. Kirk Douglass did an outstanding job portraying Van Gogh.
I'm a Kirk Douglas fan, and a VanGogh fan.  Kirk portrayed the tortured soul of VanGogh to perfection.* HIGHLY Recommend
I like this movie. About the life of Vincent Vango. Love his paintings. The man went through some really bad times.
I enjoyed this film and how it captured the essence and struggles the artist endured. It is a timeless classic to be shared.
Superb job by Kirk Douglas, Anthony Quinn, and the rest of the cast.  Fantastic job of production, re-creation of those times and places.
This is one of my favorite movies!  I've wanted to be Jo March for as long as I can remember.
Classic ! Can't get tired of watching it ,highly recommended! It took me back to the times where romantic was priority
Review based on movie seen years ago, looking forward to watching again with granddaughter after she has read the book.
Wonderful family movie.  One of my favorites!!  I love it!  This one is SO MUCH better than the earlier version with Katherine Hepburn!!
I am not a huge June Allyson fan but she plays Jo wonderfully in this version. Elizabeth Taylor is so very beautiful and so very funny!
I have other versions of this movie and I LOVE them all. Thanks Amazon for making them all the others available!
This movie is super expensive in stores... Amazon provided an exceptional DVD with and even better price... Thank you Amazon.
This by far is the best movie of all times. Remakes cannot hold a candle to this.
There have been several movies made of this classic story. I haven't seen any that I don't like, but this one is my favorite.
YES, RED SKELTON STOLE THE MOVIE, BUT ENJOYED THE FILM, AS MANY OTHERS WILL, ESTHER WILLIAMS,BEAUTIFULAS USUAL, IN OR OUT OF A BATHING SUIT
I can't believe how realistic Kevin Costner played a serial killer.  I was on pins and needles the entire time.  Loved this movie!
I was never a big Costner fan but I really dug this movie.  The concept was lots of fun as was the pairing of Costner and William Hurt.
Hollywood can do an innovative job of creating forensic ideas to complicate criminal investigation. This movie typifies such an example.
Kevin Costner is great in this psychological thriller. Buy it if you can afford it.  You won't regret it.  I swear.
I wanted to see this move when it came out on the theater, but never had the time. I enjoyed all the evil things he made and his creepy subconcience
This is a scary but GREAT MOVIE&#62;  It is AWESOME. Then you think there really are people in the world that are like this, then it's scary.
Costner knocks it out of the ballpark, something I never expected. But he did it a solid, wish they had made a second, really liked the cast..
If you are a Kevin Costner fan, this is a must see movie! He makes an excellent bad guy. A very suspenseful and gripping movie!
Waiting for sequel! This is an excellent movie!
It musr be a great movie because my wife has watched it several times. I would say it is avery good movie. Kiven is a very good actor.
Where is the sequel? I LOVE this movie! so well done..it is a must watch if you like a suspense, thriller :)
This movie was as good as American Pycho, but with a twist. Kevin Costner plays a good role in this movie.
A great thriller with twists and turns.  I feel this is Kevin Costners best role and best performance to date.  Awesome movie.
What a creep out thriller of a movie.  Different for Kevin Costner, who did a great job.  Absolutely amazing movie.
I loved this move one of the best films with Kevin in it I really love the concept the whole movie was action beginning to end
This was the best movie I had seen in ages. Kevin Costner was absolutely brilliant and William Hurt as the alter ego was excellent
intense at times, creepy, and down right good. Lots of twisted characters and a great pace through the film. Where it goes you will follow. B+
considering the power that the mind is capable of this episode touched on a theme of how powerful emotions can influence reality.
Great movie I would recemond this movie to any one, I am a Dark Shadows fan. All dark Shadows fans should buy this movie.
I'm glad that Dark Shadows continues to live on throughn Blu-ray.I recommend it to long-time fans and those looking to see what inspired Johnny Depp.
kate jackson played a very nice part in that movie i just love dark shadows in that era of time
This is aq great movie if you are a Dark Shadows fan. Some fans don't like it but I think it is a must have for the serious fan and collector.
Has all the subtle atmosphere of Dark Shadows even in color... A sequel that is just as good as the precursor
Have not watched this yet but wanted it to go w/ my Dark Shadows collection.  I am a huge fan of the series.
I have been a fan of the show for years.  This is a must have for any fan of Dark Shadows, or a great movie to get you interested in the series.
I have the complete series of all of the original tv show. This movie was very entertaining in a more current time.
Arrived in great condition and was perfectly fine to give to my mom to complete her collection. would buy again since it was brand new
I never got to see this one as a teen.  Loved the show.  I will watch this dvd over and over
Its a cool old tv show, got it for my mother she loves it and it reminds her of when she was younger.
great movie, really enjoyed the old Dark Shadows serial and the movie makes a great companion piece. no Barnabas but still a great storyline.
Item was as described.  Had this on vsh tape. Wanted it on Blu-Ray. A lot better quality. Love the movie.
The original Mechanic movie is so much better than the remake. In this movie Charles Bronson is more believable as a hitmam.
This movie is exciting and enjoyable.  But, the best part is how it ends with an unexpected twist...
i think this movie is alot better than the remake they made.  charles bronson has it hands down.  thank you.
Charles Bronson was my &#34;main man&#34; A lot of movies came my way but, his were the best for a reason!
BRONSON didn't disappoint me at all with his performance.  I did not care for JAN MICHAEL VINCENT in his role. but all good movie.
I saw this movie years ago and absolutely loved it.  I think Charles Bronson in a very good actor and this story was something else.
It is a wonderful movie. We loved it I recommend it. A great addition to your DVD collection. A must.
I loved this movie as a kid, used to watch it all the time. Now I get to watch it all over again. Its still great!
Good show used to watch it as a little kid fun family movie I highly recommend this one its great for the kids and as a family movie
Movie night with dad and the kidsDad and the kids loved it.Would purchase a movie againTHe kids are always looking for a good movie
Its a great movie that takes me back to my childhood and it was great to share with friends and family
Amelie loves ballet so I got this for her for Christmas. It's a classic she will grow to love.
Just wonderful and Baryshnikov is still number one all these years. Children still love the story as well as us big kids.
There are few things that remind one of Christmas more than this particular version of the Nutcracker. It is fantastic.
Just plain beautiful. And relaxing. And Christmasy.
I love that Nutcracker Ballet for perfect christmas season yearly. I first saw it since I was a kid.  I never bore with it!
Last saw on PBS TV Xmas special in 1970s. Mikhail Baryshnikov is the ONLY Nutcracker Prince for us! And the Nutcracker on ice is superb!
I have watched this every year since it came out.  Needed replacing.  Has passed love of ballet on to my granddaughter.
It's a beautiful rendition. I would probably order another version in the future. Because it was so good.  Thank you.
The best ever Nutcracker
just seen I never sent back my review for you so sorry this tape was for my granddaughter who remembered seeing it when she was a chid
Received order as expected in a timely manner...Good movie if your a Clark Gable Fan...
Great movie.... Enjoyed adding it to my collection. I like all the movies that are made in Africa. Thank you
I love Clark Gable and this movie is very good.  I bought this for my Mom and she watches it all the time.  Great buy.
The story line is great, the cast is great the production and the location was splendid is what a entertainment film should be. Classic
I watch this all the time.  Only found it on Amazon.  Gable is one of my favorite's -Who does not have Gone With The Wind!!!
This movie had great actors and it was truly a reflection of the times. I loved the relationship in this movie the best.
Bought this for my grandgirls and they loved it.  Will consider something else along these lines for the holiday stocking gift.
I think this is one of my more favorite versions of 'Little Women'....because I love Katharine Hepburn.  You will enjoy it.
She wanted our granddaughters to not only read the book but also see it. She wants to pass on what was so valuable to her as a small girl.
Can't say enough about &#34;Little Women&#34; - one of the best movies - all the others are good as well but this is a classic.
This 1949 film is excellent and has a fine score by Miklos Rozsa. The DVD is in 4:3 aspect ratio with very good black-and-white picture.
This was, I believe the first of many terrific shows with this duo.  You'd have to be moribund not to enjoy this romp.
Another fabulous outing by these two super talented people. My personal favorite. If old black & white musicals are your genre, then this is for you.
Great chemistry between the two stars!  Production values outstanding!I would recommend it to everyone, even my teenage niece and nephew!
The songs are so beautiful and the movie will keep you watching until the end. Try it. You'll love it.
Great movie often overlooked.  Acting excellent, topic good, overall a movie not to miss.
the movie was in black and white and dated, but still a great story with wonderful acting and believable characters
This movie is a plus. He shows how people with hearing problems can learn to. This much touchs in so many ways. It's a very good film. see it.
This movie was the best. Some of the old movies are poor quality, but this was beautiful. Really enjoyedJohnel Casey
I seen the movie when it first came out.  The DVD is of excellent quality.  A B&W classic from the days of yesteryear.
Classic Cagney plus Billy Wilder's directing make this is a gem!
This is one of my favorite musicals with Gene Kelly and Judy Garland together. It's well worth the purchase if your fan!
I was introduced to this movie by my grandfather and I love it.  I am very thankful it is out on DVD :)
great movie have watched it several times. never get sick of it. take it to work and our resident love it.
THis is a fun movie. It has everything. Romance, comedy, great music, sexy Gene Kelly and dancing. Enjoyed every minute.
Had never heard of this, but is great.  Arrived timely, met expectations.  Highly recommend for any Gene Kelly fan or Judy Garland fan.
Thank you very much for allowing me to get this classic movie on DVD. Wasn't sure I would find it. I always love Judy Garland and Gene Kelly movies.
I am a big fan of Gene Kelly and Judy Garland.  The movie features songs by Cole Porter.  A very enjoyable movie.
Simply the best film Lee Marvin ever made.  Even if you don't like anything else he's in, you'll be taken with Point Blank.  Classic!
STUNNING BEAUTIFUL TRANSFER OF A CLASSIC LEE MARVIN MOVIE! BUY NOW! THE TWO FEATURES ARE EVEN CLEANED UP AND LOOK GREAT!GREAT JOB WARNER!
On blu....just amazing, great transfer and commentary. wjat a great dea;
Way ahead of its time.  Lee Marvin's acting is right on point.  Overall surrealism grips this film. Worth watching. A must see.
This is one of the forgotten great movies, that we are still waiting to be released on DVD or Blue Ray!!!!
This film is definitely the template for the hardboiled genre, as was Hammett's novel. It is Bogart and Lorre and Greenstreet at their very best.
This is one of my all-time favorite films.  I watched the original copy I had so much I wore it out.
i had a good experience in buying this dvd online. i don't like writing an essay for every purchase that i make online.
Bogart is missed.  This is one of his better showings.  He was a wonder in an age that he ruled.  Chas
Follow Humphrey Bogart's character to get to the bottome of the Maltese Falcon mystery.  The acting is supurb and the story line unbeatable.
The B/W picture is very crisp and clean. They did a great job in the video transfer. The audio is 2 channel stereo and is also very clean.
Great movie. Will watch it again and again. Images are fine on the 52&#34;  TV screen. Extra content was interesting.
This is the one, right up there with Casablanca and Sahara. Its bogey at his finest. He's the hero and you love to see him win.
The Maltese Falcon, The Big Sleep.  Bpgart at his best.  Probably the two greatest crime/mystery movies ever written or shown on film.
This is one of Humphrey Bogart's best movies, and I definitely recommend that you purchase it from Amazon for great service and notable prices!!!!
I love this movie, had to have a copy. Boggie outdid himself here. A really grat detective novel and a really great movie.
Bogart, Astor, Lorre, Greenstreet - it doesn't get any better than this. This remains one of the best mysteries ever made. John Huston at his finest.
You can't go wrong with any Humphrey Bogart movie.  Good quality recording and we highly recommend it for those who love old movies.
This film is Boart at his best. The Falcon was a sought out prize for which people are betrayed and killed. The intrigue is classic film noir.
The DVD is great!  The film is wonderful aqnd all the deep B&W tones are there, a great transfer and superior to the VHS I replaced it with.
Great movie, with the best of them all, &#34;Bogie.&#34; Supporting cast played their roles as well. I would definitely recommend this product.
A must see for all Bogart fans! Great story, great performances by all. Mary Astor is exceptional ! Loved it for the 100 th time!
great movie with a great cast, one of my all time favorites mystery films, i recommend everyone to see this film who's into this genre.
Another oldie that pleases my husband's taste in movies from the past.  Great entertainment that is still available for purchase.
maltese falcon what a classic. has stood the test of time.they dont make films of this calibre today. regards PAUL.
THIS IS A CHRISTMAS PRESENT FOR MY HUSBAND HE JUST LOVES THE MOVIE AND I KNOW HE WILL LIKE IT EVEN BETTER IN BLUE RAY.
Casablanca and the Africa Queen get the fame but this is a better movie. A good plot that revolves around the characters make this one a must see.
There are two versions of the Maltese Falcon: the one with Bogart and an earlier one that is a hoot. If you like old movies you will like this set.
Just love Bogie. Don't think he ever made a bad movie and this is one of his best. Highly recomended.
Dasheil Hammett is one of my favorite authors and this cast and character portrayal is timeless.  Never gets old to me.
One of the best actors ever in another classic movie that defies time.  Some movies and actors are for the ages, and this is one of them.
Bogart, Mary Astor, Greenstreet, Lorre: acting at its best.  The old movies take us back to the days before socialism when America was great!
YOU MUST WATCH THIS MOVIE FOR YOURSELF. NO ONE CAN TELL YOU JUST HOW GOOD IT IS - FROM START TO FINISH!
Utterly charming anti-war movie with hauntingly beautiful music by Georges Delerue.  One of the greatest movies ever made. You must see it.
Saw this movie back when I was in college, so it brings back memories. Better than I remembered.
This is the western as high art. Peckinpaw serves up a Wild West visual feast with pitch perfect characterizations by all actors.
James Coburn and others give a sometimes humorous outlook on a rough life that has come to the end. watch it.
If you one to be a god night of movie with your friend this is the one I enjoy this all movie like new.
THIS MOVIE IS FUNNIER THAN WATCHING YOUR GRANDMOTHER FALL DOWN A FLGHT OF STAIRS!
Every Peter Sellers & Blake Edwards fan should own a copy of this movie ! A wonderfully funny flashback to the sixties.
a true gem...birdy num-nums for all !!
love bette davis,  love this film.  just a silly, witty movie i like to watch at Christmas time.  so happy!
I love this movie. Monty Wooley is exceptional!!! Best lines - My aunt was dead 3 days and she looks better than you do NOW!!!!
A older classic film that is still very appealing.  Many outstanding performances.  Even though it is dated still very funny
Lots of fun to watch.  Lots of laughs.  In my opinion, not the typical Bette Davis movie.
Use to be my favorite movie but the kids love it too. This is a great laugh out loud movie~
Lots of big name stars live up to a fine script for a wonderful couple of hours of enjoyment.
Great classic movie.  As an avid fan of Bette Davis,I was not disappointed in her performance in this Classic movie!
Khartoum is the true life story of a battle between two men, two religions, two nations and the after effects of the famous battle.
excellent production. This history is very relevent to today. not to be missed. Performances are a standout and great prodution values.
A great movie with a great cast. Even though it shows the British in somewhat of a defeat, it also shows the determination of a great people.
How can you go wrong with Heston, Gielgud and Olivia!  Historically accurate and sweeping in scope,  My history classes enjoyed watching this.
Good Historical movie - fairly accurate concerning the events as they happened. Recommend for those who are studying about Middle East
I gave it as a Gift thay thought it was greatNo dislike just pure joy in watchingLike I stated before you need this in your collection
They did a good job getting it to me.  I am happy with the service. I will order through them again in the future.
Khartoum is a masterpiece and made so by a great actor- Charlton Heston.
The quality of the dvd is good.  There is certain cut in the scene of the dance; but in general a stupendous and great movie
This is a classic Lucy movie with her antics and comedy.  Super funny wholesome movie that's appropriate for all ages
Great Job! That didn't take long at all! I am very happy with this movie. It makes a great movie for movie night.
This is a really good, clean, funny family movie. It is very entertaining.Classic Lucille Ball comedy.
I love it for trip but hard time drive
This movie is really funny for those who enjoy Lucille Ball. Her antics in the big trailer are so very entertaining.
I watched this when I was young and was looking for this movie.  It is funny and strange to hear them being call Tracy and Micky
Before you go out & Buy your First Trailer, you have to watch this funny movie first!! Get ready to Laugh!!
Lucille Ball and Desi Arnaz play a great part in history when travel by trailer was in great demand in the 50's.  Great scenes of Yosemite...  Enjoy
Be prepared to laugh the whole way through this movie. --  Really great family movie,  a movie you can watch over and over again.
In it's day this was a very funny movie.  This came nicely packaged and on time.  A true must-have for a Lucy fan.
Sit down, have plenty of tissue and get ready to laugh so hard you cry!  Great movie although it was hard to hear Ricky and Lucy use different names!
This is Classic Desi and Lucy.  Shows the struggle of a newly married couple and their first home on wheel.  Sounded like a good Idea.
This was a very funny movie with one of the funniest comedians there ever was.  I would definitely recommend this for entertainment.
This is a classic, so funny and endearing. If I want to cheer up on a dreary day; this movie is it!
i remember watching this movie many times when it was a sunday afternoon staple for the abc affiliate in buffalo, ny.  it is a classic movie.
We love this crazy movie with all its slapstick comedy and on-the-road trailer towing scenes. Lucy and Ricky are great!
This came from a 3 pack set it would be cheaper to buy the whole set and recieve 3 movies, but it is still a funny movie.
I love their movies but, The Long Long Trailer has to be the best Lucille Ball and Desi Arnez movies ever!
I love Lucy & Ricky, grew up watching them and this movie is very funny. So if you feel depressed watch it.
this movie is so funny. Lucy and Desi do a great acting job, the story is really cute. Glad I bought it
If you like Lucy, you'll love this movie it's a classic.  Good for all family members.  I bought two - one was a gift - he loved it too.
Bought this for my gran because she loves it, and I do too! Good movie, who doesn't love Lucy? &#9829;
so glad to have added this to my collections of dvd's - i purchased one also for a friend who was also so very pleased with hers
A classic from the era of boundless American optimism and consumption. Truly has to be seen to be believed, at least for this generation...
I really like this DVD. I remember watching this years ago. The color is great. The DVD is so clear. The price is great. The deliverey was fast.
I loved this movie, especially the scenery.  It's a hoot and worth it just to see Lucy and Ricky together again.
I saw this film when it came out in the 1950`s and still enjoy it today. one for the whole family.
This is one of the funniest movies I have ever watched.  It's something that could happen to anyone that didn't know better.
I highly recommend this movie.  It's Lucy and Desi at their best.I'd give it ten stars if I could!
I love this movie! Reminds me of the old days. There are so many great parts in this movie, everyone should see it at. Least once!
I love lucy so of course I was going to love The Long Long Trailer. I love lucy and ricky as tacy and nicky.
I bought this for my grandchildren, they love Lucy and Ricky.  it is a movie that everybody can watch.Good clean fun.
Funny FUN and just plain entertaining. Anyone that has ever pulled a rv trailer will enjoy this . It is indeed a classic
A good and funny -- at times -- movie about life and chivalry in medieval times.  Not as good as Ivanhoe, but it pairs well with it.
SO GLAD THIS MOVIE WAS STILL AVAILABLE.....AND AT SUCH A REASONABLE PRICE.  FAST DELIVERY WAS A PLUS+++++
I highly recommend this movie.  It is very entertaining.Robert Taylor is great castin th role of Lancelot. I'd giveit 10 stars if I could.
Fast service.  Excellent condition.  I like old movies and the old stars that play in them.  Thank you.
Saw it years ago, but movie was just as good. Totally enjoyed. Frank Sinatra was at his best as were the other members of the movie.
Good Movie it was a lot of fun i watch the whole thing and was very happy except i see never knew what the fuss was all about :)
another great aborigine movie on our African ancestors. great is all to be said. a must view for all. I strongly recommend it.
This is a great movie in the Ninja series.  We have owned it for several months now and have not been disappointed.
As one reviewer said the first scene at the golf corse is worth the dvd alone.Please release this classic 80's cheese!
Great movie. Great quallity. The movie was a hit during the ninja craze in the 80's and is still interesting for the younger generations
If you loved this film previously then do yourself a favor and pick this up.  It's good fun and worth the purchase price.
Hard to believe that such an old show, still givesme goosebumps.. An all time favorite~!!! It's oneof those shows, that never gets old.
I love these kind of movies, I remember seeing this movie at the walk in theater in my home town, Its a real good movie.
It has closed captions. (that's for all of you people who read these reviews to find out if they do) plus, it's a good movie
All of Jeanette MacDonald movies are my favorites! She was such a talented actress, singer, and dancer! Highly recommend this movie!
Think the music in this film is some of the best of Nelson Eddy and Jeanette MacDonald.  Very romantic movie
this one is the best these two ever made,i have seen  them all but this is the classic you will watch over and over aussie critic!
A wonderful story. A real &#34;love&#34; story. Jeanette MacDonald and Nelson Eddy were at the top of their vocal powers.
If you like these two actors/singers...then this is the musical for you. Absolutely one of their best! So glad that they are now available on DVD
I ordered this DVD and it wouldn't play.  It is a bad copy.  I believe I would really like the DVD as I have read alot about it.
This movie is a great classic. This cast of classic stars make for a great movie. A must-have for people who love any of the stars of this movie!
What a terrific movie this is, in every element.  They don't make horror movies like this anymore.
This was a great buy.  It played flawlessly and it met all of my expectations.  I will continue to enjoy this movie
Excellent movie.  More artsy, than dark.  Full of artsy, spooky camera shots and scenery.  Great acting.  Watched with kids, and we all enjoyed it.
One if not the best Robert Mitchum movies. It tends to keep You at the edge of Your seat !!!
This is the very first movie that gave me fright, The story of love verses hate, Robert Mitchum at his best
Should be in everyone's collection. Drama, humor, good story and production.  The Director was a visionarry for future films.  Watch it!
The VHS tape was surprisingly in very clear shape. I loved this movie because of the Historical view point of the French andIndian War.
Extremely good movie.  Lots of historical facts about Rogers Rangers. I highly recommend this to anyone interested in history .
Times have changed but some things remain universal.  You will grow to admire Marty and probably will recognize the same struggles.
what a down to earth movie about a lonely guy looking for love, saw it on cable, had to have it
Borgnine won an Academy Award for his performance in "Marty" and deserved it. Enough said.
This movies is old NYC Italian at its best. It is great to show non glamorous actors finding love as this is the real norm. You will love this movie.
It has real meaning, I love the old black and whites, the real good ones. Will watch it over, and over again
I really like this movie i have the vhs and the part where she talks to her parents after the date is not on here ,but otherwise i enjoyed it.
Marty can be anybody who is single and lives at home, taking care of his mother. That's all I will tell you, see the movie you will love it.
Best Picture of 1955! Ernie is great as usual.
This is a very sweet movie.  You'll enjoy viewing it "with the girls."  Also, it's CLEAN...which is important to me.
Great acting from Mr. Borgnine that won him the Best Actor award. Great classic! I have seen this movie about 3 times and it never bores me.
Ernest Borgnine is great! I see why he won the Oscar for his performance! A must see!
Great pairing of Katharine Hepburn and Spencer Tracy in this comedy classic.  A little dated but still a classic enjoyable family movie.
This is one of the most leading lady of all times. Her style, looks and the way she is, no one can top her, in today's world. A classic and beyond.
Love all Bette Davis movies and this early one is great!  A must see if you like Bette Davis films.
A detective tries to convince four girlfriends in order to testify against their boss underworld. A pleasant and intriguing picture.
Need i say more? She is a woman of the night.........one of her best and script ahead of its time.
I love Bette Davis and Miriam Hopkins. They are both great in this movie, although I missed Bette Davis's usual feisty behavior.
I really love this movie and really don't understand why this has not been released on DVD. Let's get it out there people!
This was a wonderful addition to my collection. I would recommend any Bette Davis movie to anyone.
THANK YOU, THE TAPE PLAYS FINE, JACKET IS CLEAN, I AM VERY PLEASED, YOUR AD WAS TRUTHFUL.SATISFIED CUSTOMER,DJKAY
Bette Davis is the Woman of all times. She is so grand, that I wish I had all of her movies. I call her the GREAT lady of all times.
One of her lesser know movies and I think her best. Brilliant Cinematography. Exceptional acting all around and a story that won't let you go.
This film is just One of BETTE'S MANY Great portrayals....Remember when "actors" really knew their Craft?It deserves 15 stars!
this is a great classic movie. I have bought more than one copy and given them as gifts. bette davis is great as always.
This is one of Bette Davis' best films. She runs the gamut from steely-eyed murderer to pitiful, love-struck simp. A true gem of a movie!
Love this movie, I seem it years a old. Old but sill a winner in my book. Betty Davis is very good in the is movie, as always.
Once again they sang beautifully together and the chemistry between the two of them was palpable. They sang many beautiful songs.
This movie is truely beautiful.  The costumes, The photography, the lighting, and the music.  This is my favorite of the MacDonald, and Eddy movies.
This is one of my favorites when it comes to both story and singing.  My thanks to the company that sent it so promptly.
Knew of their love for each other.  Loved the :"Wanting You" duet. would recommend to everyone because of their voices.  Their lives were so sad.
This one isn't as well known as some of the other movies they made, but it is well worth viewing.
This movie won an Academy Award many, many years ago. It is great being able to watch these movies - thanks to DVD's.
Way ahead of its time.  Great story, relevant for today with abuse of power and political corruption. Pul Muni was great.
Bought this film because it's an Academy Award winner for Best Picture of 1937. Had to add it to my collection.
I have most of Muni's films.  Get all you can.  He has great presence as an actor and always entertaining.
I did see this film a long time ago, and it is nice to see Maurice Chevalier , speaking English, and Jeanette Mc Donald in this movie
McDonald and Chevalier are delightful in this funny, charming, romantic musical. Richard Rodgers partner Lorenz Hart wrote the English lyrics.
One of the best films of the Thirties. The new remastering does justice to this masterpiece. Don't dare miss it.
An old time musical with lots of songs, dancing and a cute plot.  If you like this type if thing, Merry Widow is one of the best of the 30s movies.
Not accurate but gorgeous.  So much trash is on dvd, why not transfer this wonderful film?! Come back Norma!!!!!
I truly love this version the acting and the sets are what movies were about and this one of the best!!!!!!!
LOVED THIS MOVIE AVMUST HAVE GREAT FLIM ROGER WATERS HIT THIS ONE OUT OF  THE BALL PARK  GREAT FLIM EVERYONE WILL ENJOY
Well done DVD, with the bonus interviews and extras. If you like The Wall, you'll be pleased with this edition.
This is an awesome DVD.  Don't expect a storyline, and don't try to make sense of it.  It's all about the music!
I picked this up for my brother good movie with a great soundtrack and Bob Geldof as pink I saw this in the movies years ago I thoroughly enjoyed it
FIRST SAW THIS AT MIDNIGHT WHEN IT WAS RELEASED MANY, MANY YEARS AGO...MAYBE 1984?  A MASTERPIECE! BRUTAL AND PSYCHEDELIC, BUT A MASTERPIECE...
I had to have the 25th Anniversary deluxe edition, because it's just a classic & updated quality
Thanks so much.  My husband loves this movie and Pink Floyd.  He has always wanted the movie and now he has it.  Thanks again!
this video is not for everyone, but for Pink Floyd fans it answers questions in video of the bands intentions from the album.
I wanted to share this movie with my son who loves The Wall audio cd. He seems to appreciate it.
Its always been my favorite movie concert, next to queen. I recommend to those who still remember this group. Awesome!
Just tell me WHY this classic film is NOT out on DVD????????????????It SHOULD BE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
the picture of dorian gray- enjoyed the performances
A great way to depict how what happens on the inside reflects on the outside of a person.  Good moral lesson.
Mine. Great story. Tells what can happen to one who feels that their existence is the only one of importance.
I grew up with this film, please release this on DVD, THis is one of the greatest films ever made why is it not on DVD!!!RELEASE IT PLEASE!!!!!
Have always like seeing the Thin Man with the Actor Powell. If you like old movies, these are one of them.
Very nice family oriented stuff.  You can watch this with the whole family and my grand children like it also.  The whole thin man series is good.
I love Gene Kelly so this was a must have.  I have not had the opportunity to view it yet, but it arrived very quickly and in good condition.
GREAT MGM FILM QUALITY WAS SUPERB AND ALL THOSE STARS AND I MEAN STARSBUY THIS ONE IF YOU LOVE THE OLD MGM MUSICALS.LIZA DELLA REESE
We have been patiently waiting since 1992 for this movie to be put out on DVD. Its Time NOW MGM!!!
I really enjoyed this movie with Judy Garland and Fred Astaire.  It is very entertaining and fun to watch.  It's a film well worth seeing.
I love this film...my favorite Bette Davis stars in it along with many other stars of the era.Very enjoyable..good to replace my old VHS with a DVD.
A classic that I watch over and over every few years.  It all takes place in one room and there is a &#34;star-studded&#34; cast.
This movie is such a classic. Henry Fonda is one of the best actors ever! I have watched this movie many times before and it never gets old!
I have not watched a better movie in ten years. Kinda like a short &#34; Gone with the wind&#34;. Don't miss this one!!!
A classic. What more can I say, except that I wish we had Reginald Rose and Sidney Lumet around today to make movies the way thety should be made.
12 Angry Men!This film is a classic in every sense of the word.What a cast!You have to see this film.It should be required watching!
This movie explores the reasoning and the emotions of 12 jurors trying to reach a verdict in a murder case. It was fascinating, and it was dramatic.
Good sample of what the classic period in film was.  Tops in script, directing, acting.  Worth seeing over & over again.
This movie explains what it is to be American. It is a breath of fresh air in a world full of deceptions.
It had no flaws and I have enjoyed watching the movie several times.  One Two Three Four Five Six Seven
Such an excellent movie. Well written, great directing, and a fabulous cast. Should be a must see for anyone before they become a juror.
This is a great movie that is definitely worth a watch if you are interested. It's a crime drama that takes a different approach!
I got this  movie for my husband for Christmas, and the whole family has enjoyed it!  This is a study in human behavior at its best.  Very well done!
excellent movie.  great acting.  interesting story.  even my teenaged kids liked it!Amazing an entire movie can take place in one room!
I doubt there is any other movie that takes place in one setting with such wonderful actors and great dialog.  Awesome isn't a strong enough review.
Has a little of all sides of human nature.  The cast is great and so is the screenplay.  Enjoy watching.
Great acting, great plot.  Don't miss.  By today's standards, low budget, but who needs stunts when the writing and acting are AAA.
I used this movie in my Government class. It led to quite a discussion and resulted in a better understanding of our jury system.
I don't know what there is to say my review practicaly says it all really it is an interesting movie
a classic black and white film  a much wanted addition to my collection  classic actors and great actors make this a must-have
This is the film that first introduced me to Meryl Streep. She gives an incredible performance that should not be missed.
This is an excellent movie and one of the best suspense  movies I have seen.  I very much recommend this to anyone liking this sort of genre!
Great movie, plays great with no problems and looking forward to doing more business with you folks in the future!
Love this movie. If you like musicals and romance this is a good one. They are the best together and this is in color which was a great find.
It's a must have for the collectors of these two fabulous actors. I am so grateful that they are now on dvd
Jeannette McDonald and Nelson Eddy always did great performances in their movies. The song, &#34;Sweetheart&#34; is a very lovely song.
great movie,played great--and very great condition.  no glitches or no problems with tape.  as if brand new. wish dvd but glad have vhs copy.
Christmas gift for family member. This person is really into the old musicals from way back when.  This person was extremely happy to get this movie
Can't live without (the 1936 version) it! It is the Holy Grail of Hollywood musicals!
This was one of my husband's favorite movies. I got this as a gift for him and he really likes watching it.
We were drawn to this man's story because it is a true story,and being Tennesseans, we were interested in his background.A great, great story.
Great movie, especially if you are patriotic. We would recommend this movie for an audience of any age.  Gary Cooper Is a terrific actor.
Saw this movie when it first came out on the big screen many years ago, Enjoy it every time i see it. Good personal story.Of a true hero.
I can't recommend this movie enough. It is the story of a very brave man in World war 1. Watch it!
Great movie one of my all time favorites of war movies great story, love Gary Cooper great price must have
Great story of a true Christian hero who wrestled with his convictions over fighting in WWI, excellent family movie, and very well acted.
great movie to add to my collection . a reak hero and from tennessee where i live. don't make movies like this anymore
My All time favorite movie I could watch this movie over and over again and never get tired of itGreat DVD
Purchased for my father for Christmas. Great movie! Movie is not in color like the cover...it is black and white only.
What an uplifting story, and it's true.  Recommend to teachers for their classes in history o f WW1 with explanations as to some poetic license.
I enjoyed wathing this movie about sgt york and his time in service and his home place in tn and talking about his family.
I always liked this true story of sergeant york and the history in put to WW ! gary cooper did it right in making this movie
Great story and excellent quality of recording.  I highly recommend this version.  The second DVD in the set had a great documentary.
This is a feel good movie that I consider to be an &#34;oldie&#34;, but a &#34;goodie&#34;.  If you're into older movies, this is a must own.
This is one of the greatest films ever made and we are grateful that it has been made on DVD. If you have not seen this, you must :0)
love it and our daughter (who's a school teacher) uses it to enhance her lessons on WWI
Gift for the wife (from Tn.) - her favorite movie of all time - Gary Cooper at his best. Now we can see it whenever we need to feel good.
Lionel Barrymore is the standout in this movie.  The best Treasure Island movie there ever was!
good old movie. the color makes it more alive.  the thing that I like most about old movies is that there is no cuss words in the movie.
I loved Jason Patric so handsome! He was great in The Lost Boys too, of course I have that in my collection already.
***Great Film of the mid-80s!  Time sure does fly.  I remember this film when it came out & saw it at a local theatre.  would recommend to anyone !..
This movie is hilarious! The laughs don't stop with this great movie! I highly recommend buying it! Especially, for such a low price!
It's a super cute!!!! I loved Betty Davis. I remember watching this on TNT/TBS late night in the 90's. :)
i love it comedies that make me laugh are worth going in my DVD collection :) glad to hear that its finally coming out on DVD this month
A very fine DVD and a great movie. All you really need to know isits another great Roy Rogers movie. The DVD is great as is the sound.
Thank ypu for the outstanding tape you send me . I like new. i will enjoy it for years. ART
By the disk or the tape and learn how regular people can stop wars! This is what peace making is all about!
Fantastic movie.  Loved it way back when, now enjoy watching it with my kids.
A very funny movie that is still funny years later.
One of my all time favorite movies. I can watch it again and again. Be sure to catch it whenever it plays.
Much better than I expected. A great comment on the absurdity of the Cold War. Excellent cast. The whole family enjoyed it.
This is a true classic, lots and lots of big stars! Funny and heart warming. All ages will love this movie!
This is a great satire on how people can get along. I watch it over and over. Never bored. Love the drama and whimsicalness of this movie.
I remember seeing this at the movies when I was small. I have always remembered this and was thrilled that I was able to find it on DVD.
My wife is Russian and I lived in northern Califorina where it was filmed and it was great to watch for all ages.
I really enjoyed it.  It has been a long time since I have seen it.
They would re-re-release this DVD for a little more reasonable price. I'd love to add it to my collection, but over $40 is a bit steep.
This has been one my all time favorite movies.  It has a great cast, good music and an all around super entertainent.
I love the story of the San Francisco earthquake.  It is a movie that makes you feel good at the end.
Great movie dealing with time period. Like how it deals with corruption, good and evil and how a tragic event turns faith and appreciation for God.
One of the best movies of three great artists,Jeanette Macdonald,Clark Gabel and Spencer Tracy,unforgetable scenes and music.
The picture quality is good.  The story is a bit cheesy, but my mom loved it.The last scenes are the best.
Great copy of the movie.  Still in it's original form.  A great classic.  Wonderful singing by the great Jeanette MacDonald.
If you like Ruth Gordon or George Segal (or Ron Silver) you will LOVE this movie.  it is terrific.  Especially, Ruth Gordon!
Well almost enough. Eight more of the wildest and funniest 'toons you'll never see on broadcast TV again.
i loved this movie.  lucy is at her best, again, but with a lot of children.  lucille ball makes the story great.
This is a great all time family movie!!  We all enjoyed watching this one.  Everyone here liked it so much that we voted to watch it again soon!!
If you've had a stressful day and  need a &#34;lift&#34; just watch this movie. It will tickle your funny bone and brighten your day.
I am a huge Lucille Ball fan and loved this movie, she is funny as always and a great Sunday afternoon watch.
I really enjoyed this excellent family movie.This movie was a teacher.I would highly recommend this movie to family and friends.
If you are a fan of nice family movies this is one for you.  The acting & story line are wonderful.  Lots of good laughs.
Don't know how I never say this awesome movie before but happy I finally did. I love old classics and this is one of them.
Excellant movie for all ages.  No shocking or upsetting scenes.Recommend it for all ages.  This is one that you will enjoy watching many times.
Great movie clean nothing but good clean laughs. I highly recommend this for the whole family. Seen it at least 6 times and will watch over again.
if this was only true in real life then step families wouldn't get a bum wrap.... lucy does a great job!
This is a fun story about love, children and the joys of chaos.  It has been one of my favorites since I was a teenager.
This is another movie that has been copied over and over but the original is still by far the best.  It has both heart and humor.
I love this movie, it is the best. The product was a great price and received it in an amazing time.A family oriented movie that everyone will enjoy.
I have yet to view this movie, but based on the quality of the stars, I am sure I will enjoy it.
Wonderful movie with great morals. Lucille Ball is hilarious as always and it makes a good family movie. Enjoy this movie!
I am working hard to collect the classics and always enjoy a much simpler world.  This movie was a favorite from my childhood.
Excellent family movie. Pop some popcorn, turn the lights down low and enjoy!
Old fashioned movie with excellent acting and reasonable story line. If you likeBall and Fonda you will enjoy this old time film.
The product came before it was scheduled to and in great condition. A great classic for all ages. Lucille Ball is a timeless comedian!
Was all I hoped for. Great condition, fast delivery, wonderful movie. Funny and touching all at the same time. For a great night...watch this.
Like a throw back to simpler times, where family values were something and families were close knit.  You could always depend on family...
This one has more heart in it.  Yes, the new one is cute but this one is Great!  Love the lessons taught the kids in this one.
I watach this movie years ago and couldnt believe it when i found it on amazon love this movie it is a real family movie
It was just as good as I remembered it being.  Enjoyed it thoroughly.  The VHS was in very good condition.
I have seen this movie several times and always have enjoyed it.  Fonda and Ball show how good they really were.
Best BLENDED FAMILY Flick of all time!VERY FUNNY!!!Best scene is when Lucille Ball meets Henry Fonda's children for the first time!HILARIOUS!!!!
This one is much better than the newer version and cleaner for little ears too. Great movie and fun for the whole family!
Great movie! Who doesn't love Lucille Ball???!!
Good family movie.  Fun and humorous and enjoyable.  I would recommend this movie for any family.  Have popcorn with your movie.
Great family movie!  Lots of laughs and real life disasters when trying to combine two families together!  Lucille Ball and Henry Fonda are great!
I have always loved this movie!!!  Fonda and Ball do a fantastic job - well matched.  I watch it at least twice a year.  Good oldie!
This is one of my favorite movies. I love the big family & how they combined 2 families & worked to make it work. Great family movie.
it has been a great movie of the 1960s and it has been one of my favorites for years. it continues to be the part of Lucy's legecy.
I have been watching reruns of this movie on television for years.  It is very funny and touching.  Recommended for all ages.
I love John Wayne any movie he is in is worth watching at least once He is a great actor
This is a really good movie. Thought I had seen just about every movie John Wayne made but had not seen this one. Very Good.
It is a great addition to a John Wayne collection. It made amends with my EX.
An exellent movie where Bette plays two roles as the two sisters. Even though this movie is Black and White I will enjoy watching it again.
MOVIE CAME WHEN PROMISED.WORKED WELL AND SHE WATCHES IT AT LEAST ONCE A MONTH.IT IS A WELLACTED MOVIE BUY IT IF YOU LIE A MYSTERY MOVIE.
Classic Bette in double - good story but reminding me a bit of The Great Lie but with out Mary Astor!!!
Bette Davis is one of my favorite actresses so any movie with her in it is going to get 5+ stars from me.
Bette Davis is the best actress! She pulls this off really well. I had never heard of this movie until recently, I thought I had seen them all!
did not order or see Don't you know. Small Town Girl is great thank you---Joanne
From when hollywood still made really good movies. Classic film from a by gone era. Very happy to have in my collection.
I loved watching this with my husband who hadn't even heard of it before. I love the older movies and enjoy watching them as much as I can
I haven't seen this movie in years and I really enjoyed it. I purchased it used and it played like new.
THIS WAS A GIFT FOR MY HUSBAND AND HE WAS SO EXCITED WHEN I GABE HIM THE PACKAGE AND HE WAS WHAT IT WAS
Here I got again with another wonderful western told with Errol Flynn in the lead.  Will always keep this movie so I can watch it again.
YOU HAVE TO LIKE OLD MOVIES AND OLD MOVIE STARS...AND TO WATCH A MOVIE WITH NO F WORDS...I REALLY DO LOVE THE OLD STARS
One of the best westerns from the Golden Age of Hollywood.  They don't get any better then this historic film.
Will enjoy this movie again = not only did I like Errol Flynn But I liked her portrayal of Libby Custer .
This was bought for my brother.  He loves old Westerns.  . This came on time and the DVD was in great shape.  The art work was in great shape.
My absolute favorite version of this classic tale - my grandkids love it too! The music is wonderful and the characters are completely believable.
I enjoyed watching this movie. It was in good condition.It is a classic of American Literature. The cast is also great.
Excellent story, casting, music, but not enough showing Errol Flynn.  Loved the movieit is worth seeing and viewing again.
Love the adventure and innocent intrigue. Errol Flynn is at his comical best and the plot is classic. I like it better than newer versions
Who does not like Errol Flynn?
This is one of the best Charles Bronson western movies around, a lot of action. Was glad to get it so quick.
A Wonderful movie. Everything I remember it to be. I have enjoyed it from the first time I saw it VHS. My Favorite movie by him.
This is a good old story about Wild Bill in the old west
&#34;Support Your local Sheriff &#34; starringJames GarnerA wry look at America's West. Enjoyed it thoroughly, would certainly recommend
Who wouldn't love a movie with James Garner.  It may be old but he is always a good actor and I love this it reminds me of Maverick.
This is a western movie that takes you out of the ordinary, but it is not ridiculously made.  A pleasant family movie, great cast of characters.
My husband loves this movie. So funny and so many funny scenes through the whole thing. Funny all the way through. Recommend it. Hilarious.
This is my new favorite western, I watched the sequel too, but this one is better even though the sequel has some really good stars in it.
An all time favorite have on dvd . If you want to relax this is a good one to play
this movie is hilarious! anyone who hasn't seen it should buy it. it is filled with one-liners and funny situations.
Great DVD. REally liked it in my earlier years. Great DVD. The reason I ordered it was it was an old favorite movie.
James Garner is super in this funny western with an all star cast.  Well worth watching and definitely deserves the five star rating!
I watched this movie years ago & loved it so when I found it on DVD I was really happy to purchase it.
I've never seen a bad James Garner movie.  A companion to this movie is Support Your Local Gunfighter.  Both are very good comedy westerns.
Great movie,excellent digital quality! I was able to watch it in seconds after I purchased it on my Amazon tv acct. James Garner at his best!
I always enjoy watching James Garner, he is a terrific actor and can play any roll with a great deal of charm
Funny western that is nearly a duplicate of &#34;Support Your Local Gunfighter&#34; but Garner is much smoother in this variation.
Great westeren movie.It also was very funny.It was well written story and produce. They pick the right cast to play in the movie.
Love that James Garner in anything.  I'm watching Maverick, Season 3 now.  Would recommend both to fans of Jim Garner.
I so enjoy watching a character who is cool, with just enough flaws to make it interesting...James Garner is so very cool. Loved every minute.
Timeless. Great show. Funny. Something everyone with sense of humor should see. Lot of hidden  jokes in it. Great price
Worth watching just for Jack Elam,the best actor who ever stumbled over a road apple.
if you like old movies this is great, old burt lancaster plays a good part in this movie,oldy but goody.
Received order very quickly.  Love this movie, watched it as soon as I received it.
Old favorite since childhood. Charles Bronson would not have been my 1st choice casting a KGB agent, but he really pulls it off well in this one.
In its day this was a very intriguing ans suspenseful movie. Bronson, Remick and other Russian characters really filled out the movie.
Thrilling and dramatic actors and moving plot.  I gave it five stars because Kirk Douglas makes a good Character in being a Viking.
Wonderful old movie. I have always enjoyed it, I watch it a lot now that I don't have to rely on tv.
Imagination.  Good acting.  No cussing or vulgar scenes.  The writers were talented and offered more insight into a lost world
What's not to like about Tony Curtis and Kirk Douglas. These folks are pretty nice compared to the History Channels current production. Good Yarn.
This was a movie I saw before and Liked it.  Unusual love story between bo derek and the jungle man
I ordered this as a gift for my husband since he is a Tarzan fan.  He loved the movie.  Thanks!
i like this movie when i was in my teens and was happy when i got it brought back nice memorys the people that sent it to me did so real fast
This was a gift for my husband who always admired the way Richard Dreyfuss attacked his disability in the film. Very poignant story.
Glad to finally find this DVD available.  Great acting by a great cast!  Truly should be part of any DVD collector's library.
I love this movie!  It was an enjoyable and wonderful commentary on a family torn asunder.
The very best of Sho Kosugi's films.It was watchable and entertaining. I highly recmmend this to those who love ninja movies.
This is a great movie in the Ninja series.  We have owned it for several months along with the others in the series and have not been disappointed.
all these ninja movies and still this is one of the best ones and come on is sho.
Cheesy Old school ninja movie that I use to enjoy as a teenager.  One of the many that use to come out back in the day!
Hannah and Quinn had great chemistry, I loved everything about the movie, the music, the story, the romance and the scene.
This is another one of those movies that I was probably the only one who watched/enjoyed, but I like it!
One of most precious movies. One you can look at with the family. Just a great movie especially for you ladies.
I love B&W movies and though this version is very different from the book, it is a great watch.  The print was good.
I am very happy with this DVD,it was in great condition,the case and DVD,so once again Amazon has done me well!
This is one of the finest films that ever made. I love to watch Mr. Darcy fall in love with Miss.Elizabeth. One of hollywoods greatest moments.
You have got to love Greer Garson and Laurence Oliviet. This is a classic old movie. It is a bit corny but I love it.
I love Jane Austin and enjoy seeing the various renditions that are made of her writings. This was another that I enjoyed.
Pride and Prejudice is an all time classic.  There have been remakes on this film but the original is wonderful.
I enjoy Pride and Prejudice and all of the versions that are out there in the visual media. This one is fun.
A great performance by Lawrence Olivier and I always enjoy Edna Mae Oliver. The story and other performances are okay.
One of Jane Austen's best.  The actors could not be any more perfect.  Who can resist a young Laurence Olivier, and the beautiful Greer Garson.
I liked it this movie because I am a fanatic of Jane Austeen.  Besides, this movie In addition this film is full of humor
Just love this movie...have since I was a kid!  So glad you have it available so I can watch it again and again.
I love this movie, thank you for for a great price and quick to ship. My sister and I have watched it 6 times already.
Is a great old movie, loved the way it was ended over what the book had or the other movies about this book..
This classic film bears viewing a lot. These two stars dominated the screen for many years. Good for memory time.
It may not be accurate to the book, but it's one of my all time favorites. All the interacting characters make this movie a gem.
Another of MGM's Dickens blockbusters. Great cast and fine production!
One of the greatest movies ever made. Perfect story, perfect cast, and perfect movie making. This can't be done anymore.
Great classic movie with Ronald Colman based on Charles Dickens novel on the French Revolution &#34;A Tale of Two Cities.&#34;
Absolutely wonderful!
The acting and story were great.  I had never seen the movie and after having just finished the book found the movie to be true to the book
For a taste of Dickens on the screen! Classic details in black and white, a very good adaptation. I enjoyed it!
Well made movie in every aspect.  Burton and Ava connect. Someone did a great job of casting.  Well worth watching.
This movie was one I had not seen before and I was suprized at the quality of the plot and the excellent quality of the pictures.
i think bill holden was a under rated actor and the story was great about an aging cowboy the the fear of dying broke
I love this movie!  Great actors cast that gave a great performance and a great clean romance/comedy!  I love the music too!  :)
This was one of my favorite movies when in my teens.  Brought back a lot of fond memoriesand makes me feel young again.
Being on a Beach in the days of George Hamilton's golden tan! Great movie
ONE OF MY ALL TIME FAVORITES EVER. EXCELLENT CAST, EXCELLENT STORYLINE, EXCELLENT ACTING, EXCELLENT PICTURE, HONEST!!!!!!!!!
Have adored this film since I was in my early 20's - 26 years later it remains a solid favorite!
this one is a classic as far as I am concerned. I can't believe delores hart went on to become a nun.
Totally enjoyable and light viewing.  Remembering how things were back in the 50's.  Put your feet up, relax and take a trip down memory lane.
I was never allowed to dare to think about going to Spring Break; when I was in college it was nothing but work work work!!!!
Just as I remember it, and just as good this time around. I recommended it to those who like this janre.
I loved this movie when it first came out, it  has not lost any of its vitality! Debbie Reynolds gives a wonderful performance as Molly Brown.
A fast moving musical with good music and lots of variety.
I have loved this movie since I watched it as a little girl.  One of my favorite musicals of all time.
Words are inadequate to describe the delight we get every time we watch this classic musical. It is so uplifting.
You cannot mistake these characters for anyone else! It is amazing this is based on a true story! Funny and entertaining from beginning to end.
Hollywood did a good job with telling Molly Brown's story. Even though the movie over glamorized the home she really lived in.
This is a gal with spunk and class and her exuberant personality shines through even in dire situations.  A must see!
Great Old Movie. One of my wifes favorite. It is nothing but a chick flick, but a good one. Recommend to all.
A movie from my past.  I just loved Debbie Reynolds in this part and the music.  This is my kind of movie.
The music in this film is spectacularly.  You really learn to LOVE sEAN CONNERY'S CHARACTER.  REALLLY REALLLY GOOD ADVENTURE FILM
My wife loves this movie. As a matter of fact I have not watched it, so I can give an opinion, but according to her it is excellent. Benny
Teddy was my kind of president and the Marines were allowed to do what we did best...kick butt quick and hard to get things done the right way.
one of sean connery best film the story is good and the acting is great.  Candice Bergen plays a good upper class wife.
Always loved this movie but hard to find a copy for rent or one that still plays well. great price, great condition.
The &#34;Wind and the Lion&#34; is an all time Classic. No matter how many times I watch this movie it never fails to entertain.
Come on Sean Connery is in it,, you know this is a great movie hell even if it was a bad movie just the fact he is in it makes it a great movie...
i love this movie, knowing it is based on real events made it all the more exciting.  i've watched it  many times over the years.
Truly a fun movie to watch. Sean at his accented best and Candice as beautiful as ever! Go for it.
I bought this primarily to see Brian Keith's portrayal of my favourite President, Teddy Roosevelt.  I was pleasantly surprised and enjoyed it.
This is a really good movie and I would highly recommend it to anyone who loves this genre. Don't make them like this any more.
This is a classic movie and classic Sean Connery. The movie was filled with great scenes and lots of action.
great film about time it was on blu ray transfer is so clear and colours outstanding.
If you liked 'Lawrence of Arabia' then you will like 'The Wind and the Lion'.  Believe me, that's enough said!
I love this movie. Sean Connery plays a great part in this movie. It is worth the money to get it. It has action, adventure, and even some culture.
A different type of movie for Sean Connery to do. But has a good story line and wonderful locations.
I am big Sean Connery fan and I just like the way he acts.  The movie arrived in an excellent shape
It's a historical fantasy based a bit of history and it's delightful.  Give me some time and I'm sure I'm going to want to see again.
He told me it was wonderful and that he could not stop watching until it was completely over. He asked if there were any more like it made?
I love Rocky!!! Rocky 4 has the best training montage in it!! I wanna work out like Sly Stallone!! He is the man!!!
Best Rocky movie of them all. The blu ray disc was very cheap and the quality is great. Happy with this purchase
This is my favorite Rocky movie.it was a great price and a really good copy.I would recommend buying this movie
I really enjoyed this movie because it was one of the better ones to have come out.  If you haven't seen it you are missing out on a good movie.
THIS is the best rocky movie so far great and entertaining i love it  brought this a while back on amazon greatly done
seriously one of the best rocky movies, who doesn't like ivan drago, dude is intense and seeing the ole Italian stallion knock him out is incredible!
This movie was a gift for a friend and she was very happy to have it and add to her collection
What a change Rocky in Russia. I liked the change. Man the Russian man was a big guy. I really enjoyed seeing this movie.
Great story and great songs. Any movie that Jeanette MacDonald is in I enjoy. Such a beautiful and talented lady! Highly recommend this movie!
Another great addition to the collection of these two very talented people. Definetly a must-have. The quality of this dvd is amazing.
Nelson is a Royal Mounted Policeman and Jeannette is the woman he loves. The romance and songs are so wonderful!
This is one of my favourite old movies and I was very pleased that you had this movie in your collection.I will order more movies in the future .
This movie arrived on time, actually sooner... it is a classic which I shall enjoy for a long time, thank you.
My mom told me this was a favorite of hers, so I purchased lit for her.  She is/was very happy to view it again, after so many years.
Excellent movie -- would recommend it to anyone who loves old movies (good ones, that is!).
I love olde movies.  Color, sound and quality is great.  I have this movie on VHS and watch it over and over.  I am glad to get it on DVD.
We like world war 11 and love storys.  This is one of the best. My husband and I both love it.
I'm not much on chic flicks but this one is great. If you have never seen it before you are in for a great movie.
Love the story and singing.  Company is great to deal with as well, I got it in record time if I remember right.
Very good print!  So glad it's out.  Like it so much I can't remember what I paid for it, so it must not have been too outrageous!
This movie begs ti be transferred on DVD! If Warner doesnt want to re-release her movies as singles at least give us a best of Eleanor Powell on DVD!
I love Joan Crawford !!! She is amazing in this movie I like it much better than the other possessed !!
I'm a big fan of old movies and this film is one of the best. Gable and Crawford are outstanding.
The Thin Man series are wonderful movies. Great chemistry among all the actors. Lots of humor AND a good mystery to boot!
This is a great movie. It is fun, a little corny, and the dialogue and innuendos are there for smart viewers.
If you have never seen The Thin Man movies, well this is the original and best of the bunch! Just buy it!
As good as a movie as you'll ever see. As good as any and better than most.
It is so very pleasant to watch an old William Powell  detective movie series.  It is  void of blood, gore and dismembered bodies.  How refreshing.
Came very quickly, looks to be in great shape, though it's a present so don't know how it works yet.
If you're a Joan Crawford fan, which I am, you've got to see this movie.  Superb, from beginning to end!
This is one of the classic films of all time.  Good viewing for family and friends.  This is a true story.
Excellent Technicolor movie Comedy with the dark twist Lana is beautiful but Evil I love this 1948 movie Version  five major stars
This was just plain fun. Gene Kelly really played a fun part and you know he's having a ball. This is my favorite version of this movie.
A swiftly moving, enjoyable, Errol Flynn-type romp which does not ask or require that it be taken seriously. Lana Turner is an ideal Mme de Winter.
I would commend this as a great family movie!  The story line was great, along with the stunning techno color.
Another wonderful swashbuckler.  Very entertaining.  The color is wonderful.  There is nothing like the old movies  Terrific.
Always loved to watch Gene Kelly (sorry Fred Astaire) and this is his classic intro.
Great cast. I love Gene Kelly and June Allyson in this movie. This is a great family movie. I am glad to have it in my classic collection.
This is a great collectible, and also a great gift for anyone that grew up in this era.Wonderful memories, and fun!  I do recommend it.
Loved the movie and all the stairs that appeared in it.  This movie had a very good price point.  Another wonderful addition to my collection.
Old favourite - dusted off and watched every so often. All Greer Garson's movies are so wonderful especially if you believe in basic good.
My wife really loves the Classic movies and this is very good. Thank you for carrying this great movie. Thank you!!!
Talking about a happy ending, tears for joy.  Too bad we don't have actors today with such poise ad class.
Totally pleased with this movie all the way around....  Great quality video, and I received it quite promptly.  "Thank you."  :)
Only Colman-Garson could pull this tale of love found, lost and found again. It's one of my favorite love stories that never gets old.
I always did like this movie. Too bad none of these old classics were never released by the original studios. But I'd recommend this one.
This is an interesting old film. I enjoyed watching it very much. I like stories with happy endings, and this one does end well, thank heavens.
Some of the greatest movies were made in black and white. This one is a must-see with incredible acting. Very happy to own it!
As always Greer Garson was great and lovely, Ronald Colman was excellent in his roll, would not hesitate to recommend this to friends.
I always wanted a copy of this old film to see again  and again.  Thanksfor making it available in good quality copy.
A beautiful story, beautiful acting, and beautiful filming.  A story that ends well and makes you feel good.  I like this type.
wonderful story - great story - very well done - something to share with your family and firends - a great addition to your dvd collection
Great movie.  True classic in the every sense of the word.  Garson & Coleman made a great team in this movie.
LOVE OLD MOVIES AND GREER GARSON.  AM LOOKING FORWARD TO SPENDING SOME QUALITY TIME WATCHING AN ENJOYING ONE OF MY FAVORITE OLD MOVIES OVER AND OVER
Love the Thin Man series.  Good movie without the vulgar language or excessive violence.
We love the Thin Man series. This is another classic example of the great talent of Myrna Loy and William Powell!
As a Barbra Streisand fan for me a must have in my collection but also a beautifully filmed movie, one of my absolute favourites
Very good movie.worth watching.
Explores culture of Jewish woman before education was available. Barbara also directed this movie a must for any fan to own
Wonderful songs and a excellent plot.  I really enjoyed watching Yentl on the big screen but I'm so thankful to have my own DVD finally.
Great classic performance by Barbra.  Nice storyline.  Great singing.  Watched years ago and had to see it again.  Love this movie.
... is that of a true master. The storyline, the songs, and cast made this a much loved movie in my mind.
LOVE this movie! Was happy to find it!
I GOT THIS FILM FOR MY WIFE BECAUSE SHE LOVES BARBRA.IT IS A GOOD FILM AND MUST HAVE BEEN HARD FOR HER TO DO
One of Barbara's Finest!  All kinds of emotions going on and some funny, and some emotional as well. Could not  find a better movie.
This special anniversary edition of Yentl is even better than the original which I saw many years ago.  Something I will watch often.
Yentl was a fine movie with just enough singing from Babs!  I liked the storyline and it's message about life.
I needed to replace a lost DVD. This was good quality production. Love the musicals. Have many in my collection.
A must for any Barbra Streisant fan. If you love musicals, you will love this movie. It is just  a great movie
No problems with this DVD order....would buy it again it's an enjoyable &#34;oldie&#34;,  Story is excellent, good acting and  cinematography!
Brabra Srteisand proves she can do so much more than just sing - which she does great!
awesome musical about a woman who wants to be treated equal to a man.  the song are great and i learn a little every time i watch it.
Yentl is one of my favorite Streisand movies. It always gives me a sense of what it was like being a Jewish female years ago.
This was such a good movie and I kept my VHS copy until I discovered it finally came out on DVD.  Very good movie and I recommend it to others.
Beautifully done. Excellently produced DVD. ***** Barbra YOU ROCK MY WORLD STILL AFTER ALL THESE YEARS!
You cannot go wrong with a Barbra Streisand movie.  This one is very enjoyable.  She is a hit in anything.
A very wonderful story told with a sense of humor, as only Barbra could do.  I love the song &#34;PAPA&#34;.
I've always enjoyed this movie, and I'm glad it's finally available on DVD.  The acting, music and plot all worked together beautifully.
Guess anything with Barbara Streisand, and this is no exception.  Wonderful plot, great acting and directing. We thoroughly enjoyed it.
I absolutely love this movie and was a joy to watch it again and most likely will watch it again.
I love Barbara Streisand. What a voice. She plays a great role. DVD itself was a great price, great quality and arrived on time.
This movie is one of the dukes best!
Always enjoy John Wayne movies. Haven't been disappointed yet. Wish the movie was in color. Always love his war movies.
Can't say enough about him and don't have to due to the movies he makes talks for themselves.  He can be funny and serious in the movies he makes.
No John Wayne collection is finished with out this jewel! The quality of the movie is brilliant on my flat screen and this actor is a treasure!!
Classic John Wayne, good movie for the older crowd. Special effect's are not what young people can handle. No computers or green screen's.
This was for my husband.  He loves Wayne's movies and has such a library of them.  This is one he was missing and he was so happy to receive it.
John Wayne and Maureen O'Hara together! Need more be said? Set in the interwar years and part of WW II, this biographical movie is a favorite!
This movie accurately portrays Naval Aviation when was in its infancy!!!!  It's back in the day when men were men and sheep were nervous!!!
john wayne has always been a favorite of mine in any type of movie. western, or airforce army or naval
I have seen the movie before and have been looking for it a long time and am glad the I found it
Great movie, great Actors, great director, all around good stuff.  I recommend it to any John Wayne fan.  A pleasure.
Wings of Eagles is another great John Wayne flick. We all miss THE DUKE!But, his great movies will keep him going.Alan ........
You can never go wrong with John Wayne. He was such a great actor. I love his war movies. He had such a large presence.
this is a good movie, it has lot of interesting parts and is  very exciting.ELVIS PLAYS THE PART VERY WELL I THINK THIS ONE IS ONE HIS BEST
As I have said , just love Elvis a lot. He is one of the best singer and actor in the world.
Please release this wonderful Evis Classic"Stay Away Joe" on DVD.So spread the word.Thanks!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
THIS IS A GOOD DVD IF YOU ARE AN ELVIS FAN. I ENJOY WATCHING ALL OF HIS MOVIES. VERY GOOD
I love it! I am a big Elvis fan. I am collecting all of his movies. Am looking forward to watching it.
I loved EP forever, I grew up watching all of his movies and music. Also no one could take his place ever.
very hard to find movie just seen it once on amc movie classics years ago always wanted to buy for my collection
I like Glenn Ford in this movie.War movies are always good for me.They do not show these movies much anymore.
What a pleasant, well acted, cute plot movie.  It's an "oldie" but "goodie" and all should enjoy it.
Glenn Ford and Marlon Brando at his best.One of my favorites.Thank you!
This is Glenn Ford at his best.  A very amusing movie from the 1950's, with a young Marlon Brando in one of his best roles.
Super funny movie.  Glenn Ford and Marlon Brando work together well to make you laugh alot.  Excellent for anybody's collection.
On the surface this is a pleasant film but the more you watch it, the more you notice the underlying themes.
My husband was a military brat in Okinawa. He loves it.  I love that it is now true that organic farming is now the way to go.
This cast is the best.  Geraldine Page, Paul Newman, the works!  The tragic story is also ironic and even funny.
Love this adorable, enjoyable musical film! Cute story. Lots of entertaining song and dance. Fun stars. Just a Great movie!
I got this for my dad and he loves it he watches every few months it is something he grew up on
This is an all time classic that everyone will enjoy!
This is a real Classic; worth watching again.  I saw it reviewed in a documentary and got it.  Glad I did.
It is one of the great movies that was made. I love watching it at Christmas time. It is a great movie.
This is not an easy one to find.  Looked awhile.  Is not a well written script, but the characters try and the hero still wins.
One of John Wayne's best movies.  I enjoyed some of his other movies but this one was my favorite; Probably HONDO was my 2nd best.
What can I say it a early John Wayne movie .You can not beat a John Ford and  John Wayne movie .  Nice tribute to Harry Carey.A real good movie.
John Wayne. what more can be said. This movie made me cry,laugh, and hollar. Great movie with great actors/actortess wow!!!
A Western that should be added to the Christmas movie collection for families.  A true classic with Wayne in one of his best performances.
I have always loved this movie. It is probaly my favorite of all the John Wayne moveis,except &#34;The Cowboys&#34;. Thank-you
if you like john wayne the way that I do you will love this old movie. a lot of fun to watch.
This is a great old western, with the good, semi-bad guys, and triumph over adverse odds. Well written scrip, and appropriate ending.
I have been waiting for years for this film to be out on dvd and I'm so happy that its finally here. the quality is great. I'm so happy with it.
I love classic movies & this one is right up there. Leslie Caron is wonderful in it. Highly recommend it!
Nice older movie and its available on DVD.
reproduction was excellent picture clarity and resolution was great I only wish colorize was possible for any old  Black & White  movies
if you love old movies this is a great one to add to your collection won't disappoint for the classic movie lover
Thank you this was a very interesting movie....I love the old cars and fashions....and Richard Widmark...also well acted and good commentary
Gable's best postwar effort. Gripping war film with superb supporting cast.Neal Robertson
GREAT HISTORY OF 8TH AIR FORCE AND THE CONCERN OF WINING
it is a marvelous film , story, with great actors (no women), great director.  here are the flying fortresses of world war ii...the b-17.
We need "ALL" of the old musicals to be released on DVD right away so we can enjoy them completely!!!
Ricardo Montalban and Jane Powell shine in this film  So does Debbie Reynolds.  It's a great film, and I highly recommend it!It's entertaining.
I really enjoyed this movie the dancing the singing the acting it was all superb!If you like musicals you'll love this one.
How can one g wrong with the fdelightful music, great dancing and classic characters frokm a time when actors worked hard,and knew their craft.
great movie.good choice actors for the roles.  thank you.  Joanne
Fast delivery.  Love the movie.  Brings back memories of these great musicals.  Had the movie in VHS & needed to update into DVD.
I grew up on this movie. So glad it made it to DVD. Astaire and Skelton make a great team. Good songs and dance numbers.
What a great show ! an enjoyable story of real people --I knew their music - but not their names. Charming!
This is a great movie. I love that Vera Ellen & Red Skelton are in a movie together. Would recommend it to any one.
I like that I spent a small price for 7 movies!!!  We love old movies!  Thank you for providing all these movies at the same time.
One of the great MGM musicals...but rarely seen. Finally a HD version. First time it's looked this good in a very long time
This is a fun and musical delight from that time period of dancing and Astaire was so great at acting and the Movie showed his sense of humor.
I thourghly enjoy fred astaire,and this was one of his best. I always liked the movies he did with ginger rogers.
All of these films were already in my collection, so I had no hesitarion in buying this for a friend. A brilliant selection of musicakl from MGM.
This is another wonderful movie with my favorite dancer, Fred Astaire.  I think he's absolutely the greatest dancer of all time.
If you like musicals, this is a must-have.  Astair's famous dancing on-the-ceiling number.  Real footage of the original Royal Wedding.
You cannot help but enjoy Fred Astaire and the nostalgia of such great musical song and dance productions.  Relax and enjoy.
This is an excellent movie! Dancing is great! Story is great! Actors are great! Loved it! One of my favorite movies.
Peter O'Toole...one of his best! Good story...great writing and acting. If you're in the mood for a good movie, this It
I knew the story before I saw this movie.  I love the beautiful music.  It is a beautiful story of a professor at a Boys School.
One of my all time favorites and so thankful it was available in DVD format.
It's always good to watch some of the movie Classics.  This is always a good one to go back to.
This was a really good movie which I wanted to have for my collection.  I think the musical version did justice to the original film.
i got in the mail early.  my favorite movie. got to it on tcm on tv. thank you very much
A marvelous rendering of the attitude of a professor in the good old days!!! Expertly acted by Peter O'Toole ... what else is new!
A film that not many have seen and is not on TV much. It is funny, romantic and is just a good film to watch on the weekend.
i enjoyed it happen in Brooklyn best because i had seen it before and like it for many reasons
Gotta love the older movies.  Good clean fun and get to see &#34;ole blue eyes&#34; in his prime.
This film is great and a must see.  Great for all Katheryn Grayson fans  It's romantic funny and enjoyable to see each time.  I highly recommend it.
Joan Collins & June Allyson are the biggest reasons to own this film; their acting was superb and I think it's underrated
one of the better ones,  this is the second remake of the movie,and the third was the women with meg ryan, Gammy likes this one better.
This movie never gets old....the remake with Annette Benning and meg Ryan is a dud!  There is no comparison and this is highly recommended.
Just like the cd DVD is good all in all the music and the film goes together which isn't really good
I love Sylvestor Stallone as Rocky,  I couldn't think of anyone else in the entire universe that would make a movie that classic.
Not my cup of tea, but I ordered it as a gift for a niece - at her request. She is a fan of Stallone and loves it.
I grew up on the rocky movies and I love them to this day. I now have all six rocky movies that came out and they will be one of the all time greats.
this film is great I sugest you watch it BELEVE M
THIS IS A GOOD DVD IF YOU LIKE ROCKY MOVIES. I'M A FAN OF SYLVESTER STALLONE AND REALLY LIKE MOST OF HIS MOVIES.
Great installment in the Rocky series; I love the message this movie sends. A must see for the family and sports entusiast.
Sylvester Stallone is a great actor in whatever he does. He's the perfect Rocky, Rambo, etc. This is a great movie
Just love these old mysteries. They are fun, predictable but fun. I wish they had made more of them. You just can match the oldies
Very enjoyable story line and actress is a wonderful lady that makes the movie the best. My favorite movies
Margaret Rutherford is such a joy to watch in her role as Miss Marple.  She is a wonderful actress and brings so much to the role.
I love old mystery stories especially with Margaret Rutherford. She was a great actress and sort of funny in a special way.
very good.  enjoy the movies of older vintage,this Miss Marple has always been my favorite.  She is very enjoyable and precise!
Great to see Margaret Rutherford in action. Have seen this many times on late night TV so I finally just had to buy it. Arrived in perfect condition,
re rockford files. one of the best pi movies. better than harper.
Well remastered action thriller with touches of humour and a brilliant portrayal of Philip Marlowe by the irrepressible James Garner!
Film noir at its best I like the way the movie was shot camera angles the whole works.Charles Mcgraw and marie windsor light up the screen.
Peter Fonda's Directorial debut. Companion to The Ox-Bow Incident (1943).
The  people were very good actors, interesting to watch, not boring and lots of twists and turns in this mystery.  Good quality DVD, played good.
The package showed up in great shape, the product was just fine.I only buy what I like so I don't know what other info you want from me.
I loved the movie. I thought Gary Cooper and Marlene Dietrich were awesome and the film was in great (brand new) condition!!
I bought this movie for my grandchildren but I enjoy watching them my self. I had begun telling them the story so I had to order the movie.
Really good family intertaiment. Would be a good movie for kids of all ages.  I really enjoyed the movie. Thanks.
Great movie at a great price.  I remember Petes Dragon from years ago.  Its nice to find it in Blue Ray.
This has been one of my son's favorite Disney movies. The DVDs and the Case are in a good condition
I have always loved this movie. My son is getting this movie for Christmas and I Cannot wait to let my son watch it.
It was very entertaining, I didn't know it had humains in it too. I know my son also will enjoy it.
Watch this one as a kid and once again I had to share it with my kids.  They love it.
i loved this movie when i was growing up,  very touching family film.  Kids of all ages will watch over and over again.
I have always loved this movie! It's full of magic and fun! Mickey Rooney is great! Cannot wait to watch it again and again
Once again another classic kids movie. Pete is a great imaginary friend for any kid. I'm glad I bought this movie.
I bought this one for my grandchildren, mainly because I loved it when it first came out.  I still enjoy the songs and the actors.
Oh my, this is a must see for people of all ages. I used to watch it as a child and now I'm loving it as an adult watching it with my own child!
Sat down with my son and watched this. He enjoyed the music and the dragon. One of my all time favorite movies. Will definitely watch again
I was so happy to have an old favorite on blu ray. The picture quality is beautiful the sound quality is also very good.
Loved this movie as a kid and still love it as an adult!  My fianc&eacute;e can't believe I love this, but hate watching other musicals with her.
While I'm not much of a fan of this movie, my dad loves it. The price was great and it is in perfect condition. Glad to make dad happy.
This movie deserved to be put on blue ray. A fun movie and I recommed it for all to see at least once.
Everything was good, we wanted a DVD to replace our old VHS tape.  It was a good idea, to do this
This was my son's faverite movie when he was little. He wonted a dragon of his own. He wore the tape out, so I replaced it with a DVD.
Well this is my favorite movie when I was growing up and now its on blu-ray I can watch it as it was back way then years.
enjoyed movie years ago, and was excited to get again. Enjoyed singing along with the movie and remembering the story.
More Disney fun with a Dragon and a lighthouse family.  Colors are brilliant and music sounds wonderful
My 3 year old granddaughter loves this, and it's fun to watch it with her...definitely a 5 star for everyone!
this is an old one but it is good to see again remade and seeing hellen reddy again in it was really good and the stories was a good one
It is a great kids show.  I always love a happy ending.  Helen Reddy has a wonderful singing voice. Shelly Winters does a great job also.
we ordered this to add to our collection of Disney movies.  Good movie for kids and adults. The characters and music are great!
loved this film as a kid, and despite the age my kids enjoyed it also. even the musical nature did not deflate my interest
I highly recommend this film.  It is wonderful, greatfor the etire family to watch!  I'd give it more stars if Icould!
Great gift for the Disney fan who thinks they have seen it all. A must watch and must own for the movie collector. Fun for kids.
I have seen this movie a couple times and now can watch and also share with my grandkids as well.  Thanks
I Grew Up Watching this Movie And my Siblings And I always Watched Petes Dragon. A great Family Movie. Guaranteed to Please, Thank You.
this is very good clean family fun for both kids and adults alike I mean who doesn't like friendly dragons
Thank you very much-- this is a wonderful addition to my Disney collection Thank you again.
This is a great family movie. I think one of the best Disney movies out. It brings back very good memories. Great for family night.
